{'en': 'Identification of Good and Bad News on Twitter', 'pt': 'Identificação de boas e más notícias no Twitter', 'es': 'Identificación de buenas y malas noticias en Twitter', 'ar': 'التعرف على الأخبار الجيدة والسيئة على تويتر', 'fr': 'Identification des bonnes et des mauvaises nouvelles sur Twitter', 'ja': 'Twitterでの良いニュースと悪いニュースの識別', 'ru': 'Выявление хороших и плохих новостей в Twitter', 'hi': 'ट्विटर पर अच्छी और बुरी खबरों की पहचान', 'zh': '推特上识消息坏消息', 'ga': 'Aithint Dea-Scéala agus Drochscéala ar Twitter', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση καλών και κακών ειδήσεων στο Twitter', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Identificazione di buone e cattive notizie su Twitter', 'lt': 'Gerų ir blogų naujienų identifikavimas Twitteryje', 'hu': 'A jó és rossz hírek azonosítása a Twitteren', 'mk': 'Identification of Good and Bad News on Twitter', 'kk': 'Твиттерде жақсы және жаман жаңалықтарды анықтау', 'ml': 'ടൂട്ടരില്\u200d നല്ല വാര്\u200dത്തകളും മോശം വാര്\u200dത്തകളും തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'mt': 'Identifikazzjoni ta’ Aħbarijiet Tajba u Mħażina fuq Twitter', 'ms': 'Pengenalan berita baik dan buruk di Twitter', 'no': 'Identifikasjon av god og ugyldig nyhetar på Twitter', 'mn': 'Твиттерт сайн болон муу мэдээ', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja dobrych i złych wiadomości na Twitterze', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga Good and Bad News on Twitter', 'ro': 'Identificarea veștilor bune și rele pe Twitter', 'sr': 'Identifikacija dobrih i loših vesti na Twitter-u', 'sv': 'Identifiering av goda och dåliga nyheter på Twitter', 'ta': 'தொடர்பில் உள்ள நல்ல மற்றும் கெட்ட செய்திகளை அடையாளம்', 'ur': 'توئیٹر پر اچھی اور بد خبر کی شناسایی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nhận diện Tin Tốt và Xấu trên Twitter', 'bg': 'Идентификация на добри и лоши новини в Туитър', 'nl': 'Identificatie van goed en slecht nieuws op Twitter', 'hr': 'Identifikacija dobrih i loših vijesti na Twitter-u', 'da': 'Identifikation af gode og dårlige nyheder på Twitter', 'de': 'Identifizierung von guten und schlechten Nachrichten auf Twitter', 'id': 'Identifikasi berita baik dan buruk di Twitter', 'fa': 'شناسایی اخبار خوب و بد توئیتر', 'sw': 'Kutambua habari nzuri na mbaya kwenye mtandao wa Twita', 'ko': '트위터의 좋은 소식과 나쁜 소식을 식별하다', 'af': 'Identifikasie van Goed en Slegte Nuus op Twitter', 'tr': 'Twitterin gowy we ýaman Haýtalarynyň kimligi', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i lajmeve të mira dhe të këqija në Twitter', 'am': 'በቴዊተር ላይ መልካሙን እና ክፉ ዜናዎችን ማረጋገጥ', 'az': '睔瑩整摲駉礠硡鿅뇄瘠駉瀠獩砠駉쥢犙쥬犙琠駉摳煩쥬溙쥭玙੩', 'bn': 'টুইটারে ভালো এবং খারাপ সংবাদ পরিচয়', 'ca': 'Identification of Good and Bad News on Twitter', 'hy': 'Լավ և վատ նորությունների հայտնաբերումը Թվիթերում', 'cs': 'Identifikace dobrých a špatných zpráv na Twitteru', 'et': 'Hea ja halba uudise tuvastamine Twitteris', 'bs': 'Identifikacija dobrih i loših vijesti na Twitter-u', 'fi': 'Hyvien ja huonojen uutisten tunnistaminen Twitterissä', 'jv': 'Sampeyan Kemerdekaan Karo Bal Haji nang Google', 'sk': 'Identifikacija dobrih in slabih novic na Twitterju', 'ha': 'Suna gane wa Babu da News a Twitter', 'bo': 'ཌིས་ཌིར་ཐོག་ཏུ་བདེ་བོ་དང་བྱང་ཉེས་བ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་པ', 'he': 'זיהוי חדשות טובות ורעות בטוויטר'}
{'en': 'Social media plays a great role in news dissemination which includes good and bad news. However, studies show that news, in general, has a significant impact on our mental stature and that this influence is more in bad news. An ideal situation would be that we have a tool that can help to filter out the type of news we do not want to consume. In this paper, we provide the basis for such a tool. In our work, we focus on Twitter. We release a manually annotated dataset containing 6,853 tweets from 5 different topical categories. Each tweet is annotated with good and bad labels. We also investigate various machine learning systems and features and evaluate their performance on the newly generated dataset. We also perform a comparative analysis with sentiments showing that sentiment alone is not enough to distinguish between good and bad news.', 'fr': "Les médias sociaux jouent un rôle important dans la diffusion des nouvelles, y compris les bonnes et les mauvaises nouvelles. Cependant, des études montrent que les nouvelles, en général, ont un impact significatif sur notre stature mentale et que cette influence est davantage une mauvaise nouvelle. Une situation idéale serait que nous disposions d'un outil qui peut aider à filtrer le type de nouvelles que nous ne voulons pas consommer. Dans cet article, nous fournissons les bases d'un tel outil. Dans notre travail, nous nous concentrons sur Twitter. Nous publions un ensemble de données annoté manuellement contenant 6 853 tweets provenant de 5 catégories thématiques différentes. Chaque tweet est annoté avec de bonnes et de mauvaises étiquettes. Nous étudions également divers systèmes et fonctionnalités d'apprentissage automatique et évaluons leurs performances sur le jeu de données nouvellement généré. Nous effectuons également une analyse comparative des sentiments montrant que le sentiment seul ne suffit pas à faire la distinction entre les bonnes et les mauvaises nouvelles.", 'pt': 'A mídia social desempenha um grande papel na disseminação de notícias que incluem boas e más notícias. No entanto, estudos mostram que as notícias, em geral, têm um impacto significativo na nossa estatura mental e que essa influência está mais nas más notícias. Uma situação ideal seria que tivéssemos uma ferramenta que pudesse ajudar a filtrar o tipo de notícia que não queremos consumir. Neste artigo, fornecemos a base para tal ferramenta. Em nosso trabalho, focamos no Twitter. Lançamos um conjunto de dados anotado manualmente contendo 6.853 tweets de 5 categorias de tópicos diferentes. Cada tweet é anotado com rótulos bons e ruins. Também investigamos vários sistemas e recursos de aprendizado de máquina e avaliamos seu desempenho no conjunto de dados recém-gerado. Também realizamos uma análise comparativa com sentimentos mostrando que o sentimento por si só não é suficiente para distinguir entre boas e más notícias.', 'ar': 'تلعب وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي دورًا كبيرًا في نشر الأخبار بما في ذلك الأخبار الجيدة والسيئة. ومع ذلك ، تشير الدراسات إلى أن الأخبار بشكل عام لها تأثير كبير على مكانتنا العقلية وأن هذا التأثير يكون أكثر في الأخبار السيئة. قد يكون الوضع المثالي هو أن لدينا أداة يمكن أن تساعد في تصفية نوع الأخبار التي لا نريد استهلاكها. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم الأساس لمثل هذه الأداة. في عملنا نركز على تويتر. أصدرنا مجموعة بيانات مشروحة يدويًا تحتوي على 6853 تغريدة من 5 فئات موضوعية مختلفة. يتم وضع تعليقات توضيحية على كل تغريدة بتسميات جيدة وسيئة. نتحرى أيضًا عن أنظمة وميزات التعلم الآلي المختلفة ونقيم أدائها على مجموعة البيانات التي تم إنشاؤها حديثًا. نقوم أيضًا بإجراء تحليل مقارن مع المشاعر التي تظهر أن المشاعر وحدها لا تكفي للتمييز بين الأخبار الجيدة والسيئة.', 'es': 'Las redes sociales desempeñan un papel importante en la difusión de noticias, que incluyen buenas y malas noticias. Sin embargo, los estudios muestran que las noticias, en general, tienen un impacto significativo en nuestra estatura mental y que esta influencia está más en las malas noticias. Una situación ideal sería que tengamos una herramienta que pueda ayudar a filtrar el tipo de noticias que no queremos consumir. En este documento, proporcionamos la base para una herramienta de este tipo. En nuestro trabajo, nos centramos en Twitter. Publicamos un conjunto de datos anotado manualmente que contiene 6853 tuits de 5 categorías temáticas diferentes. Cada tuit está anotado con etiquetas buenas y malas. También investigamos varios sistemas y funciones de aprendizaje automático y evaluamos su rendimiento en el conjunto de datos recién generado. También realizamos un análisis comparativo con sentimientos que muestran que el sentimiento por sí solo no es suficiente para distinguir entre buenas y malas noticias.', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアは、良いニュースと悪いニュースを含むニュースの普及に大きな役割を果たしています。しかし、研究によると、一般的に、ニュースは私たちの精神状態に大きな影響を与え、この影響は悪いニュースよりも大きいことがわかっています。理想的な状況は、消費したくないニュースの種類をフィルタリングするのに役立つツールがあることでしょう。本稿では、そのようなツールの基礎を提供する。私たちの仕事では、Twitterに焦点を当てています。5つの異なるトピックカテゴリからの6,853件のツイートを含む手動で注釈付けされたデータセットをリリースします。各ツイートには良いラベルと悪いラベルが付けられています。また、さまざまな機械学習システムと機能を調査し、新しく生成されたデータセットのパフォーマンスを評価します。また、感情との比較分析を行い、感情だけでは良いニュースと悪いニュースを区別するには不十分であることを示しています。', 'zh': '社交媒体于新闻传,奄有消息坏消息。 然则研明者,新闻于我神有大故,而多坏消息也。 理者,吾有一器可以助漉吾不欲费之新闻。 于本文中,为此具资。 在我事中,我专于Twitter。 发手动注数集,其包自5异题之6,853条推文。 每条推文都标注着好的和坏的标签。 又考诸机器学统功能,并评其数集上性能。 犹较之于情,情不足以别消息坏消息。', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया समाचार प्रसार में एक महान भूमिका निभाता है जिसमें अच्छी और बुरी खबरें शामिल हैं। हालांकि, अध्ययनों से पता चलता है कि समाचार, सामान्य रूप से, हमारे मानसिक कद पर महत्वपूर्ण प्रभाव डालते हैं और यह प्रभाव बुरी खबरों में अधिक है। एक आदर्श स्थिति यह होगी कि हमारे पास एक उपकरण है जो उस प्रकार की खबरों को फ़िल्टर करने में मदद कर सकता है जिसका हम उपभोग नहीं करना चाहते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम इस तरह के एक उपकरण के लिए आधार प्रदान करते हैं। हमारे काम में, हम चहचहाना पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं. हम मैन्युअल रूप से एनोटेट किए गए डेटासेट को जारी करते हैं जिसमें 5 अलग-अलग सामयिक श्रेणियों से 6,853 ट्वीट होते हैं। प्रत्येक ट्वीट अच्छे और बुरे लेबल के साथ एनोटेट किया गया है। हम विभिन्न मशीन लर्निंग सिस्टम और सुविधाओं की भी जांच करते हैं और नए उत्पन्न डेटासेट पर उनके प्रदर्शन का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हम भावनाओं के साथ एक तुलनात्मक विश्लेषण भी करते हैं जो दिखाता है कि अकेले भावना अच्छी और बुरी खबरों के बीच अंतर करने के लिए पर्याप्त नहीं है।', 'ru': 'Социальные сети играют большую роль в распространении новостей, которые включают хорошие и плохие новости. Однако исследования показывают, что новости, в целом, оказывают значительное влияние на наш умственный рост и что это влияние больше в плохих новостях. Идеальной ситуацией было бы то, что у нас есть инструмент, который может помочь отфильтровать тип новостей, которые мы не хотим потреблять. В настоящем документе мы представляем основу для такого инструмента. В своей работе мы фокусируемся на Twitter. Мы выпускаем вручную аннотированный набор данных, содержащий 6853 твита из 5 различных тематических категорий. Каждый твит снабжен хорошими и плохими ярлыками. Мы также исследуем различные системы и функции машинного обучения и оцениваем их эффективность на вновь созданном наборе данных. Мы также проводим сравнительный анализ с настроениями, показывая, что одних настроений недостаточно, чтобы отличить хорошие и плохие новости.', 'ga': 'Tá ról mór ag na meáin shóisialta i scaipeadh nuachta lena n-áirítear dea-scéal agus drochscéal. Mar sin féin, léiríonn staidéir go bhfuil tionchar suntasach ag nuacht, go ginearálta, ar ár stádas meabhrach agus go bhfuil an tionchar seo níos mó i drochscéal. Is é an cás idéalach ná go bhfuil uirlis againn a chuideoidh linn an cineál nuachta nach bhfuil muid ag iarraidh a úsáid a scagadh amach. Sa pháipéar seo, soláthraímid an bunús le haghaidh uirlis den sórt sin. Inár gcuid oibre, dírímid ar Twitter. Eisímid tacar sonraí anótáilte de láimh ina bhfuil 6,853 tvuít ó 5 chatagóir ábhair éagsúla. Tá lipéid mhaith agus olc anótáilte ar gach tweet. Déanaimid imscrúdú freisin ar chórais agus ar ghnéithe éagsúla meaisínfhoghlama agus déanaimid meastóireacht ar a bhfeidhmíocht ar an tacar sonraí nuaghinte. Déanaimid anailís chomparáideach freisin le mothúcháin a thaispeánann nach leor an meon amháin chun idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir an dea-scéal agus an drochscéal.', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიაში დიდი პროლია ახალგაზრულებში, რომელიც საკუთარ კარგი და ცოტა ახალგაზრულებში აქვს. მაგრამ სწავლებები აჩვენებენ, რომ ნუმენტები, საერთოდ, გვაქვს მნიშვნელოვანი მოვლენა ჩვენი მექსიალური სტატურაზე და რომ ეს მოვლენა უფრო ცოტა ნუმენ იდეალური სიტუაცია იქნება, რომ ჩვენ გვაქვს ხელსაწყო, რომელიც შეუძლია ფილტრუქტრების ტიპის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც ჩვენ არ გვინდა გამოყენება. ჩვენ ამ დოკუნეში ასეთი ხელსაწყოთან მივიღეთ ბაზი. ჩვენი სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ტვირუტერზე დავყენებთ. ჩვენ ხელსახურად მონაცემებული მონაცემების კოტეგორია, რომელიც 5 განსხვავებული ტემატიკური კატეგორიადან 6 853 ტივიტები აქვს. გჟვკთ რვირ ვ თნჲრვრთპან ჟ ეჲბპთ თ ლჲქთ ლაბვრკთ. ჩვენ ასევე განსხვავებული მაქინის სწავლების სისტემის და ფუნქციების შესახებ და ახალი შექმნილი მონაცემების შესახებ გამოყენება. ჩვენ ასევე გავაკეთებთ კომპორაციური ანალიზაცია სენტიმენტებით, რომელიც ჩვენ დავიწყებთ, რომ სენტიმენტიმენტი მხოლოდ არ არის მხოლოდ, რომ განსხვავებ', 'hu': 'A közösségi média nagy szerepet játszik a hírek terjesztésében, amelyek magukban foglalják a jó és rossz híreket. A tanulmányok azonban azt mutatják, hogy a hírek általában jelentős hatással vannak a mentális állapotunkra, és hogy ez a hatás inkább a rossz hírekben van. Ideális helyzet lenne, ha rendelkeznénk egy eszközzel, amely segíthet kiszűrni azokat a híreket, amelyeket nem szeretnénk elfogyasztani. Ebben a tanulmányban megadjuk az alapot egy ilyen eszközhöz. Munkánk során a Twitterre koncentrálunk. Egy manuálisan jegyzetelt adatkészletet bocsátunk ki, amely 6 853 tweetet tartalmaz 5 különböző aktuális kategóriából. Minden tweet jó és rossz címkékkel van ellátva. Vizsgáljuk továbbá a különböző gépi tanulási rendszereket és funkciókat, és értékeljük teljesítményüket az újonnan létrehozott adatkészleten. Összehasonlító elemzést végzünk olyan érzelmekkel is, amelyek azt mutatják, hogy önmagában az érzelmek nem elegendőek ahhoz, hogy megkülönböztessük a jó és a rossz híreket.', 'it': "I social media svolgono un ruolo importante nella diffusione delle notizie che includono buone e cattive notizie. Tuttavia, gli studi dimostrano che le notizie, in generale, hanno un impatto significativo sulla nostra statura mentale e che questa influenza è più nelle cattive notizie. Una situazione ideale sarebbe quella di avere uno strumento che può aiutare a filtrare il tipo di notizie che non vogliamo consumare. In questo articolo, forniamo la base per tale strumento. Nel nostro lavoro, ci concentriamo su Twitter. Rilasciamo un dataset annotato manualmente contenente 6.853 tweet provenienti da 5 diverse categorie di attualità. Ogni tweet è annotato con etichette buone e cattive. Investighiamo inoltre vari sistemi e funzionalità di machine learning e valutiamo le loro prestazioni sul set di dati appena generato. Eseguiamo anche un'analisi comparativa con i sentimenti che dimostrano che il sentimento da solo non è sufficiente a distinguere tra buona e cattiva notizia.", 'el': 'Τα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης διαδραματίζουν μεγάλο ρόλο στη διάδοση ειδήσεων, η οποία περιλαμβάνει καλά και κακά νέα. Ωστόσο, μελέτες δείχνουν ότι οι ειδήσεις, γενικά, έχουν σημαντικό αντίκτυπο στο ψυχικό μας ανάστημα και ότι αυτή η επιρροή είναι περισσότερο κακά νέα. Μια ιδανική κατάσταση θα ήταν να έχουμε ένα εργαλείο που μπορεί να βοηθήσει να φιλτράρουμε το είδος των ειδήσεων που δεν θέλουμε να καταναλώνουμε. Σε αυτό το έγγραφο, παρέχουμε τη βάση για ένα τέτοιο εργαλείο. Στη δουλειά μας, εστιάζουμε στο Twitter. Δημοσιεύουμε ένα χειροκίνητα σχολιασμένο σύνολο δεδομένων που περιέχει 6,853 tweets από πέντε διαφορετικές τοπικές κατηγορίες. Κάθε tweet είναι σχολιασμένο με καλές και κακές ετικέτες. Ερευνούμε επίσης διάφορα συστήματα και χαρακτηριστικά μηχανικής μάθησης και αξιολογούμε την απόδοσή τους στο νέο σύνολο δεδομένων. Επίσης, διεξάγουμε μια συγκριτική ανάλυση με συναισθήματα που δείχνουν ότι το συναίσθημα από μόνο του δεν αρκεί για να διακρίνουμε καλά και κακά νέα.', 'mk': 'Social media plays a great role in news dissemination which includes good and bad news.  Сепак, студиите покажуваат дека вестите, генерално, имаат значително влијание врз нашата ментална статуа и дека ова влијание е повеќе во лошите вести. Идеална ситуација би била тоа што имаме алатка која може да помогне во филтрирањето на типот на вести што не сакаме да ги конзумираме. In this paper, we provide the basis for such a tool.  In our work, we focus on Twitter.  We release a manually annotated dataset containing 6,853 tweets from 5 different topical categories.  Each tweet is annotated with good and bad labels.  We also investigate various machine learning systems and features and evaluate their performance on the newly generated dataset.  Исто така, спроведуваме споредлива анализа со чувствата кои покажуваат дека самиот чувство не е доволно за да се разликува помеѓу добрите и лошите вести.', 'kk': 'Социалдық медиақтар жақсы және жаман жаңалықтарды тарату үшін жақсы роль орындалады. Бірақ зерттеулердің жаңалықтарының жалпы жаңалықтарының психикалық күйіне маңызды нәрсе бар дегенін көрсетеді. Бұл нәрсе жаман жаңалықтарда көп нәрсе бар Идеалдық мәлімет - біз қаламаған жаңалықтарды сүзгілеу үшін көмектесетін құрал бар. Бұл қағазда бұл құрылғының негізін келтіреміз. Біздің жұмысымызда Твиттерге назар аударып тұрмыз. Біз 5 түрлі нақышты санаттардан 6 853 tweet бар деректер жиынын қолмен жазып шығармыз. Әрбір tweet жақсы және жаман жарлықтардан белгіледі. Мұндай-ақ біз машинаны оқыту жүйелерін және мүмкіндіктерін зерттеп, жаңа құрылған деректер жинағындағы әрекеттерін бағалаймыз. Мұндай-ақ біз жақсы және жарамсыз жаңалықтар арасындағы түрлендіру мүмкіндігін көрсетеді сезімдермен салыстыратын анализ жасаймыз.', 'ms': 'Social media plays a great role in news dissemination which includes good and bad news.  Bagaimanapun, kajian menunjukkan bahawa berita, secara umum, mempunyai kesan yang signifikan pada status mental kita dan bahawa kesan ini lebih dalam berita buruk. Situasi yang ideal adalah bahawa kita mempunyai alat yang boleh membantu penapis jenis berita yang kita tidak mahu konsum. Dalam kertas ini, kita menyediakan dasar untuk alat seperti itu. Dalam kerja kita, kita fokus pada Twitter. Kami melepaskan set data yang dicatat secara manual yang mengandungi 6,853 tweet dari 5 kategori topik yang berbeza. Setiap tweet dicatat dengan label yang baik dan buruk. We also investigate various machine learning systems and features and evaluate their performance on the newly generated dataset.  Kami juga melakukan analisis perbandingan dengan perasaan yang menunjukkan bahawa perasaan sendirian tidak cukup untuk membezakan antara berita baik dan berita buruk.', 'lt': 'Social media plays a great role in news dissemination which includes good and bad news.  Tačiau tyrimai rodo, kad naujienos apskritai daro didelį poveikį mūsų protinei būklei ir kad ši įtaka yra labiau blogose naujienose. Ideali padėtis būtų ta, kad turime priemonę, kuri padėtų išskirti naujienų, kurių nenorime suvartoti, tipą. Šiame dokumente mes suteikiame tokios priemonės pagrindą. Mūsų darbe mes sutelkiame dėmesį į Twitter. We release a manually annotated dataset containing 6,853 tweets from 5 different topical categories.  Each tweet is annotated with good and bad labels.  We also investigate various machine learning systems and features and evaluate their performance on the newly generated dataset.  Taip pat atliekame lyginamąją analizę su jausmais, rodančiais, kad vien jausmas nepakanka geroms ir blogoms žinioms atskirti.', 'ml': 'നല്ല വാര്\u200dത്തകളും ചീത്ത വാര്\u200dത്തകളും ഉള്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്ന സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയ വിവേചനത്തില്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ പ്രവർത് എന്നാലും പഠനം കാണിക്കുന്നത് പൊതുവായി വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മാനസിക നിയമങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വലിയ പ്രഭാവം ഉണ്ടെന്നും ഈ പ്രഭാ ഒരു ആശയിക്കുന്ന സാഹചര്യം നമുക്ക് ഒരു ഉപകരണമുണ്ട്, അത് നമുക്ക് ഭക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d ആഗ്രഹിക്കാത്ത വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d ഫില്\u200d ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഇത്തരം ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ഞങ്ങളുടെ ജോലിയില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ടൂട്ടറില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. We release a manually annotated dataset containing 6,853 tweets from 5 different topical categories.  എല്ലാ ടൂട്ടിയും നല്ല ല ലേബലുകളും കൊണ്ട് വിഷമിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത യന്ത്ര പഠിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തെയും വിശേഷതകളെയും അന്വേഷിക്കുകയും പുതിയ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d അവരുടെ പ്ര നല്ല വാര്\u200dത്തകളും ചീത്ത വാര്\u200dത്തകളും തമ്മില്\u200d വ്യത്യാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് മാത്രമാണെന്ന് കാണിക്കുന്ന വിചാരങ്ങളുമാ', 'mt': 'Il-midja soċjali għandha rwol kbir fit-tixrid tal-a ħbarijiet li jinkludi aħbarijiet tajbin u ħżiena. However, studies show that news, in general, has a significant impact on our mental stature and that this influence is more in bad news.  Sitwazzjoni ideali tkun li għandna għodda li tista’ tgħin biex tiffiltra t-tip ta’ a ħbarijiet li ma nixtiequx nikkonsumaw. F’dan id-dokument, nipprovdu l-bażi għal tali għodda. In our work, we focus on Twitter.  We release a manually annotated dataset containing 6,853 tweets from 5 different topical categories.  Kull tweet huwa annotat b’tikketti tajbin u ħżiena. Investigaw ukoll diversi sistemi u karatteristiċi ta’ tagħlim bil-magni u jivvalutaw il-prestazzjoni tagħhom fuq is-sett ta’ dejta ġġenerat mill-ġdid. We also perform a comparative analysis with sentiments showing that sentiment alone is not enough to distinguish between good and bad news.', 'pl': 'Media społecznościowe odgrywają dużą rolę w upowszechnianiu wiadomości, które obejmują dobre i złe wiadomości. Badania pokazują jednak, że wiadomości, ogólnie rzecz biorąc, mają znaczący wpływ na nasz stan psychiczny i że wpływ ten jest bardziej zły. Idealną sytuacją byłoby to, że mamy narzędzie, które może pomóc wyfiltrować rodzaj wiadomości, których nie chcemy konsumować. W niniejszym artykule dostarczamy podstawy do takiego narzędzia. W naszej pracy skupiamy się na Twitterze. Wydajemy ręcznie adnotatowany zestaw danych zawierający 6,853 tweety z pięciu różnych kategorii tematycznych. Każdy tweet jest opatrzony dobrymi i złymi etykietami. Badamy również różne systemy i funkcje uczenia maszynowego oraz oceniamy ich wydajność na nowo generowanym zbiorze danych. Przeprowadzamy również analizę porównawczą ze sentymentami pokazującą, że samo sentyment nie wystarczy do rozróżnienia między dobrą a złą wiadomością.', 'ro': 'Social media joacă un rol important în difuzarea știrilor, care include știri bune și rele. Cu toate acestea, studiile arată că știrile, în general, au un impact semnificativ asupra staturii noastre mentale și că această influență este mai mult în veștile proaste. O situație ideală ar fi că avem un instrument care poate ajuta la filtrarea tipului de știri pe care nu dorim să le consumăm. În această lucrare, oferim baza pentru un astfel de instrument. În munca noastră, ne concentrăm pe Twitter. Lansăm un set de date adnotat manual care conține 6.853 de tweeturi din 5 categorii diferite de actualitate. Fiecare tweet este adnotat cu etichete bune și rele. De asemenea, investigăm diferite sisteme și caracteristici de machine learning și evaluăm performanța acestora pe setul de date nou generat. De asemenea, efectuăm o analiză comparativă cu sentimentele care arată că sentimentul singur nu este suficient pentru a distinge între vestea bună și cea rea.', 'si': 'සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමත්වය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා නරක ආරංචියක් සමග හොඳයි නරක ආරංචියක්. නමුත්, අධ්\u200dයානය පෙන්වන්නේ වාර්තාව, සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්, අපේ මානසික ප්\u200dරමාණයේ වැදගත් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් තියෙනවා  අදහස් තත්වයක් තමයි අපිට උපකරණයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් අපිට අවශ්\u200dය නැති වුණු වර්තනයක් පරික්ෂා කරන්න උදව මේ පත්තරේ අපි ඒ වගේ උපකරණයක් වෙනුවෙන් අධාර්ථයක් දෙන්නේ. අපේ වැඩේ අපි ට්විටර් එකේ බලන්න. අපි වෙනස් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්ණ වර්ගයක් පස්සේ 6,853 ට්විට් තියෙන දත්ත සෙට් එකක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා. හැම ට්විට් එකක්ම හොඳයි නරක ලේබල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනවා. අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා විවිධ පණිවිධ පද්ධතිය සහ අවශ්\u200dයාවය සහ ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරමාණය අළුත් නිර්මාණය අපි හොඳයි නරක වාර්තාවක් අතර විශේෂයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පෙන්වන්නේ.', 'so': 'Macluumaadka bulshada ayaa qayb weyn ku ciyaaraya ku saabsan faafiyada wararka, kaas oo ku jira war wanaagsan iyo war xun. However, studies show that news, in general, has a significant impact on our mental stature and that this influence is more in bad news.  An ideal situation would be that we have a tool that can help to filter out the type of news we do not want to consume.  Qoraalkan waxaan ku siinaynaa asalka qalabkan. Shaqadeena, waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa Twitterka. Waxaannu u dirnaa sawirada macluumaadka si rasmi ah oo ay ku jirto 6,853 tweeti oo ka mid ah 5 kooxo oo kala duduwan. Tweet kasta waxaa lagu dhibaataystaa calaamado wanaagsan oo xun. Sidoo kale waxaynu baaraynaa nidaamka waxbarashada iyo tababaro kala duduwan, waxaana qiimeynaynaa sameyntooda sameynta taariikhda cusub ee la sameeyay. Anaguna waxaynu sameynaa baaritaan isbardhig ah oo la jeedo fikrada oo keliya kuma filna in loo kala soocaa macluumaadka wanaagga iyo macluumaadka xunxun.', 'sv': 'Sociala medier spelar en stor roll i nyhetsspridningen som inkluderar goda och dåliga nyheter. Studier visar dock att nyheter i allmänhet har en betydande inverkan på vår mentala status och att detta påverkar mer i dåliga nyheter. En idealisk situation skulle vara att vi har ett verktyg som kan hjälpa till att filtrera ut den typ av nyheter vi inte vill konsumera. I denna uppsats ger vi grunden för ett sådant verktyg. I vårt arbete fokuserar vi på Twitter. Vi släpper ett manuellt kommenterat dataset som innehåller 6 853 tweets från 5 olika aktuella kategorier. Varje tweet är märkt med bra och dåliga etiketter. Vi undersöker även olika maskininlärningssystem och funktioner och utvärderar deras prestanda på den nygenererade datauppsättningen. Vi gör också en jämförande analys med känslor som visar att enbart känslor inte räcker för att skilja mellan goda och dåliga nyheter.', 'ta': 'சமூக ஊடகங்கள் நல்ல மற்றும் கெட்ட செய்திகளை சேர்க்கும் செய்தி பரப்பில் ஒரு பெரிய பங்கை விளையாடுக ஆயினும், படிப்பாடுகள் பொதுவாக, செய்திகள் எங்கள் மனநிலையின் மீது ஒரு முக்கியமான பாதிப்பு உள்ளது மற்றும் இந்த த விள ஒரு சிந்தனையான நிலைமை என்னவென்றால் நாம் உணவு விரும்பாத செய்திகளை வடிகட்ட உதவும் கருவி இருக்கும். இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இவ்வாறு ஒரு கருவிக்கு அடிப்படையை வழங்குகிறோம். எங்கள் வேலையில், நாங்கள் Twitter மீது கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம். நாம் ஒரு கைமுறையாக அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட தரவுத்தளத்தை வெளியிடுகிறோம். இதில் 6,853 டிவிட்டர் உள்ளது 5 வேறு வித்த ஒவ்வொரு தொடர்பும் நல்ல மற்றும் கெட்ட சிட்டைகள் கொண்டு குழப்பமாக இருக்கிறது. நாம் புதிய உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தரவுத்தளத்தில் அவர்களுடைய செயல்பாட்டை மதிப்பிட வேண்டும். நாம் ஒரு ஒப்பிடுப்பு ஆய்வு செய்து உணர்வுகளுடன் செய்து காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்று உணர்வு மட்டுமே நல்ல மற்றும் கெட்ட', 'ur': 'سوسیل میڈیا اخبار پھیلانے میں بہت بڑا رغم لگا رہا ہے جس میں اچھی اور بری خبریں شامل ہیں۔ However, studies show that news, in general, has a significant impact on our mental stature and that this influence is more in bad news. ایک ایڈیل موقعیت یہ ہوتی ہے کہ ہمارے پاس ایک ابزار ہے جو ہمیں مصرف نہ کرنا چاہتا ہے اس طرح کی خبروں کا فیلٹر کرنے کے لئے مدد کر سکتا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایسی ابزار کے لئے بنیاد دیتے ہیں۔ ہمارے کام میں ہم توئیٹر پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک دستی کے ذریعہ مطلع ڈیٹ سٹ کو چھوڑ دیتے ہیں جو پانچ مختلف ٹوپیٹ کاٹیوں سے 6,853 ٹویٹ ہے۔ ہر ٹویٹ کو اچھی اور بری لابلوں سے آگاہ کیا جاتا ہے۔ ہم نے بھی مختلف ماشین یادگیری سیستموں اور فکرتوں کی تحقیق کریں اور ان کی عملکرد نیا پیدا ہوئی ڈیٹ سٹ پر ارزش کریں۔ ہم نے بھی احساسات کے ساتھ ایک مقایسہ تحلیل کر رہے ہیں کہ احساسات صرف اچھی اور بری خبر کے درمیان تفریق کرنے کے لئے کافی نہیں ہے۔', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчид сайн, муу мэдээг нэмэгдүүлэхэд гайхалтай rol хийдэг. Гэвч судалгаанууд мэдээллийн хувьд бидний сэтгэл санааны хувьд маш чухал нөлөөтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ нөлөө нь муу мэдээнд илүү их байдаг. Идеалтай нөхцөл нь бидэнд хэрэглэхийг хүсэхгүй мэдээг шалгахад тусалж чадна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид ийм хэрэгслийн суурь хангадаг. Ажилдаа бид Твиттерт анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Бид 5 өөр сэдвийн категориудаас 6,853 tweets агуулсан өгөгдлийн санг гараараа гаргаж өгдөг. Твитт бүр сайн, муу тэмдэглэгддэг. Мөн бид машины суралцах систем болон чадварыг судалж, шинэ үүсгэсэн өгөгдлийн санд ажиллагааг үнэлэх болно. Мөн бид сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй харьцуулсан шинжилгээ хийдэг. Яг л сэтгэл хөдлөл нь сайн болон муу мэдээний хоорондоо ялгах хангалттай биш гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Socielle medier spelar ein stor rolle i nyhetssspredning som inneheld gode og dårlige nyhetar. Studiene viser imidlertid at nyhetar generelt har ein signifikant effekt på psykisk status vårt og at denne effekten er meir i dårlige nyhetar. Eit ideell situasjon vil vera at vi har eit verktøy som kan hjelpa til å filtrera ut typen nyhetar vi ikkje vil bruka. I denne papiret gir vi grunnlag for slike verktøyet. I arbeidet vårt fokuserer vi på Twitter. Vi løyser ei manuelt merkt dataset som inneheld 6 853 tweets frå 5 forskjellige temakategoriar. Kvar tweet er merkt med gode og dårlige merkelappar. Vi undersøker også ulike maskinelæringssystemar og funksjonar og evaluerer utviklinga sine på den nye genererte datasettet. Vi utfører også ein sammenlignbare analyse med følelser som viser at følelsen alene er ikkje nok til å forskjelle mellom gode og dårlige nyhetar.', 'sr': 'Društveni mediji imaju veliku ulogu u širenju vijesti koja uključuje dobre i loše vijesti. Međutim, ispitivanja pokazuju da vijesti uopšte imaju značajan uticaj na našu mentalnu statusu i da je taj uticaj više u lošim vijestima. Idealna situacija bi bila da imamo alat koji može pomoći da filtrira vrste vesti koje ne želimo da potrošimo. U ovom papiru pružamo osnovu za takav alat. U našem poslu, fokusiramo se na Twitter. Puštamo ruèno annotiranu setu podataka koja sadrži 6 853 tweets iz 5 različitih temalnih kategorija. Svaki tweet je annotiran dobrim i lošim etiketama. Istražujemo i različite sisteme za učenje mašina i karakteristike i procjenjujemo njihovu provedbu na novom generisanom setu podataka. Takoðe izvršavamo komparativnu analizu sa oseæanjima koji pokazuju da oseæaj nije dovoljno da se razlikuje izmeðu dobrih i loših vijesti.', 'uz': "Name Lekin o'qituvchilar umuman, yani ma'lumotlar mening mental holatimizga juda muhim effekti ko'rsatadi va bu muvaffaqiyatlar yomon xabar bilan ko'proq. Bu fikr holatda bizda ishlatmaydigan xabar turlarini filterlashga yordam beradi. Bu qogʻozda biz bu asboblar uchun asosini yaratdik. Biz ishimizda Twitter bilan foydalanamiz. We release a manually annotated dataset containing 6,853 tweets from 5 different topical categories.  Har bir tweeti yaxshi va yomon yomon teglar bilan harakat qiladi. Biz boshqa mashinalar o'rganish tizimlarini va xususiyatlarni qidirishimiz va yangi yaratilgan maʼlumotlar sohasida ularning amalni qiymatimiz. Biz o'ylab o'ylab, faqat o'ylab o'ylab, yaxshi va yomon xabar orasidagi ajratishga yetarli narsalarni bajaramiz.", 'vi': 'Cách mạng xã hội đóng một vai trò lớn trong việc truyền tin, gồm cả tin tốt và tin xấu. Tuy nhiên, nghiên cứu cho thấy tin tức có ảnh hưởng lớn đến trạng thái tinh thần của chúng ta và ảnh hưởng xấu hơn nhiều. Một tình huống lý tưởng là chúng ta có một công cụ có thể giúp lọc ra loại tin tức mà chúng ta không muốn tiêu thụ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi tạo ra cơ sở cho một công cụ như vậy. Trong công việc, chúng tôi tập trung vào Twitter. Chúng tôi phát hành một bộ dữ liệu ghi chú bằng tay chứa 6,83n tweet từ năm loại chính sách khác nhau. Mỗi tweet được ghi chú bằng nhãn tốt và xấu. Chúng tôi cũng điều tra các hệ thống học máy và các tính năng và đánh giá khả năng của chúng trên bộ dữ liệu mới tạo ra. Chúng tôi cũng phân tích tương đối với những tình cảm cho thấy rằng một mình cảm xúc không đủ để phân biệt giữa tin tốt và tin xấu.', 'da': 'Sociale medier spiller en stor rolle i nyhedsudbredelsen, som omfatter gode og dårlige nyheder. Undersøgelser viser imidlertid, at nyheder generelt har en betydelig indflydelse på vores mentale status, og at denne indflydelse mere er i dårlige nyheder. En ideel situation ville være, at vi har et værktøj, der kan hjælpe med at filtrere den type nyheder, vi ikke ønsker at forbruge. I denne artikel giver vi grundlaget for et sådant værktøj. I vores arbejde fokuserer vi på Twitter. Vi udgiver et manuelt annoteret datasæt indeholdende 6.853 tweets fra 5 forskellige aktuelle kategorier. Hver tweet er annoteret med gode og dårlige etiketter. Vi undersøger også forskellige maskinlæringssystemer og funktioner og evaluerer deres ydeevne på det nyligt genererede datasæt. Vi foretager også en sammenlignende analyse med følelser, der viser, at følelser alene ikke er nok til at skelne mellem gode og dårlige nyheder.', 'nl': 'Sociale media spelen een grote rol in de verspreiding van nieuws, waaronder goed en slecht nieuws. Uit studies blijkt echter dat nieuws over het algemeen een aanzienlijke impact heeft op onze mentale status en dat deze invloed meer slecht nieuws is. Een ideale situatie zou zijn dat we een tool hebben die kan helpen om het soort nieuws dat we niet willen consumeren uit te filteren. In deze paper leggen we de basis voor een dergelijk instrument. In ons werk richten we ons op Twitter. We brengen een handmatig geannoteerde dataset uit met 6.853 tweets uit vijf verschillende actuele categorieën. Elke tweet wordt geannoteerd met goede en slechte labels. We onderzoeken ook verschillende machine learning systemen en functies en evalueren hun prestaties op de nieuw gegenereerde dataset. We voeren ook een vergelijkende analyse uit met sentimenten waaruit blijkt dat sentiment alleen niet voldoende is om een onderscheid te maken tussen goed en slecht nieuws.', 'de': 'Soziale Medien spielen eine große Rolle bei der Verbreitung von Nachrichten, einschließlich guter und schlechter Nachrichten. Studien zeigen jedoch, dass Nachrichten im Allgemeinen einen erheblichen Einfluss auf unsere mentale Statur haben und dass dieser Einfluss eher schlecht ist. Eine ideale Situation wäre, dass wir ein Tool haben, das helfen kann, die Art von Nachrichten herauszufiltern, die wir nicht konsumieren möchten. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir die Grundlage für ein solches Tool zur Verfügung. In unserer Arbeit konzentrieren wir uns auf Twitter. Wir veröffentlichen einen manuell kommentierten Datensatz mit 6.853 Tweets aus fünf verschiedenen Themenkategorien. Jeder Tweet wird mit guten und schlechten Labels kommentiert. Darüber hinaus untersuchen wir verschiedene Machine Learning Systeme und Features und bewerten deren Performance auf dem neu generierten Datensatz. Wir führen auch eine vergleichende Analyse mit Sentiments durch, die zeigt, dass Sentiment allein nicht ausreicht, um zwischen guten und schlechten Nachrichten zu unterscheiden.', 'bg': 'Социалните медии играят голяма роля в разпространението на новини, което включва добри и лоши новини. Проучванията обаче показват, че новините като цяло оказват значително влияние върху психическия ни статус и че това влияние е повече в лошите новини. Идеална ситуация би била, че имаме инструмент, който може да помогне за филтриране на вида новини, които не искаме да консумираме. В тази статия ние предоставяме основата за такъв инструмент. В нашата работа се фокусираме върху Туитър. Издаваме ръчно анотиран набор от данни, съдържащ 6 853 туита от 5 различни тематични категории. Всеки туит е анотиран с добри и лоши етикети. Също така изследваме различни системи и функции за машинно обучение и оценяваме тяхната ефективност на новогенерирания набор от данни. Извършваме и сравнителен анализ с настроения, които показват, че само сантименталността не е достатъчна за разграничаване между добри и лоши новини.', 'hr': 'Društveni mediji imaju veliku ulogu u širenju vijesti koja uključuje dobre i loše vijesti. Međutim, ispitivanja pokazuju da vijesti uopće imaju značajan utjecaj na našu mentalnu statusu i da je taj utjecaj više u lošim vijestima. Idealna situacija bi bila da imamo alat koji može pomoći filtrirati vrste vijesti koje ne želimo potrošiti. U ovom papiru pružamo temelj za takav alat. U našem poslu, fokusiramo se na Twitter. Puštamo ručno označene podatke koje sadrže 6 853 tweets iz 5 različitih temalnih kategorija. Svaki tweet je annotiran dobrim i lošim etiketama. Istražujemo i različite sustave za učenje strojeva i karakteristike i procjenjujemo njihovu učinku na novom proizvedenom sastavu podataka. Također provodimo usporedbnu analizu sa osjećajima pokazujući da osjećaj sam nije dovoljno da se razlikuje između dobrih i loših vijesti.', 'id': 'Media sosial bermain peran besar dalam penyebaran berita yang termasuk berita baik dan buruk. Namun, penelitian menunjukkan bahwa berita, secara umum, memiliki dampak yang signifikan pada status mental kita dan bahwa pengaruh ini lebih dalam berita buruk. Situasi yang ideal adalah bahwa kita memiliki alat yang dapat membantu untuk menyusun jenis berita yang tidak ingin kita konsumasikan. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyediakan dasar untuk alat seperti itu. Dalam pekerjaan kami, kami fokus pada Twitter. Kami melepaskan set data yang dicatat secara manual berisi 6.853 tweet dari 5 kategori topik yang berbeda. Each tweet is annotated with good and bad labels.  Kami juga menyelidiki berbagai sistem belajar mesin dan fitur dan mengevaluasi prestasi mereka pada set data yang baru dibuat. Kami juga melakukan analisis perbandingan dengan perasaan yang menunjukkan bahwa perasaan sendirian tidak cukup untuk membedakan antara kabar baik dan buruk.', 'ko': '소셜 미디어는 좋은 소식과 나쁜 소식을 포함한 뉴스 전파에서 중요한 역할을 하고 있다.그러나 연구에 의하면 전체적으로 말하자면 뉴스는 우리의 정신 상태에 중대한 영향을 미치고 이런 영향은 나쁜 소식에서 더욱 뚜렷하다.이상적인 상황은 우리가 소비하고 싶지 않은 뉴스 유형을 필터하는 데 도움을 줄 수 있는 도구가 있다는 것이다.본문에서 우리는 이런 도구를 위해 기초를 제공하였다.우리는 업무 중에 트위터를 주목한다.우리는 5개의 서로 다른 주제 유형에서 온 6853개의 추문을 포함하는 수동 주석 데이터 집합을 발표했다.모든 추문에는 좋은 라벨과 나쁜 라벨이 있다.우리는 또한 각종 기계 학습 시스템과 기능을 연구했고 새로 생성된 데이터 집합에서 그들의 성능을 평가했다.정서를 비교 분석한 결과 정서만으로는 좋은 소식과 나쁜 소식을 구분할 수 없다는 결과가 나왔다.', 'tr': "Sosialy medýdylar täzelikler a ýlamakda has gowy we erbet täzelikler bar. Ýöne, öwrenmeler täzelikleriň umumy görnüşde, akyllyklarymyzyň durumyna örän wajyp täsiri bar we bu täsiri erbet täzeliklerde köp täsir edýär. Iýip bolan ýagdaýymyz, islemeýän täzelikleri süýtgetmek üçin kömek edip biljek bir araç bar. Bu kagyzda biz şeýle bir gural üçin esasy temel bererdik. Biziň işimizde Twitter'a üns berýäris. Biz 6,853 tweet 5 beýleki topar kategoriýasynda elimizden näbelli edilen harplar goýberdik. Her tweet gowy we erbet etiketler bilen duýýar. Biz hem dürli enjamlar öwrenmek sistemlerini we özelliklerini inceleýäris we olaryň janlaýyşyny täze üretilen veri setirinde deňleýäris Biz hem duýgularyň ýeke özüni gowy we erbet haberler arasyny tapawutlandyrmak üçin duýgular bilen howa-howa çykyşlyk analyzasyny edýäris.", 'sq': 'Media sociale luan një rol të madh në përhapjen e lajmeve që përfshin lajme të mira dhe të këqija. Megjithatë, studimet tregojnë se lajmet, në përgjithësi, kanë një ndikim të rëndësishëm në staturën tonë mendore dhe se ky ndikim është më shumë në lajme të këqija. Një situatë ideale do të ishte që ne kemi një mjet që mund të ndihmojë për të filtruar llojin e lajmeve që nuk duam të konsumojmë. Në këtë letër, ne japim bazën për një mjet të tillë. Në punën tonë, ne përqëndrohemi në Twitter. Ne lëshojmë një set të dhënash të anotuar manualisht që përmban 6,853 tweets nga 5 kategori të ndryshme tematike. Çdo tweet është shënuar me etiketa të mira dhe të këqija. Ne gjithashtu hetojmë sisteme dhe funksione të ndryshme mësimi i makinave dhe vlerësojmë performancën e tyre në grupin e të dhënave të gjeneruara sapo. We also perform a comparative analysis with sentiments showing that sentiment alone is not enough to distinguish between good and bad news.', 'af': "Soziale media speel 'n groot rol in nuusverspreiding wat goed en slegte nuus insluit. Maar studies wys dat nuus, algemeen, â\x80\x99n betekende invloek het op ons menslike status en dat hierdie invloek meer in slegte nuus is. 'n Ideale situasie sou wees dat ons 'n nutsprogram het wat kan help om die tipe nuus uit te filter wat ons nie wil hê na gebruik nie. In hierdie papier verskaf ons die basis vir sodanige nutsprogram. In ons werk, ons fokus op Twitter. Ons verlaat 'n handaangekies datastel wat 6,853 tweet bevat van 5 verskillende onderwerpe kategorie. Elke tweet is aangetrek met goed en slegte etikette. Ons ondersoek ook verskeie masjien leer stelsels en funksies en evalueer hulle prestasie op die nuwe genereerde datastel. Ons doen ook 'n vergelykbare analisie met sentimente wat sien dat sentiment alleen nie genoeg is om tussen goeie en slegte nuus te verkies nie.", 'sw': 'Vyombo vya habari vya kijamii vinaweza nafasi kubwa katika kusambaza habari ambazo ni pamoja na habari nzuri na mbaya. Hata hivyo, tafiti zinaonyesha kuwa, kwa ujumla, habari zina athari kubwa juu ya msimamo wetu wa akili na kwamba ushawishi huu unazidi katika habari mbaya. Hali ya akili itakuwa ni kuwa tuna zana ambazo zinaweza kusaidia kuchuja filamu ya aina ya habari ambazo hatutaki kutumia. Katika karatasi hii, tunatoa msingi wa chombo hiki. Katika kazi yetu, tunajikita kwenye mtandao wa Twita. Tunaweza kuachia seti ya taarifa zilizotangazwa kwa manufaa yenye twiti 6,853 kutoka katika makundi matano tofauti. Kila twiti kinasumbuliwa na alama nzuri na mabaya. Pia tunachunguza mfumo wa kujifunza mashine kadhaa na utambulisho na kutathmini utendaji wao kwenye seti ya taarifa mpya zilizotengenezwa. We also perform a comparative analysis with sentiments showing that sentiment alone is not enough to distinguish between good and bad news.', 'fa': 'رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی نقش بزرگی در انتشار اخبار بازی می\u200cکند که شامل اخبار خوب و بد است. اما مطالعه ها نشان می دهند که اخبار، عمومی، اثرات بزرگی بر مجسمه روانی ما دارد و این تأثیر بیشتر در اخبار بد است. موقعیت ایده ای این است که ما یک ابزار داریم که می تواند کمک کند تا نوع اخبار را که نمی خواهیم مصرف کنیم. در این کاغذ، ما بنیادی برای چنین ابزار را پیشنهاد می کنیم. در کار ما، روی توئیتر تمرکز می کنیم. ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای دستی که شامل ۶.853 تویت از ۵ گروه موضوع متفاوت است آزاد می\u200cکنیم. هر تويت با نقاشي هاي خوب و بد آشنا ميشه ما همچنین سیستم یادگیری و ویژگی های ماشین مختلف را تحقیق می کنیم و عملکرد آنها را در مجموعه داده های تازه تولید می کنیم. ما همچنین یک تحلیل مقایسه با احساسات انجام می دهیم که احساسات تنها کافی نیست تا بین خبر خوب و بد تفاوت دهیم.', 'am': 'ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ መልካም እና ክፉ ዜና በተጨማሪው ዜና በማድረግ ትልቅ ሚዛን ያሳያል፡፡ ነገር ግን ትምህርት፣ ዜናዎች በጠቅላላ በአካባቢነታችን ሥርዓት ላይ እጅግ የበረታች ጉዳይ እንዳለው፣ ይህም ጥቅም በክፉ ዜና ላይ የበለጠ ነው፡፡ የአሳብ ጉዳይ እንዲህ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ጋዜጠኛ የዚህን መሠረት መሠረት እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሥራችን ላይ ትዊተር ላይ እናስማራለን፡፡ 6,853 ትዊተሮችን ከ5 ልዩ አካባቢ ክፍሎች የሚያዙ የዳታ-ሰርተቶችን በእጃችን እናስወግዳለን፡፡ ትዊተር ሁሉ በመልካምና በመጥፎ ምልክቶች ይታወካል፡፡ እና የተለያዩ የሜክስሎችን መምህርት እና የአዲስ አዲስ ፍጥረታቸውን እናስተምር፡፡ አካባቢውን ብቻውን በመልካም እና በመጥፎ ዜና መካከል ለመለየት አይበቃንም በማሳየቱ እናስተያየትን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցները մեծ դեր են խաղում նորությունների տարածման մեջ, որը ներառում է լավ և վատ նորություններ: Այնուամենայնիվ, ուսումնասիրությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ նորությունները, ընդհանուր առմամբ, մեծ ազդեցություն ունեն մեր մտավոր վիճակին և որ այս ազդեցությունը ավելի շատ վատ նորություններում է: Իդեալական իրավիճակը կլինի այն, որ մենք ունենք մի գործիք, որը կարող է օգնել ֆիլտրել այն նորությունները, որոնք չենք ուզում օգտագործել: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ապահովում ենք հիմքը նման գործիքի համար: Մեր աշխատանքում մենք կենտրոնանում ենք Թվիթերի վրա: Մենք հրապարակում ենք ձեռքով գրված տվյալների համակարգ, որը պարունակում է 6.853 թվիթեր 5 տարբեր թեմային կատեգորիաներից: Յուրաքանչյուր թվիթ գրված է լավ և վատ պիտակներով: Մենք նաև ուսումնասիրում ենք տարբեր մեքենային ուսումնասիրության համակարգեր և առանձնահատկություններ, և գնահատում ենք նրանց արտադրողությունը նորից ստեղծված տվյալների համակարգի վրա: Մենք նաև կատարում ենք համեմատական վերլուծություն զգացմունքների հետ, որոնք ցույց են տալիս, որ միայն զգացմունքները բավարար չեն լավ և վատ նորությունների միջև տարբերակելու համար:', 'az': "Sosyal media yaxşı və pis xəbərlər içərisində olan xəbərlər yayılmasında böyük bir rol oynayır. Ancaq təhsil göstərir ki, xəbərlər genel olaraq bizim ruhsal heykəlimizə çox möhkəm bir təsiri var və bu təsirin kötü xəbərlərdə daha çox olduğunu. İddial durum bizim üçün istifadə etmək istəmədiyimiz xəbərləri filtrləmək üçün yardım edə bilən bir vasitə var. Bu kağızda, böyük bir vasitə üçün əsas təyin edirik. Bizim işimizdə Twitter'a odaqlanırıq. Biz 5 müxtəlif məsələlər kategoriyasından 6.853 tweet içərik məlumatlar qurulmuş verilən qutusu yayındırıq. Hər tweet yaxşı və pis etiketlər ilə danışır. Biz də müxtəlif maşın öyrənmə sistemlərini və fərqli sistemlərini incidirik və yeni yaratdığı veri qutusunda onların performansını değerləşdiririk. Biz həmçinin hisslərin yalnız hisslərini yaxşı və pis xəbərlər arasında ayırmaq üçün kifayət deyildir.", 'ca': "Els mitjans socials juguen un gran paper en la difusió de notícies que inclou bones i dolentes notícies. Tot i així, els estudis demostren que les notícies, en general, tenen un impacte significatiu en la nostra estatura mental i que aquesta influència està més en les dolentes notícies. An ideal situation would be that we have a tool that can help to filter out the type of news we do not want to consume.  En aquest paper, donem la base d'una eina així. En la nostra feina, ens centrem en Twitter. Vam publicar un conjunt de dades anotats manualment que contenia 6.853 tweets de 5 categories tòpices diferents. Cada tweet està anotat amb etiquetes bones i dolentes. També investigam diversos sistemes i característiques d'aprenentatge automàtic i evaluem el seu rendiment en el nou conjunt de dades generats. També fem una anàlisi comparativa amb sentiments que demostren que el sentiment només no és suficient per distingir les bones i les dolentes not ícies.", 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যম সংবাদ প্রচার মাধ্যমে ভূমিকা প্রদর্শন করছে, যার মধ্যে ভালো এবং খারাপ সংবাদ রয়েছে। তবে গবেষণা দেখাচ্ছে যে সাধারণত সংবাদ আমাদের মানসিক মূল্যের উপর গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রভাব ফেলেছে এবং এই প্রভাব খারাপ সংব একটি চিন্তা পরিস্থিতি হচ্ছে যে আমাদের কাছে একটি টুল আছে যা ফিল্টার করার সাহায্য করতে পারে যে সংবাদ আমরা খাওয়াতে চাই ন এই পত্রিকায়, আমরা এই ধরনের টুলের জন্য ভিত্তি দিচ্ছি। আমাদের কাজে আমরা টুইটারে মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি। আমরা হাতে বিভিন্ন বিষয়বস্তু বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভাগ থেকে ৬,৮৫৩ টুইট প্রদান করা একটি ডাটাসেটের ব প্রত্যেক টুইট ভাল এবং খারাপ লেবেল দিয়ে বিরক্তিকর। এছাড়াও আমরা বিভিন্ন মেশিন শিক্ষা ও বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং নতুন তৈরি করা ডাটাসেটে তাদের কার্যক্রমের মূল্যায়ন করি। আমরা অনুভূতির সাথে তুলনামূলক বিশ্লেষণ করি যেখানে দেখাচ্ছি যে শুধুমাত্র ভালো এবং খারাপ সংবাদের মধ্যে আলাদা করার জন্য', 'cs': 'Sociální média hrají velkou roli v šíření zpráv, které zahrnují dobré i špatné zprávy. Studie však ukazují, že zprávy mají obecně významný vliv na naši duševní postavu a že tento vliv je spíše špatný. Ideální situací by bylo, že máme nástroj, který může pomoci filtrovat typ zpráv, které nechceme konzumovat. V tomto článku poskytujeme základ pro takový nástroj. V naší práci se zaměřujeme na Twitter. Vydáváme ručně anotovaný datový soubor obsahující 6,853 tweety z pěti různých aktuálních kategorií. Každý tweet je označen dobrými i špatnými nálepkami. Dále zkoumáme různé systémy a funkce strojového učení a hodnotíme jejich výkon na nově generovaném datovém souboru. Dále provádíme srovnávací analýzu se sentimenty, které ukazují, že sentiment samotný nestačí k rozlišení mezi dobrou a špatnou zprávou.', 'bs': 'Društveni mediji imaju veliku ulogu u širenju vijesti koja uključuje dobre i loše vijesti. Međutim, ispitivanja pokazuju da vijesti, općenito, imaju značajan utjecaj na našu mentalnu statusu i da je taj utjecaj više u lošim vijestima. Idealna situacija bi bila da imamo alat koji može pomoći da filtrira vrste vijesti koje ne želimo da potrošimo. U ovom papiru pružamo osnovu za takav alat. U našem poslu, fokusiramo se na Twitter. Puštamo manualno annotiranu setu podataka koja sadrži 6 853 tweets iz 5 različitih temalnih kategorija. Svaki tweet je annotiran dobrim i lošim etiketama. Istražujemo i različite sisteme za učenje strojeva i karakteristike i procjenjujemo njihovu učinku na novom generiranom setu podataka. Također provodimo komparativnu analizu sa osjećajima pokazujući da osjećaj sam nije dovoljan da se razlikuje između dobrih i loših vijesti.', 'et': 'Sotsiaalmeedia mängib suurt rolli uudiste levitamisel, mis hõlmab häid ja halbu uudiseid. Uuringud näitavad siiski, et uudised avaldavad üldiselt märkimisväärset mõju meie vaimsele seisundile ja et see mõju on rohkem halbades uudistes. Ideaalne olukord oleks see, et meil on vahend, mis aitab filtreerida välja uudiseid, mida me ei taha tarbida. Selles dokumendis anname aluse sellisele vahendile. Oma töös keskendume Twitterile. Avaldame käsitsi annoteeritud andmekogumi, mis sisaldab 6853 säutsu viiest erinevast teemakategooriast. Iga säutsu on märgitud heade ja halbade siltidega. Samuti uurime erinevaid masinõppe süsteeme ja funktsioone ning hindame nende jõudlust äsja loodud andmekogumil. Samuti teostame võrdleva analüüsi tundetega, mis näitavad, et üksi tundest ei piisa heade ja halbade uudiste eristamiseks.', 'fi': 'Sosiaalisella medialla on suuri rooli uutisten levittämisessä, joka sisältää hyviä ja huonoja uutisia. Tutkimukset osoittavat kuitenkin, että uutisilla on yleensä merkittävä vaikutus henkiseen kuntoon ja että tämä vaikutus on enemmän huonoissa uutisissa. Ihanteellinen tilanne olisi, että meillä on työkalu, joka voi auttaa suodattamaan pois sellaisia uutisia, joita emme halua kuluttaa. Tässä asiakirjassa tarjoamme perustan tällaiselle työkalulle. Työssämme keskitymme Twitteriin. Julkaisemme manuaalisesti merkityn aineiston, joka sisältää 6 853 twiittiä viidestä eri aihealueesta. Jokainen twiitti on merkitty hyvillä ja huonoilla etiketeillä. Tutkimme myös erilaisia koneoppimisjärjestelmiä ja ominaisuuksia sekä arvioimme niiden suorituskykyä juuri luodussa aineistossa. Teemme myös vertailevan analyysin tunteista, jotka osoittavat, että pelkkä tunne ei riitä erottamaan hyviä ja huonoja uutisia toisistaan.', 'ha': "mitandai na jamii yana da wani roli mai girma a cikin fassarar lãbãri da ke ƙunsa da bushãra mai kyau da mummũnan. A lokacin da fassarar za'a nũna cewa, news, a jumla, yana da wani matsayi mai girma kan halinmu na fikanci kuma wannan muhimmi yana da mafi ƙaranci cikin lãbãri mabaya. Wata halin na zato ne da za'a sami wata shiri da za'a iya amfani da filterar nau'in lãbãri wanda ba mu yi nufin su ci ba. In this paper, we provide the basis for such a tool.  Ga aikinmu, tuna makini a kan Twitter. Tuna sakar da aka sanar da takardar da hannayen da ke ƙunsa da wasu littattafai 6,853 daga ƙungiyõyi 5 dabam-daban. Kila Twitter ana zartar da alama mai kyau da mabaya. Kayya, Munã ƙidãya masu lazimar da masu ƙidãya masu amfani da shiryoyin ayukansu a danne-danne na yanzu. Kayya, muna sami rabon da saurãre da za'a nũna cewa hisãbi bai isa ba ga rarraba tsakanin alhẽri da bushãra mbaya.", 'jv': 'Media sothik nduwe akeh sing dibenakake kanggo Kedah Berita sing nduwe akeh sing apik lan alam sing apik. Nanging, cah-cah saben wartané ana, ning jeral-jeral, kuwi akih sing mengko awak dhéwé kuwi kaleh bakal iki ngono kuwi nggawe barang dhéwé. Sitasi sing beraksi iki dhewe ana alat sing bisa nyelungan nyeluk kanggo ngerasah Ketoke Ketoke Ketoke Ketoke Tipe Ketoke awak dhéwé ora gelem nggawe kudu nggunakake Nang pempet iki, kita nyebuti nggawe barang kanggo ngerasakno Nang barêng-barêng, kéné mungkasi nang Tom. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Sugeng-Sugeng sing ditambah banget nganggo masa lan masa Awak dhéwé nyusegi pangrungu sistem kanggo kelas telu-sistem lan akeh barêng-barêng nggawe barang nggawe barang dataset sing gawe mbukaké ora bisa kerjane Awak dhéwé éntuk karo perusahaan karo hal-hal sing luwih apik iki luwih apik dhéwé kuwi sawasar seneng ora ono wektu nggawe barang apik lan basa sing apik.', 'sk': 'Socialni mediji igrajo veliko vlogo pri širjenju novic, ki vključuje dobre in slabe novice. Vendar pa študije kažejo, da novice na splošno pomembno vplivajo na naš duševni položaj in da je ta vpliv bolj slab. Idealna situacija bi bila, da imamo orodje, ki lahko pomaga filtrirati vrsto novic, ki jih ne želimo porabiti. V tem članku zagotavljamo osnovo za takšno orodje. Pri svojem delu se osredotočamo na Twitter. Izdajamo ročno označen nabor podatkov, ki vsebuje 6.853 tweetov iz 5 različnih tematskih kategorij. Vsak tweet je označen z dobrimi in slabimi oznakami. Preučujemo tudi različne sisteme strojnega učenja in funkcije ter ocenjujemo njihovo učinkovitost na novo ustvarjenem naboru podatkov. Prav tako izvajamo primerjalno analizo s čustvi, ki kaže, da čustva sama po sebi ne zadostujejo za razlikovanje med dobrimi in slabimi novicami.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་དེ་གསར་འགྱུར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ལས་འཕགས་པ་ཆེན་ཡོད་པ་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་བརྡ་ཞིག་ལ་བསྒྲགས་ན་ང་ཚོའི་སྐྱེས་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་གནོད་ཅན་ཏུ་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡོད་པ་དང་། བརྡ་སྟོན་ ང་ཚོའི་གནས་སྟངས་གང་ཡིན་ན་གསར་འགྱུར་གྱི་རིགས་སྡུད་ནས་ཚགས་བཅུག་མི་དགོས་པའི་ལག་ཆ་ཡོད་པ་ཞིག་ཡོད། ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ལག་ཆ་ཞིག་ལ་རྨན་གཞི་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ནང་དུ་ཌིས་ཌིར་གནང་བ་འདུག ང་ཚོས་དུས་གཏམ་གླེང་མེད་པའི་གནད་དོན་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིགས་༥་ལས་སྤྱོད་པའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ལག་སྟར་སྤོར་བ Tweet each is annotated with good and bad labels. ང་ཚོས་རྩོམ་འཁོར་གྱི་མ་ལག་སྣ་བརྗོད་བྱས་ནས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་བྱ་སྟངས་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཉིད་གསར་བསྐྲུན་པའི་གནད ང་ཚོས་རང་ཚོར་སེམས་ཚོར་གཅིག་པུའི་བརྗོད་བྱས་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མཐུན་བཟོས་བའི་དབྱེ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མེད།', 'he': 'התקשורת החברתית משחקת תפקיד גדול בהפיצה חדשות שכלול חדשות טובות ורעות. עם זאת, מחקרים מראים שלחדשות, באופן כללי, יש השפעה משמעותית על המצב הנפשי שלנו ושהשפעה הזאת יותר בחדשות רעות. מצב אידיאלי יהיה שיש לנו כלי שיכול לעזור לסנן את סוג החדשות שאנחנו לא רוצים לצרוך. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מספקים את הבסיס לכלי כזה. בעבודתנו, אנחנו מתמקדים בטוויטר. אנו משחררים קבוצת נתונים מועטפת ידנית שמכילה 6,853 טוויטים מ-5 קטגוריות נושאיות שונות. כל טוויט מצויין עם תוויות טובות ורעות. We also investigate various machine learning systems and features and evaluate their performance on the newly generated dataset.  We also perform a comparative analysis with sentiments showing that sentiment alone is not enough to distinguish between good and bad news.'}
{'en': 'Bilingual Low-Resource Neural Machine Translation with Round-Tripping : The Case of Persian-Spanish', 'ar': 'ترجمة آلية عصبية ثنائية اللغة منخفضة الموارد مع تنطلق دائري: حالة الفارسية الإسبانية', 'pt': 'Tradução automática neural de baixo recurso bilíngue com viagem de ida e volta: o caso do persa-espanhol', 'es': 'Traducción automática neuronal bilingüe de bajos recursos con ida y vuelta: el caso del persa-español', 'fr': 'Traduction automatique neuronale bilingue à faibles ressources avec aller-retour\xa0: le cas du persan-espagnol', 'zh': '带往返双语低资源神经机器翻译:波斯语-西班牙语例', 'ja': 'ラウンドトリッピング付きバイリンガル低リソース神経機械翻訳：ペルシャ語-スペイン語のケース', 'hi': 'द्विभाषी कम संसाधन तंत्रिका मशीन राउंड-ट्रिपिंग के साथ अनुवाद: फारसी-स्पेनिश का मामला', 'ru': 'Двуязычный низкоресурсный нейронный машинный перевод с круговыми рейсами: пример персидско-испанского языка', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach Dátheangach ar Acmhainn Íseal le Bualadh Babhta: Cás na Peirsis-Spáinnis', 'ka': 'მეორე მიმაღალი რესურსის ნეიროლური მაქინის გასაგრძელება: The Case of Persian-Spanish', 'el': 'Διγλωσσική Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση χαμηλού Πόρου με Γύρω-Τριπ: Η περίπτωση των Περσικών-Ισπανικών', 'hu': 'Kétnyelvű alacsony erőforrású neurális fordítás kerekítéssel: A perzsa-spanyol eset', 'kk': 'Қосымша төменгі ресурс нейрондық машинаның аударуы: The Case of Persian- Spanish', 'it': 'Traduzione automatica bilingue a basso contenuto di risorse neurali con tripping rotondo: il caso del persiano-spagnolo', 'mk': 'Дивјазичен превод на неврална машина со ниски ресурси со круг патување: случајот на персиски-шпански', 'ms': 'Perjemahan Mesin Neural Sumber Terrendah Berbahasa Dengan Penjejakan Putaran: Kasus Persia-Sepanyol', 'lt': 'Dvikalbis mažų išteklių neuroninių mašinų vertimas apvaliu būdu: persų ir ispanų kalbos atvejis', 'ml': 'ബില്\u200dലിങ്കുള്ള കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ: The Case of Persian- Spanish', 'mn': 'Хоёрдугаар бага боловсролын мэдрэлийн машины түвшилт: The Case of Persian-Spanish', 'mt': 'It-Traduzzjoni Bilingwali ta’ Makkinarju Newrali b’Riżorsi Bażi b’Tripping Ċirkolari: Il-Każ ta’ Persjan-Spanjol', 'no': 'Bilinguelt låg- ressurs- neuralmaskin- omsetjing med rundt- trykking: The Case of Persian- Spanish', 'pl': 'Dwujęzyczne niskie zasoby neuronalne tłumaczenie maszynowe z okrągłymi podróżami: przypadek persko-hiszpańskiego', 'ro': 'Traducere automată bilingvă neurală cu resurse scăzute cu rotunde-Tripping: Cazul persană-spaniolă', 'sr': 'Bilingualna neuralna mašina za manje resurse sa okruženim trkama: slučaj persijanskog-španjolskog', 'si': 'The case of Percian- Sphere', 'so': 'Bilingual Low-Resource Neural Machine Translation with Round-Tripping: The Case of Persian-Spanish', 'sv': 'Tvåspråkig neuroral maskinöversättning med låg resurs med rundtrippning: fallet persisk-spanska', 'ta': 'மொழி குறைந்த மூலம் நெருல் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு: The Case of Persian- Spanish', 'ur': 'The Case of Persian-Spanish', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dịch sang ngôn ngữ thần kinh nghèo với kiểu trượt tròn:', 'bg': 'Двуезичен нискоресурсен неврален машинен превод с кръгло спъване: случаят на персийско-испански', 'da': 'Tosproget Neural maskinoversættelse med lav ressource med rundtripping: Tilfældet med persisk-spansk', 'hr': 'Bilingualna prevoda neuroloških strojeva s okruglim trikovanjem: slučaj persijskog-španjolskog', 'nl': 'Tweetalige neuronale machinevertaling met weinig hulpbronnen met ronde tripping: het geval van Perzisch-Spaans', 'de': 'Zweisprachige ressourcenarme neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung mit Round-Tripping: Der Fall Persisch-Spanisch', 'id': 'Perjemahan Mesin Neural Low-Resource Bilingual dengan Round-Tripping: Kasus Persia-Spanyol', 'ko': '페르시아어-스페인어 사례', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی کم منبع دومین: The case of Persian-Spanish', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kifaransa Kichini ya Asili na Kihispania', 'af': 'Bilinguele Lae- Hulpbron Neural Masjien Vertaling met Round- Tripping: The Case of Persian- Spanish', 'tr': 'Çapda Aýik Ressurat Nural Makiny Çevirmek: The Case of Persian-Spanish', 'sq': 'Përkthimi dygjuhësor i Makinës Neurale me burime të ulta me udhëtim rreth: rasti i Persian-Spanjoll', 'az': 'İkili Aşağı-Ressours Nöral Makinesi Tərcləməsi: The Case of Persian-Spanish', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'hy': 'Երկլեզու ցածր ռեսուրսների նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանություն շրջանակի ճանապարհորդության հետ: The', 'bn': 'বালিভায়ুয়াল নিম্ন- উৎস নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ করা হচ্ছে: পার্সিয়ান- স্প্যানিশ', 'bs': 'Bilingualna Neuralna strojna prevoda s okruglim trkačem: slučaj persijskog-španjolskog', 'ca': 'La traducció bilingüe de màquines neuronals de baix recursos amb viatges redondes: el cas persa-espanyol', 'et': 'Kahekeelne madala ressursiga neuroalne masintõlge koos ümmarguse trippimisega: Pärsia-hispaania juhtum', 'cs': 'Dvoujazyčný neuronový strojový překlad s nízkými zdroji s kulatým překladem: Případ perštiny-španělštiny', 'fi': 'Kaksikielinen matalan resurssin hermokonekäännös pyöreällä trippauksella: Persian-espanjan tapaus', 'jv': 'Bilingual', 'sk': 'Dvojezični strojni prevod z nizkimi viri z okroglim potovanjem: primer perzijsko-španščine', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'תורגם וסונכרן ע"י Qsubs מצוות', 'bo': 'Bilingual Low-Resource Neural Machine Translation with Round-Tripping: The Case of Persian-Spanish'}
{'en': 'The quality of Neural Machine Translation (NMT), as a data-driven approach, massively depends on quantity, quality, and relevance of the training dataset. Such approaches have achieved promising results for bilingually high-resource scenarios but are inadequate for low-resource conditions. This paper describes a round-trip training approach to bilingual low-resource NMT that takes advantage of monolingual datasets to address training data scarcity, thus augmenting translation quality. We conduct detailed experiments on Persian-Spanish as a bilingually low-resource scenario. Experimental results demonstrate that this competitive approach outperforms the baselines.', 'ar': 'تعتمد جودة الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) ، كنهج قائم على البيانات ، بشكل كبير على كمية وجودة وملاءمة مجموعة بيانات التدريب. وقد حققت هذه الأساليب نتائج واعدة لسيناريوهات ثنائية اللغة عالية الموارد ولكنها غير مناسبة لظروف انخفاض الموارد. تصف هذه الورقة نهجًا تدريبيًا ذهابًا وإيابًا على NMT ثنائي اللغة منخفض الموارد والذي يستفيد من مجموعات البيانات أحادية اللغة لمعالجة ندرة بيانات التدريب ، وبالتالي زيادة جودة الترجمة. نجري تجارب مفصلة على اللغة الفارسية-الإسبانية كسيناريو ثنائي اللغة منخفض الموارد. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن هذا النهج التنافسي يتفوق على خطوط الأساس.', 'pt': 'A qualidade da tradução automática neural (NMT), como uma abordagem orientada por dados, depende muito da quantidade, qualidade e relevância do conjunto de dados de treinamento. Tais abordagens alcançaram resultados promissores para cenários bilíngües de muitos recursos, mas são inadequadas para condições de poucos recursos. Este artigo descreve uma abordagem de treinamento de ida e volta para NMT bilíngue de baixo recurso que aproveita conjuntos de dados monolíngues para lidar com a escassez de dados de treinamento, aumentando assim a qualidade da tradução. Conduzimos experimentos detalhados em persa-espanhol como um cenário bilíngue de poucos recursos. Os resultados experimentais demonstram que esta abordagem competitiva supera as linhas de base.', 'fr': "La qualité de la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT), en tant qu'approche axée sur les données, dépend massivement de la quantité, de la qualité et de la pertinence de l'ensemble de données de formation. De telles approches ont donné des résultats prometteurs pour les scénarios bilingue à ressources élevées, mais elles sont inadéquates pour les conditions de faibles ressources. Cet article décrit une approche de formation aller-retour pour la NMT bilingue à faibles ressources qui tire parti des ensembles de données monolingues pour pallier la pénurie de données de formation, augmentant ainsi la qualité de la traduction. Nous menons des expériences détaillées sur le persan-espagnol dans le cadre d'un scénario bilingue à faibles ressources. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que cette approche concurrentielle surpasse les niveaux de référence.", 'es': 'La calidad de la traducción automática neuronal (NMT), como enfoque basado en datos, depende enormemente de la cantidad, la calidad y la relevancia del conjunto de datos de entrenamiento. Estos enfoques han logrado resultados prometedores para escenarios bilingües de recursos altos, pero son inadecuados para condiciones de bajos recursos. Este documento describe un enfoque de capacitación de ida y vuelta para la NMT bilingüe de bajos recursos que aprovecha los conjuntos de datos monolingües para abordar la escasez de datos de capacitación, lo que aumenta la calidad de la traducción. Llevamos a cabo experimentos detallados en persa-español como escenario bilingüe de bajos recursos. Los resultados experimentales demuestran que este enfoque competitivo supera a las líneas de base.', 'ja': 'データ駆動型アプローチとしての神経機械翻訳（ NMT ）の品質は、トレーニングデータセットの数量、品質、および関連性に大きく依存する。このようなアプローチは、バイリンガルな高リソースシナリオでは有望な結果を達成しているが、低リソース条件では不十分である。本論文では、単一言語のデータセットを利用してトレーニングデータの不足に対処し、翻訳品質を向上させる、低リソースのバイリンガルNMTのラウンドトリップトレーニングアプローチについて説明する。バイリンガルな低リソースシナリオとして、ペルシャ語-スペイン語の詳細な実験を行っています。実験結果は、この競争的アプローチがベースラインを上回ることを示しています。', 'zh': '神经机器翻译(NMT)之质为数驱之法,其在于练数集数、量相关性。 喜双语高资,不足也。 本文引双语低资源 NMT 往返训练方法,宜用单语数集来决教数稀缺,以重译质。 详波斯语 - 西班牙语之实验,以为双语资不足之场。 实验结果表明,优于基线。', 'ru': 'Качество нейронного машинного перевода (НМП), как подхода, основанного на данных, в значительной степени зависит от количества, качества и релевантности обучающего набора данных. Подобные подходы дали многообещающие результаты для двуязычных сценариев с высоким уровнем ресурсов, однако они не отвечают требованиям, предъявляемым к условиям с низким уровнем ресурсов. В настоящем документе описывается подход к обучению в оба конца для двуязычных НМТ с низким уровнем ресурсов, который использует одноязычные наборы данных для решения проблемы нехватки данных для обучения, тем самым повышая качество перевода. Мы проводим детальные эксперименты по персидско-испанскому как двуязычно малоресурсному сценарию. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что этот конкурентный подход превосходит исходные показатели.', 'hi': 'न्यूरल मशीन ट्रांसलेशन (एनएमटी) की गुणवत्ता, डेटा-संचालित दृष्टिकोण के रूप में, बड़े पैमाने पर प्रशिक्षण डेटासेट की मात्रा, गुणवत्ता और प्रासंगिकता पर निर्भर करती है। इस तरह के दृष्टिकोणों ने द्विभाषी रूप से उच्च-संसाधन परिदृश्यों के लिए आशाजनक परिणाम प्राप्त किए हैं, लेकिन कम संसाधन स्थितियों के लिए अपर्याप्त हैं। यह पेपर द्विभाषी कम-संसाधन एनएमटी के लिए एक राउंड-ट्रिप प्रशिक्षण दृष्टिकोण का वर्णन करता है जो प्रशिक्षण डेटा की कमी को दूर करने के लिए मोनोलिंगुअल डेटासेट का लाभ उठाता है, इस प्रकार अनुवाद की गुणवत्ता को बढ़ाता है। हम एक द्विभाषी रूप से कम संसाधन परिदृश्य के रूप में फारसी-स्पेनिश पर विस्तृत प्रयोग करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि यह प्रतिस्पर्धी दृष्टिकोण बेसलाइन को मात देता है।', 'ga': 'Braitheann cáilíocht an Neural Machine Translation (NMT), mar chur chuige atá bunaithe ar shonraí, go mór ar chainníocht, ar cháilíocht agus ar ábharthacht an tacar sonraí oiliúna. Tá torthaí dóchais bainte amach ag cur chuige dá leithéid do chásanna dátheangacha ard-acmhainní ach níl siad leordhóthanach i gcás coinníollacha íseal-acmhainne. Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar chur chuige oiliúna turas cruinn i leith NMT dátheangach íseal-acmhainní a bhaineann leas as tacair sonraí aonteangacha chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar ghanntanas sonraí oiliúna, rud a chuireann le cáilíocht an aistriúcháin. Déanaimid turgnaimh mhionsonraithe ar Peirsis-Spáinnis mar chás dátheangach íseal-acmhainní. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn an cur chuige iomaíoch seo na bunlínte.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური მაქინის გასაგრძელება (NMT) როგორც მონაცემების გასაგრძელებელი მონაცემების გასაგრძელება, მასტივიურად დაახლოდება მრავალობით, კაalitეტიდან და მონაცემებ ასეთი პროგორმაციები გავაკეთეთ მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოდგენები ორიენდურად მეტი რესურსის სინარიოში, მაგრამ არაფექციელია მარტივი რესურსის შესახებ. ეს დოკუმენტი აღწერს ორივე ენერგიური დამატებული რესურსისტების გარეშე, რომელიც მონოლენგური მონაცემების შესახებ მონაცემების შესახებ განაკეთება მონაცემების შესახებ, რაც ჩვენ პერსიან-სპანელი ექსპერიმენტების განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთებთ, როგორც ორივე ენერგიულად დამატებული რესურსის სენა ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები აჩვენებენ, რომ ეს კონპერიმენტიური პროგენტი უფრო მეტად გავაკეთებენ ბაზლინი.', 'hu': 'A Neural Machine Translation (NMT) mint adatközpontú megközelítés minősége nagymértékben függ a képzési adatok mennyiségétől, minőségétől és relevanciájától. Az ilyen megközelítések ígéretes eredményeket értek el a kétnyelvűen nagy erőforrásokkal rendelkező forgatókönyvek esetében, de nem elégségesek az alacsony erőforrásokkal rendelkező feltételekhez. Ez a tanulmány ismerteti a kétnyelvű alacsony erőforrású NMT-vel kapcsolatos visszatérő képzési megközelítését, amely kihasználja az egynyelvű adatkészleteket a képzési adatok hiányának kezelésére, ezzel javítva a fordítási minőséget. Részletes kísérleteket végzünk perzsa-spanyol nyelven, mint kétnyelvűen alacsony forgatókönyv. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy ez a versenyképességi megközelítés felülmúlja az alapvető értékeket.', 'el': "Η ποιότητα της Νευρικής Μηχανικής Μετάφρασης (NMT), ως προσέγγιση βασισμένη στα δεδομένα, εξαρτάται σε μεγάλο βαθμό από την ποσότητα, την ποιότητα και τη συνάφεια του συνόλου δεδομένων κατάρτισης. Τέτοιες προσεγγίσεις έχουν επιτύχει ελπιδοφόρα αποτελέσματα για διγλωσσικά σενάρια υψηλών πόρων, αλλά είναι ανεπαρκείς για συνθήκες χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους. Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει μια προσέγγιση εκπαίδευσης μετ' επιστροφής για τη δίγλωσση χρήση των μονογλωσσικών συνόλων δεδομένων για την αντιμετώπιση της έλλειψης δεδομένων κατάρτισης, αυξάνοντας έτσι την ποιότητα της μετάφρασης. Διεξάγουμε λεπτομερή πειράματα στα περσικά-ισπανικά ως ένα δίγλωσσο σενάριο χαμηλών πόρων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι αυτή η ανταγωνιστική προσέγγιση ξεπερνά τις βασικές γραμμές.", 'it': 'La qualità della traduzione automatica neurale (NMT), come approccio basato sui dati, dipende in larga misura dalla quantità, dalla qualità e dalla pertinenza del set di dati di formazione. Tali approcci hanno raggiunto risultati promettenti per scenari bilingui ad alto contenuto di risorse, ma sono inadeguati per le condizioni a basso contenuto di risorse. Questo articolo descrive un approccio formativo di andata e ritorno alla NMT bilingue a basso contenuto di risorse che sfrutta i set di dati monolingue per affrontare la scarsità di dati formativi, aumentando così la qualità della traduzione. Conduciamo esperimenti dettagliati sul persiano-spagnolo come scenario bilingue a basso contenuto di risorse. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che questo approccio competitivo supera le linee di base.', 'lt': 'Neuralinių mašinų vertimo (NMT) kokybė, kaip duomenų pagrindu grindžiamas metodas, labai priklauso nuo mokymo duomenų rinkinio kiekio, kokybės ir svarbos. Tokie metodai pasiekė perspektyvių dvikalbių didelių išteklių scenarijų rezultatų, tačiau jų nepakanka mažai išteklių turinčioms sąlygoms. Šiame dokumente aprašomas apvalios kelionės mokymo metodas dvikalbei mažai išteklių turinčiai NMT, kuris naudojasi vienkalbiniais duomenų rinkiniais, kad būtų pašalintas mokymo duomenų trūkumas ir taip didinama vertimo kokybė. We conduct detailed experiments on Persian-Spanish as a bilingually low-resource scenario.  Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad šis konkurencinis požiūris viršija bazines vertes.', 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаның аудармасының (NMT) сапасы, деректерді басқару әдісі ретінде, массалық сапасы, сапасы және оқыту деректер жиынының маңыздылығына тәуелді. Бұл әдістер екі тілде көп ресурс сценарияларының үлкен нәтижелерін жеткізді, бірақ аз ресурс шарттарына жеткізбейді. Бұл қағаз екі тілінде төмен ресурстар NMT- ге тез саяхатты оқыту тәсілін таңдайды. Бұл монолингі деректер қорларының көмегімен деректердің қажеттілігін өзгерту үшін, сондықтан аудармалард Біз Перс-Испан туралы тегжейлі тегжейлі тәжірибелерді екі тіл менен төмен ресурс сценариясы ретінде орындаймыз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері, бұл конкурстық тәртібі негізгі жолдарды жасайды.', 'ms': 'Kualiti Penerjemahan Mesin Neural (NMT), sebagai pendekatan dipandu data, bergantung pada kuantiti, kualiti, dan relevansi set data latihan. Pendekatan seperti ini telah mencapai keputusan yang berjanji untuk skenario sumber-tinggi dua bahasa tetapi tidak cukup untuk keadaan sumber-rendah. Kertas ini menggambarkan pendekatan latihan perjalanan bulat ke NMT sumber rendah bilingual yang mengambil keuntungan dari set data monobahasa untuk mengatasi kekurangan data latihan, dengan demikian meningkatkan kualiti terjemahan. Kami melakukan eksperimen terperinci pada Persia-Spanyol sebagai skenario sumber rendah dua bahasa. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kompetitif ini melebihi garis dasar.', 'mk': 'Квалитетот на преведувањето на невралните машини (НМТ), како пристап воден од податоци, масовно зависи од количината, квалитетот и релевантноста на наборот на податоци за обука. Таквите пристапи постигнаа ветувачки резултати за двојјазички сценарија со високи ресурси, но не се соодветни за условите со ниски ресурси. Овој весник го опишува пристапот на обука за круг пат кон двојјазичната НМТ со ниски ресурси, која ги искористува монојазичните податоци за решавање на недостатокот на податоци за обука, со што се зголемува квалитетот на преводот. We conduct detailed experiments on Persian-Spanish as a bilingually low-resource scenario.  Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека овој конкурентски пристап ги надминува основните линии.', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ (NMT), ഒരു ഡാറ്റാ ഓടിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വഴിയായി നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ ഗുണവും, പരിശീലനത്ത ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള നടപടികള്\u200d രണ്ടു ഭാഷക്കാള്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dന്ന വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വാഗ്ദാനം ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നേടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ കുറഞ്ഞ വി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d രണ്ടു ഭാഷ കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളിലേക്കുള്ള ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ ട്രെയിനിങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരിക്കുന്ന We conduct detailed experiments on Persian-Spanish as a bilingually low-resource scenario.  പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, ഈ മത്സരത്തിലുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്', 'mt': 'Il-kwalità tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali (NMT), bħala approċċ immexxi mid-dejta, tiddependi b’mod massiv fuq il-kwantità, il-kwalità, u r-rilevanza tas-sett tad-dejta tat-taħriġ. Approċċi bħal dawn kisbu riżultati promettenti għal xenarji ta’ riżorsi għoljin b’żewġ lingwi iżda mhumiex adegwati għal kundizzjonijiet ta’ riżorsi baxxi. Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi approċċ ta’ taħriġ ta’ vjaġġ tond għal NMT b’riżorsi baxxi bilingwi li jieħu vantaġġ minn settijiet ta’ dejta monolingwi biex jindirizza l-iskarsezza tad-dejta ta’ taħriġ, u b’hekk iżid il-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni. Aħna nagħmlu esperimenti dettaljati dwar il-Persjan-Spanjol bħala xenarju b’riżorsi baxxi b’żewġ lingwi. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li dan l-approċċ kompetittiv huwa ogħla mil-linji bażi.', 'mn': 'Дасгал өгөгдлийн хөгжүүлэх арга хэмжээ, сайн чанар, болон сургалтын өгөгдлийн сангийн чухал хамааралтай байдаг. Ийм арга баримтууд хоёр хэл дээр бага баялаг нөхцөл байдлын тулд амлалтай үр дүнг гаргасан. Энэ цаас нь хоёр хэл бага боловсролын NMT-ийн хоорондын аялал дасгал сургалтын арга замыг тайлбарладаг. Энэ нь нэг хэл өгөгдлийн сангуудыг ашиглаж өгөгдлийн талаар сургалтын тулд өгөгдлийн хамааралтай байд Бид Персийн-Испанийн талаар хоёр хэлний бага байгууллагын хувилбар гэж нарийвчлалтай туршилтыг хийдэг. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд энэ өрсөлдөөний арга зам нь суурь шугам дээр байдаг.', 'no': 'Kvaliteten til Neuralmaskineomsetjinga (NMT), som ein datadrivt tilnærming, er massivt avhengig av kvantiteten, kvaliteten og relevant av opplæringsdatasettet. Desse tilnærmingane har oppnådd promiserende resultat for bilinguelt høg ressursscenario, men er ikkje tilgjengeleg for låg ressursforhold. Denne papiret beskriver ein rundtreiseøvingstilnærming til bilinguelt låg ressurs NMT som brukar avansert av monospråk datasett for å handtera trykk på data, slik at omsetjingskvalitet aukar. Vi gjer detaljerte eksperimenter på persisk- spansk som ein divlingskvittig låg ressursscenario. Eksperimentale resultat viser at denne konkurentære tilnærminga utfører baselinjene.', 'pl': 'Jakość neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT), jako podejścia opartego na danych, w dużej mierze zależy od ilości, jakości i znaczenia zbioru danych szkoleniowych. Takie podejścia osiągnęły obiecujące rezultaty w przypadku scenariuszy dwujęzycznie wysokich zasobów, ale są niewystarczające dla warunków niskich zasobów. Niniejszy artykuł opisuje podejście szkoleniowe w obrębie podróży do dwujęzycznego NMT o niskich zasobach, które wykorzystuje jednojęzyczne zbiory danych do rozwiązania niedoboru danych szkoleniowych, zwiększając tym samym jakość tłumaczenia. Przeprowadzamy szczegółowe eksperymenty na persko-hiszpańskim scenariuszu dwujęzycznie niskiego zasobu. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że to konkurencyjne podejście przewyższa linię bazową.', 'ro': 'Calitatea traducerii automate neurale (NMT), ca abordare bazată pe date, depinde masiv de cantitatea, calitatea și relevanța setului de date de formare. Astfel de abordări au obținut rezultate promițătoare pentru scenariile bilingve cu resurse ridicate, dar sunt inadecvate pentru condițiile cu resurse scăzute. Această lucrare descrie o abordare de instruire dus-întors a NMT bilingvă cu resurse scăzute, care profită de seturile de date monolingve pentru a aborda deficitul de date de instruire, sporind astfel calitatea traducerii. Realizăm experimente detaliate pe persano-spaniolă ca scenariu bilingv cu resurse scăzute. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează că această abordare competitivă depășește liniile de bază.', 'sr': 'Kvaliteta Neuralnog prevoda mašine (NMT), kao pristup podataka, masivno zavisi od količine, kvalitete i relevantnosti seta podataka za obuku. Takvi pristupi su postigli obećavajuće rezultate za scenarije dvojezično visokog resursa, ali nisu dovoljni za uslove niskog resursa. U ovom papiru opisuje pristup obuke okruglih putovanja na dvojezički nizak resurs NMT koji koristi monojezičke datasete za rješavanje nedostatka obuke podataka, tako da povećava kvalitet prevođenja. Provodimo detaljne eksperimente o persijskom-španjolskom kao scenarij s niskim resursima. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da ovaj konkurentni pristup iznosi osnovne linije.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් අවවාදය (NMT) ගැන, දත්ත ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් විදිහට, ගොඩක් විශේෂය, ක්\u200dරමතාවය, සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය දත්ත සූද්ධ අනිවාර්ය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබුනා දෙවිභාෂාවක් විශාල ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර මේ පත්තුව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා දෙවල් භාෂාවක් අඩු සම්පූර්ණය NMT වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තොරතුරු නැ අපි පර්සියාන්-ස්පැනියාන් ගැන විස්තර පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා දෙවෙනි භාෂාවක් අඩු ප්\u200dරමාණයක පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නවා මේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර විද', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha tarjumaadda Neural machine (NMT), sida qaab lagu wado macluumaad, waxay ku xiran tahay qiyaastii, qiimaha iyo xiriirka koorasyada waxbarashada. Dhaqdhaqaaqyadaas waxay gaadheen sabab ballan ah oo ay labada luqadood oo labada luqadood ka helaan, laakiin ma filna shuruudaha hoos-nololeed. Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay koorasyada safarka oo aad u baahan karto laba luqadood oo hoos nooc ah NMT, kaas oo isticmaalaya macluumaadka kooxaha afka ah si uu u macaamiloodo baahida waxbarashada, sidaa darteed ayaa u kordhiya qiimaha turjumaadda. Imtixaano faa’iido ah oo ku qoran Finnish-Isbanish sida muuqashada labada luqadood oo hoos u leedahay. Shahaadada imtixaanka waxay muujiyaan in qaababkan tartanku ay ka muuqato aasaasiga.', 'sv': 'Kvaliteten på Neural Machine Translation (NMT), som ett datadrivet tillvägagångssätt, beror i hög grad på kvantitet, kvalitet och relevans hos utbildningsdatauppsättningen. Sådana tillvägagångssätt har gett lovande resultat för tvåspråkigt höga resursscenarier, men är otillräckliga för lågresursförhållanden. Denna uppsats beskriver en rundtursutbildningsmetod för tvåspråkig lågresurs NMT som utnyttjar enspråkiga datauppsättningar för att hantera brist på utbildningsdata, vilket ökar översättningskvaliteten. Vi genomför detaljerade experiment på persisk-spanska som ett tvåspråkigt lågresursscenario. Experimentella resultat visar att denna konkurrensstrategi överträffar baslinjerna.', 'ur': 'نیورال ماشین تعبیر کی کیفیت (NMT) کی، ایک ڈیٹا چلنے والی طریقہ کی طریقہ سے، بہت زیادہ تعبیر، کیفیت، اور تربین ڈیٹ سٹ کے معاملہ پر مضبوط ہے. یہ طریقے پہنچ گئے ہیں کہ دو زبانوں سے بلند سراسر سناریوں کے لئے وعدہ کا نتیجہ پہنچ گیا ہے لیکن کم سراسر شرایط کے لئے کافی نہیں ہیں. یہ کاغذ دو زبان کے نیچے منطقی NMT کے لئے ایک رانڈ ٹرینگ ٹرینگ ٹرینگ کا طریقہ توصیف کرتا ہے جو ایک زبان ڈیٹ سٹ کے فائدہ اٹھاتا ہے اس طرح ترجمہ کیفیت کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ ہم فارسی-اسپانیایی کے بارے میں تفصیل کی آزمائش کررہے ہیں ایک دوسری زبان سے کم منبع سناریو کے طور پر۔ آزمائش کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ مسابقات کی تقریبا بنیاس لینوں سے زیادہ کامل ہوتی ہے۔', 'ta': 'தரவு இயக்கி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) என்ற நெயுரால் இயந்திரத்தின் தரம், தரம், மற்றும் பயிற்சி தரவு அமைப்புகளின் சார்புரிமையை மாற்றுக இவ்வாறு முன்னேற்றங்கள் இரு மொத்த மூலத்திற்கு வாக்களிக்கப்பட்ட முடிவுகள் பெற்றுவிட்டன ஆனால் குறைந்த மூலத்தின் நில @ info நாங்கள் பார்சியன்-ஸ்பானிஷ் மீது விவரமான சோதனைகளை ஒரு இரு மொழி குறைந்த வளங்கள் காட்சியாக நடத்துகிறோம். சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் அடிப்படைகளை வெளியே செயல்படுத்துகிறது என்பதை காட்டுகிறது.', 'uz': 'Name Bu usullar ikki tillar yuqori manbaning aniqlariga ishlatilgan natijalari yetarli edi lekin manbaning xil holatiga yetarli emas. Бу саҳифа икки тилдан кам манзилга бажариш манзилга таърифли кўринади, у моллик маълумотлар маълумотлари камсифатини бажариш учун фойдаланади. Шундай қилиб, translation сифатини зиёда қилади. Biz Persiz-Ispanchada bir ikki tildan kamaytirish imtiyozni bajaramiz. Tekshirish natijalari bu rivojlanish usuli asosiy satrlarni bajaradi.', 'vi': 'Chất lượng của dịch về máy thần kinh (NMB) như một phương pháp dựa trên dữ liệu, phụ thuộc vào lượng, chất lượng và tầm quan trọng của bộ dữ liệu huấn luyện. Những phương pháp như vậy đã đạt được kết quả hứa hẹn cho các tình huống cao nguồn, nhưng không phù hợp với môi trường ít nguồn. Tờ giấy này mô tả một phương pháp huấn luyện vòng quanh nhằm phát triển hình thức phát sinh chất lượng thấp cho NMB mà sử dụng các bộ dữ liệu ngôn ngữ riêng để giải quyết việc thiếu dữ liệu, nhằm nâng cao chất lượng dịch. Chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm chi tiết về Ba Tư-Tây Ban Nha như một viễn cảnh ngầm thấp nguồn. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp cạnh tranh này hoàn thiện bản gốc.', 'bg': 'Качеството на невралния машинен превод (НМТ) като подход, основан на данни, значително зависи от количеството, качеството и релевантността на набора от данни за обучение. Подобни подходи са постигнали обещаващи резултати при двуезични сценарии с висок ресурс, но са недостатъчни при условия с нисък ресурс. Настоящата статия описва двуезичен подход за обучение с нисък ресурс, който се възползва от едноезични набори от данни за справяне с недостига на данни за обучение, като по този начин увеличава качеството на превода. Провеждаме подробни експерименти на персийско-испански като двуезичен сценарий с ниски ресурси. Експерименталните резултати показват, че този конкурентен подход надминава базовите линии.', 'da': 'Kvaliteten af Neural Machine Translation (NMT) som datadrevet tilgang afhænger i høj grad af mængde, kvalitet og relevans af træningsdatasættet. Sådanne fremgangsmåder har opnået lovende resultater for to-sprogede scenarier med høj ressource, men er utilstrækkelige for forhold med lav ressource. Denne artikel beskriver en returuddannelse tilgang til tosproget lav ressource NMT, der udnytter ensprogede datasæt til at tackle mangel på træningsdata og dermed øge oversættelseskvaliteten. Vi udfører detaljerede eksperimenter på persisk-spansk som et tosproget lav ressource scenarie. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at denne konkurrencemæssige tilgang overstiger basislinjerne.', 'hr': 'Kvaliteta prevoda neuroloških strojeva (NMT), kao pristup podataka, masivno zavisi od količine, kvalitete i relevantnosti seta podataka obuke. Takvi pristupi su postigli obećavajuće rezultate za scenarije dvojezično visokog resursa, ali nisu dovoljni za uvjete niskog resursa. U ovom papiru opisuje okružni pristup obuke na dvojezičke niske resurse NMT-u koji koristi monojezičke podatke za rješavanje nedostatka obuke podataka, a to povećava kvalitet prevoda. Provodimo detaljni eksperimenti o persijanskom-španjolskom kao scenarij dvojezički niskog resursa. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da taj konkurentni pristup iznosi osnovne linije.', 'nl': "De kwaliteit van Neural Machine Translation (NMT) als datagedreven benadering hangt sterk af van kwantiteit, kwaliteit en relevantie van de trainingsdataset. Dergelijke benaderingen hebben veelbelovende resultaten opgeleverd voor tweetalige scenario's met veel hulpbronnen, maar zijn ontoereikend voor omstandigheden met weinig hulpbronnen. Dit artikel beschrijft een round-trip trainingsaanpak voor tweetalige low-resource NMT die gebruik maakt van eentalige datasets om schaarste aan trainingsgegevens aan te pakken, waardoor de vertaalkwaliteit wordt verbeterd. We voeren gedetailleerde experimenten uit op Perzisch-Spaans als een tweetalig scenario met weinig hulpbronnen. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat deze competitieve aanpak de basislijnen overtreft.", 'de': 'Die Qualität der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung (NMT) als datengetriebener Ansatz hängt massiv von Quantität, Qualität und Relevanz des Trainingsdatensatzes ab. Solche Ansätze haben vielversprechende Ergebnisse für bilingual ressourcenreiche Szenarien erzielt, sind aber für ressourcenarme Bedingungen unzureichend. Diese Arbeit beschreibt einen Round-Trip-Trainingsansatz für bilinguale ressourcenarme NMT, der monolinguale Datensätze nutzt, um die Knappheit von Trainingsdaten zu beheben und so die Übersetzungsqualität zu erhöhen. Wir führen detaillierte Experimente zu Persisch-Spanisch als bilingual ressourcenarmem Szenario durch. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass dieser Wettbewerbsansatz die Basislinien übertrifft.', 'id': 'Kualitas Translation Mesin Neural (NMT), sebagai pendekatan yang didorong data, bergantung pada kuantitas, kualitas, dan relevansi set data pelatihan. Pendekatan seperti ini telah mencapai hasil yang berjanji untuk skenario sumber daya tinggi dua bahasa tetapi tidak cukup untuk kondisi sumber daya rendah. Kertas ini menggambarkan pendekatan latihan perjalanan bulat ke NMT sumber daya rendah dua bahasa yang mengambil keuntungan dari set data monobahasa untuk mengatasi kekurangan data latihan, sehingga meningkatkan kualitas terjemahan. Kami melakukan eksperimen terperinci pada Persia-Spanyol sebagai skenario sumber daya rendah secara dua bahasa. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kompetitif ini melebihi garis dasar.', 'ko': '신경기계번역(NMT)은 데이터 구동 방법의 하나로서 그 품질은 어느 정도에 훈련 데이터 집합의 수량, 품질과 관련성에 달려 있다.이런 방법은 이중 언어 자원이 높은 상황에서 희망적인 결과를 얻었지만 자원이 낮은 상황에서는 부족하다.본고는 이중 언어 저자원 NMT의 왕복 훈련 방법을 묘사했는데 이 방법은 단어 데이터 집합을 이용하여 훈련 데이터가 부족한 문제를 해결하고 번역의 질을 향상시킨다.우리는 페르시아어-스페인어에 대해 상세한 실험을 진행하였는데, 이중 언어 자원이 부족한 상황이다.실험 결과 이런 경쟁적인 방법은 기선보다 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'کیفیت ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) به عنوان یک دستور با راهنمایی داده بستگی به اندازه، کیفیت و مربوط به مجموعه داده آموزش بستگی دارد. این روش\u200cها نتیجه\u200cی قول\u200cدهنده\u200cای برای سناریو\u200cهای منابع بالا به زبان رسیده\u200cاند ولی برای شرایط کم منابع کافی نیستند. این کاغذ یک روش آموزش مسافرت به NMT منابع کم زبان دو زبان توصیف می\u200cکند که از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای یک زبان استفاده می\u200cکند تا به کمبود داده\u200cهای آموزش کند، بنابراین کیفیت ترجمه را افزایش می\u200cدهد. ما آزمایش\u200cهای جزئیات در اسپانیایی و فارسی را به عنوان یک سناریو کم منابع دو زبان انجام می\u200cدهیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهند که این روش رقابت بیشتر از خط\u200cهای پایین را انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Ukubwa wa Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Neural (NMT), kama mbinu inayoendeshwa na taarifa, inategemea sana kiasi, ubora na umuhimu wa seti ya mafunzo. Hatua hizo zimefikia matokeo yanayoahidiwa kwa matukio ya rasilimali yenye lugha mbili lakini hayakutosha kwa mazingira ya chini ya rasilimali. Gazeti hili linaelezea mbinu za mafunzo ya safari kwa lugha mbili za NMT inayotumia matumizi ya taarifa za lugha za kiwili ili kuhusiana na ukosefu wa mafunzo ya data, kwa hiyo inaongeza kiwango cha tafsiri. Tunafanya majaribio ya kina katika lugha ya Kiperspania kama hali ya chini ya rasilimali mbili. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu hii ya ushindani inafanya msingi.', 'tr': 'Neural Maşynyň terjimesiniň (NMT) kalitesi, maglumatlar tarapyndan golaýlaşýan ýagdaýynda gaty baglanýar. Bütin ýagdaýlar iki dil ýokary resurs senaryýasynda söz berýän netijelere ýetdi, ýöne iň-çeşme şertleri üçin ýeňok däldir. Bu kagyz ikinji dilli iň az resurslar NMT üçin ýöred gezek eğitim taýýarlamagynyň bir golaýyny tassyýar edýär. Bu käze bir monodil datajylary maglumatyň ýekisini çözmek üçin bir hereket edip bilýär we şonuň üçin terjime etmek howpsalyn Biz persiýa-ispanyýa bilen iki dil iň az resurs senaryýany bilen detaylar deneyler etdik. Araşdyrylyk netijeleri bu ýaryşykly ýagdaýyň baseçiliklerini ýok edip görkezýär.', 'af': "Die kwaliteit van Neurale Masjien Vertaling (NMT), as 'n data-draai toegang, het massief afhang van hoeveelheid, kwaliteit en relevansie van die onderwerp datastel. Hierdie toegang het beloftende resultate bereik vir twee-linge hoë-hulpbron-scenarios, maar is onvoldoende vir lae-hulpbron-voorwaardes. Hierdie papier beskrywe 'n rondtreking onderwerp toegang tot twee tale lae hulpbron NMT wat voordeel van monolinglike datastelle neem om onderwerp van onderwerp data te beskikbaar, sodat vertaling kwaliteit vergroot. Ons doen gedetale eksperimente op Persiese-Spaanse as 'n tweedelinglike lae hulpbron scenario. Eksperimentale resultate bevestig dat hierdie mededingstoegang die basilyne uitvoer.", 'sq': 'Kualiteti i Translacionit të Makinës Neurale (NMT), si një qasje e drejtuar nga të dhënat, varet në mënyrë masive nga sasia, cilësia dhe rëndësia e grupit të të dhënave të trainimit. Këto qasje kanë arritur rezultate premtuese për skenarët dygjuhësisht me burime të larta por nuk janë të përshtatshme për kushtet me burime të ulta. Ky dokument përshkruan një qasje trajnimi të udhëtimit të rrumbullakët ndaj NMT dy-gjuhës me burime të ulëta që përfiton nga grupet e të dhënave monogjuhësore për të trajnuar mungesën e të dhënave të trajnimit, duke rritur kështu cilësinë e përkthimit. Ne kryejmë eksperimente të detajuara në persiano-spanjoll si një skenar dy-gjuhës me burime të ulëta. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se kjo qasje konkurruese tejkalon linjat bazë.', 'am': 'የናውሬል መኪን ትርጉም (NMT) ጥያቄ፣ የዳታ ሥርዓት፣ ቁጥር፣ ጥሩ እና የቴናው ዳታተር ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ Such approaches have achieved promising results for bilingually high-resource scenarios but are inadequate for low-resource conditions.  ይሄ ፕሮግራም ለሁለት ቋንቋዎች የዋጭነት የክፍለ ሀብት NMT ጥያቄን ለመጠቀም የሚጠቅመውን የዶላንቋዎች ዳታ ድህነትን ለማግኘት የሚጠቅመውን የዞረ ጉዞ ማህበረታዊን ይናገራል፤ ስለዚህም ትርጓሜዎችን ጥሩ ያበዛል። በፋርስፓኒሽ-ስፓኒሽ ላይ የተዘረዘ ፈተናዎችን በሁለት ቋንቋ ታናሽ የክፍለ ክፍተት እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች ይህ ተግባራዊ ሥርዓት መደገፊያውን እንዲያወጣ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) որակը, որպես տվյալների հիմնված մոտեցում, մեծ մասամբ կախված է մարզիչ տվյալների համակարգի քանակից, որակից և կարևորությունից: Այսպիսի մոտեցումները երկլեզու բարձր ռեսուրսներ ունեցող սցենարների համար խոստացնող արդյունքներ են հասել, բայց դրանք բավարար են ցածր ռեսուրսներ ունեցող պայմանների համար: Այս թղթին նկարագրում է երկլեզու ցածր ռեսուրսներ ունեցող ՆՄԹ-ի կրթության շրջանակի մոտեցումը, որը օգտագործում է միալեզվի տվյալների համակարգերը, որպեսզի լուծվի տվյալների բացակայությունը, այնպես բարձրացնում է թա Մենք փորձեր ենք կատարում պարսի-իսպաներենի վրա որպես երկլեզու ցածր ռեսուրսների սցենարիա: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ այս մրցակցության մոտեցումը գերազանցում է հիմնական գծերը:', 'az': 'NMT, məlumatları tərcümə etdiyi tərzdə nöral maşın tərcümünün keyfiyyəti, böyük təhsil verilənlərin sayısına, keyfiyyətinə və məlumatların bağlılığına bağlı. Bütün bu yollar iki dildən yüksək ressurs scenariyalarının və ’ d verən sonuçlarına çatdılar, amma düşük ressurs şartları üçün kifayət deyillər. Bu kağıt iki dil düşük ressurs NMT üçün çevrili səfərdə təhsil metodlarını təsdiqləyir ki, təhsil etmə məlumatlarının zəif olmasını çəkmək üçün monodil verilən qurbanların faydasını verər, böylece tercümə keyfiyyətini artırar. Biz Persiyalı-İspanyolca barəsində ayrıntılı təcrübələr iki dildən düşük ressurs senaryosu olaraq etdik. Həqiqətən, təcrübə sonuçları bu müəllif tərəfindən baz çətinlərini daha üstün etdiyini göstərir.', 'bn': 'নেউরাল মেশিনের অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) মানের মান, ডাটা চালানো পদ্ধতি হিসেবে ব্যাপক নির্ভর করে ট্রেনিং ডাটাসেটের মান, মান এবং প্রশ এই ধরনের পদক্ষেপ দুই ভাষায় উচ্চমূল্যের দৃশ্যের প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল ফলাফল অর্জন করেছে কিন্তু কম সম্পদ পরিস্থিতির জন্য যথেষ্ট নয় এই পত্রিকাটি দুই ভাষায় নীচের সম্পদ এনএমটির প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণের একটি রাউন্ড-ভ্রমণের প্রশিক্ষণের পদ্ধতি বর্ণনা করেছে, যা মোনোলিভাল ভাষার আমরা পার্সিয়ান-স্প্যানিশে বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষা করি দুই ভাষায় কম সম্পদের দৃশ্য হিসেবে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করে যে এই প্রতিযোগিতার প্রতিযোগিতার প্রতিযোগিতা বেসেলাইনের বাইরে প্রদর্শন করে।', 'bs': 'Kvaliteta prevoda neuroloških strojeva (NMT), kao pristup podataka, masivno zavisi od količine, kvalitete i relevantnosti seta podataka za obuku. Takvi pristupi su postigli obećavajuće rezultate za scenarije dvojezično visokog resursa, ali nisu dovoljni za uvjete niskog resursa. U ovom papiru opisuje pristup obuke okrugla putovanja na dvojezički nizak resurs NMT koji koristi monojezičke dataset za rješavanje nedostatka podataka o obuci, tako da povećava kvalitet prevođenja. Mi vodimo detaljne eksperimente o persijskom-španjolskom kao scenario dvojezički niskog resursa. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da ovaj konkurentni pristup iznosi osnovne linije.', 'ca': "La qualitat de la traducció de màquines neurals (NMT), com un enfocament basat en dades, depèn massivament de la quantitat, la qualitat i la pertinencia del conjunt de dades d'entrenament. Aquests enfocaments han aconseguit resultats prometedors per a escenaris bilingües de recursos alts però són insuficients per a condicions de recursos baixos. Aquest paper descriu un enfocament d'entrenament en viatge redond a la NMT bilingüe de baix recursos que aprofita els conjunts de dades monolingües per abordar l'escassetat de dades d'entrenament, augmentant així la qualitat de la traducció. Fem experiments detallats en persa-espanyol com a escenari de baix recursos bilingües. Experimental results demonstrate that this competitive approach outperforms the baselines.", 'et': 'Neuraalse masintõlke (NMT) kvaliteet kui andmepõhine lähenemine sõltub massiliselt koolitusandmete kogusest, kvaliteedist ja asjakohasusest. Sellised lähenemisviisid on saavutanud paljulubavaid tulemusi kahekeelselt suure ressursiga stsenaariumide puhul, kuid need on ebapiisavad vähese ressursiga tingimuste puhul. Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse tagasi-tagasi koolituse lähenemisviisi kakskeelsele vähese ressursiga NMT-le, mis kasutab ära ühekeelseid andmekogumeid koolitusandmete nappuse lahendamiseks, parandades seeläbi tõlkekvaliteeti. Me teeme üksikasjalikke eksperimente Pärsia-hispaania kui kahekeelselt vähese ressursi stsenaariumi kohta. Katsetulemused näitavad, et selline konkurentsivõimeline lähenemisviis ületab lähtetasemeid.', 'cs': 'Kvalita neuronového strojového překladu (NMT) jako datově řízeného přístupu závisí masivně na kvantitě, kvalitě a relevanci tréninkových dat. Tyto přístupy dosáhly slibných výsledků pro dvojjazyčné scénáře s vysokými zdroji, ale nejsou dostatečné pro podmínky s nízkými zdroji. Tento článek popisuje zpětný tréninkový přístup k dvojjazyčnému NMT s nízkými zdroji, který využívá jednojjazyčných datových sad k řešení nedostatku dat v oblasti školení, čímž se zvyšuje kvalita překladu. Provádíme detailní experimenty na perské španělštině jako dvojjazyčném scénáři s nízkými zdroji. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že tento konkurenční přístup překonává základní linie.', 'fi': 'Neuraalisen konekäännöksen (NMT) laatu datavetoisena lähestymistapana riippuu valtavasti koulutusaineiston määrästä, laadusta ja relevanssista. Tällaisilla lähestymistavoilla on saavutettu lupaavia tuloksia kaksikielisesti runsaiden resurssien skenaarioissa, mutta ne ovat riittämättömiä vähäisten resurssien olosuhteissa. Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan kaksikielisen vähäresurssisen NMT:n koulutusmallia, jossa hyödynnetään monikielisiä aineistoja koulutusdatan niukkuuden korjaamiseksi ja käännösten laadun parantamiseksi. Teemme yksityiskohtaisia kokeita persia-espanjasta kaksikielisesti vähävaraisena skenaariona. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että tämä kilpailukykyinen lähestymistapa ylittää lähtökohdat.', 'jv': 'kalitas bertuturaké Manus Terjamahan (NMT), kayata data-akéwé, nggambar-uwong ngomong ing kantor, kalitas lan ijol-ijolan dataset kuwi nggawe dataset kuwi kudu. Diwong-wong kanggo mbelangno hukum sing rumangsa akeh lan alam menyang sekenari iki dadi iki dadi, kepiye ora iso dianggap kanggo kowé apa-apa sing berarti. Awak iki dipperintah Panjenengan langgambar para nggawe NdMT kuwi tindang kuwi wis ambang barang nggawe dataset kuwi Monlenggane kuwi tindakan to nguasai perusahaan data seneng pisan, dadi wis apik nggawe paling-apik. Awak dhéwé éntuk ndhelik teluktan karo Persemana-Kasian kuwi padha kelas telu hasar. Pametuné sing paling apik maneh sawetara dadi, akeh sing paling apik kuwi nggawe barang pancen.', 'sk': 'Kakovost nevralnega strojnega prevajanja (NMT) kot pristopa, ki temelji na podatkih, je močno odvisna od količine, kakovosti in ustreznosti nabora podatkov o usposabljanju. Takšni pristopi so dosegli obetavne rezultate za dvojezične scenarije z visokimi viri, vendar niso primerni za razmere z nizkimi viri. V prispevku je opisan povratni pristop usposabljanja za dvojezično NMT z nizkimi viri, ki izkorišča enojezične nabore podatkov za obravnavanje pomanjkanja podatkov o usposabljanju in s tem povečuje kakovost prevodov. Izvajamo podrobne eksperimente na perzijsko-španskem scenariju kot dvojezično nizko-virih. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da ta konkurenčni pristop presega osnovne vrednosti.', 'ha': "Tsarin Translate na Kikake na Neural (NMT), kamar wata hanyor da aka yi tafiyar da shi na data, yana mai ƙayyade gwargwadon, da tsarin, da kuma yana da amfani da tsarin danna na tsarin. Waccan hanyoyinsu sun sãmu matsayin mai yiwuwa wa'anar-fassarar sau biyu, kuma ba su isa ba ga sharrin-resource. Wannan takardan na describe a runaway-tafiyar tattalin mafarin aiki zuwa na biyu-wuri-resource NMT wanda ke ci da amfani da data masu tsakanin ayuka na mutane, sabõda haka yana ƙara sifar fassarar. Munã samun jarrabãwa na fasanci a kan Persian-spanish kamar wani fassara na ƙaranci na biyu. Matarin jarrabai sun nuna cewa wannan hanyor yin ta'ura ta samar bakin.", 'he': 'איכות התרגום של מכונות נוירות (NMT), בתור גישה מונעת על נתונים, תלויה באופן מסיבי על כמות, איכות ורלוונטיות של קבוצת נתונים האימונים. גישות כאלה השיגו תוצאות מבטיחות לתרחישים בעלי משאבים גבוהים בשולשיים, אך הן לא מתאימות לתנאים בעלי משאבים נמוכים. העיתון הזה מתאר גישה לאימוני טיול מסביב ל NMT משאבים נמוכים שתיים ששניים שמשתמשים במערכות נתונים מונושפתיים כדי להתמודד עם חסר נתונים לאימונים, כך מגביר את איכות התרגום. אנחנו מבצעים ניסויים מפורסמים על פרסי-ספרדי כתרחיש של משאבים נמוכים בשלשיים. תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות שגישה תחרותית זו מעלית את קווי הבסיס.', 'bo': 'སྒེར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་རིམ་ཐང་ཚད་(NMT)དང་གནད་དོན་ཕྱོགས་གནང་བ་ཞིག་ཆས་ཡོད་པ་ལྟར་བསམ་ཚད་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གནང་འཕྲིན་དང འདི་དག་གི་མཐུན་སྣེ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ལ་འཇོག་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་བྱུང་། ཤོག ང་ཚོས་Persian-Spanish ཡི་སྒེར་གྱི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཆོས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ལག་ལེན་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དེ་ནི་སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདིས་གཞི་རྩལ་བ་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Diachronic Analysis of Entities by Exploiting Wikipedia Page revisions', 'ar': 'تحليل غير متزامن للكيانات من خلال استغلال مراجعات صفحة ويكيبيديا', 'fr': 'Analyse diachronique des entités en exploitant les révisions des pages Wikipédia', 'es': 'Análisis diacrónico de entidades mediante la explotación de revisiones de páginas de Wikipedia', 'pt': 'Análise Diacrônica de Entidades Explorando Revisões de Páginas da Wikipédia', 'ja': 'ウィキペディアページの改訂を利用することによるエンティティのダイアクロニック分析', 'zh': '因维基百科页面修实体以析之', 'hi': 'विकिपीडिया पृष्ठ संशोधनों का शोषण करके संस्थाओं का डायक्रोनिक विश्लेषण', 'ru': 'Диахронный анализ сущностей с использованием редакций страниц Википедии', 'ga': 'Anailís Diachronic na n-Eintiteas ag Leas a bhaint as Vicipéid athbhreithnithe Leathanach....', 'ka': 'ელემენტების დიაპრონიკური ანალიზი ვიკიპედიაში გვერდის რედაქტირების გამოყენებით', 'el': 'Διάχρονη ανάλυση οντοτήτων με αξιοποίηση αναθεωρήσεων σελίδας της Βικιπαίδειας', 'hu': 'Az entitások diakrónikus elemzése a Wikipédia kihasználásával', 'it': 'Analisi diacronica delle entità sfruttando Wikipedia', 'kk': 'Википедия парақтың редакцияларын зерттеу арқылы нысандардың диастроникалық анализ', 'lt': 'Diachroninė subjektų analizė naudojant Wikipedia puslapių peržiūras', 'mk': 'Дијахронична анализа на ентитетите со искористување на ревизиите на страниците на Википедија', 'ms': 'Analisi Diakronik Entiti dengan Menggunakan revisi Halaman Wikipedia', 'mt': 'Analiżi dijakronika ta’ Entitajiet bl-Isfruttar ta’ Reviżjonijiet tal-Paġni tal-Wikipedia', 'ml': 'വിക്കിപിഡിയയുടെ താളുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിച്ചുകൊണ്ട് എന്റിറ്റികളുടെ ഡയറകോണിക് അന്വേഷിക്കുക', 'mn': 'Википедийн хуудас шинэчлэлүүдийг судалж байгаагаар', 'no': 'Diakronisk analyse av einingar ved utforsking av Wikipedia- siderevisjonar', 'pl': 'Diachroniczna analiza podmiotów poprzez wykorzystanie wersji strony Wikipedii', 'sr': 'Dijahronička analiza područja istražujući revizije Wikipedia stranica', 'ro': 'Analiza diacronică a entităților prin exploatarea paginii Wikipedia', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Analyse of Entities by Exploding Wikipedia Page revisions', 'ta': 'விகிபிடியா பக்கத்தின் மேல்மேலாளர்கள் மூலம் உள்ளீடுகளின் விரைவான ஆய்வு', 'sv': 'Diakronisk analys av enheter genom att utnyttja Wikipedia Sidrevideringar', 'ur': 'ویکیپیڈیا پیج روشنی کے مطابق انٹیٹیوں کی دیاگرنیک تحلیل', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nhật ký phân tích các đơn vị bằng cách khai thác các phiên bản Wikipedia.', 'bg': 'Диахроничен анализ на субектите чрез използване на ревизиите на страницата на Уикипедия', 'nl': 'Diachronische Analyse van Entiteiten door gebruik te maken van Wikipedia pagina revisies', 'hr': 'Diakronička analiza područja istražujući revizije Wikipedia stranice', 'da': 'Diakronisk analyse af enheder ved at udnytte Wikipedia Siderevisioner', 'de': 'Diachrone Analyse von Entitäten durch Ausnutzung von Wikipedia-Seitenrevisionen', 'ko': '위키백과 페이지 수정을 이용하여 실체에 대해 역대 분석을 진행하다', 'id': 'Analisi Diakronis Entitas Dengan Eksploatasi Revisi Halaman Wikipedia', 'fa': 'تحلیل دیاتوریکی از اجتماعات با تحلیل تغییرات صفحه ویکیپدیا', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa kidijitali wa Matukio na Mategemeo ya Ukurasa wa Wikipedia', 'tr': 'Wikipediýa sahypa çalyşyrlygyny tarapyndan birnäçe analizi', 'sq': 'Analiza Diakronike e njësive duke shfrytëzuar revisionet e faqeve të Wikipedias', 'am': 'Wikipedia Page revisions', 'af': 'Diakronise Analisie van Eenheidse deur Wikipedia Bladsy Revisiërings te uitvoer', 'hy': 'Diachronic Analysis of Entities by Exploiting Wikipedia Page revisions', 'az': 'Wikipedia s…ôhif…ôl…ôrinin d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrini istifad…ô ed…ôr…ôk Entitel…ôrin Diakroniki Analizi', 'bs': 'Diakronička analiza poduzeća istražujući revizije Wikipedia stranice', 'bn': 'উইকিপিডিয়া পাতা পরিবর্তনের মাধ্যমে এন্টিটির ডায়ারোনিক বিশ্লেষণ', 'ca': 'Diachronic Analysis of Entities by Exploiting Wikipedia Page revisions', 'cs': 'Diachronická analýza entit využitím revizí Wikipedie stránek', 'et': 'Olemuste diakrooniline analüüs Vikipeedia lehekülje paranduste kasutamise abil', 'fi': 'Entiteettien diakrooninen analyysi hyödyntämällä Wikipedian sivuversioita', 'jv': 'diahronik Alkalis Entityèn kanggo Ketokeyarno Pajine Ngubah', 'he': 'Analysis Diachronic of Entities by Exploiting Wikipedia Page Revisions', 'sk': 'Diakronična analiza entitet z izkoriščanjem revizij strani Wikipedije', 'ha': 'Analyze of Entities by Exploding Wikimedia Page versions', 'bo': 'Wikipedia འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ནས་དབྱེ་རིགས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'In the last few years, the increasing availability of large corpora spanning several time periods has opened new opportunities for the diachronic analysis of language. This type of analysis can bring to the light not only linguistic phenomena related to the shift of word meanings over time, but it can also be used to study the impact that societal and cultural trends have on this language change. This paper introduces a new resource for performing the diachronic analysis of named entities built upon Wikipedia page revisions. This resource enables the analysis over time of changes in the relations between entities (concepts), surface forms (words), and the contexts surrounding entities and surface forms, by analysing the whole history of Wikipedia internal links. We provide some useful use cases that prove the impact of this resource on diachronic studies and delineate some possible future usage.', 'es': 'En los últimos años, la creciente disponibilidad de grandes corpus que abarcan varios períodos de tiempo ha abierto nuevas oportunidades para el análisis diacrónico del lenguaje. Este tipo de análisis puede sacar a la luz no solo los fenómenos lingüísticos relacionados con el cambio de significado de las palabras a lo largo del tiempo, sino que también se puede utilizar para estudiar el impacto que las tendencias sociales y culturales tienen en este cambio de idioma. Este artículo presenta un nuevo recurso para realizar el análisis diacrónico de entidades nombradas basado en revisiones de páginas de Wikipedia. Este recurso permite el análisis a lo largo del tiempo de los cambios en las relaciones entre entidades (conceptos), formas de superficie (palabras) y los contextos que rodean a las entidades y formas de superficie, mediante el análisis de toda la historia de los enlaces internos de Wikipedia. Proporcionamos algunos casos de uso útiles que demuestran el impacto de este recurso en los estudios diacrónicos y delinean algunos posibles usos futuros.', 'ar': 'في السنوات القليلة الماضية ، أدى التوافر المتزايد للمؤسسات الكبيرة التي تمتد لفترات زمنية عديدة إلى فتح فرص جديدة للتحليل التعاقدي للغة. يمكن لهذا النوع من التحليل أن يسلط الضوء ليس فقط على الظواهر اللغوية المتعلقة بتحول معاني الكلمات بمرور الوقت ، ولكن يمكن أيضًا استخدامه لدراسة تأثير الاتجاهات المجتمعية والثقافية على هذا التغيير اللغوي. تقدم هذه الورقة موردًا جديدًا لإجراء التحليل التاريخي للكيانات المسماة المبنية على مراجعات صفحة ويكيبيديا. يمكّن هذا المورد من تحليل التغييرات في العلاقات بين الكيانات (المفاهيم) ، والأشكال السطحية (الكلمات) ، والسياقات المحيطة بالكيانات وأشكال السطح ، بمرور الوقت ، من خلال تحليل التاريخ الكامل للروابط الداخلية لـ Wikipedia. نحن نقدم بعض حالات الاستخدام المفيدة التي تثبت تأثير هذا المورد على الدراسات التاريخية وتحديد بعض الاستخدامات المحتملة في المستقبل.', 'fr': "Au cours des dernières années, la disponibilité croissante de grands corpus couvrant plusieurs périodes a ouvert de nouvelles possibilités pour l'analyse diachronique du langage. Ce type d'analyse peut mettre en lumière non seulement les phénomènes linguistiques liés au changement de sens des mots au fil du temps, mais il peut également être utilisé pour étudier l'impact des tendances sociétales et culturelles sur ce changement de langue. Cet article présente une nouvelle ressource pour effectuer l'analyse diachronique des entités nommées à partir des révisions de pages Wikipédia. Cette ressource permet d'analyser au fil du temps les changements dans les relations entre les entités (concepts), les formes de surface (mots) et les contextes entourant les entités et les formes de surface, en analysant l'histoire complète des liens internes de Wikipédia. Nous fournissons quelques cas d'utilisation utiles qui prouvent l'impact de cette ressource sur les études diachroniques et délimitent certaines utilisations futures possibles.", 'pt': 'Nos últimos anos, a crescente disponibilidade de grandes corpora abrangendo vários períodos de tempo abriu novas oportunidades para a análise diacrônica da linguagem. Esse tipo de análise pode trazer à luz não apenas fenômenos linguísticos relacionados à mudança de significado das palavras ao longo do tempo, mas também pode ser usado para estudar o impacto que as tendências sociais e culturais têm nessa mudança de linguagem. Este artigo apresenta um novo recurso para realizar a análise diacrônica de entidades nomeadas construídas a partir de revisões de páginas da Wikipédia. Este recurso possibilita a análise ao longo do tempo das mudanças nas relações entre entidades (conceitos), formas superficiais (palavras), e os contextos que envolvem entidades e formas superficiais, analisando toda a história dos links internos da Wikipédia. Fornecemos alguns casos de uso úteis que comprovam o impacto deste recurso em estudos diacrônicos e delineamos alguns possíveis usos futuros.', 'ja': '過去数年間で、いくつかの期間にわたる大規模なコーパスの入手可能性の増加は、言語のダイアクロニック分析の新しい機会をもたらしました。この種の分析は、言葉の意味の時間の移り変わりに関連する言語現象を明らかにするだけでなく、社会的および文化的傾向がこの言語の変化に与える影響を研究するためにも用いることができる。本稿では、Wikipediaページの改訂に基づいて構築された名前付きエンティティのダイアクロニック分析を実行するための新しいリソースを紹介する。このリソースは、ウィキペディアの内部リンクの全体的な歴史を分析することによって、エンティティ（概念）、表面形式（単語）、およびエンティティと表面形式を取り巻く文脈の間の関係の変化を時間の経過とともに分析することを可能にします。私たちは、このリソースがダイアクロニクス研究に与える影響を証明し、将来の使用の可能性を説明するいくつかの有用なユースケースを提供します。', 'zh': '往数年中,越数时间段之大语料库可用性日增,剖析开辟。 非徒明单词时变之言也,所以论世俗文化之势也。 本文引新资,基于维基百科页面修订版构之实。 资能析维基百科内链接之终,析实(名),表面形式(单词)与上下文之间,随时变化。 资有用之用例,证其资源,述其未来之用。', 'hi': 'पिछले कुछ वर्षों में, कई समय अवधि में फैले बड़े कॉर्पोरेट की बढ़ती उपलब्धता ने भाषा के डायक्रोनिक विश्लेषण के लिए नए अवसर खोले हैं। इस प्रकार का विश्लेषण न केवल समय के साथ शब्द अर्थों के बदलाव से संबंधित भाषाई घटनाओं को प्रकाश में ला सकता है, बल्कि इसका उपयोग इस भाषा परिवर्तन पर सामाजिक और सांस्कृतिक रुझानों के प्रभाव का अध्ययन करने के लिए भी किया जा सकता है। यह पेपर विकिपीडिया पृष्ठ संशोधनों पर निर्मित नामित संस्थाओं के डायक्रोनिक विश्लेषण करने के लिए एक नए संसाधन का परिचय देता है। यह संसाधन विकिपीडिया के आंतरिक लिंक के पूरे इतिहास का विश्लेषण करके संस्थाओं (अवधारणाओं), सतह रूपों (शब्दों) और संस्थाओं और सतह रूपों के आसपास के संदर्भों के बीच संबंधों में परिवर्तन के समय के साथ विश्लेषण को सक्षम बनाता है। हम कुछ उपयोगी उपयोग के मामले प्रदान करते हैं जो डायक्रोनिक अध्ययनों पर इस संसाधन के प्रभाव को साबित करते हैं और कुछ संभावित भविष्य के उपयोग को चित्रित करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В последние несколько лет растущая доступность крупных корпусов, охватывающих несколько периодов времени, открыла новые возможности для диахронного анализа языка. Этот тип анализа может выявить не только лингвистические явления, связанные со сдвигом значений слов во времени, но и может быть использован для изучения влияния социальных и культурных тенденций на это изменение языка. В этой статье представлен новый ресурс для выполнения диахронного анализа именованных сущностей на основе версий страниц Википедии. Этот ресурс позволяет анализировать с течением времени изменения во взаимоотношениях между сущностями (понятиями), поверхностными формами (словами) и контекстами, окружающими сущности и поверхностные формы, анализируя всю историю внутренних связей Википедии. Мы предоставляем несколько полезных вариантов использования, которые доказывают влияние этого ресурса на диахронические исследования и описывают некоторые возможные будущие варианты использования.', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas, tá deiseanna nua ann le hanailís dhéacrónach a dhéanamh ar theanga mar gheall ar an méadú atá tagtha ar chorparáidí móra a mhair thar roinnt tréimhsí ama. Is féidir leis an gcineál seo anailíse ní amháin feiniméin theangeolaíocha a bhaineann le haistriú bríonna focal a thabhairt chun solais le himeacht ama, ach is féidir í a úsáid freisin chun staidéar a dhéanamh ar an tionchar a bhíonn ag treochtaí sochaíocha agus cultúrtha ar an athrú teanga seo. Tugann an páipéar seo acmhainn nua isteach chun an anailís dhiacrónach a dhéanamh ar eintitis ainmnithe bunaithe ar athbhreithnithe ar leathanaigh Vicipéid. Cumasaíonn an acmhainn seo anailís a dhéanamh le himeacht ama ar athruithe sa chaidreamh idir eintitis (coincheapa), foirmeacha dromchla (focail), agus na comhthéacsanna a bhaineann le haonáin agus foirmeacha dromchla, trí anailís a dhéanamh ar stair iomlán naisc inmheánacha Vicipéid. Cuirimid roinnt cásanna úsáide úsáideacha ar fáil a dhearbhaíonn tionchar na hacmhainne seo ar staidéir dhéacrónacha agus a shainíonn roinnt úsáide féideartha amach anseo.', 'ka': 'ბოლო რამდენიმე წლის განმავლობაში, დიაპონიკალური ანალიზაციის დიაპონიკალური შესაძლებლობა, რამდენიმე წლის განმავლობაში გახსნა ახალი შესაძლებლობა. ამ ანალიზის ტიპი შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ სინამდვილეში არა მხოლოდ სინამდვილეების ცვლილებისთვის, მაგრამ ეს შეიძლება გამოყენება სინამდვილეების ცვლილებისთვის, რომელიც საზოგადოებული და კულტურური ამ დოკუმენტის ახალი რესურსი ვიკიპედია გვერდის რეუზიციაში დააყენებული სახელსახულების დიაჰრონიკური ანალიზაციის გამოყენება. ამ რესურსის შესაძლებელია ანალიზაცია ინტერტიების (კონცექტები), სამუშაო ფორმები (სიტყვები) და კონტექსტები, რომლებიც ინტერტიები და სამუშაო ფორმები გადარწმუნდებული, ვიკ ჩვენ გვეყვანეთ რამდენიმე საჭირო გამოყენება, რომელიც გამოიყენება ამ რესურსის გავლენას დიაპრონიკური სწავლებაში და განაკეთება შესაძლებელი მომავალ', 'el': 'Τα τελευταία χρόνια, η αυξανόμενη διαθεσιμότητα μεγάλων σωμάτων που καλύπτουν αρκετές χρονικές περιόδους έχει ανοίξει νέες ευκαιρίες για τη διαχρονική ανάλυση της γλώσσας. Αυτός ο τύπος ανάλυσης μπορεί να φέρει στο φως όχι μόνο γλωσσικά φαινόμενα που σχετίζονται με τη μετατόπιση των εννοιών λέξεων με την πάροδο του χρόνου, αλλά μπορεί επίσης να χρησιμοποιηθεί για τη μελέτη του αντίκτυπου που έχουν οι κοινωνικές και πολιτιστικές τάσεις στην αλλαγή της γλώσσας. Η παρούσα εργασία εισάγει έναν νέο πόρο για την εκτέλεση της διαχρονικής ανάλυσης των ονομάτων οντοτήτων που βασίζονται σε αναθεωρήσεις σελίδας της Βικιπαίδειας. Αυτός ο πόρος επιτρέπει την ανάλυση με την πάροδο του χρόνου των αλλαγών στις σχέσεις μεταξύ οντοτήτων (εννοιών), επιφανειακών μορφών (λέξεων) και των πλαισίων γύρω από οντότητες και επιφανειακές μορφές, αναλύοντας ολόκληρη την ιστορία των εσωτερικών συνδέσεων της Βικιπαίδειας. Παρέχουμε μερικές χρήσιμες περιπτώσεις χρήσης που αποδεικνύουν τον αντίκτυπο αυτού του πόρου στις διαχρονικές μελέτες και περιγράφουν κάποιες πιθανές μελλοντικές χρήσεις.', 'hu': 'Az elmúlt néhány évben a több időszakra kiterjedő nagyvállalatok egyre növekvő rendelkezésre állása új lehetőségeket nyitott a nyelv diakrónikus elemzésére. Ez a típusú elemzés nemcsak a szójelentések idővel történő eltolódásával kapcsolatos nyelvi jelenségeket hozhat fénybe, hanem arra is használható, hogy tanulmányozza a társadalmi és kulturális trendek milyen hatást gyakorolnak a nyelvváltozásra. Ez a tanulmány egy új forrást mutat be a Wikipédia oldalváltoztatásaira épülő nevezett entitások diakrónikus elemzéséhez. Ez az erőforrás lehetővé teszi az entitások (fogalmak), felületi formák (szavak), valamint az entitásokat és felületi formákat körülvevő kontextusok és kontextusok idővel történő elemzését a Wikipédia belső linkjeinek teljes történetének elemzésével. Olyan hasznos felhasználási eseteket adunk, amelyek bizonyítják ennek az erőforrásnak a diakrónikus vizsgálatokra gyakorolt hatását és felvázolnak néhány lehetséges jövőbeli felhasználást.', 'it': "Negli ultimi anni, la crescente disponibilità di grandi corpore che coprono diversi periodi di tempo ha aperto nuove opportunità per l'analisi diacronica del linguaggio. Questo tipo di analisi può portare alla luce non solo fenomeni linguistici legati allo spostamento dei significati delle parole nel tempo, ma può anche essere utilizzato per studiare l'impatto che le tendenze sociali e culturali hanno su questo cambiamento linguistico. Questo articolo introduce una nuova risorsa per eseguire l'analisi diacronica di entità nominate basate sulle revisioni delle pagine di Wikipedia. Questa risorsa permette l'analisi nel tempo dei cambiamenti nelle relazioni tra entità (concetti), forme di superficie (parole), e i contesti che circondano entità e forme di superficie, analizzando l'intera storia dei collegamenti interni di Wikipedia. Forniamo alcuni casi d'uso utili che dimostrano l'impatto di questa risorsa sugli studi diacronici e delineano alcuni possibili usi futuri.", 'kk': 'Соңғы бірнеше жылда, көптеген кезде көптеген үлкен корпора мүмкіндіктері тілді диагроникалық анализ үшін жаңа мүмкіндіктер ашылды. Бұл анализ түрі уақытта сөздердің мәліметтерін өзгерту үшін ғана лингвистикалық панельдерге сәйкес бере алады, бірақ ол әлемдік және мәдениеттік тенденциялардың бұл тіл өзгертілген нәрсені зерттеу Бұл қағаз Википедия парақтағы редакцияларында құрылған аталған нысандарды диастроникалық анализ үшін жаңа ресурсты таңдайды. Бұл ресурс бірліктер (концепциялар), мәтін пішімдері (сөздер) арасындағы өзгертулердің уақыты бойынша анализ жасайды. Википедия ішкі сілтемелердің барлық журналын анализ көмектеседі. Біз бұл ресурстың диагроникалық зерттеулерге әсер ететін және келесі болашақ пайдалану мүмкіндіктерін таңдау үшін кейбір пайдаланушыларды таңдаймыз.', 'lt': 'Per pastaruosius kelerius metus didėjantis didelių korprų prieinamumas keliais laikotarpiais atverė naujas galimybes diachroninei kalbos analizei. Tokia analizė gali atskleisti ne tik kalbinius reiškinius, susijusius su žodžių reikšmės pokyčiais laikui bėgant, bet ir poveikį, kurį visuomenės ir kultūrinės tendencijos daro šiam kalbų pokyčiui. Šiame dokumente pateikiami nauji ištekliai, skirti atlikti pavadintų subjektų diachroninę analizę, pagrįstą Vikipedijos puslapių peržiūromis. Šis išteklius leidžia laikui bėgant analizuoti subjektų (koncepcijų), paviršiaus formų (žodžių) ir aplinkinių subjektų bei paviršiaus formų santykių pokyčius analizuojant visą Wikipedia vidaus ryšių istoriją. Pateikiame tam tikrus naudingus naudojimo atvejus, kurie įrodo šio išteklio poveikį diachroniniams tyrimams ir apibrėžia tam tikrą galimą naudojimą ateityje.', 'mk': 'Во последните неколку години, зголемената достапност на големи тела која трае неколку временски периоди отвори нови можности за дијахроничната анализа на јазикот. Овој тип на анализи може да објасни не само јазички феномени поврзани со промената на значењето на зборовите со текот на времето, туку и за проучување на влијанието на општествените и културните трендови врз оваа промена на јазикот. Овој документ претставува нов ресурс за спроведување на дијахроничната анализа на именуваните ентитети изградени на ревизиите на страниците на Википедија. Овој ресурс овозможува анализа со текот на времето на промените во односите помеѓу ентитетите (концептите), површините (зборовите) и контекстите околу ентитетите и површините, со анализа на целата историја на внатрешните врски на Википедија. Ние обезбедуваме некои корисни случаи на употреба кои докажуваат влијание на овој ресурс на дијахроничните студии и дефинираат некои можни идни употреби.', 'mt': 'Fl-aħħar ftit snin, id-disponibbiltà dejjem tikber ta’ korpora kbira li tkopri diversi perjodi ta’ żmien fetħet opportunitajiet ġodda għall-analiżi dijakronika tal-lingwa. Dan it-tip ta’ analiżi jista’ jġib fid-dawl mhux biss il-fenomeni lingwistiċi relatati mal-bidla fit-tifsiriet tal-kliem maż-żmien, iżda jista’ jintuża wkoll biex jiġi studjat l-impatt li x-xejriet soċjali u kulturali għandhom fuq din il-bidla fil-lingwa. Dan id-dokument jintroduċi riżorsa ġdida għat-twettiq tal-analiżi dijakronika ta’ entitajiet imsemmija mibnija fuq reviżjonijiet tal-paġna tal-Wikipedia. Din ir-riżorsa tippermetti l-analiżi maż-żmien ta’ bidliet fir-relazzjonijiet bejn l-entitajiet (kunċetti), il-forom tal-wiċċ (kliem), u l-kuntesti madwar l-entitajiet u l-forom tal-wiċċ, billi tanalizza l-istorja kollha tar-rabtiet interni tal-Wikipedia. Aħna nipprovdu xi każijiet ta’ użu utli li juru l-impatt ta’ din ir-riżorsa fuq l-istudji dijakroniċi u niddefinixxu xi użu possibbli fil-ġejjieni.', 'ms': 'Dalam beberapa tahun terakhir, peningkatan kemampuan corpora besar yang melalui beberapa masa telah membuka peluang baru untuk analisis diakronik bahasa. Jenis analisis ini boleh membawa kepada cahaya tidak hanya fenomena bahasa yang berkaitan dengan perubahan makna perkataan melalui masa, tetapi ia juga boleh digunakan untuk mempelajari kesan yang trends masyarakat dan budaya mempunyai pada perubahan bahasa ini. Kertas ini memperkenalkan sumber baru untuk melaksanakan analisis diakronik entiti bernama dibina pada revisi halaman Wikipedia. Sumber ini membolehkan analisis melalui masa perubahan dalam hubungan antara entiti (konsep), bentuk permukaan (kata), dan konteks yang mengelilingi entiti dan bentuk permukaan, dengan analisis keseluruhan sejarah pautan dalaman Wikipedia. Kami menyediakan beberapa kes penggunaan yang berguna yang membuktikan kesan sumber ini pada kajian diakronik dan membahayakan beberapa penggunaan yang mungkin di masa depan.', 'ml': 'കഴിഞ്ഞ കുറച്ച് വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d ഭാഷയുടെ ഡൈക്രോണിക്ക് അന്വേഷണത്തിനുള്ള വലിയ കോപ്പോരാ കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കാലാവധി കാലം  ഈ തരം അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വെളിച്ചത്തിലേക്ക് മാത്രമല്ല വാക്കുകളുടെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം മാറ്റുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് മാത്രമല്ല, പക്ഷെ ഈ ഭാഷയില്\u200d സാമൂഹ്യസ്ഥാനമാ വിക്കിപീഡിയയുടെ താള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട വസ്തുക്കളുടെ ഡയക്രോണിക്ക് അന്വേഷണം പ്രവര്\u200dത വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കുറച്ചു ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന കേസുകള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ഈ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ പ്രഭാവം നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് ഡയറക്രോണിക് പഠനത', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн хэдэн жилийн дотор, хэдэн хугацаанд орж ирсэн том корпорацийн тусламжтайгаар нэмэгдсэн, хэлний диагрон шинжилгээнд шинэ боломж нээсэн. Энэ төрлийн анализ нь зөвхөн хэлний утгатай утгатай өөрчлөлтийн холбоотой гэрлэлт руу авч чадна. Гэхдээ нийгмийн болон соёлын тенденцийг энэ хэлний өөрчлөлт дээр нөлөөлдөг нөлөөлдөгийг судалж чадна. Энэ цаас Wikipedia хуудас шинэчлэлд бүтээгдэхүүний диагроник шинжилгээг хийх боломжтой шинэ нөөц бий болгодог. Энэ баялаг нь биетүүд (ойлголт), гадаргуу хэлбэрүүд (үг) болон байгууллагууд болон гадаргуу хэлбэрүүд хоорондын харилцааны өөрчлөлтийн цаг хугацаанд шинжилгээ боломжтой болгодог. Бид зарим хэрэгтэй хэрэглээний тухай хэрэглээний хэрэглээний нөлөө үзүүлж, ирээдүйн хэрэглээний тухай тодорхойлж чаддаг.', 'no': 'I de siste få årene har det økte tilgjengeligheten til store korpora som gjer fleire tidspunktar opna nye muligheter for den diakroniske analysen av språk. Denne typen analyser kan føre til lyset ikkje berre språkstiske fenomenar relatert til forskyving av ordmeaningar over tid, men det kan også brukast til å studera effekten som sosiale og kulturelle trender har på denne språkstendringa. Denne papiret introduserer eit ny ressurs for å utføra diakronisk analysen av namnet entiteter bygd på Wikipedia- siderevisjonar. Denne ressursen kan analysera over tida for endringar i relasjonane mellom einingar (konseptar), overflateformar (ord) og kontekstane omvendt einingar og overflateformar ved å analysera heile historia over interne lenkjer i Wikipedia. Vi tilbyr nokre nyttige bruk-tilfeller som beviser effekten av denne ressursen på diakroniske studier og delifiserer nokre moglege framtidige bruk.', 'pl': 'W ostatnich latach rosnąca dostępność dużych korpusów obejmujących kilka okresów czasowych otworzyła nowe możliwości diachronicznej analizy języka. Tego rodzaju analiza może ujawnić nie tylko zjawiska językowe związane z zmianą znaczeń słowa w czasie, ale może być również wykorzystana do badania wpływu, jaki trendy społeczne i kulturowe mają na tę zmianę językową. Niniejszy artykuł przedstawia nowy zasób do przeprowadzania diachronicznej analizy nazwanych podmiotów zbudowanych na wersjach stron Wikipedii. Zasób ten umożliwia analizę w czasie zmian w relacjach między jednostkami (pojęciami), formami powierzchniowymi (słowami) oraz kontekstami otaczającymi jednostki i formami powierzchniowymi poprzez analizę całej historii wewnętrznych linków Wikipedii. Przedstawiamy kilka przydatnych przypadków użycia, które potwierdzają wpływ tego zasobu na badania diachroniczne i określają możliwe przyszłe wykorzystanie.', 'ro': 'În ultimii ani, disponibilitatea crescândă a corporelor mari care se întind pe mai multe perioade de timp a deschis noi oportunități pentru analiza diacronică a limbajului. Acest tip de analiză poate aduce la lumină nu numai fenomenele lingvistice legate de schimbarea semnificațiilor cuvintelor în timp, dar poate fi utilizată și pentru a studia impactul pe care tendințele societale și culturale îl au asupra acestei schimbări lingvistice. Această lucrare introduce o nouă resursă pentru efectuarea analizei diacronice a entităților numite construite pe reviziile paginilor Wikipedia. Această resursă permite analiza în timp a schimbărilor în relațiile dintre entități (concepte), forme de suprafață (cuvinte) și contextele din jurul entităților și formelor de suprafață, analizând întreaga istorie a legăturilor interne Wikipedia. Oferim câteva cazuri utile de utilizare care demonstrează impactul acestei resurse asupra studiilor diacronice și delimitează unele posibile utilizări viitoare.', 'si': 'අන්තිම අවුරුදු කිහිපයක්, ලොකු කොර්පෝරා ගැන විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාලනය සඳහා අලුත් අ මේ විශ්ලේෂණ වර්ගයක් පුළුවන් ආලෝකයේ භාෂාත්මක ප්\u200dරදේශයක් විතරයි වචන අදහස් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් නෙවෙයි, ඒත්  Name මේ සම්බන්ධය සක්\u200dරිය කරන්නේ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා  අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සමහරවිට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සමහරවිට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සමහරවිට අනාගතයේ', 'so': 'Sannadihii ugu danbeeyey dhawr sano ayaa fursado cusub u furay baaritaanka baaritaanka luuqada. Shalalkan caynkan ah waxey nuurka u keeni karaan wax ku saabsan beddelka hadalka oo kaliya waqtiga dheer, laakiin waxaa sidoo kale loo isticmaali karaa in la barto saamaynta bulshada iyo dhaqamada ay ku leeyihiin beddelka luuqadan. Kanu wuxuu soo bandhigaa warqad cusub oo lagu sameynayo baaritaanka dhakhtarka ah oo lagu magacaabay macluumaadyada lagu qoray wargeysyada bogga Wikipedia. Tan resourceydu waxay ku socon kartaa baaritaanka waqtiga beddelka ee xiriirka jidhka (fikrada), foomka surface (words), iyo waxyaalaha ku wareegsan alaabta iyo foomka surface, baaritaanka taariikhda oo dhan ee Wikipedia xiriirka gudaha ah. Waxaannu siinaynaa xaaladaha isticmaalka qaarkood oo faa’iido leh, kuwaas oo caddaynaya saameyn ku saabsan waxbarashada dhakhtarka ah iyo si fudud ugu qoran isticmaalka mustaqbalka ah.', 'sr': 'U poslednjih nekoliko godina, povećana dostupnost velike korporacije koje prolaze nekoliko vremena otvorila je nove prilike za dijagronsku analizu jezika. Ova vrsta analize može dovesti do svetla ne samo lingvističke fenomene povezane sa promjenom značenja reči u vrijeme, nego se može koristiti i za proučavanje utjecaja na promjenu jezika društva i kulture. Ovaj papir predstavlja novi resurs za izvršavanje diahroniske analize imenih entiteta izgrađenih na revizijama stranica Wikipedia. Ovaj resurs omogućava analizu tijekom vremena promjena odnosa između entitata (koncepta), površinskih oblika (reči) i konteksta okruženih entitata i površinskih oblika, analizirajući cijelu istoriju unutrašnjih veza Wikipedije. Mi pružamo neke korisne slučajeve upotrebe koji dokazuju uticaj ovog resursa na dijagronske studije i određuju moguću buduću upotrebu.', 'sv': 'Under de senaste åren har den ökande tillgängligheten av stora korpora som sträcker sig över flera tidsperioder öppnat nya möjligheter för diakronisk analys av språk. Denna typ av analys kan belysa inte bara språkliga fenomen relaterade till skiftet av ordbetydelser över tid, utan den kan också användas för att studera vilken inverkan samhälleliga och kulturella trender har på denna språkförändring. Denna uppsats introducerar en ny resurs för att utföra diakronisk analys av namngivna entiteter byggda på Wikipedias sidrevideringar. Denna resurs möjliggör analys över tid av förändringar i relationerna mellan entiteter (begrepp), ytformer (ord) och kontexten kring entiteter och ytformer, genom att analysera hela historiken av Wikipedias interna länkar. Vi tillhandahåller några användbara användningsfall som bevisar effekten av denna resurs på diakroniska studier och beskriver eventuell framtida användning.', 'ta': 'கடந்த சில ஆண்டுகளில், பெரிய நிறுவனத்தின் கிடைக்கும் பெரிய நேரம் காலங்களில் அதிகரிக்கும் கிடைக்கும் பொருள் மொழியை நி இந்த வகையான ஆராய்ச்சி மொழியின் மாற்றத்திற்கு மட்டும் தொடர்புடைய மொழிமாற்றத்தை மட்டும் கொண்டு வர முடியும், ஆனால் இந்த மொழியின் மாற்றத்திற்க இந்த காகிதம் விகிபிடியா பக்கத்தின் மீள்நோக்குகளில் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ள பொருட்களின் வழக்கமான ஆயிரத்தை செயல்படு Name நாம் சில பயனுள்ள பயன்பாடுகளை வழங்குகிறோம். இது இந்த மூலத்தின் விளைவுகளை நிர்ணயிக்கும் மூலம் மற்றும் சில சாத்தி', 'ur': 'پچھلے چند سال میں، بہت سی مدت میں بڑی کمپرا کی زیادہ موجود موجود ہوتی ہے کہ زبان کے دیاکرونیک تحلیل کے لئے نئی فرصت کھول دیتی ہیں۔ یہ تحقیقات کی طرح صرف زبان کی مطلوبات کی تغییر کے باعث نہیں ہے لیکن اس کے لئے بھی استعمال کر سکتا ہے کہ اس تغییر کے لئے اجتماعی اور فرهنگی کی تغییر پر ہے۔ This paper introduces a new resource for performing the diachronic analysis of names entities built on Wikipedia page revisions. یہ سراسر واحدوں اور سطح فرموں کے درمیان تغییرات کے وقت کے بارے میں تحلیل کو امکان دیتا ہے، ویکیپیڈیا کی تمام داخلی لینکوں کی تاریخ کی تحلیل کے ذریعہ۔ ہم کچھ فائدہ استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں جو اس سرمایہ کی تأثیر دیاگرنیک تحقیقات پر ثابت کرتے ہیں اور بعض امکان مستقبل استعمال کو منحصر کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Keyingi necha yil ichida, ko'p vaqt davomida katta kompaniya imkoniyatlarini ko'paytirish uchun tilni diakronisk analyzer uchun yangi imkoniyatlarni ochadi. Bu turi analytika faqat so'zning ma'nosini o'zgartirish mumkin emas, balki buni jamiyat va cultural trenlari bu tillar o'zgarishga ega narsa o'rganish uchun ishlatiladi. Name Name Biz bir foydalanuvchi foydalanuvchining foydalanuvchilarini qo'shishimiz mumkin. Bu manbaning diakronisk taʼminotlarda ishlatiladigan va kelajakdagi foydalanuvchilarni qidirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong những năm gần đây, sự gia tăng khả năng có thể xuất hiện trên nhiều thời gian dài đã tạo ra cơ hội để phân tích ngôn ngữ. Kiểu phân tích này có thể làm sáng tỏ không chỉ các hiện tượng ngôn ngữ liên quan đến sự chuyển đổi ý nghĩa từ qua thời gian, mà còn có thể được sử dụng để nghiên cứu tác động của xu hướng xã hội và văn hóa về sự thay đổi ngôn ngữ này. Tờ giấy này giới thiệu một nguồn tài nguyên mới để thực hiện phân tích kinh niên về các thực thể tên được xây dựng trên trang Wikipedia. Tài nguyên này cho phép phân tích theo thời gian các thay đổi các mối quan hệ giữa các thực thể (các khái niệm), các dạng bề mặt (từ) và các đối tượng bao quanh các thực thể và các dạng bề mặt, bằng cách phân tích toàn bộ lịch sử của Wikipedia nội kết nối. Chúng tôi cung cấp vài trường hợp sử dụng có ích chứng minh tác động của nguồn tài nguyên này lên các nghiên cứu muối tiêu và mô tả một số cách sử dụng tương lai.', 'bg': 'През последните няколко години нарастващата наличност на големи корпуси, обхващащи няколко периода от време, отвори нови възможности за диахроничен анализ на езика. Този тип анализ може да покаже не само езикови явления, свързани с промяната на значението на думите във времето, но може да се използва и за изследване на въздействието, което социалните и културните тенденции оказват върху тази езикова промяна. Тази статия представя нов ресурс за извършване на диахроничен анализ на имената, изградени въз основа на ревизиите на страницата на Уикипедия. Този ресурс дава възможност за анализ във времето на промените в отношенията между същности (понятия), повърхностни форми (думи) и контекстите около същности и повърхностни форми, като анализира цялата история на вътрешните връзки на Уикипедия. Предлагаме някои полезни случаи на употреба, които доказват въздействието на този ресурс върху диахронните изследвания и очертават някои възможни бъдещи употреби.', 'da': 'I de seneste år har den stigende tilgængelighed af store korpora over flere perioder åbnet nye muligheder for diakronisk analyse af sprog. Denne type analyse kan bringe lys på ikke kun sproglige fænomener relateret til skiftet af ordbetydninger over tid, men den kan også bruges til at undersøge den indvirkning, som samfundsmæssige og kulturelle tendenser har på denne sprogforandring. Denne artikel introducerer en ny ressource til at udføre den diakroniske analyse af navngivne enheder bygget på Wikipedia siderevisioner. Denne ressource muliggør analyse over tid af ændringer i relationerne mellem entiteter (begreber), overfladeformer (ord) og sammenhænge omkring entiteter og overfladeformer ved at analysere hele historien om Wikipedia interne links. Vi giver nogle nyttige brugscases, der beviser indvirkningen af denne ressource på diakroniske undersøgelser og skitserer nogle mulige fremtidige brug.', 'hr': 'U posljednjih nekoliko godina, povećanje dostupnosti velike tijelove koje prolaze nekoliko vremena otvorilo je nove prilike za dijagronsku analizu jezika. Ova vrsta analize može dovesti do svjetla ne samo lingvističke fenomene vezane za promjenu značenja riječi tijekom vremena, već se može koristiti i za proučavanje utjecaja na promjenu jezika društva i kulture. Ovaj papir predstavlja novi resurs za provedbu diakroniske analize imenih entitata izgrađenih na revizijama stranica Wikipedia. Ovaj resurs omogućava analizu tijekom vremena izmjena odnosa između subjekta (koncepta), površinskih oblika (riječi) i konteksta okruženih subjekta i površinskih oblika, analizirajući cijelu povijest unutrašnjih veza Wikipedije. Mi pružamo neke korisne slučajeve upotrebe koji dokazuju utjecaj ovog resursa na dijagronske ispitivanja i određuju moguću buduću upotrebu.', 'nl': "De laatste jaren heeft de toenemende beschikbaarheid van grote corpora's over meerdere periodes nieuwe mogelijkheden geopend voor de diachrone analyse van taal. Dit type analyse kan niet alleen linguïstische fenomenen in verband met de verschuiving van woordbetekenissen in de loop van de tijd aan het licht brengen, maar het kan ook worden gebruikt om de impact te bestuderen die maatschappelijke en culturele trends hebben op deze taalverandering. Dit artikel introduceert een nieuwe bron voor het uitvoeren van de diachrone analyse van benoemde entiteiten gebouwd op Wikipedia pagina revisies. Deze bron maakt de analyse in de loop van de tijd mogelijk van veranderingen in de relaties tussen entiteiten (concepten), oppervlaktevormen (woorden), en de contexten rondom entiteiten en oppervlaktevormen, door de hele geschiedenis van interne links van Wikipedia te analyseren. We bieden enkele nuttige use cases die de impact van deze bron op diachrone studies bewijzen en een aantal mogelijke toekomstige toepassingen beschrijven.", 'de': 'Die zunehmende Verfügbarkeit großer Korpora über mehrere Zeiträume hinweg hat in den letzten Jahren neue Möglichkeiten für die diachrone Sprachanalyse eröffnet. Diese Art der Analyse kann nicht nur sprachliche Phänomene im Zusammenhang mit der Verschiebung von Wortbedeutungen im Laufe der Zeit ans Licht bringen, sondern auch dazu dienen, die Auswirkungen gesellschaftlicher und kultureller Trends auf diesen Sprachwandel zu untersuchen. Dieses Papier stellt eine neue Ressource für die Durchführung der diachronen Analyse benannter Entitäten vor, die auf Wikipedia-Seitenrevisionen basieren. Diese Ressource ermöglicht die Analyse von Veränderungen in den Beziehungen zwischen Entitäten (Begriffen), Oberflächenformen (Wörter) und den Kontexten, die Entitäten und Oberflächenformen umgeben, indem die gesamte Geschichte der internen Links von Wikipedia analysiert wird. Wir stellen einige nützliche Anwendungsfälle zur Verfügung, die den Einfluss dieser Ressource auf diachrone Studien belegen und einige mögliche zukünftige Nutzung aufzeigen.', 'ko': '과거 몇 년 동안 여러 시간대를 뛰어넘는 대형 어료 라이브러리의 끊임없는 증가는 언어의 역사적 분석에 새로운 기회를 제공했다.이런 유형의 분석은 단어의 의미가 시간에 따라 변화하는 것과 관련된 언어 현상을 제시할 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 사회와 문화 추세가 이런 언어 변화에 미친 영향을 연구할 수 있다.본고는 위키백과 페이지 수정을 바탕으로 한 명명 실체를 역대 분석하는 데 사용되는 새로운 자원을 소개한다.이 자원은 위키백과 내부 링크의 전체 역사를 분석함으로써 실체(개념), 표면형식(단어) 간의 관계와 실체와 표면형식을 둘러싼 상하문이 시간에 따라 변화하는 것을 분석할 수 있다.우리는 이런 자원이 과거 연구에 미친 영향을 증명하고 미래의 용도를 묘사하는 데 유용한 용례를 제공했다.', 'fa': 'در چند سال گذشته، افزایش دسترسی شرکت بزرگی که چند مدت طول کشید، فرصت جدید برای تحلیل دیاکرونیک زبان را باز کرده است. این نوع تحلیل می\u200cتواند به نور برساند نه تنها پدیده\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی که مربوط به تغییر معنی\u200cهای کلمه در طول زمان است، بلکه می\u200cتواند برای تحقیق تاثیر اجتماعی و فرهنگی بر این تغییر زبان استفاده شود. این کاغذ یک منبع جدید برای انجام تحلیل دیاکرونیک از برنامه\u200cهای نامیده روی برنامه\u200cهای صفحه ویکیپدیا معرفی می\u200cکند. این منابع به تحلیل در زمان تغییرات بین واحدها (تفکرات), فرم سطح (کلمات) و محیط\u200cهای اطراف واحدها و فرم سطح، با تحلیل تمام تاریخ ارتباطات داخلی ویکیپدیا اجازه می\u200cدهد. ما برخی از پرونده\u200cهای استفاده مفید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که تاثیر این منابع را بر مطالعه\u200cهای مختلفی ثابت می\u200cکند و برخی از استفاده\u200cهای امکان آینده را تخفیف می\u200cکند.', 'id': 'Dalam beberapa tahun terakhir, peningkatan kemampuan dari corpora besar melalui beberapa periode waktu telah membuka kesempatan baru untuk analisis diakronis bahasa. Jenis analisis ini dapat menyatakan tidak hanya fenomena bahasa yang berhubungan dengan perubahan arti kata dalam waktu, tetapi juga dapat digunakan untuk mempelajari dampak yang trend masyarakat dan budaya memiliki pada perubahan bahasa ini. Kertas ini memperkenalkan sumber daya baru untuk melakukan analisis diakronis dari entitas bernama dibangun pada revisi halaman Wikipedia. Sumber daya ini memungkinkan analisis selama waktu perubahan dalam hubungan antara entitas (konsep), bentuk permukaan (kata), dan konteks sekitar entitas dan bentuk permukaan, dengan analisis seluruh sejarah hubungan interna Wikipedia. Kami menyediakan beberapa kasus penggunaan yang berguna yang membuktikan dampak sumber daya ini pada studi diakronis dan membatasi beberapa kemungkinan penggunaan masa depan.', 'sw': 'Katika miaka michache iliyopita, ongezeko la upatikanaji wa makampuni makubwa kwa muda kadhaa umefungua fursa mpya za uchambuzi wa lugha. Uchambuzi wa aina hii unaweza kuleta mwangaza siyo tu kuhusu mabadiliko ya maana ya maneno ya lugha kwa muda mrefu, lakini pia inaweza kutumika kutafiti athari ya mitindo ya kijamii na kiutamaduni yanayohusu mabadiliko ya lugha hii. Gazeti hili linaonyesha rasilimali mpya kwa kufanya uchambuzi wa kidijitali wa vyombo vinavyoitwa vilivyojengwa kwenye tovuti ya Wikipedia. Chanzo hili inawezesha uchambuzi wa muda wa mabadiliko katika mahusiano kati ya vitu (dhana), mitindo ya surfe (maneno), na matatizo yanayozunguka vitu na mitindo ya surfe, kwa uchambuzi wa historia yote ya viungo vya ndani vya Wikipedia. Tunatoa matumizi mengine yenye manufaa yanayothibitisha madhara ya rasilimali hii kwenye utafiti wa kihistoria na kwa urahisi wa matumizi yanayoweza baadaye.', 'tr': 'Soňky bir näçe ýylda, köp wagtlar ýaşaýan uly korpora ýerleşýän täze gezek dil diakroniki analyzasynda täze bir mümkinçilik açdy. Bu hili analýusyň ýagtylyga diňe söz maňgalarynyň üýtgetmegine sereden dili däldir, emma bu dil üýtgetmeginiň täsirini öwrenmek üçin ullanýar. Bu kagyz Wikipediýa sahypa wersiýasynda düzenlenen adly zatlaryň diakroniki analyzasyny etmäge täze bir çeşmegi tanyşdyrýar. Bu çeşme birnäçe (konseptler), surat biçimleri (sözler), we çeşmeler çevre birnäçe we surat biçimlerinde analizi mümkin edýär. Biz bu resursynyň diakroniki öwrenmelere täsirini kanıtlayan kynçylyklary ulandyryp, gelejekde mümkin ulanylaryny azat edýäris.', 'af': "In die laaste paar jaar het die vergroot beskikbaarheid van groot korpora wat verskeie tyd periode oopgemaak het nuwe geleenthede vir die diakroniske analisie van taal. Hierdie tipe analisie kan na die lig bring nie alleen lingwisiese fenomene wat verwanter is met die verskuif van woord betekening oor tyd nie, maar dit kan ook gebruik word om die effek te studier wat samelewing en kulturele trende op hierdie taal verander het nie. Hierdie papier introduseer 'n nuwe hulpbron vir uitvoer van die diakronise analiseer van genaamde entiteite wat op Wikipedia bladsy hersienings gebou is. Hierdie hulpbron laat die analiseer toe oor tyd van veranderinge in die verhouding tussen entiteite (konsepte), oorspronklike vorms (woorde) en die konteks omring entiteite en oorspronklike vorms deur die hele geskiedenis van Wikipedia interne skakels te analiseer. Ons verskaf sommige nuttige gebruik gevalle wat die vloek van hierdie hulpbron bevestig op diakroniske studie en 'n paar moontlik toekomstige gebruik verdeling.", 'sq': 'Në vitet e fundit, dispozicioni në rritje i korprave të mëdha që zgjasin disa periudha kohore ka hapur mundësi të reja për analizën diakronike të gjuhës. Ky lloj analize mund të nxjerrë në dritë jo vetëm fenomenet gjuhësore lidhur me ndryshimin e kuptimeve të fjalës gjatë kohës, por mund të përdoret gjithashtu për të studiuar ndikimin që prirjet shoqërore dhe kulturore kanë në këtë ndryshim gjuhësor. Ky artikull paraqet një burim të ri për kryerjen e analizës diakronike të njësive të emëruara të ndërtuar në revisionet e faqeve të Wikipedias. Ky burim mundëson analizën gjatë kohës të ndryshimeve në marrëdhëniet midis njësive (koncepteve), formave të sipërfaqes (fjalëve) dhe konteksteve rreth njësive dhe formave të sipërfaqes, duke analizuar të gjithë historinë e lidhjeve të brendshme të Wikipedias. Ne ofrojmë disa raste përdorimi të dobishëm që provojnë ndikimin e këtij burimi në studimet diakronike dhe përcaktojnë disa përdorim të mundshëm të ardhshëm.', 'am': 'ባለፉት ጥቂት ዓመታት፣ የታላቁ ኮርፖራ የቁጥር ዘመናት ማግኘት የቋንቋውን አዲስ መፍታት አዲስ ስርዓት ከፈተ፡፡ ይህ ዓይነት አካላቢ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ አካሄዱን ለመለወጥ ብቻ አይደለም፥ ነገር ግን ማኅበራዊ እና የባሕላዊ ጉዳይ በዚህ ቋንቋ ለውጥ ላይ ያለውን ጥቅም ለመማረጃ ይችላል፡፡ ይህ ገጽ በWikipedia ገጽ ውጤቶች ላይ የተደረገውን አካላትን ለማድረግ አዲስ ክፍል የሚያሳውቀው ነው፡፡ ይህ resource በአካባቢዎች (አካባቢዎች)፣ የsurface ፎርማቶች (ቃሎች) እና በዙሪያው ያሉትን አካባቢዎች እና የመሬት ፎርማቶች በሙሉ የWikipedia ግንኙነት ታሪክ በማስተምር ይችላል፡፡ የዚህን resource በጥያቄ ትምህርት ላይ የጥያቄ ጉዳይ እናደርጋለን፣ የሚቻለውንም የቀድሞውን መጠቀም እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջին մի քանի տարիների ընթացքում մեծ մարմնի աճող հասանելիությունը մի քանի ժամանակահատվածների ընթացքում նոր հնարավորություններ է բացել լեզվի դիաքրոնիկ վերլուծության համար: Այս տեսակի վերլուծությունը կարող է լուսավորել ոչ միայն լեզվաբանական երևույթները, որոնք կապված են բառի իմաստի փոփոխության հետ ժամանակի ընթացքում, այլ նաև այն կարող է օգտագործվել հասարակության և մշակութային միտումների ազդեցության ուսումնասիրելու համար այս լեզվի փոփոխության վրա: This paper introduces a new resource for performing the diachronic analysis of named entities built upon Wikipedia page revisions.  Այս ռեսուրսը հնարավորություն է տալիս վերլուծությունը կազմակերպությունների (գաղափարների), մակերևույթի ձևերի (բառերի) և կազմակերպությունների շրջապատող կոնտեքստների և մակերևույթի ձևերի փոխությունների ժամանակի ընթացքում վերլուծում Վիքիփեդիայի ներ Մենք տրամադրում ենք որոշ օգտակար դեպքեր, որոնք ապացուցում են այս ռեսուրսների ազդեցությունը դիախրոնիկ ուսումնասիրությունների վրա և որոշ հնարավոր ապագայի օգտագործման սահմանափակում են:', 'az': 'Son bir neçə il içində, çox müddətlərdən çox böyük korpora vasitəsi artırmaq üçün dilin diakroniki analizi üçün yeni fırsatlar açdı. Bu analiz növü işıqlara yalnız dil ifadələrinin dəyişikliklərinə bağlı deyil, lakin bu dəyişikliklərin bu dil dəyişikliklərinə müvəffəqiyyət etmək üçün də istifadə edilə bilər. Bu kağıt Wikipedia səhifələrində inşa edilmiş növlərin diakroniki analizi üçün yeni mənbəni təşkil edir. Bu çoxlu, Wikipedia iç bağlantılarının bütün tarihini analizə edərək dəyişikliklərin (konseptlər), yüzə formları (sözlər) arasındakı dəyişikliklərin vaxtında analizi fəallaşdırır. Biz bu resursu diakroniki təcrübələrinə təsir edən və mümkün gələcək istifadə etməyi təsdiqləyən bəzi faydalı istifadə edən məsələlər təmin edirik.', 'bn': 'গত কয়েক বছরে বিশাল কোর্পোরা বেশ কিছু সময় ধরে বেড়ে যাওয়ার সুযোগ খুলেছে ভাষার ডায়রোনিক বিশ্লেষণের জন্য। এই ধরনের বিশ্লেষণ শুধুমাত্র ভাষাগত বিষয়ের মান পরিবর্তনের সাথে সম্পর্কিত নয়, কিন্তু এই ভাষায় সামাজিক এবং সাংস্কৃতিক ধারার প্রভাব পড়ার জন্য এটি ব্যবহার করা যা উইকিপিডিয়া পাতার পরিবর্তনে নির্মিত বস্তুগুলোর ডায়রোনিক বিশ্লেষণের জন্য এই কাগজটি একটি নতুন সম্পদ উপস্থাপন করেছে। এই সম্পদ উইকিপিডিয়া ইন্টারনেট লিঙ্কের পুরো ইতিহাস বিশ্লেষণ করে উইকিপিডিয়ার বিভিন্ন লিঙ্কের ইতিহাস বিশ্লেষণ করে উইকিপিডিয়ার সারা বিভিন্ন সংযোগের মা আমরা কিছু কার্যকর ক্ষেত্র প্রদান করি যা এই সম্পদের প্রভাব প্রমাণ করে ডায়ারোনিক গবেষণা এবং ভবিষ্যতের কিছু ব্যবহার পরিশ্রা', 'bs': 'U posljednjih nekoliko godina, povećanje dostupnosti velike korporacije koje prolaze nekoliko vremena otvorilo je nove prilike za dijagronsku analizu jezika. Ova vrsta analize može dovesti do svetla ne samo lingvističke fenomene vezane za promjenu značenja riječi tijekom vremena, već se može koristiti i za proučavanje utjecaja na promjenu jezika društva i kulture. Ovaj papir predstavlja novi resurs za provedbu diakroniske analize imenih entitata izgrađenih na revizijama stranica Wikipedia. Ovaj resurs omogućava analizu tijekom vremena izmjena odnosa između entitata (koncepta), površinskih oblika (riječi) i konteksta okruženih entitata i površinskih oblika, analizirajući cijelu povijest unutrašnjih veza Wikipedije. Mi pružamo neke korisne slučajeve upotrebe koji dokazuju utjecaj ovog resursa na dijagronske studije i određuju moguću buduću upotrebu.', 'ca': "En els últims anys, la disponibilitat creixent de grans corpores durant diverses períodes de temps ha obert noves oportunitats per a l'anàlisi diacrònica del llenguatge. Aquest tipus d'anàlisi pot revelar no només fenomens lingüístics relacionats amb el canvi de significats de paraules amb el temps, però també pot ser utilitzat per estudiar l'impacte que tenen les tendències socials i culturals en aquest canvi de llenguatge. Aquest article introdueix un nou recurso per a fer l'anàlisi diacrònica d'entitats anomenades construïdes en revisions de pàgines de Wikipedia. Aquest recurso permet l'anàlisi amb el temps de canvis en les relacions entre entitats (conceptes), formes de superfície (paraules) i els contextes que envolten entitats i formes de superfície, analitzant tota la història dels enllaços interns de Wikipedia. Posem alguns casos útils d'ús que demostren l'impacte d'aquest recurso en estudis diacrònics i delineixen algun possible ús futur.", 'cs': 'V posledních letech rostoucí dostupnost velkých korpusů v několika časových obdobích otevřela nové možnosti pro diachronickou analýzu jazyka. Tento typ analýzy může přinést na světlo nejen jazykové jevy související s posunem slovních významů v průběhu času, ale může být také využit ke studiu dopadu, který mají společenské a kulturní trendy na tuto jazykovou změnu. Tento článek představuje nový zdroj pro provádění diachronické analýzy pojmenovaných entit postavených na revizích stránek Wikipedie. Tento zdroj umožňuje analýzu v průběhu času změn vztahů mezi entitami (pojmy), povrchovými formami (slova) a kontextem okolních entit a povrchových forem prostřednictvím analýzy celé historie vnitřních odkazů Wikipedie. Poskytujeme několik užitečných případů použití, které dokazují dopad tohoto zdroje na diachronické studie a vymezují některé možné budoucí využití.', 'et': 'Viimastel aastatel on suurte korpuste suurenev kättesaadavus mitme perioodi ulatuses avanud uusi võimalusi keele diakrooniliseks analüüsiks. Seda tüüpi analüüs võib tuua valgusesse mitte ainult keelelisi nähtusi, mis on seotud sõna tähenduse muutumisega aja jooksul, vaid seda saab kasutada ka selleks, et uurida mõju, mida ühiskondlikud ja kultuurilised suundumused sellele keele muutusele avaldavad. Käesolev töö tutvustab uut ressurssi nimeliste entiteetide diakroonilise analüüsi teostamiseks, mis on ehitatud Wikipedia lehekülje paranduste põhjal. See ressurss võimaldab aja jooksul analüüsida muutusi olemite (kontseptsioonide), pinnavormide (sõnade) ning olemite ja pinnavormide vahelistes suhetes, analüüsides kogu Wikipedia sisemiste linkide ajalugu. Pakume mõningaid kasulikke kasutusjuhtumeid, mis tõestavad selle ressursi mõju diakroonilistele uuringutele ja kirjeldavad mõningaid võimalikke tulevasi kasutusi.', 'fi': 'Viime vuosina useiden aikajaksojen laajamittainen suurten corporaen saatavuus on avannut uusia mahdollisuuksia kielen diakroniselle analyysille. Tämäntyyppinen analyysi voi tuoda esiin sanamerkitysten muuttumiseen ajan mittaan liittyvien kielellisten ilmiöiden lisäksi myös yhteiskunnallisten ja kulttuuristen suuntausten vaikutusta kielenmuutokseen. Tämä artikkeli esittelee uuden resurssin Wikipedian sivujen revisioihin perustuvien nimettyjen entiteettien diakroonisen analyysin suorittamiseen. Resurssi mahdollistaa entiteettien (käsitteiden), pintamuotojen (sanojen) sekä entiteettien ja pintamuotojen välisten yhteyksien muutosten ajan mittaan analysoimalla Wikipedian sisäisten linkkien koko historiaa. Tarjoamme joitakin hyödyllisiä käyttötapauksia, jotka todistavat tämän resurssin vaikutuksen diakroonisiin tutkimuksiin ja hahmottelevat mahdollisia tulevia käyttötapoja.', 'ha': "Daga ƙidãyar shẽkaru da suka shige, ana ƙara bayani da samarka mai girma wanda aka spanni muda guda, sun buɗe fursa masu buɗe wa anaƙatan harshen. Wannan fassarar Ana iya iya zo wa haske, ba da koma ba ga musanya wa muhimmin maganar da aka faɗa a lokacin, kuma amma yana iya amfani da shi dõmin a karanta matsayin musamman da jami da kullum sun sami da shi kan musanya wa wannan harshen. This paper introduces a new resource for performing the diachronic analysis of named entities built upon Wikipedia page revisions.  Wannan resource na zartar da Anarari over lokaci na musanya masu cikin mazaɓa tsakanin abun masu (zato), fassaran fuskar (magana), da masu cikin abun da ke kẽwayẽwa da maɓalli da tsari bakin ƙasa, da an yi anayyari, bayani'ar bayanin duk linki na Wikimedia guda. Munã ƙayyade masu amfani da wasu masu amfani da su, waɗanda ke jarraba matsayin wannan resource a kan yin dioden-dioden kuma Munã ƙaddara masu amfani da yiwuwa a buƙata.", 'he': 'בשנים האחרונות, ההזדמנות הגדולה של גופורה גדולה במשך מספר תקופות זמן פתחה הזדמנויות חדשות לניתוח הדיאכרוני של שפה. סוג זה של ניתוח יכול להביא לאור לא רק תופעות שפתיות קשורות לשינוי משמעות מילים במהלך הזמן, אלא גם ניתן להשתמש בו כדי לחקור את ההשפעה שיש לטנדציות חברתיות ותרבותיות על השינוי בשפה הזאת. העיתון הזה מציג משאב חדש לבצע את הניתוח הדיאכרוני של ישויות בשם בנויות על שינויים עמוד ויקיפדיה. המשאב הזה מאפשר את הניתוח במהלך זמן של שינויים בין יחסים (מושג), צורות שטח (מילים), והקשרים שמסביבים יחסים ופורמות שטח, על ידי ניתוח כל ההיסטוריה של קשרים פנימיים ויקיפדיה. אנחנו מספקים כמה מקרים שימושיים שמוכיחים את ההשפעה של המשאב הזה על מחקרי דיאכרונים ולהגדיר כמה שימוש עתידי אפשרי.', 'sk': 'V zadnjih nekaj letih je vedno večja razpoložljivost velikih korpusov v več časovnih obdobjih odprla nove priložnosti za diakronično analizo jezika. Ta vrsta analize lahko osvetli ne le jezikovne pojave, povezane s spreminjanjem besednih pomenov skozi čas, temveč se lahko uporabi tudi za preučevanje vpliva, ki ga imajo družbeni in kulturni trendi na to jezikovno spremembo. Ta prispevek predstavlja nov vir za izvajanje diakronične analize imenovanih entitet, zgrajenih na podlagi revizij strani Wikipedije. Ta vir omogoča analizo časovnih sprememb odnosov med entitetami (koncepti), površinskimi oblikami (besedami) in konteksti okoli entitet in površinskimi oblikami z analizo celotne zgodovine Wikipedijskih notranjih povezav. Prikazujemo nekaj koristnih primerov uporabe, ki dokazujejo vpliv tega vira na diakronične študije in določajo možno prihodnjo uporabo.', 'jv': 'Nang sing klor-klor sing paling, arep kuwi nggawe Peribong kuwi tindang neng akeh nguasai kapan kanggo ngeruhan peribong sing dibutuhke tarjamahan kanggo ngerasai perusahaan diakronik kanggo langga. Ketoke énalusi iki iso nggawe nglanggar aturan luwih dumadhi kanggo ngubah gerakan kelas kanggo ngubah ujaran winih, mace iso nggambar nggawe gerarané kuwi nggawe gerarané sakjane karo hal basa sakjane lan sakjane sakjane sakjane sakjane mruput iki. Perintah iki nggawe sistem sing dibutuhke perusahaan kanggo diakrun diakrun diakrun dianggawe jenis sing dibutuhke nang pagjine Wipedipedya. Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan kanggo nggawe lansi tentang kanggo ngerasakno ning resmi sak Entèni (coneps), suparno (gambaran), lan kontèks-kowarni dianggawe Entèni lan mulasai kapan, oleh nyong bisa langgar aturan tambah gak dhéwé unyangkat gak dhéwé Anyar Manual Awak dhéwé éntukno ing nggawe kesempatan kanggo nyengké ngerasakno ning awak dhéwé dianggonan lan ujaran nggawe barang seneng nggawe Perintah dhéwé.', 'bo': 'འདས་བའི་ལོ་ངོ་ཤས་ཀྱི་རིང་ལ། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཁང་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་ཐོག་འཕྲད་དུ་རྒྱུད་རིང་ལ། སྐད་ཡིག དབྱེ་ཞིབ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་འཕེལ་རིམ་དང་དུས ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་Wikipedia་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་བསླར་སྐབས་མིང་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་གསར་བ་སྟོན་ཐུབ་པ This resource enables the analysis over time of changes in the relationships between entities (concepts), surface forms (words), and the contexts surrounding entities and surface forms, by analyzing the whole history of Wikipedia internal links. A resource allows the analysis over time of changes in the relationships between entities (concepts), surface forms (words), and the contexts surrounding entities and surface forms, by analyzing the whole history of Wikipedia internal links. ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་ཁུངས་འདིའི་གླེང་སྡོམ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལ་ཕན་ཐོགས་ཅན་ཅིག་སྟོན་བྱེད་དགོས།'}
{'en': 'Using a Lexical Semantic Network for the Ontology Building', 'ar': 'استخدام الشبكة الدلالية المعجمية لمبنى علم الوجود', 'pt': 'Usando uma Rede Semântica Lexical para a Construção de Ontologias', 'fr': "Utilisation d'un réseau sémantique lexical pour le bâtiment Ontology", 'es': 'Uso de una red semántica léxica para el edificio de ontología', 'ja': 'オントロジー構築のための語彙セマンティックネットワークの使用', 'hi': 'ओंटोलॉजी बिल्डिंग के लिए एक लेक्सिकल सिमेंटिक नेटवर्क का उपयोग करना', 'zh': '以词汇语义网络本体构之', 'ru': 'Использование лексической семантической сети для построения онтологии', 'ga': 'Ag baint úsáide as Líonra Séimeantach Foclaíochta don Fhoirgneamh Onteolaíochta', 'ka': 'სექსიკური სემენტიკური ქსელის გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Lexikus szemantikus hálózat használata az Ontológia épületéhez', 'it': "Utilizzo di una rete semantica lessicale per l'edificio di ontologia", 'kk': 'Онтологиялық құрылғының лексикалық семантикалық желі қолданылады', 'el': 'Χρήση Λεξικού Σηματικού Δικτύου για το Κτήριο Οντολογίας', 'ms': 'Menggunakan Rangkaian Semantik Lexik untuk Bina Ontologi', 'ml': 'ഒരു ലെക്സിക്സിക്കല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് ശൃംഖലം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ഓണ്\u200dട്ടോളജി ബില്\u200dഡിങ്ങില്\u200d', 'mt': 'L-użu ta’ Netwerk Semantiku Lessiku għall-Bini tal-Ontoloġija', 'mn': 'Онтологийн барилгын Lexical Semantic Network ашиглан', 'lt': 'Naudojant leksinį Semantinį tinklą Ontologijos pastatams', 'mk': 'Користење лексикална семантична мрежа за изградбата на онтологија', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie leksykalnej sieci semantycznej dla budynku ontologii', 'ro': 'Utilizarea unei rețele semantice lexicale pentru clădirea de ontologie', 'sr': 'Koristeći leksičku semantičku mrežu za izgradnju ontologije', 'si': 'ඔන්ටෝලෝජික් ගොඩනිර්මාණය වෙනුවෙන් ලෙක්සිකාල් සෙමැන්ටික් ජාලය භාවිත කරන්න', 'so': 'Isticmaalka shabakadda xemantic ee shabakadda Ontology', 'sv': 'Använda ett Lexical Semantic Network för Ontology Building', 'ta': 'Ontology கட்டுதலுக்கான ஒரு லெக்சிக்சியல் செமான்டிக் பிணையத்தை பயன்படுத்துகிறது', 'ur': 'انٹولوژی بنیاد کے لئے ایک لکسیکل سیمنٹی نیٹورک استعمال کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dùng mạng đổi mẫu giáo cho tòa nhà Ontology.', 'da': 'Brug af et Lexical Semantic Network til Ontology Building', 'nl': 'Gebruik van een Lexisch Semantisch Netwerk voor het Ontologiebouw', 'hr': 'Koristeći leksičku semantičku mrežu za građevinu Ontologije', 'bg': 'Използване на лексикална семантична мрежа за сградата на онтологията', 'id': 'Menggunakan Jaringan Semantik Lexik untuk Bangunan Ontologi', 'de': 'Nutzung eines Lexical Semantic Network für das Ontologie Building', 'ko': '어휘 의미 네트워크를 사용하여 본체 구축', 'sw': 'Kwa kutumia Mtandao wa Semantic wa Lexico kwa ajili ya jengo la Ontology', 'fa': 'استفاده از شبکه\u200cی سیمانتیک لکسیکی برای ساختمان انتولوژی', 'af': "Gebruik van 'n Leksiese Semantiese Netwerk vir die Ontologie bou", 'am': 'ለኦንቶሎጂ መሥራት ለሌክሲካል ስሞንቲክ መረብ በመጠቀም', 'hy': 'Օգտագործելով օնտելոգիայի կառուցվածքի լեքսիկական սեմատիկ ցանց', 'az': 'Ontologiya Binası üçün', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i një rrjeti leksikal Semantik për ndërtimin e Ontologjisë', 'tr': 'Ontologiýa binasy üçin Leksik Semantik Network ullanýar', 'bs': 'Koristeći leksičku semantičku mrežu za građevinu ontologije', 'ca': "Utilitzant una xarxa Semàtica Lèxica per a l'edifici de l'Ontologia", 'bn': 'অনটলোগি বিল্ডিং এর জন্য লেক্সিক্যাল সেমান্টিক নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে', 'cs': 'Využití Lexické sémantické sítě pro Ontologickou budovu', 'et': 'Lexikaalse semantilise võrgustiku kasutamine ontoloogiahoones', 'fi': 'Lexical Semantic Network -verkoston käyttö ontologiarakennuksessa', 'jv': 'Ngawe ngubah Leksial semanti Network kanggo nggawe Ontologhi', 'he': 'השימוש ברשת סמנטית לקסית לבניין האונטולוגיה', 'ha': 'Yi amfani da Cimantic NetworkManager', 'sk': 'Uporaba leksičnega semantičnega omrežja za ontološko stavbo', 'bo': 'Ontology བཟོ་བརྩིགས་པ་ལ་སྤྱིར་ཐག་གཙང་ཆེན་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Building multilingual ontologies is a hard task as ontologies are often data-rich resources. We introduce an approach which allows exploiting structured lexical semantic knowledge for the ontology building. Given a multilingual lexical semantic (non ontological) resource and an ontology model, it allows mining relevant semantic knowledge and make the ontology building and enhancement process faster.', 'pt': 'Construir ontologias multilíngues é uma tarefa difícil, pois as ontologias geralmente são recursos ricos em dados. Apresentamos uma abordagem que permite explorar o conhecimento semântico lexical estruturado para a construção de ontologias. Dado um recurso semântico lexical multilíngue (não ontológico) e um modelo de ontologia, permite minerar conhecimento semântico relevante e tornar o processo de construção e aprimoramento de ontologias mais rápido.', 'ar': 'يعد بناء الأنطولوجيا متعددة اللغات مهمة صعبة لأن الأنطولوجيا غالبًا ما تكون موارد غنية بالبيانات. نقدم نهجًا يسمح باستغلال المعرفة الدلالية الهيكلية المهيكلة لبناء الأنطولوجيا. بالنظر إلى مورد دلالي معجمي متعدد اللغات (غير وجودي) ونموذج أنطولوجي ، فإنه يتيح استخراج المعرفة الدلالية ذات الصلة وجعل عملية بناء وتعزيز الأنطولوجيا أسرع.', 'es': 'La creación de ontologías multilingües es una tarea difícil, ya que las ontologías suelen ser recursos ricos en datos. Presentamos un enfoque que permite explotar el conocimiento semántico léxico estructurado para la construcción de ontología. Dado un recurso semántico léxico multilingüe (no ontológico) y un modelo ontológico, permite extraer el conocimiento semántico relevante y acelerar el proceso de construcción y mejora de la ontología.', 'fr': "La création d'ontologies multilingues est une tâche ardue, car les ontologies sont souvent des ressources riches en données. Nous introduisons une approche qui permet d'exploiter les connaissances sémantiques lexicales structurées pour la construction de l'ontologie. Grâce à une ressource sémantique lexicale multilingue (non ontologique) et à un modèle ontologique, il permet d'explorer les connaissances sémantiques pertinentes et d'accélérer le processus de création et d'amélioration de l'ontologie.", 'ja': 'オントロジーは多くの場合データ豊富なリソースであるため、多言語オントロジーの構築は難しい作業です。オントロジー構築のための構造化された語彙的意味論的知識を利用できるアプローチを紹介します。多言語の語彙セマンティック（非オントロジー）リソースとオントロジーモデルを考慮すると、関連するセマンティック知識をマイニングし、オントロジー構築とエンハンスメントプロセスを高速化できます。', 'zh': '构多言本体为一剧,盖本体常数丰资也。 引入一法,许用结构化词汇语义本体。 给定多语言词汇语义(非本体)资源与本体相模,许掘相关语义知识,并使本体构益速。', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी ontologies का निर्माण एक कठिन काम है क्योंकि ontologies अक्सर डेटा समृद्ध संसाधन होते हैं। हम एक दृष्टिकोण पेश करते हैं जो आंटोलॉजी बिल्डिंग के लिए संरचित लेक्सिकल शब्दार्थ ज्ञान का शोषण करने की अनुमति देता है। एक बहुभाषी लेक्सिकल सिमेंटिक (गैर ontological) संसाधन और एक आंटोलॉजी मॉडल को देखते हुए, यह खनन प्रासंगिक शब्दार्थ ज्ञान की अनुमति देता है और ओंटोलॉजी निर्माण और वृद्धि प्रक्रिया को तेजी से बनाता है।', 'ru': 'Построение многоязычных онтологий является трудной задачей, поскольку онтология часто богата данными. Введем подход, позволяющий использовать структурированные лексические семантические знания для построения онтологии. Учитывая многоязычный лексический семантический (не онтологический) ресурс и онтологическую модель, он позволяет добывать соответствующие семантические знания и ускоряет процесс построения и улучшения онтологии.', 'ga': 'Is obair chrua é ontologies ilteangacha a thógáil mar is minic gur acmhainní atá saibhir ó thaobh sonraí iad ontologies. Tugaimid isteach cur chuige a cheadaíonn leas a bhaint as eolas struchtúrtha shéimeantach léacsach don fhoirgneamh ontology. I bhfianaise acmhainn shéimeantach ilteangach léacsach (neamhontological) agus samhail onteolaíochta, ceadaíonn sé eolas shéimeantach ábhartha a mhianadóireacht agus déanann sé próiseas tógála agus feabhsaithe an onteolaíochta níos tapúla.', 'hu': 'A többnyelvű ontológiák építése nehéz feladat, mivel az ontológiák gyakran adatban gazdag erőforrások. Olyan megközelítést vezetünk be, amely lehetővé teszi a strukturált lexikai szemantikai ismeretek kiaknázását az ontológia építéséhez. Egy többnyelvű lexikai szemantikai (nem ontológiai) erőforrással és egy ontológiai modell segítségével lehetővé teszi a releváns szemantikai ismeretek bányászatát, és gyorsabbá teszi az ontológia építési és fejlesztési folyamatát.', 'el': 'Η δημιουργία πολύγλωσσων οντολογιών είναι μια δύσκολη εργασία καθώς οι οντολογίες είναι συχνά πλούσιοι σε δεδομένα πόροι. Παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση που επιτρέπει την αξιοποίηση δομημένης λεξικής σημασιολογικής γνώσης για την οικοδόμηση οντολογίας. Δεδομένου ενός πολύγλωσσου λεξικού σημασιολογικού (μη οντολογικού) πόρου και ενός οντολογικού μοντέλου, επιτρέπει την εξόρυξη σχετικών σημασιολογικών γνώσεων και κάνει τη διαδικασία οικοδόμησης και βελτίωσης της οντολογίας ταχύτερη.', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური ანტოლოგიების შექმნა არის ძალიან რთული დავალება, რადგან ანტოლოგიები ზოგიერთად მონაცემების რესურსებია. ჩვენ შევცვალოთ პროგრამა, რომელიც მოძლევს გამოიყენოთ სტრუქტურული ლექსიკალური სმენტიკური ცოდნენები ანტოლოგიის შესახებ. მრავალენგიური ლექსიკალური სიმენტიკური (არონტოლოგიური) რესურსები და ონტოლოგიური მოდელის შესაძლებელია მინდომენტიური სიმენტიკური ცოდნობები და ანტოლოგიური შექმნა და გაუფროვება', 'lt': 'Daugiakalbių ontologijų kūrimas yra sunki užduotis, nes ontologijos dažnai yra daug duomenų turintys ištekliai. Įdiegiame metodą, leidžiantį išnaudoti struktūrizuotas leksikines semantines žinias ontologijos kūrimui. Atsižvelgiant į daugiakalbį semantinį (ne ontologinį) išteklių ir ontologinį model į, jis leidžia kasyti svarbias semantines žinias ir spartinti ontologijos kūrimo ir tobulinimo procesą.', 'it': "Costruire ontologie multilingue è un compito difficile in quanto le ontologie sono spesso risorse ricche di dati. Introduciamo un approccio che permette di sfruttare le conoscenze semantiche lessicali strutturate per la costruzione ontologica. Data una risorsa semantica lessicale multilingue (non ontologica) e un modello ontologico, consente di estrarre conoscenze semantiche rilevanti e rendere più veloce il processo di costruzione e valorizzazione dell'ontologia.", 'mk': 'Градбата на мултијазични онтологии е тешка задача бидејќи онтологиите честопати се ресурси богати со податоци. Ние воведуваме пристап кој овозможува експлоатирање на структурирано лексикално семантично знаење за зградата на онтологија. Со оглед на мултијазичкиот лексикален семантичен (неонтологичен) ресурс и онтологичен модел, тој овозможува рудање релевантно семантично знаење и го направи процесот на изградба и подобрување на онтологијата побрз.', 'ml': 'പല ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d പണിയുന്നത് ഒരു കഠിനമായ ജോലിയാണ്. എന്നാല്\u200d നോട്ടോളജികള്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും ഡേറ്റാ സമ്പത്തുള്ള വിഭ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വഴിയെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക് അറിവ് കൊണ്ട് പ് പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളിലെ ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക് വിഭവങ്ങളും ഒണ്ടോളജി മോഡലും കൊണ്ട് അത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സെമാന്റിക് അറിവ് കുറച്ച് കുറവ് ചെയ്യുകയും ന', 'ms': 'Bina ontologi berbilang bahasa adalah tugas sukar kerana ontologi sering merupakan sumber yang kaya data. Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan yang membolehkan mengeksploitasi pengetahuan semantik lexik struktur untuk bangunan ontologi. Memberikan sumber semantik leksikal berbilang bahasa (bukan ontologi) dan model ontologi, ia membolehkan pengetahuan semantik relevan perlombongan dan membuat proses pembangunan dan peningkatan ontologi lebih cepat.', 'mt': 'Il-bini ta’ ontoloġiji multilingwi huwa kompitu diffiċli peress li l-ontoloġiji ta’ spiss huma riżorsi rikki fid-dejta. We introduce an approach which allows exploiting structured lexical semantic knowledge for the ontology building.  Given a multilingual lexical semantic (non ontological) resource and an ontology model, it allows mining relevant semantic knowledge and make the ontology building and enhancement process faster.', 'no': 'Bygging av fleirspråk ontologiar er ein vanskeleg oppgåve, men ontologiar er ofte data-rykke ressursar. Vi introduserer ein tilnærming som tillater å bruka strukturert leksisk semantisk kunnskap for ontologibygninga. Gjennomsiktig ein fleirspråkssemantisk (ikkje ontologisk) ressurs og ein ontologisk modell, kan det gjera mining av relevante semantiske kunnskap og gjera ontologibygging og forbedring av prosessen raskare.', 'pl': 'Budowanie ontologii wielojęzycznych jest trudnym zadaniem, ponieważ ontologie są często zasobami bogatymi w dane. Wprowadzamy podejście umożliwiające wykorzystanie strukturyzowanej semantycznej wiedzy leksykalnej do budowy ontologii. Biorąc pod uwagę wielojęzyczny leksykalny zasób semantyczny (nieontologiczny) i model ontologiczny, umożliwia wydobycie istotnej wiedzy semantycznej i sprawia, że proces budowy i ulepszania ontologii jest szybszy.', 'mn': 'Ихэнх хэлний онтологийг бүтээх нь онтологиуд ихэвчлэн өгөгдлийн баян боловсрол юм. Бид онтологийн барилгын бүтээгдэхүүний хэлбэртэй хэлний мэдлэгийг ашиглах боломжтой арга замыг танилцуулдаг. Олон хэл хэлний семантик (онтологик биш) болон онтологийн загвар учраас, энэ нь холбоотой семантик мэдлэг болон онтологийн бүтээмж болон хөгжүүлэх процессийг хурдан гаргаж чадна.', 'ro': 'Construirea ontologiilor multilingve este o sarcină grea deoarece ontologiile sunt adesea resurse bogate în date. Introducem o abordare care permite exploatarea cunoștințelor semantice lexicale structurate pentru construirea ontologiei. Având în vedere o resursă semantică lexicală multilingvă (non ontologică) și un model ontologic, permite extragerea cunoștințelor semantice relevante și face procesul de construire și îmbunătățire ontologică mai rapid.', 'sr': 'Izgradnja multijezičkih ontologija je težak zadatak jer ontologija često imaju bogate resurse podataka. Predstavljamo pristup koji omogućava iskoristiti strukturirane leksičke semantičke znanje za ontološku zgradu. S obzirom na većinu jezičkih semantičkih (ne ontoloških) resursa i ontoloških model a, omogućava rudarstvo relevantnih semantičkih znanja i ubrzati proces ontološke zgrade i poboljšanja.', 'kk': 'Көптілік онтологияларды құру - онтологиялар көпшілік деректерді бағалау ресурстары. Біз онтологиялық құрылған лексикалық семантикалық білім үшін қолдануға мүмкіндік береді. Көптілік лексикалық семантикалық (онтологиялық емес) ресурс мен онтологиялық моделі болса, ол бағалау керек семантикалық білімдерді құрып, онтологиялық құру және жетілдіру процесін тез көмектеседі', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාවික විද්\u200dයාවය නිර්මාණය කරන්න අමාරුයි විද්\u200dයාවික ව්\u200dයාපෘතියක් විද්\u200dයාපෘතිය නිර අපි ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ නිර්මාණය කළු ලෙක්සිකල් සැමැන්තික දැනගන්න. ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් ලෙක්සිකල් සිමාන්තික (non ontology) සහ ontology මොඩේල් එකක්, ඒක ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සම්බන්ධ සිමාන්තික දැනගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා ස', 'so': 'Bulshada maamulka luuqadaha kala duduwanu waa shaqo adag, sababtoo ah dhibaatooyinku inta badan waa hanti taajir ah. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab ay u ogolaan lahaayeen isticmaalka aqoonta lexicka ee dhismaha ontologiga. Sida uu helo qalabka leksikada (a an ontological) oo luuqadaha badan iyo model ontologi, waxay u fasaxaa inay ka hoosayso aqoonta semantika, waxayna ka sameynaysaa dhismaha ontologiga iyo horumarinta tartanka.', 'sv': 'Att bygga flerspråkiga ontologier är en svår uppgift eftersom ontologier ofta är datarika resurser. Vi introducerar ett tillvägagångssätt som möjliggör utnyttjande av strukturerad lexikal semantisk kunskap för ontologibyggnaden. Med tanke på en flerspråkig lexikal semantisk (icke ontologisk) resurs och en ontologisk modell, möjliggör den utvinning av relevant semantisk kunskap och gör ontologibyggande och förbättringsprocessen snabbare.', 'ta': 'பல மொழி நிலைமைகளை உருவாக்குவது கடினமான செயல் நாம் ஒரு முறையை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். அது முன்னோட்டோளியல் கட்டிடத்திற்கு உருவாக்கப்பட்ட லெக்சிக்சியல் பெ பல மொழி லெக்சிக்கல் பெம்மென்டிக் கொடுத்துள்ள மூலம் மற்றும் ஒரு ஒற்றுநோக்கி மாதிரி கொண்டுள்ளது, அது தொடர்பு அருகாமை அறிவை குறைக்க அனுமதிக்கி', 'ur': 'بہت سی زبان انٹولوژ بنانے کا ایک سخت کام ہے کیونکہ انٹولوژ اکثر ڈاٹا-ثروت سرمایہ ہیں. ہم ایک طریقہ معلوم کرتے ہیں جس کی بنائی لکھی سیمنٹی علم کی استعمال کرنا اجازت دیتے ہیں ایک بہت سی زبان کلیسی سیمنٹی (غیر آنٹولوژیک) منبع اور آنٹولوژیکی موڈل کے ذریعہ، اس نے اچھی سیمنٹی علم کے ذریعہ ذخیره کرنے کی اجازت دی اور آنٹولوژیکی بنیاد اور مہربانی پروسس کو بہت سریع کر دی', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik tillar boshqarish vazifasi juda qiyin, chunki ontologlar ko'p doim maʼlumot yozuvlari. Biz ontologiy quyidagi o'zgarishni o'rganish uchun leksikal semantik bilimni ishlatish mumkin. Bir necha tillar uchun leksikal semantik (non-ontologik) manbalar va ontologiy modeli bilan ishlatadi, u muhim semantik aniqlarini yaratishga ruxsat beradi va ontologiy tuzilishini tezlashtirish imkoniyatini oshirish imkoniyatini tez beradi.", 'vi': 'Việc xây dựng các loài tồn tại đa dạng là một nhiệm vụ khó khăn vì loài duy trì là nguồn cung cấp dữ liệu. Chúng tôi áp dụng một phương pháp khai thác kiến thức ngôn ngữ văn học cấu trúc cho tòa nhà khảo cổ. Dựa vào một nguồn từ ngôn ngữ văn học đa dạng và một mô hình tổ tiên, nó cho phép khai thác theo ngữ pháp liên tục và làm tiến trình xây dựng và cải tiến khoa học nhanh hơn.', 'da': 'At opbygge flersprogede ontologier er en svær opgave, da ontologier ofte er datarige ressourcer. Vi introducerer en tilgang, der gør det muligt at udnytte struktureret leksikalsk semantisk viden til ontologibygningen. Med en flersproget leksikalsk semantisk (ikke ontologisk) ressource og en ontologisk model gør det muligt at udvinde relevant semantisk viden og gøre ontologiens opbygning og forbedring hurtigere.', 'de': 'Der Aufbau mehrsprachiger Ontologien ist eine schwierige Aufgabe, da Ontologien oft datenreiche Ressourcen sind. Wir stellen einen Ansatz vor, der es erlaubt, strukturiertes lexikalisches semantisches Wissen für die Ontologie-Konstruktion zu nutzen. Mit einer mehrsprachigen lexikalisch-semantischen (nicht ontologischen) Ressource und einem Ontologiemodell ermöglicht es, relevantes semantisches Wissen zu gewinnen und den Aufbau- und Verbesserungsprozess der Ontologie zu beschleunigen.', 'bg': 'Изграждането на многоезични онтологии е трудна задача, тъй като онтологиите често са богати на данни ресурси. Въвеждаме подход, който позволява използването на структурирано лексикално семантично знание за изграждането на онтологията. Предвид многоезичен лексикален семантичен (неонтологичен) ресурс и онтологичен модел, той позволява извличане на съответните семантични знания и ускоряване процеса на изграждане и усъвършенстване на онтологията.', 'hr': 'Izgradnja multijezičkih ontologija je težak zadatak jer ontologije često imaju bogate resurse podataka. Predstavljamo pristup koji omogućava iskoristiti strukturirane leksičke semantičke znanje za ontološku zgradu. S obzirom na multijezičke semantičke (ne ontološke) resurse i ontološke modele, omogućava rudarstvo relevantnih semantičkih znanja i ubrzati proces konstrukcije i poboljšanja ontologije.', 'nl': 'Het bouwen van meertalige ontologieën is een moeilijke taak omdat ontologieën vaak datarijke bronnen zijn. We introduceren een aanpak die het mogelijk maakt om gestructureerde lexicale semantische kennis te benutten voor het ontologiebouw. Gezien een meertalige lexicale semantische (niet ontologische) bron en een ontologiemodel, maakt het het mogelijk relevante semantische kennis te winnen en het ontologiebouwproces sneller te maken.', 'sw': 'Kujenga utaalamu wa lugha nyingi ni kazi ngumu kwa kuwa utaalamu mara nyingi ni rasilimali za taarifa. Tunaweza kutengeneza hatua ambayo inaruhusu kutumia maarifa ya sekta ya kimapenzi kwa ajili ya jengo la utambulisho. Kutokana na rasilimali ya lexico ya lugha mbalimbali (isiyo na mantolojia) na modeli ya utaalamu, inaruhusu kupunguza maarifa yanayohusiana na kimapenzi na kufanya ujenzi wa utaalamu na kukuza mchakato wa kuendeleza haraka.', 'ko': '다언어 본체를 구축하는 것은 매우 어려운 임무이다. 왜냐하면 본체는 왕왕 데이터가 풍부한 자원이기 때문이다.우리는 구조화된 어휘와 의미 지식을 이용하여 본체를 구축하는 방법을 소개했다.다국어 어휘의 의미(비본체) 자원과 하나의 본체 모델을 정하면 관련 의미 지식을 발굴하여 본체의 구축과 강화 과정을 가속화할 수 있다.', 'id': 'Membangun ontologi berbagai bahasa adalah tugas sulit karena ontologi sering merupakan sumber daya yang kaya data. Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan yang memungkinkan mengeksploitasi pengetahuan semantis lexik struktur untuk bangunan ontologi. Mengingat sumber daya semantis (bukan ontologi) multibahasa dan model ontologi, itu memungkinkan pengetahuan semantis relevan pertambangan dan membuat proses pembangunan dan peningkatan ontologi lebih cepat.', 'af': "Die bou van multitaalse ontologies is 'n moeilike taak, want ontologies is dikwels data- rich hulpbronne. Ons introduiseer 'n toepassing wat toelaat om structureerde leksiesemantiese kennis te gebruik vir die ontologie-bou. Gien 'n multitaalske leksiesemantiek (non ontologiese) hulpbron en 'n ontologie model, laat dit die mining van relevante semantiese kennis toelaat en die ontologie bou en verbetering proses vinniger maak.", 'sq': 'Ndërtimi i ontologjive shumëgjuhësore është një detyrë e vështirë pasi ontologjitë shpesh janë burime të pasura me të dhëna. We introduce an approach which allows exploiting structured lexical semantic knowledge for the ontology building.  Duke pasur parasysh një burim lexik shumëgjuhës semantik (jo ontologjik) dhe një model ontologjik, ai lejon minierën e njohurive të rëndësishme semantike dhe e bën procesin e ndërtimit dhe përmirësimit të ontologjisë më të shpejtë.', 'hy': 'Բազլեզու օնտոլոգիաներ կառուցելը դժվար խնդիր է, քանի որ օնտոլոգիաները հաճախ տվյալների հարուստ ռեսուրսներ են: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի մոտեցում, որը թույլ է տալիս օգտագործել կառուցվածված լեքսիկական սեմանտիկ գիտելիքները օնտալոգիայի կառուցվածքի համար: Հետևաբար բազլեզու լեքսիկական սեմանտիկ (ոչ օնտոլոգիական) ռեսուրսը և օնտոլոգիական մոդելը թույլ են տալիս հանել համապատասխանատու սեմանտիկ գիտելիքները և արագ դարձնել օնտոլոգիայի կառուցվածքը և զարգաց', 'tr': 'Çoklu dil ontologiýany guramak kyn zady däl, ontologiýa köplenç data-baý resurslar. Biz ontologiýa binasy üçin guruldygy çykmak üçin bir gollaşdyrýarys. Çoklu dilli semantik (non ontological) resursy we ontologa nusgasyna görä, taýýarlamak üçin semantik bilgileri alyp, ontologa gurulmagy we gelişme prosesini çalt etmäge rugsat berýär.', 'am': 'ብዙዎችን ቋንቋዎች መሥራት አስቸጋሪ ስራ ነው፡፡ የሜንጦሎጂ አካላዊ እውቀትን ለመፍጠር የሚችል የሌክሲካዊ እውቀትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ብዙ ቋንቋዎች የሌክሲካዊ (የontological) ሀብት እና የኦኖሎጂ ሞዴል ሲሰጥ፣ በተቃራኒ የsemantic እውቀት ማነሳቅስ ይችላል፣ የኦኖሎጂ መሠረት እና ማደጋገሚያ ፕሮጀክት ፈጥኖ ይችላል፡፡', 'fa': 'ساختن آنتولوژی\u200cهای زیادی زبان\u200cها کار سختی است، زیرا آنتولوژی اغلب منابع\u200cهای ثروت داده است. ما یک روش را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که اجازه می\u200cدهد استفاده از دانش شناسایی زبانی ساخته شده برای ساختمان ontology. با توجه به یک منبع سیمانتیک (غیر آنتونولوژیکی) و یک مدل آنتونولوژیکی بسیار زیادی زبان\u200cهای زبان می\u200cگذارد، این اجازه می\u200cدهد که دانش\u200cهای سیمانتیک را خرید کند و فرایند آفرینش آنتونولوژیکی را سریع\u200cتر', 'bn': 'বহুভাষার প্রতিষ্ঠান তৈরি করা একটি কঠিন কাজ, কারণ প্রায়শই তথ্য-সমৃদ্ধ সম্পদ। আমরা একটি পদক্ষেপ উপস্থাপন করেছি যা তৈরি করা লেক্সিক্সিয়াল সেমান্টিক জ্ঞান বিস্ফোরণের সুযোগ দেয়। মাল্টিভাষার লেক্সিক্যাল সেমেন্টিক (অনটলোগিক্যাল) সম্পদ এবং একটি অনটলজিক মডেলের কারণে এটি প্রয়োজনীয় সেম্যান্টিক জ্ঞান কমিয়ে দেয়া এবং তা', 'az': 'Çoxlu dil ontoloqları inşa etmək çətin bir iş, çünki ontoloqlar çox çox zaman veri-qüvvətli kaynaqlardır. Biz ontoloji binası üçün qurulmuş hekayətli semantik bilgi istifadə etməyə imkan verir. Çoxlu dil dil semantik (non ontological) çoxluğu və ontoloji modeli sayəsində, minik məlumatı semantik bilgiləri və ontoloji inşaatı və artırma sürətini daha hızlı edər.', 'cs': 'Vytváření vícejazyčných ontologií je těžký úkol, protože ontologie jsou často zdroje bohaté na data. Představujeme přístup, který umožňuje využít strukturované lexikální sémantické znalosti pro budování ontologie. Vzhledem k vícejazyčnému lexikálnímu sémantickému (netologickému) zdroji a ontologickému modelu umožňuje těžbu relevantních sémantických znalostí a zrychlení procesu budování a vylepšování ontologie.', 'et': 'Mitmekeelsete ontoloogiate loomine on raske ülesanne, sest ontoloogiad on sageli andmerikkad ressursid. Tutvustame lähenemisviisi, mis võimaldab kasutada struktureeritud leksikaalseid semantilisi teadmisi ontoloogiahoones. Arvestades mitmekeelset leksikaalset semantilist (mitteontoloogilist) ressurssi ja ontoloogilist mudelit, võimaldab see kaevandada asjakohaseid semantilisi teadmisi ning muuta ontoloogia ehitamise ja täiustamise protsessi kiiremaks.', 'ca': "Building multilingual ontologies is a hard task as ontologies are often data-rich resources.  Introduïm un enfocament que permet explotar coneixements semàntics lèxics estructurats per a l'edifici de l'ontologia. Tenint en compte un recurso semàntic (no ontològic) lèxic multilingüe i un model ontològic, permet extraure coneixements semàntics pertinents i fer més ràpid el procés de construcció i millorament de l'ontologia.", 'fi': 'Monikielisten ontologioiden rakentaminen on vaikea tehtävä, sillä ontologit ovat usein datarikkaita resursseja. Esittelemme lähestymistavan, joka mahdollistaa strukturoidun lexikaalisen semanttisen tiedon hyödyntämisen ontologian rakentamisessa. Koska kyseessä on monikielinen lexikaalinen semanttinen (ei-ontologinen) resurssi ja ontologiamalli, se mahdollistaa merkityksellisen semanttisen tiedon louhinnan ja nopeuttaa ontologian rakentamista ja parantamista.', 'bs': 'Izgradnja multijezičkih ontologija je težak zadatak, jer ontologija često imaju bogate resurse podataka. Predstavljamo pristup koji omogućava iskoristiti strukturirane leksičke semantičke znanje za ontološku zgradu. S obzirom na multijezički semantički (ne ontološki) resurs i ontološki model, omogućava rudarstvo relevantnih semantičkih znanja i ubrzati proces konstrukcije i poboljšanja ontologije.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé nglanggar tarjamahan sing nyenggawe nguasai seneng semanti nggawe barang kelas nggawe ontlogi. Nanging awak dhéwé sistem sing langgar sematik (gak bên ontrolog) lan model ontrolog, kuwi supoyo nggawe kesempatan sematik lan nggawe nggawe sistem ontrolog nggawe barang langgar.', 'ha': "An gina abubuwa na mulki-lingui, shi ne mai tsanani kwanan da ontogi ko da yawa, su zama matajiri na data-tajiri. Tuna fara wani hanyoyi wanda ke yarda ta sami da sanin na'anar mutusiki na bakwai na ontoloji. Given a multilingual lexical semantic (non ontological) resource and an ontology model, it allows mining relevant semantic knowledge and make the ontology building and enhancement process faster.", 'he': 'בניית אונטולוגיות רבות שפות היא משימה קשה כי אונטולוגיות הן לעתים קרובות משאבים עשירים במידע. אנחנו מציגים גישה שמאפשר לנצל ידע סמנטי לקסי מבוסס לבניין האונטולוגיה. בהתחשב במקור סמנטי (לא אונטולוגי) רב-שפתי ומודל אונטולוגי, הוא מאפשר למכרה ידע סמנטי רלוונטי ולעשות את בניין האונטולוגי ותהליך השיפור מהיר יותר.', 'sk': 'Gradnja večjezičnih ontologij je težka naloga, saj so ontologije pogosto viri, bogati s podatki. Predstavljamo pristop, ki omogoča izkoriščanje strukturiranega leksikalnega semantičnega znanja za gradnjo ontologije. Glede na večjezični semantični (neentološki) vir in ontološki model omogoča izkopavanje relevantnega semantičnega znanja ter hitrejši proces gradnje in izboljšave ontologije.', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་དབྱིབས་གཞུང་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ནི་གནད་དོན་ལས་ཀྱང་དཀའ་ངལ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་། ང་ཚོས་གཞི་སྒྲིག Given a multilingual lexical semantic (non ontological) resource and an ontology model, it allows mining relevant semantic knowledge and make the ontology building and enhancement process faster.'}
{'en': 'Evaluating the Consistency of Word Embeddings from Small Data', 'ar': 'تقييم مدى اتساق عمليات تضمين الكلمات من البيانات الصغيرة', 'pt': 'Avaliando a consistência dos Word Embeddings a partir de Small Data', 'fr': 'Évaluation de la cohérence des intégrations de mots à partir de données de petite taille', 'es': 'Evaluación de la coherencia de las incrustaciones de palabras a partir de datos pequeños', 'ja': '小さなデータからのWord埋め込みの一貫性の評価', 'zh': '自小数据评估词嵌一致性', 'hi': 'छोटे डेटा से Word Embeddings की संगतता का मूल्यांकन करना', 'ru': 'Оценка согласованности вложений слов на основе малых данных', 'ga': 'Meastóireacht a dhéanamh ar Chomhsheasmhacht Leabaithe Focal ó Shonraí Beaga', 'hu': 'A szóbeágyazások következetességének értékelése kis adatokból', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση της συνέπειας των ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων από μικρά δεδομένα', 'ka': 'პატარა მონაცემებიდან სიტყვების შებეჭდვის შესახებ', 'it': 'Valutazione della coerenza delle incorporazioni di parole da piccoli dati', 'mk': 'Оценувањето на конзистентноста на вградувањата на зборови од мали податоци', 'lt': 'Žodžių įterpimo iš mažų duomenų nuoseklumo vertinimas', 'kk': 'Шағын деректерден сөздерді ендіру сәйкестігін оқу', 'ms': 'Evaluating the Consistency of Word Embeddings from Small Data', 'ml': 'ചെറിയ ഡേറ്റായില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ ആശയം', 'mn': 'Багахан өгөгдлийн нэгтгэлийн төвөгтэй байдлыг үнэлгээх', 'mt': 'Evalwazzjoni tal-konsistenza tal-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem minn Dejta Żgħar', 'ro': 'Evaluarea coerenței încorporărilor Word din date mici', 'sr': 'Procjenjivanje konsistencije uključenja reči iz malih podataka', 'no': 'Evaluerer konsistensjonen av ordinnbygging frå lite data', 'pl': 'Ocena spójności osadzeń słowa z małych danych', 'so': 'Qiimeynta qalabka hadalka ee macluumaadka yar', 'ta': 'சிறிய தரவுகளிலிருந்து வார்த்தையின் உள்ளடக்கத்தை மதிப்பிடுகிறது', 'sv': 'Utvärdera samstämmigheten i Word-inbäddningar från små data', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đánh giá liên kết các môi trường chữ từ nhỏ', 'bg': 'Оценка на последователността на вгражданията на думи от малки данни', 'nl': 'Evaluatie van de consistentie van Word Embeddings uit kleine gegevens', 'da': 'Evaluering af konsistensen af Word Embeddings fra små data', 'hr': 'Procjenjivanje konsistencije uključenja riječi iz malih podataka', 'de': 'Bewertung der Konsistenz von Word-Einbettungen aus kleinen Daten', 'id': 'Mengevaluasi Konsistensi Pencampuran Kata dari Data Kecil', 'ko': '작은 데이터로 단어 삽입의 일치성을 평가하다', 'fa': 'ارزیابی اتصال کلمات از اطلاعات کوچک', 'sw': 'Kuthibitisha Uwekezaji wa Mazungumzo ya Neno kutoka Taarifa ndogo', 'tr': 'Kiçi Maglumatdan Sözler Buýruklygyny Taýýarla', 'sq': 'Vlerësimi i konsistencës së përfshirjeve të fjalëve nga të dhënat e vogla', 'af': 'Name', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'K칲칞칲k Veril톛rden S칬zl칲k 캻fad톛l톛rinin 캻fad톛sini Q캼d캼rlan캼r', 'hy': 'Փոքր տվյալներից բառերի ներգրավման համապատասխանությունը գնահատելը', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Procjenjivanje konsistencije uključenja riječi iz malih podataka', 'ca': "Evaluar la consistencia de l'incorporació de paraules a partir de petites dades", 'cs': 'Hodnocení konzistence vložení slov z malých dat', 'et': 'Sõnade manustamise järjepidevuse hindamine väikeandmetest', 'fi': 'Word-upotusten johdonmukaisuuden arviointi pienistä tiedoista', 'jv': 'text-editor-action', 'sk': 'Ocena skladnosti besednih vdelav iz majhnih podatkov', 'ha': 'Yana ƙayyade Ƙaramiwa na Babbata da Kalmar da ke Ƙaramiwa', 'he': 'הערכה התקבילות של קישור מילים ממידע קטן', 'bo': 'ཆུང་ཆུང་ཆུང་བའི་ཡིག་ཆ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་རིམ་པ་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'In this work, we address the evaluation of distributional semantic models trained on smaller, domain-specific texts, specifically, philosophical text. Specifically, we inspect the behaviour of models using a pre-trained background space in learning. We propose a measure of consistency which can be used as an evaluation metric when no in-domain gold-standard data is available. This measure simply computes the ability of a model to learn similar embeddings from different parts of some homogeneous data. We show that in spite of being a simple evaluation, consistency actually depends on various combinations of factors, including the nature of the data itself, the model used to train the semantic space, and the frequency of the learnt terms, both in the background space and in the in-domain data of interest.', 'ar': 'في هذا العمل ، نتناول تقييم النماذج الدلالية التوزيعية المدربة على نصوص أصغر خاصة بمجال معين ، على وجه التحديد ، النص الفلسفي. على وجه التحديد ، نفحص سلوك النماذج باستخدام مساحة خلفية مُدرَّبة مسبقًا في التعلم. نقترح مقياسًا للاتساق يمكن استخدامه كمقياس للتقييم في حالة عدم توفر بيانات قياسية ذهبية في المجال. يحسب هذا المقياس ببساطة قدرة النموذج على تعلم زخارف مماثلة من أجزاء مختلفة من بعض البيانات المتجانسة. نظهر أنه على الرغم من كونه تقييمًا بسيطًا ، إلا أن الاتساق يعتمد في الواقع على مجموعات مختلفة من العوامل ، بما في ذلك طبيعة البيانات نفسها ، والنموذج المستخدم لتدريب الفضاء الدلالي ، وتكرار المصطلحات المكتسبة ، سواء في مساحة الخلفية وفي بيانات المجال ذات الأهمية.', 'fr': "Dans ce travail, nous abordons l'évaluation de modèles sémantiques distributionnels formés à partir de textes plus petits et spécifiques à un domaine, en particulier des textes philosophiques. Plus précisément, nous inspectons le comportement des modèles à l'aide d'un espace d'arrière-plan pré-formé dans l'apprentissage. Nous proposons une mesure de cohérence qui peut être utilisée comme mesure d'évaluation lorsqu'aucune donnée standard dans le domaine n'est disponible. Cette mesure calcule simplement la capacité d'un modèle à apprendre des intégrations similaires à partir de différentes parties de certaines données homogènes. Nous montrons que, bien qu'il s'agisse d'une évaluation simple, la cohérence dépend en fait de diverses combinaisons de facteurs, y compris la nature des données elles-mêmes, le modèle utilisé pour entraîner l'espace sémantique et la fréquence des termes appris, à la fois dans l'espace d'arrière-plan et dans les données internes au domaine d'intérêt.", 'pt': 'Neste trabalho, abordamos a avaliação de modelos semânticos distribucionais treinados em textos menores, específicos de domínio, especificamente, texto filosófico. Especificamente, inspecionamos o comportamento dos modelos usando um espaço de fundo pré-treinado na aprendizagem. Propomos uma medida de consistência que pode ser usada como métrica de avaliação quando não há dados padrão-ouro no domínio disponíveis. Essa medida simplesmente calcula a capacidade de um modelo de aprender incorporações semelhantes de diferentes partes de alguns dados homogêneos. Mostramos que apesar de ser uma avaliação simples, a consistência na verdade depende de várias combinações de fatores, incluindo a natureza dos dados em si, o modelo usado para treinar o espaço semântico e a frequência dos termos aprendidos, tanto no espaço de fundo e nos dados do domínio de interesse.', 'es': 'En este trabajo, abordamos la evaluación de modelos semánticos distribucionales entrenados en textos más pequeños y específicos de dominio, específicamente, textos filosóficos. Específicamente, inspeccionamos el comportamiento de los modelos utilizando un espacio de formación previamente entrenado en el aprendizaje. Proponemos una medida de coherencia que se puede utilizar como métrica de evaluación cuando no se dispone de datos de referencia en el dominio. Esta medida simplemente calcula la capacidad de un modelo para aprender incrustaciones similares de diferentes partes de algunos datos homogéneos. Demostramos que, a pesar de ser una evaluación simple, la coherencia en realidad depende de varias combinaciones de factores, incluida la naturaleza de los datos en sí, el modelo utilizado para entrenar el espacio semántico y la frecuencia de los términos aprendidos, tanto en el espacio de fondo como en los datos de interés dentro del dominio.', 'ja': 'この研究では、より小さな領域固有のテキスト、具体的には哲学的テキストについてトレーニングされた分布的意味モデルの評価に取り組む。具体的には、学習において事前にトレーニングされたバックグラウンドスペースを使用してモデルの挙動を検査します。私たちは、ドメイン内のゴールドスタンダードデータが利用できない場合に評価指標として使用できる一貫性の尺度を提案します。この尺度は、いくつかの均質なデータの異なる部分から同様の埋め込みを学習するモデルの能力を単純に計算します。単純な評価であるにもかかわらず、一貫性は実際には、データそのものの性質、意味空間を訓練するために使用されるモデル、学習された用語の頻度など、バックグラウンド空間と関心のあるドメイン内データの両方の要素のさまざまな組み合わせに依存することを示しています。', 'zh': '于此议论,特定于领域之本(特哲学文本)训练之分语义模范之评。 具体来说,吾于学之先教者背景间以观模形之行。 凡立一致性量,无域内黄金准数可用时,可以为指标。 此量值仅计模同构数之学类也。 虽一简之评,一致性实在各种因素,包数性质,以训语义空形,及学术语频率,背景空乐域。', 'hi': 'इस काम में, हम छोटे, डोमेन-विशिष्ट ग्रंथों, विशेष रूप से, दार्शनिक पाठ पर प्रशिक्षित वितरणात्मक शब्दार्थ मॉडल के मूल्यांकन को संबोधित करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम सीखने में पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित पृष्ठभूमि स्थान का उपयोग करके मॉडल के व्यवहार का निरीक्षण करते हैं। हम स्थिरता का एक उपाय प्रस्तावित करते हैं जिसका उपयोग मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक के रूप में किया जा सकता है जब कोई इन-डोमेन गोल्ड-मानक डेटा उपलब्ध नहीं होता है। यह उपाय बस कुछ सजातीय डेटा के विभिन्न हिस्सों से समान एम्बेडिंग सीखने के लिए एक मॉडल की क्षमता की गणना करता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि एक साधारण मूल्यांकन होने के बावजूद, स्थिरता वास्तव में कारकों के विभिन्न संयोजनों पर निर्भर करती है, जिसमें डेटा की प्रकृति, शब्दार्थ स्थान को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए उपयोग किए जाने वाले मॉडल, और सीखे गए शब्दों की आवृत्ति, दोनों पृष्ठभूमि स्थान में और ब्याज के इन-डोमेन डेटा में शामिल हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой работе мы рассмотрим оценку дистрибутивных семантических моделей, обученных на более мелких, предметно-ориентированных текстах, в частности, философском тексте. В частности, мы проверяем поведение моделей, используя предварительно обученное фоновое пространство в обучении. Мы предлагаем меру согласованности, которая может быть использована в качестве оценочной метрики при отсутствии данных о золотом стандарте внутри домена. Эта мера просто вычисляет способность модели изучать схожие вложения из разных частей некоторых однородных данных. Показано, что, несмотря на простоту оценки, согласованность фактически зависит от различных комбинаций факторов, включая характер самих данных, модель, используемую для обучения семантическому пространству, и частоту изучаемых терминов, как в фоновом пространстве, так и в представляющих интерес внутридоменных данных.', 'ga': 'Sa obair seo, tugaimid aghaidh ar mheastóireacht ar shamhlacha shéimeantacha dáileacháin atá oilte ar théacsanna níos lú a bhaineann go sonrach le fearann, go sonrach, ar théacs fealsúnach. Go sonrach, déanaimid iniúchadh ar iompar samhlacha ag baint úsáide as spás cúlra réamh-oilte san fhoghlaim. Molaimid tomhas comhsheasmhachta ar féidir a úsáid mar mhéadrach meastóireachta nuair nach bhfuil aon sonraí caighdeánacha óir san fhearann ar fáil. Ríomhann an beart seo go simplí an cumas atá ag múnla leabú comhchosúla a fhoghlaim ó chodanna éagsúla de roinnt sonraí aonchineálacha. Léiríonn muid, in ainneoin gur meastóireacht shimplí é, go mbraitheann comhsheasmhacht i ndáiríre ar chomhcheangail éagsúla fachtóirí, lena n-áirítear nádúr na sonraí féin, an tsamhail a úsáidtear chun an spás shéimeantach a oiliúint, agus minicíocht na dtéarmaí foghlamtha, sa spás cúlra araon. agus sna sonraí leasa in-fhearainn.', 'hu': 'Ebben a munkában kisebb, tartományspecifikus szövegekre, konkrétan filozófiai szövegekre képzett disztribúciós szemantikai modellek értékelésével foglalkozunk. Konkrétan a modellek viselkedését egy előre képzett háttértér segítségével vizsgáljuk a tanulás során. Javasoljuk a következetesség mértékét, amely értékelési mutatóként használható, ha nem állnak rendelkezésre a domain gold-standard adatok. Ez a mérés egyszerűen kiszámítja, hogy egy modell képes hasonló beágyazásokat tanulni néhány homogén adat különböző részéből. Megmutatjuk, hogy annak ellenére, hogy egy egyszerű értékelés, a konzisztencia valójában a tényezők különböző kombinációjától függ, beleértve magát az adatok természetét, a szemantikai tér kiképzésére használt modellt, valamint a tanult kifejezések gyakoriságát, mind a háttértérben, mind a domain belüli adatokban.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, ασχολούμαστε με την αξιολόγηση των διανεμητικών σημασιολογικών μοντέλων που εκπαιδεύονται σε μικρότερα κείμενα, ειδικά σε φιλοσοφικό κείμενο. Συγκεκριμένα, επιθεωρούμε τη συμπεριφορά των μοντέλων χρησιμοποιώντας έναν προ-εκπαιδευμένο χώρο υποβάθρου στη μάθηση. Προτείνουμε ένα μέτρο συνοχής το οποίο μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί ως μετρικό αξιολόγησης όταν δεν υπάρχουν διαθέσιμα δεδομένα χρυσού προτύπου εντός του τομέα. Αυτό το μέτρο απλά υπολογίζει την ικανότητα ενός μοντέλου να μάθει παρόμοιες ενσωματώσεις από διαφορετικά μέρη κάποιων ομοιογενών δεδομένων. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι παρόλο που είναι μια απλή αξιολόγηση, η συνέπεια εξαρτάται στην πραγματικότητα από διάφορους συνδυασμούς παραγόντων, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της φύσης των ίδιων των δεδομένων, του μοντέλου που χρησιμοποιείται για την εκπαίδευση του σημασιολογικού χώρου και της συχνότητας των διδαχθέντων όρων, τόσο στο χώρο παρασκήνιου όσο και στα δεδομένα εντός του πεδίου ενδιαφέροντος.', 'ka': 'ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ განსაზღვრებული სენმანტიკური მოდელების გავამუშავებთ, რომლებიც პატარა, დემომინიკური სპექტიკური ტექსტზე, განსაზღვრებით ფილოსოფიკალური განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ მოდელების მონაცემების მონაცემების მონაცემების გამოყენება საფუნო სივრცე სწავლებში. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ გავაკეთოთ კონსტენსტივის ზომა, რომელიც შეიძლია გამოიყენება როგორც გავაკეთოთ მეტრიკი, როდესაც არაფერი დოლანური-სტანდარ ეს მზადება მხოლოდ მოდელის შესაძლებლობას გავისწავლოთ სხვა ჰომოგენეული მონაცემების განსხვავებული ნაწილზე. ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ მარტივი განსაზღვრება იყოს, რომ კონსტენსტია ფაქტორის განსაზღვრებით დააყენება, რომელიც თავიდან მონაცემების ნათობა, მოდელი, რომელიც გამოყენებულია სიმენტიკური სივრცე და სწავლილი სივრცემების განსაზღვ', 'it': "In questo lavoro, affrontiamo la valutazione di modelli semantici distributivi formati su testi più piccoli e specifici del dominio, in particolare testi filosofici. Nello specifico, controlliamo il comportamento dei modelli utilizzando uno spazio di background pre-addestrato nell'apprendimento. Proponiamo una misura di coerenza che può essere utilizzata come metrica di valutazione quando non sono disponibili dati in-domain gold-standard. Questa misura calcola semplicemente la capacità di un modello di apprendere incorporazioni simili da parti diverse di alcuni dati omogenei. Dimostriamo che, pur essendo una semplice valutazione, la coerenza dipende in realtà da varie combinazioni di fattori, tra cui la natura dei dati stessi, il modello utilizzato per addestrare lo spazio semantico e la frequenza dei termini appresi, sia nello spazio di sfondo che nei dati in-domain di interesse.", 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыс ішінде бөлімдеу семантикалық үлгілерді шағын, доменге арналған мәтіндерді, осылай қатар, философиялық мәтіндерді оқытуға болады. Ескерту үлгілердің әрекетін оқыту үшін алдын- оқылған аясының орынын қолдану үшін тексереміз. Біз доменде алтын- стандартты деректер қол жеткізілмегенде қолданылатын метрикалық түрлендірудің өлшемін келтіреміз. Бұл өлшемі бірнеше гомоген деректерінің бірнеше бөлшектерінен ұқсас ендіру үлгісінің мүмкіндігін есептеп береді. Біз қарапайым оқиға болғанын көрсету үшін, тәуелсіздік әртүрлі факторлық комбинацияларына тәуелді, өзінің деректерінің қасиеті, семантикалық орын оқыту үшін қолданылатын үлгі және оқылған терминлердің жиілігі, аясының орында да да, до', 'lt': 'In this work, we address the evaluation of distributional semantic models trained on smaller, domain-specific texts, specifically, philosophical text.  Konkrečiai tikriname modelių elgesį, naudojant iš anksto apmokytą foninę erdvę mokymosi srityje. Siūlome nuoseklumo rodiklį, kuris gali būti naudojamas kaip vertinimo metrinis rodiklis, kai nėra duomenų apie aukso standartus. Ši priemonė paprasčiausiai apskaičiuoja modelio gebėjimą mokytis panašių įdėjimų iš įvairių vienodų duomenų dalių. Mes rodome, kad, nepaisant paprasto vertinimo, nuoseklumas iš tikrųjų priklauso nuo įvairių veiksnių derinių, įskaitant pačių duomenų pobūdį, semantinei erdvei treniruoti naudojamą model į ir pasimokytų terminų dažnumą tiek foninėje erdvėje, tiek dominuojančiuose duomenise.', 'mk': 'Во оваа работа, ние се обраќаме на проценката на дистрибуционалните семантични модели обучени на помали, специфични тексти за домени, специфично филозофички текст. Специфично, го проверуваме однесувањето на моделите користејќи предобучен простор за позадина во учењето. Ние предложуваме мерка на константност која може да се користи како метрика на евалуација кога нема достапни златни стандардни податоци во доменот. Оваа мерка едноставно ја обчистува способноста на моделот да научи слични вградувања од различни делови на некои хомогени податоци. Ние покажуваме дека и покрај тоа што е едноставна проценка, константноста всушност зависи од различни комбинации на фактори, вклучувајќи ја природата на самите податоци, моделот кој се користи за обука на семантичниот простор, и фреквенцијата на научените термини, како во позадината простор, така и во податоците во доменот од интерес', 'ms': 'In this work, we address the evaluation of distributional semantic models trained on smaller, domain-specific texts, specifically, philosophical text.  Secara khusus, kita periksa perilaku model menggunakan ruang latar belakang yang dilatih-dilatih dalam belajar. Kami cadangkan ukuran kesistensi yang boleh digunakan sebagai metrik penilaian bila tiada data piawai emas dalam domain tersedia. Ukuran ini hanya menghitung kemampuan model untuk mempelajari penyambungan yang sama dari bahagian yang berbeza dari beberapa data homogen. Kami menunjukkan bahawa walaupun menjadi penilaian sederhana, konsistensi sebenarnya bergantung pada berbagai kombinasi faktor, termasuk sifat data sendiri, model yang digunakan untuk melatih ruang semantik, dan frekuensi terma belajar, kedua-dua dalam ruang latar belakang dan dalam data domain yang menarik.', 'ml': 'ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, ചെറിയ, ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച, ഫിലോസോഫിക്കല്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട സെമാന്\u200dറിക് മോഡലുകള പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, പഠിക്കുന്നതിന് മുമ്പ് പശ്ചാത്തലത്തിന്റെ പശ്ചാത്തല സ്ഥലം ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മോഡലുകളുടെ പ് ഡൊമൈനില്\u200d സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണ-സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഡേറ്റര്\u200d ഡേറ്റായിട്ടില്ലാത്ത ഒരു വിലയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന മെറ്റിക്കായി  ഈ അളവ് ഒരു മോഡലിന്റെ കഴിവിനെ എണ്ണുന്നുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ചില ഹോമോജിന്റെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് ഒരു ലളിതമായ വിലാസങ്ങളാണെങ്കില്\u200d ശരിക്കും ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത്, വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ്വഭാവം, സെമാന്റിക് സ്പെയിസ്റ്റ് പരിശീലിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന', 'mt': 'In this work, we address the evaluation of distributional semantic models trained on smaller, domain-specific texts, specifically, philosophical text.  Speċifikament, a ħna ninspezzjonaw l-imġiba tal-mudelli bl-użu ta’ spazju ta’ sfond imħarreġ minn qabel fit-tagħlim. Aħna nipproponu miżura ta’ konsistenza li tista’ tintuża bħala metrika ta’ evalwazzjoni meta ma tkun disponibbli l-ebda dejta standard tad-deheb fid-dominju. Din il-miżura sempliċement tikkalkula l-kapaċità ta’ mudell li jitgħallem inkorporazzjonijiet simili minn partijiet differenti ta’ xi dejta omoġenja. Aħna nuru li minkejja li tkun evalwazzjoni sempliċi, il-konsistenza fil-fatt tiddependi fuq diversi kombinazzjonijiet ta’ fatturi, inkluż in-natura tad-dejta nnifisha, il-mudell użat għat-taħriġ tal-ispazju semantiku, u l-frekwenza tat-termini meħuda, kemm fl-ispazju tal-isfond kif ukoll fid-dejta interna ta’ interess.', 'mn': 'Энэ ажлын тулд бид хуваарилцааны семантик загваруудыг жижиг, холбоотой тодорхойлогдсон, ялангуяа философик текст дээр шалгаж байна. Ялангуяа, бид суралцахын тулд урд сургалтын арга зайг ашиглан загварын замыг шалгаж байна. Бид холбоотой алт-стандарт өгөгдлийн хэрэглэгдэхгүй үед хэрэглэгдэж болно. Энэ хэмжээ нь зөвхөн нэг загварын бага зэрэг ижил төрлийн өгөгдлийн өөр хэсэгт төстэй холбогдолтыг сурах чадварыг тооцоолж байна. Бид энгийн оюутнууд байхдаа, үр дүнтэй байдал нь өөрийн мэдээллийн байгаль, semantic орон зайг суралцахын тулд хэрэглэгдсэн загвар болон сурсан хэмжээний ихэвчлэл, фонд орон зайд болон дотоод сонирхолтой мэдээллийн холбоотой олон тоонуудын холбоотой байдаг.', 'no': 'I denne arbeiden adresserer vi evalueringa av distribusjonale semantiske modeller som trengte på mindre, domenespesifikke tekstar, spesielt filosofisk tekst. Dette er spesielt at vi kontrollerer oppførsel av modeller ved hjelp av eit føretrainert bakgrunnsflate i læring. Vi foreslår eit mål av konsistens som kan brukast som ein evalueringsmetrisk når ingen gull- standard data i domene er tilgjengeleg. Dette målet reknar enkelt på at ein modell kan lære liknande innbygging frå ulike deler av nokre homogeneske data. Vi viser at, selv om det er ein enkel evaluering, er konsekvensen faktisk avhengig av ulike kombinasjonar av faktorer, inkludert naturen av dataene sjølv, modellen som vert brukt til å trenja semantisk plass, og frekvensen av lærte uttrykk, både i bakgrunneplassen og i inndomenedata med interesse.', 'pl': 'W niniejszej pracy zajmujemy się oceną dystrybucyjnych modeli semantycznych szkolonych na mniejszych, domenowych tekstach, a w szczególności tekstach filozoficznych. W szczególności badamy zachowanie modeli wykorzystując wstępnie przeszkoloną przestrzeń tła w uczeniu się. Proponujemy miarę spójności, która może być stosowana jako wskaźnik oceny, gdy nie są dostępne dane standardowe w domenie. Miara ta po prostu oblicza zdolność modelu do uczenia się podobnych osadzeń z różnych części niektórych jednorodnych danych. Pokazujemy, że pomimo prostej oceny, spójność zależy faktycznie od różnych kombinacji czynników, w tym od charakteru samych danych, modelu używanego do trenowania przestrzeni semantycznej oraz częstotliwości poznawanych terminów, zarówno w przestrzeni tła, jak i w interesujących danych wewnątrz domeny.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, abordăm evaluarea modelelor semantice distribuționale instruite pe texte mai mici, specifice domeniului, în special texte filosofice. Mai exact, inspectăm comportamentul modelelor folosind un spațiu de fundal pre-instruit în învățare. Propunem o măsură de coerență care poate fi folosită ca metrică de evaluare atunci când nu sunt disponibile date aur-standard în domeniu. Această măsură calculează pur și simplu capacitatea unui model de a învăța încorporări similare din diferite părți ale unor date omogene. Aratăm că, în ciuda faptului că este o simplă evaluare, coerența depinde de diferite combinații de factori, inclusiv natura datelor în sine, modelul folosit pentru instruirea spațiului semantic și frecvența termenilor învățați, atât în spațiul de fundal, cât și în datele din domeniu de interes.', 'sr': 'U ovom poslu se obraćamo procjenu distribucijskih semantičkih modela obučenih na manjim, domeničkim tekstima, posebno filozofijskim tekstima. Posebno, provjeravamo ponašanje modela koristeći predobučeni prostor pozadine u učenju. Predlažemo mjeru konsekvencije koja se može koristiti kao metrika za procjenu kada nema podataka o zlatnom standardu u domenu. Ova mjera jednostavno računa sposobnost model a da nauči slične uključenje iz različitih dijelova nekih homogenenih podataka. Pokazujemo da, uprkos jednostavnom procjenom, konsekvencija zapravo zavisi od različitih kombinacija faktora, uključujući prirodu samih podataka, model koji se koristi za trening semantičkog prostora, i frekvenciju učenih termina, kako u pozadinskom prostoru, tako i u podacima interesa u domenu.', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේදී, අපි විදුලිය සෙමැන්ටික් මොඩේල්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්නේ විශේෂ විශේෂයෙන්, විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන්, අපි මොඩේල් වර්තනය පරීක්ෂා කරනවා ප්\u200dරධාන පිටිපස්සේ අවසානයක් භාවිත කරන්න. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා සාමාන්\u200dයතාවක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් මෙට්\u200dරික් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න මේ මාපණය සමහරවිට මොඩල් එකක් ගැන ගණන්න පුළුවන් විවිධ පැත්තෙන් සමාන්\u200dය දත්ත වලින් සමාන්\u200dය සංවිධ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ඒක සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණයක් වුනොත්, සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණයක් ඇත්තටම විවිධ සංවිධානයක් වෙනුවෙන් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන් විවිධ සංවිධානයක් විතර', 'sv': 'I detta arbete behandlar vi utvärderingen av distributionsmässiga semantiska modeller utbildade på mindre, domänspecifika texter, specifikt filosofisk text. Specifikt inspekterar vi modellernas beteende med hjälp av ett förberett bakgrundsutrymme i inlärningen. Vi föreslår ett mått på konsekvens som kan användas som ett utvärderingsmått när inga guldstandarddata finns tillgängliga. Detta mått beräknar helt enkelt en modells förmåga att lära sig liknande inbäddningar från olika delar av vissa homogena data. Vi visar att konsekvensen, trots att den är en enkel utvärdering, faktiskt beror på olika kombinationer av faktorer, inklusive själva datans natur, modellen som används för att träna det semantiska rummet och frekvensen av de lärda termerna, både i bakgrundsrummet och i domändata av intresse.', 'so': 'Markaas waxan waxaynu ku sheekaynaa qiimeynta samooyinka qaybsiga ah oo lagu baray qoraalka yar ee gudaha, khusuusan qoraalka filsafka ah. Si gaar ah, waxaynu fiirinaynaa dabeecada qaababka lagu isticmaalayo goobta waxbarashada horay loo tababaray. Waxaannu soo jeedaynaa qiyaastii isku dadaal ah oo lagu isticmaali karo qiimeynta marka a an lagu helin macluumaad kaamil ah oo dahab ah. Tan qiyaastaasu wuxuu si fudud u xisaabiyaa awoodda tusaale ahaan in laga barto wax la mid ah oo laga helo meelo kala duduwan ee macluumaad isku mid ah. Waxaan muujinnaa in inkastoo ay tahay qiimeynta fudud, dhamaantoodu waxay ku xiran tahay isku xiriir kala duduwan waxyaabaha, kuwaas oo ka mid ah dabiicadda macluumaadka, modelka loo isticmaalay in lagu baro cirka semantika, iyo isbedelka waxbarashada, xiliga dabaqa iyo macluumaadka danaha gudaha.', 'ta': 'இந்த வேலையில், நாம் சிறிய, domain- குறிப்பிட்ட உரைகளில், குறிப்பிட்ட கோப்பியல் உரையில் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட பங்கீட்டு semantic மா குறிப்பிட்டு, கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் போது மாதிரிகளின் நடைமுறையை நாம் பரிசோதிக்கிறோம். நாம் ஒரு தொடர்பு அளவை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இது ஒரு மதிப்பு மெட்ரிக்காக பயன்படுத்த முடியும். இந்த அளவு ஒரு மாதிரியின் இயல்பானத்தை எளிதாக கணக்கிடும் சில பொதுவான தகவல்களின் வேறு பகுதிகளிலிருந்து போன்ற உள்ளி We show that in spite of being a simple evaluation, consistency actually depends on various combinations of factors, including the nature of the data itself, the model used to train the semantic space, and the frequency of the learnt terms, both in the background space and in the in-domain data of interest.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کام میں تقسیم کرنے والی سیمنٹی موڈل کی ارزش کریں جو چھوٹی، ڈومین خاص متن پر آموزش کی گئی تھی، مخصوصاً فیلسوفی متن پر۔ مخصوص طور پر، ہم نے مدل کے رفتار کو سیکھنے کے لئے پیش آموزش کی پشتیبانی جگہ کے مطابق دیکھا ہے. ہم ایک موجودگی کے اندازے سے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک ارزش میٹریک کے طور پر استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں جب کوئی سوند استاندارڈ ڈاٹر نہیں ہے۔ یہ اندازہ صرف ایک موڈل کے قابلیت کی محاسبہ کرتا ہے کہ کسی موڈل کے مختلف ٹکڑوں سے برابر انڈینگ سکھائے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک سادہ ارزیابی ہو جانے کے باوجود، تعلق باوجود مختلف فکتوروں کی تعلق پر ہے، جیسے ڈاٹوں کی طبیعت کے ساتھ، سمانتریک فضا کی تعلیم کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، اور سکھایا جاتا ہے، پچھلی جگہ میں اور ڈومین کی اطلاعات میں.', 'uz': "Bu ishda biz kichkina, domen-specific matnlarda o'rganilgan semantik modellarni qiymatga qaramamiz, hususik filosofik matnni. Ko'rsatilgan, biz o'rganishdan oldin o'rganishdan oldin orqa fon joy bilan modellarning xususiyatini ko'rinamiz. Biz davom etishimiz, bu metrikni qiymatlashtirish mumkin, lokal domenning gold-standard maʼlumot mavjud emas. Bu usulni oddiy hisoblash mumkin, bir necha homogen maʼlumotning bir necha qismlaridan o'rganish mumkin. Biz esa oddiy qiymatni ko'rsatuvchimiz kerak boʻlsa, bir qancha bir qanchalik bir qatlamlar birikmasiga ishlatadi, ma'lumotning natijasida, semantik romaniga o'rganish modeli va o'rganish sonlarining frekveligi, orqa фазsidagi va domen maʼlumotida.", 'vi': 'Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề cập đến đánh giá các mô hình giao tiếp theo ngữ pháp văn bản nhỏ hơn, cụ thể là triết học. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi kiểm tra hành vi của các mô hình sử dụng một lớp nền huấn luyện để học. Chúng tôi đề xuất một thước đo độ đồng nhất có thể dùng như một hệ thống đánh giá khi không có dữ liệu thuộc loại vàng. Dự án này đơn giản là tính to án khả năng của mô hình để học những sự nhúng tay tương tự từ các phần khác nhau của một số dữ liệu đồng bộ. Chúng tôi cho thấy mặc dù chỉ là một đánh giá đơn giản, sự đồng nhất thực sự phụ thuộc vào nhiều kết hợp của các yếu tố, bao gồm tính chất của các dữ liệu, mô hình được dùng để đào tạo ngữ pháp, và tần số của các thuật ngữ học, cả trong vùng và trong dữ liệu về lợi ích.', 'bg': 'В тази работа разглеждаме оценката на дистрибуционни семантични модели, обучени върху по-малки, специфични за домейна текстове, по-конкретно философски текст. По-конкретно, ние инспектираме поведението на моделите, използвайки предварително обучено пространство за обучение. Предлагаме мярка за съгласуваност, която може да се използва като измервателен показател, когато няма налични данни в областта на златния стандарт. Тази мярка просто изчислява способността на един модел да научи подобни вграждания от различни части на някои хомогенни данни. Показваме, че въпреки че е проста оценка, последователността всъщност зависи от различни комбинации от фактори, включително естеството на самите данни, модела, използван за обучение на семантичното пространство и честотата на научените термини, както във фоновото пространство, така и в областните данни, които представляват интерес.', 'hr': 'U ovom poslu obraćamo procjenu distribucijskih semantičkih modela obučenih na manjim, domeničkim tekstima, posebno filozofijskim tekstom. Posebno, provjeravamo ponašanje modela koristeći predobučeni pozadinski prostor u učenju. Predlažemo mjeru konsekvencije koja se može koristiti kao metrička procjena kada nema podataka o zlatnom standardu u domenu. Ova mjera jednostavno računa sposobnost model a naučiti slične uključenje iz različitih dijelova nekih homogenenih podataka. Pokazujemo da, uprkos jednostavnom procjenom, konsekvencija zapravo zavisi od različitih kombinacija faktora, uključujući prirodu samih podataka, model koji se koristi za obuku semantičkog prostora, i učestalost učenih termina, kako u pozadinskom prostoru, tako i u podacima o interesu u domenu.', 'da': 'I dette arbejde behandler vi evalueringen af distributionsmæssige semantiske modeller trænet på mindre domænespecifikke tekster, specifikt filosofisk tekst. Specielt inspicerer vi modellernes adfærd ved hjælp af et forududdannet baggrundsrum i læringen. Vi foreslår et mål for konsistens, som kan bruges som en evalueringsmetric, når der ikke er nogen guldstandard-data tilgængelige. Denne måling beregner simpelthen en models evne til at lære lignende indlejringer fra forskellige dele af nogle homogene data. Vi viser, at konsistensen på trods af en simpel evaluering afhænger faktisk af forskellige kombinationer af faktorer, herunder arten af selve dataene, den model, der anvendes til at træne det semantiske rum, og hyppigheden af de lærte termer, både i baggrundsrummet og i de in-domæne data af interesse.', 'nl': 'In dit werk behandelen we de evaluatie van distributionele semantische modellen getraind op kleinere, domeinspecifieke teksten, in het bijzonder filosofische tekst. Specifiek inspecteren we het gedrag van modellen met behulp van een vooraf getrainde achtergrondruimte in het leren. We stellen een maatstaf voor consistentie voor die kan worden gebruikt als een evaluatiemetric wanneer er geen in-domein gold-standaard gegevens beschikbaar zijn. Deze maatregel berekent simpelweg het vermogen van een model om soortgelijke insluitingen te leren van verschillende delen van sommige homogene gegevens. We laten zien dat consistentie, hoewel het een eenvoudige evaluatie is, feitelijk afhangt van verschillende combinaties van factoren, waaronder de aard van de gegevens zelf, het model dat wordt gebruikt om de semantische ruimte te trainen en de frequentie van de geleerde termen, zowel in de achtergrondruimte als in de interessante gegevens in het domein.', 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit beschäftigen wir uns mit der Evaluation von distributionalen semantischen Modellen, die auf kleineren, domänenspezifischen Texten trainiert werden, insbesondere philosophischen Texten. Konkret untersuchen wir das Verhalten von Modellen anhand eines vortrainierten Hintergrundraums im Lernen. Wir schlagen ein Maß für Konsistenz vor, das als Auswertungsmetrik verwendet werden kann, wenn keine in-domain Gold-Standard-Daten verfügbar sind. Dieses Maß berechnet einfach die Fähigkeit eines Modells, ähnliche Einbettungen aus verschiedenen Teilen einiger homogener Daten zu lernen. Wir zeigen, dass Konsistenz, obwohl es sich um eine einfache Bewertung handelt, tatsächlich von verschiedenen Kombinationen von Faktoren abhängt, einschließlich der Art der Daten selbst, dem Modell, das verwendet wird, um den semantischen Raum zu trainieren, und der Häufigkeit der erlernten Begriffe, sowohl im Hintergrundraum als auch in den interessierenden In-Domain-Daten.', 'ko': '이 작업에서 우리는 비교적 작은 분야에서 특정한 텍스트, 특히 철학 텍스트에서 훈련된 분포 의미 모델에 대한 평가를 논의했다.구체적으로 말하면 우리는 학습 과정에서 미리 훈련된 배경 공간을 이용하여 모델의 행위를 검사한다.우리는 역내 금 표준 데이터가 사용되지 않을 때 이를 평가 지표로 사용할 수 있는 일치성 도량을 제시했다.이 도량은 단지 계산 모델이 일부 동질 데이터의 다른 부분에서 유사한 삽입 능력을 배울 뿐이다.우리는 비록 간단한 평가이지만 일치성은 실제적으로 각종 요소의 조합에 달려 있다. 이는 데이터 자체의 성질, 의미 공간을 훈련하는 모델, 그리고 용어를 학습하는 빈도, 배경 공간이든 관심 있는 지역 내 데이터든에 달려 있다.', 'id': 'Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengatasi evaluasi model semantis distribusi yang dilatih pada teks yang lebih kecil, spesifik domain, spesifik, teks filosofik. Secara spesifik, kita memeriksa perilaku model menggunakan ruang latar belakang yang terlatih di belajar. Kami mengusulkan ukuran konsistensi yang dapat digunakan sebagai metrik evaluasi ketika tidak ada data standar emas dalam domain tersedia. Ukuran ini hanya menghitung kemampuan model untuk mempelajari embedding yang sama dari bagian yang berbeda dari beberapa data homogen. Kami menunjukkan bahwa meskipun menjadi evaluasi sederhana, konsistensi sebenarnya tergantung pada berbagai kombinasi faktor, termasuk alami data sendiri, model yang digunakan untuk melatih ruang semantis, dan frekuensi istilah belajar, baik dalam ruang latar belakang dan dalam data domain yang menarik.', 'sw': 'Katika kazi hii, tunazungumzia tathmini ya mifano ya usambazaji wa mitindo yenye mafunzo kidogo, ujumbe mahsusi wa ndani, hususani ujumbe wa filosofia. Kwa hakika, tunachunguza tabia za mifano kwa kutumia nafasi ya nyuma ya mafunzo ya zamani katika kujifunza. Tunazipendekeza hatua ya msimamo ambayo inaweza kutumika kama njia ya uchunguzi wakati hakuna taarifa za dhahabu za kawaida za ndani. Hatua hii inakadiria uwezo wa muundo wa kujifunza namna hiyo kutoka sehemu mbalimbali za data za mashoga. Tunaonyesha kwamba pamoja na kuwa tathmini rahisi, uhalisia unategemea mfululizo wa mambo mbalimbali, ikiwa ni pamoja na asili ya taarifa wenyewe, modeli iliyotumika kufundisha nafasi ya sekunde, na kiwango cha matumizi ya kujifunza, hata katika nafasi ya nyuma na katika takwimu za ndani ya maslahi.', 'fa': 'در این کار، ما با ارزیابی مدل\u200cهای semantic تقسیم\u200cکننده بر متن\u200cهای کوچکتر، دامنه\u200cهای خاص، مخصوصاً متن فلسفه\u200cای آموزش داده می\u200cشویم. به طور خاص، ما رفتار مدل را با استفاده از فضای پشتیبانی پیش آموزش در یادگیری بررسی می کنیم. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم اندازه\u200cای از هماهنگی که می\u200cتواند به عنوان متریک ارزیابی استفاده شود وقتی داده\u200cهای طلا استاندارد در دومین وجود ندارد. این اندازه به ساده توانایی یک مدل را محاسبه می\u200cکند که از بخش\u200cهای مختلف اطلاعات همجنسی یاد بگیرد. ما نشان می دهیم که با وجود ارزیابی ساده بودن، هماهنگی در واقع بستگی به ترکیب\u200cهای مختلف فاکتورها بستگی دارد، شامل طبیعت خود داده\u200cها، مدل استفاده برای آموزش فضای سیمانتیک، و فرکانس شرایط یاد گرفته\u200cاند، هر دو در فضای پشتیبانی و در اطلاعات دامنی علاقه.', 'tr': 'Bu işde, bölünme semantik modellerinin çözümlenmesini çözeriz, özellikle filosofi metin üzerinde eğitilmiş. Adatça, öwrenmek üçin öňünden öwrenmek üçin nusgalaryň davranışyny barlaýarys. Biz bir durmuşyň ölçüsini, domain altyn-standart maglumaty meňzeş bolmadykda ulanyp biljek metrik hökmünde teklip edip bilýäris. Bu ölçüde sadece homogeniýan verilerinin farklı bölgelerinden benzeri bir modelin edip biljek ukyplaryny hesaplar edir. Basit bir değerlendirme olmasına rağmen, süreklilik farklı faktörlerin birleşmesine bağlı olduğunu gösteriyoruz. Berüvlerin kendisi de, semantik alanı eğlemek için kullanılan modeller ve öğrenmiş terimlerin frekanslarına da, arkaplan alanında da ve domenin ilgili verilerine da bağlı.', 'af': "In hierdie werk adres ons die evaluering van verspreiding semantiese modele wat op kleiner, domein-spesifieke teks opgelei is, spesifieke, filosofiese teks. Spesifieke, ons inspekteer die gedrag van modele wat gebruik 'n vooraf onderwerp agtergrond spasie in leer. Ons voorstel 'n maat van konsistensie wat kan gebruik word as 'n evaluasie metriek wanneer geen in-domein goud-standaard data beskikbaar is nie. Hierdie maat maat eenvoudig bereken die moontlikheid van 'n model om soortgelyke inbettings te leer van verskillende dele van sommige homogeen data. Ons wys dat, alhoewel 'n eenvoudige evaluasie is, bestuurlikheid eintlik afhang van verskeie kombinasies van faktore, insluitend die natuur van die data self, die model gebruik word om die semantiese spasie te trein, en die frekwensie van die geleerde terme, beide in die agtergrond spasie en in die in-domein data van belang.", 'am': 'በዚህ ሥራ፣ ትንሽ፣ ዶሜን-specific ጽሑፎች፣ በተለየ የፊሊሶፊክ ጽሑፎች የተማረዱትን የsemantic ዓይነቶች ማስታወቂያውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተለየ ጊዜ የሞዴል ሥርዓት ለመማር ቀድሞ የተጠቃሚ የመደቡን ስፍራን በመጠቀም እንመርጣለን፡፡ We propose a measure of consistency which can be used as an evaluation metric when no in-domain gold-standard data is available.  ይህ ስፋት የሞዴል አካባቢዎችን ከሌሎቹ አካባቢ ዳራዎችን ለመማር የሚችሉትን ሥልጣን ብቻ ይቆጥራል፡፡ ቀላል ማስታወቂያ ቢሆንም፣ በተጨማሪው ነገር፣ የዳታ ራሱ ሥርዓት፣ የsemantic ስፍራን እና የመማር ግንኙነት፣ የመደቡን ስፍራና የውይይት የውይይት ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም በተለየ የውይይት ክፍተቶችን በመጠቀም ይታያል፡፡', 'az': 'Bu işdə, biz dağıtılış semantik modellərin çəkinməsini çəkirik ki, daha kiçik, domain-specific metinlərdə təhsil edilmişdir, özlərinə də filozofik metinlərdə təhsil edilmişdir. Biz modellərin davranışlarını öyrənmək üçün əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş arxa alanı istifadə edirik. Biz, domeində qızıl-standart verilən məlumatlar faydalanmadığı zaman istifadə edilə biləcək bir müəyyən müəyyən ölçüyə təklif edirik. Bu ölçü sadəcə bir modelin bəzi homogenel məlumatların bəzi bölümlərindən bənzər inbingləri öyrənmək üçün istifadə edir. Biz göstəririk ki, basit değerlendirmə olmasına rağmen, konsistenci, həm də arxa alanında, həm də domain verilənlərin təbiətində, semantik alanı təhsil etmək üçün istifadə edilən modeli, həm də öyrəndiyi şəkillərin frekvenci, həm arxa alanında, həm də səhifələrin dəyişikliklərində.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք քննարկում ենք տարածական սեմանտիկ մոդելների գնահատումը, որոնք պատրաստված են փոքր, բնագավառների հատուկ տեքստերի վրա, հատկապես փիլիսոփական տեքստի վրա: Մասնավորապես, մենք ստուգում ենք մոդելների վարքագիծը, օգտագործելով նախապատրաստված ետնային տարածք ուսումնասիրության մեջ: Մենք առաջարկում ենք համապատասխանատվության չափումը, որը կարող է օգտագործվել որպես գնահատման մետրիկ, երբ ոսկու ստանդարտ տվյալներ տիեզերքում չկան: Այս չափումը պարզապես հաշվարկում է մոդելի հնարավորությունը սովորել նմանատիպ ներդրումներ որոշ համագենետ տվյալների տարբեր մասերից: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ չնայած պարզ գնահատման, կարևորությունը իրականում կախված է գործոնների տարբեր համադրություններից, ներառյալ տվյալների բնույթը, մոդելը, որը օգտագործվում է սեմանտիկ տարածքի ուսումնասիրելու համար, և սովոր տերմինների հաճախականությունը, ինչպես ներքևի տարածքում, և հետաքրքիր բնագավառների', 'sq': 'Në këtë punë, ne trajtojmë vlerësimin e modeleve semantike shpërndarëse të trajnuar në tekste më të vogla, specifike për domenin, veçanërisht, tekst filozofik. Veçanërisht, ne inspektojmë sjelljen e modeleve duke përdorur një hapësirë të paratrajnuar të sfondit në mësim. Ne propozojmë një masë konsistence që mund të përdoret si një metrik vlerësimi kur nuk ka të dhëna në domeni të standartit të arit në dispozicion. Kjo masë thjesht llogarit aftësinë e një modeli për të mësuar përfshirje të ngjashme nga pjesë të ndryshme të disa të dhënash homogjene. Ne tregojmë se pavarësisht se është një vlerësim i thjeshtë, konsistenca në fakt varet nga kombinimet e ndryshme të faktorëve, duke përfshirë natyrën e të dhënave vetë, model in e përdorur për të trajnuar hapësirën semantike, dhe frekuencën e termave të mësuar, si në hapësirën e sfondit, ashtu edhe në të dhënat e brendshme të interesit.', 'bn': 'এই কাজে আমরা ছোট, ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট ট টেক্সটের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা সেমেন্টিক মডেলের মূল্যের মূল্যের কথা বলি। বিশেষ করে, শিক্ষা পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত পটভূমি স্থান ব্যবহার করে মডেলের আচরণ পরীক্ষা করি। আমরা প্রস্তাব করি যে পরিমাণ ব্যবহার করা যায়, যা মূল্যের মেট্রিক হিসেবে ব্যবহার করা যাবে যখন ডোমেইনে সোনার স্ট্যান্ডার ডাট এই পরিমাপ শুধুমাত্র একটি মডেলের ক্ষমতা গণনা করে সমকামীন কিছু তথ্যের বিভিন্ন অংশ থেকে একই ধরনের বিভিন্ন অংশ থেকে  We show that in spite of being a simple evaluation, consistency actually depends on various combinations of factors, including the nature of the data itself, the model used to train the semantic space, and the frequency of the learnt terms, both in the background space and in the in-domain data of interest.', 'bs': 'U ovom poslu se obraćamo procjenu distribucijskih semantičkih modela obučenih na manjim, domeničkim tekstima, posebno filozofijskim tekstom. Posebno, provjeravamo ponašanje modela koristeći predobučeni pozadinski prostor u učenju. Predlažemo mjeru konsekvencije koja se može koristiti kao metrička procjena kada nema podataka o zlatnom standardu u domenu. Ova mjera je jednostavno izračunala sposobnost model a da nauči slične integracije iz različitih dijelova nekih homogenenih podataka. Pokazujemo da, uprkos jednostavnom procjenom, konsekvencija zapravo zavisi od različitih kombinacija faktora, uključujući prirodu samih podataka, model koji se koristi za trening semantičkog prostora, i frekvenciju učenih termina, kako u pozadinskom prostoru, tako i u podacima o interesu u domenu.', 'ca': "En aquesta feina, abordem l'evaluació de models semàntics de distribució entrenats en textos més petits, específics per domini, específicament, text filosòfic. Concretament, inspeccionem el comportament dels models utilitzant un espai de fons pré-entrenat en l'aprenentatge. Proposem una mesura de consistencia que pot ser utilitzada com a métrica d'evaluació quan no hi ha dades d'or en domini. Aquesta mesura només calcula l'habilitat d'un model d'aprendre integracions similars de diferents parts d'algunes dades homogènes. We show that in spite of being a simple evaluation, consistency actually depends on various combinations of factors, including the nature of the data itself, the model used to train the semantic space, and the frequency of the learnt terms, both in the background space and in the in-domain data of interest.", 'cs': 'V této práci se zabýváme hodnocením distribučních sémantických modelů trénovaných na menších, doménově specifických textech, konkrétně filozofickém textu. Konkrétně kontrolujeme chování modelů pomocí předškoleného prostoru na pozadí při učení. Navrhujeme měřítko konzistence, které lze použít jako hodnotící metriku, pokud nejsou k dispozici žádná data ve zlatém standardu v doméně. Toto měřítko jednoduše vypočítá schopnost modelu naučit se podobné vložení z různých částí některých homogenních dat. Ukazujeme, že i když jde o jednoduché vyhodnocení, konzistence ve skutečnosti závisí na různých kombinacích faktorů, včetně povahy dat samotných, modelu použitého k trénování sémantického prostoru a frekvence učených termínů, a to jak v prostoru pozadí, tak v interdoménových datech zájmu.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös käsitleme väiksemate domeenispetsiifiliste tekstide, täpsemalt filosoofiliste tekstide, jaotussemantiliste mudelite hindamist. Konkreetselt kontrollime mudelite käitumist, kasutades eelnevalt koolitatud taustaruumi õppimisel. Pakume välja järjepidevuse mõõtmise, mida saab kasutada hindamismõõdikuna, kui valdkonnasisesed kuldstandardi andmed puuduvad. See mõõde arvutab lihtsalt mudeli võime õppida sarnaseid manustamisi mõnede homogeensete andmete erinevatest osadest. Näitame, et vaatamata lihtsale hindamisele sõltub järjepidevus tegelikult erinevatest tegurite kombinatsioonidest, sealhulgas andmete iseloomust, semantilise ruumi koolitamiseks kasutatavast mudelist ja õppitud terminite sagedusest nii taustaruumis kui ka huvipakkuvates valdkonnasisestes andmetes.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä tarkastellaan pienempiin, toimialueekohtaisiin teksteihin, erityisesti filosofisiin teksteihin, koulutettujen jakelusemanttisten mallien arviointia. Tarkastamme erityisesti mallien käyttäytymistä käyttäen ennalta koulutettua taustatilaa oppimisessa. Ehdotamme johdonmukaisuuden mittaria, jota voidaan käyttää arviointimittarina silloin, kun kullanmuotoista tietoa ei ole saatavilla. Tämä mittari yksinkertaisesti laskee mallin kyvyn oppia samanlaisia upotuksia joidenkin homogeenisten tietojen eri osista. Osoitamme, että vaikka se onkin yksinkertainen arviointi, johdonmukaisuus riippuu itse asiassa eri tekijöiden yhdistelmistä, kuten itse datan luonteesta, semanttisen tilan kouluttamiseen käytetystä mallista ja opittujen termien taajuudesta sekä taustaavaruudessa että kiinnostavassa aineistossa.', 'jv': 'In this job, we Address the measurement of Distribubutionsemanti modes TRANSLED on small, domain-special texts, Specically, Filesof text. Laptop" and "Desktop We proposal a measurement of coherence that can be used as an measurement meter when no in-domain gol-Standard data is available. Punika-punika ingkang dipunangé kapan ning model kanggo sampek kapan mulasai gambaran karo perusahaan sing sampeyan karo data omogène. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing sampeyan mrasai, ngêngêngêngêngêngêngêngêngêngêng, gayut nêmêngêngêngé sistem kayané karo perusahaan ngêngêngêngêng, séngêngêngêngêngêng, lan kêngêngêngêngêng, lan mêngêngêng.', 'ha': "Daga wannan aikin, Munã jãyayya evaluation of misãlai masu sakanti da aka sanar da su a kan littãfin ƙarami, masu hususann littãfin da ke cikin guda, kuma da haske, filosofical. Aka ƙayyade, muna bincike aikin motel ɗin da ke amfani da wani filin bangon na zaman yin shirin da aka sani. Munã goyya da gwargwadon daidaita wanda za'a yi amfani da shi kamar an ƙaddara metric idan ba za'a iya da data na daidaita na zĩnãriya a cikin guda ba. Wannan ƙaddara yana ƙidãya awon wani misali dõmin su iya sanar da shirin ayuka masu daidaita daga rabo-daban wasu masu da suka yi samo. Tuna nũna cewa, kõ da yaushe ya kasance mai amfani da sauƙi, yana dõgara ga komai-daban masu cikin matsayi, kamar irin mutane da ke amfani da shi, da misali wanda ya yi amfani da yin wa'anar filin na semantic, da fomat na karanta, duk cikin filin bango da kuma a cikin danne-danne na amfani.", 'sk': 'V tem delu obravnavamo vrednotenje distribucijskih semantičnih modelov, usposobljenih na manjših, domensko specifičnih besedilih, zlasti filozofskem besedilu. Natančneje pregledujemo vedenje modelov z uporabo vnaprej usposobljenega prostora za ozadje pri učenju. Predlagamo merilo doslednosti, ki se lahko uporabi kot merilo ocenjevanja, kadar ni na voljo podatkov zlatih standardov. Ta merilo preprosto izračuna sposobnost modela, da se nauči podobnih vdelav iz različnih delov nekaterih homogenih podatkov. Dokazujemo, da je doslednost kljub preprostemu ocenjevanju dejansko odvisna od različnih kombinacij dejavnikov, vključno z naravo samih podatkov, modelom, ki se uporablja za usposabljanje semantičnega prostora in pogostostjo učenih izrazov, tako v ozadju kot v interesnih podatkih.', 'he': 'בעבודה הזו, אנו מתייחסים לערכה של דוגמנים סמנטיים פיתוחים מאומנים על טקסטים קטנים, ספציפיים לתחום, במיוחד, טקסט פילוסופי. במיוחד, אנחנו בודקים את התנהגות של דוגמנים באמצעות מרחב רקע מאומן מראש ללמוד. אנו מציעים מידה של התקבלות שאפשר להשתמש בתור מטריקה הערכה כאשר אין נתונים סטנדרטי זהב בתחום זמינים. המידד הזה פשוט מחשב את היכולת של דוגמנית ללמוד תוכניות דומות מחלקים שונים של נתונים הומוגנים. We show that in spite of being a simple evaluation, consistency actually depends on various combinations of factors, including the nature of the data itself, the model used to train the semantic space, and the frequency of the learnt terms, both in the background space and in the in-domain data of interest.', 'bo': 'In this work, we address the evaluation of distributional semantic models trained on smaller, domain-specific texts, specifically, philosophical text. ང་ཚོས་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས་སྔོན་གྱིས་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་སྤྱོད་པའི་མིག་ཆས་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད། We propose a measure of consistency which can be used as an evaluation metric when no in-domain gold-standard data is available. This measure simply computes the ability of a model to learn similar embeddings from different parts of some homogeneous data. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་སྟབས་བདེ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རིམ་པ་ཅིག་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་དང་། ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་མ་འདྲ་བྱས་པར་ཨིན།'}
{'en': 'Learning Sentence Embeddings for Coherence Modelling and Beyond', 'ar': 'تضمين جملة التعلم لنمذجة التماسك وما بعدها', 'pt': 'Learning Embeddings de sentenças para modelagem de coerência e além', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de incrustaciones de oraciones para el modelado de coherencia y más allá', 'fr': 'Apprentissage des intégrations de phrases pour la modélisation de la cohérence et au-delà', 'ja': '一貫性のあるモデリングとその後のための学習文の埋め込み', 'hi': 'Coherence मॉडलिंग और परे के लिए सीखना वाक्य एम्बेडिंग', 'zh': '学句嵌以成一致性建模及其', 'ru': 'Изучение предложений для моделирования согласованности и за ее пределами', 'ga': 'Leabú Pianbhreithe a Fhoghlaim le haghaidh Samhaltú Comhleanúnachais agus Thall', 'el': 'Ενσωματώσεις φράσεων εκμάθησης για μοντελοποίηση συνοχής και πέρα από αυτό', 'hu': 'Tanulási mondatok beágyazása a koherencia modellezéséhez és azon túl', 'ka': 'შესწავლობა სიტყვების შეყვარება კოჰენერენციის მოდელილის და გარეშე', 'it': 'Incorporazione delle frasi di apprendimento per la modellazione della coerenza e oltre', 'kk': 'Координациялық үлгілеу және басқа', 'lt': 'Mokymosi nuosprendžių įtraukimas į sanglaudos modeliavimą ir už jo ribų', 'ms': 'Membelajar Penjelmaan Sentensi untuk Modelan Kesesuaian dan Beyond', 'mk': 'Learning Sentence Embeddings for Coherence Modelling and Beyond', 'ml': 'Learning Sentence Embeddings for Coherence Modelling and Beyond', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjonijiet tas-Sentenzi għat-Tagħlim għall-Mudellar ta’ Koerenza u lil hinn', 'mn': 'Сонголтын загвар болон дараа нь суралцах', 'no': 'Læring av innbygging av teikn for samsvarmodellering og utvid', 'pl': 'Uczenie się osadzeń zdań dla modelowania spójności i poza nimi', 'ro': 'Încorporarea sentințelor de învățare pentru modelarea coerenței și dincolo de aceasta', 'sr': 'Naučenje uvođenja kazne za model koherencije i dalje', 'so': 'Barista qalabka daryeelka', 'si': 'කොහෙරෙන්ස් මොඩේලින් සහ පැත්තට වාර්තාව ඉගෙනගන්න', 'sv': 'Inlärning av meningar för sammanhållningsmodellering och bortom', 'ta': 'குறிப்பு மாதிரி மற்றும் புறத்திற்கான வாக்குறிப்புகளை கற்றுக்கொள்கிறது', 'ur': 'سیکھ رہی ہے سنت انڈینگ', 'uz': 'Learning Sentence Embeddings for Coherence Modelling and Beyond', 'vi': 'Ý tưởng về trường hợp', 'bg': 'Учебни вграждания на изречения за моделиране на съгласуваност и отвъд него', 'nl': 'Inzetten van zinnen leren voor coherentie modellering en meer', 'hr': 'Naučenje uvođenja kazne za model koherencije i dalje', 'da': 'Indlejring af sætninger for sammenhængende modellering og videre', 'de': 'Lernen von Satz-Einbettungen für Kohärenzmodellierung und darüber hinaus', 'id': 'Belajar Penambahan Sentensi untuk Modeling Koerensi dan Beyond', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن داخل کلمه برای نمونه\u200cسازی هماهنگی و فراتر', 'ko': '문장을 삽입하여 일관성 모델링 및 기타 기능을 실현하다', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Makazi ya Hukumu kwa ajili ya Utoaji Mkuu na Mjini', 'tr': 'Coherens Modelling we Gaýd Edilmek üçin Sözler öwrenmek', 'af': 'Onderleer Sentence Inbêding vir Kohêrens Modelling en Buiter', 'sq': 'Mësimi i përfshirjes së dënimeve për modelimin e koherencës dhe përtej', 'hy': 'Learning Sentence Embeddings for Coherence Modelling and Beyond', 'am': 'CategoryName', 'bn': 'কোহেরেন্স মডেলিং এবং পিছনের জন্য শিক্ষা শিখা যাচ্ছে', 'az': 'Koh칠renci modell톛ri v톛 bundan sonra S칬z칲 캻칞eri 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'ca': 'Aprendre integracions de sentences per modelar la coerència i més enllà', 'cs': 'Učení se vět vložení pro modelování koherence a dále', 'et': 'Õppimislause manustamine sidususe modelleerimiseks ja sellest kaugemale', 'bs': 'Naučenje integracije kazne za model koherencije i dalje', 'fi': 'Oppimislauseiden sulautukset johdonmukaisuuden mallintamiseen ja sen ulkopuolelle', 'jv': 'Ngerti Kemerdekaan Sentensi kanggo Kemerdekaan model lan Kemerdekaan', 'he': 'למדת משפטים למדליגת תואם ומעבר', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Vgradnje učnih stavkov za modeliranje skladnosti in več', 'bo': 'མཐུན་སྒྲིག་རྣམ་གྲངས་དང་ཕྱོགས་སུ་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་བརྗོད་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་སློབ་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'We present a novel and effective technique for performing text coherence tasks while facilitating deeper insights into the data. Despite obtaining ever-increasing task performance, modern deep-learning approaches to NLP tasks often only provide users with the final network decision and no additional understanding of the data. In this work, we show that a new type of sentence embedding learned through self-supervision can be applied effectively to text coherence tasks while serving as a window through which deeper understanding of the data can be obtained. To produce these sentence embeddings, we train a recurrent neural network to take individual sentences and predict their location in a document in the form of a distribution over locations. We demonstrate that these embeddings, combined with simple visual heuristics, can be used to achieve performance competitive with state-of-the-art on multiple text coherence tasks, outperforming more complex and specialized approaches. Additionally, we demonstrate that these embeddings can provide insights useful to writers for improving writing quality and informing document structuring, and assisting readers in summarizing and locating information.', 'ar': 'نقدم تقنية جديدة وفعالة لأداء مهام اتساق النص مع تسهيل رؤى أعمق في البيانات. على الرغم من الحصول على أداء مهام متزايد باستمرار ، إلا أن مناهج التعلم العميق الحديثة لمهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية غالبًا ما توفر للمستخدمين القرار النهائي للشبكة ولا يوجد فهم إضافي للبيانات. في هذا العمل ، نوضح أن نوعًا جديدًا من تضمين الجملة تم تعلمه من خلال الإشراف الذاتي يمكن تطبيقه بفعالية على مهام ترابط النص أثناء العمل كنافذة يمكن من خلالها الحصول على فهم أعمق للبيانات. لإنتاج هذه الزخارف الجملية ، نقوم بتدريب شبكة عصبية متكررة على أخذ جمل فردية والتنبؤ بموقعها في مستند في شكل توزيع على المواقع. نثبت أن هذه الزخارف ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع الاستدلال البصري البسيط ، يمكن استخدامها لتحقيق أداء تنافسي مع أحدث ما توصل إليه العلم في مهام تماسك النص المتعددة ، وتتفوق على الأساليب الأكثر تعقيدًا وتخصصًا. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نوضح أن حفلات الزفاف هذه يمكن أن توفر رؤى مفيدة للكتاب لتحسين جودة الكتابة وإبلاغ هيكلة المستندات ، ومساعدة القراء في تلخيص المعلومات وتحديد مكانها.', 'es': 'Presentamos una técnica novedosa y eficaz para realizar tareas de coherencia de texto al tiempo que facilitamos una visión más profunda de los datos. A pesar de obtener un rendimiento de las tareas cada vez mayor, los enfoques modernos de aprendizaje profundo para las tareas de PNL a menudo solo proporcionan a los usuarios la decisión final de la red y no tienen una comprensión adicional de los datos. En este trabajo, mostramos que un nuevo tipo de incrustación de oraciones aprendida a través de la autosupervisión se puede aplicar de manera efectiva a las tareas de coherencia del texto, al tiempo que sirve como una ventana a través de la cual se puede obtener una comprensión más profunda de los datos. Para producir estas incrustaciones de oraciones, entrenamos una red neuronal recurrente para que tome oraciones individuales y prediga su ubicación en un documento en forma de distribución entre ubicaciones. Demostramos que estas incrustaciones, combinadas con una heurística visual simple, se pueden utilizar para lograr un rendimiento competitivo con el estado de la técnica en tareas de coherencia de texto múltiple, superando a los enfoques más complejos y especializados. Además, demostramos que estas incorporaciones pueden proporcionar información útil a los escritores para mejorar la calidad de la escritura e informar la estructuración de los documentos, y ayudar a los lectores a resumir y localizar la información.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une technique novatrice et efficace pour effectuer des tâches de cohérence de texte tout en permettant de mieux comprendre les données. Malgré l'augmentation constante des performances des tâches, les approches modernes d'apprentissage profond des tâches NLP ne fournissent souvent aux utilisateurs que la décision finale sur le réseau et aucune compréhension supplémentaire des données. Dans ce travail, nous montrons qu'un nouveau type d'intégration de phrases appris grâce à l'auto-supervision peut être appliqué efficacement aux tâches de cohérence de texte tout en servant de fenêtre à travers laquelle une compréhension plus approfondie des données peut être obtenue. Pour produire ces intégrations de phrases, nous entraînons un réseau neuronal récurrent à prendre des phrases individuelles et à prédire leur emplacement dans un document sous la forme d'une distribution sur des emplacements. Nous démontrons que ces intégrations, combinées à de simples heuristiques visuelles, peuvent être utilisées pour atteindre des performances compétitives avec les dernières technologies sur de multiples tâches de cohérence de texte, surpassant les approches plus complexes et spécialisées. En outre, nous démontrons que ces intégrations peuvent fournir des informations utiles aux rédacteurs pour améliorer la qualité de la rédaction et éclairer la structuration des documents, et aider les lecteurs à résumer et à localiser les informations.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma técnica nova e eficaz para realizar tarefas de coerência de texto, ao mesmo tempo em que facilitamos insights mais profundos sobre os dados. Apesar de obter um desempenho de tarefa cada vez maior, as abordagens modernas de aprendizado profundo para tarefas de PNL geralmente fornecem aos usuários apenas a decisão final da rede e nenhuma compreensão adicional dos dados. Neste trabalho, mostramos que um novo tipo de incorporação de sentenças aprendidas por meio de autossupervisão pode ser aplicado efetivamente em tarefas de coerência de texto, servindo como uma janela através da qual se pode obter uma compreensão mais profunda dos dados. Para produzir esses embeddings de sentenças, treinamos uma rede neural recorrente para pegar sentenças individuais e prever sua localização em um documento na forma de uma distribuição sobre locais. Demonstramos que esses embeddings, combinados com heurísticas visuais simples, podem ser usados para obter desempenho competitivo com o estado da arte em várias tarefas de coerência de texto, superando abordagens mais complexas e especializadas. Além disso, demonstramos que essas incorporações podem fornecer insights úteis aos escritores para melhorar a qualidade da escrita e informar a estruturação do documento, além de ajudar os leitores a resumir e localizar informações.', 'ja': 'データのより深い洞察を促進しながら、テキストの一貫性のあるタスクを実行するための新しく効果的なテクニックを提示します。 ますます増加するタスクパフォーマンスを取得しているにもかかわらず、NLPタスクに対する現代的な深層学習アプローチは、多くの場合、ユーザーに最終的なネットワークの決定を提供し、データの追加の理解を提供しません。 この研究では、自己監視を通じて学んだ新しいタイプの文章の埋め込みを、データのより深い理解を得る窓としての役割を果たしながら、テキストの一貫性のあるタスクに効果的に適用できることを示している。 これらの文の埋め込みを作成するために、私たちは再帰的なニューラルネットワークを訓練して、個々の文を取り出し、それらの文の場所をドキュメント内の場所に分散する形で予測します。 これらの埋め込みは、単純な視覚的ヒューリスティックと組み合わせることで、複数のテキストコヒーレンスタスクで最先端のパフォーマンスと競合し、より複雑で専門的なアプローチを上回るパフォーマンスを達成できることを実証しています。 さらに、これらの埋め込みは、書き込みの品質を向上させ、文書の構造化に情報を提供し、読者が情報を要約して見つけるのを支援するのに役立つ洞察を提供することができることを実証します。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем новую и эффективную технику для выполнения задач согласования текста, одновременно способствуя более глубокому пониманию данных. Несмотря на получение постоянно растущей производительности задач, современные подходы к решению задач NLP с глубоким обучением часто предоставляют пользователям только окончательное сетевое решение и не дают дополнительного понимания данных. В этой работе мы показываем, что новый тип встраивания предложения, усвоенный посредством самоконтроля, может быть эффективно применен к задачам согласованности текста, одновременно выступая в качестве окна, через которое можно получить более глубокое понимание данных. Чтобы создать эти вложения предложений, мы обучаем рекуррентную нейронную сеть брать отдельные предложения и предсказывать их расположение в документе в виде распределения по местоположениям. Мы демонстрируем, что эти вложения в сочетании с простой визуальной эвристикой могут быть использованы для достижения производительности, конкурентоспособной с современными задачами согласованности нескольких текстов, превосходя более сложные и специализированные подходы. Кроме того, мы демонстрируем, что эти вложения могут предоставить идеи, полезные для авторов для улучшения качества написания и информирования структурирования документов, а также помочь читателям в обобщении и поиске информации.', 'zh': '立一新术,施于文一致性,而趣数之深察。 虽得其任,而NLP今之世,深学之法,常为用户终网络决策,不能知数。 于此之事,开自督学新型句嵌可效于文一致性,兼为一窗,可以得数。 为生此句,练一递归神经网络以取单句,而以布列占之文档中。 吾证此等嵌开发式合视,可施于数本一致性任与最先进之性竞,优于杂业之术。 此外证其有用之见,以崇文档结信,助读者总结定位信息。', 'hi': 'हम डेटा में गहरी अंतर्दृष्टि की सुविधा प्रदान करते हुए पाठ सुसंगतता कार्यों को करने के लिए एक उपन्यास और प्रभावी तकनीक प्रस्तुत करते हैं। लगातार बढ़ते कार्य प्रदर्शन को प्राप्त करने के बावजूद, एनएलपी कार्यों के लिए आधुनिक गहरी सीखने के दृष्टिकोण अक्सर उपयोगकर्ताओं को केवल अंतिम नेटवर्क निर्णय और डेटा की कोई अतिरिक्त समझ प्रदान करते हैं। इस काम में, हम दिखाते हैं कि आत्म-पर्यवेक्षण के माध्यम से सीखे गए एक नए प्रकार के वाक्य एम्बेडिंग को एक खिड़की के रूप में सेवा करते हुए पाठ सुसंगतता कार्यों पर प्रभावी ढंग से लागू किया जा सकता है, जिसके माध्यम से डेटा की गहरी समझ प्राप्त की जा सकती है। इन वाक्य एम्बेडिंग का उत्पादन करने के लिए, हम व्यक्तिगत वाक्यों को लेने के लिए एक आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं और स्थानों पर वितरण के रूप में एक दस्तावेज़ में उनके स्थान की भविष्यवाणी करते हैं। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि इन एम्बेडिंग, सरल दृश्य ह्यूरिस्टिक्स के साथ संयुक्त, का उपयोग कई पाठ सुसंगतता कार्यों पर अत्याधुनिक के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करने के लिए किया जा सकता है, जो अधिक जटिल और विशेष दृष्टिकोणों को बेहतर बनाते हैं। इसके अतिरिक्त, हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि ये एम्बेडिंग लेखन की गुणवत्ता में सुधार करने और दस्तावेज़ संरचना को सूचित करने के लिए लेखकों को उपयोगी अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान कर सकते हैं, और जानकारी को सारांशित करने और पता लगाने में पाठकों की सहायता कर सकते हैं।', 'ga': "Cuirimid teicníocht úrnua agus éifeachtach i láthair chun tascanna comhleanúnachais téacs a dhéanamh agus léargais níos doimhne ar na sonraí a éascú. In ainneoin go bhfuil feidhmíocht tasc ag méadú i gcónaí, is minic nach dtugann cuir chuige domhainfhoghlama nua-aimseartha i leith tascanna NLP ach an cinneadh líonra deiridh d'úsáideoirí agus ní thugann aon tuiscint bhreise ar na sonraí. Sa saothar seo, léirímid gur féidir cineál nua leabú abairtí a foghlaimíodh trí fhéinmhaoirseacht a chur i bhfeidhm go héifeachtach ar thascanna comhleanúnachais téacs agus é ag feidhmiú mar fhuinneog trínar féidir tuiscint níos doimhne a fháil ar na sonraí. Chun na leabú abairtí seo a tháirgeadh, déanaimid oiliúint ar líonra néarach athfhillteach chun abairtí aonair a ghlacadh agus a suíomh a thuar i ndoiciméad i bhfoirm dáileadh thar láithreacha. Léirímid gur féidir na leabaithe seo, in éineacht le heuristicí amhairc simplí, a úsáid chun feidhmíocht a bhaint amach atá iomaíoch leis an úrscothacht ar thascanna iolracha comhleanúnachais téacs, a sháraíonn cur chuige níos casta agus níos speisialaithe. Ina theannta sin, léirímid gur féidir leis na leabaithe seo léargais úsáideacha a sholáthar do scríbhneoirí chun cáilíocht na scríbhneoireachta a fheabhsú agus chun eolas a chur ar struchtúrú doiciméad, agus chun cabhrú le léitheoirí achoimre agus faisnéis a aimsiú.", 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα και αποτελεσματική τεχνική για την εκτέλεση εργασιών συνοχής κειμένου ενώ παράλληλα διευκολύνουμε βαθύτερες γνώσεις στα δεδομένα. Παρά την απόκτηση συνεχώς αυξανόμενης απόδοσης εργασιών, οι σύγχρονες προσεγγίσεις βαθιάς μάθησης στις εργασίες συχνά παρέχουν στους χρήστες μόνο την τελική απόφαση δικτύου και καμία πρόσθετη κατανόηση των δεδομένων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, καταδεικνύουμε ότι ένας νέος τύπος πρότασης που ενσωματώνεται μέσα από την αυτοεπίβλεψη μπορεί να εφαρμοστεί αποτελεσματικά σε εργασίες συνοχής κειμένου, ενώ παράλληλα λειτουργεί ως παράθυρο μέσω του οποίου μπορεί να επιτευχθεί βαθύτερη κατανόηση των δεδομένων. Για να παραγάγουμε αυτές τις ενσωματώσεις προτάσεων, εκπαιδεύουμε ένα επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρωνικό δίκτυο να λαμβάνει μεμονωμένες προτάσεις και να προβλέψει τη θέση τους σε ένα έγγραφο με τη μορφή κατανομής σε τοποθεσίες. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι αυτές οι ενσωματώσεις, σε συνδυασμό με απλές οπτικές heuristics, μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για να επιτύχουν απόδοση ανταγωνιστική με την τελευταία λέξη της τεχνολογίας σε πολλαπλές εργασίες συνοχής κειμένου, ξεπερνώντας πιο πολύπλοκες και εξειδικευμένες προσεγγίσεις. Επιπλέον, καταδεικνύουμε ότι αυτές οι ενσωματώσεις μπορούν να παρέχουν πληροφορίες χρήσιμες στους συγγραφείς για τη βελτίωση της ποιότητας γραφής και την ενημέρωση της δομής εγγράφων, καθώς και για τη βοήθεια των αναγνωστών στη σύνοψη και τον εντοπισμό πληροφοριών.', 'hu': 'Új és hatékony technikát mutatunk be a szövegkoherencia feladatok elvégzésére, miközben megkönnyítjük az adatok mélyebb betekintését. A folyamatosan növekvő feladatteljesítmény elérése ellenére az NLP-feladatok korszerű mélytanulási megközelítése gyakran csak a végső hálózati döntést biztosítja a felhasználók számára, és nincs további megértése az adatokról. Ebben a munkában megmutatjuk, hogy az önfelügyeleten keresztül tanult mondatbeágyazás új típusa hatékonyan alkalmazható a szövegkoherencia feladatokra, miközben ablakként szolgál az adatok mélyebb megértésére. Ezeknek a mondatbeágyazásoknak a létrehozásához egy visszatérő neurális hálózatot képezünk arra, hogy egyes mondatokat vegyen fel, és előrejelzze a helyüket egy dokumentumban, helyszínek közötti eloszlás formájában. Bemutatjuk, hogy ezek a beágyazások az egyszerű vizuális heurisztikával kombinálva versenyképes teljesítményt érhetnek el a legkorszerűbb szövegkoherenciával kapcsolatos feladatok során, összetettebb és speciálisabb megközelítéseket teljesítve. Ezenkívül bemutatjuk, hogy ezek a beágyazások hasznos betekintést nyújthatnak az írók számára az írási minőség javításához és a dokumentumok strukturálásának tájékoztatásához, valamint az olvasók segítségével az információk összefoglalásában és megtalálásában.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ პრომენტი და ეფექტიური ტექნექცია ტექსტის კონექციენტის დავალებისთვის, როდესაც უფრო დიდი მონაცემები მონაცემებში დავიყენებთ მივიღეთ უფრო მეტად მეტად მეტად მეტად მეტად მეტად მეტად მეტად მეტად მეტად მეტად მეტად მეტად მეტად მხოლოდ მომხმარებელი მხოლოდ ქსელის გადაწყვეტილების ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ახალი ტიპი სიტყვის, რომელიც სამუშაოდ მონაცემის გამოყენებით, შეიძლება ეფექტიურად ტექსტის კონექციებისთვის დააყენება, რომელიც მო ამ სიტყვების შემდეგ ჩვენ განვიწყებთ განსხვავებული ნეიროლური ქსელი, რომელიც განსხვავებული სიტყვები გავწყებთ და დავიწყებთ დოკუმენტის ადგილის ადგილის პროგრამის განსხვ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ეს კონფიგურაციები, რომლებიც უკეთესი ვიზუალური ჰესურისტიკით, შეიძლება გამოყენება კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციისთვის, რომლებიც უფრო კონფიგურაციული და სპეციალურად გა დამატებით, ჩვენ ევმონსტრაცით, რომ ეს კომპერაციები შეგვიძლია აღმოჩენოთ წერილებისთვის გამოსახულებელი ინფორმაციების გაუფლებისთვის და დოკუმენტის სტრუქტურაციის ინფორმაციის შესაძლებ', 'it': "Presentiamo una tecnica innovativa ed efficace per eseguire attività di coerenza del testo facilitando al contempo approfondimenti sui dati. Nonostante le prestazioni delle attività siano sempre più elevate, i moderni approcci di deep learning alle attività NLP spesso forniscono agli utenti solo la decisione finale della rete e nessuna comprensione aggiuntiva dei dati. In questo lavoro, mostriamo che un nuovo tipo di embedding di frasi appreso attraverso l'auto-supervisione può essere applicato efficacemente alle attività di coerenza del testo, servendo come una finestra attraverso la quale è possibile ottenere una comprensione più profonda dei dati. Per produrre queste incorporazioni di frasi, addestriamo una rete neurale ricorrente per prendere singole frasi e prevedere la loro posizione in un documento sotto forma di distribuzione su posizioni. Dimostriamo che questi embedding, combinati con una semplice euristica visiva, possono essere utilizzati per ottenere prestazioni competitive con lo stato dell'arte su più compiti di coerenza del testo, superando approcci più complessi e specializzati. Inoltre, dimostriamo che queste incorporazioni possono fornire approfondimenti utili agli scrittori per migliorare la qualità di scrittura e informare la strutturazione dei documenti e aiutare i lettori a sintetizzare e localizzare le informazioni.", 'kk': 'Біз мәтіннің соғыстық тапсырмаларын жасау үшін романдық және эффективні техникалық тапсырмаларды көмектесеміз. Тапсырмалар көтеріліп жатқан әртүрлі, NLP тапсырмаларына көбінесе, пайдаланушылардың соңғы желінің шешімі мен деректерді қосымша түсінбейді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, өз қарау арқылы үйренілген жаңа түрін, мәтіндік сәйкестік тапсырмаларды терезе ретінде жұмыс істеу үшін, мәтіндік түсініктерді түсініп алуға болады. Бұл сөздерді ендіру үшін біз қайталанатын неврал желіне бөлек сөздерді алу және құжаттың орналасуын орналасу үшін құжаттың орналасуын көрсету үшін оқыдық. Біз кәдімгі визуалдық геуристикамен біріктірілген ендірулерді бірнеше мәтін согластық тапсырмалардың күй- жайындағы жұмыс істеу үшін қолданылады. Сонымен қатар, бұл енгізулер жазудың сапасы және құжаттың құрылымын жақсарту және мәліметті таңдау және оқушыларға көмек беру үшін жазушыларға пайдалы түсініктерді көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'We present a novel and effective technique for performing text coherence tasks while facilitating deeper insights into the data.  Nepaisant vis didėjančių užduočių rezultatų, šiuolaikiniai gilaus mokymosi metodai NLP užduotims dažnai suteikia vartotojams galutinį sprendimą dėl tinklo ir papildomo duomenų supratimo. Šiame darbe parodomi, kad naujo pobūdžio sakinys, įgytas vykdant savarankišką priežiūrą, gali būti veiksmingai taikomas tekstų nuoseklumo užduotims, tuo pačiu metu naudojamas kaip langas, per kurį galima geriau suprasti duomenis. Siekdami sukurti šiuos sakinius, mes treniruojame pasikartojantį nervinį tinklą, kad paimtume atskirus sakinius ir nuspėtume jų vietą dokumente paskirstymo vietose form a. Mes įrodome, kad šie įrankiai, kartu su paprasta vizualine heuristika, gali būti naudojami siekiant veiksmingumo, konkurencingo su pažangiausiomis tekstų nuoseklumo užduotimis, viršijant sudėtingesnius ir specializuotus metodus. Be to, mes įrodome, kad šie įrašai gali suteikti rašytojams naudingą informaciją rašymo kokybei gerinti ir dokumentų struktūrizavimui informuoti bei skaitytojams padėti apibendrinti ir surasti informaciją.', 'mk': 'Презентираме нова и ефикасна техника за спроведување на задачите на конеквентност на текстот, истовремено олеснувајќи ги подлабоките информации за податоците. И покрај тоа што се постојано се зголемува извршувањето на задачите, модерните пристапи на длабоко учење кон задачите на НЛП честопати им обезбедуваат само на корисниците конечна мрежна одлука и нема дополнително разбирање на податоците Во оваа работа, покажуваме дека новиот вид на реченица која се вклучува научена преку самонадгледување може ефикасно да се примени на задачите на текстовата кохеренција и да служи како прозорец преку кој може да се добие подлабоко разбирање на податоците. За да ги произведеме овие реченици, тренираме рецидентна нервна мрежа за да земеме индивидуални реченици и да ја предвидеме нивната локација во документ во форма на дистрибуција преку локации. Демонстрираме дека овие вложувања, комбинирани со едноставна визуелна хеористика, можат да се користат за да се постигнат перформансите конкурентни со најсовремените задачи за повеќекратна текстова кохеренција, надминувајќи повеќе комплексни и специјализирани пристапи. Покрај тоа, ние демонстрираме дека овие вградувања можат да обезбедат информации корисни за писателите за подобрување на квалитетот на пишувањето и информирање на структурирањето на документите, како и помош на читателите во сумирањето и локацијата на информациите.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan teknik baru dan berkesan untuk melakukan tugas kesesuaian teks sambil memudahkan pemahaman lebih dalam ke dalam data. Walaupun mendapat prestasi tugas yang semakin meningkat, pendekatan belajar dalam moden untuk tugas NLP sering hanya menyediakan pengguna keputusan rangkaian akhir dan tiada pemahaman tambahan data. Dalam kerja ini, kami menunjukkan bahawa jenis perkataan baru yang diperlukan melalui pengawasan diri boleh dilaksanakan secara efektif untuk tugas kesesuaian teks semasa melayani sebagai tetingkap melalui mana pemahaman lebih dalam data boleh dicapai. Untuk menghasilkan kandungan kalimat ini, kita melatih rangkaian saraf berulang untuk mengambil kalimat individu dan meramalkan lokasi mereka dalam dokumen dalam bentuk distribusi di atas lokasi. Kami menunjukkan bahawa penerbangan ini, bergabung dengan heuristik visual sederhana, boleh digunakan untuk mencapai prestasi kompetitif dengan state-of-the-art pada tugas koerensi teks berbilang, melampaui prestasi pendekatan yang lebih kompleks dan khusus. Additionally, we demonstrate that these embeddings can provide insights useful to writers for improving writing quality and informing document structuring, and assisting readers in summarizing and locating information.', 'ml': 'വിവരങ്ങളിലേക്ക് ആഴത്തിലുള്ള കാഴ്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവലിനും  എപ്പോഴും വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ജോലി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് ശേഷം, ആധുനിക ആഴത്തിക ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ആഴത്തിലെ ആഴത്തില്\u200d  ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, സ്വയം നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിലൂടെ പഠിച്ച ഒരു പുതിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയോടെ പഠിക്കുന്നു.  ഈ വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്തേക്ക് വരുത്തുവാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന നെയൂറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലം പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, വ്യക്തിപരമായ വാക്കു നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെന്ന് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു, ഈ പ്രവേശങ്ങള്\u200d ലളിതമായ കാഴ്ചകളോടൊപ്പം കൂടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു, ഒരുപാട് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് കൂട്ടു കൂടുതലായി, ഈ അകത്തേക്കുള്ള അടയാളങ്ങള്\u200d എഴുതുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രയോജനപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. എഴുതുന്നതിന്റെ ഗുണവും', 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw teknika ġdida u effettiva għat-twettiq ta' kompiti ta' koerenza fit-testi filwaqt li niffaċilitaw għarfien aktar profond fid-dejta. Minkejja li jinkisbu prestazzjonijiet dejjem jiżdiedu tal-kompiti, approċċi moderni ta’ tagħlim profond għall-kompiti NLP spiss jipprovdu biss lill-utenti bid-deċiżjoni finali tan-netwerk u l-ebda fehim addizzjonali tad-dejta. In this work, we show that a new type of sentence embedding learned through self-supervision can be applied effectively to text coherence tasks while serving as a window through which deeper understanding of the data can be obtained.  Biex nipproduċu dawn l-inkorporazzjonijiet tas-sentenzi, a ħna nħarrġu netwerk newrali rikorrenti biex nieħdu sentenzi individwali u jipprevedu l-post tagħhom f’dokument fil-form a ta’ distribuzzjoni fuq il-postijiet. Aħna nippruvaw li dawn l-inkorporazzjonijiet, flimkien ma’ ħewristiċi viżivi sempliċi, jistgħu jintużaw biex jinkisbu prestazzjonijiet kompetittivi mal-aqwa prestazzjoni fuq kompiti ta’ koerenza tat-testi multipli, li jwettqu approċċi aktar kumplessi u speċjalizzati. Barra minn hekk, nagħmlu xhieda li dawn l-inkorporazzjonijiet jistgħu jipprovdu għarfien utli għall-kittieba għat-titjib tal-kwalità tal-kitba u l-informazzjoni dwar l-istrutturar tad-dokumenti, u l-għajnuna lill-qarrejja fil-ġbir fil-qosor u l-lokalizzazzjoni tal-informazzjoni.", 'mn': 'Бид өгөгдлийн тухай илүү гүнзгий ойлголтыг нэмэгдүүлэхэд текст хамтын ажиллагааг хийх шинэ, эффективны техник өгдөг. Орчин үеийн гүн гүнзгий суралцах үйл ажиллагааны үр дүнд нэмэгдсэн ч, NLP үйл ажиллагаанд ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгчдэд эцсийн сүлжээний шийдвэр гаргаж, өгөгдлийн нэмэлт ойлголт гаргахгүй. Энэ ажил дээр бид өөрийгөө удирдлагаар суралцсан шинэ хэлбэрүүдийг цонхны хувьд ашиглаж, өгөгдлийг илүү гүнзгий ойлголт авч болно гэдгийг харуулж байна. Эдгээр өгүүлбэрийг бий болгохын тулд бид өөрсдийн өгүүлбэрийг авч, баримт дээр хуваарилцааны хэлбэрээр бий болгох мэдрэлийн сүлжээг дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахи Бид энгийн харааны хюристикийн холбогдолтой эдгээр бүтээлүүдийг олон текст хамтын ажил дээр дасгал хөдөлгөөнтэй өрсөлдөөнд ашиглаж болно. Үүнээс гадна бид бүтээгдэхүүнд бичиж чадварыг сайжруулахад, баримт бүтээгдэхүүнд мэдээлэл өгүүлэхэд, уншигчдад мэдээллийг цуглуулахад, олж мэдэхэд хэрэгтэй ойлголт өгч чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein roman og effektiv teknikk for å utføra tekstkoherens oppgåver medan det gjer dei dypere innsyningane i data. Til tross å få aukande oppgåver, er moderne dypt læring nærmere NLP-oppgåver ofte bare tilbyr brukarar det siste nettverksbeslutninga og ingen ekstra forståelse av data. I dette arbeidet viser vi at ein ny type setningar som innebygger seg gjennom sjølvovervaking kan brukast effektivt til tekstsamordningar medan du tjener som eit vindauge gjennom dei dypere forståande av dataene kan få. For å produsera disse setningane, treng vi ein rekurserande neuralnettverk for å ta individuelle setningar og forventa plasseringa sine i eit dokument som form av distribusjon over stader. Vi demonstrerer at desse innbyggingane, kombinerte med enkle visuelle heuristikk, kan brukast til å oppnå utføringsfunksjonsfunksjonsfunksjonen med tilstanden av kunsten på fleire tekstsamansettingsoppgåver, som utfører meir komplekse og spesialiserte tilnærmingar. I tillegg demonstrerer vi at desse innbyggingane kan gje innsyningar som er nyttig for brennar for å forbetra skrivekvalitet og informera dokumentstrukturering, og hjelpa lesarar for å samansera og finna informasjon.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy nowatorską i skuteczną technikę wykonywania zadań spójności tekstu, ułatwiając jednocześnie głębszy wgląd w dane. Pomimo coraz większej wydajności zadań, nowoczesne podejścia głębokiego uczenia się do zadań NLP często zapewniają użytkownikom jedynie ostateczną decyzję sieciową i brak dodatkowego zrozumienia danych. W niniejszej pracy pokazujemy, że nowy rodzaj osadzenia zdań nauczonych poprzez samoobserwację można skutecznie zastosować do zadań spójności tekstu, służąc jednocześnie jako okno, dzięki któremu można uzyskać głębsze zrozumienie danych. Aby stworzyć te osadzenia zdań, szkolimy powtarzającą się sieć neuronową do przyjmowania poszczególnych zdań i przewidywania ich lokalizacji w dokumencie w postaci rozkładu na lokalizacje. Pokazujemy, że osadzenia te, w połączeniu z prostą heurystyką wizualną, mogą być wykorzystane do osiągnięcia wydajności konkurencyjnej z najnowocześniejszymi zadaniami w zakresie spójności tekstu, przewyższając bardziej złożone i specjalistyczne podejścia. Dodatkowo pokazujemy, że osadzenia te mogą dostarczyć informacji przydatnych dla pisarzy w celu poprawy jakości pisania i informowania o strukturyzowaniu dokumentów oraz pomocy czytelnikom w podsumowaniu i lokalizacji informacji.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm o tehnică nouă și eficientă pentru efectuarea sarcinilor de coerență a textului, facilitând în același timp o perspectivă mai profundă a datelor. În ciuda obținerii performanțelor tot mai mari ale sarcinilor, abordările moderne de învățare profundă a sarcinilor PNL oferă adesea utilizatorilor doar decizia finală de rețea și nicio înțelegere suplimentară a datelor. În această lucrare, arătăm că un nou tip de încorporare a propozițiilor învățate prin auto-supraveghere poate fi aplicat eficient sarcinilor de coerență a textului, servind în același timp ca o fereastră prin care se poate obține o înțelegere mai profundă a datelor. Pentru a produce aceste încorporări de propoziții, instruim o rețea neurală recurentă pentru a lua propoziții individuale și a prezice locația lor într-un document sub forma unei distribuții peste locații. Demonstrăm că aceste încorporări, combinate cu euristica vizuală simplă, pot fi utilizate pentru a obține performanțe competitive cu state-of-the-art în mai multe sarcini de coerență a textului, depășind abordările mai complexe și specializate. În plus, demonstrăm că aceste încorporări pot oferi perspective utile scriitorilor pentru îmbunătățirea calității scrierii și informarea structurării documentelor și pentru a asista cititorii în rezumarea și localizarea informațiilor.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo novu i efikasnu tehniku za izvršavanje tekstskih zadataka u sklonosti dok olakšavamo dublje uvide u podatke. Uprkos dobivanju većih većih zadataka, moderni duboko učenje pristupi zadacima NLP često pružaju samo korisnicima konačnu odluku mreže i bez dodatnog razumevanja podataka. U ovom poslu, pokazujemo da se nova vrsta rečenice koja se uključuje kroz samopouzdanje može efikasno primjenjivati na tekstualne saslušnosti zadatke dok služi kao prozor kroz koje se može dobiti dublje razumevanje podataka. Da bi proizveli ove rečenice, trenirali smo rekonstruiranu neuralnu mrežu da uzme pojedinačne rečenice i predviđamo njihovu lokaciju u dokumentu u obliku distribucije nad lokacijama. Pokazujemo da se ove ugrađenje, kombinirane sa jednostavnim vizualnim heuristikom, mogu koristiti za ostvarivanje konkurentnog izvođenja sa stanjem umjetnosti na višestrukim zadacima saslušanja teksta, iznosivanje složenijih i specijalizovanijih pristupa. Osim toga, mi pokazujemo da ove integracije mogu pružiti informacije korisne pisacima za poboljšanje kvalitete pisanja i informacije o strukturaciji dokumenta i pomaganje čitačima u sažetku i lokaciji informacija.', 'si': 'අපි පැත්තක් සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක් සහ ප්\u200dරවේශ ව්\u200dයාප්\u200dතිකාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට තියෙ වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩේ ප්\u200dරමාණය ගත්තොත්, අද්\u200dයුතික ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගත්තා නිසා NLP වැඩේ වැඩේ පාවිච්චිකරුවන්ට අවසාන ව මේ වැඩේදී, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අළුත් වචනයක් ස්වයංග බලාපොරොත්තුවෙන් ඉගෙන ගත්තා වචනයක් පරීක්ෂණයෙන් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය මේ වාක්ය සම්බන්ධයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරතිකාරණ න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලයේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරියක් පිළිගත වාක්ය ගන්න සහ ඔවුන්ගේ  අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා මේ සම්පූර්ණ විදියට, සම්පූර්ණ දර්ශනය හෙයුරිස්ටික් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණ විදියට, පුළුවන් විදියට පුළුවන් විදියට ප්\u200d තවත්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ සංවිධානයක් ලේඛකට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ලියපු විශේෂතාවට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ ලියපු සංවිධානය ස', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en ny och effektiv teknik för att utföra textsammanhållningsuppgifter samtidigt som vi underlättar djupare insikter i data. Trots att man uppnår ständigt ökande uppgiftsresultat ger moderna djupinlärningsmetoder för NLP-uppgifter ofta bara användarna det slutliga nätverksbeslutet och ingen ytterligare förståelse för data. I detta arbete visar vi att en ny typ av meningsinbäddning lärt sig genom självövervakning kan tillämpas effektivt på textsammanhållningsuppgifter samtidigt som den fungerar som ett fönster genom vilket djupare förståelse av data kan erhållas. För att producera dessa meningsinbäddningar tränar vi ett återkommande neuralt nätverk för att ta enskilda meningar och förutsäga deras plats i ett dokument i form av en fördelning över platser. Vi visar att dessa inbäddningar, kombinerat med enkel visuell heuristik, kan användas för att uppnå prestanda konkurrenskraftig med state-of-the-art på flera textsammanhållningsuppgifter, vilket överträffar mer komplexa och specialiserade tillvägagångssätt. Dessutom visar vi att dessa inbäddningar kan ge insikter som är användbara för skribenter för att förbättra skrivkvaliteten och informera dokumentstrukturering, och hjälpa läsare att sammanfatta och lokalisera information.', 'so': "Waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaab sawir ah oo faa’iido leh oo sameynta shaqaalaha la xiriira qoraalka, iyadoo ku caawinaya aragtida hoose ee macluumaadka. Inta kastoo la helo sameynta shaqada oo sii kordhaya, shaqada hoose-dhexe ee NLP waxey marar badan isticmaalayaasha u fidiyaan go'aanka shabakadda ugu dambeeya iyo waxyaabo dheeraad ah oo macluumaadka ku saabsan. Shaqadan waxaynu tusnaynaa in qaab cusub oo lagu baro ilaalinta iskuulka ah waxaa si faa’iido ah loo codsan karaa shaqaalaha la isku xiriira marka lagu adeego sida daaqad oo kale, taas oo lagu heli karo waxyaabaha aad u deegaan macluumaadka. Si aan u sameyno qalabkan, waxaynu ku tababarinnaa shabakadda neurada ee ku soo socda si aan u qaadano hal erayo oo kali ah, waxaana horay ugu sii sheegaynaa meesha uu ku yaalo dukumenti sida loo qaybsado meelaha lagu qoro. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qalabkan la xidhiidha aragtida fudud, waxaa loo isticmaali karaa in ay ku sameyn karto bandhigyada farshaxanta oo ku saabsan shaqooyinka la xiriira qoraalka kala duduwan, waxayna sameyn karaan qaabab ka adag iyo dhaqanka gaarka ah. Additionally, we demonstrate that these embeddings can provide insights useful to writers for improving writing quality and informing document structuring, and assisting readers in summarizing and locating information.", 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய மற்றும் பயனுள்ள தொழில்நுட்பத்தை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் தகவல்களுக்கு ஆழமான குறிப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தும்  எப்போதும் அதிகரிக்கும் பணி செயல்பாட்டை பெறுவதாக இருந்தாலும், NLP செயல்களுக்கு அமர்ந்த ஆழமான கற்றல் நெருங்குகிறது பெரும்பாலும் முட இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய வாக்கியத்தை காட்டுகிறோம் என்றால் தானே கண்காணிப்பு மூலம் கற்றுக் கொண்டுள்ள ஒரு புதிய வகையான வாக்கு பயன்படு இந்த வாக்கியத்தை பொருத்துவதற்கு, நாம் ஒரு திரும்ப ப புதிய பிணையத்தை பயிற்சி செய்து தனித்த வாக்கியங்களை எடுத்து தங்கள் இடத்தை ஒரு ஆவணத்தில நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் சுலபமான பார்வையுடன் இந்த பொருள்கள், சுலபமான பார்வையுடன் சேர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, பல உரை இணைப்பு பணிகளில் சிக்கலான மற்றும் சிறப்பு முறைகளை  மேலும், இந்த உட்பொருள்கள் எழுதுபவர்களுக்கு பயனுள்ள உணர்வுகளை காட்டுகிறது எழுத்துபவர்களுக்கு தரம் மேம்படுத்தும் ஆவண அமைப்புகளை அறிவிப்பதற்கும்,', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئی اور تاثیر تکنیک پیش کرتے ہیں تاکسٹ کی تعلقات کے کاموں کے لئے اور ڈیٹوں میں عمیق نظر آسان کرنے کے لئے۔ زیادہ اضافہ کی عملہ حاصل کرنے کے باوجود، مدرنی عمیق تعلیم NLP تاسکیوں کے لئے صرف فائدہ نیٹ ورک فیصلہ کے ذریعے استعمال کرنے والوں کو پہنچا رہا ہے اور ڈیٹا کا اضافہ نہیں ہوتا۔ ہم اس کام میں دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک نئی قسم کی جماعت جو اپنی نظر سے سکھائی جاتی ہے اس کے ذریعہ ایک نئی قسم کی جماعت پر مفید طور پر استعمال کی جاتی ہے جبکہ وہ ایک پنجره کے طور پر استعمال کرتی ہے جس کے ذریعہ سے اطلاعات کی عمیق سمجھ سکتی ہے۔ یہ جماعت ایمبڈینگ بنانے کے لئے ہم ایک دوبارہ نیورل نیورل نیٹورک کی تطاریر کرتے ہیں کہ ایک شخصی جماعت لے لیں اور ان کی موقعیت کو ایک سند میں تقسیم کے شکل میں پیش بینی کریں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ انڈینگ، ساده نظریہ حوریستیک کے ساتھ ملے ہوئے، بہت سی ٹیکسٹ کنٹنس کے کاموں پر، بہت پیچیدہ اور مخصوص طریقوں سے کامل کرنے کے لئے استعمال کر سکتے ہیں. اور ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ ایمبڈینگ لکھنے والوں کے لئے مفید بصیرت دے سکتے ہیں اور لکھنے کی کیفیت اور سند ساخترانی کی خبر دینے کے لئے اور پڑھنے والوں کی مدد کرسکتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Biz ma'lumotga qo'shish uchun matn birlashtirish vazifalarini bajarish uchun yangilik va effektiv teknologini hozir qilamiz. Vazifaning vazifani ko'paytirishda, yangi aql o'rganishni NLP vazifalarga qaramadi. Odatda foydalanuvchilar faqat oxirgi tarmoq xususiyatini beradi va maʼlumotni qoʻshimcha tushunmaydi. Bu ishda, biz o'zimni o'zimni boshqarish orqali o'rganish orqali yangi bir xil turini o'rganish mumkin. Maʼlumotlarni juda qulay qilish mumkin. Ushbu so'zlar tarmoqni ishga tushirish uchun, biz har bir hil so'zlarni qabul qilish va manzillar boshqa tarmoqni ajratish uchun manzilni koʻrsatish. Biz ko'p matn bir necha xil vazifalar bilan bir necha matn birlashtirish vazifalarini ishlab chiqarishimiz mumkin. Ko'proq murakkab va foydalanish usullarini bajarish mumkin. Ko'pchilik, biz bu embedded yozuvlar yozuvchilarga yozuvchi sifatini oshirish va hujjatning tuzilishini yaxshi ko'rinishi mumkin, va o'quvchilarni tahrirlash va maʼlumot olish uchun yozuvchiga yordam beradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi cung cấp một kỹ thuật mới và hiệu quả để thực hiện các nhiệm vụ liên kết văn bản trong khi dễ hiểu sâu hơn về dữ liệu. Mặc dù đạt được hiệu quả nhiệm vụ ngày càng tăng cường, nhưng các phương pháp học sâu học hiện đại trong các công việc N.P thường chỉ cung cấp cho người dùng quyết định mạng cuối cùng và không hiểu thêm dữ liệu. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi cho thấy một loại câu mới được học qua tự giám sát có thể được áp dụng hiệu quả với các công việc ký kết văn bản trong khi phục vụ như một cửa sổ để có thể hiểu sâu hơn về dữ liệu. Để tạo ra sự cấy ghép câu này, chúng tôi đào tạo một mạng thần kinh liên tục sử dụng để nghe từng câu và dự đoán vị trí của nó trong một tài liệu dưới dạng phân phối các địa điểm. Chúng tôi chứng minh những sự nhúng tay này, kết hợp với thần kinh thị đơn giản, có thể được sử dụng để đạt được hiệu suất cạnh tranh với công nghệ hiện đại về các công việc liên kết nhiều văn bản, vượt qua các phương pháp phức tạp và chuyên nghiệp hơn. Chúng tôi cũng chứng minh những sự tham gia này có thể cung cấp những ý tưởng hữu ích cho các nhà văn để nâng cao chất lượng viết và thông báo về cấu trúc tài liệu, và giúp người đọc tóm tắt và tìm kiếm thông tin.', 'bg': 'Представяме нова и ефективна техника за изпълнение на задачи за съгласуваност на текста, като същевременно улесняваме по-задълбочени прозрения в данните. Въпреки постигането на все по-висока производителност на задачите, съвременните подходи за дълбоко обучение към задачите на НЛО често предоставят на потребителите само окончателното решение за мрежата и никакво допълнително разбиране на данните. В тази работа показваме, че нов тип вграждане на изречение, научено чрез самоконтрол, може да се приложи ефективно към задачите за съгласуваност на текста, като същевременно служи като прозорец, през който може да се получи по-задълбочено разбиране на данните. За да създадем тези вграждания на изречения, ние обучаваме повтаряща се невронна мрежа да взема отделни изречения и да предсказва тяхното местоположение в документ под формата на разпределение по места. Ние демонстрираме, че тези вграждания, съчетани с проста визуална евристика, могат да бъдат използвани за постигане на конкурентно представяне с най-съвременните технологии при множество задачи за съгласуваност на текста, надминавайки по-сложни и специализирани подходи. Освен това демонстрираме, че тези вграждания могат да предоставят полезни за писателите прозрения за подобряване на качеството на писане и информиране на структурирането на документи и подпомагане на читателите при обобщаване и намиране на информация.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en ny og effektiv teknik til at udføre tekstkohærens opgaver og samtidig lette dybere indsigt i dataene. På trods af at opnå stadigt stigende opgaveeffektivitet giver moderne dyb læring til NLP-opgaver ofte kun brugerne den endelige netværksbeslutning og ingen yderligere forståelse af dataene. I dette arbejde viser vi, at en ny type sætningsindlejring lært gennem selvtilsyn kan anvendes effektivt på tekstkohærens opgaver, samtidig med at den fungerer som et vindue, hvorigennem dybere forståelse af dataene kan opnås. For at producere disse sætningsindlejringer træner vi et tilbagevendende neuralt netværk til at tage individuelle sætninger og forudsige deres placering i et dokument i form af en fordeling over steder. Vi demonstrerer, at disse integreringer, kombineret med simpel visuel heuristik, kan bruges til at opnå ydeevne konkurrencedygtig med state-of-the-art på flere tekstkohærens opgaver, der overgår mere komplekse og specialiserede tilgange. Derudover viser vi, at disse indlejringer kan give indsigt, der er nyttigt for forfattere til at forbedre skrivekvaliteten og informere dokumentstrukturering og hjælpe læserne med at opsummere og lokalisere oplysninger.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een nieuwe en effectieve techniek voor het uitvoeren van tekstcoherentietaken en het vergemakkelijken van diepere inzichten in de data. Ondanks het verkrijgen van steeds hogere taakprestaties, bieden moderne deep-learning benaderingen van NLP-taken gebruikers vaak alleen de uiteindelijke netwerkbeslissing en geen extra inzicht in de gegevens. In dit werk laten we zien dat een nieuw type zinsinbedding geleerd door zelftoezicht effectief kan worden toegepast op tekstcoherentietaken en tegelijkertijd dient als een venster waardoor dieper inzicht in de data kan worden verkregen. Om deze zinsinsluitingen te produceren, trainen we een terugkerend neuraal netwerk om individuele zinnen te nemen en hun locatie in een document te voorspellen in de vorm van een verdeling over locaties. We tonen aan dat deze embeddings, gecombineerd met eenvoudige visuele heuristiek, kunnen worden gebruikt om prestaties te bereiken die concurreren met state-of-the-art op meerdere tekstcoherentietaken, die complexere en gespecialiseerde benaderingen overtreffen. Daarnaast tonen we aan dat deze embeddings inzichten kunnen bieden die nuttig zijn voor schrijvers voor het verbeteren van de schrijfkwaliteit en het informeren van documentstructurering, en het helpen van lezers bij het samenvatten en lokaliseren van informatie.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo novu i učinkovitu tehniku za provedbu zadataka usklađenosti teksta dok olakšavamo dublje uvide u podatke. Uprkos dobivanju sve veće funkcije zadatka, moderni podaci dubokog učenja na zadatke NLP često pružaju korisnicima konačnu odluku mreže i bez dodatnog razumijevanja podataka. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da se učinkovito primjenjuje novi tip rečenice koje se uključuju kroz samoopazivanje na tekstske saslušnosti zadatke dok se služi kao prozor kroz kojeg se može dobiti dublje razumijevanje podataka. Za proizvodnju tih uvođenja rečenica, treniramo povratnu neuralnu mrežu da uzme pojedinačne rečenice i predviđamo njihovu lokaciju u dokumentu u obliku distribucije nad lokacijama. Pokazujemo da se ove ugrađenje, kombinirane s jednostavnim vizualnim heuristikom, mogu iskoristiti kako bi se postigli konkurentni učinkoviti sa stanjem umjetnosti na višestrukim postupcima usklađenosti teksta, nadmaženim složenijim i specijaliziranijim pristupima. Osim toga, mi pokazujemo da te uključenje mogu pružiti upotrebe pisacima za poboljšanje kvalitete pisanja i informiranje strukture dokumenta i pomoć čitačima u sažetku i lokaciji informacija.', 'de': 'Wir stellen eine neuartige und effektive Technik vor, um Textkohärenzaufgaben durchzuführen und gleichzeitig tiefere Einblicke in die Daten zu ermöglichen. Trotz einer stetig steigenden Aufgabenleistung liefern moderne Deep-Learning-Ansätze für NLP-Aufgaben oft nur die endgültige Netzwerkentscheidung und kein zusätzliches Verständnis der Daten. In dieser Arbeit zeigen wir, dass eine neue Art von Satzbedeckung, die durch Selbstkontrolle gelernt wurde, effektiv auf Textkohärenzaufgaben angewendet werden kann und gleichzeitig als Fenster dient, durch das ein tieferes Verständnis der Daten gewonnen werden kann. Um diese Satzbedingungen herzustellen, trainieren wir ein wiederkehrendes neuronales Netzwerk, um einzelne Sätze zu nehmen und deren Position in einem Dokument in Form einer Verteilung über Orte vorherzusagen. Wir zeigen, dass diese Einbettungen, kombiniert mit einfachen visuellen Heuristiken, verwendet werden können, um Leistung zu erzielen, die mit dem neuesten Stand der Technik bei mehreren Textkohärenzaufgaben konkurriert und komplexere und spezialisiertere Ansätze übertrifft. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, dass diese Einbettungen für Autoren nützliche Erkenntnisse liefern können, um die Schreibqualität zu verbessern und die Dokumentenstrukturierung zu informieren und Leser bei der Zusammenfassung und Lokalisierung von Informationen zu unterstützen.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan teknik baru dan efektif untuk melakukan tugas koerensi teks sambil memudahkan pemahaman dalam data. Meskipun mendapatkan prestasi tugas yang semakin meningkat, pendekatan belajar dalam modern untuk tugas NLP sering hanya menyediakan pengguna keputusan jaringan akhir dan tidak ada pemahaman tambahan dari data. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menunjukkan bahwa jenis kalimat baru yang diperlihatkan melalui pengawasan diri dapat diaplikasikan secara efektif untuk tugas koerensi teks sementara melayani sebagai jendela melalui mana pemahaman lebih dalam data dapat diperoleh. Untuk menghasilkan penerbangan kalimat ini, kita melatih jaringan saraf berkurang untuk mengambil kalimat individu dan memprediksi lokasi mereka dalam dokumen dalam bentuk distribusi di atas lokasi. Kami menunjukkan bahwa penerbangan ini, bergabung dengan heuristik visual sederhana, dapat digunakan untuk mencapai prestasi kompetitif dengan state-of-the-art dalam tugas koerensi teks berbilang, melampaui prestasi pendekatan yang lebih kompleks dan spesialisasi. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bahwa penerbangan ini dapat menyediakan penglihatan berguna untuk penulis untuk meningkatkan kualitas menulis dan memberitahu strukturasi dokumen, dan membantu pembaca dalam mempersingkatkan dan menemukan informasi.', 'ko': '우리는 텍스트의 일관성 임무를 수행하는 새로운 효과적인 방법을 제시했고 데이터에 대한 깊은 이해를 추진했다.비록 갈수록 높은 임무 성능을 얻었지만 NLP 임무의 현대 심도 있는 학습 방법은 일반적으로 사용자에게 최종 네트워크 결정만 제공하고 데이터에 대한 추가 이해는 제공하지 않는다.이 작업에서 우리는 자기 감독을 통해 학습하는 신형 문장 삽입을 통해 텍스트 연결 임무에 효과적으로 응용할 수 있고 창으로서 데이터에 대한 깊은 이해를 얻을 수 있음을 보여 주었다.이 문장들이 삽입되기 위해서, 우리는 하나의 문장을 얻기 위해 귀속신경 네트워크를 훈련하고, 문서의 위치를 위치 분포의 형식으로 예측한다.우리는 이러한 삽입과 간단한 시각적 계발을 더하면 여러 텍스트의 일관성 임무에서 최신 기술에 필적하는 성능을 실현할 수 있고 더욱 복잡하고 전문적인 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 증명했다.그 밖에 이러한 삽입은 작가에게 유용한 견해를 제공하여 글쓰기의 질을 향상시키고 문서 구조에 정보를 제공하며 독자가 정보를 정리하고 포지셔닝하는 데 도움을 줄 수 있음을 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza mbinu yenye ufanisi wa kutekeleza kazi za ushirikiano wa maandishi wakati tunasaidia kuona kina zaidi katika takwimu. Pamoja na kuongezeka kwa kufanya kazi, mafunzo ya kisasa ya kujifunza kwa kazi za NLP mara nyingi huwa hutoa watumiaji uamuzi wa mtandao wa mwisho na hakuna uelewa wa taarifa za ziada. Katika kazi hii, tunaonyesha kuwa aina mpya ya hukumu inayojifunza kupitia uangalizi wa kujitegemea inaweza kutumika kwa ufanisi wa kazi za ujumbe wa maandishi wakati wanatumikia kama dirisha ambapo kinaweza kupata uelewa wa kina wa taarifa. Ili kutengeneza hukumu hizi, tunafundisha mtandao wa neura unaoendelea kuchukua hukumu binafsi na kutabiri sehemu yao katika nyaraka kama usambazaji wa maeneo. Tunaonyesha kuwa mapambano haya, yanayounganishwa na viungo rahisi vya kuona, yanaweza kutumika kufanya ushindani wa utendaji wenye ushindani na hali ya sanaa katika kazi mbalimbali za ushirikiano wa maandishi, kutekeleza mbinu za utata na maalumu. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha kuwa makampuni haya yanaweza kutoa maoni yanayofaa kwa waandishi kwa ajili ya kuboresha ubora wa kuandika na kutoa taarifa za ujenzi wa nyaraka, na kusaidia wasomaji katika kuharibu na kupata taarifa.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n roman en effektief tekniks voor die uitvoer van teks koherensie taak terwyl die diepeste inligtings in die data gemeenskap word. Terwyl ons ooit vergroter taak uitvoerdigheid ontvang het, het moderne diep-leer toegang tot NLP-taak dikwels net gebruikers verskaf met die eindelike netwerk besluit en geen addisionele verstanding van die data nie. In hierdie werk, wys ons dat 'n nuwe tipe seting ingesluit deur self-supervisie kan effektief aanwend word na teks koherensie taak terwyl dien as 'n venster deur wat dieper verstanding van die data kan verkry word. Om hierdie setinge te produseer, tref ons 'n herhaalde neuralnetwerk om individuele setinge te neem en hulle ligging in 'n dokument voorskou in die vorm van 'n verspreiding oor liggings. Ons wys dat hierdie inbêding, gekombineer met eenvoudige visuele heuristiek, kan gebruik word om uitvoerings te verkry met staat-van-die-kuns op veelvuldige teks koherensies taak, wat meer kompleks en spesialiseerde toegange uitvoer. Ons wys ook dat hierdie inbêding kan instellings gebruiklik voorsien vir skrywers vir die verbetering van skryfkwaliteit en dokumentstruktuuring te informasie en die lesers by die opsomming en lokasie van inligting.", 'fa': 'ما یک تکنیک نویس و موثر برای انجام کار های متن هماهنگی را در حالی که مشاهده های عمیق تر در داده ها را آسان می کنیم. با وجود اینکه عملکرد عملکرد بیشتر افزایش می\u200cدهد، تقریبا عمیق یادگیری مدرن به کار NLP اغلب فقط کاربران را با تصمیم نهایی شبکه و درک اطلاعات اضافه نمی\u200cکنند. در این کار، نشان می\u200cدهیم که یک نوع جدید جمله\u200cای که از طریق نظارت خود آموخته شده\u200cاند می\u200cتواند به طور موثر بر کار\u200cهای هماهنگی متن در حالی که به عنوان پنجره خدمت می\u200cکند که درک عمیق\u200cتر از داده\u200cها می\u200cتواند دریافت شود. برای تولید این جمله\u200cها، یک شبکه عصبی دوباره تمرین می\u200cکنیم تا جمله\u200cهای شخصی را بگیریم و جایگاهشان را در یک سند در شکل یک توزیع بر جایگاهها پیش بینی کنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که این وسیله\u200cها، پیوند با هوریستیک ساده\u200cای دیده\u200cای، می\u200cتوانند برای رسیدن مسابقه\u200cی عملکرد با حالت هنر در کار\u200cهای متعددی متن، بیشتر از انجام دستورات پیچیده\u200cتر و متخصص\u200cتر استفاده می\u200cشوند. به اضافه، ما نشان می دهیم که این وسیله\u200cها می\u200cتوانند برای نویسندگان مشاهده\u200cهای مفید برای improving quality نوشتن و اطلاعات ساختار سند و کمک به خوانندگان در جمع کردن و پیدا کردن اطلاعات را بدهند.', 'tr': 'Biz metin kohereket görevlerini ýerine ýetirmek üçin bir roman we etkinlik teknikizi berýäris we daýlaryň derinliklerini a ňsat edýäris. Artyp gören netijesi bolmasa bile, modern derinlikli öwrenmek NLP zadalaryna köplenç ulananlaryň soňky şebeke kararyny saýlamagyna we maglumatlaryň haýsy düşünmesine garaşýar. Bu işde, özüni gözlemäge tarapyndan öwrenen täze bir sözlem metin koherekçilik işlerine etkinlik edip, pencerede işlenýän täze bir sözlem üýtgedigini görkez. Bu sözleriň içini döretmek üçin, biz birnäbir sözleri almak üçin ýene bir sened içinde täzeliklik etmek üçin tekrar bir näral a ňladyrys. Biz bu ýerleri görsel heuristik bilen birleştirilýän bu ýerleri birnäçe metin koherekçiliklerinde, karmaşık we wajyplyk hereketlerden çykmak üçin ulanylýarys. Biz bu sowgadyň içine ýazmanyň howpsuzlygyny geliştirmek we desktap strukturasyny aýdyrmak üçin ýazçylara faydaly düşündirip biljekdigini we okuwçylara howpsuzlyk we informasiýa tapmakda kömek edip biljekdigini görkez.', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ስራዎችን ለማድረግ እና የጥልቅ ስልጣንን ወደ ዳራዎች እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የሚጨምሩ ስራዎችን ለማግኘት ቢሆንም የአዲስ ጥልቅ ትምህርት ወደ NLP ስራዎችን በመጠየቅ ጊዜ የሚጠይቁትን የመጨረሻው መረብ ውሳኔ እና የዳራዎችን ማስተዋል በማይችሉ ብቻ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ በአዲስ ዓይነት የራሴ ጉዳይ የተማረ የጽሑፍ ተግባር በጥቅም ለመጠቀም እናስታውቃለን፡፡ እነዚህን የፍርድ አካባቢዎች ለማድረግ፣ የአካባቢ የኔትራዊ መረብ ማሳየትን እናስተምር እና ቦታዎቻቸውን በአካባቢ ክፍል ላይ በተለየ መልዕክት እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ይህ አካባቢዎች ከቀላል የዓይነ አርጤክሲ ጋር የተሰበሰቡ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ Additionally, we demonstrate that these embeddings can provide insights useful to writers for improving writing quality and informing document structuring, and assisting readers in summarizing and locating information.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një teknikë të re dhe efektive për kryerjen e detyrave të konsistencës së tekstit duke lehtësuar kuptime më të thella në të dhënat. Megjithë përfundimin në rritje të detyrave, metodat moderne të mësimit të thellë ndaj detyrave të NLP shpesh ofrojnë përdoruesve vetëm vendimin përfundimtar të rrjetit dhe jo kuptimin shtesë të të dhënave. Në këtë punë, ne tregojmë se një lloj i ri fjalimi që përfshin mësimin nëpërmjet vetë-mbikqyrjes mund të aplikohet efektivisht në detyrat e konsistencës së tekstit ndërsa shërben si një dritare nëpër të cilën mund të arrihet kuptimi më i thellë i të dhënave. Për të prodhuar këto përmbajtje fjalësh, ne trajnojmë një rrjet neural të përsëritur për të marrë fjalë individuale dhe parashikuar vendndodhjen e tyre në një dokument në form ë të shpërndarjes mbi vende. Ne demonstrojmë se këto përfshirje, të kombinuara me heuristikë vizuale të thjeshta, mund të përdoren për të arritur performancën konkurruese me veprimet më të mëdha në koherencën e teksteve të shumta, duke kaluar qasjet më komplekse dhe të specializuara. Additionally, we demonstrate that these embeddings can provide insights useful to writers for improving writing quality and informing document structuring, and assisting readers in summarizing and locating information.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր և արդյունավետ տեքստի համապատասխանատվության խնդիրների կատարման մեթոդ, միաժամանակ ավելի խորը ընկալումներ տվյալների մասին: Չնայած անընդհատ աճող խնդիրների արտադրողականությանը, ժամանակակից խորը սովորելու մոտեցումները ՆԼՊ խնդիրների հանդեպ հաճախ միայն տրամադրում են օգտագործողներին վերջնական ցանցի որոշումը և ոչ մի ավելին հասկացու Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ինքնավերահսկողության միջոցով սովորված նախադասությունների նոր տեսակը կարող է արդյունավետ կիրառվել տեքստի համապատասխանատվության խնդիրների վրա, միաժամանակ ծառայում է որպես պատուհան, որի միջոցով կարող է ստանալ ավելի խո Այս նախադասությունները ստեղծելու համար մենք վարժեցնում ենք կրկնվող նյարդային ցանց, որպեսզի վերցնենք անհատական նախադասություններ և կանխատեսենք դրանց տեղադրությունը փաստաթղթի մեջ տեղադրության տեսքով: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս ներդրումները, համադրված պարզ տեսողական հյուրիստիկայի հետ, կարող են օգտագործվել, որպեսզի կարողանան համընդհանուր արդյունքներ ունենալ տեքստի բազմաթիվ համապատասխանատվության խնդիրների հետ, առավել բարդ և հատուկ մոտեցումների: Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս ներդրումները կարող են օգտակար ընկալումներ տալ գրողներին գրելու որակի բարելավման և փաստաթղթերի կառուցվածքի տեղեկատվության համար, ինչպես նաև օգնել ընթերցողներին համառոտագրել և տեղադրել տեղեկատվությունը:', 'az': 'Biz məlumatlara daha derin baxışları olaraq məlumatları birləşdirmək üçün yeni və etkili bir teknik göstəririk. Daha çox yüksək işin performansını almasına rağmen, modern deep learning approaches to NLP tasks often only provide users with the final network decision and no additional understanding of the data. Bu işdə, özünün gözləmə vasitəsilə öyrənmiş yeni cümlənin yeni türünü göstəririk ki, məlumatların daha derin anlaşılması ilə pəncərə olaraq məlumatların birləşdirilməsi üçün faydalanır. Bu cümlələr in şallaşdırmaq üçün, individual cümlələri almaq və məlumatlarını bir dökümdə dağıtmaq üçün yenidən nöral a ğ təhsil edirik. Biz göstəririk ki, bu inşalları, sadəcə gönüllü heuristik ilə birlikdə, çoxlu mətn birləşdirilməsi işlərində, daha kompleks və məxluqat tərzlərindən daha münasibətli və məxluqat tərzlərindən üstün olmaq üçün istifadə edilə bilər. Əksinə, biz göstəririk ki, bu səhifələr yazıcılara yazmaq üçün faydalanır, məlumatları təmizləmək və məlumatları yerinə yetirmək üçün yazıcılara istifadə edə bilər.', 'ca': "Presentam una tècnica nova i eficaç per a executar tasques de coherencia de textos, facilitant una visió més profunda de les dades. Despite obtaining ever-increasing task performance, modern deep-learning approaches to NLP tasks often only provide users with the final network decision and no additional understanding of the data.  En aquesta feina, demostram que un nou tipus de frase incorporada aprenent a través de l'autosupervisió pot ser aplicat eficaçment a tasques de coherencia textual mentre serveix com una finestra per a obtenir una comprensió més profunda de les dades. Per a produir aquestes incorporacions de frases, entrenem una xarxa neural recurrent per prendre frases individuals i predir la seva ubicació en un document en forma de distribució sobre llocs. Demostram que aquestes incorporacions, combinades amb heurística visual senzilla, poden ser utilitzades per aconseguir rendiment competitiu amb l'última tasca de coherencia múltiple de textos, superant els enfocaments més complexes i especialitzats. A més, demostrem que aquestes incorporacions poden proporcionar insights útils als escriptors per millorar la qualitat d'escriptura i informar l'estructuració dels documents, i ajudar als lectors a resumir i localitzar la informació.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo novu i efikasnu tehniku za izvršavanje tekstskih zadataka saslušnosti dok olakšavamo dublje uvide u podatke. Uprkos dobivanju sve veće funkcije zadataka, moderni duboko učenje pristupi zadacima NLP često pružaju korisnicima samo konačnu odluku mreže i bez dodatnog razumijevanja podataka. U ovom poslu, pokazujemo da se nova vrsta rečenice koja se uključuje kroz samopouzdanje može učinkovito primjenjivati na zadatke usklađenosti teksta dok se služi kao prozor kroz koji se može dobiti dublje razumijevanje podataka. Za proizvodnju ove rečenice, treniramo rekonstruiranu neuralnu mrežu da uzme pojedinačne rečenice i predviđamo njihovu lokaciju u dokumentu u obliku distribucije nad lokacijama. Pokazujemo da se ove ugrađenje, kombinirane s jednostavnim vizualnim heuristikom, mogu iskoristiti kako bi se postigli konkurentni učinkoviti sa stanjem umjetnosti na višestrukim zadacima saskaņovanja teksta, iznosi kompleksnije i specijaliziranije pristupe. Osim toga, mi pokazujemo da ove integracije mogu pružiti upotrebe pisacima za poboljšanje kvalitete pisanja i informiranje strukture dokumenta i pomoć čitačima u sažetku i lokaciji informacija.', 'et': 'Esitleme uudset ja tõhusat tehnikat teksti sidususe ülesannete täitmiseks, hõlbustades samas andmete sügavamat ülevaadet. Vaatamata üha suurenevale ülesannete tulemuslikkusele annavad tänapäevased sügavõppe lähenemisviisid uue tööprogrammi ülesannetele sageli kasutajatele ainult lõpliku võrguotsuse ning andmetest täiendavat arusaamist ei saa. Käesolevas töös näitame, et uut tüüpi enesejärelevalve kaudu õppitud lause manustamist saab tõhusalt rakendada teksti sidususe ülesannetele, olles aken, mille kaudu saab andmetest sügavamalt aru saada. Nende lausete manustamiseks koolitame korduvat närvivõrku võtma üksikuid lauseid ja ennustama nende asukohta dokumendis jaotusena kohtade vahel. Näitame, et neid manustamisi koos lihtsa visuaalse heuristikaga saab kasutada mitme teksti sidususe ülesandega konkurentsivõimelise jõudluse saavutamiseks, ületades keerukamaid ja spetsialiseerunud lähenemisviise. Lisaks näitame, et need manustamised võivad anda kirjanikele kasulikke ülevaateid kirjutamiskvaliteedi parandamiseks ja dokumentide struktureerimise teavitamiseks ning lugejate abistamiseks teabe kokkuvõtlikul ja leidmisel.', 'cs': 'Představujeme novou a efektivní techniku pro provádění úloh soudržnosti textu a zároveň usnadňujeme hlubší pohled do dat. Navzdory stále rostoucímu výkonu úkolů, moderní hluboké učení k úkolům NLP často poskytuje uživatelům pouze konečné rozhodnutí o síti a žádné další porozumění dat. V této práci ukazujeme, že nový typ věty vložení naučené prostřednictvím sebeohledu lze efektivně aplikovat na úlohy soudržnosti textu a zároveň slouží jako okno, skrze které lze získat hlubší pochopení dat. K vytvoření těchto vložení vět trénujeme recidivující neuronovou síť, aby vzala jednotlivé věty a předpovídala jejich umístění v dokumentu ve formě distribuce na místa. Ukazujeme, že tyto vložení v kombinaci s jednoduchou vizuální heuristikou lze použít k dosažení výkonu konkurenčního s nejmodernějšími úkoly v oblasti soudržnosti textu, které překonávají složitější a specializovanější přístupy. Kromě toho demonstrujeme, že tato vložení mohou poskytnout přehled užitečný pro autory pro zlepšení kvality psaní a informování struktury dokumentů a pomoci čtenářům při shrnutí a lokalizaci informací.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme uudenlaisen ja tehokkaan tekniikan tekstin koherenssitehtävien suorittamiseen ja samalla mahdollistamme syvemmän ymmärryksen aineistosta. Vaikka tehtävien suorituskyky kasvaa jatkuvasti, nykyaikaiset syväoppimisen lähestymistavat NLP-tehtäviin antavat käyttäjille usein vain lopullisen verkkopäätöksen eikä lisää ymmärrystä datasta. Tässä työssä osoitetaan, että uudenlaista itsevalvonnan kautta opittua lauseiden upottamista voidaan soveltaa tehokkaasti tekstin koherenssitehtäviin samalla kun se toimii ikkunana, jonka kautta datasta saadaan syvempää ymmärrystä. Näiden lauseupotusten tuottamiseksi harjoittelemme toistuvaa hermoverkkoa ottamaan yksittäisiä lauseita ja ennustamaan niiden sijaintia asiakirjassa sijainnin jakautumisen muodossa paikkoihin. Osoitamme, että näitä upotuksia yhdistettynä yksinkertaiseen visuaaliseen heuristiikkaan voidaan käyttää saavuttamaan suorituskykyä, joka on kilpailukykyinen uusimpien tekstien koherenssitehtävien kanssa, ylittäen monimutkaisemmat ja erikoistuneemmat lähestymistavat. Lisäksi osoitamme, että nämä upotukset voivat tarjota kirjoittajille hyödyllisiä oivalluksia kirjoittamisen laadun parantamiseen ja dokumenttien jäsentämiseen tiedottamiseen sekä lukijoiden auttamiseen tiedon yhteenvetoon ja paikantamiseen.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি উপন্যাস এবং কার্যকর প্রযুক্তি উপস্থাপন করছি টেক্সটের সাথে যোগাযোগ কাজ করার জন্য, যখন তথ্যে গভীর দৃষ্টিভঙ্গ এনএলপির কাজে আধুনিক গভীর শিক্ষা পাওয়া সত্ত্বেও ব্যবহারকারীদের প্রায়শ শ শেষ নেটওয়ার্ক সিদ্ধান্ত নিয়ে যায় এবং তথ্য সম্পর্কে আরো বাড়তে  এই কাজে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে নিজেদের পর্যবেক্ষণের মাধ্যমে শিক্ষা প্রদান করা একটি নতুন ধরনের বাক্য কার্যক্রমে কার্যকর করে টেক্সট সংযোগ কাজে প্রয়োগ করা য এই শাস্তি প্রবেশ করার জন্য আমরা পুনরায় নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক প্রশিক্ষণ দিচ্ছি যাতে তারা ব্যক্তিগত শাস্তি নিয়ে তাদের অবস্থান নিতে এবং স্থানে বিত আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই প্রবেশগুলো সাধারণ দৃষ্টিভঙ্গির সাথে যুক্ত, সাধারণ দৃশ্য হিউরিস্টিকের সাথে প্রতিযোগিতায় ব্যবহার করা যায় বিভিন্ন টেক্সটের সাথে প্ এছাড়াও আমরা প্রমাণ করছি যে এই বিষয়গুলো লেখকদের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রদান করতে পারে লেখার মান উন্নতি এবং নথি কাঠামোর সংক্ষেপ এবং তথ্য সংক্ষেপে পাঠকদের', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk nyumbang lan tékno sing luwih nggawe gerakan kelangan seneng nggawe barang nggawe barang langgar bantuan kuwi. Nanging ketahane tengah arungan pengguna sistem sing gak bukal, modèrn-ingkang dipun ajeng NLP dadi kapan pengguna kuwi wis nguasai pengguna tambahan sing beraksi tambahan lan ora ono sumelang liyané data. Nang gunggo iki, kita sembarang langkung dak akeh sewisur sing gak dhéwé ngerasakno Kernel Awak dhéwé éntuk ngono akeh-akeh lan akeh sampeyan karo heuristik liyane, iso nggawe nyimpen karo hal-karo perusahaan langgar sampeyan karo hal-karo perusahaan langgar sampeyan gambar, iso nggawe akeh bantuan sampeyan luwih dumadhi sak kesempatik lan tambah. Nambah, awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono akeh basa iki bakal bantuan ngono nggawe kaliwat nggawe barang nggawe barang nggambar aturan sing nggawe Kelangan Gambar nggawe layang dokumen lan ngêlangno nghelp Keteraken nggambar tarjamahan lan ngêlangno informasi', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wani na'ura da mai amfani ga cika aikin matsayin sambaƙãwa a lokacin da za'a amfani da masu ƙaranci cikin data. Inã rantsuwa da za'a iya ƙara da aikin aiki, sai masu motsi na masu iya ƙaranci zuwa aikin NLP, ko da yawa kawai, yana ga masu amfani da su ga tsarin ƙarshen tarayyan da kuma bã ya da wani fahimci na ƙaranci ga data. Daga wannan aikin, Munã nũna wa wani nau'i na ƙirƙiri magana na daban da aka sanar da shi a cikin shirin kanzu-tsari, za'a iya amfani da shi da amfani da yin aiki na matsayin sami idan an yi amfani da shi kamar taga, wanda za'a iya sami fahimta masu ƙaranci ga data. To, idan za mu buɗe wannan cewa, za mu yi kõre wata tarayya na fara a lokacin da za'a karɓi magana guda kuma Mu yi bayani ga wurin a cikin takardar, cikin tsarin rabo a kan wurãres. Tuna nũna cewa, waɗannan da ke haɗa da heuristics mai sauƙi na gane, za'a iya amfani da mafarinta da taƙaita da halin-art kan taskõkin mutane na rubutun, da za'a sami wasu masu kamfata da masu husũma. Ina ƙaranci, za mu nuna cewa waɗannan da ake fitarwa za ta iya bãyar da gannai mai amfani ga ma'abũta littãfi dõmin ya improve tsari ga rubũtãwa da ƙididdige takardar, kuma mu yi taimako ga karatun karatun cikin ƙararin da za'a sãmu information.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo novo in učinkovito tehniko za opravljanje nalog skladnosti besedila, hkrati pa olajšamo globlji vpogled v podatke. Kljub vedno večji uspešnosti nalog sodobni pristopi globokega učenja k nalogam NLP pogosto uporabnikom omogočajo le končno odločitev o omrežju in nobenega dodatnega razumevanja podatkov. V tem delu pokažemo, da se lahko nova vrsta vključevanja stavkov, naučenega s samonadzorom, učinkovito uporablja za naloge skladnosti besedila, hkrati pa služi kot okno, skozi katero je mogoče pridobiti globlje razumevanje podatkov. Za izdelavo teh vdelav stavkov usposabljamo ponavljajočo se nevronsko omrežje, ki vzame posamezne stavke in napoveduje njihovo lokacijo v dokumentu v obliki porazdelitve po lokacijah. Dokazujemo, da se lahko te vdelave v kombinaciji s preprostimi vizualnimi heuristikami uporabljajo za doseganje konkurenčne zmogljivosti z najsodobnejšimi nalogami za več skladnost besedila, kar presega kompleksnejše in specializirane pristope. Poleg tega dokazujemo, da lahko te vdelave zagotovijo vpogled, ki so koristni pisateljem za izboljšanje kakovosti pisanja in obveščanje o strukturiranju dokumentov ter pomoč bralcem pri povzemanju in iskanju informacij.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་ལས་སྒྲུབ་ཅན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་རེད། Despite obtaining ever-increasing task performance, modern deep-learning approaches to NLP tasks often only provide users with the final network decision and no additional understanding of the data. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་སྒེའུ་ཁུང་གི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་པ་ཞིག ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་གནས་ཡུལ་འདི་ཚོ་ཞིག་ལ་རྗེས་སུ་འབྱུང་བའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ལྟ་བུ་ འུ་ཅག་གིས་གསར་འཛུགས་འདི་དག་གི་མཐོང་སྣེ་མཐོང་གི་རྣམ་པ་དང་མཉམ་སྦྲགས་ཀྱི་མཐོང་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ལས་སྒྲུབ་གྱི་རྒྱལ་སྤྲོད་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། འུ་ཅག་གི་གནས་ཁོངས་འདི་ཚོ་རྩོམ་པ་ལ་སྟོན་པར་མཐུན་རྣམས་བྲིས་པ་ཚོར་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཚུལ་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་ཆའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཡར་རྒྱས', 'he': 'אנו מציגים טכניקה חדשה ויעילה לבצע משימות תואם טקסט בזמן שהקלנו תובנות עמוקות יותר לתוך הנתונים. למרות השיגת ביצועי משימה גדולים, גישות למידה עמוקה מודרניות למשימות NLP לעתים קרובות מספקות רק למשתמשים החלטה הרשתית הסופית ולא הבנה נוספת של הנתונים. בעבודה הזאת, אנו מראים שסוג חדש של משפט שמתוקף ללמוד באמצעות הפיקוח עצמי יכול להיפעיל באופן יעיל למשימות תואם טקסט בזמן שירות כחלון דרך שבו אפשר להשיג הבנה עמוקה יותר של הנתונים. כדי לייצר את התקפות המשפטים האלה, אנו מאמן רשת עצבית חוזרת לקחת משפטים בודדים ולחזות את המיקום שלהם במסמך בצורה של פיצוח מעל מיקומות. אנו מראים שהקישורים האלה, שילובים בהיוריסטיקה ויזואלית פשוטה, יכולים להשתמש כדי להשיג ביצועים תחרותיים עם מצב המיוחד על משימות תואם טקסט מרובות, ביצועים גישות מורכבות ומיוחדות יותר. בנוסף, אנו מראים שהתוכניות האלה יכולות לספק תובנות שימושיות לכותבים לשפר איכות כתיבה ולמידע מבנה מסמכים, ולעזור לקוראים בקיצור ומיקום מידע.'}
{'en': 'Classifying Author Intention for Writer Feedback in Related Work', 'ar': 'تصنيف نية المؤلف لملاحظات الكاتب في العمل ذي الصلة', 'es': 'Clasificación de la intención del autor para la retroalimentación del escritor en trabajos relacionados', 'pt': 'Classificando a intenção do autor para o feedback do escritor em trabalhos relacionados', 'fr': "Classification de l'intention de l'auteur pour les commentaires du rédacteur dans les travaux connexes", 'ja': '関連著作物における執筆者フィードバックの著者意図の分類', 'zh': '其反馈意类也', 'hi': 'संबंधित कार्य में लेखक प्रतिक्रिया के लिए लेखक के इरादे को वर्गीकृत करना', 'ru': 'Классификация намерения автора для обратной связи с автором в сопутствующей работе', 'ga': 'Cuspóir Údar a Aicmiú chun Aiseolas Scríbhneora in Obair Ghaolmhara', 'hu': 'A szerzői szándék osztályozása az írói visszajelzéshez a kapcsolódó munkában', 'it': "Classificare l'intenzione dell'autore per il feedback degli scrittori in lavori correlati", 'ka': 'კლასიფიკაციის ავტორის ინტენტიფიკაცია წერილის შესახებ მუშაობაში', 'el': 'Ταξινόμηση της πρόθεσης συγγραφέα για ανατροφοδότηση συγγραφέα σε σχετική εργασία', 'lt': 'Klasifikuoti autoriaus ketinimą rašytojo atsakymui susijusiame darbe', 'kk': 'Сәйкес жұмыстағы жазушылардың қайталану үшін авторды классификациялау мәліметі', 'mk': 'Класификување на намерата на авторот за враќање на писателот во врска со работата', 'ml': 'വിചാരിക്കപ്പെട്ട ജോലിയില്\u200d എഴുതുന്നതിനുള്ള എഴുത്തുകാരുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'ro': 'Clasificarea intenției autorului pentru feedback-ul scriitorilor în lucrări conexe', 'mt': 'Il-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Intenzjoni tal-Awtur għar-Rispons tal-kitba fix-Xogħol Relatat', 'pl': 'Klasyfikowanie intencji autora dla opinii pisarza w powiązanej pracy', 'mn': 'Харин хамааралтай ажлын бичигчийн хариултын төлөө зохион байгуулагч', 'no': 'Klassifiserer utviklarintens for skrivartilbakemelding i tilhøyrande arbeid', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ වැඩේ ලේඛක ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සඳහා ලේඛක ක්\u200dරියාකාරය හැකියාව', 'sr': 'Klasificiranje Intenzije autora za povratak pisaca u vezi sa poslom', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha qoraalka Feedback in Related Work', 'ms': 'Menaklasifikasikan Intensi Penulis untuk Balas Balas Penulis dalam Kerja Berkaitan', 'sv': 'Klassificera författarintention för Writer Feedback i relaterat arbete', 'ta': 'Comment', 'ur': 'رابطہ دار کام میں رائیٹر فیڈبک کے لئے لکھنے کی توقع کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Classifying Author Intention for Writer Feedback in Related Work', 'vi': 'Mục đích tác giả mê hoặc tập tin ảnh trong tác vụ liên quan', 'bg': 'Класифициране на намерението на автора за обратна връзка на писателя в свързана работа', 'hr': 'Classifying Author Intention for Writer Feedback in Related Work', 'nl': 'Indeling van de intentie van de auteur voor feedback van schrijvers in verwant werk', 'da': 'Klassificering af forfatter hensigt til Writer Feedback i relateret arbejde', 'de': 'Klassifizierung der Absicht des Autors für Feedback von Autoren in verwandten Arbeiten', 'fa': 'توجه نویسنده برای بازگشت نویسنده در کار ارتباطی', 'id': 'Mengklasifikasi Intensi Penulis untuk Balas Penulis dalam Kerja Terhubung', 'ko': '관련 작업 중의 작자 피드백을 위해 작자의 의도를 분류하다', 'sw': 'Kushinikiza mwandishi wa habari kwa ajili ya Feedback katika kazi inayohusiana na mwandishi', 'tr': 'Name', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i synimit të autorit për përgjigjen e shkrimtarit në punën e lidhur', 'af': 'Klassifiseer Outeur Intensie vir Skrifter Voorwerk in Verwante Werk', 'am': 'Back in Related Work', 'bn': 'সম্পর্কিত কাজে লেখক ফেডব্যবহারের জন্য লেখকের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অনুগ্রহ', 'az': 'İlişkili İş içində yazıcının geri bildirməsi üçün Sınıflandırılır', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Klasificirajuća autora intenzija za povratak pisaca u vezi s poslom', 'cs': 'Klasifikace záměru autora pro zpětnou vazbu spisovatelů v související práci', 'ca': "Classificar la intenció de l'autor per al retorn de l'escriptor en treball relacionat", 'et': 'Autori kavatsuse klassifitseerimine Writeri tagasiside jaoks seotud töös', 'fi': 'Kirjoittajan aikomuksen luokittelu Writer-palautteen aiheeseen liittyvässä työssä', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog", 'ha': 'Media controller element', 'sk': 'Razvrščanje namena avtorja za povratne informacije pisatelja v sorodnem delu', 'he': 'מסווג כוונת הכותב לחזור הכתב בעבודה קשורה', 'bo': 'འབྲེལ་བ་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་བྱ་ཚིག་ལ་རྩོམ་པ་ལ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་པའི་རྩོམ་པ་ལ་བསམ'}
{'en': 'The ability to produce high-quality publishable material is critical to academic success but many Post-Graduate students struggle to learn to do so. While recent years have seen an increase in tools designed to provide feedback on aspects of writing, one aspect that has so far been neglected is the Related Work section of academic research papers. To address this, we have trained a supervised classifier on a corpus of 94 Related Work sections and evaluated it against a manually annotated gold standard. The classifier uses novel features pertaining to citation types and co-reference, along with patterns found from studying Related Works. We show that these novel features contribute to classifier performance with performance being favourable compared to other similar works that classify author intentions and consider feedback for academic writing.', 'ar': 'تعد القدرة على إنتاج مواد قابلة للنشر عالية الجودة أمرًا بالغ الأهمية للنجاح الأكاديمي ، لكن العديد من طلاب الدراسات العليا يجاهدون لتعلم القيام بذلك. بينما شهدت السنوات الأخيرة زيادة في الأدوات المصممة لتقديم ملاحظات حول جوانب الكتابة ، فإن أحد الجوانب التي تم إهمالها حتى الآن هو قسم العمل ذي الصلة في أوراق البحث الأكاديمي. لمعالجة هذا الأمر ، قمنا بتدريب مصنف خاضع للإشراف على مجموعة من 94 قسمًا من أقسام العمل ذات الصلة وقمنا بتقييمها مقابل معيار ذهبي مشروح يدويًا. يستخدم المصنف ميزات جديدة تتعلق بأنواع الاقتباسات والمراجع المشتركة ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع الأنماط الموجودة من دراسة الأعمال ذات الصلة. نظهر أن هذه الميزات الجديدة تساهم في أداء المصنف مع كون الأداء مواتياً مقارنة بالأعمال المماثلة الأخرى التي تصنف نوايا المؤلف وتضع في الاعتبار التعليقات للكتابة الأكاديمية.', 'pt': 'A capacidade de produzir material publicável de alta qualidade é fundamental para o sucesso acadêmico, mas muitos alunos de pós-graduação lutam para aprender a fazê-lo. Embora os anos recentes tenham visto um aumento nas ferramentas projetadas para fornecer feedback sobre aspectos da escrita, um aspecto que até agora tem sido negligenciado é a seção de trabalhos relacionados de trabalhos de pesquisa acadêmica. Para resolver isso, treinamos um classificador supervisionado em um corpus de 94 seções de Trabalhos Relacionados e o avaliamos em relação a um padrão ouro anotado manualmente. O classificador usa novos recursos referentes a tipos de citação e co-referência, juntamente com padrões encontrados no estudo de Trabalhos Relacionados. Mostramos que esses novos recursos contribuem para o desempenho do classificador com desempenho favorável em comparação com outros trabalhos semelhantes que classificam as intenções dos autores e consideram o feedback para a escrita acadêmica.', 'fr': "La capacité de produire du matériel publiable de haute qualité est essentielle à la réussite scolaire, mais de nombreux étudiants de troisième cycle ont du mal à apprendre à le faire. Alors que ces dernières années ont vu une augmentation des outils conçus pour fournir des commentaires sur certains aspects de la rédaction, un aspect qui a été négligé jusqu'à présent est la section Travaux connexes des articles de recherche universitaires. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous avons formé un classificateur supervisé sur un corpus de 94 sections de travaux connexes et l'avons évalué par rapport à un étalon-or annoté manuellement. Le classificateur utilise de nouvelles fonctionnalités relatives aux types de citations et à la coréférence, ainsi que des modèles découverts lors de l'étude des ouvrages connexes. Nous montrons que ces caractéristiques novatrices contribuent à classifier les performances, les performances étant favorables par rapport à d'autres œuvres similaires qui classent les intentions des auteurs et tiennent compte des commentaires pour les écrits universitaires.", 'es': 'La capacidad de producir material publicable de alta calidad es fundamental para el éxito académico, pero muchos estudiantes de posgrado tienen dificultades para aprender a hacerlo. Si bien en los últimos años se ha visto un aumento en las herramientas diseñadas para proporcionar retroalimentación sobre aspectos de la escritura, un aspecto que hasta ahora se ha descuidado es la sección Trabajo relacionado de los trabajos de investigación académica. Para abordar esto, hemos capacitado a un clasificador supervisado en un corpus de 94 secciones de Trabajo Relacionado y lo hemos evaluado con un patrón oro anotado manualmente. El clasificador utiliza características novedosas relacionadas con los tipos de citas y la correferencia, junto con los patrones encontrados al estudiar trabajos relacionados. Mostramos que estas características novedosas contribuyen al rendimiento del clasificador con un rendimiento favorable en comparación con otros trabajos similares que clasifican las intenciones de los autores y consideran la retroalimentación para la escritura académica.', 'ja': '質の高い出版可能な資料を作成する能力は、学術的成功にとって重要ですが、多くの大学院生はそれを学ぶのに苦労しています。近年、執筆の側面に関するフィードバックを提供するために設計されたツールが増加しているが、これまで軽視されてきた一つの側面は、学術研究論文の「関連作業」セクションである。これに対処するために、94の関連作業セクションのコーパスで監視された分類子をトレーニングし、手動で注釈が付けられたゴールドスタンダードと比較して評価しました。分類子は、関連作品の研究から見出されるパターンとともに、引用タイプと共参照に関する新規の特徴を使用する。これらの新規機能は、著者の意図を分類し、学術的な執筆のためのフィードバックを考慮する他の同様の作品と比較して、パフォーマンスが良好で、分類器のパフォーマンスに寄与することを示しています。', 'ru': 'Способность выпускать высококачественные печатные материалы имеет решающее значение для академического успеха, но многие аспиранты с трудом учатся делать это. Хотя в последние годы наблюдается увеличение числа инструментов, предназначенных для обеспечения обратной связи по аспектам письменности, одним из аспектов, который до сих пор игнорировался, является раздел "Соответствующая работа" научных исследований. Для решения этой проблемы мы подготовили поднадзорный классификатор по корпусу из 94 разделов, связанных с работой, и оценили его по золотому стандарту с ручной аннотацией. Классификатор использует новые особенности, относящиеся к типам цитирования и кореференций, а также закономерности, обнаруженные при изучении сопутствующих работ. Мы показываем, что эти новые особенности способствуют производительности классификатора, причем производительность является благоприятной по сравнению с другими аналогичными работами, которые классифицируют намерения автора и рассматривают обратную связь для академического письма.', 'zh': '高质量版材之力,于学为至重,而研究生多难为也。 虽顷年以来,反馈文之具有加,而迄今为止被忽视一则学术研究论文之关务也。 94事者语料库练监分器,以手动注金为质。 器用与引文同引相关者,及考相关之式。 吾明其有助于分器者,与其意类而虑反馈类,性之利也。', 'hi': 'उच्च गुणवत्ता वाली प्रकाशन योग्य सामग्री का उत्पादन करने की क्षमता अकादमिक सफलता के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है, लेकिन कई स्नातकोत्तर छात्र ऐसा करने के लिए सीखने के लिए संघर्ष करते हैं। जबकि हाल के वर्षों में लेखन के पहलुओं पर प्रतिक्रिया प्रदान करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किए गए उपकरणों में वृद्धि देखी गई है, एक पहलू जिसे अब तक उपेक्षित किया गया है, वह अकादमिक शोध पत्रों का संबंधित कार्य अनुभाग है। इसे संबोधित करने के लिए, हमने 94 संबंधित कार्य वर्गों के एक कॉर्पस पर एक पर्यवेक्षित क्लासिफायर को प्रशिक्षित किया है और मैन्युअल रूप से एनोटेट किए गए सोने के मानक के खिलाफ इसका मूल्यांकन किया है। क्लासिफायर उद्धरण प्रकार और सह-संदर्भ से संबंधित उपन्यास सुविधाओं का उपयोग करता है, साथ ही संबंधित कार्यों के अध्ययन से पाए जाने वाले पैटर्न के साथ। हम दिखाते हैं कि ये उपन्यास विशेषताएं अन्य समान कार्यों की तुलना में अनुकूल होने के साथ क्लासिफायर प्रदर्शन में योगदान करती हैं जो लेखक के इरादों को वर्गीकृत करती हैं और अकादमिक लेखन के लिए प्रतिक्रिया पर विचार करती हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá an cumas chun ábhar ardchaighdeáin infhoilsithe a tháirgeadh ríthábhachtach do rath acadúil ach bíonn deacrachtaí ag go leor mac léinn Iarchéime foghlaim conas é sin a dhéanamh. Cé go bhfuil méadú tagtha le blianta beaga anuas ar na huirlisí atá deartha chun aiseolas a sholáthar ar ghnéithe na scríbhneoireachta, gné amháin a ndearnadh faillí uirthi go dtí seo ná an roinn Obair Ghaolmhar de pháipéir thaighde acadúil. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt air seo, chuireamar oiliúint ar aicmitheoir maoirsithe ar chorpas de 94 rannóg Obair Ghaolmhara agus rinneamar é a mheas i gcoinne caighdeán óir atá anótáilte de láimh. Úsáideann an t-aicmitheoir gnéithe núíosacha a bhaineann le cineálacha lua agus comhthagairt, mar aon le patrúin a fhaightear ó staidéar a dhéanamh ar Shaothar Gaolmhara. Léirímid go gcuireann na gnéithe úra seo le feidhmíocht an aicmitheora agus go bhfuil an fheidhmíocht fabhrach i gcomparáid le saothair eile dá samhail a dhéanann rangú ar intinn na n-údar agus a bhreithníonn aiseolas don scríbhneoireacht acadúil.', 'hu': 'A kiváló minőségű publikálható anyagok előállításának képessége kritikus az akadémiai siker szempontjából, de sok posztgraduális hallgató küzd ezért. Bár az elmúlt években növekedett az írás szempontjairól visszajelzést nyújtó eszközök száma, az egyik szempont, amelyet eddig elhanyagoltak az akadémiai kutatások Kapcsolódó Munka része. Ennek megoldására egy felügyelt osztályozót képzettünk 94 Kapcsolódó Munka részből álló korpuszra, és értékeltük azt egy manuálisan jegyzetelt aranyszabvány alapján. Az osztályozó új funkciókat használ az idézéstípusokhoz és a társ-hivatkozásokhoz, valamint a Kapcsolódó Művek tanulmányozásából származó mintákat. Megmutatjuk, hogy ezek az újszerű jellemzők hozzájárulnak az osztályozó teljesítményéhez, és a teljesítmény kedvező más hasonló művekhez képest, amelyek osztályozzák a szerzői szándékokat és figyelembe veszik a visszajelzéseket a tudományos íráshoz.', 'ka': 'მაგალითად უფრო კარგალითად გამოსახულებელი მატერიალის შესაძლებლობა კრიტიკურია აკადემიკური წარმატებისთვის, მაგრამ ბევრი სტუდენტები შესაძლებლობად გავისწავლო მიმდინარე წლის შემდეგ აღმოჩენა აკედემიური სწავლების სამუშაო მუშაო ფაქტების შესახებ, ერთი აპექტი, რომელიც აღმოჩენა, არის აკედემიური სწავლების მუშაო ფაქტი. ამის შესახებ, ჩვენ 94 სამუშაო სამუშაო სექციონის შესახებ კლასიფიკაციის შესახებ გავაკეთეთ და მისი შესახებ ხელსახურად მონიტანტირებული დოლანდის სტანდარზე კლასიფიკაცია გამოყენებს პრომენტის ფუნქციები, რომელიც საკუთარი ტიპები და კოდირენტრენციების შესახებ, რომელიც შესახებ დაკავშირებული სამუშაოების შე ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს პრომენური განსაზღვრებები კლასიფიკაციური განსაზღვრებისთვის დამატება, რომელიც განსაზღვრებულია სხვა მსგავსი საქმედებისთვის, რომელიც კლასიფიკაცია', 'el': 'Η ικανότητα παραγωγής υψηλής ποιότητας δημοσιεύσιμου υλικού είναι κρίσιμη για την ακαδημαϊκή επιτυχία, αλλά πολλοί μεταπτυχιακοί φοιτητές αγωνίζονται να μάθουν να το κάνουν. Ενώ τα τελευταία χρόνια έχουν δει μια αύξηση των εργαλείων που έχουν σχεδιαστεί για να παρέχουν ανατροφοδότηση σε πτυχές της γραφής, μια πτυχή που έχει παραμεληθεί μέχρι στιγμής είναι η ενότητα Σχετικές Εργασίες των ακαδημαϊκών ερευνητικών εργασιών. Για να το αντιμετωπίσουμε αυτό, έχουμε εκπαιδεύσει έναν επιβλέποντα ταξινομητή σε ένα σώμα τμημάτων 94 Σχετικών Έργων και το αξιολογήσουμε με βάση ένα χειροκίνητα σχολιασμένο χρυσό πρότυπο. Ο ταξινομητής χρησιμοποιεί νέα χαρακτηριστικά που σχετίζονται με τους τύπους παραπομπής και την συν-αναφορά, μαζί με μοτίβα που βρέθηκαν από τη μελέτη σχετικών έργων. Δείχνουμε ότι αυτά τα καινοτόμα χαρακτηριστικά συμβάλλουν στην απόδοση του ταξινομητή με την απόδοση να είναι ευνοϊκή σε σύγκριση με άλλα παρόμοια έργα που ταξινομούν τις προθέσεις του συγγραφέα και λαμβάνουν υπόψη ανατροφοδότηση για ακαδημαϊκή γραφή.', 'it': 'La capacità di produrre materiale pubblicabile di alta qualità è fondamentale per il successo accademico, ma molti studenti post-laurea faticano a imparare a farlo. Mentre gli ultimi anni hanno visto un aumento di strumenti progettati per fornire feedback su aspetti della scrittura, un aspetto che è stato finora trascurato è la sezione Lavoro Correlato dei documenti di ricerca accademici. Per affrontare questo problema, abbiamo formato un classificatore supervisionato su un corpus di 94 sezioni di Lavoro Correlato e valutato in base a un gold standard annotato manualmente. Il classificatore utilizza nuove caratteristiche relative ai tipi di citazione e co-riferimento, insieme a modelli trovati dallo studio di opere correlate. Mostriamo che queste novità contribuiscono alla performance del classificatore con prestazioni favorevoli rispetto ad altre opere simili che classificano le intenzioni degli autori e considerano il feedback per la scrittura accademica.', 'kk': 'Жоғары сапатты материал жасау мүмкіндігі - академиялық сәттігіне көп, бірақ Post-Graduate студенттері оны үйрену үшін көпшілікті көпшілікті. Соңғы жылдарда жазу аспектеріне қайталау үшін құралдар көтеріліп жатқан болғанда, бір аспект бұл - академиялық зерттеу қағаздарының қатынау бөлігі. Бұл жағдайда қатынау үшін 94 жұмыс бөлігінің корпуса бақылау классификаторын оқыдық. Бұны қолмен белгіленген алтын стандартына қарсы оқыдық. Классификациясы тапсырылған жұмыс істерін оқу үлгілерімен қатынау түрлері мен сілтемелердің романдық мүмкіндіктерін қолданады. Біз бұл романдық мүмкіндіктері оқиғалардың оқиғаларына салыстырып, оқиғалардың оқиғаларына салыстырып, академиялық жазбалардың қайта жауап беру үшін классификациялық істе', 'lt': 'Galimybė gaminti aukštos kokybės leidybinę medžiagą yra labai svarbi akademinei sėkmei, tačiau daugelis studentų po absolventų stengiasi tai išmokti. Nors pastaraisiais metais išaugo priemonių, skirtų pateikti grįžtamąją informaciją apie rašytinius aspektus, vienas aspektas, kuris iki šiol buvo pamirštas, yra susijusių akademinių mokslinių tyrimų dokumentų darbo skyrius. Siekdami spręsti šį klausimą, apmokėme prižiūrėtą klasifikatorių 94 susijusių darbo skyrių korpusuje ir įvertinome jį pagal rankiniu būdu užrašytą aukso standartą. Klasifikatorius naudoja naujus požymius, susijusius su citacijos tipais ir bendra nuoroda, taip pat su susijusių darbų tyrimo būdus. Mes rodome, kad šios naujos savybės padeda klasifikuoti veiklos rezultatus, o veiklos rezultatai yra palanki, palyginti su kitais panašiais kūriniais, kurie klasifikuoja autorių ketinimus ir svarsto atsakymą į akademinį rašymą.', 'mk': 'Способноста за производство на висококвалитетен објавлив материјал е критична за академскиот успех, но многу студенти по дипломирање се борат да го научат тоа. И покрај тоа што во последните години се зголеми бројот на алатки дизајнирани за обезбедување врска со аспектите на пишувањето, еден аспект кој досега е заборавен е одделот за врска со работата на академските истражувачки документи. To address this, we have trained a supervised classifier on a corpus of 94 Related Work sections and evaluated it against a manually annotated gold standard.  Класификаторот користи нови карактеристики поврзани со типовите на цитација и кореференција, заедно со шемите пронајдени од студирањето на поврзани дела. Ние покажуваме дека овие нови карактеристики придонесуваат за класификувањето на перформансите, при што перформансите се поволни во споредба со другите слични дела кои ги класификуваат намерите на авторот и ги разгледуваат реакциите за академското пишување.', 'ms': 'Kemampuan untuk menghasilkan bahan yang boleh diterbitkan berkualiti tinggi adalah penting untuk kejayaan akademik tetapi banyak pelajar Post-Graduate berjuang untuk belajar untuk melakukannya. Walaupun tahun-tahun terakhir telah melihat peningkatan pada alat yang direka untuk memberikan balas balik mengenai aspek penulisan, satu aspek yang telah diabaikan sejauh ini ialah seksyen Kerja Berkaitan kertas kajian akademik. Untuk mengatasi ini, kami telah melatih kelasuk yang diawasi pada mayat 94 seksyen kerja berkaitan dan menilainya melalui standar emas yang dicatat secara manual. Pengklasifikasi menggunakan ciri-ciri baru yang berkaitan dengan jenis citasi dan rujukan-sama, bersama dengan corak yang ditemui daripada mempelajari Kerja Berkaitan. Kami menunjukkan bahawa ciri-ciri baru ini berkontribusi kepada prestasi pengklasifikasi dengan prestasi yang lebih baik dibandingkan dengan kerja-kerja yang sama lain yang mengklasifikasi niat penulis dan mempertimbangkan balas balik untuk menulis akademik.', 'ml': 'ഉയര്\u200dത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രസിദ്ധമായ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാനുള്ള കഴിവ് അക്കാഡിക വിജയത്തിന് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്. പക്ഷെ പല അടുത്ത വര്\u200dഷങ്ങള്\u200d എഴുതുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രതികരണങ്ങളില്\u200d ഫിബിബ്ബാക്ക് നല്\u200dകാനുള്ള ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, ഇത ഇതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d 94 പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d പരിശീലനം നടത്തിയിട്ടുണ്ട്. കൈകാര്യമായി വില വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്ന രീതികളുമായി ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയര്\u200d നോവലിന്റെ ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. We show that these novel features contribute to classifier performance with performance being favourable compared to other similar works that classify author intentions and consider feedback for academic writing.', 'mt': 'Il-ħila li jiġi prodott materjal pubblikabbli ta’ kwalità għolja hija kritika għas-suċċess akkademiku iżda ħafna studenti ta’ wara l-Gradwati għandhom diffikultà biex jitgħallmu jagħmlu dan. Filwaqt li s-snin reċenti raw żieda fl-għodod imfassla biex jipprovdu feedback dwar aspetti tal-kitba, aspett wieħed li s’issa ġie injorat huwa s-sezzjoni tax-Xogħol Relatat tad-dokumenti ta’ riċerka akkademika. Biex nindirizzaw dan, a ħna mħarrġin klassifikatur superviż fuq korpus ta’ 94 taqsima tax-Xogħol Relatat u evalwajna kontra standard tad-deheb annotat manwalment. Il-klassifikatur juża karatteristiċi ġodda li għandhom x’jaqsmu mat-tipi ta’ ċitazzjoni u l-ko-referenza, flimkien ma’ mudelli misjuba mill-istudju tax-Xogħlijiet Relatati. Aħna nuru li dawn il-karatteristiċi ġodda jikkontribwixxu għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-prestazzjoni bil-prestazzjoni tkun favorevoli meta mqabbla ma’ xogħlijiet simili oħra li jikklassifikaw l-intenzjonijiet tal-awtur u jikkunsidraw rispons għall-kitba akkademika.', 'mn': 'Академийн амжилтын тулд өндөр чанартай хэвлэлтэй материал үйлдвэрлэх чадвар нь маш чухал. Гэхдээ Олон Сургуулийн оюутнууд үүнийг суралцахыг хичээдэг. Сүүлийн жилүүд бичих талаар хариу өгөхийн тулд зориулагдсан хэрэгслүүдийн нэмэлт харагдаж байна. Одоогийн үед нэг асуудал нь академикийн судалгааны сонины хамааралтай ажлын хэсэг. Энэ талаар бодохын тулд бид 94 холбоотой ажлын хэсэг дээрх удирдагчийг суралцаж, тэднийг гар арьсан алтын стандарт эсрэг үнэлгээ хийсэн. Холбооны хувьд харилцааны ажлыг судалж байхаас холбогдож байгаа шинэ өөрчлөлтийг ашигладаг. Бид эдгээр шинэ санаанууд нь бүтээлч зорилгоонуудыг хичээдэг, академикийн бичилгээний хариултыг бодож үздэг бусад төстэй ажилтай харьцуулахад илүү ашигтай байдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Kvaliteten for å produsere høg kvalitetsverdi er kritisk for akademisk suksess, men mange post-graduat studentene kjem til å lære å gjøre det. Selv om siste år har sett eit økning i verktøy som er utvikla for å gjera tilbakemeldingar om skrivingsaspektar, er ein aspekt som så langt har blitt neglectert i den tilhøyrande arbeidsdelen av akademiske forskningspapir. For å handsama dette, har vi trent ein oversikt klassifiserer på ein korpus av 94 Related Work Sections og evaluert det mot ein manuelt merkt gull standard. Klassifikatoren brukar novel funksjonar for siteringstypar og samanlikning, saman med mønsterelement funne frå studering av tilhøyrande arbeid. Vi viser at desse romanske funksjonane bidra til klassifiserer utviklingar med utviklinga som er favoritt samanlikna med andre liknande arbeidar som klassifiserer utviklaren og vurder tilbakemeldingar for akademisk skriving.', 'pl': 'Zdolność do produkcji wysokiej jakości materiałów publikowalnych ma kluczowe znaczenie dla sukcesu akademickiego, ale wielu studentów podyplomowych trudno się tego nauczyć. Podczas gdy w ostatnich latach nastąpił wzrost narzędzi przeznaczonych do dostarczania informacji zwrotnych na temat aspektów pisania, jednym z aspektów, który do tej pory został zaniedbany, jest sekcja Powiązana Praca akademickich prac badawczych. Aby temu rozwiązać, przeszkoliliśmy nadzorowanego klasyfikatora na korpusie sekcji 94 Related Work i oceniliśmy go na podstawie ręcznie adnotacji złotego standardu. Klasyfikator wykorzystuje nowe cechy odnoszące się do rodzajów cytowania i współreferencji, wraz ze wzorami znalezionymi podczas studiowania Powiązanych Prac. Pokazujemy, że te nowe cechy przyczyniają się do wydajności klasyfikatora, a wykonanie jest korzystne w porównaniu z innymi podobnymi pracami, które klasyfikują intencje autora i uwzględniają opinie zwrotne dla pisania akademickiego.', 'ro': 'Abilitatea de a produce materiale publicabile de înaltă calitate este esențială pentru succesul academic, dar mulți studenți post-absolvenți se luptă să învețe să facă acest lucru. În timp ce ultimii ani au înregistrat o creștere a instrumentelor concepute pentru a oferi feedback cu privire la aspectele scrisului, un aspect care a fost neglijat până în prezent este secțiunea Lucrări conexe a lucrărilor de cercetare academică. Pentru a rezolva acest lucru, am instruit un clasificator supravegheat pe un corpus de 94 de secțiuni de lucru asociat și l-am evaluat conform unui standard aur adnotat manual. Clasificatorul folosește caracteristici noi referitoare la tipurile de citații și co-referință, împreună cu modele găsite din studiul Lucrărilor conexe. Aratăm că aceste caracteristici noi contribuie la performanța clasificatorului, performanța fiind favorabilă în comparație cu alte lucrări similare care clasifică intențiile autorului și iau în considerare feedback-ul pentru scrierea academică.', 'sr': 'Sposobnost proizvodnje visokokvalitetnih izdavateljskih materijala je kritična za akademijski uspeh, ali mnogi studenti nakon diplomiranja se bore za to naučiti. Iako su poslednje godine videli povećanje alata dizajniranih za pružanje reakcije na aspekte pisanja, jedan aspekt koji je do sada zanemaren je povezan dio radnog sekcije akademijskih istraživačkih papira. Da bismo to riješili, obučili smo nadzornog klasifikatora na korpusu od 94 povezanih radnih sekcija i procenili ga protiv ruèno annotiranog zlatnog standard a. Klasifikator koristi nove karakteristike koje se odnose na tipe citanja i saradnju, zajedno sa obrascima koje su pronađene iz proučavanja vezanih radova. Pokazujemo da ovi novi karakteristici doprinose klasifikaciji izvedbe s dobrodošlim izvedbama u usporedbi s drugim sličnim radovima koji klasifikuju namjere autora i razmatraju odgovor na akademski pisanje.', 'si': 'උත්සත්වය ප්\u200dරකාශනය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරකාශනයක් විදියට විශේෂ විදියට විශේෂ විදියට විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්  අන්තිම අවුරුද්දු දැක්කා විශේෂ විද්\u200dයාපයක් ලියනයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් දෙන්න සැලසුම් කරලා තියෙනවා නමුත්, ලියනයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක මේක විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි 94 සම්බන්ධ ව්\u200dයාපාර කොර්පස් එකේ ප්\u200dරධානයක් පුළුවන් විදිහට පරික්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ ඒක අත් The classifier use new Featuries that permeate to citating types and co-references, accompanied with patterns from study from AramAssassin. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ කතාවක්ෂාවක් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය සඳහා අනිත් වගේ විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය', 'so': 'awood u lahaanshaha soo bixinta alaabta aad u baahan tahay waa mid muhiim u ah guuleysta iskuulka, laakiin ardayda waxbarashada ka dambeeya ayaa ku dadaala in ay barto. Intii sannadihii la soo dhowaaday ay arkeen kordhiska qalabka loo qoray in loo soo celiyo warqadaha qoraalka, hal dhinac oo aan weli la halmaamin waa qaybta shaqada ee la xiriira warqadaha waxbarashada ee iskuulka. Markaas waxan ayaannu tababarinnay koox ilaaliye ah oo ku qoran qaybaha shaqada ee la xidhiidha 94, waxaana qiimeynay inay ka gees noqoto calaamad dahab ah. The classifier uses novel features pertaining to citation types and co-reference, along with patterns found from studying Related Works.  Waxaynu muujinnaa in xirfadaha warqadahan waxay ku faa’iido fasax ku leedahay bandhigyada fasaxda, taas oo la barbardhigo shuqullo kale oo la mid ah oo ay ku qoran yihiin qasnadaha qoraalka iskuulka.', 'sv': 'Förmågan att producera högkvalitativt publiceringsbart material är avgörande för akademisk framgång, men många postgraduate studenter kämpar för att lära sig att göra det. Medan de senaste åren har sett en ökning av verktyg utformade för att ge feedback på aspekter av skrivande, en aspekt som hittills har försummats är avsnittet Relaterat arbete i akademiska forskningsartiklar. För att ta itu med detta har vi utbildat en övervakad klassificerare på en korpus av 94 Relaterade Arbete sektioner och utvärderat den mot en manuellt kommenterad guldstandard. Klassificeringen använder nya funktioner som rör citeringstyper och samreferens, tillsammans med mönster som hittats från studier av Relaterade verk. Vi visar att dessa nya funktioner bidrar till klassificerarens prestation med prestanda som är gynnsam jämfört med andra liknande verk som klassificerar författarintentioner och beaktar feedback för akademiskt skrivande.', 'ta': 'அதிக தரமான வெளிப்படுத்தக்கூடிய பொருளை உருவாக்குவதற்கு முக்கியமானது கல்வி வெற்றிக்கு ஆனால் பல பின்பு கல்வி பட்டியல் மா சமீபத்தில் ஆண்டுகள் எழுதும் பகுதிகளில் பதில் கொடுக்க வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட கருவிகளின் அதிகரிப்பை பார்த்துள்ளார்கள் என்றால், இது வரை தவிர்க்கப்பட்டு To address this, we have trained a supervised classifier on a corpus of 94 Related Work sections and evaluated it against a manually annotated gold standard.  வகுப்பாளர் தொடர்பு பணிகளை படிப்பதிலிருந்து காணப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளுடன் கிடைக்கப்பட்ட புதிய குணங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறது. நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் இந்த புத்தகக் குணங்கள் வகைப்படுத்தும் செயல்பாட்டிற்கு செயல்பாட்டிற்கு செலவு செய்வது சிறப்பாக இருக்கும் மற்', 'ur': 'اچھی کیفیت کے پیدا کرنے کی طاقت اسکادمیکی کامیابی کے لئے ضرورت ہے لیکن بہت سی استادیوں نے اس کے ساتھ سیکھنے کی کوشش کی ہے. اگلوں سالوں نے لکھنے کے لئے طراحی کی وسائل میں اضافہ کیا ہے، ایک الگو ہے جو اب تک غفلت کی گئی ہے، یہ علمی تحقیق کاغذوں کے مرتبہ کار قسم ہے. اس کے بارے میں ہم نے 94 رابطہ دار کام قسموں کے ایک قالب پر ایک نظارت والی کلاسیر کی تعلیم دی ہے اور اسے اپنے ہاتھ سے نوشتہ سونے کی استاندارد کے خلاف ارزش کیا ہے. کلاسفار نے نیٹی ٹیپ اور شروع کے بارے میں نومین ویژگی استعمال کرتا ہے، رابطہ دار کارکوں کی تعلیم سے پٹرنے کے ساتھ. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ روانی ویژے کلاسپیر کی عملکرد کے ساتھ اضافہ کرتی ہیں اور ان کے ساتھ اضافہ کرتی ہیں جو دوسرے ایسے کاموں کے مقابلہ میں لکھنے کے ارادہ کو کلاسپیر کرتی ہیں اور علمی لکھنے کے لئے فائدہ واکنا سمجھتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Akdemik muvaffaqiyatlariga eng yuqori tadbirlik materialni yaratishga muhim, lekin ko'p ta'lim o'quvchilar buni o'rganish uchun o'rganishga harakat qiladi. Yaqinda yil ichida yozuvchi davlatlarni javob berish uchun qo'llangan asboblarning ko'payishini ko'rsatadi. Bu yerda eng bir aspekt yoʻq edi, bu akademik tafitiyat takarda bog'liq ish qismi qismlari. Buni tajriba qilish uchun, biz 94 ish qismlari bilan boshqaruvchi darajasini o'rganishni o'rgandik va uni qoʻlbola qo'lbola qo'llangan gull standardini qiymatdik. Name We show that these novel features contribute to classifier performance with performance being favourable compared to other similar works that classify author intentions and consider feedback for academic writing.", 'vi': 'Khả năng sản xuất tài liệu đăng xuất cao cấp là quan trọng với thành công trong giới học tập nhưng nhiều học sinh tốt nghiệp đều khó khăn để học hỏi. Trong khi những năm gần đây đã có một số công cụ tăng lên nhằm cung cấp phản hồi về khía cạnh viết lách, một khía cạnh đã bị bỏ qua cho đến nay là phần còn lại của các nghiên cứu học tập. Để giải quyết việc này, chúng tôi đã đào tạo một người phân loại giám sát trong tập đoàn của thiểu chuyên nghiệp liên quan, Người phân loại sử dụng các tính năng mới liên quan tới các loại ghi chú và tham khảo, cùng với các mẫu tìm thấy từ nghiên cứu các công trình liên quan. Chúng tôi cho thấy những tính năng mới này giúp phân loại các thành quả, với khả năng đạt được thuận lợi hơn so với những tác phẩm khác, phân loại các dự định tác giả và xem xét phản hồi cho văn học.', 'hr': 'Sposobnost proizvodnje visokokvalitetnih izdavateljskih materijala je kritična za akademijski uspjeh, ali mnogi studenti nakon razreda se bore za to učiti. Iako su zadnje godine vidjeli povećanje alata dizajniranih za pružanje povratka o aspektima pisanja, jedan aspekt koji je do sada zabranjen je povezan radni dio akademijskih istraživačkih papira. Za rješavanje ovoga, obučili smo nadziranog klasifikatora na korpusu od 94 povezanih radnih sekcija i procijenili ga protiv ručno annotiranog zlatnog standard a. Klasifikator koristi nove karakteristike koje se odnose na vrste citanja i saradnju, zajedno s obrascima koje su pronađene iz proučavanja vezanih radova. Pokazujemo da ovi novi karakteristici doprinose klasifikaciji učinkovitosti s učinkovitosti koji su dobrodošli u usporedbi s drugim sličnim radovima koji klasifikuju namjere autora i razmatraju odgovor na akademijsko pisanje.', 'da': 'Evnen til at producere udgiveligt materiale af høj kvalitet er afgørende for akademisk succes, men mange Post-Graduate studerende kæmper for at lære at gøre det. Mens de seneste år har set en stigning i værktøjer designet til at give feedback på aspekter af skrivning, er et aspekt, der indtil videre er blevet forsømt, afsnittet Relateret arbejde i akademiske forskningspapirer. For at løse dette har vi uddannet en overvåget klassificering på et korpus af 94 relaterede arbejdssektioner og evalueret det i forhold til en manuelt annoteret gold standard. Klassificeren bruger nye funktioner vedrørende citeringstyper og co-reference, sammen med mønstre fundet fra at studere Relaterede værker. Vi viser, at disse nye træk bidrager til klassificerers præstation, idet performance er gunstig sammenlignet med andre lignende værker, der klassificerer forfatterens intentioner og overvejer feedback til akademisk skrivning.', 'nl': 'Het vermogen om hoogwaardig publiceerbaar materiaal te produceren is cruciaal voor academisch succes, maar veel post-graduate studenten worstelen om dit te leren. Hoewel de afgelopen jaren een toename van tools is waargenomen die zijn ontworpen om feedback te geven op aspecten van schrijven, is een aspect dat tot nu toe is verwaarloosd de sectie Gerelateerd werk van academische onderzoekspapers. Om dit aan te pakken, hebben we een begeleide classificator getraind op een corpus van 94 Related Work secties en geëvalueerd aan de hand van een handmatig geannoteerde gouden standaard. De classificator maakt gebruik van nieuwe functies met betrekking tot citatietypen en co-referentie, samen met patronen gevonden uit het bestuderen van Gerelateerde Werken. We laten zien dat deze nieuwe kenmerken bijdragen aan classificatorprestaties met gunstige prestaties in vergelijking met andere soortgelijke werken die de bedoelingen van de auteur classificeren en feedback voor academisch schrijven overwegen.', 'bg': 'Способността да се произвеждат висококачествени публикувани материали е от решаващо значение за академичния успех, но много студенти се борят да се научат да го направят. Докато през последните години се наблюдава увеличаване на инструментите, предназначени да предоставят обратна връзка по аспектите на писането, един аспект, който досега е пренебрегнат, е разделът Свързана работа на академичните научни статии. За да се справим с това, обучихме надзорен класификатор върху корпус от 94 раздела Свързани Работи и го оценихме спрямо ръчно анотиран златен стандарт. Класификаторът използва нови функции, отнасящи се до типовете цитати и съпътстващи препратки, заедно с модели, открити от изучаването на Свързани произведения. Показваме, че тези нови характеристики допринасят за представянето на класификатора, като представянето е благоприятно в сравнение с други подобни произведения, които класифицират намеренията на автора и вземат предвид обратната връзка за академичното писане.', 'id': 'Kemampuan untuk menghasilkan materi yang dapat diterbitkan kualitas tinggi sangat penting untuk sukses akademik tapi banyak siswa Post-Graduate berjuang untuk belajar melakukannya. Sementara bertahun-tahun terakhir telah melihat peningkatan peralatan yang direncanakan untuk memberikan feedback pada aspek menulis, satu aspek yang telah sejauh ini diabaikan adalah bagian kerja berhubungan dari kertas penelitian akademik. Untuk mengatasi ini, kami telah melatih klasifikasi yang diawasi pada mayat dari 94 bagian kerja terkait dan mengevaluasinya melalui standar emas yang dicatat secara manual. Klasifikasi menggunakan ciri-ciri baru yang berhubungan dengan tipe citasi dan koreferensi, bersama pola yang ditemukan dari mempelajari Kerja Terkait. Kami menunjukkan bahwa ciri-ciri novel ini berkontribusi untuk prestasi klasifikasi dengan prestasi yang lebih baik dibandingkan dengan pekerjaan yang sama lainnya yang klasifikasi niat penulis dan mempertimbangkan feedback untuk tulisan akademik.', 'de': 'Die Fähigkeit, qualitativ hochwertiges publizierbares Material zu produzieren, ist entscheidend für den akademischen Erfolg, aber viele Post-Graduate-Studenten haben Schwierigkeiten, dies zu lernen. Während in den letzten Jahren eine Zunahme an Werkzeugen verzeichnet wurde, die entwickelt wurden, um Feedback zu Aspekten des Schreibens zu geben, ist ein Aspekt, der bisher vernachlässigt wurde, der Abschnitt Related Work in wissenschaftlichen Forschungsarbeiten. Um dies zu beheben, haben wir einen überwachten Klassifikator auf einem Korpus von 94 Related Work Abschnitten geschult und anhand eines manuell annotierten Goldstandards bewertet. Der Klassifikator verwendet neuartige Merkmale in Bezug auf Zitationstypen und Co-Referenzen, zusammen mit Mustern, die aus dem Studium verwandter Werke gefunden wurden. Wir zeigen, dass diese neuartigen Merkmale zur Klassifizierungsleistung beitragen, wobei die Performance im Vergleich zu anderen ähnlichen Werken günstig ist, die die Intentionen des Autors klassifizieren und Feedback für akademisches Schreiben berücksichtigen.', 'ko': '고품질의 출판 자료를 만드는 능력은 학술 성공에 매우 중요하지만, 많은 대학원생들이 이렇게 하는 것을 배우기 어렵다.최근 몇 년 동안 창작에 피드백을 제공하는 도구가 갈수록 많아지고 있지만 지금까지 학술 연구 논문과 관련된 업무 부분은 줄곧 소홀히 여겨져 왔다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 94개의 관련 작업 부분의 어료 라이브러리에 감독이 있는 분류기를 훈련시키고 수동 주석의 금 기준에 따라 이를 평가했다.이 분류기는 인용 유형과 공동 인용과 관련된 새로운 특징, 연구 관련 저서에서 발견된 모델을 사용한다.우리는 이러한 새로운 특징이 분류기의 성능을 향상시키는 데 도움이 된다는 것을 발견했다. 다른 유사한 작품에 비해 이런 작품들은 작가의 의도를 분류하고 학술 창작의 피드백을 고려했다.', 'sw': 'Uwezo wa kutengeneza vifaa vinavyochapishwa kwa kiwango kikubwa ni muhimu kwa mafanikio ya kitaaluma lakini wanafunzi wengi wanapambana na kujifunza kufanya hivyo. Wakati miaka ya hivi karibuni imeonekana kuongezeka kwa vifaa vinavyolengwa kutoa maoni juu ya masuala ya kuandika, upande mmoja ambao mpaka sasa umefutiliwa ni sehemu ya Kazi za Utafiti wa Kisomo. Ili kutangaza hili, tumemfundisha mwangalizi katika makampuni ya sekta 94 zinazohusiana na kazi na kutathmini dhidi ya kiwango cha dhahabu kinachokerwa kwa mikononi. The classifier uses novel features pertaining to citation types and co-reference, along with patterns found from studying Related Works.  Tunaonyesha kuwa taswira hizi za riwaya zinachangia utendaji wa ufanisi wa tabia kwa kuwa ni vizuri kulinganisha na kazi nyingine kama hizo zinazofanana na malengo ya mwandishi na kuangalia maombi ya kuandika kwa wasomi.', 'fa': 'توانایی تولید ماده\u200cهای قابل انتشار کیفیت زیادی برای موفقیت دانش آموزشی مهم است ولی بسیاری از دانش آموزان post-Graduate struggle for learning to do that. در حالی که سالهای اخیر افزایش ابزارهای طراحی شده برای تسلیم برخورداری از منطقه نوشتن دیده\u200cاند، یک منطقه که تا حالا فراموش شده، بخش کار مربوط به کاغذهای تحقیقات علمی است. برای حل این کار، ما یک راهنمایی تحت نظر قرار گرفته\u200cایم که در یک مجموعه از ۴۹ بخش کار ارتباط دارد و آن را بر خلاف یک استاندارد طلایی که به دست نشان داده است ارتباط داده\u200cایم. گروه\u200cشناسی از ویژه\u200cهای رمانی استفاده می\u200cکند که مربوط به نوع\u200cها و مربوط\u200cهای همکاری هستند، همراه با الگوهای پیدا شده از مطالعه کار\u200cهای ارتباطی. ما نشان می دهیم که این ویژگی\u200cهای رمانی به عملکرد\u200cهای مخفی\u200cتر کمک می\u200cکنند با عملکرد\u200cهای مناسب در مقایسه با کارهای مشابه\u200cای که هدف\u200cهای نویسنده\u200cها را تشکیل می\u200cدهند و بازگشت برای نوشتن علمی را در نظر می\u200cگیرند.', 'sq': 'Aftësia për të prodhuar materiale publikuese të cilësisë së lartë është kritike për suksesin akademik, por shumë studentë pas diplomimit luftojnë për të mësuar ta bëjnë këtë. Ndërsa vitet e fundit kanë parë një rritje në mjetet e dizajnuara për të dhënë feedback mbi aspektet e shkrimit, një aspekt që është harruar deri tani është seksioni i Punës së Lidhur të dokumenteve të kërkimit akademik. Për ta trajnuar këtë, kemi trajnuar një klasifikues të mbikqyrur në një trup prej 94 seksionesh të punës së lidhura dhe e vlerësuam atë me një standard të artë të anotuar manualisht. Klasifikuesi përdor karakteristika të reja të lidhura me tipat e citacionit dhe bashkëreferencën, së bashku me modelet e gjetura nga studimi i punëve të lidhura. Ne tregojmë se këto karakteristika të reja kontribuojnë në paraqitjen klasifikuese me paraqitjen e favorshme krahasuar me vepra të tjera të ngjashme që klasifikojnë synimet e autorit dhe konsiderojnë përgjigje për shkrimin akademik.', 'am': 'ከፍተኛ ጥሩ የሚታወቀው ማህበረሰብ መፍጠር ለትምህርት ማድረግ ግን ብዙ ተማሪዎች ይህን ለማድረግ ተጋደማሉ፡፡ የቀድሞው ዓመታት የጽሑፉን ክፍሎች ላይ መልስ ማድረግ የተዘጋጀውን መቀናቀል ሲያዩት፣ የረገመው አንድ ክፍል የአካቲክ ትምህርት ገጾች የሥራ ክፍል ነው፡፡ ለዚህ ለማስታወቂያ፣ 94 የሥራ ክፍለ ክፍሎች ላይ የተጠበቀውን ክፍል አስተማርነው እና በጅራት የተመሳሰለውን የወርቅ ድርቅ ክፍል ላይ አስተዋልነው፡፡ The classifier uses novel features pertaining to citation types and co-reference, along with patterns found from studying Related Works.  እነዚህም የኖረ አቀማመጥ ፍላጎች ለአካዳቢ ጽሑፍ ጥያቄን ለመተካከል የሚችሉትን ሌሎችን እንደተደረጉ ሥራ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'af': "Die moontlikheid om hoë-kwaliteit publisiebaar materiaal te produseer is kritiese vir akademiese sukses, maar baie post-Graduate studente struikel om dit te leer. Terwyl onlangse jaar 'n verhoog in nutsprogramme gesien het om terugmelding te verskaf oor aspekte van skryf, is een aspekt wat tot toe verwerp is, die verwante werk seksie van akademiese ondersoek papier. Om hierdie adres te stel, het ons 'n ondersoekte klassifiseerder op 'n korpus van 94 verwante werk seksies opgelei en dit geevalueer teen 'n handaangekies goue standaard. Die klassifiseerder gebruik novele eienskappe wat betref die siteringstipes en co-verwysing, saam met patrone wat gevind het van die studering van verwante werke. Ons wys dat hierdie nuwe funksies bydra aan klassifiseerder prestasie met die prestasie wat moontlik is in vergelyking met ander gelykbare werke wat outeurintensies klassifiseer en beskou terugmelding vir akademiese skryfing.", 'hy': 'Հիանալի որակի հրատարակվող նյութեր արտադրելու ունակությունը կարևոր է գիտական հաջողության համար, բայց շատ հետավագ աշակերտներ պայքարում են սովորել դա անել: Մինչդեռ վերջին տարիների ընթացքում մեծացում են գործիքները, որոնք նախագծված են գրության ասպեկտների հետ կապված արձագանքներ տալու համար, մինչ այժմ անտեսված մի ասպեկտ է գիտական ուսումնասիրությունների կապված աշխատանքի հատվածը: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք վարժեցրել ենք վերահսկված դասակարգիչը 94-ի կապված աշխատանքի մասերի մարմինի վրա և գնահատել այն ձեռքով նշումնավորված ոսկու ստանդարտի համեմատ: Տեղադասավորը օգտագործում է նոր հատկություններ, որոնք կապված են մեջբերման տեսակների և համեմատության հետ, ինչպես նաև կապված աշխատանքների ուսումնասիրելուց գտնվող կաղապարների հետ: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս նոր հատկությունները ներդրում են դասակարգում արտադրողությունները, որոնք համեմատած են այլ նման աշխատանքների, որոնք դասակարգում են հեղինակի մտադրությունները և հաշվի առնում գիտական գրության արձագանքները:', 'bn': 'উচ্চমান প্রকাশিত বস্তুগুলো তৈরি করার ক্ষমতা শিক্ষামীন সফলতার জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কিন্তু অনেক পোস্ট-গ্রাডুয়েট ছাত সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে লেখার বিষয়ে প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রদানের জন্য পরিকল্পনা করা টুলস বৃদ্ধি পেয়েছে, কিন্তু একটি প্রাক্ষাপট যা এখনও উপেক্ষা করা হয় এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা ৯৪ সম্পর্কিত কর্ম বিভাগের কোর্পাসে একজন পর্যবেক্ষক শ্রেণীকে প্রশিক্ষণ দিয়েছি এবং হাতে সোনার মানে বিরক্ ক্লাসিফারের সাথে সম্পর্কিত কার্যকলাপ পড়ার প্যাটারেন্ট পাওয়া যাচ্ছে তার সাথে নোভেলের বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই উপন্যাসের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী শিক্ষামিক লেখার জন্য প্রতিক্রিয়া বিবেচনা করা হয়েছে তাদের অন্যান্য অনুরূপ কাজের তুলনায় ভাল', 'bs': 'Sposobnost proizvodnje visokokvalitetnih izdavateljskih materijala je kritična za akademijski uspjeh, ali mnogi studenti nakon diplomiranja se bore za to naučiti. Iako su poslednje godine vidjeli povećanje alata dizajniranih za pružanje povratka o aspektima pisanja, jedan aspekt koji je do sada zanemaren je povezan dio radnog dijela akademijskih istraživačkih papira. Da bi se ovo riješili, obučili smo nadzornog klasifikatora na korpusu od 94 povezanih radnih sekcija i procenili ga protiv ručno annotiranog zlatnog standard a. Klasifikator koristi nove karakteristike koje se odnose na vrste citanja i saradnju, zajedno sa obrascima koje su pronađene iz proučavanja vezanih radova. Pokazujemo da ovi novi karakteristici doprinose klasifikaciji učinkovitosti, a činjenice su dobre u usporedbi s drugim sličnim radovima koji klasifikuju namjere autora i razmatraju odgovor na akademijsko pisanje.', 'az': 'Ən yüksək kaliteli təhsil edən materyal təhsil etmə bacarığı akademik başarısına qədər möhkəmdir, amma çox post-Graduate təhsil öyrənməyə çalışır. Son illərdə yazmaq üçün tədbir vermək üçün müəyyən edilmiş vasitələrin artırılmasını gördükdə, bu qədər unutduğu bir aspekt akademik araştırma kağıtlarının bağlı işlər bölümüdür. Bunu çəkmək üçün 94 İş bölümünün korpusu üzərində mühafizə edilmiş bir klasifikatçı təhsil etdik və onu manually annotated gold standard ilə təhsil etdik. Sınıflandırıcı yeni xüsusiyyətlər və şəkildə istifadə edir. İlişkilər işlərini öyrənməkdən tapılan örtüklər ilə birlikdə yeni xüsusiyyətlər istifadə edir. Biz göstəririk ki, bu yeni xüsusiyyətlər, başqa bənzər işlərə salınmaq və akademik yazmaq niyyətlərini dəyişdirən başqa işlərə salınmaq üçün xüsusiyyətlərə kömək edir.', 'ca': "The ability to produce high-quality publishable material is critical to academic success but many Post-Graduate students struggle to learn to do so.  Mentre que els últims anys han vist un augment en les eines dissenyades per proporcionar feedback sobre aspectes de l'escriptura, un aspecte que s'ha ignorat fins ara és la secció de treball relacionat dels documents de recerca acadèmica. Per abordar això, hem entrenat un classificador supervisat en un cos de 94 seccions de treball relacionat i l'hem evaluat en comparació amb un estàndard d'or anotat manualment. El classificador utilitza noves característiques relacionades amb els tipus de citació i la co-referència, juntament amb patrons trobats en l'estudi de treballs relacionats. Mostrem que aquestes noves característiques contribueixen a la classificació del rendiment amb el rendiment favorable en comparació amb altres obres similars que classifiquen les intencions dels autors i consideran el feedback de l'escriptura acadèmica.", 'cs': 'Schopnost produkovat vysoce kvalitní publikovatelný materiál je klíčová pro akademický úspěch, ale mnoho postgraduálních studentů se snaží naučit se tak učit. Zatímco v posledních letech došlo k nárůstu nástrojů určených k poskytování zpětné vazby na aspekty psaní, jedním z aspektů, který byl doposud zanedbáván, je sekce Související práce akademických výzkumných článků. Abychom to řešili, vyškolili jsme dohlíženého klasifikátora na korpus sekcí 94 Související práce a vyhodnotili ho podle manuálně anotovaného zlatého standardu. Klasifikátor využívá nové vlastnosti týkající se citačních typů a korespondence, spolu se vzory nalezenými ze studia Souvisejících děl. Ukazujeme, že tyto nové vlastnosti přispívají k klasifikačnímu výkonu, přičemž výkon je příznivý ve srovnání s jinými podobnými díly, které klasifikují autorské záměry a zvažují zpětnou vazbu pro akademické psaní.', 'et': 'Võime toota kvaliteetset avaldatavat materjali on akadeemilise edu jaoks kriitilise tähtsusega, kuid paljud kraadiõppe üliõpilased vaevavad, et seda õppida. Kuigi viimastel aastatel on kirjutamise aspektide kohta tagasiside andmiseks mõeldud vahendite hulk kasvanud, on üks aspekt, mis seni on jäetud tähelepanuta, akadeemiliste uurimistööde jaotis Seotud töö. Selle lahendamiseks oleme koolitanud järelevalvega klassifitseerijat 94 seotud töö sektsioonist koosneva korpuse alusel ja hinnanud seda käsitsi märgitud kuldstandardi alusel. Klassifikaator kasutab uudseid tsitaatide tüüpide ja kaasviidete funktsioone ning sarnaste teoste uurimisel leitud mustreid. Näitame, et need uudsed omadused aitavad kaasa klassifitseerijate tulemuslikkusele, kusjuures tulemuslikkus on soodne võrreldes teiste sarnaste teostega, mis klassifitseerivad autori kavatsusi ja arvestavad tagasisidet akadeemilise kirjutamise puhul.', 'tr': 'Yüksek kaliteli publika etmäge ukyp başaryşlar akademiki başaryşlar üçin wajypdyr, ýöne köp okuwçylar şony öwrenmek üçin owrenýärler. Soňky ýyllar ýazma aspektleri barada terjime etmek üçin düzenlenen aletler ýokary görýändir. Şu wagt iň umydan bäri akademiki ylmy kagytlaryň syýahat bölegi. Bunu çözmek üçin, 94-nji iş bölümlerinde gözlemli klasifikatçy okuwdyk we elimizden berilen altın standartlara değerlendirdik. Sınıftçy Related Çalışmalary öwrenmek üçin roman hatlary ulanýar. Biz bu roman özellikleri ukyplary ukyplaryň niýetlerini klasifiklaşdyran we akademiki ýazma üçin jogaplary düşünýän eserlerden has gowy bir şekilde täsirleýändigini görkeýäris.', 'fi': 'Kyky tuottaa korkealaatuista julkaistavaa materiaalia on ratkaiseva akateemisen menestyksen kannalta, mutta monet jatko-opiskelijat kamppailevat oppimaan sitä. Vaikka viime vuosina on nähty lisääntyneen työkalujen määrä antaa palautetta kirjoittamisen näkökohdista, yksi näkökohta, joka on tähän mennessä laiminlyöty, on akateemisten tutkimuspapereiden Related Work -osio. Tätä varten olemme kouluttaneet valvotun luokittelijan 94 Related Work -osion korpusesta ja arvioineet sen manuaalisesti merkityn kultastandardin perusteella. Luokittelija käyttää viittauksiin ja rinnakkaisviittauksiin liittyviä uusia ominaisuuksia sekä niihin liittyviä teoksia tutkiessaan löydettyjä kuvioita. Osoitamme, että nämä uudet ominaisuudet edistävät luokittelijan suorituskykyä ja että suorituskyky on suotuisa verrattuna muihin vastaaviin teoksiin, jotka luokittelevat tekijän aikeita ja ottavat huomioon palautetta akateemisesta kirjoittamisesta.', 'jv': 'Kapan kanggo ngwalih pisan kang cuwih-suaraning nggawe mulalah sing dikarepaké kanggo ngaksudi cara-cara sing susahe batar nggo ngwalih sekolahan luwih bantuan. Warsane sing klok tau ngomong nik arep nggawe barang alat sing bisa nggawe barang alat kanggo nggawe barang nggawe kalih, Aspek sing nganggep nggawe barang langgar-langgar sampek Karo Pakan sing paling académik. Wurungu iki, awak dhéwé wis ngerasakno sekolahan kanggo ngilangno sak cara-cara sing luwih dumaten, nik awak dhéwé wis ana sak janè bersatu. email-custom-header-Security Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan kelas iki dadi neng akeh bantuan karo perusahaan karo hal-hal sing mengko coro karo ngono nggawe barang sing luwih apik sing nyimpen karo perusahaan kawit autor sira nggawe tarjamahan lan ingang langgar tarjamahan kanggo tukang tarjamahan', 'he': 'היכולת לייצר חומר אפשרי לפרסם איכות גבוהה היא קריטית להצלחה אקדמית אבל הרבה תלמידים אחרי הסיום נאבקים ללמוד לעשות זאת. למרות ששנים האחרונות ראו גיבוי כלים שנועדו כדי לספק חזרה על היבטים של כתיבה, היבט אחד שנעלם עד כה הוא חלק העבודה הקשורה של מסמכי מחקר אקדמיים. כדי להתמודד עם זה, אימנו מערכת מופקחת על גוף של 94 חלקי עבודה קשורים והערכנו את זה בנוגע לסטנדרט זהב שנכתב יד. המסגר משתמש בתוכניות חדשות שייכות לסוגי ציטוט ושותף התייחסות, יחד עם דפוסים שנמצאו מללמד עבודות קשורות. We show that these novel features contribute to classifier performance with performance being favourable compared to other similar works that classify author intentions and consider feedback for academic writing.', 'sk': 'Sposobnost izdelave visokokakovostnega objavljivega gradiva je ključnega pomena za akademski uspeh, vendar se mnogi podiplomski študenti težko naučijo tega. Medtem ko se je v zadnjih letih povečalo število orodij, namenjenih zagotavljanju povratnih informacij o vidikih pisanja, je eden od vidikov, ki je bil do zdaj zanemarjen, razdelek Povezano delo akademskih raziskovalnih člankov. Za reševanje tega smo usposobili nadzorovanega klasifikatorja na korpusu 94 oddelkov sorodnega dela in ga ocenili glede na ročno označen zlati standard. Klasifikator uporablja nove značilnosti, ki se nanašajo na vrste citatov in soveličenje, skupaj z vzorci, ki jih najdemo pri študiju sorodnih del. Pokazujemo, da te nove značilnosti prispevajo k uspešnosti klasifikatorja, pri čemer je uspešnost ugodna v primerjavi z drugimi podobnimi deli, ki klasificirajo avtorske namene in upoštevajo povratne informacije za akademsko pisanje.', 'ha': "Taimar da za'a samar da abun da aka faɗa sarki, yana da muhimmi zuwa ma'abũta mafaniki kuma amma masu yawa daga karãtun na bayan-Graduta sun yi jihãdi da za su iya barta. A lokacin da sanarsu na ƙara ƙari cikin kayan aiki na designed to bãyar feedback on masu aspects of rubũtun, wani aspects wanda aka manta har zuwa yanzu, shi ne the Related Arkin aiki of littafan akadi. To, da ya faɗi wannan, mun haƙin wani mai tsaro a kan karatun na 94 masu husũma na aikin aiki kuma muka ƙaddara shi a kan wata takarda na zĩnãriya da hannayen da aka faɗa. @ action: button Tuna nũna cewa waɗannan masu fassarar nowaya sunã ƙara wa mai fassarar da performance da a yarda da su sami da waɗansu aikin da ke daidai da fasalin marubuci da ke fassarar da fassarar da kuma ka ƙaddara feedback wa littafin akada.", 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བརྩོན་བྱས་པར་མཐོ་རྩིས་བ་སྐྱེན་པར་མཐོ་རྩིས་བྱེད་ནི་ཆེན་ཤུགས་ཡོད། དབུས་གཞུང་གི་ལོ་ངོ་༡༢༠་རེད་ཅིག་བྱུང་བའི་ལག་ཆ་སྐྱེན་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་ཡིན་ནའང་། ད་ལྟ་མ་འོངས འདི་ལྟ་བུར་བརྗོད་པར་ངེད་ཚོའི་དབུགས་སྡུད་པ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་བཟོས་ཡོད། 94 རྣམ་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དབུགས་གཙང་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་དབུགས The classifier uses novel features pertaining to citation types and co-reference, along with patterns found from studying Related Works. ང་ཚོས་གསར་བརྗོད་ཆེན་འདི་དག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་སྣང་བ་དེ་གྲངས་རིམ་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་སྟངས་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཡོད་པ་གཞན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེ'}
{'en': 'Sparse Victory   A Large Scale Systematic Comparison of count-based and prediction-based vectorizers for text classification', 'ar': 'انتصار متناثر - مقارنة منهجية واسعة النطاق لموجهات المتجهات القائمة على التعداد والقائمة على التنبؤ لتصنيف النص', 'es': 'Victoria dispersa: una comparación sistemática a gran escala de vectorizadores basados en recuentos y predictivos para la clasificación de textos', 'pt': 'Vitória Esparsa – Uma Comparação Sistemática em Grande Escala de vetorizadores baseados em contagem e baseados em previsão para classificação de texto', 'fr': 'Sparse Victory — Une comparaison systématique à grande échelle des vectorisateurs basés sur le nombre et les prévisions pour la classification de texte', 'ja': 'まばらな勝利–テキスト分類のためのカウントベースと予測ベクトルの大規模なシステム的比較', 'zh': '疏胜 – 文本之类,与占候之矢量化大较', 'hi': 'विरल विजय - पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए गिनती-आधारित और भविष्यवाणी-आधारित वेक्टराइज़र की एक बड़े पैमाने पर व्यवस्थित तुलना', 'ru': 'Редкая победа – крупномасштабное систематическое сравнение векторов, основанных на подсчете и прогнозировании, для классификации текста', 'ga': 'Bua Gann – Comparáid Chórasach ar Mhórscála idir veicteoireoirí atá bunaithe ar chomhaireamh agus ar thuar chun téacs a rangú', 'ka': 'Sparse Victory - დიდი სკალური სისტემალური შემდგომარება ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციისთვის მნიშვნელოვანი და წარმოდგენების განსაზღვრება', 'el': 'Σπάνια νίκη.Μια μεγάλη κλίμακα συστηματική σύγκριση διανυσματικών φορέων με βάση τον καταμέτρηση και την πρόβλεψη για την ταξινόμηση κειμένου', 'hu': 'Szűk győzelem - A számláláson alapuló és előrejelzésen alapuló vektorizátorok nagyszabású szisztematikus összehasonlítása a szövegosztályozáshoz', 'kk': 'Спарс жеңілігі - Мәтін классификациясы үшін үлкен масштабының систематикалық салыстыру', 'lt': 'Mažas laimėjimas – Didelio masto sisteminis skaitmeninių ir prognozėmis pagrįstų vektorių, skirtų teksto klasifikacijai, palyginimas', 'it': 'Sparse Victory - Confronto sistematico su larga scala dei vettori basati sul conteggio e sulla previsione per la classificazione del testo', 'mk': 'Мала победа - Систематска споредба на голема скала на броеви и предвидувања базирани векторизатори за класификација на текст', 'ml': 'സ്പേഴ്സ് വിജയം - ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനുള്ള വെക്റ്റര്\u200d വിജയിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വലിയ വലിപ്പം സിസ്റ്റീമാറ്റി', 'ms': 'Sparse Victory - A Large Scale Systematic Comparison of count-based and prediction-based vectorizers for text classification', 'pl': 'Sparse Victory.Duża skala Systematyczne porównanie wektorów opartych na liczbach i prognozach dla klasyfikacji tekstu', 'mn': 'Sparse Victory - A Large Scale System Comparison of Count-based and prediction-based vectorizers for text classification', 'ro': 'Victorie spartă - O comparație sistematică la scară largă a vectorizatorilor bazați pe numărătoare și predicții pentru clasificarea textelor', 'mt': 'Victory Sparse - Tqabbil Sistematiku fuq Skala kbira ta’ vetturi bbażati fuq l-għadd u bbażati fuq it-tbassir għall-klassifikazzjoni tat-test', 'no': 'Sparse Victory - Ei stor skal sistematisk sammenligning av tellbasert og foregåande vektorar for tekstklassifikasjon', 'so': 'Iswidish Victory - A Large Scale Systematic Comparison of count-based and prediction-based vectorers for text classification', 'sr': 'Sparse Victory - Velika sistemska usporedba vektorizera na bazi broja i predviđanja za klasifikaciju teksta', 'sv': 'Sparse Victory - En storskalig systematisk jämförelse av räknebaserade och förutsägelsebaserade vektorer för textklassificering', 'si': 'sparse Victorizer - A Large scaling System Comparison of Count-based and forecast-based Vectors for text classification', 'ta': 'விற்பனை - உரை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கான பெரிய அளவு முறைமையான ஒப்பிடுதல் எண்ணிக்கையிலுள்ள மற்றும் முன்வாக்கி அடிப்படையிலு', 'ur': 'Sparse Victory - A Large Scale System Comparison of Count-based and prediction-based vectorizers for text classification', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name Lý do ví dụ như:', 'nl': 'Sparse Victory.Een grootschalige systematische vergelijking van op telling en voorspelling gebaseerde vectorizers voor tekstclassificatie', 'bg': 'Спасна победа - мащабно систематично сравнение на векторизатори, базирани на броене и прогнози за класификация на текста', 'de': 'Sparse Victory.Ein großer systematischer Vergleich von Zähl- und Vorhersage-basierten Vektorizern für die Textklassifizierung', 'da': 'Sparse Sejr - En stor skala systematisk sammenligning af tællingsbaserede og forudsigelsesbaserede vektorer til tekstklassifikation', 'ko': '희소 승리 - 텍스트 분류에서 계수와 예측을 바탕으로 하는 벡터기의 대규모 시스템 비교', 'fa': 'Victory Sparse - A Scale Large System Comparison of count-based and prediction-based vectorizers for text classification', 'tr': 'Sparse Victory - A Large Scale sistem Comparison of count-based and prediction-based vectorizers for text classification', 'af': "Sparse Victory - 'n Groot Skaal Sistemiese Vergelyking van tel-gebaseerde en voorskou-gebaseerde vektorisers vir teks klasifikasie", 'sw': 'Mshindi wa Kihispania - Mfumo Mkubwa wa kiwango cha mfumo wa kulinganisha vectors wenye asili ya hisabu na utabiri kwa ajili ya kutafsiri matokeo', 'sq': 'Fitore e shpejtë - Një krahasim sistemik me shkallë të madhe të vektorëve bazuar në numërim dhe parashikim për klasifikimin e tekstit', 'id': 'Victory Sparte - Sebuah Perbandingan Sistematik Skala Besar dari vektor berdasarkan hitungan dan prediksi untuk klasifikasi teks', 'am': 'Sparse Victory - A Large Scale Systematic Comparison of count-based and prediction-based vectors for text classification', 'hy': 'Փոքր հաղթանակ - Տեքստի դասակարգման համար հիմնված և կանխագուշակում հիմնված վեկտորիզերների մեծ մասշտաբ համակարգչային համեմատություն', 'bs': 'Sparse Victory - Velika sistemska usporedba vektorizacija na bazi broja i predviđanja za klasifikaciju teksta', 'hr': 'Sparse Victory - Velika sustava sustava sustava usporedbe vektorizera na temelju broja i predviđanja za klasifikaciju teksta', 'ca': 'Vitoria ràpida - Una comparació sistemàtica a gran escala dels vectoritzadors basats en el nombre i en la predicció per la classificació de text', 'et': 'Haruldane võit - arvupõhiste ja prognoosipõhiste vektorisaatorite suuremahuline süstemaatiline võrdlus teksti klassifitseerimiseks', 'bn': 'স্পের্স বিজয় - টেক্সট গ্রাফিকেশনের জন্য একটি বড় পরিমাণ সিস্টেমিটিক তুলনা', 'az': 'Sparse Victory - A Large Scale Systemic Comparison of count-based and prediction-based vectorizers for text classification', 'fi': 'Sparse Victory - Laskentapohjaisten ja ennustepohjaisten vektorisaattoreiden laaja-alainen systemaattinen vertailu tekstin luokittelussa', 'cs': 'Velké měřítko Systematické srovnání vektorizérů založených na počtu a predikci pro klasifikaci textu', 'jv': 'Sparsi', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Redka zmaga - velika sistematična primerjava vektorjev na podlagi štetja in napovedi za klasifikacijo besedila', 'bo': 'Sparse Victory - A Large Scale SystemComparison of count-based and prediction-based vectorizers for text classification', 'he': 'ניצחון נמוך - שיוון מערכי במידה גדולה של ויקטוריזצים מבוססים על ספירה ומבוססים על חיזוי'}
{'en': 'In this paper we study the performance of several text vectorization algorithms on a diverse collection of 73 publicly available datasets. Traditional sparse vectorizers like Tf-Idf and Feature Hashing have been systematically compared with the latest state of the art neural word embeddings like Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText and character embeddings like ELMo, Flair. We have carried out an extensive analysis of the performance of these vectorizers across different dimensions like classification metrics (.i.e. precision, recall, accuracy), dataset-size, and imbalanced data (in terms of the distribution of the number of class labels). Our experiments reveal that the sparse vectorizers beat the neural word and character embedding models on 61 of the 73 datasets by an average margin of 3-5 % (in terms of macro f1 score) and this performance is consistent across the different dimensions of comparison.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، ندرس أداء العديد من خوارزميات توجيه النص على مجموعة متنوعة من 73 مجموعة بيانات متاحة للجمهور. تمت مقارنة أدوات التوجيه التقليدية المتفرقة مثل Tf-Idf و Feature Hashing بشكل منهجي مع أحدث تضمين للكلمات العصبية مثل Word2Vec و GloVe و FastText ومزيج الشخصيات مثل ELMo و Flair. لقد أجرينا تحليلاً شاملاً لأداء هذه المتجهات عبر أبعاد مختلفة مثل مقاييس التصنيف (مثل الدقة والتذكر والدقة) وحجم مجموعة البيانات والبيانات غير المتوازنة (من حيث توزيع عدد تسميات الفئات). تكشف تجاربنا أن المتجهين المتفرقين تغلبوا على نماذج تضمين الكلمات والشخصيات العصبية في 61 من مجموعات البيانات 73 بهامش متوسط قدره 3-5٪ (من حيث درجة الماكرو f1) وهذا الأداء متسق عبر الأبعاد المختلفة للمقارنة.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, estudamos o desempenho de vários algoritmos de vetorização de texto em uma coleção diversificada de 73 conjuntos de dados disponíveis publicamente. Vetorizadores esparsos tradicionais, como Tf-Idf e Feature Hashing, foram sistematicamente comparados com os mais recentes embeddings de palavras neurais de última geração, como Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText e embeddings de caracteres como ELMo, Flair. Realizamos uma extensa análise do desempenho desses vetorizadores em diferentes dimensões, como métricas de classificação (ou seja, precisão, recall, exatidão), tamanho do conjunto de dados e dados desequilibrados (em termos de distribuição do número de rótulos de classe). Nossos experimentos revelam que os vetorizadores esparsos superam os modelos de incorporação de palavras e caracteres neurais em 61 dos 73 conjuntos de dados por uma margem média de 3-5% (em termos de pontuação macro f1) e esse desempenho é consistente nas diferentes dimensões de comparação.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous étudions les performances de plusieurs algorithmes de vectorisation de texte sur une collection diversifiée de 73 ensembles de données accessibles au public. Les vectoriseurs épars traditionnels tels que Tf-Idf et Feature Hashing ont été systématiquement comparés aux derniers intégrations de mots neuronaux comme Word2Vec, Glove, FastText et aux intégrations de caractères comme ElMo, Flair. Nous avons effectué une analyse approfondie des performances de ces vectoriseurs dans différentes dimensions, telles que les métriques de classification (précision, rappel, précision), la taille de l'ensemble de données et les données déséquilibrées (en termes de distribution du nombre d'étiquettes de classe). Nos expériences révèlent que les vectorisateurs épars battent les modèles d'intégration de mots neuronaux et de caractères sur 61 des 73 ensembles de données d'une marge moyenne de 3 à 5\xa0% (en termes de score macro f1) et que cette performance est cohérente dans les différentes dimensions de la comparaison.", 'es': 'En este artículo estudiamos el rendimiento de varios algoritmos de vectorización de texto en una colección diversa de 73 conjuntos de datos disponibles públicamente. Los vectorizadores dispersos tradicionales como Tf-Idf y Feature Hashing se han comparado sistemáticamente con las últimas incorporaciones de palabras neuronales de última generación como Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText e incrustaciones de caracteres como ElMo, Flair. Hemos llevado a cabo un análisis exhaustivo del rendimiento de estos vectorizadores en diferentes dimensiones, como métricas de clasificación (es decir, precisión, recuperación, precisión), tamaño de los conjuntos de datos y datos desequilibrados (en términos de la distribución del número de etiquetas de clase). Nuestros experimentos revelan que los vectorizadores dispersos superan a los modelos neuronales de incrustación de palabras y caracteres en 61 de los 73 conjuntos de datos por un margen promedio de 3-5% (en términos de puntuación macro f1) y este rendimiento es consistente en las diferentes dimensiones de comparación.', 'ja': 'この論文では、公開されている73のデータセットの多様なコレクション上のいくつかのテキストベクトル化アルゴリズムのパフォーマンスを研究します。Tf - IdfやFeature Hashingのような従来のまばらなベクトライザーは、Word 2 Vec、GloVe、FastTextのような最新のニューラルワード埋め込みやELMo、Flairのような文字埋め込みと体系的に比較されています。我々は、分類指標（精度、想起、精度）、データセットサイズ、および不均衡データ（クラスラベルの数の分布の観点から）などの異なる次元にわたるこれらのベクトル化のパフォーマンスの広範な分析を行った。私たちの実験は、73個のデータセットのうちの61個のデータセットで、まばらなベクトライザーが神経ワードおよび文字埋め込みモデルを平均マージン3 ～ 5%で打ち負かしたことを明らかにし、このパフォーマンスは、比較の異なる次元にわたって一貫している。', 'zh': '于本文中,研究数种文本矢量化算法在73个公明可以数据集的不同集合上的性能。 旧疏矢量化器(如Tf-Idf、Feature Hashing)已系统地与最新最新神经词嵌(如Word2Vec,GloVe,FastText)与字符嵌(如ELMo,Flair)较之。 臣等异维度,广析其矢量化器,如类指标(精,召率准确性),大小不平(就类表数而言)。 臣等实验明,疏矢量化器于73数集者61数集上以3-5%之均胜神经单词与字符嵌之(宏观f1分数而言),且其性异维度一也。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम 73 सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध डेटासेट के विविध संग्रह पर कई टेक्स्ट वेक्टराइजेशन एल्गोरिदम के प्रदर्शन का अध्ययन करते हैं। Tf-Idf और फीचर हैशिंग जैसे पारंपरिक विरल वेक्टराइज़र की तुलना व्यवस्थित रूप से वर्ड 2Vec, GloVe, FastText जैसे कला तंत्रिका शब्द एम्बेडिंग और ELMo, फ्लेयर जैसे चरित्र एम्बेडिंग के नवीनतम राज्य के साथ की गई है। हमने वर्गीकरण मीट्रिक (यानी परिशुद्धता, याद, सटीकता), डेटासेट-आकार और असंतुलित डेटा (वर्ग लेबल की संख्या के वितरण के संदर्भ में) जैसे विभिन्न आयामों में इन वेक्टराइज़र्स के प्रदर्शन का एक व्यापक विश्लेषण किया है। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि विरल वेक्टराइज़र ने 73 डेटासेट में से 61 पर तंत्रिका शब्द और चरित्र एम्बेडिंग मॉडल को 3-5% (मैक्रो एफ 1 स्कोर के संदर्भ में) के औसत मार्जिन से हराया और यह प्रदर्शन तुलना के विभिन्न आयामों में सुसंगत है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы изучаем производительность нескольких алгоритмов векторизации текста на разнообразной коллекции из 73 общедоступных наборов данных. Традиционные разреженные векторы, такие как Tf-Idf и Feature Hashing, систематически сравнивались с новейшими вложениями нейронных слов, такими как Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText и вложениями символов, такими как ELMo, Flair. Мы провели обширный анализ производительности этих векторов в различных измерениях, таких как классификационные метрики (т.е. точность, отзыв, точность), размер набора данных и несбалансированные данные (с точки зрения распределения количества меток классов). Наши эксперименты показывают, что редкие векторы обгоняют модели встраивания нейронных слов и символов на 61 из 73 наборов данных со средним запасом 3-5% (в терминах макроса f1), и эта производительность согласуется по различным измерениям сравнения.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid staidéar ar fheidhmíocht roinnt halgartaim veicteoirithe téacs ar bhailiúchán éagsúil de 73 tacar sonraí atá ar fáil go poiblí. Rinneadh comparáid chórasach ar veicteoirí tanaí traidisiúnta ar nós Tf-Idf agus Feature Hashing leis na leabú focal néarúil is déanaí ar nós Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText agus leabaithe carachtar mar ELMo, Flair. Tá anailís fhairsing déanta againn ar fheidhmíocht na veicteoireoirí seo thar thoisí éagsúla cosúil le méadracht aicmithe (.i. beachtas, aisghairm, cruinneas), méid tacair sonraí, agus sonraí éagothroime (i dtéarmaí dáileadh líon na lipéad ranga). Nochtann ár dturgnaimh gur bhuail na veicteoireoirí tanaí na samhlacha néaracha focal agus carachtar neadaithe ar 61 de na 73 tacar sonraí faoi mheánchorrlach 3-5% (i dtéarmaí scór macrai f1) agus tá an fheidhmíocht seo comhsheasmhach ar fud na toisí éagsúla comparáide.', 'ka': 'ამ წიგნაში ჩვენ ვისწავლით რამდენიმე ტექსტის ვაკტორიზაციის ალგორიტემის გამოსახულება 73 განსხვავებული მონაცემების განსხვავებული კოლექციაში. Tradicionale sparse vectorizers like Tf- Idf and Feature Hashing have been systematically compared with the latest state of the art neural word embeddings like Word2Vec, Glove, FastText and character embeddings like ELMo, Flair. Name ჩვენ განსხვავებული განზომილებების გავაკეთებეთ განზომილებების გავაკეთებული ანალიზი, როგორც კლასიფიკაციის მეტრიკის განზომილებაში (მაგალითად, დახმარება, მაგალითად), მონაცემების განზომილება და განგანზომილებული მონაცემების განზომილება ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აღმოჩნენ, რომ ბოლო გვეკტორიზრები ნეიროლური სიტყვა და სიტყვა, რომლებიც 73 მონაცემების 61 წერტილის მოდელეების განმავლობაში სამი-5% (მაკრო f1 წერტილის განმავლობაში) და ეს პროცემენტი', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban több szövegvektorizációs algoritmus teljesítményét vizsgáljuk 73 nyilvánosan elérhető adathalmazból álló változatos gyűjteményen. A hagyományos ritka vektorizátorokat, mint a Tf-Idf és Feature Hashing rendszeresen összehasonlították a legújabb korszerűbb neurális szóbeágyazásokkal, mint a Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText és karakter beágyazások, mint az ELMo, Flair. Ezeknek a vektorizátoroknak a teljesítményét átfogó elemzést végeztünk különböző dimenziókban, mint például osztályozási mutatók (pontosság, visszahívás, pontosság), adatkészlet mérete és kiegyensúlyozatlan adatok (osztálycímkék számának eloszlása tekintetében). Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a ritka vektorizátorok a 73 adathalmazból 61-en átlagosan 3-5%-os marginnal győzték le a neurális szó és karakter beágyazási modellt, és ez a teljesítmény konzisztens az összehasonlítás különböző dimenzióiban.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία μελετάμε την απόδοση αρκετών αλγορίθμων διανυσματικοποίησης κειμένου σε μια ποικίλη συλλογή 73 δημοσίως διαθέσιμων συνόλων δεδομένων. Παραδοσιακοί λιγοστοί διανυσματικοί μηχανισμοί όπως και η λειτουργία έχουν συγκριθεί συστηματικά με τις τελευταίες ενσωμάτωση νευρωνικών λέξεων αιχμής της τεχνολογίας όπως και ενσωμάτωση χαρακτήρων όπως ELMo, Flair. Έχουμε πραγματοποιήσει μια εκτενή ανάλυση της απόδοσης αυτών των διανυσματικών φορέων σε διαφορετικές διαστάσεις όπως μετρήσεις ταξινόμησης (π.χ. ακρίβεια, ανάκληση, ακρίβεια), μέγεθος συνόλου δεδομένων και ανισορροπημένα δεδομένα (όσον αφορά την κατανομή του αριθμού των ετικετών κλάσης). Τα πειράματά μας αποκαλύπτουν ότι οι λιγοστοί διανυσματικοί συντελεστές νίκησαν τα μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης των νευρωνικών λέξεων και χαρακτήρων σε 61 από τα 73 σύνολα δεδομένων με ένα μέσο περιθώριο 3-5% (όσον αφορά τη μακροεντολή και η απόδοση αυτή είναι συνεπής σε όλες τις διαφορετικές διαστάσεις της σύγκρισης.', 'it': "In questo articolo studiamo le prestazioni di diversi algoritmi di vettorializzazione del testo su una raccolta diversificata di 73 dataset pubblicamente disponibili. I vectorizzatori tradizionali sparsi come Tf-Idf e Feature Hashing sono stati sistematicamente confrontati con le più recenti incorporazioni neurali di parole come Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText e incorporazioni di caratteri come ELMo, Flair. Abbiamo effettuato un'analisi approfondita delle prestazioni di questi vettori in diverse dimensioni come metriche di classificazione (precisione, richiamo, precisione), dimensioni del set di dati e dati sbilanciati (in termini di distribuzione del numero di etichette di classe). I nostri esperimenti rivelano che i vettori rari battono i modelli neurali di incorporazione di parole e caratteri su 61 dei 73 dataset con un margine medio del 3-5% (in termini di punteggio macro f1) e questa performance è coerente tra le diverse dimensioni di confronto.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente mes tiriame kelių tekstų vektorizavimo algoritmų rezultatus įvairiame 73 viešai prieinamų duomenų rinkinyje. Tradiciniai nedideliai vektoriai, pvz., Tf-Idf ir Feature Hashing, buvo sistemingai lyginami su naujausiais naujausiais nerviniais žodžiais, pvz., Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText ir simboliais, pvz., ELMo, Flair. Atlikome i šsamią šių vektoritorių veiksmingumo analizę įvairiais matmenimis, pvz., klasifikacijos metrijomis (t. y. tikslumu, atšaukimu, tikslumu), duomenų rinkinio dydžiu ir disbalansuotais duomenimis (klasės etikečių skaičiaus paskirstymo atžvilgiu). Our experiments reveal that the sparse vectorizers beat the neural word and character embedding models on 61 of the 73 datasets by an average margin of 3-5% (in terms of macro f1 score) and this performance is consistent across the different dimensions of comparison.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник ја проучуваме изведбата на неколку алгоритми за векторизација на текст на различна колекција од 73 јавно достапни податоци. Традиционалните мали векторизатори како Tf-Idf и Feature Hashing се систематично споредени со најновите нервни зборови како Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText и знаци како ELMo, Flair. We have carried out an extensive analysis of the performance of these vectorizers across different dimensions like classification metrics (.i.e. precision, recall, accuracy), dataset-size, and imbalanced data (in terms of the distribution of the number of class labels).  Нашите експерименти откриваат дека ретките векторизатори ги победија нервните зборови и карактеристичките модели на 61 од 73 податоци со просечна маргина од 3 до 5 % (во поглед на макро ф1 оценката) и оваа перформанса е константна во различните димензии на споредбата.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami mempelajari prestasi beberapa algoritma vektorisasi teks pada koleksi berbeza 73 set data yang tersedia secara umum. Vektor jarang tradisional seperti Tf-Idf dan Feature Hashing telah dibandingkan secara sistematik dengan keadaan terbaru pembenaman perkataan saraf seperti Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText dan pembenaman aksara seperti ELMo, Flair. Kami telah melakukan analisis ekstensif prestasi vektor in i melalui dimensi berbeza seperti metrik klasifikasi (.i.e. ketepatan, ingatan, ketepatan), saiz set data, dan data yang tidak seimbang (dalam terma pengedaran bilangan label kelas). Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa vektor jarang mengalahkan kata saraf dan model penyembedding aksara pada 61 daripada 73 set data dengan marji rata-rata 3-5% (dalam terma skor makro f1) dan prestasi ini konsisten di dalam dimensi berbeza perbandingan.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d 73 പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ ഒരു വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വെക്ട്രോക്ടറേഷന്\u200d അല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളുടെ പ്രഭാവ ടിഫ്- ഐഡിഫിനെപ്പോലുള്ള പാഠമായ സ്പെയ്സ് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d ഹാഷിംഗിനെയും സിസ്റ്റമികമായി വാര്\u200dഡ്\u200c2വെക്ക്, ഗ്ലോവേവ്, ഫാസ്റ്റ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ടെക്റ്റ് ടെക്സ്റ്റര്\u200d ഹാ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങളിലൂടെ ഈ വെക്റ്ററുകളുടെ പ്രകടനത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു വിശാലമായ അന്വേഷിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ക്ലാസ്സിഫിക്ഷന്\u200d മെറ്റിക്കുകളെപ്പോലെ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200dമാര്\u200d 73 ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ 61 ല്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d വാക്കും സ്വഭാവം മോഡലുകള്\u200d പിടിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു എന്ന് വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. 3-5% (മാക്രോ എഫ', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаздың бірнеше мәтін векторизациялау алгоритмдерін 73 жалпы деректер жинақтарында зерттейміз. Тf- Idf және функциялық хашинг секілді традиционалдық кеңістік векторизаторлар Word2Vec, Glove, FastText және ELMo, Flair секілді сияқты бейнералдық сөздердің соңғы күйіне салыстырылған. Біз бұл векторизерлердің әртүрлі өлшемдерінің шектеулерін (яғни, дұрыс, еске салу, дұрыс), деректер жиынының өлшемі және дисбаланс деректерін (клас жарлықтарының саны үлестіру үшін) жасадық. Біздің тәжірибелеріміз, кеңіл векторизаторлар 73 деректер қорларының 61- інде нейрондық сөз мен таңбаларды ендіру үлгілерін 3- 5% деген орташа шегімен (макро f1 деңгейіндегі) жетілдіреді. Бұл жылдамдығы әртүрлі өлшемдерінде', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule badamy wydajność kilku algorytmów wektoryzacji tekstu na zróżnicowanym zbiorze 73 publicznie dostępnych zbiorów danych. Tradycyjne rzadkie wektoryzatory, takie jak Tf-Idf i Feature Hashing, zostały systematycznie porównywane z najnowszymi najnowocześniejszymi osadzeniami słów neuronowych, takimi jak Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText i osadzeniami znaków, takimi jak ELMo, Flair. Przeprowadziliśmy obszerną analizę wydajności tych wektorów w różnych wymiarach, takich jak wskaźniki klasyfikacyjne (tj. precyzja, przywołanie, dokładność), rozmiar zbioru danych i dane niezrównoważone (pod względem rozkładu liczby etykiet klas). Nasze eksperymenty ujawniają, że rzadkie wektoryzatory pokonują neuronowe modele osadzania słów i znaków na 61 zbiorach danych 73 o średni margines 3-5% (pod względem wyniku makro f1) i wydajność ta jest spójna w różnych wymiarach porównania.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare studiem performanța mai multor algoritmi de vectorizare a textului pe o colecție diversă de 73 de seturi de date disponibile public. Vectorizatoarele tradiționale rare precum Tf-Idf și Feature Hashing au fost comparate sistematic cu cele mai recente încorporări neurale de cuvinte de ultimă generație, cum ar fi Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText și încorporări de caractere precum ELMo, Flair. Am efectuat o analiză amplă a performanței acestor vectorizatoare în diferite dimensiuni, cum ar fi măsurătorile de clasificare (precizie, rechemare, acuratețe), dimensiunea setului de date și datele dezechilibrate (în ceea ce privește distribuția numărului de etichete de clasă). Experimentele noastre arată că vectorizatorii slabi bat modelele neurale de încorporare a cuvintelor și caracterelor pe 61 din cele 73 de seturi de date cu o marjă medie de 3-5% (în termeni de scor macro f1) și această performanță este consistentă în diferitele dimensiuni ale comparației.', 'no': 'I denne papiret studerer vi utviklinga av fleire tekstvektoriseringsalgoritmer på ein ulik samling av 73 tilgjengelege datasett. Tradisjonale sparse vektoriserar som Tf- Idf og funksjonsHashing er systematisk samanlikna med den siste tilstanden til kunsten i nøyralordinnbygginga som Word2Vec, Glove, FastText og teikn som ELMo, Flair. Vi har utført eit utvida analyse av utviklinga av disse vektorane over ulike dimensjonar som klassifikasjonsmeterikk (t.d. nøyaktighet, rekkjell, nøyaktighet), datasettstorleik og ulike data (i tillegg til distribusjonen av talet på klassiske merkelappar). Eksperimentane våre viser at sparse vektoriserane slår den neurale ordet og teikn innebyggende modellen på 61 av de 73 datasettene med gjennomsnittlig margin på 3-5% (med makro f1- poeng) og denne utviklinga er konsistent over dei ulike dimensjonane for sammenlikning.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru proučavamo izvođenje nekoliko vektorizacionih algoritma teksta o različitim kolekcijama 73 dostupnih podataka. Tradicionalni rezervni vektorizeri poput Tf-Idf i Hashing Feature su sistematski uspoređeni sa najnovijim stanjem umetničkih neuralnih reèi uključenih kao Word2Vec, Glove, FastText i uloženja karaktera poput ELMo, Flair. Proveli smo široku analizu učinkovitosti ovih vektorizača u različitim dimenzijama poput klasifikacijske metrike (npr. preciznost, sećanje, tačnost), veličin e podataka i neograničene podatke (u smislu distribucije broja etiketa klase). Naši eksperimenti otkrivaju da su rezervni vektorizeri pobijedili neuralnu reč i modele uključujući karaktere na 61 od 73 dataseta prosječnom maržljivom od 3-5% (u smislu makrof1 rezultata) i da je ta predstava konsistentna u različitim dimenzijama usporedbe.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි පිළිබඳු වෙක්ටරිස් ඇල්ගෝරිතම් වගේ පිළිබඳු දත්ත සේට් 73 වෙනස් සංකේතයක් ගැන ප්\u200dරශ් Name අපි මේ වෙක්ටෝරිස්ටරිස්ටර්ස් ගැන විස්තර විශ්ලේෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ විවිධ විශ්ලේෂණයක් වගේ විවිධ විශේෂණයක් වගේ (.i.e. විශ්ලේෂණය, ප්\u200dරතික අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට වෙක්ටෝරිස්ටර්ස් වචනය සහ අක්ෂර භාවිතේ අනුමුතු වචනය අනුමුතු වචනය අනුමුතු වචනය අනුමුතු විදිහට අනුමුතු 73', 'so': 'In this paper we study the performance of several text vectorization algorithms on a diverse collection of 73 publicly available datasets.  Vectors of traditional sparse like Tf-Idf and Feature Hashing have been systematically compared to the latest state of the art neural word embeddings like Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText and character embeddings like ELMo, Flair. Waxaannu sameynay baaritaan aad u dheer oo sameynta waxqabadka wadooyinka oo kala duduwan oo kala duduwan sida qiyaastii fasaxa (tusaale ahaan saxda, xusuusta, saxda), qiyaastii databaseta iyo macluumaad aan la mid ahayn (sida qaybsiga tirada calaamada fasalka). Imtixaanadayada ayaa muuqanaya in qofka wax jabsada ayaa ku garaacay noocyada nidaamka iyo sawirka ku qoran 61 oo ka mid ah 73-datasets, wuxuuna ku riday qiyaastii ugu dhexaysay 3-5% (xiliga kooxda macro f1) wuxuuna sameynayaa isbardhig kala duduwan oo kala duduwan.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats studerar vi prestandan hos flera textvektoriseringsalgoritmer på en mångsidig samling av 73 offentligt tillgängliga datauppsättningar. Traditionella glesa vektorizers som Tf-Idf och Feature Hashing har systematiskt jämförts med de senaste toppmoderna neurala ord inbäddningar som Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText och tecken inbäddningar som ELMo, Flair. Vi har genomfört en omfattande analys av dessa vektorizers prestanda över olika dimensioner som klassificeringsmetoder (.dvs precision, återkallelse, noggrannhet), datauppsättningsstorlek och obalanserade data (när det gäller fördelningen av antalet klassetiketter). Våra experiment visar att de glesa vektorizerna slår de neurala ord- och teckenbäddningsmodellerna på 61 av 73 datauppsättningar med en genomsnittlig marginal på 3-5% (i termer av makro f1 poäng) och denna prestanda är konsekvent över de olika dimensionerna av jämförelse.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் 73 பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும் தரவு அமைப்புகளின் செயல்பாட்டை நாம் படிக்கிறோம். Name நாங்கள் இந்த நெறிகர்களின் செயல்பாட்டின் விரிவாக ஆய்வு செய்துள்ளோம் வகுப்பு மெட்ரிக்கள் போன்ற வகுப்பு வகுப்பு மெட்ரிக்கள் (, துல்லியம், நினைவு, சரித்தல்), தரவு அம 73 தரவுத்தளத்தின் 61 ல் உள்ள புதிய வார்த்தையும் எழுத்தும் மாதிரிகளையும் வெளிப்படுத்தினார்கள். சராசரி மூன்று 5% (மாக்ரோ F1 புள்ளியில் இருந்து) இந்த செயல்பாடு ஒப்பி', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument nistudjaw il-prestazzjoni ta’ diversi algoritmi ta’ vektorizzazzjoni tat-test fuq ġbir diversifikat ta’ 73 sett ta’ dejta disponibbli għall-pubbliku. Vettorizzaturi rari tradizzjonali bħal Tf-Idf u Feature Hashing tqabblu b’mod sistematiku ma’ l-aħħar inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem newrali avvanzati bħal Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText u inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ karattri bħal ELMo, Flair. Twettqet analiżi estensiva tal-prestazzjoni ta’ dawn il-vetturizzaturi f’dimensjonijiet differenti bħall-metriċi tal-klassifikazzjoni (.i.e. preċi żjoni, ġbir lura, preċiżjoni), id-daqs tas-sett tad-dejta, u dejta żbilanċjata (f’termini tad-distribuzzjoni tan-numru ta’ tikketti tal-klassi). L-esperimenti tagħna juru li l-vetturizzaturi rari jgħaqqdu l-mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem u l-karattru newrali fuq 61 mit-73 sett ta’ dejta b’marġini medju ta’ 3-5% (f’termini ta’ punteġġ makro f1) u din il-prestazzjoni hija konsistenti fid-dimensjonijiet differenti ta’ paragun.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон текст векторизацийн алгоритмын үйл ажиллагааг судлаж байна 73 олон нийтлэг өгөгдлийн санг цуглуулж байна. Tf-Idf болон Feature Hashing шиг уламжлалтын загварын векторизаторууд Word2Vec, Glove, FastText болон зурагтай ELMo, Flair шиг хамгийн сүүлийн үеэс харьцуулсан байдалтай харьцуулсан. Бид эдгээр векторизерүүдийн ажиллагааны талаар олон хэмжээсүүд (яг л тодорхой, санах, зөв байдал), өгөгдлийн сангийн хэмжээг, мөн тэгшитгэл өгөгдлийг (ангийнхэмжээсүүдийн жагсаалтын тоо хэмжээгээр) хийсэн. Бидний туршилтууд мэдрэлийн үг болон харьцааны загварыг 73 өгөгдлийн санд дундаж 3-5% (макро f1 оноо хэмжээний хувьд) дундаж хэмжээний загвартай холбоотой гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک مختلف مجموعہ میں 73 دسترسی ڈاٹ سٹ کے متفرق مختلف مجموعہ پر چند ٹیکسٹ ویکتوریزی الگوریٹم کی عملکرد پڑھتے ہیں. Name ہم نے ان ویکتوریزاروں کی عملکرد کی ایک گھیری تحلیل کی ہے جس طرح کلاسپیٹ میٹریک (یعنی دقیق، یادآوری، دقیق) کی طرح مختلف اندازوں میں (یعنی کلاسپیٹ لیبل کی تعداد کے مطابق) مختلف اندازوں میں۔ ہماری آزمائش ظاہر کرتی ہے کہ سپرس ویکتوریزر نے نیورال لفظ اور کریٹر میں سے 73 ڈیٹ سٹ میں سے 61 موڈل پر غلبہ ڈال دیا ہے ایک متوسط مقدار سے 3-5% (مکرو f1 اسکور کے مطابق) اور یہ عملکرد مختلف اندازوں میں ثابت ہوتی ہے۔', 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu khả năng của nhiều thuật toán về chuyển động văn bản về một bộ sưu tập đầy đủ các dữ liệu có công chúng 73. Truyền thống của các sinh vật rải rác như Tf-Idf và Feature Hashiming đã được so sánh chặt chẽ với chế độ mới nhất của các từ nhân loại thần kinh mới như Word2Vectron, GloVes, FastbText and character embeddings like ElMo, Flair. Chúng tôi đã phân tích kỹ lưỡng các hiệu suất của các véc- tơ này qua các kích thước khác nhau, như cấu trúc âm lượng phân loại, chính xác, chuẩn xác, kích cỡ tập tin, và dữ liệu không cân bằng (theo phân phối số nhãn lớp). Những thí nghiệm của chúng ta cho thấy rằng các véc- tơ rải rác vượt qua các mô- tơ thần kinh và ký tự chứa các mô- đun trên 61 của các bộ gia-tinh dữ liệu 73 với một khoảng cách trung bình của 3-5= (theo tỉ số Mac f1) và hiệu ứng này tương ứng ngang qua các kích thước khác nhau của so sánh.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda biz 73 huddi umumiy maʼlumotlar toʻplami bo'lgan bir necha matn vektorlik algorithining amalni o'rganamiz. Name Biz bu vektorlarning amalni boshqa shakllarga boshqa shakllar bajarib bajardik, masalan classification metriklari (, xotira, xotira), maʼlumot oʻlchami va balandlik maʼlumot (sinf tugmalar soni ajratishda). Our experiments reveal that the sparse vectorizers beat the neural word and character embedding models on 61 of the 73 datasets by an average margin of 3-5% (in terms of macro f1 score) and this performance is consistent across the different dimensions of comparison.", 'nl': 'In dit artikel bestuderen we de prestaties van verschillende tekstvectorisatie algoritmes op een diverse verzameling van 73 publiek beschikbare datasets. Traditionele schaarse vectorizers zoals Tf-Idf en Feature Hashing zijn systematisch vergeleken met de nieuwste state of the art neurale woord embeddings zoals Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText en karakter embeddings zoals ELMo, Flair. We hebben een uitgebreide analyse uitgevoerd van de prestaties van deze vectorizers in verschillende dimensies, zoals classificatiemetrics (.d.w.z. precisie, recall, nauwkeurigheid), dataset-grootte en onevenwichtige gegevens (in termen van de verdeling van het aantal class labels). Onze experimenten tonen aan dat de schaarse vectorizers de neurale woord- en karakterinbeddingsmodellen op 61 van de 73 datasets verslaan met een gemiddelde marge van 3-5% (in termen van macro f1 score) en deze prestaties consistent zijn over de verschillende dimensies van vergelijking.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir die Leistungsfähigkeit mehrerer Textvektorisierungsalgorithmen auf einer vielfältigen Sammlung von 73 öffentlich zugänglichen Datensätzen. Traditionelle spärliche Vektorizer wie Tf-Idf und Feature Hashing wurden systematisch mit den neuesten neuralen Wort-Einbettungen wie Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText und Zeichen-Einbettungen wie ELMo, Flair verglichen. Wir haben eine umfassende Analyse der Leistung dieser Vektorisierer über verschiedene Dimensionen wie Klassifizierungsmetriken (d.h. Präzision, Rückruf, Genauigkeit), Datensatzgröße und ungleichgewichtige Daten (in Bezug auf die Verteilung der Anzahl der Klassenlabels) durchgeführt. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass die spärlichen Vektorisierer die neuronalen Wort- und Zeicheneinbettungsmodelle auf 61 der 73-Datensätze um einen durchschnittlichen Rand von 3-5% (in Bezug auf Makro f1 Score) schlagen und diese Leistung über die verschiedenen Dimensionen des Vergleichs konsistent ist.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия изследваме изпълнението на няколко алгоритма за векторизация на текста върху разнообразна колекция от 73 публично достъпни набора данни. Традиционните редки векторизатори като Тф-Idf и Характерно хаширане са систематично сравнявани с най-новите неврални слова вграждания като Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText и вграждания на знаци като ELMo, Flair. Извършихме обширен анализ на ефективността на тези векторизатори в различни измерения като класификационни показатели (.т.е. точност, изземване, точност), размер на набора от данни и дисбалансирани данни (по отношение на разпределението на броя на етикетите на класовете). Нашите експерименти показват, че рядките векторизатори побеждават невралните модели за вграждане на думи и знаци на 61 от 73 набора данни със среден марж от 3-5% (по отношение на макрос) и това представяне е последователно в различните измерения на сравнение.', 'da': 'I denne artikel undersøger vi ydeevnen af flere tekstvektoriseringsalgoritmer på en bred samling af 73 offentligt tilgængelige datasæt. Traditionelle sparsomme vektorizere som Tf-Idf og Feature Hashing er blevet systematisk sammenlignet med de nyeste state of the art neurale ord indlejringer som Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText og tegn indlejringer som ELMo, Flair. Vi har gennemført en omfattende analyse af disse vektorizeres ydeevne på tværs af forskellige dimensioner som klassifikationstemeter (.dvs. præcision, tilbagekaldelse, nøjagtighed), datasæt-størrelse og ubalancerede data (med hensyn til fordelingen af antallet af klasseetiketter). Vores eksperimenter afslører, at de sparsomme vektorizere slår neurale ord og tegn indlejringsmodeller på 61 af de 73 datasæt med en gennemsnitlig margin på 3-5% (i form af makro f1 score), og denne ydeevne er konsekvent på tværs af de forskellige dimensioner af sammenligning.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 73개의 공개 데이터 집합에서 몇 가지 텍스트 벡터화 알고리즘의 성능을 연구했다.전통적인 희소 벡터기(예를 들어 Tf Idf와 특징 해시)는 최신 신경 단어 삽입(예를 들어 Word2Vec,GloVe,FastText)과 문자 삽입(예를 들어 ELMo,Flair)과 체계적으로 비교했다.우리는 분류 지표(.e. 정밀도, 리콜율, 정확도), 데이터 집합 크기와 불균형 데이터(종류 라벨 수량에 따라 분포)를 광범위하게 분석했다.우리의 실험에 의하면 73개의 데이터가 집중된 61개의 데이터 집합에서 희소 벡터기는 3-5%의 평균 폭으로 신경 단어와 문자 삽입 모델(거시적 f1분수로 말하자면)을 격파했고 이런 성능은 서로 다른 비교 차원에서 일치한다.', 'sw': 'In this paper we study the performance of several text vectorization algorithms on a diverse collection of 73 publicly available datasets.  Wavectors wa uchimbaji wa kimapenzi kama Tf-Idf na Feature Hashing wamekuwa wakilinganishwa na hali ya hivi karibuni ya neno la kidini kama vile Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText na wahusika kama ELMo, Flair. Tumefanya uchambuzi wa kina wa utendaji wa vectors hawa katika maeneo mbalimbali kama mtiririko wa usambazaji (.yaani uhakika, kumbuka, ukweli), ukubwa wa data na data isiyo na usawa (kwa namna ya usambazaji wa idadi ya tabaka). Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa wagonjwa wa moto walishinda maneno na mhusika wa ubongo katika mitandao ya data 61 ya 73 kwa kiwango cha wastani cha asilimia 3-5 (kwa kiwango cha vipimo vya f1) na utendaji huu unalinganisha katika maeneo mbalimbali.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما عملکرد چندین الگوریتم\u200cهای ویکتوریزم متن را در یک مجموعه مختلف از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای 73 در دسترس عمومی مطالعه می\u200cکنیم. ویکتوریزهای سنتی مانند Tf- Idf و هشینگ ویژه سیستماتیک با آخرین وضعیت کلمه عصبی هنری مانند Word2Vec, Glove, FastText و پیوند\u200cهای شخصیت مانند ELMo, Flair مقایسه شده\u200cاند. ما تحلیل عملکرد این ویکتوریزها را در بعدی مختلف انجام داده ایم مثل متریک کلاسیک (یعنی دقیق، یادآوری، دقیق، اندازه\u200cگیری، اندازه\u200cگیری داده\u200cهای داده\u200cها و داده\u200cهای غیرقابل تغییر داده\u200cایم) (به توزیع تعداد برچسب\u200cهای کلاسی). آزمایش\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که ویکتوریزهای ذخیره\u200cای کلمه\u200cی عصبی و شخصیت\u200cهایی که مدل\u200cهای ذخیره\u200cای در 61 از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای 73 را با مرز متوسط ۳-۵% (به عنوان نمونه\u200cی مکرو f1) شکست دادند، و این عملکرد در اندازه\u200cهای مختلف مقایسه است.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda biz esasy üçin birnäçe metin vektorizaçy algoritmalaryň eserini 73 sany mümkin edip bilýär. Tf-Idf we Feature Hashing ýaly däpli süýtgenler, Word2Vec, Glove, FastText we karakter basmalaryň iň soňky durumyna görä edildi. Biz bu vektörleri klasifikasyon metrikleri ýaly farklı ölçülerde etkinleşen ukyplaryň bir analýşin i çözdik. Bizim deneylerimiz, küçük vektörler neural sözlerini ve karakterler içeren modelleri 61'de 3-5% (macro f1 nokat hökmünde) ortalama gabdalyk tarafından döwüldi we bu etkinlik karşılaştırmanyň farklı boyutlarynda sabitlendirildi.", 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami mempelajari prestasi beberapa algoritma vektorisasi teks pada koleksi berbeda dari 73 set data yang tersedia publik. Vektor jarang tradisional seperti Tf-Idf dan Feature Hashing telah secara sistematis dibandingkan dengan state state of the art word neural embedding seperti Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText dan character embedding seperti ELMo, Flair. Kami telah melakukan analisis ekstensif dari prestasi vektorizer in i melalui dimensi yang berbeda seperti metrik klasifikasi (.i.e. presisi, ingatan, akurasi), ukuran dataset, dan data yang tidak seimbang (dalam terma distribusi bilangan label kelas). Eksperimen kami mengungkapkan bahwa vektor langka mengalahkan kata neural dan karakter memasukkan model pada 61 dari 73 set data dengan margin rata-rata 3-5% (dalam terma skor makro f1) dan prestasi ini konsisten di dalam dimensi berbeda perbandingan.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም የጽሑፍ አሌጎርቲዎችን በ73 ህዝብ የተገኘ የዳታ ማኅበረሰብ ላይ እናስተምራለን፡፡ Tf-Idf እና ፊትራር ሐሽን እንደተደረገው የባሕላዊ ምርጫዎች ቃላትን እንደ Word2Vec፣ GloVe፣ Fast Text እና ፊደል እንደ ELMo፣ Flair በሚመስል በአዲስ ደረጃ በተስማማማሚ ሆኖ በተስተካከሉ ነበር። በተለያዩ አካባቢ ሚትሪክ፣ ማስታወቂያ፣ የዳታ መስመር እና የክፍል ማህበረሰብ (የክፍለ የክፍል ምልክቶች ቁጥር በሚያካፈሉ መጠን) እና የክፍል ዳታ አሰራንተናል፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የሳራ vectorers የ73 ዳታተሮችን 61 የነጥብ ቃልና የሥርዓት ዓይነቶችን በመጠቀም 3-5 በመቶ (ማክሮ F1 score) እና ይህም ስርዓት በተለያዩ ክፍሎች ላይ ነው፡፡', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru proučavamo učinkovitost nekoliko vektorizacijskih algoritma teksta o raznim kolekcijama 73 javno dostupnih podataka. Tradicionalni rezervni vektorizeri poput Tf-Idf i Hashing Feature bili su sistematski uspoređeni s najnovijim stanjem umjetničkih neuralnih riječi ugrađenih kao Word2Vec, Glove, FastText i ugrađenja karaktera poput ELMo, Flair. Proveli smo široku analizu učinkovitosti ovih vektorizača u različitim dimenzijama poput klasifikacijske metrike (.tj. preciznost, sjećanje, preciznost), veličin e podataka i neograničene podatke (u smislu distribucije broja etiketa klase). Naši eksperimenti otkrivaju da rezervni vektorizeri pobijedili su neuralnu riječ i modele uključujući karaktere na 61 od 73 dataseta prosječnom marginom od 3-5% (u smislu makrof1 rezultata) i da je taj rezultat u skladu s različitim dimenzijama usporedbe.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք տեքստի վեկտորիզացիայի բազմազան ալգորիթմների արտադրողությունը 73 հանրային հասանելի տվյալների բազմազան հավաքածուի վրա: Թf-IDf և Feature HASIng-ի նման ավանդական փոքրիկ վեկտորիզարները սիստեմատիկ համեմատել են նորագույն նյարդային բառերի, ինչպիսիք են Word2vec, glove, արագ տեքստը և ELMo, Flar-ը: Մենք արեցինք այս վեկտորիզերի արտադրողականության էքսպանցիոն վերլուծություն տարբեր չափերում, ինչպիսիք են դասակարգման մետրիկները (. Մեր փորձարկումները բացահայտում են, որ հազվադեպ վեկտորիչները հաղթահարում են 73 տվյալների 61-ից մոդելները նյարդային բառերի և հերոսների վրա միջին մակարդակի 3-5 տոկոսով, և այս արտադրողությունը համեմատության տարբեր չափերի ընթացքում համապատասխան է:', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër studiojmë shfaqjen e disa algoritmave të vektorizimit të tekstit në një koleksion të ndryshëm prej 73 të dhënave publikisht të disponueshme. Vektorizatorët tradicionalë të shkurtër si Tf-Idf dhe Feature Hashing janë krahasuar sistematikisht me gjendjen më të fundit të fjalëve nervore si Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText dhe karaktere të integrimit si ELMo, Flair. Ne kemi kryer një analizë të gjerë të performancës së këtyre vektorizatorëve në dimensione të ndryshme si metrika klasifikimi (. Eksperimentet tona zbulojnë se vektorizuesit e rrallë mundën fjalën nervore dhe modelet e përfshirjes së karakterit në 61 nga 73 grupet e të dhënave me një margin mesatar prej 3-5% (në lidhje me rezultatin makro f1) dhe kjo performancë është konsistente nëpërmjet dimensioneve të ndryshme të krahasimit.', 'af': "In hierdie papier studeer ons die prestasie van verskeie teks vektorisasie algoritme op 'n verskeie versameling van 73 openlik beskikbaar datastelle. Tradisjoneel sparse vektorisers soos Tf- Idf en Funksie Hashing het sistematiese vergelyk met die nuutste staat van die kuns neurale woord inbettings soos Word2Vec, Glove, FastText en karakterinbettings soos ELMo, Flair. Ons het 'n uitbreidige analisie van die prestasie van hierdie vektorisers uitgevoer deur verskillende dimensies soos klassifikasie metriek (.i. presisie, herrekening, presisie), datastel grootte en onbalanse data (in terms van die verspreiding van die nommer van klas etikette). Ons eksperimente vertoon dat die sparse vektorisers die neurale woord en karakter ingesluit modele op 61 van die 73 datastelle deur 'n gemiddelde marjin van 3- 5% (in terms van makro f1 telling) en hierdie prestasie is bestaan oor die verskillende dimensies van vergelyking.", 'az': 'Bu kağıtda 73-ci müxtəlif verilən qurbanlar barəsində bir neçə metin vektorizasyon algoritminin performansını öyrənirik. Tf-Idf və Feature Hashing kimi nəticəli uzaq vektorizerlər sistematik olaraq Word2Vec, Glove, FastText və karakter içərisində ELMo, Flair kimi müzik nöral sözlərin son durumu ilə qarşılaşdırıldı. Biz bu vektorizerlərin performansının geniş analizi, klasifikasyon metrikləri kimi müxtəlif ölçülərdə (məsələn, precizit, recall, accuracy), veri qurması böyüklüyü və dəyişiklik məlumatların (sınıf etiketlərin sayısı ilə dağılınması kimi) i şlədik. Bizim təcrübələrimiz göstərir ki, küçük vektorizerlər nöral sözləri və karakterləri 73 veri qurularının 61-si ilə ortalama margini 3-5% (makro f1 score ilə) döyüşdülər və bu təcrübə müxtəlif ölçüləri ilə birləşdirildi.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku studujeme výkon několika algoritmů textové vektorizace na různorodé sbírce 73 veřejně dostupných datových sad. Tradiční řídké vektorizátory jako Tf-Idf a Feature Hashing byly systematicky porovnávány s nejnovějšími nejmodernějšími vloženími neuronových slov jako Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText a vložením znaků jako ELMo, Flair. Provedli jsme rozsáhlou analýzu výkonu těchto vektorizátorů napříč různými dimenzemi, jako jsou klasifikační metriky (tj. přesnost, odvolání, přesnost), velikost datové sady a nevyvážená data (z hlediska rozložení počtu štítků tříd). Naše experimenty ukazují, že řídké vektorizátory porazily neuronové slovo a znaky vložené modely na 61 datových sadách 73 o průměrný okraj 3-5% (z hlediska makro f1 skóre) a tento výkon je konzistentní napříč různými dimenzemi srovnání.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি টেক্সট ভেক্টরেশন অ্যালগরিদমের প্রদর্শনী গবেষণা করছি ৭৩ জন প্রকাশ্যে বিভিন্ন সংগ্রহের উপর। টিএফ-আইডিফ এবং ফিটার হ্যাশিং এর মত ঐতিহ্যবাহী স্প্যাস ভেক্টর ব্যবস্থা ব্যবস্থাপনা করেছে যেমন ওয়ার্ড ২ভেক, গ্লোভে, ফাস্ট ট টেক্সট এবং চরিত্র যেমন ইএলমো ফ্লেয়ারের। আমরা বিভিন্ন ভেক্টরের প্রভাবের বিশেষ বিশ্লেষণ করেছি যেমন ক্লাসাফিকেশন মেট্রিক (, সুস্পষ্ট, স্মরণ, সঠিকভাবে), ডাটাসেট আকার এবং অসম্পূর্ণ তথ্য (ক্লাসের লেবেলের আমাদের পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা প্রকাশ করেছে যে স্মার্স ভেক্টরিজাররা ৭৩ ডাটাসেটের ৬১-এ নিউরেল শব্দ এবং চরিত্রের মডেল হারিয়েছেন। সাধারণ মার্গিন ৩-৫% (ম্যাক্রো এফ১', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös uurime mitmete tekstivektoriseerimise algoritmide jõudlust mitmekesises 73 avalikult kättesaadavas andmekogumis. Traditsioonilisi hõredaid vektorisaatoreid nagu Tf-Idf ja Feature Hashing on süstemaatiliselt võrreldakse uusimate neurosõnade manustamisega nagu Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText ja märkide manustamisega nagu ELMo, Flair. Oleme läbi viinud ulatusliku analüüsi nende vektorite jõudluse erinevates mõõtmetes nagu klassifikatsioonimõõdikud (täpsus, tagasikutsumine, täpsus), andmekogumi suurus ja tasakaalustamatud andmed (klassimärgiste arvu jaotus). Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et hõredad vektorisaatorid võitsid 73 andmekogumist 61-l närvisõna- ja märgipõimimismudeleid keskmiselt 3-5% (makro f1 skoori mõttes) ja see jõudlus on erinevates võrdlusdimensioonides ühtlane.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru proučavamo učinkovitost nekoliko algoritma za vektorizaciju teksta o različitim kolekcijama 73 dostupnih podataka. Tradicionalni rezervni vektorizeri poput Tf-Idf i Hashing Feature bili su sistematski uspoređeni sa najnovijim stanjem umjetničkih neuralnih riječi ugrađenja poput Word2Vec, Glove, FastText i ugrađenja karaktera poput ELMo, Flair. Proveli smo široku analizu učinkovitosti ovih vektorizača u različitim dimenzijama poput klasifikacijske metrike (.tj. preciznost, sjećanje, preciznost), veličin e podataka i neograničene podatke (u smislu distribucije broja etiketa klase). Naši eksperimenti otkrivaju da su rezervni vektorizeri pobijedili neuralnu riječ i modele uključujući karaktere na 61 od 73 dataseta prosječnom maržanju od 3-5% (u smislu makrof1 rezultata) i da je taj rezultat u skladu s različitim dimenzijama usporedbe.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä tutkitaan useiden tekstivektorisointialgoritmien suorituskykyä 73 julkisesti saatavilla olevan aineiston monipuolisessa kokoelmassa. Perinteisiä harvoja vektorisaattoreita, kuten Tf-Idf ja Feature Hashing, on systemaattisesti verrattu uusimpiin neurosanaupotuksiin, kuten Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText ja merkkiupotuksiin, kuten ELMo, Flair. Olemme tehneet kattavan analyysin näiden vektorisaattoreiden suorituskyvystä eri ulottuvuuksissa, kuten luokittelumetriikassa (tarkkuus, takaisinkutsu, tarkkuus), aineiston koossa ja epätasapainossa olevissa tiedoissa (luokkatunnisteiden lukumäärän jakautumisessa). Kokeet paljastavat, että harvat vektorisaattorit päihittivät 61:n sanan ja merkin sulauttamismallit 73:sta aineistosta keskimäärin 3-5%:lla (makro f1 -pisteellä mitattuna) ja tämä suorituskyky on yhdenmukainen vertailun eri ulottuvuuksissa.', 'ca': "En aquest paper estudiem el rendiment de diversos algoritmes de vectorització de text en una diversa col·lecció de 73 conjunts de dades disponibles al públic. Vectors pocs tradicionals com Tf-Idf i Feature Hashing han estat sistemàticament comparats amb l'últim estat d'integració neuronal de paraules com Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText i personatges com ELMo, Flair. Hem fet una an àlisi extensa del rendiment d'aquests vectoritzadors en diferents dimensions com les mètriques de classificació (i.e. precisió, recuperació, precisió), mida del conjunt de dades i dades desequilibradas (en termes de distribució del nombre d'etiquetes de classe). Els nostres experiments revelen que els petits vectoritzadors vencen els models neurològics d'incorporació de paraules i caràcters en 61 dels 73 conjunts de dades amb un marge mitjà de 3-5% (en termes de puntuació macro f1) i aquest rendiment és consistent en les diferents dimensions de comparació.", 'jv': 'In this paper we see the output of a number of text vector Algorithms Name We have lined up an expanded measurement of the output of this vector zer Awak dhéwé éntuk éntukno karo perusahaan vector-an an sing gak nggawe perusahaan kelas-kelas lan caratar sing bisa basa manut ning weruh-manut ning weruh-manut ning weruh-manut ning weruh-manut ning weruh-manut sing dibuté dhéwé, éwé kayané sampek kedaulatan sampek karo ngono', 'sk': 'V prispevku preučujemo delovanje vektorskih algoritmov besedila na raznoliki zbirki 73 javno dostopnih podatkovnih nizov. Tradicionalni redki vektorji, kot so Tf-Idf in Feature Hashing, so sistematično primerjali z najnovejšimi nevralnimi besedami, kot so Word2Vec, GloVe, FastText in vgradnje znakov, kot so ELMo, Flair. Izvedli smo obsežno analizo učinkovitosti teh vektorjev v različnih dimenzijah, kot so klasifikacijske meritve (.t. natančnost, odpoklic, točnost), velikost nabora podatkov in neravnoteženi podatki (glede na porazdelitev števila oznak razredov). Naši eksperimenti so pokazali, da redki vektorji premagajo nevronske modele vključevanja besed in znakov na 61 od 73 naborov podatkov za povprečno mejo 3-5% (glede na oceno makro f1), ta učinkovitost pa je dosledna v različnih dimenzijah primerjave.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã karatun mafarin algoritori masu iya cikin wasu algoritori na shiryarwa na daban-jama'a 73 da ake samu da bayani. KCharselect unicode block name Mun yi ƙidãya ga aikin waɗannan masu shiryarwa a cikin wasu diminisai dabam-dabam, kamar shirin daraja (, misali, tsari, tsari, da tsarin data da za'a daidaita (cikin raba ko da yawan alama cikin daraja). Mijarayanmu suka bayyana cewa masu sakar da ke ƙara motsi na neural da mazaɓa wanda ke cikin tsari na 73, yana da gwargwadon margin 3-5% (kama da matsayin f1 score) kuma wannan aikin yana daidai a cikin duk daban-dabam.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་གེ་སྒྲུབ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་རྣམས་ལ་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་སྐྱེས་ཚིག་གཞན Traditional sparse vectorizers like Tf-Idf and Feature Hashing have been systematically compared with the latest state of the art neural word embeddings like Word2Vec, Glove, FastText and character embeddings like ELMo, Flair. We have carried out an extensive analysis of the performance of these vectorizers across different dimensions like classification metrics (.i.e. precision, recall, accuracy), dataset-size, and imbalanced data (in terms of the distribution of the number of class labels). ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་ཟླ་བ་སྐྱེས་པའི་བརྗོད་མཁན་ཚུ་གིས་མཐུན་པའི་གྲངས་ཀ་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ནང་བཙུགས་སྐྱེས་པའི་དཔེ་གཞི་བཙུགས་སྟངས་ལ་ཉུང་མཐའ་དབུགས་འདི་ཕན་ཚུན་', 'he': 'In this paper we study the performance of several text vectorization algorithms on a diverse collection of 73 publicly available datasets.  ויקטוריזצים נדירים מסורתיים כמו Tf-Idf והחסינג אופייני הושוואים באופן שיטתי עם המצב האחרון של המילים העצביות כמו Word2Vec, Glove, FastText והחסינג אופיינים כמו ELMo, Flair. We have carried out an extensive analysis of the performance of these vectorizers across different dimensions like classification metrics (.i.e. precision, recall, accuracy), dataset-size, and imbalanced data (in terms of the distribution of the number of class labels).  Our experiments reveal that the sparse vectorizers beat the neural word and character embedding models on 61 of the 73 datasets by an average margin of 3-5% (in terms of macro f1 score) and this performance is consistent across the different dimensions of comparison.'}
{'en': 'Personality-dependent Neural Text Summarization', 'fr': 'Synthèse de texte neuronal dépendante de la personnalité', 'ar': 'تلخيص النص العصبي المعتمد على الشخصية', 'es': 'Resumen de texto neuronal dependiente de la personalidad', 'pt': 'Sumarização de Texto Neural Dependente da Personalidade', 'zh': '人格依赖性神经文本摘要', 'ru': 'NERVNOI TEXT SUMMARIZATSIIA OTDELENNAIA', 'hi': 'व्यक्तित्व-निर्भर तंत्रिका पाठ सारांशीकरण', 'ja': 'パーソナリティ依存ニューラルテキストの要約', 'ga': 'Pearsantacht-spleách Néarach Téacs Achoimre', 'ka': 'პერაციალურობის შესახებ ნეირალური ტექსტის კომპანიზაციაName', 'el': 'Περίληψη Νευρικού Κειμένου Εξαρτώμενου από την προσωπικότητα', 'hu': 'Személyiségfüggő neurális szövegösszefoglalás', 'it': 'Sintesi del testo neurale dipendente dalla personalità', 'kk': 'Дербес тәуелді нейрондық мәтін тұжырымдамасы', 'lt': 'Nuo asmens priklausomas neurologinio teksto santrauka', 'mk': 'Резултат на неуралниот текст зависен од личноста', 'mt': 'Sommarju tat-test newrali dipendenti fuq il-personalità', 'ml': 'വ്യക്തിപരമായ- ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d പദാവലിയുടെ ചുരുക്കം', 'ms': 'Penapisan Teks Neural Bergantung Kepribadian', 'mn': 'Хүний хувьд хамааралтай мэдрэлийн текст цуглуулга', 'no': 'Samandring av nøyraltekst med personlegheit avhengig', 'pl': 'Podsumowanie tekstu neuronowego zależnego od osobowości', 'ro': 'Rezumat text neural dependent de personalitate', 'sr': 'Osobno zavisno od neiralnog teksta', 'si': 'පෞද්ගලිකතාවය සම්බන්ධතාවක් නිර්මාණ පාළුව සංශ්\u200dය', 'so': 'Takhasuska qoraalka qoyska ee qofka ku xiran', 'sv': 'Personlighetsberoende neural textsammanfattning', 'ta': 'தனிப்பட்ட- சார்ந்த புதிய உரை சுருக்கம்', 'ur': 'شخصیت-dependent Neural Text Summarization', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Обобщение на невронния текст, зависимо от личността', 'nl': 'Persoonlijkheidsafhankelijke samenvatting van neurale tekst', 'da': 'Personlighedsafhængig neural tekst opsummering', 'hr': 'Sažetak Neuralnog teksta ovisnog o osobnosti', 'de': 'Pers√∂nlichkeitsabh√§ngige Zusammenfassung des neuronalen Textes', 'id': 'Penapisan Teks Neural Tergantung Kepribadian', 'ko': '개성에 기초한 신경 텍스트 요약', 'fa': 'تعداد متن عصبی بستگی به شخصیت', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa maandishi ya kijasiri inayotegemea', 'tr': 'Şahsy Maglumaty Jawany Täze Metin Toplaýyşy', 'af': 'Persoonlike- afhanklik Neurale Teks Opsomming', 'sq': 'Përshkrimi i tekstit nervor i varur nga personaliteti', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'hy': 'Անհատականությունից կախված նյարդային տեքստի համառոտագրություն', 'az': 'Kişilik-bağlı nöral Metin Toplaşdırması', 'bn': 'ব্যক্তিগত- নির্ভর নিউরাল লেখা সামারিজেশন', 'bs': 'Sažetak Neuralnog teksta ovisnog o osobnosti', 'ca': 'Resumen del text neuronal dependent de la personalitat', 'cs': 'Souhrn neuronového textu závislý na osobnosti', 'et': 'Isiksusest sõltuv neuroteksti kokkuvõte', 'fi': 'Persoonallisuudesta riippuva neurotekstin yhteenveto', 'jv': 'Samurasi tèks Neral', 'sk': 'Povzetek živčnega besedila, odvisnega od osebnosti', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རང་ཉིད་རྟེན་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་གི་བཅུད་སྡུད་རྟགས', 'he': 'Personality-dependent Neural Text Summarization'}
{'en': 'In Natural Language Generation systems, personalization strategies-i.e, the use of information about a target author to generate text that (more) closely resembles human-produced language-have long been applied to improve results. The present work addresses one such strategy-namely, the use of Big Five personality information about the target author-applied to the case of abstractive text summarization using neural sequence-to-sequence models. Initial results suggest that having access to personality information does lead to more accurate (or human-like) text summaries, and paves the way for more robust systems of this kind.', 'fr': "Dans les systèmes de génération de langage naturel, les stratégies de personnalisation - c'est-à-dire l'utilisation d'informations sur un auteur cible pour générer un texte qui ressemble (plus) à un langage produit par l'homme - sont appliquées depuis longtemps pour améliorer les résultats. Le présent travail aborde l'une de ces stratégies - à savoir l'utilisation d'informations de personnalité Big Five sur l'auteur cible - appliquée au cas de la synthèse de texte abstrait à l'aide de modèles neuronaux de séquence à séquence. Les premiers résultats suggèrent que l'accès aux informations de personnalité conduit à des résumés textuels plus précis (ou ressemblant à des humains), et ouvre la voie à des systèmes plus robustes de ce type.", 'es': 'En los sistemas de generación de lenguaje natural, las estrategias de personalización, es decir, el uso de información sobre un autor objetivo para generar texto que (más) se parezca más al lenguaje producido por el hombre, se han aplicado durante mucho tiempo para mejorar los resultados. El presente trabajo aborda una de esas estrategias, a saber, el uso de la información de personalidad de los Cinco Grandes sobre el autor objetivo, aplicada al caso de la sumarización abstractiva de textos utilizando modelos neuronales de secuencia a secuencia. Los resultados iniciales sugieren que tener acceso a la información sobre la personalidad conduce a resúmenes de texto más precisos (o similares a los humanos), y allana el camino para sistemas más sólidos de este tipo.', 'ar': 'في أنظمة إنشاء اللغة الطبيعية ، تم تطبيق استراتيجيات التخصيص - أي استخدام المعلومات حول المؤلف المستهدف لإنشاء نص (أكثر) يشبه إلى حد كبير اللغة التي ينتجها الإنسان - لتحسين النتائج. يتناول العمل الحالي إحدى هذه الإستراتيجيات - وهي استخدام معلومات شخصية الخمسة الكبار عن المؤلف المستهدف - المطبقة على حالة تلخيص النص التجريدي باستخدام نماذج التسلسل العصبي إلى التسلسل. تشير النتائج الأولية إلى أن الوصول إلى معلومات الشخصية يؤدي إلى ملخصات نصية أكثر دقة (أو شبيهة بالبشر) ، ويمهد الطريق لأنظمة أكثر قوة من هذا النوع.', 'pt': 'Nos sistemas de geração de linguagem natural, as estratégias de personalização - ou seja, o uso de informações sobre um autor de destino para gerar texto que (mais) se assemelham à linguagem produzida por humanos - têm sido aplicadas há muito tempo para melhorar os resultados. O presente trabalho aborda uma dessas estratégias - a saber, o uso de informações de personalidade do Big Five sobre o autor alvo - aplicado ao caso de sumarização de texto abstrativo usando modelos neurais de sequência a sequência. Os resultados iniciais sugerem que ter acesso a informações de personalidade leva a resumos de texto mais precisos (ou semelhantes a humanos) e abre caminho para sistemas mais robustos desse tipo.', 'ja': '自然言語生成システムでは、パーソナライズ戦略、すなわち、ターゲットとなる著者に関する情報を使用して、人間が生み出した言語に（より）よく似たテキストを生成することは、結果を改善するために長い間適用されてきた。本研究は、ニューラルシーケンスツーシーケンスモデルを用いた抽象的なテキストサマリのケースに適用される、そのような戦略の1つ、すなわち、ターゲット作者に関するビッグファイブの人格情報の使用に取り組んでいる。初期の結果は、人格情報へのアクセスがより正確な（または人間のような）テキストの要約につながり、この種のより堅牢なシステムへの道を開くことを示唆している。', 'zh': '自然语言生统中,个性化策 - 虽以信息成(更)类人言之本 - 久而用之于改善也。 本解一策 - 虽以五大人格信 - 宜用神经序于序摘要。 初结果表明,访人信息,诚有确(若类人)文本摘要,为此更强铺平道路。', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी प्रणालियों में, वैयक्तिकरण रणनीतियों - यानी, एक लक्ष्य लेखक के बारे में जानकारी का उपयोग पाठ उत्पन्न करने के लिए जो (अधिक) मानव-उत्पादित भाषा जैसा दिखता है - परिणामों को बेहतर बनाने के लिए लंबे समय से लागू किया गया है। वर्तमान कार्य एक ऐसी रणनीति को संबोधित करता है - अर्थात्, लक्ष्य लेखक के बारे में बिग फाइव व्यक्तित्व जानकारी का उपयोग - तंत्रिका अनुक्रम-टू-अनुक्रम मॉडल का उपयोग करके अमूर्त पाठ सारांशीकरण के मामले में लागू होता है। प्रारंभिक परिणाम बताते हैं कि व्यक्तित्व जानकारी तक पहुंच होने से अधिक सटीक (या मानव-जैसे) पाठ सारांश होते हैं, और इस तरह की अधिक मजबूत प्रणालियों के लिए मार्ग प्रशस्त होता है।', 'ru': 'В системах генерации естественного языка стратегии персонализации - т.е. использование информации о целевом авторе для генерации текста, который (более) напоминает язык, созданный человеком - уже давно применяются для улучшения результатов. В настоящей работе рассматривается одна из таких стратегий, а именно использование информации о личности целевого автора Большой пятерки, применяемая к случаю абстрактного обобщения текста с использованием моделей нейронной последовательности-последовательности. Первоначальные результаты показывают, что доступ к информации о личности действительно приводит к более точным (или похожим на человека) текстовым резюме и прокладывает путь к более надежным системам такого рода.', 'ga': 'I gcórais Ghiniúint Teanga Nádúrtha, tá straitéisí pearsanaithe - i.e., úsáid faisnéise faoi spriocúdar chun téacs a ghintear (níos mó) atá cosúil go dlúth le teanga a tháirgtear ag an duine - curtha i bhfeidhm le fada chun torthaí a fheabhsú. Tugann an saothar reatha aghaidh ar straitéis amháin dá leithéid - is é sin, úsáid faisnéise pearsantachta Big Five faoin spriocúdar - a chuirtear i bhfeidhm ar chás achoimre teibí téacs ag baint úsáide as samhlacha néaracha seicheamh-go-seicheamh. Tugann torthaí tosaigh le fios go n-eascródh achoimrí téacs níos cruinne (nó cosúil le daoine) as rochtain ar fhaisnéis phearsantachta, agus go réitíonn sé an bealach do chórais níos láidre den chineál seo.', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelv generálási rendszerekben régóta alkalmazzák a személyre szabási stratégiákat, azaz a célszerzőről szóló információk felhasználását olyan szövegek létrehozására, amelyek (jobban) hasonlítanak az ember által előállított nyelvre. Jelen munka egy ilyen stratégiával foglalkozik, nevezetesen a célszerzőre vonatkozó Big Five személyiség információinak felhasználásával, amelyet neurális szekvencia-szekvencia modellek segítségével alkalmazunk absztraktív szövegösszefoglalásra. A kezdeti eredmények arra utalnak, hogy a személyiségi információkhoz való hozzáférés pontosabb (vagy emberszerű) szövegösszefoglalókhoz vezet, és megnyitja az utat az ilyen fajta robusztusabb rendszereknek.', 'el': 'Στα συστήματα δημιουργίας φυσικής γλώσσας, οι στρατηγικές εξατομίκευσης, δηλαδή η χρήση πληροφοριών για έναν συγγραφέα-στόχο για τη δημιουργία κειμένου που (περισσότερο) μοιάζει με ανθρώπινη γλώσσα, έχουν εφαρμοστεί από καιρό για τη βελτίωση των αποτελεσμάτων. Η παρούσα εργασία ασχολείται με μία τέτοια στρατηγική, δηλαδή με τη χρήση πληροφοριών προσωπικότητας των Μεγάλων Πέντε σχετικά με τον στόχο συγγραφέα που εφαρμόζεται στην περίπτωση της αφηρημένης σύνοψης κειμένου χρησιμοποιώντας μοντέλα νευρωνικής αλληλουχίας σε αλληλουχία. Τα αρχικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η πρόσβαση σε πληροφορίες προσωπικότητας οδηγεί σε ακριβέστερες (ή ανθρώπινες) περιλήψεις κειμένου και ανοίγει το δρόμο για πιο ισχυρά συστήματα αυτού του είδους.', 'it': "Nei sistemi di generazione del linguaggio naturale, le strategie di personalizzazione - cioè l'uso di informazioni su un autore target per generare testo che (più) assomiglia molto al linguaggio prodotto dall'uomo - sono state applicate a lungo per migliorare i risultati. Il presente lavoro affronta una di queste strategie - vale a dire l'uso delle informazioni sulla personalità Big Five sull'autore target - applicate al caso di sintesi astratta del testo utilizzando modelli neurali sequenza-sequenza. I risultati iniziali suggeriscono che avere accesso alle informazioni sulla personalità porta a sintesi testuali più accurate (o simili a quelle umane) e apre la strada a sistemi più robusti di questo tipo.", 'kk': 'Түзіндік тілдерді құру жүйелерінде, өзгерту стратегиялары - мысалы, нақты автор туралы мәтін құру үшін (көбірек) адамдардың құрылған тілдеріне сәйкес келетін мәтін құру үшін - нәтижелерді Назардағы жұмыс бірінің осы стратегиясына адрес береді - мысалы, мақсатты автор туралы Үлкен Бес жеке мәліметін қолдану - невралдық реттеу- мен реттеу үлгілерімен қолданылатын абстрактивті мәтін тұжыры Бастапқы нәтижелер жеке мәліметтерге қатынау мүмкіндігі арналған мәтін тұжырымдарына (немесе адамдардың сияқты) тұжырымдарына көмектеседі, және осы түрлі құпты жүйелер үші', 'lt': 'Gamtinės kalbos generavimo sistemose, siekiant pagerinti rezultatus, jau seniai taikomos individualizacijos strategijos, t. y. informacijos apie tikslinį autorį naudojimas tekstui, kuris (labiau) panašus į žmogaus pagamintą kalbą, kurti. Šiame darbe nagrinėjama viena tokia strategija - t. y. didžiųjų penkių asmenybės informacijos apie tikslinį autorį naudojimas - taikoma abstrakcinės teksto santraukos atveju naudojant nervinės sekos modelius. Pradiniai rezultatai rodo, kad galimybė susipažinti su asmenybės informacija sukuria tikslesnes (arba žmogaus tipo) teksto santraukas ir atveria kelią tokioms patikimesnėms sistemoms.', 'ka': 'სისტემებში, პორცინალიზაციის სტრატიგიებში, ინფორმაციის გამოყენება მინიშვნელოვანი ავტორის შესახებ ტექსტის შექმნა, რომელიც (უფრო) ადამიანის გამოიყენებული ენაში მხოლოდ გამოყენებული ენაში -  მიმდინარე სამუშაო სამუშაო ერთი ასეთი სტრატიგია - ანუ, დიდი ხუთი პირადგილური ინფორმაციის გამოყენება მისაწყისი ავტორის შესახებ - გამოყენება აბსტრაქტიური ტექსტის სიმბუზ პირველი წარმოდგენების შესახებ, რომ პირადნობის ინფორმაციის შესაძლებლობა უფრო მარტივი (ან ადამიანის განსხვავებული) ტექსტის შესაძლებლობად გააკეთება, და ამისთვის უფრო ძალიან', 'mk': 'Во системите на генерација на природен јазик, стратегиите за персонализација - т.е. употребата на информации за целниот автор за генерирање текст кој (повеќе) личи на човековиот јазик - долго време се применуваат за подобрување на резултатите. Сегашната работа се обраќа на една ваква стратегија - имено, употребата на информациите за големите пет личности за авторот на целта - примени на случајот на апстрактивна резултатација на текстот користејќи невропски модели од секвенца до секвенца. Првичните резултати укажуваат на тоа дека имањето пристап до информации за личноста води до попрецизни (или човечки) текстови резултати и го отвора патот за посилни системи од овој вид.', 'ms': 'Dalam sistem Penjanaan Bahasa Alami, strategi personalisasi - iaitu, penggunaan maklumat mengenai penulis sasaran untuk menghasilkan teks yang (lebih) mirip bahasa yang dihasilkan oleh manusia - telah lama dilaksanakan untuk meningkatkan keputusan. Kerja ini mengarahkan satu strategi seperti ini - iaitu, penggunaan maklumat peribadi Lima Besar mengenai penulis sasaran - dilaksanakan pada kes penghuraian teks abstraktif menggunakan model urutan-ke-urutan saraf. Hasil awal menunjukkan bahawa mempunyai akses kepada maklumat peribadi tidak membawa kepada ringkasan teks yang lebih tepat (atau seperti manusia), dan membuka jalan untuk sistem yang lebih kuat semacam ini.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രജനനത്തിന്റെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d, വ്യക്തിപരമായ വ്യവസ്ഥ- അതായത് ലക്ഷ്യരചയ്ക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗി ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ജോലി ഒരു പ്രവർത്തിയെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു- ലക്ഷ്യം രചയിതാവിനെപ്പറ്റി വലിയ അഞ്ച് വ്യക്തിപരമായ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത്- ന്യൂറല്\u200d സെക് ആദ്യത്തെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യക്തിപരമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമല്ലെന്ന് നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കുന്നു. വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശദീകരിച്ച (അല്ലെങ്കി', 'mt': 'Fis-sistemi tal-Ġenerazzjoni tal-Lingwa Natural i, l-istrateġiji ta’ personalizzazzjoni – jiġifieri, l-użu ta’ informazzjoni dwar awtur fil-mira biex jiġġenera test li (aktar) jixbah mill-qrib lil lingwa prodotta mill-bniedem – ilhom jiġu applikati għal żmien twil biex jittejbu r-riżultati. Il-ħidma preżenti tindirizza strateġija waħda bħal din - jiġifieri, l-użu ta’ informazzjoni dwar il-personalità tal-Ħames Kbar dwar l-awtur fil-mira - applikata għall-każ ta’ sommarju tat-test astratt bl-użu ta’ mudelli ta’ sekwenza għal sekwenza newrali. Initial results suggest that having access to personality information does lead to more accurate (or human-like) text summaries, and paves the way for more robust systems of this kind.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл төрөлхтний системд хувилбарчлалын стратеги - тэгэхээр, зорилготой зохиолчдын тухай мэдээлэл хэрэглэх нь хүн төрөлхтний бүтээгдэхүүний хэл илүү ойролцоогоор (илүү) төрөлхтний төрөлхтний тулд - үр Харин одоогийн ажлын нэг иймэрхүү стратегийг дамжуулдаг. Энэ бол, зорилготой зохиолчдын тухай Биг таван хувийн мэдээллийн хэрэглээ. Эхний үр дүн нь хувийн мэдээлэл дээр хүрэх боломжтой байх нь илүү тодорхой (эсвэл хүн төрөлхтний төстэй) текст цуглуулалт болж, ийм төрлийн илүү хүчтэй системүүдэд арга замыг тайлбарладаг.', 'no': 'I naturleg språk-genereringssystemet har personaliseringsstrategiar, dvs. bruken av informasjon om eit målskriver for å laga tekst som (meir) nærare liknar menneske-produsert språk - har lang brukt for å forbedra resultat. Den gjeldande arbeidet adresserer ein slik strategi, dvs. bruken av Big Five personalitetsinformasjon om målet- forfatteren, som er brukt i tilfellet av abstraktiv tekstsammendrag med neuralsekvens- til- sekvensmodeller. Førehandsvising tyder på at tilgang til personlighetsinformasjon fører til meir nøyaktige (eller menneskelige) tekstsamandringar, og gjer måten til meir robust systemar på denne typen.', 'pl': 'W systemach Natural Language Generation strategie personalizacji tj. wykorzystanie informacji o docelowym autorze do generowania tekstu, który (bardziej) przypomina język produkowany przez człowieka, od dawna stosowane są w celu poprawy wyników. Niniejsza praca dotyczy jednego z takich współczynników strategicznych, a mianowicie wykorzystania informacji o osobowości Big Five dotyczących docelowego autora zastosowanego w przypadku abstrakcyjnego podsumowania tekstu przy użyciu modeli sekwencji neuronowej. Wstępne wyniki sugerują, że dostęp do informacji o osobowości prowadzi do dokładniejszych (lub ludzkich) podsumowań tekstowych i toruje drogę do bardziej solidnych tego rodzaju systemów.', 'ro': 'În sistemele de generare a limbajului natural, strategiile de personalizare - adică utilizarea informațiilor despre un autor țintă pentru a genera text care (mai) seamănă cu limbajul produs de om - au fost mult timp aplicate pentru a îmbunătăți rezultatele. Prezenta lucrare abordează o astfel de strategie - și anume, utilizarea informațiilor Big Five despre personalitatea autorului țintă - aplicată în cazul rezumației abstractive a textului folosind modele neuronale secvență-secvență. Rezultatele inițiale sugerează că accesul la informațiile despre personalitate duce la rezumate text mai precise (sau asemănătoare cu oamenii) și deschide calea pentru sisteme mai robuste de acest tip.', 'so': "In Natural Language Generation systems, personalization strategies - i.e, the use of information about a target author to generate text that (more) closely resembles human-produced language - have long been applied to improve results.  Shaqo joogtada ah wuxuu ku qoran yahay qoraal kaas oo kale, isticmaalka macluumaadka shakhsiyeed ee weyn shan ee qofka qoraalka la jeedo- wuxuu ku codsaday xaaladda qoraalka la'aanta ah oo la isticmaalayo sameynta qaababka neurada-ilaa-xilliga. Arimaha hore waxay ka jeedaa in la helo macluumaadka shakhsiga ah wuxuu u keenaa summarinta saxda ah (ama dadka la mid ah) oo u eg, wuxuuna hogaamiyaa jidka loo sameeyo nidaamkan oo kale oo la isticmaalo.", 'sv': 'I Natural Language Generation system har personaliseringsstrategier, dvs. användning av information om en målförfattare för att generera text som (mer) liknar mänskligt producerat språk, länge tillämpats för att förbättra resultaten. Detta arbete behandlar en sådan strategi - nämligen användningen av Big Five personlighetsinformation om målförfattaren - tillämpad på fall av abstraktiv textsammanfattning med hjälp av neurala sekvens-till-sekvensmodeller. Initiala resultat tyder på att tillgång till personlighetsinformation leder till mer exakta (eller människoliknande) textsammanfattningar och banar väg för mer robusta system av detta slag.', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව නිර්මාණය පද්ධතියේ, පුද්ගලිකරණය ස්ථාපනය - ඉතින්, ඉලක්ෂ ලේඛකය ගැන තොරතුරු භාවිතා භාවිතා කරන්න මිනිස් දැන් වැඩේ මෙහෙම ව්\u200dයාපෘතිකරණයෙන් මෙහෙම ව්\u200dයාපෘතිකරණය කරනවා - මෙහෙම විශේෂ පහත් විශේෂ තොරතුරු භාවිතා කරන්න - මෙහෙම ලේඛක පළමු ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතික තොරතුරු ලබාගන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට තරම් සැ', 'sr': 'U sistemima generacije prirodnog jezika, strategije za personalizaciju - tj. korištenje informacija o ciljnom autoru kako bi stvorili tekst koji (više) bliže liči na ljudski jezik proizvođen - dugo su primjenjene za poboljšanje rezultata. Sadašnji rad se obraća na takvu strategiju - a to je, upotrebu informacija o velikoj peti ličnosti o ciljnom autoru - primjenjena na slučaj sažetanja abstraktivnog teksta koristeći modele neuralne sekvence do sekvence. Prvi rezultati ukazuju na to da imati pristup informacijama o ličnosti dovede do tačnijih (ili ljudskih) sažetaka teksta, i sprečava put za jače takve sisteme.', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி உருவாக்கும் முறைமைகளில், தனிப்பட்ட விவரங்கள் - அதாவது, இலக்கு ஆசிரியர் பற்றிய தகவல்களை பயன்படுத்தி உரையை உருவாக்க (அதிகமாக) மனித உருவாக்கப்பட்ட மொழ தற்போதைய வேலை ஒரு போன்ற திட்டத்தை முகவரிக்கிறது - அதாவது, இலக்கு ஆசிரியர் பற்றிய பெரிய ஐந்து தனிப்பட்ட தகவல்களை பயன்படுத்துவது - புதிய வரிசை முறைமைகளை பயன்படுத் முதல் முடிவுகள் தனிப்பட்ட தகவல்களை அணுகுவது அதிக சரியான (அல்லது மனித ஒப்பு)', 'ur': 'طبیعی زبان پیدا کرنے کی سیستموں میں، شخصی پیدا کرنے کی استراتژی - یعنی، ایک موجود لکھنے والے کے بارے میں اطلاعات کا استعمال کرنا کہ (اس سے زیادہ) انسان کی پیدا کی زبان جیسا ہے - نتیجے بہتر کرنے کے لئے بہت زیادہ لازم کیا گیا ہے۔ موجود کار ایک ایسی استراتژی کے ساتھ دریافت کرتا ہے - یعنی، موجود لکھنے کے بارے میں بڑی پانچ شخصیت کی اطلاعات کا استعمال کرتا ہے - نائرول سطح-تا-سطح موڈل کے مطابق استعمال کرتا ہے. آغاز نتیجے کی نشانیاں دیتے ہیں کہ شخصیت معلومات کی دسترسی حاصل کرنا (یا انسان جیسی) پیغام جمع کرتا ہے اور اس طرح زیادہ مضبوط سیستموں کے لئے راہ بناتا ہے.', 'uz': "Natalik tillar yaratuvchi tizimda shaxsiy tayyorlash strategiyadi, bu mualliflar haqida maʼlumot yordamida qo'shimcha tillarni quyidagi matnni yaratish uchun qo'llanmagan natijasida natijasi natijasida natijasi natijasida natijasida natijasi natijasida natijasi natijasida natijasida natijalar natijasida natijasida natijasida nati Name Boshlash natijalari shaxsiy maʼlumotga murojaat qilishni anglatadi, bu narsalarning ko'proq qismlariga (yoki oddiy) muhit qiladi va bu narsalarning ko'proq robot tizimlariga yoʻl beradi.", 'vi': 'Trong hệ thống Thế Hệ Ngôn Tự Nhiên, các phương pháp chuyển biến cá nhân,...dùng thông tin về tác giả đích đến để tạo ra văn bản mà (nhiều hơn) tương tự với ngôn ngữ được sản xuất từ lâu đã được áp dụng để cải thiện kết quả. Công việc hiện nay nhằm vào một chiến lược như vậy, cụ thể là việc sử dụng thông tin cá nhân Big Five về tác giả đích được áp dụng cho trường hợp tổng hợp văn bản trừu tượng sử dụng các mô hình phân tử thần kinh. Kết quả ban đầu cho thấy việc truy cập thông tin cá nhân dẫn đến các bản tóm tắt văn bản chính xác hơn hoặc giống con người, và mở đường cho những hệ thống mạnh mẽ hơn kiểu này.', 'nl': 'In Natural Language Generation systemen worden personalisatiestrategieĂ«n, d.w.z. het gebruik van informatie over een doelauteur om tekst te genereren die (meer) lijkt op door de mens geproduceerde taal, al lang toegepast om resultaten te verbeteren. Het huidige werk behandelt Ă©Ă©n van deze strategieĂ«n, namelijk het gebruik van Big Five persoonlijkheidsinformatie over de doelauteur, toegepast op het geval van abstracte tekstsamenvatting met behulp van neurale sequentiemodellen. Eerste resultaten suggereren dat toegang tot persoonlijkheidsinformatie wel leidt tot nauwkeurigere (of mensachtige) tekstsamenvattingen, en de weg effent voor robuustere systemen van dit soort.', 'bg': 'В системите за генериране на естествен език стратегиите за персонализиране - т.е. използването на информация за целевия автор за генериране на текст, който (по-скоро) прилича на човешки език - отдавна се прилагат за подобряване на резултатите. Настоящата работа разглежда една такава стратегия - а именно използването на информация за личността на Големите петима за целевия автор - приложена в случая на абстрактно обобщаване на текста чрез невронни модели последователност към последователност. Първоначалните резултати показват, че достъпът до лична информация води до по-точни (или подобни на човека) текстови резюмета и проправя пътя за по-стабилни системи от този вид.', 'da': 'I Natural Language Generation systemer har personaliseringsstrategier - dvs. brugen af oplysninger om en målforfatter til at generere tekst, der (mere) ligner menneskeligt produceret sprog - længe været anvendt for at forbedre resultaterne. Dette arbejde omhandler en sådan strategi - nemlig brugen af Big Five personlighedsoplysninger om målforfatteren - anvendt på tilfælde af abstraktiv tekst resuméering ved hjælp af neurale sekvens-til-sekvensmodeller. De første resultater tyder på, at adgang til personlighedsoplysninger fører til mere nøjagtige (eller menneskelignende) tekstresuméer og baner vejen for mere robuste systemer af denne art.', 'hr': 'U sustavima generacije prirodnog jezika, strategije personalizacije - tj. korištenje informacija o ciljnom autoru za proizvedenje teksta koji (više) bliže sliči ljudskom jeziku proizvedenom jeziku - dugo su primjenjene za poboljšanje rezultata. Sadašnji rad rješava jednu takvu strategiju - protiv, upotrebu informacija o Velikoj peti osobnosti o ciljnom autoru - primjenjena na slučaj sažetka abstraktivnog teksta s primjenom modela neuralne sekvence do sekvence. Početni rezultati ukazuju na to da pristup informacijama o osobnosti dovede do preciznijih (ili ljudskih) sažetaka teksta, te sprečava put za jake sustave takve vrste.', 'de': 'In Natural Language Generation Systemen werden Personalisierungsstrategien, d.h. die Verwendung von Informationen über einen Zielautor, um Text zu generieren, der der vom Menschen produzierten Sprache (mehr) ähnelt, seit langem angewandt, um Ergebnisse zu verbessern. Die vorliegende Arbeit befasst sich mit einer solchen Strategie, nämlich der Verwendung von Big Five Persönlichkeitsinformationen über den Zielautor, die auf den Fall der abstraktiven Textzusammenfassung mittels neuronaler Sequenzmodelle angewendet werden. Erste Ergebnisse deuten darauf hin, dass der Zugang zu Persönlichkeitsinformationen zu genaueren (oder menschenähnlichen) Textzusammenfassungen führt und den Weg für robustere Systeme dieser Art ebnet.', 'id': 'Dalam sistem Generasi Bahasa Alami, strategi personalisasi - i.e., penggunaan informasi tentang penulis sasaran untuk menghasilkan teks yang (lebih) dekat mirip bahasa yang diproduksi oleh manusia - telah lama diaplikasikan untuk meningkatkan hasil. Pekerjaan ini mengatasi satu strategi seperti ini - yaitu, penggunaan informasi pribadi Lima Besar tentang penulis sasaran - yang diterapkan untuk kasus resumen teks abstraktif menggunakan model urutan-urutan saraf. Hasil awal menunjukkan bahwa memiliki akses ke informasi pribadi tidak membawa ke ringkasan teks yang lebih akurat (atau seperti manusia), dan membuka jalan untuk sistem yang lebih kuat semacam ini.', 'ko': '자연 언어 생성 시스템에서 개성화된 전략, 즉 목표 작가의 정보를 사용하여 인류가 생성한 언어(더)와 비슷한 텍스트를 생성하는 것은 오랫동안 개선 결과에 사용되어 왔다.현재의 작업은 이러한 전략, 즉 목표 작가의 5대 인격 정보를 사용하여 신경 서열을 서열 모델에 응용하는 추상적인 텍스트 요약을 해결했다.초보적인 결과에 따르면 개성적인 정보를 얻으면 더욱 정확한(또는 인성화된) 텍스트 요약을 초래하고 더욱 튼튼한 이런 시스템을 위해 길을 닦을 수 있다.', 'fa': 'در سیستم تولید زبان طبیعی استراتژی شخصیت - یعنی استفاده از اطلاعات درباره یک نویسنده هدف برای تولید متن که (بیشتر) به نزدیک شبیه زبان تولید شده از انسان - برای بهتر نتیجه\u200cها عملکرد شده است. کاری که در حال حاضر به یک استراتژی مانند این است - یعنی استفاده از اطلاعات شخصیت بزرگ پنج بزرگ درباره نویسنده هدف - به پرونده جمع کردن متن abstractive با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای ترکیب عصبی به ترکیب استفاده می\u200cشود. نتایج اولیه پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که دسترسی به اطلاعات شخصیت به جمله\u200cهای متن دقیق\u200cتر (یا مانند انسان) می\u200cرسد و راه برای سیستم\u200cهای قوی\u200cتر از این نوع می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Katika mifumo ya uzalishaji wa lugha ya asili, mikakati ya kibinafsi - yaani matumizi ya taarifa kuhusu mwandishi aliyelenga kutengeneza ujumbe ambao (zaidi) inafanana na lugha ya kuzalishwa kwa binadamu - imetumiwa kwa muda mrefu kuboresha matokeo. Kazi ya sasa inazungumzia mkakati wa aina hiyo - ni, matumizi ya taarifa za binafsi watano kuhusu mwandishi huyo aliyelenga - imetumiwa na kesi ya muhtasari wa maandishi yasiyo na maandishi yaliyotokea kwa kutumia mifano ya mfululizo wa neura-hadi mfululizo. Matokeo ya awali yanapendekeza kuwa upatikanaji wa taarifa za kibinafsi yanapelekea muhtasari sahihi zaidi (au kama binadamu) wa maandishi ya maandishi, na inazuia njia ya mifumo ya aina hii ya kibinafsi.', 'tr': 'Tebiýal Diller Jemi sistemalarda, Şahsy taýýarlama stratejiýasy - hem bolsa maksady awtor barada maglumat ullanýar we adam dilinde meňzeş bir şekilde meňzeşlik etmek üçin (köp) bir şekilde meňzeş bir dilde - netijeleri gelişmek üçin uzaklaşdyryldy. Häzirki işe beýle bir strategiýany adres edip görýär - meselâ, Ullakan Beş Şahsy Maglumatyň ullanyşy - näyral dizim-tä-dizim modellerinden ullanýan hasaplanyň hasaplanyşy metin holasasy üçin uygulandyrylýar. Ilkinji netijeler şahsy maglumatlara erişim bolmagy üçin has dogry (ýa-da adam ýaly-da) metin toparyny saýlaýar we şeýle bir şekilde has güýçli sistemalar üçin ýolu saýlaýar.', 'af': "In Natuurlike taal Generasie stelsels, persoonalisasie strategies - i.e. die gebruik van inligting oor 'n doel outeur om teks te genereer wat (meer) naby lyk aan mens-produseerde taal - lank was aangepas om resultate te verbeter. Die huidige werk adres een sodanige strategie - naamlik, die gebruik van Groot Vyf persoonlike inligting oor die doel outeur - toegewend na die geval van abstraktiewe teks opsomming deur neurale volgorde- na- volgorde modele te gebruik. Aanvanklike resultate bevestig dat toegang tot persoonlike inligting te hê, lei na meer presies (of menslike) teks opsommings, en plaas die pad vir meer kragtige stelsels van hierdie soort.", 'sq': 'Në sistemet e Gjenerimit të Gjuhave Natyrore, strategjitë e personalizimit - pra, përdorimi i informacionit rreth një autori objektiv për të gjeneruar tekst që (më shumë) ngjan ngushtë me gjuhën e prodhuar nga njeriu - janë aplikuar gjatë për të përmirësuar rezultatet. Puna e tanishme trajton një strategji të tillë - veçanërisht, përdorimin e informacionit të personalitetit të Pesë të Madh rreth autorit të objektivit - të aplikuar në rastin e përmbledhjes abstrakte të tekstit duke përdorur modelet e sekuencës-në-sekuencës nervore. Rezultatet fillestare sugjerojnë se të ketë akses ndaj informacionit personalitet do të çojë në përmbledhje më të sakta (apo të ngjashme me njeriun) teksti dhe do të hapë rrugën për sisteme më të forta të këtij lloji.', 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক ভাষা প্রজন্ম ব্যবস্থায় ব্যক্তিগত কৌশল - যেমন লক্ষ্যবস্তুর লেখকের তথ্য তৈরি করে যে টেক্সট তৈরি করে (আরো কাছাকাছি মানুষের উৎপাদনের ভাষার মত বর্তমান কাজ এমন একটি কৌশলের কথা বলেছে- যার মাধ্যমে লক্ষ্য লেখক সম্পর্কে বিশাল পাঁচটি ব্যক্তিগত তথ্য ব্যবহার করা হয়- নিউরেল সেকেন্স-থেকে সংক্রান্ত মডেল ব্যবহার কর প্রাথমিক ফলাফল পরামর্শ দিয়েছে যে ব্যক্তিগত তথ্য প্রবেশ করতে পারে তা আরো সঠিক (অথবা মানুষের মত) টেক্সট সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের কারণে পারে এব', 'az': 'Təbiətli Dil Yenilməsi Sistemlərində, kişilik stratejiyaları - məsələn yazıcısı haqqında məlumat istifadə etmək üçün (daha yaxın) insan ürəklənmiş dillərə bənzəyən məlumatlar - sonuçlarını yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün uzun müddət istifadə edilmişdir. Şimdiki işlər böyük bir strateji tərəfindən istifadə edir - məqsəd yazıcısı haqqında Böyük Beş kişilik məlumatının istifadəsi - nöral sequence-to-sequence modellərindən istifadə edilən abstraktiv metin tərəfindən istifadə edilir. Əvvəlki sonuçlar kişilik məlumatlarına istifadə etmək üçün daha doğru (ya da insan kimi) mətn toplamlarına yol göstərir və bunun daha qüvvətli sistemlərinə yol göstərir.', 'bs': 'U sistemima generacije prirodnog jezika, strategije za personalizaciju - tj. upotrebu informacija o ciljnom autoru kako bi stvorili tekst koji (više) bliže sliči ljudskom jeziku proizvođenom jeziku - dugo su primjenjeni za poboljšanje rezultata. Sadašnji rad se obraća na jednu takvu strategiju - a to je upotrebu informacija o Velikoj peti ličnosti o ciljnom autoru - primjenjena na slučaj sažetke abstraktivnog teksta koristeći modele neuralne sekvence do sekvence. Prvi rezultati ukazuju na to da pristup informacijama o ličnosti dovede do preciznijih (ili ljudskih) sažetaka teksta, i sprečava put za jače sustave ovakve vrste.', 'ca': "En els sistemes de generació de llenguatges naturals, les estratègies de personalització - és a dir, l'ús d'informació sobre un autor destinatari per a generar text que (més) sembla molt al llenguatge produït per a l'home - s'han aplicat fa molt de temps per millorar els resultats. La feina actual aborda una d'aquestes estratègies, a saber, l'ús d'informació sobre la personalitat dels cinc grans sobre l'autor destinatari, aplicada al cas de resumir el text abstracte utilitzant models de seqüència a seqüència neuronal. Els resultats inicials suggereixen que tenir accés a la informació sobre la personalitat dóna lloc a resumes de text més exacts (o semblants a l'humà), i obre el camí a sistemes més robustos d'aquest tipus.", 'cs': 'V systémech generování přirozeného jazyka se pro zlepšení výsledků užívají personalizační strategie, tj. využití informací o cílovém autorovi k generování textu, který (více) podobá lidskému jazyku. Tato práce se zabývá jedním z takových strategických modelů, a to využitím osobnostních informací Big Five o cílovém autorovi, aplikovaným na případ abstraktivní textové shrnutí pomocí neuronových modelů sekvence-sekvence. První výsledky naznačují, že přístup k osobnostním informacím vede k přesnějším (nebo lidským) textovým shrnutím a dláždí cestu pro robustnější systémy tohoto druhu.', 'et': 'Loodusliku keele genereerimise s羹steemides on tulemuste parandamiseks juba ammu rakendatud isikup瓣rastamisstrateegiaid, st sihtautori info kasutamist (rohkem) inimese toodetud keelele sarnase teksti genereerimiseks. K瓣esolevas t繹繹s k瓣sitletakse 羹hte sellist strateegiat - nimelt Big Five isiksusinfo kasutamist sihtautori kohta -, mida rakendatakse abstraktse teksti kokkuv繭tmise juhtumile neuraalsete j瓣rjestuste-j瓣rjestuste mudelite abil. Esialgsed tulemused n瓣itavad, et juurdep瓣瓣s isikuandmetele toob kaasa t瓣psemad (v繭i inimlikumad) tekstikokkuv繭tted ning sillutab teed tugevamatele sellistele s羹steemidele.', 'am': 'በአዳራዊ ቋንቋ አቀማመጥ ስርዓት፣ የራሳቸውን ማስታወቂያ ስርዓት፣ የጉዳዩ ተቃውሞ የጽሑፍ አቀማመጥ (በዝግጅት ላይ) በሚያሳየው ቋንቋ ቋንቋ - ፍሬዎችን ለማሻሻል ረጅም ጊዜ ይጠቅማል፡፡ የአሁኑ ስራ አንድ እንደዚህ ያለ strategie - መጠቀም፣ የታላቁ አምስት የግል መረጃዎችን ለመጠቀም - በጥቅላይ የጽሑፍ አቀማመጥ ማቀናጃ በጠቅላላ ቁጥር-ወደ-sequence models በመጠቀም ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ የመጀመሪያው ውጤቶች የብሔራዊ መረጃ ማግኘት እንዲያገኝ (ወይም ሰው የሚመስል) የጽሑፍ አቅራቢያ እንዲያሳያል እና እንደዚህ ዓይነት ለብዙዎች የተነሳ ስርዓቶች መንገድን ያሳድጋል፡፡', 'fi': 'Natural Language Generation -järjestelmissä tulosten parantamiseen on jo pitkään sovellettu personointistrategioita eli kohdekirjoittajan tiedon käyttöä (enemmän) ihmisen tuottamaa kieltä muistuttavan tekstin tuottamiseen. Tässä työssä käsitellään yhtä tällaista strategiaa, nimittäin Big Five -persoonallisuustiedon käyttöä kohdekirjoittajasta, jota sovellettiin abstraktiiviseen tekstiyhteenvetoon neurosekvenssi-sekvenssimalleja käyttäen. Alustavat tulokset viittaavat siihen, että persoonallisuustiedon saatavuus johtaa tarkempiin (tai ihmisen kaltaisiin) tekstiyhteenvedoihin ja tasoittaa tietä vankempiin järjestelmiin.', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզուների ստեղծման համակարգերում անձնական ռազմավարությունները, այսինքն, նպատակային հեղինակի մասին տեղեկատվության օգտագործումը տեքստի ստեղծման համար, որը (ավելի) ավելի մոտ նման է մարդկային ստեղծված լեզուն, երկար ժամանակ կիրառվում են արդյունքների բարելավման համար: Այս աշխատանքը դիտարկում է մեկ նման ռազմավարություն, հատկապես նպատակային հեղինակի մասին Մեծ հինգ անհատականության ինֆորմացիայի օգտագործումը, որը կիրառվում է վերացրատիվ տեքստի համառոտագրման դեպքում՝ օգտագործելով նյարդային հաջորդականության մոդել Սկզբնական արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ անհատականության ինֆորմացիայի հնարավորություն ունենալը հանգեցնում է ավելի ճշգրիտ (կամ մարդկային նման) տեքստի համառոտագրությունների և պատրաստում է ճանապարհ այսպիսի ավելի ուժեղ համակարգերի համար:', 'jv': 'Nang Daerah Generation (Generation Language Generation) sistem Perusahaan Layar, dadi kapan-kapan: nek, nggawe informasi ning kebutuhan kelompok kanggo nggawe gambar kelompok (tambah luwih) sampeyan luwih apik lan alam sing menehi sak nguasai perusahaan- dumadhi kapan sistem sing beraksi ditawak Sayensi Pametuné awak dhéwé urip nggawe akses karo informasi pribadi nggawe gambaran (karo nambaran-nambaran) teks layar, lan dadi mbukaké awak dhéwé sistem sing gak adhasar iki.', 'ha': "A cikin tsarin Taurar Lugha na Kizaɓi, aka amfani da kimar masu shawara - misali, ya yi amfani da amfani da maɓallin wani littãfi na gabatar da littãfi wanda (mafi) ke sami daidai harshen wanda aka samar da shi na mutum - an sami ƙarami zuwa ƙarami matsalan. Yin aikin da ake kai yanzu yana amfani da wani ƙulli kamar wannan - amfani da amfani da maɓallin Babbar Babba masu tsari na takardar rubutun na gabatar - na applied zuwa case na ƙararin matsayin da aka kanana da motel masu sakan-zuwa-sequence. Matarin na farko yana son cẽwa, idan an sami amfani da information na kansa, za'a ƙara matsayin masu tsari (ko kuwa misalin mutum) kuma yana gaura hanya ga wasu na'ura na'urar wannan.", 'sk': 'V sistemih generiranja naravnega jezika se za izboljšanje rezultatov že dolgo uporabljajo strategije personalizacije, tj. uporaba informacij o ciljnem avtorju za ustvarjanje besedila, ki (bolj) podobno jeziku, ki ga ustvarja človek. Pričujoče delo obravnava eno takšno strategijo - namreč uporabo osebnih informacij Big Five o ciljnem avtorju - ki se uporablja za primer abstraktivnega povzetka besedila z uporabo modelov nevronskega zaporedja do zaporedja. Začetni rezultati kažejo, da dostop do osebnih informacij res vodi do natančnejših (ali človeku podobnih) besedilnih povzetkov in utrjuje pot robustnejšim tovrstnim sistemom.', 'bo': 'རང་བཟོས་སྐད་ཡིག འདི་ནང་གི་ལས་འགན་སྐྱོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཅིག་འདི་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེད་ཡོད། འགོ་འབྱེད་ཐོག་གི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་མིང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དུ་འཛུལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་གི་བཅུད་སྡུད་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་ཐུབ།', 'he': 'In Natural Language Generation systems, personalization strategies - i.e, the use of information about a target author to generate text that (more) closely resembles human-produced language - have long been applied to improve results.  העבודה הנוכחית מתייחסת לאסטרטגיה אחת כזאת - כלומר, השימוש של מידע אישיות של חמש גדולים על הסופר המטרה - שימש למקרה של סכם טקסט אסטרקטיבי באמצעות דוגמנים רצף-לרצף עצביים. התוצאות הראשוניות מצביעות שיש גישה למידע האישיות מובילה לסרטים טקסטים מדויקים יותר (או דומים לאדם), ומפתח את הדרך למערכות חזקות יותר מהסוג הזה.'}
{'en': 'Detecting Toxicity in News Articles : Application to Bulgarian', 'ar': 'الكشف عن السمية في المقالات الإخبارية: تطبيق على البلغارية', 'es': 'Detección de toxicidad en artículos de noticias: aplicación al búlgaro', 'pt': 'Detecção de toxicidade em artigos de notícias: aplicação para búlgaro', 'fr': 'Détection de la toxicité dans les articles de presse\xa0: application au bulgare', 'zh': '检新闻文之毒性,宜用于保加利亚语', 'ja': 'ニュース記事における毒性の検出：ブルガリア語への適用', 'ru': 'Обнаружение токсичности в новостных статьях: применение к болгарской', 'hi': 'समाचार लेख में विषाक्तता का पता लगाना: बल्गेरियाई के लिए आवेदन', 'ga': 'Tocsaineacht a Bhrath in Airteagail Nuachta: Iarratas chuig an mBulgáiris', 'ka': 'ტექსიკური განახლება ახალგაზომის არტიკულებში: ბულდარიური პროგრამი', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση τοξικότητας σε άρθρα ειδήσεων: Εφαρμογή στα βουλγαρικά', 'hu': 'Toxicitás kimutatása a hírekben: Alkalmazás bolgár nyelvre', 'it': 'Rilevare la tossicità negli articoli di notizie: Applicazione al bulgaro', 'kk': 'Жаңалық мақалаларындағы токсикалықты анықтау: Болгаршаға қолдану', 'ms': 'Mengesan Toksitas dalam Artikel Berita: Aplikasi ke Bulgarian', 'ml': 'Detecting Toxicity in News Articles: Application to Bulgarian', 'lt': 'Toksinio poveikio nustatymas naujienų straipsniuose: paraiška bulgarų kalbai', 'mt': 'Is-Sejbien tat-Tossiċità fl-Artikoli tal-Aħbarijiet: Applikazzjoni għall-Bulgaru', 'mk': 'Детектирање на токсичност во новинските статии: Апликација на бугарски', 'mn': 'Хөгжлийн бичил баримтууд: Болгарид хэрэглэх', 'no': 'Oppdagar toksikitet i nyhetsgrensesartiklar: Application to Bulgarian', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie toksyczności w artykułach wiadomościowych: Zastosowanie do bułgarskiego', 'ro': 'Detectarea toxicității în articole de știri: Aplicarea în limba bulgară', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje toksičnosti u novinskim članovima: Prijava Bugarskom', 'so': 'Qeybta warqadaha warqadaha macluumaadka: Codsiga Bulgarian', 'si': 'වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරකාරය: බුල්ගරියාන් වලට ප්\u200dරවේශනය', 'sv': 'Att upptäcka toxicitet i nyhetsartiklar: Tillämpning på bulgariska', 'ta': 'செய்தி கட்டுரைகளில் தொலைவை கண்டுபிடிப்பது: புல்கேரியாவிற்கு பயன்பாடு', 'ur': 'نویس لکھوں میں ٹوکسیسیٹی پتچا رہی ہے: بلگاری کے لئے کاربرد', 'uz': 'Yangi maqolalarda Toksisiyasini aniqlash: Bulgariy dasturi', 'vi': 'Phát hiện độc tố trong bản tin Chính sách:', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje toksičnosti u novinskim članovima: Prijava Bugarskoj', 'da': 'Detektering af toksicitet i nyhedsartikler: Anvendelse på bulgarsk', 'bg': 'Откриване на токсичност в новинарски статии: Приложение към български език', 'nl': 'Het opsporen van toxiciteit in nieuwsartikelen: Toepassing op Bulgaars', 'de': 'Erkennung von Toxizität in Nachrichtenartikeln: Anwendung auf Bulgarisch', 'id': 'Detektif Toksitas dalam Artikel Berita: Aplikasi ke Bulgari', 'fa': 'شناسایی توکسیسیتی در مقاله های خبری: کاربرد برای بولگاری', 'ko': '뉴스 기사의 독성 검출: 불가리아에서의 응용', 'sw': 'Kugundua Ushofu katika Makala ya Habari: Utumiaji wa Bulgaria', 'af': 'Kies Toxicity in News Articles: Application to Bulgarian', 'tr': 'Täzelikleri Taryha Et: Bulgarça üçin Program', 'sq': 'Duke zbuluar toksicitetin në artikujt e lajmeve: Aplikimi për bullgarinë', 'hy': 'Detecting Toxicity in News Articles: Application to Bulgarian', 'am': 'በዜና አርእስቶች ውስጥ Toxicity ማግኘት: ፕሮግራም ወደ ቡልጋሪኛ', 'az': 'Haqq M…ôtnl…ôrind…ô Toxicity ke≈üif: Bulgarca Uygulamasƒ±', 'bn': 'সংবাদ প্রবন্ধে টোক্সিকি সনাক্ত করা হচ্ছে: বুলগেরিয়ার অ্যাপ্লিকেশন', 'ca': 'Detecting Toxicity in News Articles: Application to Bulgarian', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje toksičnosti u novinskim člancima: aplikacija Bugarskoj', 'cs': 'Detekce toxicity v novinkách Články: Aplikace na bulharštinu', 'et': 'Mürgisuse avastamine Uudisartiklites: rakendamine Bulgaaria keeles', 'fi': 'Myrkyllisyyden havaitseminen uutisartikkeleissa: Sovellus bulgariaan', 'jv': '#a11y <joanie> hello!<joanie> hello!', 'sk': 'Odkrivanje strupenosti v novinarskih člankih: Uporaba za bolgarščino', 'ha': 'Applet to Bulgaria', 'he': 'גילוי רעילות במאמרים חדשות: היישום לבולגרי', 'bo': 'གསར་འགོད་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ནང་སྐྱེས་ཐལ་རྟོགས་བྱ་སྤྱོད། བཱལ་གྷན་རི་ལ་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་བྱ་རིམ།'}
{'en': 'Online media aim for reaching ever bigger audience and for attracting ever longer attention span. This competition creates an environment that rewards sensational, fake, and toxic news. To help limit their spread and impact, we propose and develop a news toxicity detector that can recognize various types of toxic content. While previous research primarily focused on English, here we target Bulgarian. We created a new dataset by crawling a website that for five years has been collecting Bulgarian news articles that were manually categorized into eight toxicity groups. Then we trained a multi-class classifier with nine categories : eight toxic and one non-toxic. We experimented with different representations based on ElMo, BERT, and XLM, as well as with a variety of domain-specific features. Due to the small size of our dataset, we created a separate model for each feature type, and we ultimately combined these models into a meta-classifier. The evaluation results show an accuracy of 59.0 % and a macro-F1 score of 39.7 %, which represent sizable improvements over the majority-class baseline (Acc=30.3 %, macro-F1=5.2 %).', 'ar': 'تهدف وسائل الإعلام عبر الإنترنت إلى الوصول إلى جمهور أكبر من أي وقت مضى وجذب مدى اهتمام أطول. تخلق هذه المسابقة بيئة تكافئ الأخبار المثيرة والمزيفة والسامة. للمساعدة في الحد من انتشارها وتأثيرها ، نقترح ونطور جهازًا للكشف عن سمية الأخبار يمكنه التعرف على أنواع مختلفة من المحتوى السام. بينما ركزت الأبحاث السابقة بشكل أساسي على اللغة الإنجليزية ، فإننا نستهدف هنا اللغة البلغارية. لقد أنشأنا مجموعة بيانات جديدة من خلال الزحف إلى موقع ويب يجمع منذ خمس سنوات مقالات إخبارية بلغارية تم تصنيفها يدويًا إلى ثماني مجموعات سمية. ثم قمنا بتدريب مصنف متعدد الفئات بتسع فئات: ثماني فئات سامة وواحدة غير سامة. لقد جربنا تمثيلات مختلفة بناءً على ElMo و BERT و XLM ، بالإضافة إلى مجموعة متنوعة من الميزات الخاصة بالمجال. نظرًا لصغر حجم مجموعة البيانات الخاصة بنا ، فقد أنشأنا نموذجًا منفصلاً لكل نوع ميزة ، وقمنا في النهاية بدمج هذه النماذج في مصنف التعريف. تظهر نتائج التقييم دقة 59.0٪ ودرجة ماكرو F1 تبلغ 39.7٪ ، مما يمثل تحسينات كبيرة على خط الأساس لفئة الأغلبية (Acc = 30.3٪ ، macro-F1 = 5.2٪).', 'fr': "Les médias en ligne visent à atteindre un public toujours plus large et à attirer toujours plus l'attention. Cette compétition crée un environnement qui récompense les nouvelles sensationnelles, fausses et toxiques. Pour aider à limiter leur propagation et leur impact, nous proposons et développons un nouveau détecteur de toxicité capable de reconnaître différents types de contenu toxique. Alors que les recherches précédentes portaient principalement sur l'anglais, nous ciblons ici le bulgare. Nous avons créé un nouveau jeu de données en explorant un site Web qui recueille depuis cinq ans des articles de presse bulgares classés manuellement en huit groupes de toxicité. Ensuite, nous avons formé un classificateur multi-classes avec neuf catégories\xa0: huit toxiques et une non toxique. Nous avons expérimenté différentes représentations basées sur ElMo, BERT et XLM, ainsi que diverses fonctionnalités spécifiques au domaine. En raison de la petite taille de notre jeu de données, nous avons créé un modèle distinct pour chaque type d'entité, et nous avons finalement combiné ces modèles dans un méta-classificateur. Les résultats de l'évaluation montrent une précision de 59,0\xa0% et un score macro-F1 de 39,7\xa0%, ce qui représente des améliorations significatives par rapport à la base de référence de la classe majoritaire (Acc= 30,3\xa0%, macro-F1 = 5,2\xa0%).", 'es': 'Los medios en línea tienen como objetivo llegar a una audiencia cada vez mayor y atraer una capacidad de atención cada vez mayor. Esta competencia crea un entorno que recompensa las noticias sensacionales, falsas y tóxicas. Para ayudar a limitar su propagación e impacto, proponemos y desarrollamos un nuevo detector de toxicidad que puede reconocer varios tipos de contenido tóxico. Mientras que la investigación anterior se centró principalmente en el inglés, aquí nos centramos en el Creamos un nuevo conjunto de datos rastreando un sitio web que durante cinco años ha estado recopilando artículos de noticias búlgaros que se clasificaron manualmente en ocho grupos de toxicidad. Luego entrenamos un clasificador multiclase con nueve categorías: ocho tóxicas y una no tóxica. Experimentamos con diferentes representaciones basadas en eLMO, BERT y XLM, así como con una variedad de características específicas del dominio. Debido al pequeño tamaño de nuestro conjunto de datos, creamos un modelo independiente para cada tipo de entidad y, en última instancia, combinamos estos modelos en un metaclasificador. Los resultados de la evaluación muestran una precisión del 59,0% y una puntuación macro-F1 del 39,7%, lo que representa mejoras considerables con respecto a la línea base de la clase mayoritaria (Acc= 30,3%, macro-F1 = 5,2%).', 'pt': 'A mídia on-line visa alcançar um público cada vez maior e atrair atenção cada vez maior. Essa competição cria um ambiente que recompensa notícias sensacionais, falsas e tóxicas. Para ajudar a limitar sua disseminação e impacto, propomos e desenvolvemos um detector de toxicidade de notícias que pode reconhecer vários tipos de conteúdo tóxico. Enquanto a pesquisa anterior se concentrou principalmente no inglês, aqui temos como alvo o búlgaro. Criamos um novo conjunto de dados rastreando um site que há cinco anos coleta artigos de notícias búlgaros que foram categorizados manualmente em oito grupos de toxicidade. Em seguida, treinamos um classificador multiclasse com nove categorias: oito tóxicas e uma não tóxica. Experimentamos diferentes representações baseadas em ElMo, BERT e XLM, bem como uma variedade de recursos específicos de domínio. Devido ao pequeno tamanho do nosso conjunto de dados, criamos um modelo separado para cada tipo de recurso e, por fim, combinamos esses modelos em um metaclassificador. Os resultados da avaliação mostram uma precisão de 59,0% e uma pontuação macro-F1 de 39,7%, o que representa melhorias consideráveis em relação à linha de base da classe majoritária (Acc=30,3%, macro-F1=5,2%).', 'ja': 'オンラインメディアは、これまで以上に多くの視聴者を獲得し、これまで以上に長いスパンで注目を集めることを目指しています。 このコンペティションは、センセーショナルでフェイクで有毒なニュースに報酬を与える環境を作り出します。 それらの拡散と影響を抑えるために、さまざまな種類の有毒なコンテンツを認識できるニュース毒性検出器を提案し、開発しています。 以前の研究は主に英語に焦点を当てていたが、ここではブルガリア語を対象とする。 5年間ブルガリアのニュース記事を手動で8つの毒性グループに分類して収集してきたウェブサイトをクロールして新しいデータセットを作成しました そして、8つの毒性と1つの非毒性の9つのカテゴリーを備えたマルチクラスの分類器を訓練しました。 私たちは、ElMo、BERT、XLMに基づいたさまざまな表現と、さまざまなドメイン固有の機能を実験しました。 データセットのサイズが小さいため、機能タイプごとに個別のモデルを作成し、最終的にこれらのモデルをメタクラシファイアに組み合わせました。 評価結果は、59.0%の精度と39.7%のマクロF 1スコアを示し、多数派クラスのベースライン（ Acc = 30.3%、マクロF 1 = 5.2%）よりもかなりの改善を示している。', 'zh': '在线媒体旨益多者受众,并引益长者注意。 此竞造一奖耸人听闻,虚毒新闻也。 所以助限其传播,发一以别各种类型毒分新闻毒检测器。 虽前论大要在英语,而于此为保加利亚语。 取一网站创一新数集,当网站五年收保加利亚新闻文章,手动类八毒。 然后,我们训练了一个九类分类器:八个有毒和一个无毒。 尝试基于ElMo,BERT异于XLM,及诸特定于域之功。 以数集之规模较小,为每形创一独形,而终合之于元分类器中。 评估结果显示,准确率为59.0%,宏观F1分为39.7%,与多级基线(Acc=30.3%,宏观F1=5.2%)相比,有大进步。', 'hi': 'ऑनलाइन मीडिया का उद्देश्य कभी भी बड़े दर्शकों तक पहुंचने और कभी भी लंबे समय तक ध्यान आकर्षित करने के लिए है। यह प्रतियोगिता एक ऐसा वातावरण बनाती है जो सनसनीखेज, नकली और जहरीली खबरों को पुरस्कृत करती है। उनके प्रसार और प्रभाव को सीमित करने में मदद करने के लिए, हम एक समाचार विषाक्तता डिटेक्टर का प्रस्ताव और विकास करते हैं जो विभिन्न प्रकार की विषाक्त सामग्री को पहचान सकता है। जबकि पिछले शोध ने मुख्य रूप से अंग्रेजी पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया था, यहां हम बल्गेरियाई को लक्षित करते हैं। हमने एक वेबसाइट को क्रॉल करके एक नया डेटासेट बनाया है जो पांच वर्षों से बल्गेरियाई समाचार लेखों को इकट्ठा कर रहा है जिन्हें मैन्युअल रूप से आठ विषाक्तता समूहों में वर्गीकृत किया गया था। फिर हमने नौ श्रेणियों के साथ एक बहु-श्रेणी क्लासिफायर को प्रशिक्षित किया: आठ विषाक्त और एक गैर-विषाक्त। हमने ElMo, BERT, और XLM के आधार पर विभिन्न अभ्यावेदनों के साथ-साथ विभिन्न प्रकार की डोमेन-विशिष्ट सुविधाओं के साथ प्रयोग किया। हमारे डेटासेट के छोटे आकार के कारण, हमने प्रत्येक सुविधा प्रकार के लिए एक अलग मॉडल बनाया, और हमने अंततः इन मॉडलों को मेटा-क्लासिफायर में जोड़ा। मूल्यांकन के परिणाम 59.0% की सटीकता और 39.7% का मैक्रो-F1 स्कोर दिखाते हैं, जो बहुमत-वर्ग बेसलाइन (Acc = 30.3%, मैक्रो-F1 = 5.2%) पर बड़े सुधारों का प्रतिनिधित्व करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Онлайн-медиа нацелены на охват еще большей аудитории и привлечение еще большего внимания. Эта конкуренция создает среду, которая вознаграждает сенсационные, фейковые и токсичные новости. Чтобы ограничить их распространение и воздействие, мы предлагаем и разрабатываем новостной детектор токсичности, который может распознавать различные типы токсичного содержимого. В то время как предыдущие исследования были сосредоточены в основном на английском языке, здесь мы нацелены на болгарский язык. Мы создали новый набор данных путем сканирования веб-сайта, который в течение пяти лет собирал болгарские новости, которые были вручную классифицированы на восемь групп токсичности. Затем мы обучили многоклассный классификатор с девятью категориями: восемь токсичных и одна нетоксичная. Мы экспериментировали с различными представлениями на основе ELMO, BERT и XLM, а также с различными домен-специфическими признаками. Из-за небольшого размера нашего набора данных мы создали отдельную модель для каждого типа функции и в конечном итоге объединили эти модели в мета-классификатор. Результаты оценки показывают точность 59,0% и оценку макро-F1 39,7%, что представляет значительное улучшение по сравнению с исходным уровнем большинства (Acc=30,3%, макро-F1=5,2%).', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag na meáin ar líne dul i dteagmháil le lucht féachana níos mó de shíor agus réise aird níos faide a mhealladh. Cruthaíonn an comórtas seo timpeallacht a thugann luach saothair do nuacht íogair, falsa agus tocsaineach. Chun cabhrú lena leathadh agus lena dtionchar a theorannú, molaimid agus forbróimid brathadóir tocsaineachta nuachta a fhéadfaidh cineálacha éagsúla ábhar tocsaineach a aithint. Cé gur dhírigh taighde roimhe seo go príomha ar an mBéarla, dírímid anseo ar an mBulgáiris. Chruthaíomar tacar sonraí nua trí shuíomh Gréasáin a chraobhscaoileadh atá ag bailiú ailt nuachta ón mBulgáir le cúig bliana a rangaíodh de láimh in ocht ngrúpa tocsaineachta. Ansin chuireamar oiliúint ar aicmitheoir ilaicme le naoi gcatagóir: ocht gcatagóir tocsaineach agus ceann amháin neamh-tocsaineach. Rinneamar turgnamh le huiríll éagsúla bunaithe ar ElMo, BERT, agus XLM, chomh maith le héagsúlacht gnéithe a bhaineann go sonrach le fearann. Mar gheall ar mhéid beag ár dtacar sonraí, chruthaíomar samhail ar leith do gach cineál gné, agus ar deireadh chuireamar na samhlacha seo le chéile ina meiti-aicmitheoir. Léiríonn torthaí na meastóireachta cruinneas 59.0% agus scór macrai-F1 de 39.7%, rud a léiríonn feabhsuithe suntasacha thar bhunlíne rang an tromlaigh (Acc=30.3%, macra-F1=5.2%).', 'hu': 'Az online média célja, hogy egyre nagyobb közönséget érjen el és egyre hosszabb figyelmet vonzzon. Ez a verseny olyan környezetet teremt, amely jutalmazza a szenzációs, hamis és mérgező híreket. Terjedésük és hatásuk korlátozása érdekében javaslatot teszünk és fejlesztünk ki egy olyan hírtoxicitási detektort, amely felismeri a különböző típusú mérgező tartalmakat. Míg a korábbi kutatások elsősorban az angol nyelvre összpontosítottak, itt a bolgár nyelvet célozzuk meg. Új adatkészletet hoztunk létre egy weboldal feltérképezésével, amely öt éve gyűjt bolgár híreket, amelyeket manuálisan nyolc toxicitási csoportba soroltak. Ezután képzettünk egy több osztályú osztályozót kilenc kategóriával: nyolc mérgező és egy nem mérgező. Kísérleteztünk különböző ábrázolásokkal Elmo, BERT és XLM alapján, valamint különböző domain-specifikus funkciókkal. Adatkészletünk kis méretének köszönhetően minden funkciótípushoz külön modellt hoztunk létre, és végül ezeket a modelleket metaosztályozóvá alakítottuk. Az értékelés eredményei 59,0%-os pontosságot és 39,7%-os makro-F1 pontszámot mutatnak, ami jelentős javulást jelent a többségi kategóriás kiindulási értékhez képest (Acc = 30,3%, makro-F1 = 5,2%).', 'el': 'Τα διαδικτυακά μέσα ενημέρωσης στοχεύουν στην προσέλκυση όλο και μεγαλύτερου κοινού και στην προσέλκυση όλο και μεγαλύτερης έκτασης προσοχής. Αυτός ο διαγωνισμός δημιουργεί ένα περιβάλλον που επιβραβεύει εντυπωσιακά, ψεύτικα και τοξικά νέα. Για να βοηθήσουμε στον περιορισμό της εξάπλωσης και των επιπτώσεών τους, προτείνουμε και αναπτύσσουμε έναν ανιχνευτή τοξικότητας ειδήσεων που μπορεί να αναγνωρίσει διάφορους τύπους τοξικού περιεχομένου. Ενώ η προηγούμενη έρευνα επικεντρώθηκε κυρίως στην αγγλική γλώσσα, εδώ στοχεύουμε στα βουλγαρικά. Δημιουργήσαμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων ανιχνεύοντας μια ιστοσελίδα που εδώ και πέντε χρόνια συλλέγει βουλγαρικά άρθρα ειδήσεων που κατηγοριοποιήθηκαν χειροκίνητα σε οκτώ ομάδες τοξικότητας. Στη συνέχεια εκπαιδεύσαμε έναν ταξινομητή πολλαπλών κλάσεων με εννέα κατηγορίες: οκτώ τοξικές και μία μη τοξικές. Πειραματιστήκαμε με διαφορετικές αναπαραστάσεις βασισμένες σε ElMo, BERT και XLM, καθώς και με μια ποικιλία χαρακτηριστικών που αφορούν τον τομέα. Λόγω του μικρού μεγέθους του συνόλου δεδομένων μας, δημιουργήσαμε ένα ξεχωριστό μοντέλο για κάθε τύπο χαρακτηριστικών και τελικά συνδυάσαμε αυτά τα μοντέλα σε έναν μετα-ταξινομητή. Τα αποτελέσματα αξιολόγησης δείχνουν ακρίβεια 59,0% και βαθμολογία μακρο-F1 39,7%, οι οποίες αντιπροσωπεύουν σημαντικές βελτιώσεις έναντι της βάσης βάσης πλειοψηφίας (Acc=30,3%, μακρο-F1=5,2%).', 'ka': 'უფრო დიდი აუდიტორია და უფრო მეტი ახალგაზრდების განმავლობა. ეს კონპექციენტი შექმნის გარეშე სენსიონაციალური, ტალქტიური და ტოქსიური ნუზების გარეშე. რომ დახმარება მათი გაფართლების და შესაძლებლობას, ჩვენ მოვიწყებთ და განვითარებთ ახალგაზომის ტოქსიტური განახლებელი, რომელიც შეუძლიათ განვიცნოთ განსხვავებული თუმცა წინა სწორედ სწორედ ინგლისური პროცესება, აქ ჩვენ ბულდარიური მიღება. ჩვენ შევქმნით ახალი მონაცემები საბოლოგიის საქაღალდეს, რომელიც ხუთ წლის განმავლობაში ბულდარიური ინფორმაციის არქილეები, რომელიც მანძილურად კატეგორიზებულია 8 შემდეგ ჩვენ მრავალ კლასიფიკაციის კლასიფიკაცია 9 კატეგორია: 8 ტოქსიკური და ერთი არ ტოქსიკური. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებით განსხვავებული რესპერიმენტებით ElMo, BERT, XLM და განსხვავებული დიომინის განსაკუთრებული ფუნქციებით დავიწყეთ. ჩვენი მონაცემების პატარა ზომაზე, ჩვენ ყველა ფუნქტურის ტიპის განსაკუთრებული მოდელს შექმნა, და ბოლოს ჩვენ ამ მოდელები მეტა-კლასიფიკაციაში დავყენეთ. შესაბამისი წარმოდგენები აჩვენებს 59,0% და 39,7% მაკრო-F1 წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენება, რომლებიც უფრო დიდი წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენება (Acc=30,3%, მაკრო-F1=5,2', 'it': "I media online mirano a raggiungere un pubblico sempre più vasto e ad attirare un'attenzione sempre più lunga. Questa competizione crea un ambiente che premia notizie sensazionali, false e tossiche. Per contribuire a limitare la loro diffusione e impatto, proponiamo e sviluppiamo un rilevatore di tossicità per notizie in grado di riconoscere vari tipi di contenuto tossico. Mentre le ricerche precedenti si sono concentrate principalmente sull'inglese, qui ci rivolgiamo al bulgaro. Abbiamo creato un nuovo set di dati attraverso la scansione di un sito web che da cinque anni raccoglie articoli bulgari che sono stati categorizzati manualmente in otto gruppi di tossicità. Poi abbiamo formato un classificatore multi-classe con nove categorie: otto tossici e una atossica. Abbiamo sperimentato diverse rappresentazioni basate su Elmo, BERT e XLM, così come con una varietà di funzionalità specifiche del dominio. A causa delle piccole dimensioni del nostro set di dati, abbiamo creato un modello separato per ogni tipo di funzionalità, e alla fine abbiamo combinato questi modelli in un meta-classificatore. I risultati della valutazione mostrano un'accuratezza del 59,0% e un punteggio macro-F1 del 39,7%, che rappresentano notevoli miglioramenti rispetto al basale della classe maggioritaria (Acc=30,3%, macro-F1=5,2%).", 'kk': 'Онлайн медиа мақсаттары көптеген аудиторияларды жеткізу және көптеген аудиторияларды қарау үшін. Бұл конкурс сенсоциялық, жалғыз және тәуелсіздік жаңалықтарды жасайтын орта құрады. Олардың тарату және әсерін шектеу үшін, біз жаңалықтардың токсичілікті анықтаушысын жұмыс береміз. Бұл әртүрлі токсичтік мазмұнын анықтауға болады. Алдыңғы зерттеулердің негізінде ағылшын тіліне көңіл берілген болса, бұл жерде біз Болгариялық тіліне жеткіземіз. Біз бес жыл болгария жаңалық мақалаларды қолмен сегіз тоғыздық топтарға сақталған сайтты құрып жаңа деректер жинағын құрдық. Көп класс классификациясының 9 санаты бар: сегіз денесі және бір денесі емес. Біз ElMo, BERT және XLM негізінде әртүрлі түрлі түрінде тәжірибелерді тәжірибеледік, сондай-ақ әртүрлі доменге арнаулы мүмкіндіктері бар. Деректер жиілігіміздің кішкентай өлшемінен біз әрбір мүмкіндіктердің түріне бөлек үлгісін құрып, соңында бұл үлгілерді мета-классификациясына біріктірдік. Бағалау нәтижелері 59,0% мен 39,7% макро- F1 нәтижесін көрсетеді, бұл көпшілікті класс негізгі жолдардың көпшілігін жақсартуға мүмкіндік береді (Acc=30,3%, макро- F1=5,2%).', 'ml': 'ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d മീഡിയ എപ്പോഴെങ്കിലും വലിയ കാഴ്ചക്കാര്\u200dക്കും എത്താന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. കൂടുതല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ കാ ഈ മത്സരത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പരിസ്ഥിതി ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. അത് സെന്\u200dഷനിഷന്\u200d, തെറ്റ്, പ്രതിഫലം നല്\u200dകുന്നു. അവരുടെ വ്യാപിപ്പും പ്രഭാവങ്ങളും പരിധിക്കാന്\u200d സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുകയും വ്യത്യസ്ത വിദ്യാ മുമ്പുള്ള പരിശോധന പ്രധാനമായി ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലേക്ക് ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഇവിടെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ബുള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അഞ്ചു വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളായി ബുള്\u200dഗേറിയയിലെ വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം വിഭാഗിച് പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പലക്ലാസിന്റെ ക്ലാസ്സില്\u200d ഒന്\u200dപത് വിഭാഗങ്ങളുമായി പരിശീലിപ്പിച്ചു. എട്ട് ബുദ്ധിമുട്ട എല്\u200dമോ, ബെര്\u200dട്ടി, എക്സ്\u200cഎല്\u200dഎമിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായി വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രതിനിധികളുമായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ ചെറിയ വലിപ്പം കാരണം ഓരോ വിശേഷത്തിനും വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ച ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കി. അവസാനം നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ മോഡലുകളെ മ The evaluation results show an accuracy of 59.0% and a macro-F1 score of 39.7%, which represent sizable improvements over the majority-class baseline (Acc=30.3%, macro-F1=5.2%).', 'ms': 'Online media aim for reaching ever bigger audience and for attracting ever longer attention span.  This competition creates an environment that rewards sensational, fake, and toxic news.  Untuk membantu membatasi penyebaran dan kesan mereka, kami cadangkan dan mengembangkan pengesan toksik berita yang boleh mengenali berbagai jenis kandungan toksik. Sementara kajian terdahulu terutama fokus pada bahasa Inggeris, di sini kita sasarkan Bulgari. Kami mencipta set data baru dengan merangkak laman web yang selama lima tahun telah mengumpulkan artikel berita Bulgaria yang secara manual dikategorikan menjadi lapan kumpulan toksik. Then we trained a multi-class classifier with nine categories: eight toxic and one non-toxic.  We experimented with different representations based on ElMo, BERT, and XLM, as well as with a variety of domain-specific features.  Oleh sebab saiz kecil set data kami, kami mencipta model terpisah untuk setiap jenis ciri, dan akhirnya kami menggabungkan model ini ke dalam pengklasifikasi-meta. The evaluation results show an accuracy of 59.0% and a macro-F1 score of 39.7%, which represent sizable improvements over the majority-class baseline (Acc=30.3%, macro-F1=5.2%).', 'lt': 'internetinės žiniasklaidos tikslas – pasiekti vis didesnę auditoriją ir pritraukti vis daugiau dėmesio. Ši konkurencija sukuria aplinką, kuri atlygina sensacines, suklastotas ir toksines naujienas. Siekiant apriboti jų plitimą ir poveikį, siūlome ir kuriame naujienų toksiškumo detektorių, galinčių atpažinti įvairių rūšių toksinį turinį. Nors ankstesniuose tyrimuose daugiausia dėmesio buvo skiriama anglų kalbai, čia mes nukreipiame į bulgarų kalbą. Sukūrėme naują duomenų rinkinį plaukiojant į interneto svetainę, kuri penkerius metus renka Bulgarijos naujienų straipsnius, kurie rankiniu būdu buvo suskirstyti į a štuonias toksiškumo grupes. Tada apmokėme įvairių klasių klasifikatorių su devyniomis kategorijomis: a štuoniomis toksiškomis ir viena toksiška. Eksperimentavome su skirtingomis atstovybėmis, pagrįstomis ElMo, BERT ir XLM, taip pat su įvairiomis sritims būdingomis savybėmis. Due to the small size of our dataset, we created a separate model for each feature type, and we ultimately combined these models into a meta-classifier.  Vertinimo rezultatai rodo 59,0 % tikslumą ir 39,7 % makro-F1 balas, o tai reikšmingai pagerėja, palyginti su daugumos klasės pradiniu lygiu (Acc=30,3 %, makro-F1=5,2 %).', 'mk': '袨薪谢邪褬薪 屑械写懈褍屑懈褌械 懈屑邪邪褌 蟹邪 褑械谢 写邪 写芯褋褌懈谐薪邪褌 褋茅 锌芯谐芯谢械屑邪 锌褍斜谢懈泻邪 懈 写邪 锌褉懈胁谢械褔邪褌 褋茅 锌芯写芯谢谐芯 胁薪懈屑邪薪懈械. 袨胁邪邪 泻芯薪泻褍褉械薪褑懈褬邪 褋芯蟹写邪胁邪 褋褉械写懈薪邪 泻芯褬邪 薪邪谐褉邪写褍胁邪 褋械薪蟹邪褑懈芯薪邪谢薪懈, 谢邪卸薪懈 懈 褌芯泻褋懈褔薪懈 胁械褋褌懈. 袟邪 写邪 锌芯屑芯谐薪械屑械 胁芯 芯谐褉邪薪懈褔褍胁邪褮械褌芯 薪邪 薪懈胁薪芯褌芯 褕懈褉械褮械 懈 胁谢懈褬邪薪懈械, 锌褉械写谢芯卸褍胁邪屑械 懈 褉邪蟹胁懈胁邪屑械 写械褌械泻褌芯褉 蟹邪 褌芯泻褋懈褔薪芯褋褌 薪邪 胁械褋褌懈褌械 泻芯褬 屑芯卸械 写邪 锌褉械锌芯蟹薪邪械 褉邪蟹谢懈褔薪懈 胁懈写芯胁懈 褌芯泻褋懈褔薪邪 褋芯写褉卸懈薪邪. While previous research primarily focused on English, here we target Bulgarian.  小芯蟹写邪写芯胁屑械 薪芯胁懈 锌芯写邪褌芯褑懈 褋芯 锌褉械谢懈褋褌褍胁邪褮械 薪邪 胁械斜-褋褌褉邪薪懈褑邪 泻芯褬邪 锌械褌 谐芯写懈薪懈 褋芯斜懈褉邪 斜褍谐邪褉褋泻懈 胁械褋褌懈 泻芯懈 斜械邪 褉邪褔薪芯 泻邪褌械谐芯褉懈蟹懈褉邪薪懈 胁芯 芯褋褍屑 谐褉褍锌懈 薪邪 褌芯泻褋懈褔薪芯褋褌. 袩芯褌芯邪 褌褉械薪懈褉邪胁屑械 屑褍谢褌懈泻谢邪褋懈褎懈泻邪褌芯褉 褋芯 写械胁械褌 泻邪褌械谐芯褉懈懈: 芯褋褍屑 褌芯泻褋懈褔薪懈 懈 械写械薪 薪械褌芯泻褋懈褔械薪. 袝泻褋锌械褉懈屑械薪褌懈褉邪胁屑械 褋芯 褉邪蟹谢懈褔薪懈 锌褉械褌褋褌邪胁褍胁邪褮邪 斜邪蟹懈褉邪薪懈 薪邪 ElMo, BERT 懈 XLM, 泻邪泻芯 懈 褋芯 褉邪蟹谢懈褔薪懈 褋锌械褑懈褎懈褔薪懈 泻邪褉邪泻褌械褉懈褋褌懈泻懈 薪邪 写芯屑械薪. 袩芯褉邪写懈 屑邪谢邪褌邪 谐芯谢械屑懈薪邪 薪邪 薪邪褕懈芯褌 锌芯写邪褌芯泻, 褋芯蟹写邪写芯胁屑械 芯写写械谢械薪 屑芯写械谢 蟹邪 褋械泻芯褬 褌懈锌 薪邪 泻邪褉邪泻褌械褉懈褋褌懈泻邪, 懈 薪邪 泻褉邪褬芯褌 谐懈 泻芯屑斜懈薪懈褉邪胁屑械 芯胁懈械 屑芯写械谢懈 胁芯 屑械褌邪泻谢邪褋懈褎懈泻邪褌芯褉. The evaluation results show an accuracy of 59.0% and a macro-F1 score of 39.7%, which represent sizable improvements over the majority-class baseline (Acc=30.3%, macro-F1=5.2%).', 'pl': 'Media internetowe mają na celu dotarcie do coraz większej publiczności i przyciąganie coraz większej uwagi. Konkurs ten tworzy środowisko, które nagradza rewelacyjne, fałszywe i toksyczne wiadomości. Aby ograniczyć ich rozprzestrzenianie się i wpływ, proponujemy i opracowujemy detektor toksyczności wiadomości, który może rozpoznawać różne rodzaje zawartości toksycznych. Podczas gdy poprzednie badania skupiały się głównie na angielskim, tutaj skupiamy się na języku bułgarskim. Stworzyliśmy nowy zestaw danych poprzez crawling strony internetowej, która od pięciu lat gromadzi bułgarskie artykuły wiadomościowe, które zostały ręcznie podzielone na osiem grup toksycznych. Następnie trenowaliśmy wieloklasowy klasyfikator z dziewięciu kategorii: osiem toksycznych i jedną nietoksycznych. Eksperymentowaliśmy z różnymi reprezentacjami opartymi na ElMo, BERT i XLM, a także z różnymi funkcjami specyficznymi dla domeny. Ze względu na niewielki rozmiar naszego zbioru danych stworzyliśmy oddzielny model dla każdego typu funkcji i ostatecznie połączyliśmy te modele w metaklasyfikator. Wyniki oceny pokazują dokładność 59,0% i wynik makro-F1 39,7%, co oznacza znaczącą poprawę w stosunku do linii bazowej klasy większościowej (Acc=30,3%, makro-F1=5,2%).', 'no': 'Mål på nettmedien for å nå noko større publikum og for å tiltrekke noko lengre oppmerksområde. Denne konkurransen oppretter eit miljø som tilbakestill sensational, falsk og toksisk nyhetar. For å hjelpa å avgrense spreidda og effekten, foreslår vi og utviklar eit nyhetskotsdetektor som kan gjenkjenne ulike typar toksiske innhald. Mens førre forskning fokuserte hovudsakelig på engelsk, mål vi Bulgarsk her. Vi oppretta ei ny dataset ved å køyra ein nettstad som fem år har samla Bulgarske nyhetsgrupper som vart manuelt kategorisert i åtte toksiske grupper. Så vi trenga ein multiklassesklassifiserer med ni kategoriar: åtte toksisk og ein ikkje-toksisk. Vi eksperimenterte med ulike representasjonar basert på ElMo, BERT og XLM, og med ulike domenespesifikke funksjonar. På grunn av den lille storleiken på datasettet vårt, oppretta vi ein eigen modell for kvar funksjonstype, og vi konbinerte desse modelane til ein metaklassifisering. Evalueringsresultatet viser eit nøyaktig 59,0% og eit makro-F1- score med 39,7%, som representerer stor forbedringar over dei fleste klassesbaselinja (Acc=30,3%, makro-F1=5,2%).', 'mn': 'Онлайн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчийн зорилго нь илүү том сонсогчид хүрэх, илүү их анхаарал татах зорилго юм. Энэ өрсөлдөөн нь мэдрэмжтэй, хуурамч, хохиромжтой мэдээг шагнах орчин бий болгодог. Тэдний тархалтыг хязгаарлах, нөлөөлөлийг хязгаарлахын тулд бид өөр өөр төрлийн хохиромжтой бүтээгдэхүүнийг таниж чадах мэдээллийн хохиромжтой detektoр боловсруулдаг. Өмнөх судалгаа англи хэл дээр анхаарлаа анхаарлаа хандуулсан ч, энд бид Болгарчуудыг зориулж байна. Бид таван жилийн турш Болгарийн мэдээллийн баримтуудыг 8 хохиролтой бүлгүүдэд хуваалцаж байгаа вэбсайтын хувьд шинэ өгөгдлийн санг бүтээсэн. Дараа нь бид 9 категорийн олон ангийнхээ хувьд 8 хортой, нэг хортой биш. Бид ElMo, BERT, XLM болон олон төрлийн тодорхойлолтуудыг туршиж үзсэн. Манай өгөгдлийн сангийн жижиг хэмжээнд бид өөр өөр төрлийн загвар бүтээсэн. Эцэст нь эдгээр загваруудыг мета-классификатор болгосон. Үүний шалгалтын үр дүнд 59.0% болон 39.7% макро-F1 хувь нь тодорхой байдал харагдаж байна. Энэ нь ихэнх ангины суурь шугам дээр хэмжээний сайжруулалтыг илэрхийлдэг (Acc=30.3%, макро-F1=5.2%).', 'ro': 'Media online urmărește să ajungă la un public tot mai mare și să atragă atenția tot mai lungă. Această competiție creează un mediu care recompensează știri senzaționale, false și toxice. Pentru a ajuta la limitarea răspândirii și impactului acestora, propunem și dezvoltăm un detector de toxicitate de știri care poate recunoaște diferite tipuri de conținut toxic. În timp ce cercetările anterioare s-au concentrat în principal pe limba engleză, aici vizăm limba bulgară. Am creat un nou set de date accesând un site web care de cinci ani colectează articole de știri bulgare care au fost clasificate manual în opt grupuri de toxicitate. Apoi am instruit un clasificator multi-clasa cu noua categorii: opt toxice si una non-toxice. Am experimentat cu diferite reprezentări bazate pe Elmo, BERT și XLM, precum și cu o varietate de caracteristici specifice domeniului. Datorită dimensiunii mici a setului nostru de date, am creat un model separat pentru fiecare tip de caracteristică și, în cele din urmă, am combinat aceste modele într-un meta-clasificator. Rezultatele evaluării arată o precizie de 59,0% și un scor macro-F1 de 39,7%, ceea ce reprezintă îmbunătățiri considerabile față de valoarea inițială a clasei majoritare (Acc=30,3%, macro-F1=5,2%).', 'sr': 'Онлайн медији имају цел да постигнем још већу публику и да привлекајем још увек пажње. Ova konkurencija stvara okolinu koja nagradi senzacionalne, lažne i toksične vesti. Da bi pomogli ograničiti njihov širenje i utjecaj, predlažemo i razvijamo detektor toksičnosti vesti koji može prepoznati različite vrste toksičnog sadržaja. Dok je prethodno istraživanje uglavnom fokusiralo na engleski, ovde smo ciljani bugarskom. Napravili smo novi set podataka putem otvaranja vebsajta koji pet godina skuplja bugarske novine članke koje su ručno kategorizirane u osam toksičnih grupa. Onda smo obučili višeklasičnog klasičnog klasičnog klasičara sa devet kategorija: osam toksičnih i jednog ne-toksičnog. Eksperimentirali smo sa različitim predstavljanjem na osnovu ElMo, BERT i XLM, kao i sa različitim specifičnim karakteristikama domena. Zbog male veličine našeg seta podataka, stvorili smo odvojeni model za svaku vrstu karakteristike, i konačno smo kombinirali te modele u metaklasifikatoru. Rezultati procjene pokazuju tačnost od 59,0% i makro-F1 rezultat od 39,7%, što predstavlja velike poboljšanje iznad početne linije većine klase (Acc=30,3%, makro-F1=5,2%).', 'si': 'ඇන්ලයින් මිඩියාව අදහස් කරනවා වැඩි ප්\u200dරේක්ෂකයන්ට ලැබෙන්න සහ වැඩි අවධානය අල්ලගන්න. මේ සංවේදනය නිර්මාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම සංවේදනය, බොහොම, සහ වික්ෂිත ආරංචියක් ප උදව් කරන්න ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ ප්\u200dරභාවය සීමාවට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ පිරිසි පරීක්ෂණාව ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලට ප්\u200dරධානය කළොත්, මෙතන අපි බුල්ගරියාන අපි අලුත් දත්ත සෙට් එකක් හදලා වැබැයිට් එකක් හදලා තියෙන්නේ. අවුරුදු පහකට බුල්ගරියාන් වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරකාරයක් සම්බන්ධ ඊට පස්සේ අපි විශේෂ විශේෂකයෙක් පුහුණුවන් විශේෂකයෙක් විශේෂකයෙක් විශේෂකයෙන් විශේෂ කර අපි ElMo, BERT, XLM වලින් වෙනස් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සමග පරීක්ෂණය කළා, ඒ වගේම වෙනස් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශේෂ විශේෂ අපේ දත්ත සැට් පුංචි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නිසා අපි හැම විශේෂ වර්ගයක්ම වෙනුවෙන් පෙනුම් මොඩේලයක් හොයාගත්තා, අපි අන්තිමේද විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර 59.0% සහ 39.7% මැක්රෝF1 ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශේෂය කරනවා (Acc=30.3%, macro-F1=5.2', 'so': 'Macluumaadka internetka waxaa loogu talagalay in uu gaadho dhegayaasha aad u weyn iyo in uu waqtiga dheer ku dhaqaajiyo daryeelka. Tartanku wuxuu abuuraa deegaan siiya warar qalloocan, been iyo caqli leh. Si ay u caawiyaan inay u xadiso faamulka iyo saameyntooda, waxaynu horumarinaynaa dhaqdhaqaaqa warqada maandooriyaha, taasoo aqoonsan kara noocyo kala duduwan waxyaabaha maandooriyaha ah. Marka cilmi-baaritaankii hore uu ugu horeeyay Ingiriis, halkan waxaynu u goaynaynaa Bulgarian. Waxaannu sameynay sawir cusub oo lagu baaraandegay bogagga shabakadda in shan sano ay soo ururiyeen warqadaha warqadaha Bulgaria oo ay si gacan ah u kala qeybiyeen siddeed kooxood oo tijaabada ah. Markaas waxaynu tababarinnay fasalka kala duduwan oo ku qoran sagaal kooxood: siddeed dhibaato iyo mid aan khatar lahayn. Waxaannu ku tijaabiynay noocyo kala duduwan oo ku saleysan ElMo, BERT iyo XLM, sidoo kale waxaan ku imtixaannay noocyo kala duduwan deegaanka. Sababta tirada yar ee sawirkeena, waxan u abuurnay qaab gaar ah oo cayn kasta ah, waxaana ugu danbaynay tusaalahan u dhignay mid meta-fasax ah. Xirfada qiimeyntu waxay ka muuqataa saxda qiyaastii 59.0 % iyo koox macro-F1 oo ka mid ah 39.7%, taasoo ka mid ah hagaajinta aad u fiican ee fasalka ugu badan (Acc=30.3%, macro-F1=5.2%).', 'sv': 'Nätmedierna strävar efter att nå allt större publik och locka till sig allt längre uppmärksamhet. Denna tävling skapar en miljö som belönar sensationella, falska och giftiga nyheter. För att begränsa deras spridning och påverkan föreslår och utvecklar vi en nyhetstoxicitetsdetektor som kan känna igen olika typer av giftigt innehåll. Medan tidigare forskning främst fokuserade på engelska, riktar vi oss här till bulgariska. Vi skapade ett nytt dataset genom att genomsöka en webbplats som i fem år har samlat in bulgariska nyhetsartiklar som manuellt kategoriserades i åtta toxicitetsgrupper. Sedan utbildade vi en flerklassklassificerare med nio kategorier: åtta giftiga och en giftfri. Vi experimenterade med olika representationer baserade på Elmo, BERT och XLM, samt med en mängd olika domänspecifika funktioner. På grund av den lilla storleken på vår dataset skapade vi en separat modell för varje funktionstyp, och vi kombinerade slutligen dessa modeller till en metaklassificerare. Utvärderingsresultaten visar en noggrannhet på 59,0% och en makro-F1-poäng på 39,7%, vilket innebär avsevärda förbättringar jämfört med majoritetsklassens baslinje (Acc=30,3%, makro-F1=5,2%).', 'ta': 'இணைய ஊடகங்களுக்கு எதிராக பெரிய பார்ப்பவர்களை அடையும் மற்றும் நீண்ட நேரம் கவனத்தை ஏற்படுத்துவதற்கு. இந்த போட்டியின் சூழலை உருவாக்குகிறது, உணர்வு பொய், பொய் மற்றும் தீவிரமான செய்திகளை வழங்குகிறது. அவர்களுடைய விரிவுகளை மற்றும் விளைவுகளை வரம்பு செய்ய உதவுகிறது, நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் மற்றும் நாம் ஒரு செய்தி தொடுக் முந்தைய ஆய்வு முதன்மையாக ஆங்கிலத்தில் கவனம் செலுத்தும் போது, இங்கே புல்கேரியாவை நாம் இலக் நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்கினோம் ஒரு இணையதளத்தின் மூலம் குறிக்கும் பொழுது ஐந்து வருடங்களாக புல்கேரிய செய்தி கட் ஒன்பது வகுப்புகளுடன் பல வகுப்பாளரை பயிற்சி செய்தோம். ElMo, BERT, மற்றும் XLM அடிப்படையில் வேறு குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குணங்களைக் கொண்டும் நாம் சோதனைப்படு எங்கள் தரவுத்தளத்தின் சிறிய அளவு காரணமாக, ஒவ்வொரு குணங்கள் வகைக்கும் ஒரு தனிப்பட்ட மாதிரி உருவாக்கினோம், இறுதியாக இந்த மாதிரிகளை  மதிப்பின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'اولاین میڈیا کا ارادہ ہے کہ کبھی بڑے اہل کو پہنچ سکیں اور کبھی زیادہ اہلِ توجه کو اٹھانے کے لئے۔ یہ مقابلہ ایک محیط ایجاد کرتا ہے جو سنسیشن, جھوٹی اور جسمی خبریں بدلہ دیتا ہے۔ ان کے پھیلانے اور تاثیر کے اندازے مدد کرنے کے لئے، ہم ایک اخبار کی سم ڈاکٹر کی پیشنهاد کریں اور ایجاد کریں جو مختلف طرح سم کی موتوں کو پہچان سکتا ہے۔ حالانکہ پہلے کی تحقیقات انگلیسی پر مضبوط تھا، یہاں ہم بولغاریوں کو موجود کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نے ایک ویب سائٹ بنایا ہے جو پانچ سال تک بلگاری خبریاں لاکھوں کو جمع کر رہا ہے جو آٹھ سمیٹی گروپ میں دستگیر ہوئے ہیں۔ پھر ہم نے ایک multi-class classifier کو نو قسم کے ساتھ آموزش دی: آٹھ سم اور ایک غیر سم. ہم نے ElMo, BERT اور XLM پر بنیاد مختلف نمونات کے ساتھ آزمائش کی، اور ایک مختلف ڈومین کے مختلف نمونات کے ساتھ بھی. ہمارے ڈاٹ سٹ کے چھوٹے اندازے کے باعث ہم نے ہر فرصت نوع کے لئے ایک مختلف موڈل پیدا کیا، اور بالآخر ہم نے ان موڈلوں کو متا-کلاسیر میں ترکیب کیا۔ ارزیابی نتیجے 59.0% اور 39.7% کے مکرو-F1 اسکور کی دقیق دکھاتے ہیں، جو اکثر کلاس بیس لین کے ذریعہ سے بہت ساز ترقی کرتی ہے (Acc=30.3%, مکرو-F1=5.2%).', 'mt': 'Il-midja onlajn għandha l-għan li tilħaq udjenza dejjem akbar u li tattira firxa dejjem itwal ta’ attenzjoni. Din il-kompetizzjoni toħloq ambjent li jippremja aħbarijiet sensazzjonali, foloz u tossiċi. Biex ngħinu jillimitaw it-tixrid u l-impatt tagħhom, nipproponu u niżviluppaw detettur tat-tossiċità tal-a ħbarijiet li jista’ jirrikonoxxi diversi tipi ta’ kontenut tossiku. Filwaqt li r-riċerka preċedenti ffukat primarjament fuq l-Ingliż, hawnhekk għandna fil-mira l-Bulgaru. Ħoljna sett ġdid ta’ dejta billi nġibdu fuq websajt li għal ħames snin ilha tiġbor artikoli tal-a ħbarijiet Bulgari li ġew ikkategorizzati manwalment fi tmien gruppi ta’ tossiċità. Then we trained a multi-class classifier with nine categories: eight toxic and one non-toxic.  We experimented with different representations based on ElMo, BERT, and XLM, as well as with a variety of domain-specific features.  Minħabba d-daqs żgħir tas-sett tad-dejta tagħna, a ħna ħolqu mudell separat għal kull tip ta’ karatteristiċi, u fl-aħħar mill-aħħar aħna kkombinaw dawn il-mudelli f’meta-klassifikatur. Ir-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni juru preċiżjoni ta’ 59.0% u punteġġ makro-F1 ta’ 39.7%, li jirrappreżentaw titjib sinifikanti fuq il-linja bażi tal-klassi maġġoritarja (Acc=30.3%, makro-F1=5.2%).', 'uz': "Online media aim for reaching ever bigger audience and for attracting ever longer attention span.  Bu rivojlanuvchi sensonlik, falsa va toksisk xabar beruvchi muhitni yaratadi. Ularni o'zgartirish va ta'sirini chegara qilishga yordam beramiz, biz ko'pchilik tizim tarkibini tanlash mumkin va ma'lumotni tahlil qilamiz. Oldingi o'rganishlar ingliz tilida eng muhimi foydalanayotganda, bu yerda Bulgariy tilini qanday qilamiz. Biz yangi maʼlumotlar tarkibini avtomatik yaratdik, besh yil uchun Bulgariy xabar maqolalarini qo'llab qo'llangan sakkiz toʻgʻri guruhga tayyorlaydi. Keyin biz 9 guruhga bir ko'plab klassifni o'rganimiz: sakkiz toksiz va bitta toksiz emas. Biz ElMo, BERT, XLM asosida va har xil domen xossalari bilan boshqa shakllarni ko'rsatdik. Maʼlumotlar tarkibining kichik oʻlchami sababi biz har bir xossa turi uchun alohida modelni yaratdik, va oxirida bu modellarni meta-klassifiker bilan birlashtirдик. Qiymati natijalari 59. 0% va 39. 7% - makro- F1 scori aniqlanadi. Bu katta darajada katta darajadagi bazalar chegarasini ko'paytirish (Acc=30. 3%, makro-F1=5. 2%).", 'vi': 'Truyền thông trực tuyến nhằm đạt đến những khán giả lớn hơn và thu hút sự chú ý lâu dài hơn. Cuộc thi này tạo ra một môi trường thưởng cho những tin tức giật gân, giả mạo và độc hại. Để hạn chế độ lây lan và tác động của chúng, chúng tôi đề xuất và phát triển một máy phát hiện độc tính tin tức có thể nhận diện các loại chất độc hại khác nhau. Trong khi nghiên cứu trước chủ yếu tập trung vào Anh, ở đây chúng tôi nhắm vào Bulgaria. Chúng tôi tạo ra một tập tin mới bằng cách xâm nhập một trang web mà đã thu thập các bài báo về Bulgaria, được tự phân loại vào tám nhóm độc tố. Sau đó chúng tôi đào tạo một phân loại đa hạng với chín loại: tám chất độc và một độc. Chúng tôi đã thử nghiệm nhiều bộ trình diễn khác nhau dựa trên ElMo, BERT, và XLM, cùng với các đặc điểm miền. Do kích thước nhỏ của bộ dữ liệu, chúng tôi tạo ra một mô hình riêng cho mỗi loại đặc trưng, và cuối cùng chúng tôi kết hợp các mô hình này thành dị biến phân loại. Kết quả đánh giá cho thấy độ chính xác của 59.0=. và một vi. F1 ghi số 39.7 Name, chúng là tiến bộ đáng kể trên cơ sở cơ sở cơ bản đa số (Acc=30.3=, macro-F1=5.2=).', 'bg': 'Онлайн медиите имат за цел да достигнат все по-голяма аудитория и да привлекат все по-дълго внимание. Това състезание създава среда, която възнаграждава сензационни, фалшиви и токсични новини. За да се ограничи тяхното разпространение и въздействие, ние предлагаме и разработваме новинарски детектор за токсичност, който може да разпознае различни видове токсично съдържание. Докато предишните изследвания са фокусирани основно върху английския език, тук сме насочени към български език. Създадохме нов набор от данни чрез обхождане на уебсайт, който от пет години събира български новинарски статии, които са ръчно категоризирани в осем групи токсичност. След това обучихме многокласен класификатор с девет категории: осем токсични и една нетоксични. Експериментирахме с различни изображения, базирани на както и с различни специфични за домейна функции. Поради малкия размер на нашия набор от данни създадохме отделен модел за всеки тип функции и в крайна сметка комбинирахме тези модели в мета-класификатор. Резултатите от оценката показват точност от 59,0% и макро-F1 резултат от 39,7%, което представлява значителни подобрения спрямо базовите стойности на мнозинството (Acc=30,3%, макро-F1=5,2%).', 'da': 'Online medier sigter mod at nå ud til stadig større publikum og tiltrække stadig længere opmærksomhed. Denne konkurrence skaber et miljø, der belønner sensationelle, falske og giftige nyheder. For at hjælpe med at begrænse deres spredning og påvirkning, foreslår og udvikler vi en nyhedstoksdetektor, der kan genkende forskellige typer giftigt indhold. Mens tidligere forskning primært fokuserede på engelsk, er vi her rettet mod bulgarsk. Vi skabte et nyt datasæt ved at gennemgå en hjemmeside, der i fem år har indsamlet bulgarske nyhedsartikler, der manuelt blev kategoriseret i otte toksicitetsgrupper. Så trænede vi en klasse klassificering med ni kategorier: otte giftige og en giftfri. Vi eksperimenterede med forskellige repræsentationer baseret på Elmo, BERT og XLM, samt med en række domænespecifikke funktioner. På grund af vores datasæts lille størrelse skabte vi en separat model for hver funktionstype, og vi kombinerede i sidste ende disse modeller til en meta-klassificering. Evalueringsresultaterne viser en nøjagtighed på 59,0% og en makro-F1 score på 39,7%, hvilket repræsenterer betydelige forbedringer i forhold til hovedklassens baseline (Acc=30,3%, makro-F1=5,2%).', 'nl': 'Online media zijn gericht op het bereiken van een steeds groter publiek en het aantrekken van een steeds langere aandachtsspanne. Deze wedstrijd creëert een omgeving die sensationeel, nep en giftig nieuws beloont. Om de verspreiding en impact ervan te beperken, stellen we een nieuwstoxiciteitsdetector voor en ontwikkelen die verschillende soorten toxische inhoud kan herkennen. Terwijl eerder onderzoek voornamelijk gericht was op Engels, richten we ons hier op het Bulgaars. We creëerden een nieuwe dataset door een website te crawlen die al vijf jaar Bulgaarse nieuwsberichten verzamelt die handmatig werden gecategoriseerd in acht toxiciteitsgroepen. Vervolgens hebben we een multi-class classificator getraind met negen categorieën: acht giftig en één niet giftig. We experimenteerden met verschillende representaties gebaseerd op ElMo, BERT en XLM, evenals met een verscheidenheid aan domeinspecifieke functies. Vanwege de kleine omvang van onze dataset hebben we voor elk feature type een afzonderlijk model gemaakt en deze modellen uiteindelijk gecombineerd tot een metaclassificator. De evaluatieresultaten tonen een nauwkeurigheid van 59,0% en een macro-F1 score van 39,7%, die aanzienlijke verbeteringen vertegenwoordigen ten opzichte van de meerderheidsklasse baseline (Acc=30,3%, macro-F1=5,2%).', 'id': 'Media online tujuan untuk mencapai penonton yang semakin besar dan untuk menarik perhatian semakin panjang. Kompetisi ini menciptakan lingkungan yang membalas berita sensasi, palsu dan beracun. To help limit their spread and impact, we propose and develop a news toxicity detector that can recognize various types of toxic content.  Sementara penelitian sebelumnya terutama fokus pada bahasa Inggris, di sini kita menargetkan Bulgari. Kami menciptakan dataset baru dengan merangkak situs yang selama lima tahun telah mengumpulkan artikel berita Bulgari yang secara manual dikategorikan menjadi delapan kelompok toksicitas. Then we trained a multi-class classifier with nine categories: eight toxic and one non-toxic.  Kami eksperimen dengan representati berbeda berdasarkan ElMo, BERT, dan XLM, serta dengan berbagai ciri-ciri domain-spesifik. Karena ukuran kecil dari dataset kami, kami menciptakan model terpisah untuk setiap tipe fitur, dan akhirnya kami menggabungkan model ini menjadi meta-classifier. Hasil evaluasi menunjukkan akurasi 59,0% dan skor makro-F1 39,7%, yang mewakili peningkatan yang besar atas dasar utama kelas (Acc=30,3%, makro-F1=5,2%).', 'hr': 'Online mediji ciljaju postići još veću publiku i privući još duže pažnju. Ova konkurencija stvara okolinu koja nagradi senzacionalne, lažne i toksične vijesti. Da bi pomogli ograničiti njihov širenje i utjecaj, predlažemo i razvijamo detektor toksičnosti vijesti koji može prepoznati različite vrste toksičnog sadržaja. Iako je prethodno istraživanje usredotočeno na engleski, ovdje smo ciljani bugarskom. Stvorili smo novi sastav podataka otvarajući stranicu koja je pet godina skupljala bugarske vijesti članke koje su ručno kategorizirane u osam toksičnih skupina. Onda smo obučili višeklasičnog klasičnog klasičnog klasičara sa devet kategorija: osam toksičnih i jednog ne-toksičnog. Eksperimentirali smo s različitim predstavljanjem na temelju ElMo, BERT i XLM, kao i s različitim specifičnim karakteristikama domena. Zbog malog veličine našeg seta podataka, stvorili smo odvojeni model za svaku vrstu funkcija, i konačno smo kombinirali te modele u metaklasifikatoru. Rezultati procjene pokazuju preciznost 59,0% i makro-F1 rezultat 39,7%, što predstavlja velike poboljšanje iznad početne linije većine klase (Acc=30,3%, makro-F1=5,2%).', 'ko': '인터넷 매체의 목표는 더 많은 시청자를 접촉하고 더 많은 관심을 끄는 것이다.이런 경쟁은 사람을 놀라게 하고 거짓되고 유독한 뉴스를 장려하는 환경을 만들었다.그것들의 전파와 영향을 제한하는 데 도움을 주기 위해 우리는 각종 유독 내용을 식별할 수 있는 뉴스 독성 검출기를 제기하고 개발하였다.이전의 연구는 주로 영어에 집중되었지만 우리의 목표는 불가리아어였다.우리는 한 사이트를 캡처하여 새로운 데이터 집합을 만들었다. 이 사이트는 5년 동안 불가리아의 뉴스 기사를 수집해 왔는데, 이 기사들은 수동으로 8개의 독성 그룹으로 나누어졌다.그리고 우리는 9개의 종류를 포함하는 여러 종류의 분류기를 훈련시켰다. 8개의 유독 종류와 1개의 무독 종류이다.ElMo, BERT 및 XLM의 다양한 표현과 영역별 기능을 기반으로 했습니다.우리의 데이터 집합이 매우 작기 때문에, 우리는 모든 특징 유형을 위해 하나의 단독 모델을 만들고, 최종적으로 이 모델들을 하나의 원 분류기로 조합한다.평가 결과 정확도는 59.0%, 거시-F1 평점은 39.7%로 대다수 학급 기준선에 비해 상당히 개선됐다는 것을 보여준다(Acc=30.3%, 거시-F1=5.2%).', 'de': 'Online-Medien zielen darauf ab, ein immer größeres Publikum zu erreichen und eine immer größere Aufmerksamkeitsspanne zu gewinnen. Dieser Wettbewerb schafft ein Umfeld, das sensationelle, gefälschte und giftige Nachrichten belohnt. Um ihre Ausbreitung und Auswirkungen zu begrenzen, schlagen wir einen Nachrichtentoxizitätsdetektor vor, der verschiedene Arten von toxischen Gehalten erkennen kann. Während sich frühere Forschungen hauptsächlich auf Englisch konzentrierten, konzentrieren wir uns hier auf Bulgarisch. Wir haben einen neuen Datensatz erstellt, indem wir eine Website crawlen, die seit fünf Jahren bulgarische Nachrichtenartikel sammelt, die manuell in acht Toxizitätsgruppen kategorisiert wurden. Dann trainierten wir einen mehrstufigen Klassifikator mit neun Kategorien: acht toxisch und eine ungiftig. Wir experimentierten mit verschiedenen Darstellungen basierend auf ElMo, BERT und XLM sowie mit einer Vielzahl domänenspezifischer Features. Aufgrund der geringen Größe unseres Datensatzes haben wir für jeden Feature-Typ ein separates Modell erstellt und diese Modelle schließlich zu einem Meta-Klassifikator kombiniert. Die Auswertungsergebnisse zeigen eine Genauigkeit von 59,0% und einen Makro-F1-Score von 39,7%, die erhebliche Verbesserungen gegenüber der Mehrheitsklasse-Baseline darstellen (Acc=30,3%, makro-F1=5,2%).', 'sw': 'Vyombo vya habari vya mtandaoni ni lengo la kuwafikia hadhira kubwa zaidi na kuwavutia mwangalizi wa muda mrefu. Mashindano haya yanatengeneza mazingira yanayolipa habari za kisasa, bandia na vibaya. Ili kusaidia kuzuia usambazaji na athari zao, tunapendekeza na kutengeneza mtambuzi wa taarifa za vibaya ambavyo unaweza kutambua aina mbalimbali za maudhui yenye sumu. Wakati utafiti uliopita ulijikita kwenye Kiingereza, hapa tunalenga Bulgaria. Tumetengeneza seti mpya ya taarifa kwa kuingia tovuti ambayo kwa miaka mitano imekuwa ikikusanya makala za habari za Bulgaria ambazo ziligawanywa mikononi katika makundi nane ya sumu. Kisha tukamfundisha mwandishi wa darasa la watu kadhaa wenye makundi tisa: matatizo nane na moja isiyotoxica. Tulijaribu kwa maoni tofauti yanayotokana na ElMo, BERT, na XLM, pamoja na sifa mbalimbali za ndani. Kutokana na ukubwa mdogo wa seti yetu ya taarifa, tulitengeneza mtindo wa tofauti kwa kila aina ya aina hii, na hatimaye tukaunganisha mifano hizi kuwa mgawanyiko wa meta. Matokeo ya uchunguzi yanaonyesha uhakika wa asilimia 59.0 na score ya makro-F1 ya asilimia 39.7, ambayo inawakilisha maendeleo makubwa zaidi ya msingi wa darasa kubwa (Acc=30.3%, makro-F1=5.2%).', 'tr': "Çaltylyk medýýatlar hemişe uly adamlary ýetmek we hemişe üns çekmek üçin amaçlarýarlar. Bu ýaryşyk duýdury, sahte we toksik haberleri täzeden täzeden bir ortam bar. Deñişikliklerini we täsirini çykarmak üçin, haberler toksiýasyny tanap biljek we üýtgetmek üçin. Öňki barlag iňlisçe üns berýän bolsa bärde, Bulgarça galandyrýarys. Beş ýyldan bäri Bulgaristanyň täze bir maglumaty beýleki meýdançalar bilen sekiz toksiýet topara kategoriýaly hasaplanýar. Sonra dokuz kategori olan bir çoklu sınıf klasörünü öwrendik: sekiz toksik we bir toksik olmayan bir tane. ElMo, BERT, XLM'e dayanan farklı temsiller ile denedik ve domun belli özellikleri bilen denedik. Berüvleriň kiçi ululykyna sebäbi, her hili üçin ayrı bir nusga bejerdik we iň soňunda bu nusgalary meta-klasifikatçä birleşdirdik. Ýagtym netijesi 59.0% we makro-F1 अंwaty 39.7% degişlidir, bu iň köp sınıf üssünde ululyk gelişmeler ýaly çaklaýar (Ak=30.3%, makro-F1=5.2%)", 'fa': 'رسانه\u200cهای آنلاین هدف برای رسیدن به تماشاگران بزرگتر و برای جذب کردن مدت بیشتر توجه است. این رقابت یک محیط ایجاد می کند که اخبار حساسی، حقیقت و سمی را پاداش می دهد. برای کمک به محدودیت گسترش و تاثیر آنها، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و یک بازرس سمی اخبار را توسعه می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتواند مختلف نوع محتوای سمی را شناسایی کند. در حالی که تحقیقات قبلی در اصل روی انگلیسی تمرکز می\u200cشود، اینجا ما به بلگاری هدف می\u200cدهیم. ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات جدید را با تولید یک وب سایت ایجاد کردیم که برای پنج سال مجموعه های خبری بولغاری را جمع می\u200cکند که به دستی به هشت گروه سمی تقسیم شده است. سپس ما یک کلاس مختصر چندین کلاس با نو کلاس آموزش دادیم: هشت سم و یک غیر سم. ما با نمایش\u200cهای مختلف بر اساس ElMo, BERT و XLM آزمایش کردیم، همچنین با مختلف ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای دامنی. به دلیل اندازه کوچک مجموعه داده\u200cهای ما، یک مدل جدا برای هر نوع ویژه\u200cهای ویژه ایجاد کردیم، و بالاخره این مدل\u200cها را به یک مجموعه\u200cگر مته\u200cگر ترکیب کردیم. نتایج ارزیابی دقیقات 59.0 درصد و نمونه Makro-F1 درصد 39.7 درصد را نشان می دهد، که توسعه قابل توسعه بزرگی بر پایه\u200cهای بیشتر کلاس (Acc=30.3 درصد، مکرو-F1=5.2 درصد).', 'sq': 'Media online synon të arrijë audiencë gjithmonë më të madhe dhe të tërheqë një zgjatje gjithmonë më të gjatë vëmendjeje. Ky konkurs krijon një mjedis që shpërblen lajme sensacionale, të rreme dhe toksike. Për të ndihmuar në kufizimin e shpërndarjes dhe ndikimit të tyre, ne propozojmë dhe zhvillojmë një detektor toksike të lajmeve që mund të njohë lloje të ndryshme të përmbajtjeve toksike. Ndërsa kërkimet e mëparshme u përqëndruan kryesisht në anglisht, këtu ne synojmë bullgarët. Ne krijuam një set të ri të dhënash duke kërkuar një faqe interneti që për pesë vjet ka mbledhur artikuj bullgarë të lajmeve që janë kategorizuar manualisht në tetë grupe toksike. Pastaj trajnuam një klasifikues shumë klase me nëntë kategori: tetë toksike dhe një jo toksike. Eksperimentuam me përfaqësime të ndryshme bazuar në ElMo, BERT dhe XLM, si dhe me një shumicë karakteristikësh specifike në domeni. Për shkak të madhësisë së vogël të grupit tonë të dhënash, krijuam një model të veçantë për çdo lloj funksionimi, dhe përfundimisht i kombinuam këto modele në një meta-klasifikues. Rezultatet e vlerësimit tregojnë një saktësi prej 59.0% dhe një rezultat makro-F1 prej 39.7%, që përfaqësojnë përmirësime të mëdha mbi bazën e klasës së shumicës (Acc=30.3%, makro-F1=5.2%).', 'am': 'የኢንተርኔት ሚዲያዎች ለዘላለም የበለጠ አድራጊዎችን ለመደርስ እና ለዘላለም ትኩረትን ለመቀበል ይችላል፡፡ ይሄ ተቃዋሚው የስህተት፣ ሐሰት እና የሐሰት ዜና የሚቀበል አካባቢ ይሠራል፡፡ መዘርጋቸውን እና ውጤታቸውን ለመግለጽ፣ ልዩ ዓይነት የጥቅረት ጥቅም የሚችል የዜና ተቃውሞ እና መፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ የቀድሞው ትምህርት እንግሊዘኛ ላይ በመጠቀም፣ በዚህ ቡልጋሪያን እናስመክራለን፡፡ አዲስ ዳታተር መፍጠርን በአምስት ዓመታት የቡልጋሪን የዜና ጽሑፎች እጃቸውን ወደ ስምንት የጥቁረት ክፍሎች ሲሰበስቡ ነው፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ በዘጠኝ ክፍል የተለያየን ብዙዎችን አስተማርነው፤ ስምንት ስካክሲ አንድም ስካክሲ ነው፡፡ በኤልሞ፣ BERT እና XLM በተመሳሳይ በተለያዩ መልዕክቶች ፈተናል፡፡ ከዳታ ዕይታችን ትንሽ መጠን ምክንያት ለሁሉም ምርጫዎች ዓይነት የተለየን ሞዴል ፈጠርነው፤ በመጨረሻም እነዚህን ምሳሌዎች መተላለፊያ እናደርጋለን፡፡ The evaluation results show an accuracy of 59.0% and a macro-F1 score of 39.7%, which represent sizable improvements over the majority-class baseline (Acc=30.3%, macro-F1=5.2%).', 'az': 'İnternettə media daha böyük auditoriyə ulaşmaq və daha uzun öyrənmək üçün məqsədilə nişan edir. Bu müharibə sensational, sahte və zehirli xəbərləri mükafatlandıran bir ortam yaradır. Onların yayılmasına və təsirlərinə kömək etmək üçün, müxtəlif zehirli məlumatları tanıyabilen bir xəbər zehirli detektörünü təbliğ edirik. Əvvəlki araştırma ilk dəfə İngilizə odaqlanmış olsa da, burda Bulgaristana məxsus edirik. Beş il boyunca Bulgarlıq haqq məktublarını səkkiz zehirli qruplara kategoriya edilən yeni bir veri qurmaq vasitəsilə yaratdıq. Sonra doqquz kategoriya olan çoxlu sınıf klasifikatoru təhsil etdik: sekiz zehirli və bir zehirli deyildir. ElMo, BERT və XLM-ə dayanan müxtəlif göstəricilər ilə təcrübə etdik. Və bir çox domain-specific özellikləri ilə təcrübə etdik. Verilər quruluğumuzun kiçik böyüklüyünün səbəbi, hər özellik növü üçün ayrı bir model yaratdıq və sonunda bu modelləri meta-klasifikatora birləşdirdik. Qıymet sonuçları 59,0% və makro-F1 nöqtəsi 39,7%-dir, ki çoxluğu sınıf səviyyəsində böyük düzəltmələri göstərir (Acc=30,3%, makro-F1=5,2%).', 'bn': 'অনলাইন প্রচার মাধ্যমের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে যারা সবচেয়ে বড় দর্শকদের কাছে পৌঁছাতে পারে এবং তাদের দীর্ঘদিনের মন এই প্রতিযোগিতা একটি পরিবেশ তৈরি করে যা সংবেদনশীল, মিথ্যা এবং ব্যস্ত সংবাদ পুরস্কার দেয়। তাদের ছড়িয়ে দেওয়া এবং প্রভাব সীমাবদ্ধ করতে সাহায্য করার জন্য আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি এবং একটি সংবাদ ব্যবস্থা ডিটেক্টর উন্নয়ন করি যা বি পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণা প্রথমে ইংরেজিতে মনোযোগ দিয়েছে, এখানে আমরা বুলগেরিয়ার লক্ষ্য করেছি। পাঁচ বছর ধরে বুলগেরিয়ার সংবাদ প্রবন্ধ সংগ্রহ করে একটি নতুন তথ্য সংগ্রহ করে একটি ওয়েবসাইট চালু করার মাধ্যমে আমরা একটি নতুন তথ্য সৃষ্টি করেছি যা হাত তারপর আমরা একটি মাল্টি ক্লাসের বিভাগের প্রশিক্ষণ দিয়েছিলাম ৯ শ্রেণীর সঙ্গে: আটটি ব্যস্ত এবং একটি ব্যস্ত নয়। এল মো, বের্টি এবং এক্সএলএম ভিত্তিক ভিন্ন প্রতিনিধিত্বের সাথে আমরা পরীক্ষা করেছি এবং বিভিন্ন ধরনের ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট বৈশিষ্ Due to the small size of our dataset, we created a separate model for each feature type, and we ultimately combined these models into a meta-classifier.  মূল্যের ফলাফল ৫৯. ০% এবং ম্যাক্রো-এফ১ স্কোরের মধ্যে ৩৯.', 'bs': 'U internetskim medijima cilj je da dođemo do veće publike i privučemo još više pažnje. Ova konkurencija stvara okolinu koja nagradi senzacionalne, lažne i toksične vijesti. Da bi pomogli ograničiti njihov širenje i utjecaj, predlažemo i razvijemo detektor toksičnosti vijesti koji može prepoznati različite vrste toksičnog sadržaja. Dok je prethodno istraživanje usredotočeno na engleski, ovdje smo ciljani bugarskom. Stvorili smo novi set podataka putem otvaranja internetskog sajta koji pet godina skuplja bugarske novinske članake koje su ručno kategorizirane u osam toksičnih grupa. Onda smo obučili višeklasičnog klasičnog klasičnog klasičara sa devet kategorija: osam toksičnih i jednog ne-toksičnog. Eksperimentirali smo sa različitim predstavljanjem na temelju ElMo, BERT i XLM, kao i sa različitim specifičnim karakteristikama domena. Zbog male veličine našeg seta podataka, stvorili smo odvojeni model za svaku vrstu funkcija, i konačno smo kombinirali te modele u metaklasifikatoru. Rezultati procjene pokazuju preciznost 59,0% i makro-F1 rezultat 39,7%, što predstavlja velike poboljšanje iznad početne linije većine klase (Acc=30,3%, makro-F1=5,2%).', 'ca': "Els mitjans de comunicació en línia busquen arribar a una audiència cada cop més gran i atrair més atenció. Aquesta competició crea un entorn que recompensa notícies sensacionals, falses i tòxices. Per ajudar a limitar la seva difusió i impacte, proposem i desenvolupem un detector de toxicitat de notícies que pot reconèixer diversos tipus de continguts tòxics. Mentre la recerca anterior es centrava principalment en anglès, aquí ens dirigim al búlgar. Vam crear un nou conjunt de dades buscant una pàgina web que durant cinc anys ha estat recollint articles de notícies búlgaros que van ser classificats manualment en vuit grups de toxicitat. Després vam entrenar un classificador multiclasse amb nou categories: vuit tòxics i un no tòxic. Hem experimentat amb diferents representacions basades en ElMo, BERT i XLM, i amb una varietat de característiques específices per domini. Due to the small size of our dataset, we created a separate model for each feature type, and we ultimately combined these models into a meta-classifier.  Els resultats de l'evaluació demostren una precisió del 59,0% i una puntuació macro-F1 del 39,7%, que representen millores significatives sobre el basal de la classe majoritària (Acc=30,3%, macro-F1=5,2%).", 'af': "Online ële media doel om altyd groter publiek te raak en om altyd langer aandag te raak. Hierdie mededing skep 'n omgewing wat sensasionale, falsies en toksiske nuus vergeld. Om hul verspreiding en effekt te beperk te help, voorstel ons en ontwikkel 'n nuustoksiteit-detektor wat verskillende tipes toksiske inhoud kan herken. Terwyl die vorige ondersoek voorspoedig op Engels gefokus het, hier doen ons Bulgarse. Ons het 'n nuwe datastel geskep deur 'n webwerk te kryf wat vir vyf jaar Bulgarse nuus artikels versamel het wat hand in agt toksiteitsgruppe kategoriseer is. Dan het ons 'n multiklasklasklassifiseerder opgelei met nege kategorie: agt toksik en een nie-toksik. Ons het eksperimenteer met verskillende voorstellings gebaseer op ElMo, BERT en XLM, asook met 'n verskillende domein-spesifieke funksies. Dus die klein grootte van ons datastel het ons 'n aparte model gemaak vir elke funksie tipe, en ons het eindelik hierdie modele in 'n metaklassifiseerder gekombineer. Die evalueringsresultate vertoon 'n presies van 59,0% en 'n makro-F1 telling van 39,7%, wat voorstel groottebaar verbeteringe oor die meeste klas basislien (Acc=30,3%, makro-F1=5,2%).", 'cs': 'Online média si kladou za cíl oslovit stále větší publikum a přitahovat stále delší pozornost. Tato soutěž vytváří prostředí, které odměňuje senzační, falešné a toxické zprávy. Abychom pomohli omezit jejich šíření a dopad, navrhujeme a vyvíjíme detektor toxicity zpráv, který dokáže rozpoznat různé typy toxického obsahu. Zatímco předchozí výzkum se zaměřoval především na angličtinu, zde se zaměřujeme na bulharštinu. Nový datový soubor jsme vytvořili procházením webu, který již pět let sbírá bulharské zpravodajské články, které byly ručně rozděleny do osmi toxických skupin. Pak jsme trénovali vícetřídní klasifikátor s devíti kategorií: osm toxických a jedna netoxických. Experimentovali jsme s různými reprezentacemi založenými na ElMo, BERT a XLM, stejně jako s řadou doménově specifických funkcí. Vzhledem k malé velikosti naší datové sady jsme pro každý typ funkcí vytvořili samostatný model a nakonec jsme tyto modely zkombinovali do metaklasifikátoru. Výsledky hodnocení ukazují přesnost 59,0% a makro-F1 skóre 39,7%, které představují značné zlepšení oproti většinové třídě základní hodnoty (Acc=30,3%, makro-F1=5,2%).', 'et': 'Online meedia eesmärk on jõuda üha suurema publikuni ja meelitada üha pikemat tähelepanu. See konkurss loob keskkonna, mis premeerib sensatsioonilisi, võltsitud ja mürgiseid uudiseid. Nende leviku ja mõju piiramiseks pakume välja ja töötame välja uudiseid mürgisuse detektori, mis suudab tuvastada erinevaid toksilisi sisaldusi. Samal ajal kui varasemad uuringud keskendusid peamiselt inglise keelele, siin on meie sihtrühm bulgaaria keel. Loosime uue andmekogumi, uurides veebilehte, mis on viis aastat kogunud Bulgaaria uudisteartikleid, mis liigitati käsitsi kaheksasse toksilisuse rühma. Seejärel koolitasime mitmeklassilise klassifikaatori üheksa kategooriaga: kaheksa mürgist ja üks mittetoksilist. Eksperimenteerisime erinevate ElMo, BERT ja XLM-il põhinevate representatsioonidega ning erinevate domeenispetsiifiliste funktsioonidega. Meie andmekogumi väikese suuruse tõttu lõime iga funktsioonitüübi jaoks eraldi mudeli ja lõpuks kombineerisime need mudelid metaklassifikaatoriks. Hindamistulemused näitavad 59,0% täpsust ja makro-F1 skoori 39,7%, mis tähendab märkimisväärset paranemist võrreldes enamiku klassi algtasemega (Acc=30,3%, makro-F1=5,2%).', 'fi': 'Verkkomedian tavoitteena on tavoittaa yhä suurempi yleisö ja houkutella yhä pidempään huomiota. Tämä kilpailu luo ympäristön, joka palkitsee sensaatiomaisia, väärennettyjä ja myrkyllisiä uutisia. Niiden leviämisen ja vaikutuksen rajoittamiseksi ehdotamme ja kehitämme uutismyrkyllisyyden ilmaisimen, joka tunnistaa erityyppiset myrkylliset sisällöt. Aiemmat tutkimukset keskittyivät pääasiassa englantiin, mutta tässä keskitytään bulgariaan. Luomme uuden aineiston indeksoimalla verkkosivustoa, joka on viiden vuoden ajan kerännyt bulgarialaisia uutisartikkeleita, jotka on luokiteltu manuaalisesti kahdeksaan myrkyllisyysryhmään. Sitten koulutimme moniluokan luokittelijan, jossa oli yhdeksän kategoriaa: kahdeksan myrkyllistä ja yksi myrkytöntä. Kokeilimme erilaisia ElMo-, BERT- ja XLM-esityksiä sekä erilaisia toimialueekohtaisia ominaisuuksia. Aineiston pienen koon vuoksi loimme kullekin ominaisuustyypille erillisen mallin ja lopulta yhdistimme nämä mallit meta-luokittelijaksi. Arviointitulokset osoittavat 59,0%:n tarkkuuden ja 39,7%:n makro-F1-pisteen, mikä merkitsee huomattavaa parannusta enemmistöluokan lähtötilanteeseen verrattuna (Acc=30,3%, makro-F1=5,2%).', 'hy': "Օնլայն լրատվամիջոցները նպատակում են հասնել ավելի մեծ հանդիսատեսին և ավելի երկար ուշադրություն դարձնել: Այս մրցակցությունը ստեղծում է միջավայր, որը պարգևում է սենսացիոնալ, կեղծ և թունավոր նորությունները: Որպեսզի սահմանափակենք նրանց տարածումը և ազդեցությունը, մենք առաջարկում ենք և զարգանում նորությունների թունավոր դետեկտոր, որը կարող է ճանաչել տարբեր տեսակի թունավոր պարունակություն: Մինչդեռ նախորդ հետազոտությունները հիմնականում կենտրոնացել են անգլերենի վրա, ահա մենք կենտրոնացնում ենք բուլգարեն: Մենք ստեղծեցինք նոր տվյալների համակարգ՝ գցելով վեբ կայք, որը հինգ տարի հավաքում է բուլգարիական նորությունների հոդվածներ, որոնք ձեռքով դասակարգված էին ութ թունավոր խմբերի: Հետո մենք ուսուցանեցինք բազմադասակարգչային դասակարգչային, որը ունի ինն կատեգորիաներ' ութ թունավոր և մեկ ոչ թունավոր: Մենք փորձարկում էինք տարբեր ներկայացումներով, հիմնված Էլմո, Բերթ և XLM-ի վրա, ինչպես նաև տարբեր բնագավառներով հատուկ հատկություններով: Due to the small size of our dataset, we created a separate model for each feature type, and we ultimately combined these models into a meta-classifier.  Արժեքի արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս 59.0 տոկոսի ճշգրտությունը և 39.7 տոկոսի մակրո-F1 գնահատականը, որոնք ցույց են տալիս մեծամասնության դասարանի հիմնական զարգացումները (Acc=30.3 տոկոսը, մակրո-F1=5.2 տոկոսը):", 'jv': 'Internet Awak-awak iki menehi perusahaan sing menehi winih sing luwih basa, gak tenan, lan alam sing dotakan. Rasané berarti nggawe nyimpen winih lan nggunakeh lané, awak dhéwé ngerasai perusahaan anyar-perusahaan sing isiné perusahaan seneng nggawe barang tok. ging njuk-njuk saiki istrasi sing sumulakno kanggo Inggris, iki dhewe isih perusahaan Bolgari. Awak dhéwé nggawe dataset sing dibutuhke tarjamahan kanggo nggawe website sing wis limo banjur sing katêpakan artik balêr bugar sing isiné manut kanggo kelas telu nggawe group toksik. politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), when there is a change ("assertive We énpemberit karo perkaran representations sing basa kang elMo, BERT, lan XLM, lan karo perkaran sugitising domain-perkaran. Dute to the small size of the dataset, we create a separated model for every character type, and we end up combining this model in a meta-category. Rejection', 'sk': 'Cilj spletnih medijev je doseči vse večjo občinstvo in pritegniti vse večjo pozornost. Tekmovanje ustvarja okolje, ki nagrajuje senzacionalne, lažne in strupene novice. Da bi pomagali omejiti njihovo širjenje in vpliv, predlagamo in razvijamo detektor toksičnosti novic, ki lahko prepozna različne vrste toksične vsebnosti. Medtem ko so se prejšnje raziskave osredotočale predvsem na angleščino, smo tukaj usmerjeni v bolgarščino. Z iskanjem spletne strani, ki že pet let zbira bolgarske novice, ki so bile ročno razvrščene v osem skupin toksičnosti, smo ustvarili nov nabor podatkov. Nato smo usposobili večrazredni klasifikator z devetimi kategorijami: osem strupenih in eno nestrupenih. Eksperimentirali smo z različnimi predstavitvami, ki temeljijo na ElMo, BERT in XLM, kot tudi z različnimi domenskimi funkcijami. Zaradi majhne velikosti našega nabora podatkov smo za vsako vrsto funkcij ustvarili ločen model in na koncu združili te modele v metaklasifikator. Rezultati ocene kažejo 59,0% natančnost in 39,7% oceno makro-F1, kar predstavlja znatno izboljšanje glede na izhodiščno vrednost večinskega razreda (Acc=30,3%, makro-F1=5,2%).', 'ha': "Media na Intanet aims in za'a sami saurãre mafi girma kuma dõmin ya zura zura saurãre spani. Wannan shirin ya samu wata mazaɓa wanda ke sãka wa masu saniya, fake da mai raɗaɗi. Ina ƙari wajen ta ƙayyade faɗi da yin amfani da su, sai mu buƙata, kuma mu buɗe wani mai gano na zafi mai raɗawa da ke iya gane nau'in-nau'i-nau'i. A lokacin da research ta farko ta yi makini a kan Ingiriya, nan tuna goani ga Bulgaria. Mun ƙiƙira wani sabo na dataset by crashing a website that shekara shan shẽkaru sun sami makala na Habari Bulgaria waɗanda aka rarrabe su manually cikin ƙungiyõyi takis. Then we trained a multi-class classifier with nine categories: eight toxic and one non-toxic.  Ko jarraba da wasu misãlai dabam-dabam, a kan ElMo, BERT, da XLM, da kuma da wasu masu ƙayyade guda. Dukan girmama ƙarami na daidaita danne-danne, mun halitta wata motsi dabam-daban wa kowace nau'in ƙayyade, kuma a ƙarami, muka haɗa waɗannan misãlai zuwa wani mai meta-classifiseri. Mataimakin evaluation na nuna tsari na 59.0% da wata ma'aunin macro-F1 na 39.7%, wanda yana mai ƙayyade kima ko babban bazalin fasalin mafi ƙaranci (Ak=30,3%, macro-F1=5,2%).", 'he': 'התקשורת באינטרנט מטרה להשיג קהל גדול יותר ויותר ויותר תוקף תשומת לב. התחרות הזאת יוצרת סביבה שמגמלת חדשות רגשיות, מזויפות ורעילות. כדי לעזור להגביל את התפשטות וההשפעה שלהם, אנו מציעים ולפיתח גלאי רעילות חדשות שיכול לזהות סוגים שונים של תוכן רעיל. בעוד המחקר הקודם התמקד בעיקר באנגלית, כאן אנחנו ממטרים בוגרים. יצרנו קבוצת נתונים חדשה על ידי הזריקה באתר אשר במשך חמש שנים אוסף מאמרים חדשות בולגריות שהוקטגוריו באופן ידני לשמונה קבוצות רעילות. ואז אימנו מסווג רב-מעמד עם תשע קטגוריות: שמונה רעילות ואחד לא רעיל. ניסינו עם מייצגים שונים מבוססים על ElMo, BERT, ו XLM, כמו גם עם מגוון של תכונות ספציפיות לתחום. בגלל הגודל הקטן של קבוצת הנתונים שלנו, יצרנו מודל נפרד לכל סוג של תכונות, ובסופו של דבר שיחדנו את המודלים האלה למטה-קלאסיפר. תוצאות הערכה מראות מדויקה של 59,0% וציון מקרו-F1 של 39,7%, אשר מייצגים שיפורים משמעותיים מעל רמת המערכת (Acc=30,3%, מקרו-F1=5,2%).', 'bo': 'དྲ་དམངས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་ཐོག་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཁོང་ཚོས་མཐོང་མཁན་རྒྱ་ནག་ཏུ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་། མི་མཐོང་ཚད་ལྷ རྒྱལ་སྐོར་འདིས་སྦྱོར་བ་དང་མཐུན་པོ་ཞིག་དང་བསླབ་པའི་ཕྱོགས་སྣང་དང་མཐུན་མཁན་གྱི་བརྗོད་དུ་བཟོ་འདུག ཕལ་ཆེར་འཚོལ་བ་དང་གནོད་འགྲོས་ཀྱི་འགྱུར སྔོན་མ་ཡོད་པའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་ཆོས་ལ་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གནང་བ་རེད། དེ་རིང་ནི་ང་ཚོས་ཡུལ་སྟོན ང་ཚོས་ལོ་ངོ་བཅོས་པ་ཞིག་གིས་གསར་བཟོས་བྱས་པའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིག་གིས་ལྟ་བུ་ལྷག་རི་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་སྒྲིག་བྱས་ནས་ལག་སྟར་toxicity འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གཞན་ཞིག་ལ་སྒྲིག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། We experimented with different representations based on ElMo, BERT, and XLM, as well as with a variety of domain-specific features. Due to the small size of our dataset, we created a separate model for each feature type, and we ultimately combined these models into a meta-classifier. གྲངས་བསྡུས་འབྲས་ཀྱིས་59.0% དང་མགོ་རིམ་F1་གི་ཚད་39.7% ཡིན་པས། ཆེ་ཆུང་གི་གྲངས་རིམ་གྲྭའི་གཞི་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཚད་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'De-Identification of Emails : Pseudonymizing Privacy-Sensitive Data in a German Email Corpus', 'ar': 'إلغاء التعرف على رسائل البريد الإلكتروني: إخفاء هوية مستعارة للبيانات الحساسة للخصوصية في مجموعة بريد إلكتروني ألمانية', 'es': 'Desidentificación de correos electrónicos: seudonimización de datos sensibles a la privacidad en un corpus de correo electrónico alemán', 'fr': 'Désidentification des e-mails\xa0: pseudonymisation de données sensibles à la vie privée dans un corpus de courriels allemand', 'pt': 'Desidentificação de e-mails: pseudonimizando dados sensíveis à privacidade em um corpus de e-mail alemão', 'ja': '電子メールの識別解除：ドイツの電子メールコーパスにおけるプライバシーに配慮したデータの偽名化', 'ru': 'Отмена идентификации электронной почты: псевдонимизация конфиденциальных данных в немецком почтовом корпусе', 'hi': 'ईमेल की डी-पहचान: एक जर्मन ईमेल कॉर्पस में गोपनीयता-संवेदनशील डेटा को छद्म नाम देना', 'zh': '电子邮件去识别化:德国电子邮件语料库阴私敏感数据假名化', 'ga': 'Ríomhphoist a Dhí-Aithint: Sonraí Íogair Príobháideachta a Ainmniú i gCorpas Ríomhphoist Gearmánach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'E-mailek azonosítása: Adatvédelmi érzékeny adatok álnevezése német e-mail Corpusban', 'el': 'Αποταυτοποίηση των μηνυμάτων ηλεκτρονικού ταχυδρομείου: Ψευδωνυμοποίηση ευαίσθητων δεδομένων απορρήτου σε γερμανικό σώμα ηλεκτρονικού ταχυδρομείου', 'it': 'Deidentificazione delle e-mail: pseudonimizzazione dei dati sensibili alla privacy in un corpo di posta elettronica tedesco', 'lt': 'El. pašto identifikavimo panaikinimas: duomenų, jautrių privatumui, pseudonimizavimas Vokietijos pašto korpuse', 'kk': 'Эл. пошталарды қайта идентификациялау: Неміс эл. пошта корпустағы жеке- сезімдік деректерді псевдонизациялау', 'mk': 'De-Identification of Emails: Pseudonymizing Privacy-Sensitive Data in a German Email Corpus', 'ml': 'ഈമെയിലുകളുടെ ഡി- ഐഡനിറ്റി: ഒരു ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d ഈമെയില്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d സ്വകാര്യ-സെന്\u200dസിറ്റീവ് ഡേറ്റായി പ്രത്യേകി', 'mn': 'Эл. почтын шинжлэх ухаан: Германы эл. почтын хувьцааны сэтгэл хөдлөл мэдээллийг сэтгэл хөдлөх', 'no': 'Identifikasjon av e- postar: Pseudonymising Privacy- Sensitive Data i eit tysk e- postkorpus', 'pl': 'De-identyfikacja wiadomości e-mail: Pseudonimizowanie danych wrażliwych na prywatność w niemieckim korpusie e-mail', 'ro': 'DeIdentificarea e-mailurilor: Pseudonimizarea datelor sensibile la confidențialitate într-un corpus german de e-mail', 'sr': 'Deidentifikacija e-maila: Pseudonymizing privatnosti-osetljivih podataka u njemačkoj e-mailskoj korpusi', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Isticmaalka aqoonsiga: Isticmaalka qarsoodiga-Sensitive macluumaadka ku qoran korpus Jarmalka', 'ta': 'மின்னஞ்சல்களின் அடையாளம்: ஒரு ஜெர்மன் மின்னஞ்சல் கோர்புஸில் தனியார்ந்த- உணர்வு தரவை குறிக்கும்', 'mt': 'De-Identifikazzjoni tal-Email: Pseudonymizing Privacy-Sensitive Data f’Korp Ġermaniż tal-Email', 'sv': 'Avidentifiering av e-post: Pseudonymisera sekretesskänsliga data i en tysk e-postkorpus', 'ms': 'Nyahidentifikasi Emel: Menyambungkan Data Sensitif-Peribadi dalam Korpus Emel Jerman', 'ur': 'ایمیل کی ناشناسایی: ایک جرمن ایمیل کورپوس میں پرائیسی-سنسیٹیو ڈاٹا کی روشنی کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Elektron pochta shaxsiyatlarini tasdiqlash: Olmoncha elektron pochta Korpusdagi shaxsiy maʼlumot', 'vi': 'Đang xác định dạng Emails: Thông tin Nhạy cảm bảo mật do thám trong một Tập đoàn Email Đức', 'bg': 'Де-идентификация на имейли: псевдонимиране на чувствителни към поверителността данни в немски имейл корпус', 'hr': 'Desidentifikacija e-maila: Pseudonymizing privatnosti-osjetljivih podataka u njemačkoj e-mailskoj korpusi', 'nl': 'De-identificatie van e-mails: Pseudonymisering van privacygevoelige gegevens in een Duits e-mailkorpus', 'da': 'Af-identifikation af e-mails: Pseudonymisering af privatlivsfølsomme data i et tysk e-mail korpus', 'fa': 'شناسایی از ایمیل\u200cها: داده\u200cهای خصوصی- احساساتی در یک کورپوس ایمیل آلمانی', 'id': 'De-Identifikasi Email: Pseudonymizing Privacy-Sensitive Data dalam Korpus Email Jerman', 'ko': '전자메일의 식별: 독일의 전자메일 자료 라이브러리에서 프라이버시에 민감한 데이터를 변명하다', 'tr': 'Poçtalaryň tapylmadyklary: Almança E-poçta hasaplanýan', 'sw': 'Kutambuliwa kwa barua pepe: Kuchukuliwa kwa taarifa za faragha za faragha katika Corpus ya barua pepe ya Ujerumani', 'af': 'Comment', 'de': 'De-Identifikation von E-Mails: Pseudonymisierung datenschutzsensibler Daten in einem deutschen E-Mail-Korpus', 'sq': 'Diidentifikimi i e-maileve: Pseudonimizimi i të dhënave të ndjeshme për privatësinë në një Korpus Email gjerman', 'am': 'ኢሜይል', 'hy': 'Էլեկտրոնային նամակների բացահայտումը. գերմանացի էլեկտրոնային էլեկտրոնային կորպուսում', 'az': 'E-maillərin dəyişdirməsi: Alman e-poçt korpusu içində gizli-duyarlıq məlumatlarını Pseudonymizing', 'bn': 'ই-মেইলের ডি-পরিচয়: জার্মান ইমেইল কোর্পাসে গোপনীয়-সেন্টিভিয়ের তথ্য নিয়মিত করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Desidentificació dels correus electrònics: Pseudonimitzar les dades sensibles a la privacitat', 'bs': 'Deidentifikacija e-maila: Pseudonymizing privatnosti-osjetljivih podataka u njemačkoj e-mailskoj korpusi', 'cs': 'De-identifikace e-mailů: Pseudonymizace údajů citlivých na soukromí v německém e-mailovém korpusu', 'fi': 'Sähköpostien tunnistaminen: Yksityisyydelle arkaluonteisten tietojen pseudonymisointi saksalaisessa sähköpostikorpussa', 'et': 'E-posti identifitseerimine: privaatsustundlike andmete pseudonüümimine Saksa e-posti korpuses', 'jv': 'Ngawe Delokan-Ketok Email: Pusedonimisi Data Pribadi-Sensitive nang daty E-mail Rusak', 'sk': 'Razidentifikacija elektronskih sporočil: psevdonimiziranje občutljivih zasebnosti podatkov v nemškem e-poštnem korpusu', 'ha': '@ info: status', 'he': 'זיהוי הודעה של דואר אלקטרוני: פסאודונימיזם נתונים רגישים לפרטיות בחברת דואר אלקטרוני גרמנית', 'bo': 'Email'}
{'en': 'We deal with the pseudonymization of those stretches of text in emails that might allow to identify real individual persons. This task is decomposed into two steps. First, named entities carrying privacy-sensitive information (e.g., names of persons, locations, phone numbers or dates) are identified, and, second, these privacy-bearing entities are replaced by synthetically generated surrogates (e.g., a person originally named ‘John Doe’ is renamed as ‘Bill Powers’). We describe a system architecture for surrogate generation and evaluate our approach on CodeAlltag, a German email corpus.', 'ar': 'نحن نتعامل مع الأسماء المستعارة لتلك المساحات النصية في رسائل البريد الإلكتروني والتي قد تسمح بالتعرف على أشخاص حقيقيين. تنقسم هذه المهمة إلى خطوتين. أولاً ، يتم تحديد الكيانات المسماة التي تحمل معلومات حساسة للخصوصية (على سبيل المثال ، أسماء الأشخاص أو المواقع أو أرقام الهواتف أو التواريخ) ، وثانيًا ، يتم استبدال هذه الكيانات الحاملة للخصوصية ببدائل تم إنشاؤها صناعياً (على سبيل المثال ، شخص اسمه في الأصل جون Doe "تمت إعادة تسميته باسم" Bill Powers "). نحن نصف بنية نظام للتوليد البديل ونقيم نهجنا في CodeAlltag ، مجموعة بريد إلكتروني ألمانية.', 'fr': "Nous nous occupons de la pseudonymisation de ces tronçons de texte dans les e-mails qui peuvent permettre d'identifier des personnes réelles. Cette tâche se décompose en deux étapes. Tout d'abord, les entités nommées contenant des informations sensibles à la vie privée (par exemple, les noms de personnes, les lieux, les numéros de téléphone ou les dates) sont identifiées, et, deuxièmement, ces entités respectueuses de la vie privée sont remplacées par des substituts générés synthétiquement (par exemple, une personne initialement nommée «\xa0John Doe\xa0» est renommée «\xa0Bill Powers\xa0»). Nous décrivons une architecture système pour la génération de substitution et évaluons notre approche sur CodeAllTag, un corpus allemand de courrier électronique.", 'es': 'Nos ocupamos de la seudonimización de aquellos fragmentos de texto en los correos electrónicos que podrían permitir identificar a personas individuales reales. Esta tarea se descompone en dos pasos. En primer lugar, se identifican las entidades nombradas que transportan información confidencial (por ejemplo, nombres de personas, ubicaciones, números de teléfono o fechas) y, en segundo lugar, estas entidades que guardan la privacidad se sustituyen por sustitutos generados sintéticamente (por ejemplo, una persona originalmente llamada «John Doe» pasa a llamarse «Facturas»). Describimos una arquitectura de sistema para la generación sustituta y evaluamos nuestro enfoque en CodeAllTag, un corpus de correo electrónico alemán.', 'pt': 'Lidamos com a pseudonimização desses trechos de texto em e-mails que podem permitir identificar pessoas reais. Esta tarefa é decomposta em duas etapas. Primeiro, as entidades nomeadas que carregam informações sensíveis à privacidade (por exemplo, nomes de pessoas, locais, números de telefone ou datas) são identificadas e, segundo, essas entidades com privacidade são substituídas por substitutos gerados sinteticamente (por exemplo, uma pessoa originalmente chamada "John Doe\' é renomeado como \'Bill Powers\'). Descrevemos uma arquitetura de sistema para geração substituta e avaliamos nossa abordagem no CodeAlltag, um corpus de e-mail alemão.', 'ja': '私たちは、実際の個人を特定できる可能性のある電子メールのテキストの仮名化を扱います。このタスクは2つのステップに分解されます。第１に、プライバシー機密情報（例えば、個人の名前、場所、電話番号または日付）を有する名前付きエンティティが識別され、第２に、これらのプライバシーを有するエンティティは、合成的に生成された代理人によって置き換えられる（例えば、元々「John Doe」という名前の人物は、「Bill Powers」として名前が変更される）。私たちは、代理生成のためのシステムアーキテクチャを説明し、ドイツの電子メールコーパスであるCodeAlltagで私たちのアプローチを評価します。', 'hi': "हम ईमेल में पाठ के उन हिस्सों के छद्म नाम से निपटते हैं जो वास्तविक व्यक्तिगत व्यक्तियों की पहचान करने की अनुमति दे सकते हैं। यह कार्य दो चरणों में विघटित होता है। सबसे पहले, गोपनीयता-संवेदनशील जानकारी (उदाहरण के लिए, व्यक्तियों के नाम, स्थानों, फोन नंबर या तारीखों) को ले जाने वाली नामित संस्थाओं की पहचान की जाती है, और, दूसरा, इन गोपनीयता-असर वाली संस्थाओं को सिंथेटिक रूप से उत्पन्न सरोगेट्स द्वारा प्रतिस्थापित किया जाता है (उदाहरण के लिए, मूल रूप से 'जॉन डो' नामक व्यक्ति का नाम बदलकर 'बिल पावर्स' के रूप में रखा गया है)। हम सरोगेट पीढ़ी के लिए एक सिस्टम आर्किटेक्चर का वर्णन करते हैं और CodeAlltag, एक जर्मन ईमेल कॉर्पस पर हमारे दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन करते हैं।", 'zh': '处电子邮件中,许识真片段假名化。 分解为两步驿。 先识携私敏信息(如人员姓名位置,电话号码或日)指定实体,其次合为生成代理人所代(,初名"John Doe"者更名"Bill Powers")。 述摄生之系统体系结构,而论德国电子邮件语料库CodeAlltag之法。', 'ru': 'Мы имеем дело с псевдонимизацией тех фрагментов текста в электронных письмах, которые могут позволить идентифицировать реальных отдельных лиц. Эта задача декомпозируется на два этапа. Во-первых, идентифицируются именованные объекты, несущие конфиденциальную информацию (например, имена лиц, местоположения, номера телефонов или даты), и, во-вторых, эти объекты, несущие конфиденциальность, заменяются синтетически сгенерированными суррогатами (например, лицо, первоначально называвшееся «Джон Доу», переименовывается в «Билл Пауэрс»). Мы описываем архитектуру системы для генерации суррогатов и оцениваем наш подход к CodeAlltag, немецкому почтовому корпусу.', 'ga': "Déileálaimid le hainm bréige na bpíosaí téacs sin i ríomhphoist a d’fhéadfadh gur féidir fíordhaoine aonair a aithint. Déantar an tasc seo a dhianscaoileadh ina dhá chéim. Ar an gcéad dul síos, sainaithnítear eintitis ainmnithe a bhfuil faisnéis íogair ó thaobh príobháideachta á n-iompar acu (m.sh., ainmneacha daoine, láithreacha, uimhreacha gutháin nó dátaí), agus, sa dara háit, cuirtear ionaid ionadaithe a ghintear go sintéiseach in ionad na n-eintiteas seo a bhfuil príobháideachas acu (m.sh. duine darb ainm ‘John’ ar dtús). Athainmnítear Doe mar `Bille Powers'). Déanaimid cur síos ar ailtireacht córais le haghaidh giniúna ionaid agus luachálaimid ár gcur chuige ar CodeAlltag, corpas ríomhphoist Gearmánach.", 'hu': "Az e-mailekben található szövegszakaszok álnevesítésével foglalkozunk, amelyek lehetővé teszik valódi egyéni személyek azonosítását. Ez a feladat két lépésre oszlik. Először is azonosítják az adatvédelmi szempontból érzékeny információkat (például személyek nevét, helyét, telefonszámát vagy dátumát), másodszor pedig ezeket az adatvédelmi szempontokat hordozó entitásokat szintetikusan létrehozott béranyák váltják fel (például egy eredetileg `John Doe' nevű személyt `Bill Powers'). Leírjuk a béranyagenerációs rendszer architektúráját és értékeljük a CodeAlltag, egy német e-mail korpusz megközelítését.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ შევხედავთ ამ ტექსტის პესეუდონიმიზაციას, რომელიც შეიძლება იდენტიფიკაცია რეალური ინდიველური ადამიანები. ეს სამუშაო მუშაოდ ორი ნაწილში გაყოფილი. პირველი, სახელი ინტერტიები, რომლებიც პირადი სისტეტიკური ინფორმაცია (მაგალითად, ადამიანების, ადამიანების, ტელეფონის რიცხვების, ან თარიღების სახელი) იდენტიფიკურებულია, და მეორე, ეს ინტერტიები, რომლებიც პირადი სისტეტიკურად შექმნილი სეროგიებით გადაცვლ ჩვენ აღწერეთ სისტემის არქტიქტურაცია საპროგრატის განვითარებისთვის და ჩვენი მიღება CodeAlltag-ზე, გერმანული ელფოსტის კორპუსზე.', 'el': 'Ασχολούμαστε με την ψευδωνυμοποίηση αυτών των τμημάτων κειμένου σε μηνύματα ηλεκτρονικού ταχυδρομείου που θα μπορούσαν να επιτρέψουν την αναγνώριση πραγματικών μεμονωμένων προσώπων. Αυτή η εργασία αποσυντίθεται σε δύο βήματα. Πρώτον, προσδιορίζονται ονομαστικές οντότητες που φέρουν ευαίσθητες πληροφορίες για την προστασία της ιδιωτικής ζωής (π.χ. ονόματα προσώπων, τοποθεσίες, αριθμούς τηλεφώνου ή ημερομηνίες) και δεύτερον, αυτές οι οντότητες που φέρουν την προστασία της ιδιωτικής ζωής αντικαθίστανται από συνθετικά παραγόμενα υποκατάστατα (π.χ., ένα πρόσωπο που αρχικά ονομαζόταν "John Doe" μετονομάζεται σε "Bill Powers"). Περιγράφουμε μια αρχιτεκτονική συστήματος για την υποκατάστατη γενιά και αξιολογούμε την προσέγγισή μας στο ένα γερμανικό σώμα ηλεκτρονικού ταχυδρομείου.', 'it': "Ci occupiamo della pseudonimizzazione di quei tratti di testo nelle email che potrebbero consentire di identificare persone reali individuali. Questo compito è suddiviso in due fasi. In primo luogo, vengono identificate entità denominate che contengono informazioni sensibili alla privacy (ad esempio nomi di persone, luoghi, numeri di telefono o date) e, in secondo luogo, queste entità portatrici di privacy sono sostituite da surrogati generati sinteticamente (ad esempio, una persona chiamata originariamente `John Doe' viene rinominata come `Bill Powers'). Descriviamo un'architettura di sistema per la generazione di surrogati e valutiamo il nostro approccio su CodeAlltag, un corpus di email tedesco.", 'kk': "Біз эл. пошталардағы мәтінді псевдонимизациялауға мүмкіндік беретін адамдарды анықтауға мүмкіндік береді. Бұл тапсырма екі қадам бойынша бөлінген. Біріншіден, жеке мәліметті өзгертетін мәліметтер (мысалы, адамдар, орналасуы, телефон нөмірлері не күндерінің атауы) анықталды, екіншіден, бұл жеке мәліметтерді синтетикалық құрылған сурогаттар (мысалы, `John Doe' деген адамды `Bill Powers' деп аталады). Біз сурогатты құру үшін жүйелік архитектурасын таңдап, неміс эл. пошта корпус CodeAlltag- тың қасиетін бағалаймыз.", 'mk': 'Ние се справуваме со псевдонимизацијата на оние делови на текст во мејлови кои би можеле да им овозможат да идентификуваат вистински индивидуални личности. Оваа задача е разделена во два чекори. Прво, се идентификуваат имињата на ентитетите кои носат информации чувствителни за приватноста (на пример имињата на лица, локациите, телефонските броеви или датумите) и, второ, овие ентитети кои носат приватност се заменети со синтетички генерирани сурогати (на пример, личност која оригинално се вика „Џон Незнаен“ се преимен Опишуваме системска архитектура за сурогатна генерација и го проценуваме нашиот пристап на CodeAlltag, германски електронски корпус.', 'ms': "Kami berurusan dengan pseudonymizasi bagi garis teks dalam e-mel yang mungkin membenarkan untuk mengenalpasti orang individu sebenar. Tugas ini hancur menjadi dua langkah. Pertama, entiti bernama yang membawa maklumat sensitif-privasi (cth., nama orang, lokasi, nombor telefon atau tarikh) dikenalpasti, dan kedua, entiti-entiti yang membawa privasi ini digantikan oleh pengganti yang dijana secara sintetik (cth., seseorang yang asalnya bernama `John Doe' dinamakan semula sebagai `Bill Powers'). Kami menggambarkan arkitektur sistem untuk generasi pengganti dan menilai pendekatan kami pada CodeAlltag, korpus emel Jerman.", 'mt': 'Aħna nindirizzaw il-psewdonimizzazzjoni ta’ dawk il-meded ta’ test f’e-mails li jistgħu jippermettu li jiġu identifikati persuni individwali reali. Dan il-kompitu huwa diżakkompost f’żewġ stadji. L-ewwel nett, huma identifikati entitajiet imsemmija li jġorru informazzjoni sensittiva g ħall-privatezza (pereżempju ismijiet ta’ persuni, postijiet, numri tat-telefon jew dati), u t-tieni nett, dawn l-entitajiet li jġorru l-privatezza huma sostitwiti b’sostituti ġenerati b’mod sintetiku (pereżempju persuna oriġinarjament imsejħa “John Doe” hija msejħa mill-ġdid bħala “Bill Powers”). Aħna niddeskrivu arkitettura tas-sistema għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ sostituti u jivvalutaw l-approċċ tagħna fuq CodeAlltag, korpus tal-email Ġermaniż.', 'lt': 'Mes sprendžiame šių tekstų siuntų pseudonimizaciją elektroniniais laiškais, kad būtų galima identifikuoti tikrus asmenis. Ši užduotis suskirstyta į du etapus. Pirma, identifikuojami asmenys, turintys ypatingą informaciją apie privatumą (pvz., asmenų, vietos, telefono numerių ar datų pavadinimai), ir antra, šie asmenys, turintys ypatingą informaciją apie privatumą, pakeičiami sintetiniu būdu sukurtais pakaitiniais asmenimis (pvz., asmuo, iš pradžių pavadintas „John Doe“ pavadintas „Bill Powers“). Aprašome pakaitinės kartos sistemos architektūrą ir vertiname savo požiūrį į CodeAlltag, Vokietijos pašto korpusą.', 'mn': "Бид тэдгээр эл.поштаар бичсэн текстүүдийн псевдономизацийг хийдэг. Энэ нь жинхэнэ хүмүүсийг тодорхойлох боломжтой. Энэ ажил хоёр алхам руу хуваагдсан. Эхлээд, хувийн мэдрэмжтэй мэдээллийг (жишээ нь, хүн, газар, утасны тоо эсвэл цаг үеийн нэртэй) авдаг бүтээлүүд тодорхойлдог. Хоёрдугаар, эдгээр хувийн үйлдвэрлэх бүтээлүүд синтетик үүсгэгдсэн суррогат (жишээ нь, эхлээд `John Doe' гэдэг хүн `Bill Powers') гэж нэрлэдэг Бид сүлжээний үеийн системийн архитектурыг тайлбарлаж, Германы эл. пошта корпус болон CodeAlltag-ын архитектурыг үнэлдэг.", 'ro': "Ne ocupăm de pseudonimizarea acelor întinderi de text în e-mailuri care ar putea permite identificarea persoanelor individuale reale. Această sarcină este descompusă în doi pași. În primul rând, entitățile numite care transportă informații sensibile la confidențialitate (de exemplu, numele persoanelor, locațiile, numerele de telefon sau datele) sunt identificate și, în al doilea rând, aceste entități purtătoare de confidențialitate sunt înlocuite cu surogate generate sintetic (de exemplu, o persoană numită inițial `John Doe' este redenumită ca `Bill Powers'). Descriem o arhitectură de sistem pentru generarea de surogat și evaluăm abordarea noastră pe CodeAlltag, un corpus german de e-mail.", 'pl': 'Zajmujemy się pseudonimizacją tych fragmentów tekstu w e-mailach, które mogą pozwolić na identyfikację prawdziwych osób indywidualnych. Zadanie to rozkłada się na dwa etapy. Po pierwsze, identyfikowane są podmioty posiadające informacje wrażliwe na ochronę prywatności (np. nazwiska osób, lokalizacje, numery telefonów lub daty), a po drugie, te podmioty noszące prywatność są zastępowane syntetycznie surogatami (np. osoba pierwotnie nazwana "John Doe" zostaje nazwana na "Bill Powers"). Opisujemy architekturę systemu do generowania surogatów i oceniamy nasze podejście do CodeAllgag, niemieckiego korpusu e-mail.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ആ ടെക്സ്റ്റിന്റെ പെരുമാറ്റുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് കാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്നു. യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വ്യക്തിക്കാരെ  ഈ ജോലി രണ്ടു ചുവട്ടിലേക്ക് വിതരണം ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യം സ്വകാര്യത്തിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വസ്തുക്കളുടെ പേരു് (ഉദാഹരണമായ ആളുകളുടെ പേരുകള്\u200d, സ്ഥലങ്ങള്\u200d, ഫോണ്\u200d നമ്പര്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d തീയതികള്\u200d) തിരിച്ചറിയപ്പെടുന്നു. രണ്ടാമത്, ഈ സ്വകാര്യ സ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിനെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d ഇമെയില്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് കോഡെഅല്\u200dടാഗില്\u200d നമ്മ', 'no': 'Vi arbeider med pseudonymizering av desse tekststrekane i e-post som kan tillata å identifisera virkelige individuelle personer. Denne oppgåva er dekomprimert i to steg. Først vert identifiserte namn på personer, plasseringar, telefonnummer eller datoar som inneheld privatlitetsinformasjon (f.eks. namn på personer, telefonnummer eller datoar) og, andre, vert desse privatlitetane erstatta av syntetiske genererte surrogate (f.eks. eit person som opphavleg namn « John Doe » vert endra namn som « Bill Powers »). Vi beskriver eit systemarkitektur for surrogatgenerasjon og evaluerer tilnærminga vårt på CodeAlltag, eit tysk e-postkorpus.', 'so': "Waxaannu kula macaamiloonaa faa'iidada qoraalka ah oo ku qoran e-mailka, taasoo u ogolaan kara in loo aqoonsado qof gaar ah. Shaqadan waxaa loo qeybinayaa laba tallaabo. Marka ugu horeysa waxaa la aqoonsan karaa macluumaadka gaarka loo leeyahay (tusaale ahaan magacyada dadka, meelaha, nambarka telefoonka ama taariikhda), labaadna waxaa lagu bedelaa macluumaadkan gaarka loo leeyahay surrogats oo loo sameeyay sida loo magacaabay `John Doe'). Waxaynu sawirannaa dhismaha nidaamka ee barbaarinta surrogta, waxaana qiimeynaynaa dhaqdhaqaalahayaga CodeAlltag oo ah korpus e-mailka Jarmalka ah.", 'sr': "Mi se bavimo pseudonimizacijom te širenja teksta u e-mailima koje bi mogle da identifikuju prave osobe. Ovaj zadatak je rasporen na dva koraka. Prvo, imenovane entitate nose informacije o osjetljivosti privatnosti (npr. imena osoba, lokacija, telefonskih brojeva ili datuma) su identifikovane, a drugo, te entitate noseće privatnost zamene sintetički proizvedenim surogatima (npr. osoba koja se originalno zove `John Doe' kao `Bill Powers'). Opišemo sistemsku arhitekturu za generaciju surogata i procenjujemo naš pristup KodeAlltag, njemački e-mailski korpus.", 'si': 'අපි මේල් වලට පාළුවේ පිළිබඳින්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ඇත්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නය විදි මේ වැඩේ පැත්තක් දෙකක් විතරයි. මුලින්, පුද්ගලික සංවේදනය සම්බන්ධතා තොරතුරු ගෙනීමේ නම් තියෙනවා (උදාහරණය, පුද්ගලික, ෆෝන් නොම්බර් නොම්බර් නොම්බරු නොම්බර) දැනගත්තා, සහ, දෙවෙනියි, මේ පුද්ගලික අපි පද්ධතියක් විශ්වාස කරනවා සුරෝජිත විශාලයක් සඳහා පද්ධතියක් විස්තර කරනවා ඒ වගේම ජර්මන් මේල් කො', 'sv': 'Vi behandlar pseudonymisering av de textsträckor i e-postmeddelanden som kan göra det möjligt att identifiera verkliga enskilda personer. Denna uppgift delas upp i två steg. För det första identifieras namngivna enheter med sekretesskänslig information (t.ex. namn på personer, platser, telefonnummer eller datum) och för det andra ersätts dessa sekretessbärande enheter med syntetiskt genererade surrogater (t.ex. en person som ursprungligen hette "John Doe" döps om till "Bill Powers"). Vi beskriver en systemarkitektur för surrogatgenerering och utvärderar vårt tillvägagångssätt på CodeAlltag, en tysk e-postkorpus.', 'ta': 'மின்னஞ்சலில் அந்த உரையின் அலங்காரத்தை மாற்றுகிறோம். உண்மையான தனிப்பட்ட நபர்களை அறிய அனுமதிக்கும். This task is decomposed into two steps.  முதலில், தனிப்பட்ட உணர்வுப் பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள்கள் (உ. ம். மனிதர்களின் பெயர், இடங்கள், தொலைபேசி எண்கள் அல்லது தேதிகள்) குறிப்பிடப்பட்டுள்ளது, மற்றும் இரண்டாவது, இந்த தனிப்பட்ட பொருள்கள் சேர்ந்து உருவாக்கப்பட் நாங்கள் ஒரு அமைப்பு உருவாக்கத்தை விவரிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டை CodeAlltag, ஒரு ஜெர்மன் மின்னஞ்சல் கார்புஸ் மீ', 'ur': "ہم اِمیل میں اُن پیغام کے پھیلانے کے مطابق غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر معلوم کرتے ہیں جو حقیقی شخصوں کو پہچان سکتے ہیں۔ یہ کام دو قدموں میں تقسیم کی جاتی ہے پہلے، نام داری غیبت-حساس معلومات لے کر رہے ہیں (مثال، شخصوں کے نام, جگہ, فون نمبر یا تاریخ) پہچان دیے جاتے ہیں، اور دوسرا، یہ خصوصی-بورینگ اینٹیوں کو سینٹیٹی طور پر پیدا کیا جاتا ہے سوروگراٹ (جیسے کہ ایک شخص پہلی بار نام سے `جان Doe' کا نام `بیل پاور' کے طور پر بدل دیا جاتا ہے). ہم نے سورروگٹ نسل کے لئے ایک سیستم معماری توصیف کرتا ہے اور ایک جرمن ایمیل کورپوس کے ذریعہ ہماری طریقہ کا ارزش کرتا ہے.", 'uz': "Biz xabar tarkibini aniqlash mumkin. Bu vazifa ikki qadamga koʻchiriladi. Birinchi marta, shaxsiy sensitive maʼlumot (m. g. odamlar, manzillar, telefon raqamlari yoki sanalar) ichida nomli maʼlumotlar aniqlanmoqda, va ikkinchi marta, bu shaxsiy maʼlumotlar birlashtirilgan surrogatlar (m. g. 'John Doe' aslida 'Bill Powers' deb nomlanadi). We describe a system architecture for surrogate generation and evaluate our approach on CodeAlltag, a German email corpus.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi có liên quan tới bí danh của các dạng văn bản trong email có thể giúp nhận dạng cá nhân thật sự. Nhiệm vụ này đã phân hủy thành hai bước. Đầu tiên, những thực thể có tên mang theo thông tin nhạy cảm về tính riêng tư (ví dụ, tên của người, địa điểm, số điện thoại hay ngày) được xác định, và, thứ hai, những thực thể mang tính riêng tư này được thay thế bằng các cỗ máy tạo ra tạo tạo tạo nguồn (ví dụ, một người tên "John Doe" được đổi tên là "Bill Powers). Chúng tôi mô tả một kiến trúc hệ thống cho thế hệ người máy và đánh giá phương pháp của chúng tôi về Codchung, một tập đoàn email Đức.', 'bg': 'Ние се занимаваме с псевдонимизацията на тези части от текста в имейлите, които биха могли да позволят идентифицирането на реални индивидуални лица. Тази задача се разлага на две стъпки. Първо, идентифицират се наименовани субекти, носещи чувствителна към поверителността информация (напр. имена на лица, местоположения, телефонни номера или дати), и второ, тези субекти, носещи поверителността, се заменят със синтетично генерирани заместители (напр. лице, първоначално наречено "Джон Доу", се преименува на "Бил Пауърс"). Описваме системна архитектура за сурогатно генериране и оценяваме подхода си към германски имейл корпус.', 'da': 'Vi beskæftiger os med pseudonymisering af de tekststrækninger i e-mails, der muligvis gør det muligt at identificere virkelige enkeltpersoner. Denne opgave er opdelt i to trin. For det første identificeres navngivne enheder, der indeholder personfølsomme oplysninger (f.eks. navne på personer, placeringer, telefonnumre eller datoer), og for det andet erstattes disse personlige enheder af syntetisk genererede surrogater (f.eks. omdøbes en person, der oprindeligt hedder "John Doe", til "Bill Powers"). Vi beskriver en systemarkitektur til surrogatgenerering og evaluerer vores tilgang til CodeAlltag, et tysk e-mail korpus.', 'nl': "We behandelen de pseudonimisering van die delen van tekst in e-mails die het mogelijk maken om echte individuele personen te identificeren. Deze taak is onderverdeeld in twee stappen. Ten eerste worden benoemde entiteiten met privacygevoelige informatie geïdentificeerd (bijvoorbeeld namen van personen, locaties, telefoonnummers of datums), en ten tweede worden deze privacydragende entiteiten vervangen door synthetisch gegenereerde surrogaten (bijvoorbeeld een persoon die oorspronkelijk 'John Doe' heet, wordt hernoemd naar 'Bill Powers'). We beschrijven een systeemarchitectuur voor het genereren van surrogaten en evalueren onze aanpak op CodeAllgag, een Duits e-mailcorpus.", 'hr': "Mi se bavimo pseudonimizacijom tih širenja teksta u e-mailima koje bi mogle omogućiti identificirati prave osobe. Ovaj zadatak se raspoređuje na dva koraka. Prvo se identificiraju imena entitata koje nose informacije o osjetljivosti privatnosti (npr. imena osoba, lokacija, brojeva telefona ili datuma), a drugo, te entitate koje nose privatnost zamjenjuju sintetički proizvedenim surogatima (npr. osoba koja se originalno naziva `John Doe' kao `Bill Powers'). Opišemo sistemsku arhitekturu za generaciju surogata i procjenjujemo naš pristup KodeAlltag, njemački e-mailski korpus.", 'id': "Kita berurusan dengan pseudonimisasi dari teks dalam e-mail yang mungkin memungkinkan untuk mengidentifikasi orang-orang individu nyata. Tugas ini hancur menjadi dua langkah. Pertama, entitas bernama yang membawa informasi sensitif privasi (contohnya, nama orang, lokasi, nomor telepon atau tanggal) dikenal, dan kedua, entitas-entitas yang membawa privasi ini diganti oleh ganti yang dibuat secara sintetis (contohnya, seseorang yang asli bernama `John Doe' diubah bernama sebagai `Bill Powers'). Kami menggambarkan arsitektur sistem untuk generasi pengganti dan mengevaluasi pendekatan kita pada CodeAlltag, sebuah korpus email Jerman.", 'de': 'Wir beschäftigen uns mit der Pseudonymisierung jener Textabschnitte in E-Mails, die es ermöglichen könnten, echte Einzelpersonen zu identifizieren. Diese Aufgabe ist in zwei Schritte unterteilt. Erstens werden benannte Entitäten identifiziert, die datenschutzsensible Informationen (z. B. Namen von Personen, Standorte, Telefonnummern oder Daten) tragen, und zweitens werden diese datenschutztragenden Entitäten durch synthetisch generierte Surrogate ersetzt (z. B. eine Person, die ursprünglich "John Doe" heißt, wird in "Bill Powers" umbenannt). Wir beschreiben eine Systemarchitektur zur Ersatzgeneration und evaluieren unseren Ansatz auf CodeAllgag, einem deutschen E-Mail-Korpus.', 'fa': "ما با تغییر اندازه\u200cهای متن در ایمیل\u200cها درگیر می\u200cکنیم که ممکنه اجازه دهند شخص واقعی را شناسایی کنند. این کار به دو قدم تقسیم شده است. اول، entities named with privacy-sensitive information (e.g., names of persons, locations, phone numbers or dates) are identified, and, second, these entities bearing privacy are replaced by synthetically generated surrogates (e.g., a person originally named `John Doe' is renamed as `Bill Powers'). ما یک معماری سیستم برای نسل تحقیقات و ارزیابی روش ما در CodeAlltag، یک کورپوس ایمیل آلمانی را توصیف می کنیم.", 'ko': '우리가 처리하는 것은 전자메일의 텍스트 세션의 이름입니다. 이 텍스트 세션들은 실제 개인을 식별할 수 있습니다.이 임무는 두 단계로 나뉜다.먼저, 개인 정보에 민감한 정보를 포함하는 명명된 엔티티(예: 사람 이름, 사이트, 전화 번호 또는 날짜)를 식별하고, 그 다음으로, 작성된 대체 엔티티(예: 처음에 "John Doe"였던 사람이 "Bill Power"로 이름을 바꾼 경우)를 식별합니다.우리는 에이전트가 생성한 시스템 구조를 설명하고 독일의 전자 우편 자료 라이브러리 CodeAlltag에서 우리의 방법을 평가했다.', 'sw': 'Tunakabiliana na uvunjifu wa maeneo hayo ya maandishi kwa barua pepe ambayo inaweza kuwaruhusu kuwatambua watu binafsi. Kazi hii imeshindwa katika hatua mbili. Kwanza, vyombo vinavyoitwa vinavyobeba taarifa za faragha (kama vile majina ya watu, maeneo, namba za simu au tarehe) hugunduliwa, na, pili, vitu hivi vya faragha hubadilishwa na surrogate zilizotengenezwa kwa pamoja (yaani mtu anayeitwa ‘John Doe’ anaitwa ‘Bill Powers’). Tunaelezea muundo wa mfumo wa kizazi cha upasuaji na kutathmini hatua yetu kwenye CodeAlltag, makampuni ya barua pepe ya Ujerumani.', 'af': "Ons behandel met die pseudonymizasie van dié uitstrekkings van teks in e-pos wat dalk kan toelaat om regte individuele persoon te identifiseer. Hierdie taak word in twee stappe afgekopiseer. Eerste, genaamde entiteite wat privateit-sensitiewe inligting bevat (bv. naams van persoon, liggings, foonnommers of datums) word identifiseer, en, tweede, hierdie privateit-bevaarende entiteite word vervang deur sintetiese genereerde surrogate (bv. â\x80\x99n persoon wat oorspronklik genaamd `John Doe' word as `Bill Powers'). Ons beskryf 'n stelsel arkitektuur vir surrogate generasie en evalueer ons toegang op CodeAlltag, 'n Duitse e-pos korpus.", 'tr': "Biz e-maillerde näme adamlary tanyşdyryp bilen meýdançalaryň pseudonymazlygy bilen çykýarys. Bu zady iki adımda çalyşdyrylýar. Ilkinji, ad kişiligi hasaplanjak hasaplanjak maglumaty (myselm. kişiň, ýerleriniň, telefon sanlarynyň ady, ýa-da g ünleriň ady) belirlenýär we ikinjisi, bu hususiýet-taşlary syntetik döredilen surogatlar bilen ewez edilýär (meselm. `John Doe' adynyň ady 'Bill Powers' diýip adlanýar). Biz suratlar döwletleri üçin sistem arhitekturuny tassyýarys we olaryň CodeAlltag-a, bir nemesçe e-mailkorpus bardygyny deňleýäris.", 'am': "የእነዚህን የጽሑፉን መልዕክት የደብዳቤ መልዕክቶች እውነተኛ የሆኑትን ሰዎች ማወቅ ይችላል፡፡ ይህ ስራ በሁለት ደረጃዎች ውስጥ ነው፡፡ መጀመሪያ የተባለው የግል-ስህተት መረጃዎች (ምሳሌ የሰዎች ስም፣ ስፍራዎች፣ የስልክ ቁጥር ወይም ቀን) የሚሸከሙ አካባቢዎች እና ሁለተኛው፣ እነዚህ የግል አካላት የተገኘው ስህተት በተስማማማሚ የተደረገ surrogates (ምሳሌ በመጀመሪያ `ዮን ዶe' የተባለው ሰው እንደ Bill Powers› ተብሎ ይጠራል፡፡ የፖርት ኢሜይል ኮርፓስ (CodeAlltag) የኮድአሌጋን ስብሰባችንን እናሳውቃለን፡፡", 'hy': 'Մենք զբաղվում ենք էլեկտրոնային նամակներում այդ տեքստի հատվածների կեղծ անվանումների հետ, որոնք կարող են թույլ տալ իրական անհատական մարդկանց ճանաչել: Այս խնդիրը բաժանում է երկու քայլ: Առաջինը, անվանված կազմակերպությունները, որոնք կրում են գաղտնիության զգայուն տեղեկատվություն (օրինակ, անհատների անունները, տեղադրությունները, հեռախոսային թվերը կամ ժամացույցները), և երկրորդը, այս գաղտնիության զգայունները փոխարինվում են սինթետիկ կերպով ստեղծված փոխարինակներով (օրինակ, անվանված մարդը, որը սկզբնակ Մենք նկարագրում ենք համակարգի ճարտարապետական կառուցվածքը փոխարինակ սերնդի համար և գնահատում ենք մեր մոտեցումը Կոդի Ալթեգի, գերմանացի էլեկտրոնային նամակ կորպուսի վրա:', 'sq': "Ne merremi me pseudonimizimin e këtyre teksteve në email që mund të lejojnë identifikimin e personave individual ë të vërtetë. Kjo detyrë është ndarë në dy hapa. Së pari, njësitë e emëruara që mbajnë informacion të ndjeshëm ndaj privatësisë (për shembull emrat e personave, vendeve, numrave të telefonit apo datave) janë identifikuar dhe, së dyti, këto njësi që mbajnë privatësinë zëvendësohen me zëvendësues të gjeneruar sintetikisht (për shembull, një person me emër fillimisht `John Doe' është rinominuar si `Bill Powers'). Ne përshkruajmë një arkitekturë sistemi për gjeneratën e zëvendësuesve dhe vlerësojmë qasjen tonë në CodeAlltag, një korpus email gjerman.", 'bs': "Mi se bavimo pseudonimizacijom tih širenja teksta u e-mailovima koje bi mogle omogućiti identificirati prave osobe. Ovaj zadatak je rasporen na dva koraka. Prvo se identifikuju imena entitata koje nose informacije o osjetljivosti privatnosti (npr. imena osoba, lokacija, telefonskih brojeva ili datuma), a drugo, te entitate koje nose privatnost zamjenjuju sintetički generirane surogate (npr. osoba koja se prvo zove `John Doe' kao `Bill Powers'). Opišemo sistemsku arhitekturu za generaciju surogata i procjenjujemo naš pristup KodeAlltag, njemački e-mailski korpus.", 'cs': 'Zabýváme se pseudonymizací těch úseků textu v e-mailech, které by mohly umožnit identifikaci skutečných jednotlivých osob. Tento úkol je rozložen do dvou kroků. Za prvé jsou identifikovány jmenované subjekty s informacemi citlivými na ochranu soukromí (např. jména osob, místa, telefonní čísla nebo data) a za druhé, tyto subjekty nosící soukromí jsou nahrazeny synteticky generovanými náhradníky (např. osoba původně jmenovaná "John Doe" se přejmenuje na "Bill Powers"). Popisujeme systémovou architekturu pro generování náhradních materiálů a hodnotíme náš přístup k německému e-mailovému korpusu CodeAllgag.', 'bn': "আমরা ইমেইলে এই লেখাগুলোর প্রতি বিশ্বাসঘাতকতার সাথে চুক্তি করি যা সত্যিকারের ব্যক্তিকে চিহ্নিত করতে পারে। এই কাজটি দুই পদক্ষেপে অবতরণ করা হয়েছে। প্রথমত, যার নামে ব্যক্তিগত সংবেদনশীল তথ্য (যেমন মানুষ, অবস্থান, ফোন নম্বর অথবা তারিখ) নির্ধারিত হয়েছে এবং দ্বিতীয়, এই গোপনীয় বিষয়গুলো সারোগ্রোগেট সৃষ্টি করেছে (উদাহরণস্বরূপ `জন ডো' নামের একটি  আমরা সার্রোগেট প্রজন্মের জন্য একটি সিস্টেম আর্কিটার বর্ণনা করি এবং জার্মানী ইমেইল কোর্পাসের কোডেআল্যাগের উপর আমাদের প্রতি", 'ca': "Ens ocupem de la pseudonimització d'aquestes extensions de text en correus electrònics que podrien permetre identificar persones individuals reals. Aquesta tasca està descomposa en dos passos. First, named entities carrying privacy-sensitive information (e.g., names of persons, locations, phone numbers or dates) are identified, and, second, these privacy-bearing entities are replaced by synthetically generated surrogates (e.g., a person originally named `John Doe' is renamed as `Bill Powers').  Descrivem una arquitectura del sistema per a la generació de substituts i evaluem el nostre enfocament en CodeAlltag, un corpus de correu electrònic alemany.", 'fi': "Käsittelemme sähköposteissa olevien tekstiosien pseudonymisointia, joiden avulla voidaan tunnistaa todellisia yksittäisiä henkilöitä. Tämä tehtävä on jaettu kahteen vaiheeseen. Ensinnäkin tunnistetaan nimetty taho, joka kuljettaa yksityisyyden kannalta arkaluonteisia tietoja (esim. henkilöiden nimet, sijainnit, puhelinnumerot tai päivämäärät), ja toiseksi nämä yksityisyyttä ylläpitävät tahot korvataan synteettisesti luoduilla sijaissynnyttäjillä (esim. henkilö, jonka alkuperäinen nimi on 'John Doe', nimetään uudelleen nimellä 'Bill Powers'). Kuvaamme järjestelmäarkkitehtuuria sijaisten sukupolvelle ja arvioimme lähestymistapaamme saksalaiseen sähköpostikorpuseen CodeAlltag.", 'et': 'Tegeleme nende tekstiosade pseudonüümiseerimisega e-kirjades, mis võimaldavad tuvastada reaalseid isikuid. See ülesanne jaguneb kaheks etapiks. Esiteks tuvastatakse isikuandmete puutumatuse tundlikku teavet kandvad nimetatud üksused (nt isikute nimed, asukohad, telefoninumbrid või kuupäevad) ja teiseks asendatakse need isikuandmeid andvad üksused sünteetiliselt loodud asendusmaterjalidega (nt isik, kelle algne nimi on "John Doe", nimetatakse ümber Bill Powers). Kirjeldame asendusgeneratsiooni süsteemi arhitektuuri ja hindame oma lähenemisviisi saksa e-postikorpusele CodeAlltag.', 'az': "Biz e-maill…ôrd…ô yazńĪlmńĪŇü m…ôkt…ôbl…ôrin pseudonymizasiyasńĪnńĪ √ß…ôkirik ki, h…ôqiq…ôt kiŇüil…ôri tanńĪma imkan verir. Bu iŇül…ôr iki adńĪm √ß…ôkilir. ∆Źvv…ôlc…ô, kiŇüil…ôrin, m…ôqamlarńĪn, telefon n√∂mr…ôl…ôrinin v…ô g √ľnl…ôrin adlarńĪnńĪ daŇüńĪyan m…ôlumatlar t…ôŇükil edilir v…ô ikinci, bu t…ôhl√ľk…ôsizlik daŇüńĪyan m…ôlumatlar sintetik yaratdńĪńüńĪ surrogatlar il…ô …ôv…ôz edilir (m…ôs…ôl…ôn, `John Doe' adlńĪ kiŇüinin adńĪ `Bill Powers'). Biz surrogat n…ôsill…ôri √ľ√ß√ľn sistem arhitektarńĪnńĪ t…ôsdiql…ôyirik v…ô Alman e-po√ßt korpusu CodeAlltag'da t…ôrzimizi deńüerl…ôyirik.", 'jv': "Awak dhéwé negoro perusahaan kelangan langgar sampek iso nggambar obah-obahan liyane task-type Pirêh, ono sing nganggo entis menyang bebas nang informasi priwate-jut (bisa, mbiyen, jeneng perbudhakan, kok, nomer telepone nggo daftar) iki dadi ono jiptaha, lan nganggo sistem sing gawe priwate-teka ono sing bisa dilakowe kotak sing dibutuhke sistem tau dadi supoyata (bisa, sampek, perbudhakan nambah 'John Doe' nambah dika 'Bil Power'). Awak dhéwé rambarang sistem architecture kanggo nggambar aturan suratan lan nggawe gerakan kanggo kodeAlltag, sampeyan email alaman.", 'ha': "Munã yi fatawa ga misãlai ga waɗannan filayen matsayi da e-email, wanda za mu iya yarda in gane wasu masu gaskiya. Wannan aikin aka raba shi cikin hanyõyi biyu. A farkon da aka sunan abubuwa masu tsari masu ɗaun tsari masu tsari farat ɗaya (misali sunayen mutum, wurin, namunan telephone, ko tare-kwanan), kuma, a ƙarami, za'a musanya waɗannan abun farat ɗaya da aka samu surogi (misali, wani mutum wanda aka riga aka suna `Yon Doe'). Munã bayyana wani matsayi na'urar tsarin na'urar surgita kuma ana ƙaddara hanyarmu kan Code Alltag, wata umarni na jerumani.", 'he': 'אנו מתמודדים עם הפסודונימיזציה של המרחקים האלה של טקסט בדואר אלקטרוני שיכולים לאפשר לזהות אנשים בודדים אמיתיים. המשימה הזאת מתפרקת לשני צעדים. ראשית, ישויות בשם נושאות מידע רגיש לפרטיות (למשל שמות של בני אדם, מקומות, מספרי טלפון או תאריכים) זוהות, ושנית, ישויות נושאות לפרטיות אלו הוחלפות על ידי מחליפים יוצרים באופן סינטטי (למשל, אדם בשם המקורי "ג\'ון לא" הוחלף בשם "Bill Powers"). אנחנו מתארים ארכיטקטורה מערכתית לדור חלופי ולעריך את הגישה שלנו על CodeAlltag, גופוס דואר אלקטרוני גרמני.', 'sk': 'Ukvarjamo se s psevdonimizacijo tistih delov besedila v e-poštnih sporočilih, ki bi lahko omogočili identifikacijo resničnih posameznikov. Ta naloga je razdeljena na dva koraka. Prvič, identificirajo se imenovane subjekte, ki nosijo informacije, občutljive za zasebnost (npr. imena oseb, lokacije, telefonske številke ali datume), in drugič, te subjekte, ki nosijo zasebnost, nadomestijo sintetično ustvarjeni nadomestki (npr. oseba, ki je prvotno imenovana "John Doe", se preimenuje v "Bill Powers"). Opisujemo sistemsko arhitekturo za generacijo nadomestnih materialov in ocenimo naš pristop k CodeAlltag, nemškemu korpusu e-pošte.', 'bo': "ང་ཚོས་གློག་འཕྲིན་ནང་གི་ཡི་གེ་རྩོམ་ཡིག་གི་མིང་རྟགས་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་དེ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། བྱ་འགུལ་འདི་གྲལ་ཐེངས་གཉིས་ནང་སྦྱར་བ་རེད། First, named entities carrying privacy-sensitive information (e.g., names of persons, locations, phone numbers or dates) are identified, and, second, these privacy-bearing entities are replaced by synthetically generated surrogates (e.g., a person originally named `John Doe' is renamed as `Bill Powers'). ང་ཚོས་རྣམས་ལ་བསླབ་པའི་མ་ལག་གི་བཟོ་བཀོད་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་CodeAlltag་དང་ སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཨེམ་ཨེལ་མཁན་ཞིག་གི་བཟ"}
{'en': 'Lexical Quantile-Based Text Complexity Measure', 'ar': 'مقياس تعقيد النص المعجمي المستند إلى الكم', 'pt': 'Medida de complexidade de texto baseada em quantil lexical', 'fr': 'Mesure de complexité de texte basée sur des quantiles lexicaux', 'es': 'Medición de complejidad de texto basada en cuantiles léxicos', 'ja': 'Lexical Quantile - based Text Complexity Measure', 'ru': 'Лексическое измерение сложности текста на основе квантиля', 'zh': '盖词法分位数之文本复杂性量也', 'hi': 'Lexical Quantile-आधारित पाठ जटिलता उपाय', 'ga': 'Beart Castachta Téacs Cainníocht-Bhunaithe', 'el': 'Λεξικό ποσοτικό μέτρο πολυπλοκότητας κειμένου', 'hu': 'Lexikai mennyiségalapú szövegkomplexitási mérés', 'it': 'Misura di complessità testuale quantistica', 'lt': 'Lexical Quantile-Based Text Complexity Measure', 'kk': 'Лексикалық Quantile- негіздеген мәтін толықтығының өлшемі', 'ms': 'Ukuran Kekompleksiti Teks Berasas Kuantil Leksikal', 'mk': 'Лексикална мерка на квантилна комплексност на текст', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ക്വാന്റില്\u200d - അടിസ്ഥാനമായ പദാവലി കോപ്പ്ലെക്സിറ്റി അളവു്', 'ka': 'Name', 'mt': 'Lexical Quantile-Based Text Complexity Measure', 'mn': 'Лексик хэмжээний үндсэн хэмжээний төгс хэмжээс', 'no': 'Tekstkompleksitetsmål med leksisk Quantilebasert', 'pl': 'Leksyczny ilościowy pomiar złożoności tekstu', 'ro': 'Măsurarea complexității textului bazată pe cuantificare', 'sr': 'Leksička mjera kompleksnosti teksta na kvantilu', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Lexical Quantile-Based Text Complexity Measures', 'sv': 'Lexisk kvantilbaserad textkomplexitetsmätning', 'ta': 'Lexical Quantile- Based Text Complexity அளவு', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phân tích phức tạp ngôn ngữ học', 'bg': 'Измерване на сложността на текста с квантово съдържание', 'hr': 'Leksička mjera kompleksnosti teksta na kvantilu', 'nl': 'Lexical Quantil Based Tekst Complexity Measure', 'da': 'Lexisk kvantilbaseret tekstkompleksitetsmåling', 'de': 'Lexikal quantital-based Text Complexity Measure', 'ko': '문법 분위수 기반 텍스트 복잡도 도량', 'id': 'Ukuran Kompleksitas Teks Berdasarkan Kuantil Lexik', 'fa': 'مقدار پیچیدگی متن بر پایه\u200cهای کوانتیل lexical Quantile', 'sw': 'Mezina ya kompleksita ya maandishi yenye msingi wa Kilexico', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Hatlar', 'sq': 'Masa kompleksiteti teksti me bazë kuantile', 'am': 'text-tool-action', 'hy': 'Լեքսիկական քանակի հիմնված տեքստի բարդության չափումը', 'az': 'Leksik Quantile-Based Metin Tamamlama Ölçüsi', 'bn': 'লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল কোয়ান্টিল- ভিত্তিক টেক্সট কম্পোলেক্সিটি মাপ', 'bs': 'Leksička mjera kompleksnosti teksta na kvantilu', 'cs': 'Lexické kvantilové měření složitosti textu', 'ca': 'Mésura de complexitat de text basada en càntils lècsiques', 'et': 'Lexikaalne kvantiilpõhine teksti keerukuse mõõde', 'fi': 'Lexical Quantile Based Text Complexity Measure', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog", 'sk': 'Meritev kompleksnosti besedila, ki temelji na leksični količini', 'he': 'מידה מסובכת טקסט מבוססת בקוונטיל לקסית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Lexical Quantile-Based Text Complexity Measure'}
{'en': 'This paper introduces a new approach to estimating the text document complexity. Common readability indices are based on average length of sentences and words. In contrast to these methods, we propose to count the number of rare words occurring abnormally often in the document. We use the reference corpus of texts and the quantile approach in order to determine what words are rare, and what frequencies are abnormal. We construct a general text complexity model, which can be adjusted for the specific task, and introduce two special models. The experimental design is based on a set of thematically similar pairs of Wikipedia articles, labeled using crowdsourcing. The experiments demonstrate the competitiveness of the proposed approach.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة طريقة جديدة لتقدير مدى تعقيد المستند النصي. تستند مؤشرات المقروئية الشائعة على متوسط طول الجمل والكلمات. على عكس هذه الأساليب ، نقترح حساب عدد الكلمات النادرة التي تحدث بشكل غير طبيعي في كثير من الأحيان في المستند. نستخدم مجموعة النصوص المرجعية والنهج الكمي من أجل تحديد الكلمات النادرة والترددات غير الطبيعية. نقوم ببناء نموذج تعقيد النص العام ، والذي يمكن تعديله لمهمة محددة ، وتقديم نموذجين خاصين. يعتمد التصميم التجريبي على مجموعة من أزواج مقالات ويكيبيديا المتشابهة موضوعيًا ، والتي تم تصنيفها باستخدام التعهيد الجماعي. توضح التجارب القدرة التنافسية للنهج المقترح.', 'fr': "Cet article présente une nouvelle approche pour estimer la complexité d'un document texte. Les indices de lisibilité courants sont basés sur la longueur moyenne des phrases et des mots. Contrairement à ces méthodes, nous proposons de compter le nombre de mots rares qui apparaissent anormalement souvent dans le document. Nous utilisons le corpus de textes de référence et l'approche quantile afin de déterminer quels mots sont rares et quelles fréquences sont anormales. Nous construisons un modèle de complexité de texte général, qui peut être ajusté en fonction de la tâche spécifique, et nous introduisons deux modèles spéciaux. Le design expérimental est basé sur un ensemble de paires d'articles Wikipédia similaires sur le plan thématique, étiquetés à l'aide du crowdsourcing. Les expériences démontrent la compétitivité de l'approche proposée.", 'es': 'Este documento presenta un nuevo enfoque para estimar la complejidad de los documentos de texto. Los índices de legibilidad comunes se basan en la longitud media de oraciones y palabras. A diferencia de estos métodos, proponemos contar el número de palabras raras que aparecen con frecuencia anormal en el documento. Utilizamos el corpus de textos de referencia y el enfoque de cuantiles para determinar qué palabras son raras y qué frecuencias son anormales. Construimos un modelo general de complejidad del texto, que se puede ajustar para la tarea específica, e introducimos dos modelos especiales. El diseño experimental se basa en un conjunto de pares de artículos de Wikipedia temáticamente similares, etiquetados mediante crowdsourcing. Los experimentos demuestran la competitividad del enfoque propuesto.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta uma nova abordagem para estimar a complexidade do documento de texto. Os índices de legibilidade comuns são baseados no comprimento médio de frases e palavras. Em contraste com esses métodos, propomos contar o número de palavras raras que ocorrem com frequência anormal no documento. Usamos o corpus de referência de textos e a abordagem quantílica para determinar quais palavras são raras e quais frequências são anormais. Construímos um modelo geral de complexidade de texto, que pode ser ajustado para a tarefa específica, e introduzimos dois modelos especiais. O projeto experimental é baseado em um conjunto de pares tematicamente semelhantes de artigos da Wikipedia, rotulados usando crowdsourcing. Os experimentos demonstram a competitividade da abordagem proposta.', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе представлен новый подход к оценке сложности текстового документа. Общие индексы читаемости основаны на средней длине предложений и слов. В отличие от этих методов, мы предлагаем подсчитать количество редких слов, встречающихся в документе ненормально часто. Мы используем эталонный корпус текстов и квантильный подход, чтобы определить, какие слова являются редкими, а какие - ненормальными. Построим общую текстовую модель сложности, которую можно скорректировать под конкретную задачу, и введем две специальные модели. Экспериментальный дизайн основан на наборе тематически похожих пар статей Википедии, помеченных с помощью краудсорсинга. Эксперименты демонстрируют конкурентоспособность предлагаемого подхода.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर पाठ दस्तावेज़ जटिलता का अनुमान लगाने के लिए एक नया दृष्टिकोण पेश करता है। सामान्य पठनीयता सूचकांक वाक्यों और शब्दों की औसत लंबाई पर आधारित होते हैं। इन विधियों के विपरीत, हम दस्तावेज़ में असामान्य रूप से अक्सर होने वाले दुर्लभ शब्दों की संख्या की गणना करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम यह निर्धारित करने के लिए कि कौन से शब्द दुर्लभ हैं, और कौन सी आवृत्तियां असामान्य हैं, यह निर्धारित करने के लिए ग्रंथों के संदर्भ कॉर्पस और क्वांट्री दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करते हैं। हम एक सामान्य पाठ जटिलता मॉडल का निर्माण करते हैं, जिसे विशिष्ट कार्य के लिए समायोजित किया जा सकता है, और दो विशेष मॉडल पेश किए जा सकते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक डिजाइन विकिपीडिया लेखों के विषयगत रूप से समान जोड़े के एक सेट पर आधारित है, जिसे क्राउडसोर्सिंग का उपयोग करके लेबल किया गया है। प्रयोग प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण की प्रतिस्पर्धात्मकता को प्रदर्शित करते हैं।', 'ja': '本稿では、文書の複雑性を推定するための新しいアプローチを紹介する。一般的な読みやすさの指標は、文章と単語の平均的な長さに基づいています。これらの方法とは対照的に、文書内で異常に頻繁に発生する珍しい単語の数を数えることを提案します。どの単語が珍しいか、どの頻度が異常かを判断するために、テキストの参照コーパスと分位アプローチを使用します。特定のタスクに合わせて調整できる一般的なテキストの複雑性モデルを構築し、2つの特別なモデルを導入します。実験的なデザインは、クラウドソーシングを使用してラベル付けされたウィキペディアの記事のテーマ的に類似したペアのセットに基づいています。これらの実験は、提案されたアプローチの競争力を示している。', 'zh': '本文引文本档复杂性新法。 常见可读性数,盖句单词之均长也。 与此相反,计文档常奇单词之数也。 用文本参考语料库分位数法定单词奇,频率异常。 构一通文本复杂度模形,可以调特定,引入两异。 实验设计主题相似者维基百科文对,用众包标之。 实验验其方竞争力。', 'ga': "Tugann an páipéar seo isteach cur chuige nua chun castacht doiciméad téacs a mheas. Tá innéacsanna comónta inléiteachta bunaithe ar mheánfhad abairtí agus focail. I gcodarsnacht leis na modhanna seo, tá sé beartaithe againn líon na bhfocal neamhchoitianta a tharlaíonn go neamhghnách go minic sa doiciméad a chomhaireamh. Bainimid úsáid as corpas tagartha na dtéacsanna agus as an gcur chuige cainníochtúil chun a fháil amach cad iad na focail atá tearc, agus cad iad na minicíochtaí atá neamhghnách. Déanaimid múnla ginearálta castachta téacs, ar féidir a choigeartú don tasc sonrach, agus tugtar isteach dhá mhúnla speisialta. Tá an dearadh turgnamhach bunaithe ar shraith de phéirí d'ailt Vicipéid atá cosúil go téamach, agus iad lipéadaithe ag baint úsáide as sluafhoinsiú. Léiríonn na turgnaimh iomaíochas an chur chuige atá beartaithe.", 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტის კომპლექსიტეტის შესაბამისათვის ახალი პროგრამის შესაბამისათვის. სიტყვების და სიტყვების განზომილებით საერთო კითხვა შესახებ ინდექსები დაბაზიან. ამ პროცემების კონტრესტაციაში ჩვენ მინდომენობით, რომ დოკუმენტი წარმოდგენებული სიტყვების რაოდენობას წარმოდგენა. ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ტექსტის რეფერენტური კორპუსს და კვანტალური მიღება, რომლებიც სიტყვები რედაპირებულია და რომლებიც სიტყვები არორმალურია. ჩვენ ტექსტის კომპლექციური მოდელს შევქმნით, რომელიც შეიძლება კონფიგური დავალებისთვის კონფიგურაცია და ორი სპეციალური მოდელების შესახებ ექსპერიმენტიური დიზაინი ვიკიპედიაზე გადაყენებულია ტემატიკურად მსგავსი მარტიკების ზოგი, რომლებიც მუშაობის გამოყენებით ნიშნავულია. ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენებენ პროგრამეტურის კონპექტიგურობა.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία εισάγει μια νέα προσέγγιση για την εκτίμηση της πολυπλοκότητας του εγγράφου κειμένου. Οι κοινοί δείκτες αναγνωσιμότητας βασίζονται στο μέσο μήκος των προτάσεων και των λέξεων. Σε αντίθεση με αυτές τις μεθόδους, προτείνουμε να μετρήσουμε τον αριθμό των σπάνιων λέξεων που εμφανίζονται ασυνήθιστα συχνά στο έγγραφο. Χρησιμοποιούμε το σώμα αναφοράς κειμένων και την κβαντική προσέγγιση για να προσδιορίσουμε ποιες λέξεις είναι σπάνιες και ποιες συχνότητες είναι ανώμαλες. Κατασκευάζουμε ένα γενικό μοντέλο πολυπλοκότητας κειμένου, το οποίο μπορεί να προσαρμοστεί για τη συγκεκριμένη εργασία, και εισάγουμε δύο ειδικά μοντέλα. Ο πειραματικός σχεδιασμός βασίζεται σε ένα σύνολο θεματικά παρόμοιων ζευγαριών άρθρων της Βικιπαίδειας, που επισημαίνονται με τη χρήση crowdsourcing. Τα πειράματα καταδεικνύουν την ανταγωνιστικότητα της προτεινόμενης προσέγγισης.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány új megközelítést mutat be a szövegdokumentumok összetettségének becslésére. A közös olvashatósági mutatók a mondatok és szavak átlagos hosszán alapulnak. Ezekkel a módszerekkel ellentétben azt javasoljuk, hogy a dokumentumban rendkívül gyakran előforduló ritka szavak számát számoljuk meg. A referencia-korpuszt és a kvantilis megközelítést használjuk annak meghatározására, hogy mely szavak ritkák és milyen frekvenciák rendellenesek. Az adott feladathoz igazítható általános szövegkomplexitási modellt készítünk, és két speciális modellt vezetünk be. A kísérleti kialakítás tematikusan hasonló Wikipédia cikkek párjain alapul, amelyeket crowdsourcing használatával jelöltek meg. A kísérletek bizonyítják a javasolt megközelítés versenyképességét.', 'it': "Questo articolo introduce un nuovo approccio per stimare la complessità del documento di testo. Gli indici di leggibilità comuni si basano sulla lunghezza media di frasi e parole. A differenza di questi metodi, proponiamo di contare il numero di parole rare che si verificano anormalmente spesso nel documento. Usiamo il corpus di riferimento dei testi e l'approccio quantile per determinare quali parole sono rare e quali frequenze sono anormali. Costruiamo un modello generale di complessità del testo, che può essere adattato per il compito specifico, e introduciamo due modelli speciali. Il progetto sperimentale si basa su una serie di coppie tematiche simili di articoli Wikipedia, etichettati utilizzando il crowdsourcing. Gli esperimenti dimostrano la competitività dell'approccio proposto.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз мәтін құжаттың тәжірибесін бағалау үшін жаңа тәсілді көрсетеді. Оқуға мүмкіндік индекстері сөздер мен сөздердің орташа ұзындығына негізделген. Бұл әдістердің қарсы, құжаттың көпшілігінде болатын қызықты сөздер санын есептеуге болады. Біз мәтіндердің сілтеме корпусын және квантилді қалай сөздердің қызықтығын анықтау үшін, және қандай жиіліктердің қанәтижесін анықтаймыз. Біз жалпы мәтіннің комплекстік үлгісін құрып, бұл тапсырманы баптауға болады, екі арнайы үлгілерді таңдап аламыз. Тәжірибелі дизайны көпшілік көпшіліктерді қолдану арқылы Википедия мақалаларының нақышты екеуіне негізделген. Тәжірибелер таңдалған тәжірибенің конкуренциялығын көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan pendekatan baru untuk menghargai kompleksiti dokumen teks. Indeks pembacaan umum berdasarkan panjang purata kalimat dan perkataan. Sebaliknya dengan kaedah-kaedah ini, kami cadangkan untuk menghitung bilangan perkataan langka yang berlaku secara tidak biasa sering dalam dokumen. Kami menggunakan korpus rujukan teks dan pendekatan kuantil untuk menentukan apa perkataan yang jarang, dan apa frekuensi yang tidak normal. Kami membina model kompleksiti teks umum, yang boleh disesuaikan untuk tugas khusus, dan memperkenalkan dua model khusus. Rancangan percubaan berdasarkan set pasangan artikel Wikipedia yang sama secara tematik, ditabel menggunakan crowdsourcing. Eksperimen menunjukkan kepekatan pendekatan yang diusulkan.', 'mk': 'Овој документ претставува нов пристап за проценка на комплексноста на текстовиот документ. Општите индекси за читливост се базирани на просечната должина на речениците и зборовите. За разлика од овие методи, предлагаме да се брои бројот на ретки зборови кои се случуваат анормално често во документот. Ние го користиме референцискиот корпус на текстови и квантилниот пристап за да одредиме кои зборови се ретки и кои фреквенции се анормални. Конструираме генерален модел на текст комплексност, кој може да се прилагоди за специфичната задача, и да воведеме два специјални модели. Експерименталниот дизајн се базира на сет тематски слични парови на статии од Википедија, означени со користење на пулсорсирање. Експериментите ја покажуваат конкурентноста на предложениот пристап.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas naujas požiūris į teksto dokumento sudėtingumą. Bendri skaitomumo rodikliai grindžiami vidutiniu sakinių ir žodžių ilgiu. Priešingai šiems metodams, siūlome skaičiuoti retų žodžių, atsirandančių neįprastai dažnai dokumente, skaičių. Siekdami nustatyti, kokie žodžiai yra reti ir kokie dažniai yra nenormalūs, naudojame tekstų referencinį korpusą ir kiekybinį metodą. Sukuriame bendrą teksto sudėtingumo model į, kuris gali būti pritaikytas konkrečiai užduotims, ir įvedame du specialius modelius. Eksperimentinis projektas grindžiamas temiškai panašiomis dviem Wikipedia straipsnių poromis, paženklintomis naudojant crowdsourcing. Eksperimentai rodo siūlomo metodo konkurencingumą.', 'ml': 'പദാവലി രേഖയുടെ സങ്കീര്\u200dണത്തെ പരിഗണിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഈ പേപ്പറിന് പുതിയ ഒരു വഴി കാണിക്കുന്നു. സാധാരണ വായിക്കാവുന്നതിന്റെ സാധാരണ വാക്കുകളുടെയും നീളവും അടിസ്ഥാനമാണ്. ഈ രീതികള്\u200dക്ക് വിരോധമായി നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു, രേഖയില്\u200d സാധാരണയായി സംഭവിക്കുന്ന അസാധാരണമായ വാക വാക്കുകള്\u200d എന്താണ് കുറഞ്ഞതെന്നും എന്ത് ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസ് അസാധാരണമാണെന്നും നിരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പദാവലികളുടെ പേര നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പൊതുവായ പദാവലിയുടെ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. അത് പ്രത്യേക ജോലിക്ക് മാറ്റം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d  പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഡിസൈനിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണ് വിക്കിപിഡിയയിലെ ഒരു സാമാന്യമായി പോലെയുള്ള ജോട്ടുകാര്\u200d വിക്ക പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സമ്പ്രദായത്തിന്\u200dറെ മത്സരം കാണിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jintroduċi approċċ ġdid għall-istima tal-kumplessità tad-dokument tat-test. Indiċijiet komuni tal-leġibbiltà huma bbażati fuq it-tul medju tas-sentenzi u l-kliem. B’kuntrast ma’ dawn il-metodi, qed nipproponu li ngħaddu n-numru ta’ kliem rari li jseħħu b’mod anormali ta’ spiss fid-dokument. Aħna nużaw il-korpus ta’ referenza tat-testi u l-approċċ kwantili sabiex niddeterminaw liema kliem huma rari, u liema frekwenzi huma anormali. Nibnu mudell ġenerali ta’ kumplessità tat-test, li jista’ jiġi a ġġustat għall-kompitu speċifiku, u nintroduċu żewġ mudelli speċjali. Id-disinn sperimentali huwa bbażat fuq sett ta’ par tematikament simili ta’ oġġetti tal-Wikipedia, ittikkettati bl-użu ta’ crowdsourcing. L-esperimenti juru l-kompetittività tal-approċċ propost.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас текст баримтын төвөгтэй байдлыг тодорхойлох шинэ арга замыг тайлбарладаг. Олон унших чадварын индекс нь өгүүлбэр, үгийн дундаж урт дээр үндсэн. Эдгээр аргын эсрэгээр бид баримтын дотор ихэвчлэн ховор үгийг тооцоолж байна. Бид текст болон квантийн ойлголтыг ашиглаж үг ямар ховор байдгийг тодорхойлдохын тулд, хэмжээсүүд ямар хэмжээсүүд байдгийг тодорхойлдог. Бид ерөнхий хэмжээний цогц загварыг бүтээж, тодорхой ажил дээр зөвшөөрөх боломжтой, хоёр онцгой загварыг танилцуулж болно. Энэ туршилтын загвар нь олон хүмүүсийн сэтгэл хөрөнгө ашиглаж тэмдэглэгдсэн Wikipedia хэдэн сэтгэл хөрөнгө төстэй хэсэг юм. Эдгээр туршилтууд санал өгсөн арга хэмжээний өрсөлдөгч байдлыг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret introduserer ein ny tilnærming for å vurdere kompleksitetet for tekstdokumentet. Vanlege lesingsindekser er basert på gjennomsnittlig lengde på setningar og ord. I contrast to these methods, we propose to count the number of rare words occurring abnormally in the document. Vi bruker referanskorpusen til tekstar og kvantiltilnærming for å bestemme kva ord er sjeldre, og kva frekvenser er abnormal. Vi konstruerer ein generell tekstkompleksitetsmodell, som kan justerast for den spesifikke oppgåva, og introduserer to spesifikke modeller. Den eksperimentelle design er basert på eit sett av tematilsvarande par av Wikipedia-artiklar som er merket med crowdsourcing. Eksperimentane viser konkurentiteten av den foreslåde tilnærminga.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł wprowadza nowe podejście do szacowania złożoności dokumentu tekstowego. Wspólne wskaźniki czytelności opierają się na średniej długości zdań i słów. W przeciwieństwie do tych metod proponujemy policzenie liczby rzadkich słów występujących nienormalnie często w dokumencie. Używamy korpusu odniesienia tekstów i podejścia kwantylowego, aby określić, jakie słowa są rzadkie, a jakie częstotliwości są nieprawidłowe. Budujemy ogólny model złożoności tekstu, który można dostosować do konkretnego zadania, oraz wprowadzamy dwa specjalne modele. Projekt eksperymentalny opiera się na zestawie tematycznie podobnych par artykułów Wikipedii, oznaczonych za pomocą crowdsourcingu. Eksperymenty pokazują konkurencyjność proponowanego podejścia.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare introduce o nouă abordare pentru estimarea complexității documentelor text. Indicii obișnuiți de citire se bazează pe lungimea medie a propozițiilor și a cuvintelor. Spre deosebire de aceste metode, propunem să numărăm numărul de cuvinte rare care apar anormal de des în document. Folosim corpul de referință al textelor și abordarea cuantică pentru a determina ce cuvinte sunt rare și ce frecvențe sunt anormale. Construim un model general de complexitate a textului, care poate fi ajustat pentru sarcina specifică, și introducem două modele speciale. Designul experimental se bazează pe un set de perechi tematic similare de articole Wikipedia, etichetate folosind crowdsourcing. Experimentele demonstrează competitivitatea abordării propuse.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu soo bandhigaa qaab cusub oo ku qiimeynaya qalabka qoraalka. Waxyaabaha aqriska ee caadiga ah waxay ku saleysan yihiin dhererka ugu dhexeeya hadalka iyo hadallada. Iska duwan qaababkan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aan tirino lambarka erayada qaaliga ah oo sida caadiga ah ku soo socda dukumentiga. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa kooxaha qoraalka iyo qaababka tirada ah si aan u ogaano hadalka ay yaraayeen iyo frequencada ay caadi u yihiin. Waxaan dhisnaa tusaale u eg qoraal adag, kaas oo loo beddeli karo shaqo gaar ah, waxaana soo bandhigi karnaa laba tusaale oo gaar ah. Shaqooyinka imtixaanka waxaa ku saleysan noocyo isku mid ah oo warqadaha Wikipedia lagu qoray isticmaalka kooxo. Imtixaanka waxay muujiyaan khilaafka qaababka la soo jeeday.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats introducerar en ny metod för att uppskatta textdokumentets komplexitet. Vanliga läsbarhetsindex baseras på den genomsnittliga längden på meningar och ord. Till skillnad från dessa metoder föreslår vi att räkna antalet sällsynta ord som förekommer onormalt ofta i dokumentet. Vi använder referenskorpus av texter och kvantil ansats för att avgöra vilka ord som är sällsynta och vilka frekvenser som är onormala. Vi konstruerar en generell textkomplexitetsmodell, som kan anpassas för den specifika uppgiften, och introducerar två specialmodeller. Den experimentella designen är baserad på en uppsättning tematiskt liknande par Wikipedia artiklar, märkta med crowdsourcing. Experimenten visar på den föreslagna strategins konkurrenskraft.', 'ta': 'This paper introduces a new approach to estimating the text document complexity.  பொதுவான படிக்கும் சுட்டுக்குறிப்பு இந்த முறைமைகளுக்கு மாறுபட்டால், இந்த ஆவணத்தில் வழக்கமாக நடக்கும் சில வார்த்தைகளின் எண்ணிக்கை நாம் உரைகளின் குறிப்பு குறிப்பை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் மற்றும் அளவு முறையை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் வார்த்தைகள் என்ன குறிப்பிட நாம் ஒரு பொதுவான உரை சிக்கல் மாதிரி உருவாக்குகிறோம், அது குறிப்பிட்ட பணிக்கு சரிசெய்யலாம், மற்றும் இரண்டு சிறப்பு ம Name பரிசோதனைகள் முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாட்டின் தேவையை காண்பிக்கிறது.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ایک نوی طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے کہ تفصیل دفتر کی پیچیدگی کا ارزش کرے۔ سارے پڑھنے کے قابل پڑھنے کے اندازے کلمات اور کلمات کے متوسط طول پر بنیاد ہیں. ان طریقوں کے مقابلہ میں، ہم اس طریقے سے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ دکھانے میں غیر معمولی طور پر اترا ہوا کلمات کا شمار شمار کریں. ہم پیغام کے سرگوشی کورپوس اور کوانتیل کے قریب سے استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ کلمات کو معلوم کرنے کے لئے کیا ہے اور کیسی فرکانس ناعام ہیں۔ ہم ایک عمومی ٹکسٹ پیچیدگی موڈل بنا رہے ہیں، جسے مشخص کام کے لئے سمجھ سکتے ہیں، اور دو مخصوص موڈل معلوم کرسکتے ہیں. آزمائش طراحی کا ایک مجموعہ ویکیپیڈیا کے مطابق جیسے جوڑوں پر بنیاد ہے جو جماعت سورسینگ کے مطابق لکھی جاتی ہیں. آزمائش پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کی مسابقات کو دکھاتے ہیں.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja novi pristup procjeni kompleksnosti teksta. Обједни индекси за читање су базирани на промечном длину речи и речи. Za suprotnost ovim metodama, predlažemo da brojimo broj rijetkih reči koje se događaju abnormalno često u dokumentu. Koristimo referentni korpus teksta i kvantni pristup kako bi utvrdili rijetke reči i kakve su frekvencije abnormalne. Napravili smo model kompleksnosti teksta, koji se može prilagoditi za specifični zadatak, i predstaviti dva specijalna model a. Eksperimentalni dizajn je zasnovan na setu tematički sličnih par članaka Wikipedije, označena koristeći crowdsourcing. Eksperimenti pokazuju konkurentnost predloženog pristupa.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ලිපින්ත ලිපින්ත විශේෂතාව අනුමාණ කරන්න අලුත් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පෙන්වනවා. සාමාන්\u200dය කියවන්න පුළුවන් සංකේතය සාමාන්\u200dය වචනය සහ වචනය සඳහා අධාරිත වෙනවා. මේ විදියට විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා විශේෂ වචනයක් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට වෙනුවෙන් වචනය ග අපි පාළුවන්ගේ ප්\u200dරමාණ කොර්පස් සහ ක්වාන්ටිල් ප්\u200dරමාණය භාවිතා කරනවා වචන අවශ්\u200dය දේවල් නිර්දේශනය කරන්න, සහ ක අපි සාමාන්\u200dය පාළුවක් සංවිධානයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන්, ඒක විශේෂ වැඩක් සඳහා සංවිධානය කරන්න ප විකිපිඩියා ප්\u200dරතිකෘතියේ පරීක්ෂණ විද්\u200dයාපනය අධාරිත විද්\u200dයාපනය විද්\u200dයාපනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ. පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්.', 'uz': "Ushbu qogʻoz matn hujjatning murakkablarini qidirish uchun yangi usulni koʻrsatadi. Umumiy oʻqish xizmatlari bir so'zlar va so'zlar soni asosida asoslangan. Bu usullar bilan boshqa shaklga aytganda, biz oddiy soʻzlarning sonlarning soni ko'paytirishni talab qilamiz. Biz so'zlar qanday qisqa so'zlarni aniqlashga va freymlar qanday sodda bo'lganligini aniqlash uchun textlarning bogʻ'liqligini foydalanamiz. We construct a general text complexity model, which can be adjusted for the specific task, and introduce two special models.  Name Imzolar tajribalarni tahrirlash talab qilingan usulning rivojlanishini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đưa ra một phương pháp mới để đánh giá sự phức tạp của văn bản. Các chỉ số dễ đọc chung dựa trên độ dài trung bình của câu và từ. Trái với những phương pháp này, chúng tôi đề nghị tính số lượng ngôn ngữ hiếm có xảy ra thường xuyên trong tài liệu. Chúng tôi sử dụng hệ thống tham khảo của các văn bản và phương pháp lượng tử để xác định các từ hiếm có, và các tần số bất thường. Chúng tôi xây dựng một mô hình chữ phức tạp chung, có thể thay đổi cho nhiệm vụ đặc biệt, và nhập vào hai mô hình đặc biệt. Sự thiết kế thử nghiệm dựa trên một loạt các cặp đa sắc màu tương tự của Wikipedia, đã được đánh dấu bằng cách ăn thịt bò. Các thí nghiệm cho thấy năng lực của phương pháp được đề xuất.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя нов подход за оценка на сложността на текстовия документ. Честите показатели за четливост се основават на средната дължина на изреченията и думите. За разлика от тези методи, предлагаме да се преброи броят на редките думи, които се появяват необичайно често в документа. Използваме референтния корпус от текстове и квантилния подход, за да определим кои думи са редки и кои честоти са анормални. Изграждаме общ модел на сложност на текста, който може да бъде адаптиран за конкретната задача, и въвеждаме два специални модела. Експерименталният дизайн се основава на набор от тематично сходни двойки статии от Уикипедия, етикетирани с помощта на crowdsourcing. Експериментите демонстрират конкурентоспособността на предложения подход.', 'da': 'Dette dokument introducerer en ny tilgang til vurdering af tekstdokumentets kompleksitet. Almindelige læsbarhedsindeks er baseret på gennemsnitlig længde af sætninger og ord. I modsætning til disse metoder foreslår vi at tælle antallet af sjældne ord, der forekommer unormalt ofte i dokumentet. Vi bruger referencekorpustet af tekster og kvantil tilgang til at bestemme, hvilke ord der er sjældne, og hvilke frekvenser der er unormale. Vi konstruerer en generel tekstkompleksitetsmodel, som kan justeres til den konkrete opgave, og introducerer to specielle modeller. Det eksperimentelle design er baseret på et sæt tematisk lignende par Wikipedia artikler, mærket ved hjælp af crowdsourcing. Forsøgene viser den foreslåede fremgangsmådes konkurrenceevne.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja novi pristup procjeni kompleksnosti teksta dokumenta. Obični indeksi čitljivosti temeljeni su na prosječnoj dužini rečenica i riječi. Za suprotnost ovim metodama, predlažemo broj rijetkih riječi koje se događaju abnormalno često u dokumentu. Koristimo referentni korpus teksta i kvantni pristup kako bi utvrdili rijetke riječi i kakve su frekvencije abnormalne. Napravili smo općeg model a kompleksnosti teksta, koji se može prilagoditi za određeni zadatak i predstaviti dva specijalna modela. Eksperimentalni dizajn je zasnovan na setu temično sličnih par članaka Wikipedije, označenom koristeći crowdsourcing. Eksperimenti pokazuju konkurentnost predloženog pristupa.', 'nl': 'Dit document introduceert een nieuwe benadering om de complexiteit van tekstdocumenten te schatten. Veel voorkomende leesbaarheidsindexen zijn gebaseerd op de gemiddelde lengte van zinnen en woorden. In tegenstelling tot deze methoden stellen we voor om het aantal zeldzame woorden te tellen dat abnormaal vaak voorkomt in het document. We gebruiken het referentiecorpus van teksten en de kwantiele benadering om te bepalen welke woorden zeldzaam zijn en welke frequenties abnormaal zijn. We bouwen een algemeen tekstcomplexiteitsmodel, dat aangepast kan worden aan de specifieke taak, en introduceren twee speciale modellen. Het experimentele ontwerp is gebaseerd op een reeks thematisch vergelijkbare paren Wikipedia artikelen, gelabeld met crowdsourcing. De experimenten tonen het concurrentievermogen van de voorgestelde aanpak aan.', 'de': 'Dieses Papier stellt einen neuen Ansatz zur Schätzung der Komplexität von Textdokumenten vor. Allgemeine Lesbarkeitsindizes basieren auf der durchschnittlichen Länge von Sätzen und Wörtern. Im Gegensatz zu diesen Methoden schlagen wir vor, die Anzahl der seltenen Wörter zu zählen, die ungewöhnlich häufig im Dokument vorkommen. Wir verwenden den Referenzkorpus von Texten und den Quantilansatz, um festzustellen, welche Wörter selten sind und welche Frequenzen anormal sind. Wir konstruieren ein allgemeines Textkomplexitätsmodell, das an die jeweilige Aufgabe angepasst werden kann, und führen zwei spezielle Modelle ein. Das experimentelle Design basiert auf einer Reihe thematisch ähnlicher Wikipedia-Artikel, die mittels Crowdsourcing gekennzeichnet sind. Die Experimente zeigen die Wettbewerbsfähigkeit des vorgeschlagenen Ansatzes.', 'id': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan pendekatan baru untuk memperkirakan kompleksitas dokumen teks. Indeks pembacaan umum berdasarkan panjang rata-rata kalimat dan kata-kata. Sebaliknya dengan metode-metode ini, kami mengusulkan untuk menghitung jumlah kata langka yang sering terjadi dalam dokumen. We use the reference corpus of texts and the quantile approach in order to determine what words are rare, and what frequencies are abnormal.  Kami membangun model kompleksitas teks umum, yang dapat disesuaikan untuk tugas khusus, dan memperkenalkan dua model khusus. Desain eksperimen berdasarkan set dari pasangan artikel Wikipedia yang sama secara tematis, ditabel menggunakan crowdsourcing. Eksperimen menunjukkan kompetitif pendekatan yang diusulkan.', 'ko': '본고는 텍스트 문서의 복잡도를 평가하는 새로운 방법을 소개했다.흔히 볼 수 있는 가독성 지수는 문장과 단어의 평균 길이에 근거한다.이러한 방법과 비교하면, 우리는 문서에서 매우 빈번하게 나타나는 보기 드문 단어의 수량을 통계하는 것을 건의합니다.우리는 어떤 단어가 보기 드물고, 어떤 주파수가 이상한지 확인하기 위해 텍스트 참고 자료 라이브러리와 분위수법을 사용한다.우리는 일반적인 텍스트 복잡도 모델을 구축하여 구체적인 임무에 따라 조정할 수 있고 두 가지 특수한 모델을 도입했다.실험 디자인은 주제가 비슷한 위키백과 문장을 바탕으로 패키지 표시를 사용한다.실험은 이 방법의 유효성을 증명하였다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaleta mbinu mpya ya kutathmini utata wa nyaraka za maandishi. Mashindano ya kusoma ya kawaida yanategemea kwa kiwango cha wastani wa hukumu na maneno. Tofauti na mbinu hizi, tunapendekeza kuhesabu idadi ya maneno nadra yanayotokea mara nyingi katika nyaraka. Tunatumia makampuni ya maandishi na mbinu za kiasi ili kutambua maneno ni nadra, na frekve ni za kawaida. Tunajenga muundo wa ujumla wa ujumla wa maandishi, ambao unaweza kubadilishwa kwa kazi maalum, na kutengeneza mifano miwili maalum. Mpango wa jaribio hili unajikita na seti ya makala kadhaa yanayofanana na Wikipedia, inayoonyesha kutumia vyanzo vya umma. Majaribio yanaonyesha ushindani wa mbinu zilizopendekezwa.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک روش جدید برای ارزیابی پیچیدگی سند متن را معرفی می کند. indices common readability are based on average length of sentences and words. در مقابل این روش، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تعداد کلمات نادر که اغلب در سند اتفاق می\u200cافتد را شماره کنیم. ما از قالب مرتبط متن و دسترسی کوانتیل استفاده می کنیم تا تعیین کنیم کلمات نادر هستند و چه فرکانس غیرعادی هستند. ما یک مدل پیچیدگی متن عمومی را ساختیم، که می تواند برای کار خاص تنظیم شود و دو مدل خاص را معرفی کنیم. طراحی آزمایشی بر اساس مجموعه جفت\u200cهای مشابه\u200cای از مقاله\u200cهای ویکیپدیا است که با استفاده از سرمایه\u200cگذاری جمعیت نامیده می\u200cشود. آزمایش\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند رقابتی روش پیشنهاد.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz metin senediň karmaşıklygyny hasaplamak üçin täze bir ýazşy tanyşdyrýar. Umumy okanlyk görkezilişinderler sözleriň we sözleriň orta uzunlygyna daýanýar. Bu yönleriň garşynda, senediň iň köplenç däl sözleriniň sanyny saylamagyny maslahat berýäris. Biz sözlerin nadir olduğunu ve sık olduğunu belirlemek için tekstlerin referens korpusunu ve küntal yaklaşımı kullanırız. Biz umumy metin karmaşıklygynyň nusgasyny inşa edip, bu nusgasy üçin düzeltilebilir we iki täze nusgasyny tanyşdyryp biler. Synaniýan tasarlama, crowdsourcing bilen etiket edilen Wikipedia makalarynyň bir toparyna daýanýar. Deneyler teklip eden ýazşyň ýakynlyklygyny görkeýärler.', 'af': "Hierdie papier introduseer 'n nuwe toegang om die teks dokumentkompleksiteit te vurdering. Gewone leesbaardige indekse is gebaseer op gemiddelde lengte van teikens en woorde. In contrast to these methods, we propose to count the number of rare words occurring abnormally often in the document. Ons gebruik die verwysing korpus van tekste en die quantiel toegang om te bepaal wat woorde is rare, en wat frekwensies is onnormale. Ons konstrukteer 'n algemene teks kompleksiteit model, wat kan gepas word vir die spesifieke taak, en introduseer twee spesiale modele. Name Die eksperimente vertoon die mededingsheid van die voorgestelde toegang.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument fut një metodë të re për vlerësimin e kompleksitetit të dokumentit të tekstit. Indekset e zakonshme të lexueshmërisë bazohen në gjatësinë mesatare të fjalëve dhe fjalëve. Në kundërshtim me këto metoda, propozojmë të numërojmë numrin e fjalëve të rralla që ndodhin shumë herë në dokument. Ne përdorim trupin e referimit të teksteve dhe qasjen kuantile për të përcaktuar se cilat fjalë janë të rralla dhe cilat frekuenca janë të pazakontë. Ne ndërtojmë një model të përgjithshëm kompleksiteti teksti, i cili mund të rregullohet për detyrën e veçantë, dhe të futim dy modele të veçantë. Disjini eksperimental bazohet në një sërë artikujsh tematikisht të ngjashëm të Wikipedias, të etiketuar duke përdorur crowdsourcing. Eksperimentet tregojnë konkurrencën e qasjes së propozuar.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የጽሑፉን ሰነዱን አካባቢነት ለመቆጠር አዲስ ልውቀት ያስተካክላል፡፡ የአጠቃላይ የአንባቢነት ክፍሎች የቁጥጥር ርዝመት እና ቃላት በመጠቀም ነው፡፡ ከዚህም ዓይነቶች በተለየ፣ በሰነዱ ውስጥ ብዙ ጊዜ የተነሳ ቃላትን ቁጥር ለመቆጠር እናስባለን፡፡ የጽሑፎች ቁጥጥር እና የቁጥጥር ቃላት ምን ትንሽ እና ቁጥጥር ምን ጥቅም እንደሆነ እናረጋግጥ ዘንድ ነው፡፡ የጽሑፍ አካባቢነት ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፣ ለታዋቂው ስራ ማሻሻል እና ሁለት የተለየ ምሳሌዎችን እናግናለን፡፡ ፈተናው አካባቢ፣ የቡድን ድምፅ በመጠቀም የተደረገ የWikipedia ጽሑፎች ሁለት ዓይነቶችን በተመሳሳይ ነው፡፡ ፈተናዎች የተዘጋጀውን የሥልጣን ጥቃት ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ներկայացնում է նոր մոտեցում տեքստի փաստաթղթի բարդությունը գնահատելու համար: Ընդհանուր կարդալիության ինդեքսները հիմնված են նախադասությունների և բառերի միջին երկարության վրա: Հակառակը այս մեթոդներին, մենք առաջարկում ենք հաշվել հազվադեպ բառերի թիվը, որոնք անսովորաբար հաճախ տեղի են ունենում փաստաթղթի մեջ: Մենք օգտագործում ենք տեքստների հաղորդակցման մարմինը և քվանտային մոտեցումը որոշելու համար, թե ինչ բառեր հազվադեպ են և ինչ հաճախականություններ անսովոր են: Մենք կառուցում ենք ընդհանուր տեքստի բարդության մոդել, որը կարելի է հարմարեցնել հատուկ խնդրի համար, և ներկայացնում երկու հատուկ մոդել: Փորձարկվող դիզայնը հիմնված է Վիքիփեդիայի հոդվածների մի շարք թեմատիկապես նման զույգերի վրա, որոնք պիտակում են օգտագործելով ամբողջ աշխարհը: Փորձերը ցույց են տալիս առաջարկված մոտեցումների մրցակցությունը:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt mətn belələrinin kompleksitəsini hesablamaq üçün yeni bir yol göstərir. Sözlər və sözlərin ortalama uzunluğuna dayanılır. Bu metodlara baxmayaraq, səhifələrdə çox sıxıntılı sözlərin sayını saymağı təklif edirik. Biz sözlərin nadir olduğunu və sıxınlıqların abnormal olduğunu təsdiqləmək üçün mətnlərin referens korpusu və kvantal yaxınlığını istifadə edirik. Biz ünlü metin kompleksitəsi modeli inşa edirik ki, bu müəyyən bir iş üçün düzəldirilə bilər və iki özel modeli təşkil edirik. Müxtəlif tasarım, qüvvətli sərvət vasitəsilə etiketlənmiş Wikipedia məqamlarının temalı kimi bir çift şəkildə dayanılır. Təşviyyələr təklif olunan təsirlərin müqabiliyyətini göstərir.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি টেক্সট নথিপত্রের জটিলতা হিসেবে ধারণা করার একটি নতুন পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করেছে। সাধারণ পড়তে পারার অভিযোগ গড়ে বাক্য এবং শব্দের দীর্ঘদিনের ভিত্তিতে রয়েছে। এই পদ্ধতিগুলোর বিপরীতে, আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি এই নথিতে প্রায়শই স্বাভাবিকভাবে সংখ্যার সংখ্যা গণনা করতে যাচ্ছে। আমরা টেক্সটের রেফারেন্স কোর্পাস এবং পরিমাণ প্রতিক্রিয়া ব্যবহার করি যাতে কি শব্দ দুর্লভ এবং কি ফ্রেঞ্জ স্বাভাবিক। আমরা একটি সাধারণ টেক্সটের জটিল মডেল তৈরি করি, যা নির্দিষ্ট কাজের জন্য সংশোধন করা যাবে এবং দুটি বিশেষ মডেল পরিচয় করিয়ে দেবে। এই পরীক্ষার ডিজাইনের ভিত্তিতে উইকিপিডিয়া প্রবন্ধের একই ধরনের প্রবন্ধের ভিত্তিতে রয়েছে, যা লেবেল করা হয়েছে জনস্কোর পরীক্ষাগুলো প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির প্রতিযোগিতা প্রদর্শন করে।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja novi pristup procjeni kompleksnosti teksta dokumenta. Obični indeksi za čitanje su temeljeni na prosječnoj dužini rečenica i riječi. U suprotnost ovim metodama, predlažemo brojati broj rijetkih riječi koje se događaju abnormalno često u dokumentu. Koristimo referentni korpus teksta i kvantni pristup kako bi utvrdili rijetke riječi i kakve su frekvencije abnormalne. Napravili smo općeg model a kompleksnosti teksta, koji se može prilagoditi za specifični zadatak, i predstaviti dva specijalna modela. Eksperimentalni dizajn je zasnovan na setu temično sličnih par članaka Wikipedije, označenom s crowdsourcing. Eksperimenti pokazuju konkurentnost predloženog pristupa.', 'ca': "Aquest paper introdueix un nou enfocament per estimar la complexitat del document de text. Els índics comuns de llegibilitat es basan en la llargada mitjana de frases i paraules. A diferent d'aquests mètodes, proposem comptar el nombre de paraules rares que ocorren anormalment sovint al document. We use the reference corpus of texts and the quantile approach in order to determine what words are rare, and what frequencies are abnormal.  Construim un model general de complexitat del text, que es pot ajustar a la tasca específica, i introduïm dos models especials. El disseny experimental es basa en un conjunt d'articles temàticament similars de Wikipedia, etiquetats fent servir crowdsourcing. Els experiments demostren la competitivitat de l'enfocament proposat.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje nový přístup k odhadu složitosti textového dokumentu. Běžné indexy čitelnosti jsou založeny na průměrné délce vět a slov. Na rozdíl od těchto metod navrhujeme spočítat počet vzácných slov, která se v dokumentu abnormálně často vyskytují. Používáme referenční korpus textů a kvantilový přístup k určení, která slova jsou vzácná a které frekvence jsou abnormální. Konstruujeme obecný model složitosti textu, který lze upravit pro konkrétní úkol, a představujeme dva speciální modely. Experimentální návrh je založen na sadě tematicky podobných párů článků Wikipedie, označených za použití crowdsourcingu. Experimenty demonstrují konkurenceschopnost navrhovaného přístupu.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustatakse uut lähenemisviisi tekstidokumendi keerukuse hindamisel. Tavalised loetavusindeksid põhinevad lausete ja sõnade keskmisel pikkusel. Erinevalt nendest meetoditest teeme ettepaneku lugeda dokumendis ebatavaliselt sageli esinevate haruldaste sõnade arvu. Me kasutame tekstide viitekorpust ja kvantitiilset lähenemisviisi, et määrata, millised sõnad on haruldased ja millised sagedused on ebanormaalsed. Ehitame üldise teksti keerukuse mudeli, mida saab konkreetsele ülesandele kohandada, ja tutvustame kahte erimudelit. Eksperimentaalne disain põhineb temaatiliselt sarnastel Wikipedia artiklite paaridel, mis on märgistatud ühishangete abil. Katsed näitavad kavandatud lähenemisviisi konkurentsivõimet.', 'fi': 'Tässä asiakirjassa esitellään uusi lähestymistapa tekstiasiakirjojen monimutkaisuuden arvioimiseen. Yleiset luettavuusindeksit perustuvat lauseiden ja sanojen keskimääräiseen pituuteen. Toisin kuin nämä menetelmät, ehdotamme laskemaan harvinaisten sanojen määrän, jotka esiintyvät asiakirjassa epätavallisesti usein. Käytämme tekstien viitekorpusta ja kvantitiililähestymistapaa selvittääksemme, mitkä sanat ovat harvinaisia ja mitkä taajuudet poikkeavat. Rakennamme yleisen tekstin monimutkaisuuden mallin, jota voidaan mukauttaa tiettyyn tehtävään, ja esittelemme kaksi erityismallia. Kokeellinen suunnittelu perustuu kokoelmaan temaattisesti samankaltaisia Wikipedia-artikkeleita, jotka on merkitty joukkoistamalla. Kokeet osoittavat ehdotetun lähestymistavan kilpailukyvyn.', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Perintah kapan kelas kang dipun Genjer-Genjer Pak Cocok Awak dhéwé nggambar aturan tapi nggambar texting lan dadi nggambar kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngerasai gambar kuwi kaleh bakal terus marito, lan kashukaké kesempatan unggadi. Awak dhéwé nggawe model sing komplikasi teks, sing iso nggawe nggawe gerakan kanggo kelas nggawe barang iki model sing dibenalke Name Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk kesempresan kanggo nggawé gerakan.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek uvaja nov pristop k ocenjevanju kompleksnosti besedilnega dokumenta. Pogosti indeksi berljivosti temeljijo na povprečni dolžini stavkov in besed. V nasprotju s temi metodami predlagamo število redkih besed, ki se nenavadno pojavljajo v dokumentu. Z referenčnim korpusom besedil in kvantitilnim pristopom ugotavljamo, katere besede so redke in katere frekvence so nenormalne. Izdelamo splošni model kompleksnosti besedila, ki ga je mogoče prilagoditi določeni nalogi, in uvedemo dva posebna modela. Eksperimentalni načrt temelji na nizu tematsko podobnih parov Wikipedijskih člankov, označenih z množičnim sourcingom. Poskusi dokazujejo konkurenčnost predlaganega pristopa.', 'ha': "Wannan takardar aiki na ƙunsa wani hanyoyi zuwa ya ƙayyade takardar rubutun. @ label: listbox Ga motsi da waɗannan hanyõyin, Munã buƙaitar da mu ƙidãyar da yawan maganar da suka sauce a cikin takardar nan da ɗadi ko da yawa. Munã yi amfani da makarantin littãfin da gwargwadon hanyarwa dõmin ka ƙayyade wanne magana masu sauri ne da kuma misali masu nau'i. Tuna samar da wani misali mai adadi na matsayin, wanda za'a iya daidaita wa aikin da aka ƙayyade shi, kuma Mu ƙara cikin misãlai biyu masu husu. The experimental design is based on a set of thematically similar pairs of Wikipedia articles, labeled using crowdsourcing.  jarrabai sun nuna competiti'in da ake bukãta.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ཡིག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་བཟོ་བ་དང་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གསར་བ་སྟོན་ཐུབ་པ སྤྱིར་བཏང་ནུས་ཀློག་འཇུག་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་དང་ཐ་སྙད་ཚུ་རྟེན་འདུག ལམ་ལུགས་འདི་དག་ལ་བསྟུན་ནས་ཡིག་ཆ་ནང་དུ་མི་མཐུན་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ཨང་གྲངས་རྩིས་བརྗོད་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་དབུགས་དང་རྩིས་གཞིའི་གཟུགས་འབྲི་བ་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཞི་སྤྱད་ནས་དབུགས་ཡི་གེ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་འཛིན་བྱས་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ལས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཅིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། The experimental design is based on a set of thematically similar pairs of Wikipedia articles, labeled using crowdsourcing. ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་གཟུགས་རིས་གྲ་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བ་སྟོན་ཡོད།', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מציג גישה חדשה להערכה את מורכבת מסמך הטקסט. אינדיקסי קריאות רגילים מבוססים על אורך המשפטים והמילים הממוצעים. בניגוד לשיטות אלה, אנו מציעים לספור את מספר המילים נדירות שמתרחשות בדרך כלל במסמך. אנו משתמשים בקורפוס התייחסות של טקסטים והגישה הקוונטית כדי לקבוע אילו מילים נדירות, ואיזה תדרים הם בלתי נורמליים. We construct a general text complexity model, which can be adjusted for the specific task, and introduce two special models.  The experimental design is based on a set of thematically similar pairs of Wikipedia articles, labeled using crowdsourcing.  The experiments demonstrate the competitiveness of the proposed approach.'}
{'en': 'Demo Application for LETO : Learning Engine Through Ontologies', 'ar': 'تطبيق تجريبي لـ LETO: محرك التعلم من خلال علم الوجود', 'fr': "Application de démonstration pour LETO\xa0: moteur d'apprentissage par ontologies", 'es': 'Aplicación de demostración para LETO: motor de aprendizaje a través de ontologías', 'pt': 'Aplicativo de demonstração para LETO: mecanismo de aprendizado por meio de ontologias', 'ja': 'LETO用デモアプリケーション：オントロジーによる学習エンジン', 'zh': 'LETO 演应用程序:以体学引擎', 'hi': 'LETO के लिए डेमो आवेदन: Ontologies के माध्यम से इंजन सीखना', 'ru': 'Демо-приложение для LETO: обучающий движок через онтологию', 'ga': 'Feidhmchlár taispeána le haghaidh LETO: Inneall Foghlama Trí Onteolaíochtaí', 'it': 'Applicazione demo per LETO: motore di apprendimento attraverso ontologie', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Demo Application for LETO: Tanulási motor Ontológiákon keresztül', 'el': 'Εφαρμογή επίδειξης για το LETO: Μηχανή εκμάθησης μέσω οντολογίας', 'lt': 'Demo Application for LETO: Learning Engine Through Ontologies', 'ms': 'Aplikasi Demo untuk LETO: Mempelajari Enjin Melalui Ontologi', 'mt': 'Applikazzjoni ta’ Demostrazzjoni għal LETO: Magna ta’ Tagħlim Permezz tal-Ontoloġiji', 'kk': 'LETO үшін демократиялық қолданба: Ontologies арқылы оқыту тетігі', 'no': 'Demoprogram for LETO: Læringsmotor gjennom ontologiar', 'ml': 'ലെറ്റോയ്ക്കുള്ള ഡിമോ പ്രയോഗം: ഓണ്\u200dടോളജികളിലൂടെ പഠിക്കുന്ന എഞ്ചിന്\u200d', 'ro': 'Aplicație demo pentru LETO: motor de învățare prin ontologii', 'sr': 'Demo aplikacija za LETO: Učenje motora kroz Ontologije', 'mn': 'LETO-ын демократийн програм: Ontologies-аар суралцах машин', 'si': 'Name', 'pl': 'Aplikacja demonstracyjna dla LETO: silnik uczenia się poprzez ontologię', 'mk': 'Апликација за демонстрација за LETO: Учење на моторот преку онтологии', 'ur': 'Name', 'so': 'Codsiga Demo-ka ee LETO: Maamulka waxbarashada', 'sv': 'Demo Ansökan om LETO: Lärande motor genom ontologier', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Ứng dụng Demo for LETO: sức mạnh học hỏi qua khoa u.', 'bg': 'Демо приложение за Учебен двигател чрез Онтологии', 'nl': 'Demo applicatie voor LETO: Learning Engine Door Ontologieën', 'hr': 'Demo aplikacija za LETO: Učenje motora kroz Ontologije', 'da': 'Demo Ansøgning om LETO: Læringsmotor gennem ontologier', 'id': 'Aplikasi Demo untuk LETO: Belajar Mesin Melalui Ontologi', 'de': 'Demo-Anwendung für LETO: Lernmaschine durch Ontologien', 'fa': 'کاربرد نمایش برای LETO: موتور یادگیری از طریق آنتولوژی', 'ko': 'LETO 프레젠테이션 응용 프로그램: 본체를 통한 학습 엔진', 'tr': 'LETO üçin Program Demo: Ontologi bilen öwrenmek Motory', 'sw': 'Utumiaji wa Demo kwa ajili ya LETO: Kufundisha Mashindano kupitia Mtolojia', 'af': 'Demo Toepassing vir LETO: Leer masjien deur Ontologies', 'sq': 'Programi Demo për LETO: Mësimi i motorit nëpërmjet Ontologjive', 'am': 'የዶሴ ስም፦', 'hy': 'LEto-ի ցուցադրման ծրագիր. Օնտլոգիայի միջոցով մեքենաներ սովորելը', 'bn': 'Demo Application for LETO: Learning Engine Through Ontologies', 'az': 'LETO 칲칞칲n Demo Uygulamas캼: Ontologiya vasit톛sil톛 칬yr톛nm톛 Motoru', 'bs': 'Demo aplikacija za LETO: Učenje motora kroz Ontologije', 'et': 'Demo rakendus LETO: Õppemootor läbi Ontoloogiate', 'cs': 'Demo aplikace pro LETO: Learning Engine prostřednictvím ontologií', 'fi': 'Demo sovellus LETO: Learning Engine Through Ontologies', 'ca': 'Demo Application for LETO: Learning Engine Through Ontologies', 'jv': 'Name', 'ha': 'Shiryoyin Demo wa LETO: Shiryarwa na Shirin Ayuka', 'sk': 'Demo aplikacija za LETO: učni motor skozi ontologije', 'he': 'תוכנית דגמה עבור LETO: ללמוד מנוע דרך אונטולוגיה', 'bo': 'Demo Application for LETO: Learning Engine Through Ontologies'}
{'en': 'The massive amount of multi-formatted information available on the Web necessitates the design of software systems that leverage this information to obtain knowledge that is valid and useful. The main challenge is to discover relevant information and continuously update, enrich and integrate knowledge from various sources of structured and unstructured data. This paper presents the Learning Engine Through Ontologies(LETO) framework, an architecture for the continuous and incremental discovery of knowledge from multiple sources of unstructured and structured data. We justify the main design decision behind LETO’s architecture and evaluate the framework’s feasibility using the Internet Movie Data Base(IMDB) and Twitter as a practical application.', 'ar': 'يستلزم الكم الهائل من المعلومات متعددة التنسيقات المتوفرة على الويب تصميم أنظمة برمجية تستفيد من هذه المعلومات للحصول على المعرفة الصحيحة والمفيدة. يتمثل التحدي الرئيسي في اكتشاف المعلومات ذات الصلة والتحديث المستمر وإثراء ودمج المعرفة من مصادر مختلفة للبيانات المهيكلة وغير المهيكلة. تقدم هذه الورقة إطار عمل محرك التعلم من خلال الأنطولوجيات (LETO) ، وهي بنية للاكتشاف المستمر والمتزايد للمعرفة من مصادر متعددة للبيانات غير المنظمة والمنظمة. نحن نبرر قرار التصميم الرئيسي وراء بنية LETO ونقيم جدوى إطار العمل باستخدام Internet Movie Data Base (IMDB) و Twitter كتطبيق عملي.', 'es': 'La enorme cantidad de información multiformato disponible en la Web requiere el diseño de sistemas de software que aprovechen esta información para obtener conocimientos válidos y útiles. El principal desafío es descubrir información relevante y actualizar, enriquecer e integrar continuamente el conocimiento de diversas fuentes de datos estructurados y no estructurados. Este artículo presenta el marco Learning Engine Through Ontologies (LETO), una arquitectura para el descubrimiento continuo e incremental de conocimiento a partir de múltiples fuentes de datos estructurados y no estructurados. Justificamos la principal decisión de diseño detrás de la arquitectura de LETO y evaluamos la viabilidad del marco utilizando Internet Movie Data Base (IMDB) y Twitter como aplicación práctica.', 'fr': "L'énorme quantité d'informations multiformatées disponibles sur le Web nécessite la conception de systèmes logiciels qui exploitent ces informations pour obtenir des connaissances valables et utiles. Le principal défi consiste à découvrir des informations pertinentes et à mettre à jour, enrichir et intégrer en permanence les connaissances provenant de diverses sources de données structurées et non structurées. Cet article présente le cadre LETO (Learning Engine Through Ontologies), une architecture pour la découverte continue et incrémentielle de connaissances provenant de multiples sources de données structurées et non structurées. Nous justifions la principale décision de conception qui sous-tend l'architecture de LETO et évaluons la faisabilité du cadre en utilisant l'Internet Movie Data Base (IMDB) et Twitter comme application pratique.", 'pt': 'A enorme quantidade de informações multiformatadas disponíveis na Web exige o projeto de sistemas de software que aproveitem essas informações para obter conhecimento válido e útil. O principal desafio é descobrir informações relevantes e atualizar, enriquecer e integrar continuamente o conhecimento de várias fontes de dados estruturados e não estruturados. Este artigo apresenta o framework Learning Engine Through Ontology (LETO), uma arquitetura para a descoberta contínua e incremental de conhecimento de múltiplas fontes de dados estruturados e não estruturados. Justificamos a principal decisão de design por trás da arquitetura do LETO e avaliamos a viabilidade do framework usando o Internet Movie Data Base (IMDB) e o Twitter como aplicação prática.', 'ja': 'ウェブ上で利用可能な膨大な量のマルチフォーマット情報は、この情報を活用して有効で有用な知識を得るソフトウェアシステムの設計を必要とします。主な課題は、関連情報を発見し、構造化データと非構造化データのさまざまなソースからの知識を継続的に更新、充実、統合することです。この論文では、非構造化および構造化データの複数のソースから継続的かつ増分的に知識を発見するためのアーキテクチャである、オントロジーによる学習エンジン（ LETO ）フレームワークを紹介する。LETOのアーキテクチャの背後にある主要な設計決定を正当化し、インターネットムービーデータベース（ IMDB ）とTwitterを実用的なアプリケーションとして使用してフレームワークの実現可能性を評価します。', 'ru': 'Огромный объем многоформатной информации, имеющейся в Интернете, обусловливает необходимость разработки программных систем, которые используют эту информацию для получения достоверных и полезных знаний. Основная задача заключается в том, чтобы выявлять соответствующую информацию и постоянно обновлять, обогащать и интегрировать знания из различных источников структурированных и неструктурированных данных. В этой статье представлена структура механизма обучения через ОНТОЛОГИЮ (LETO), архитектура для непрерывного и постепенного обнаружения знаний из нескольких источников неструктурированных и структурированных данных. Мы обосновываем основное проектное решение, лежащее в основе архитектуры ЛЕТО, и оцениваем осуществимость фреймворка, используя базу данных Internet Movie Data Base(IMDb) и Twitter в качестве практического приложения.', 'zh': 'Web上可用者多格式信息使须设计软件系统,因此有效有用之知。 夫挑战者,见信也,不断更新富整合自结构化非结构化数据源也。 本文引本体(LETO)框架学引擎,盖出于数非结构化结构化数据源增量见知之架构。 吾证LETO架构背之要,而用互联网电影数据库(IMDB)Twitter以为实框架之可行性。', 'hi': 'वेब पर उपलब्ध बहु-स्वरूपित जानकारी की भारी मात्रा में सॉफ़्टवेयर सिस्टम के डिज़ाइन की आवश्यकता होती है जो मान्य और उपयोगी ज्ञान प्राप्त करने के लिए इस जानकारी का लाभ उठाते हैं। मुख्य चुनौती प्रासंगिक जानकारी की खोज करना और संरचित और असंरचित डेटा के विभिन्न स्रोतों से ज्ञान को लगातार अपडेट, समृद्ध और एकीकृत करना है। यह पेपर ऑन्टोलॉजी (एलईटीओ) फ्रेमवर्क के माध्यम से लर्निंग इंजन प्रस्तुत करता है, जो असंरचित और संरचित डेटा के कई स्रोतों से ज्ञान की निरंतर और वृद्धिशील खोज के लिए एक वास्तुकला है। हम LETO की वास्तुकला के पीछे मुख्य डिजाइन निर्णय को सही ठहराते हैं और इंटरनेट मूवी डेटा बेस (IMDB) और ट्विटर का उपयोग करके एक व्यावहारिक अनुप्रयोग के रूप में ढांचे की व्यवहार्यता का मूल्यांकन करते हैं।', 'ga': "Éilíonn an t-uafás faisnéise ilfhormáidithe atá ar fáil ar an nGréasán córais bogearraí a dhearadh a ghiarálann an fhaisnéis seo chun eolas a fháil atá bailí agus úsáideach. Is é an príomhdhúshlán faisnéis ábhartha a fháil agus eolas ó fhoinsí éagsúla sonraí struchtúrtha agus neamhstruchtúrtha a nuashonrú, a shaibhriú agus a chomhtháthú go leanúnach. Cuireann an páipéar seo an creat Inneall Foghlama Trí Ontologies (LETO) i láthair, ailtireacht le haghaidh fionnachtain leanúnach agus incriminteach eolais ó fhoinsí iolracha de shonraí struchtúrtha agus neamhstruchtúrtha. Déanaimid údar maith leis an bpríomhchinneadh dearaidh atá taobh thiar d'ailtireacht LETO agus déanaimid measúnú ar indéantacht an chreata trí úsáid a bhaint as an mBunachar Sonraí Scannáin Idirlín (IMDB) agus Twitter mar fheidhmchlár praiticiúil.", 'hu': 'Az interneten rendelkezésre álló többformázott információ hatalmas mennyisége szükségessé teszi olyan szoftverrendszerek kialakítását, amelyek ezt az információt kihasználják az érvényes és hasznos ismeretek megszerzéséhez. A legfontosabb kihívás a strukturált és strukturálatlan adatok különböző forrásaiból származó ismeretek folyamatos frissítése, gazdagítása és integrálása. A tanulmány bemutatja a Learning Engine Through Ontologies (LETO) keretrendszert, amely a strukturálatlan és strukturált adatok több forrásából származó tudás folyamatos és fokozatos felfedezésére szolgáló architektúra. A LETO architektúrája mögötti fő tervezési döntést indokoljuk, és gyakorlati alkalmazásként értékeljük a keretrendszer megvalósíthatóságát az Internet Movie Data Base (IMDB) és a Twitter segítségével.', 'el': 'Η τεράστια ποσότητα των πολυμορφοποιημένων πληροφοριών που διατίθενται στο διαδίκτυο απαιτεί τον σχεδιασμό συστημάτων λογισμικού που αξιοποιούν αυτές τις πληροφορίες για να αποκτήσουν γνώσεις που είναι έγκυρες και χρήσιμες. Η κύρια πρόκληση είναι η ανακάλυψη σχετικών πληροφοριών και η συνεχής ενημέρωση, ο εμπλουτισμός και η ενσωμάτωση γνώσεων από διάφορες πηγές δομημένων και μη δομημένων δεδομένων. Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει το πλαίσιο εκμάθησης μέσω οντολογίας (μια αρχιτεκτονική για τη συνεχή και αυξανόμενη ανακάλυψη γνώσης από πολλαπλές πηγές μη δομημένων και δομημένων δεδομένων. Δικαιολογούμε την κύρια σχεδιαστική απόφαση πίσω από την αρχιτεκτονική του και αξιολογούμε τη σκοπιμότητα του πλαισίου χρησιμοποιώντας τη βάση δεδομένων και το Twitter ως πρακτική εφαρμογή.', 'ka': 'მრავალფორმატიური ინფორმაციის მასი რაოდენობა, რომელიც სამყარო სტრუმენტის სისტემების განსაზღვრება, უნდა იყოს ამ ინფორმაციის განსაზღვრება, რომელიც მნიშვნელოვანია მნიშვნელოვანი გამოსახულება არის შესაბამისი ინფორმაცია და მუშაობელოვანი განახლება, ბედნიერება და ინტერგურაცია განსხვავებული და არსტრუქტურებული მონაცემების განსხვავ ეს დოკუმენტი აჩვენებს სწავლების მოწყობილობა Ontologies(LETO) ფრამიკუმენტით, არქტიქტიკუმენტური და კონფიმენტური მონაცემების მრავალური გამოიყენება, რომელიც არსებულიან და სტ ჩვენ განსაზღვრებით LETO-ის აქტიქტურაციის შემდეგ მნიშვნელოვანი განსაზღვრება და გამოყენებით ინტერნეტური ფილმიმური მონაცემების ბაზა (IMDB) და Twitter-ის პრაქტიკური პროგრამის შე', 'it': "L'enorme quantità di informazioni multi-formattate disponibili sul Web richiede la progettazione di sistemi software che sfruttano queste informazioni per ottenere conoscenze valide e utili. La sfida principale è quella di scoprire informazioni rilevanti e aggiornare, arricchire e integrare continuamente le conoscenze provenienti da varie fonti di dati strutturati e non strutturati. Questo articolo presenta il framework Learning Engine Through Ontologies (LETO), un'architettura per la scoperta continua e incrementale di conoscenze provenienti da molteplici fonti di dati non strutturati e strutturati. Giustifichiamo la principale decisione progettuale dietro l'architettura LETO e valutiamo la fattibilità del framework utilizzando l'Internet Movie Data Base (IMDB) e Twitter come applicazione pratica.", 'kk': 'Вебтегі қол жеткізетін көп пішімдегі мәліметтің маңызды саны дұрыс және пайдалы мәліметті алу үшін бағдарламалар жүйелерін құру керек. Негізгі мәселе - құрылған және құрылмаған деректер көзінен білімдерді жаңарту, бағалау және білімдерді біріктіру. Бұл қағаз онтологиялар (LETO) қоршауымен үйрену тетігін, бірнеше құрылмаған және құрылмаған деректердің білім көзінен білім табу архитектурасын көрсетеді. LETO архитектурасының артындағы негізгі дизайн шешімін жасап, Интернет фильм деректер негізінде (IMDB) және Твиттерді практикалық қолданбаны ретінде қолдану мүмкіндігін бағалаймыз.', 'ml': '@ info പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുകയും, തുടര്\u200dച്ചയായി പുതുക്കുകയും, സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്ത വി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന എഞ്ചിന്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dട്ടോളോജികള്\u200d (LETO) ഫ്രെയിമെക്കൂടി മുഴുവന്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട പല സ്രോതസ്സുകളി ലെട്ടോയുടെ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിന്റെ പിന്നിലുള്ള പ്രധാന ഡിസൈന്\u200d തീരുമാനം നമ്മള്\u200d ന്യായീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഇന്റര്\u200dനെറ്റ് സിനിമ ഡേറ്റാ ബേസ്സും', 'lt': 'Dėl didžiulio internete turimos daugiaformuotos informacijos reikia sukurti programinės įrangos sistemas, kurios sutelktų šią informaciją, kad būtų įgytos tinkamos ir naudingos žinios. Pagrindinis uždavinys – rasti atitinkamą informaciją ir nuolat atnaujinti, praturtinti ir integruoti įvairių struktūrizuotų ir nesustruktūrizuotų duomenų šaltinių žinias. Šiame dokumente pristatoma mokymosi variklio sistema (LETO), kuri yra nuolatinio ir laipsniško žinių iš įvairių nesustruktūruotų ir struktūruotų duomenų šaltinių atradimo architektūra. Mes pateisiname pagrindinį LETO architektūros projektavimo sprendimą ir vertiname sistemos įgyvendinamumą naudojant internetinę kino duomenų bazę (IMDB) ir Twitter kaip praktinę programą.', 'mk': 'Масивната количина мултиформатирани информации достапни на Интернет бара дизајн на софтверски системи кои ги користат овие информации за да се добие знаење кое е валидно и корисно. Главниот предизвик е откритието на релевантните информации и континуираното ажурирање, богатство и интеграција на знаењето од различни извори на структурирани и неструктурирани податоци. Овој весник го претставува Учествениот мотор преку онтологија (LETO), архитектура за континуирано и екстрементално откривање на знаење од повеќе извори на неструктурирани и структурирани податоци. Ја оправдуваме главната одлука за дизајн зад архитектурата на ЛЕТО и ја проценуваме физибилитетот на рамката користејќи ја Интернет филмската база (ИМДБ) и Твитер како практична апликација.', 'ms': 'Jumlah besar maklumat berbilang-format yang tersedia di Web memerlukan desain sistem perisian yang menggunakan maklumat ini untuk mendapatkan pengetahuan yang sah dan berguna. Tandakan utama adalah untuk menemukan maklumat berkaitan dan terus-menerus kemaskini, memperkaya dan integrasi pengetahuan dari berbagai sumber data struktur dan tidak struktur. Kertas ini memperkenalkan Enjin Belajar Melalui kerangka Ontologi (LETO), arsitektur untuk penemuan terus menerus dan bertambah-tambahan pengetahuan dari berbagai sumber data tidak terstruktur dan struktur. Kami membenarkan keputusan rancangan utama di belakang arkitektur LETO dan menilai kemudahan kerangka menggunakan Pangkalan Data Film Internet (IMDB) dan Twitter sebagai aplikasi praktik.', 'mn': 'Веб дээр олон хэлбэртэй олон хэлбэртэй мэдээллийн хэмжээ нь энэ мэдээллийг хэрэгжүүлэх болон ашигтай мэдээлэл гаргахад хэрэгтэй програм хангамжийн системийн загвар хэрэгтэй. Хамгийн гол сорилт нь хамааралтай мэдээллийг олох, үргэлж шинэчлэх, баян, бүтээгдэхүүн болон бүтээгдэхүүнгүй мэдээллийн эх үүсвэрээс мэдлэг бүрдүүлэх. Энэ цаас Ontologies(LETO) хэлбэрээр суралцах хөдөлгөөн, бүтээгдэхүүн болон бүтээгдэхүүний олон эх үүсвэрээс мэдлэгийг тогтмол болон нэмэгдүүлэх архитектурыг харуулдаг. Бид LETO-ын архитектурын ард гол дизайны шийдвэрийг баталж, интернет киноны өгөгдлийн сан (IMDB) болон Twitter-г практикийн хэрэглээ ашиглаж чадах боломжтойг үнэлэх болно.', 'no': 'Det massive mengda fleire formaterte informasjon som er tilgjengeleg på nettet treng utforming av programvare-systemar som leverer denne informasjonen for å få kjenning som er gyldig og nyttig. Den viktigste utfordringen er å oppdaga relevante informasjon og kontinuerleg oppdatera, rykka og integrera kunnskap frå ulike kjelde av strukturerte og ikkje strukturerte data. Denne papiret viser læringsmotoren gjennom ontologier (LETO) rammeverket, eit arkitektur for den kontinuerlege og økende oppdaginga av kunnskapen frå fleire kjelde av ukrastrukte og strukturerte data. Vi justerer hovudutviklinga bak LETO- arkitekturen og evaluerer feiligheten til rammeverket med Internett- filmdatabasen (IMDB) og Twitter som praktisk program.', 'pl': 'Ogromna ilość wieloformatowanych informacji dostępnych w sieci Web wymaga projektowania systemów oprogramowania, które wykorzystują te informacje do uzyskania wiedzy, która jest ważna i użyteczna. Głównym wyzwaniem jest odkrywanie istotnych informacji oraz ciągłe aktualizowanie, wzbogacanie i integracja wiedzy z różnych źródeł danych ustrukturyzowanych i nieustrukturyzowanych. W artykule przedstawiono framework Learning Engine Through Ontologies (LETO), architekturę ciągłego i przyrostowego odkrywania wiedzy z wielu źródeł nieustrukturyzowanych i ustrukturyzowanych danych. Uzasadniamy główną decyzję projektową stojącą za architekturą LETO i oceniamy wykonalność frameworka wykorzystując Internet Movie Database (IMDB) oraz Twitter jako praktyczną aplikację.', 'ro': 'Cantitatea masivă de informații multi-formatate disponibile pe Web necesită proiectarea de sisteme software care valorifică aceste informații pentru a obține cunoștințe valide și utile. Principala provocare constă în descoperirea informațiilor relevante și actualizarea, îmbogățirea și integrarea continuă a cunoștințelor din diferite surse de date structurate și nestructurate. Lucrarea prezintă cadrul Learning Engine Through Ontologies (LETO), o arhitectură pentru descoperirea continuă și incrementală a cunoștințelor din surse multiple de date nestructurate și structurate. Justificăm principala decizie de proiectare din spatele arhitecturii LETO și evaluăm fezabilitatea cadrului folosind baza de date Internet Movie (IMDB) și Twitter ca aplicație practică.', 'so': "Meel badan oo macluumaad badan oo ku saabsan shabakada internetka ah waxaa u baahan in loo sameeyo qorshaha isbitaalka software oo u soo bandhigo macluumaadkan si uu u helo aqoonta uu shaqeynayo oo faa’iido leh. Caqabadaha muhiimka ah waa in la ogaado macluumaadka la xiriira oo la sii kordhiyo, hodangeliyo iyo la wada qabsasho aqoonta laga helo sourceoyin kala duduwan oo la dhisay iyo la dhisay. Kanu wuxuu qoraalka ka muujiyaa mashiinka wax barashada, kaas oo ah dhismo u sawiraya aqoonta sii-socota iyo sii-socota ah oo laga helaa sourceoyin badan oo aan la dhisay iyo la dhisay. Waxaannu xaq u yeelanaynaa go'aanka ugu horeeya ee ku qoran xarunta LETO kadibna waxaynu qiimeynaynaa awoodda uu ku isticmaalo shabakadda filimada (IMDB) iyo Twitter sida codsi caadiga ah.", 'sr': 'Velika količina višeformatiranih informacija dostupnih na Internetu potrebna je dizajn softvera koji utiču na ovu informaciju kako bi dobili znanje koje je vrijedno i korisno. Glavni izazov je otkriti relevantne informacije i stalno aktualizirati, obogatiti i integrirati znanje iz različitih izvora strukturiranih i neostrukturiranih podataka. Ovaj papir predstavlja učenje motora kroz okvir ontologija (LETO), arhitektura za kontinuirano i incrementalno otkriće znanja iz višestrukih izvora neostrukturnih i strukturiranih podataka. Mi opravdavamo glavnu odluku o dizajnu iza arhitekture LETO-a i procjenjujemo mogućnost okvira koristeći internetsku bazu filmskih podataka (IMDB) i Twitter kao praktičnu aplikaciju.', 'si': 'වෙබ් එකේ ලොකු විශාල ප්\u200dරමාණ තොරතුරු ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා මේ තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ලැබෙන්න සඳහ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු හොයාගන්න, සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් අවස්ථාවය, සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ස මේ පත්තේ ඉගෙනගන්න ඉන්න එන්ජින් පෙන්වනවා ඔන්ටෝලෝජිස් වලින් (LETO) ක්\u200dරියාමක් වලින්, නිර්මාණය සහ නිර්මාණය කරපු දත්ත වලි අපි LETO ගේ ස්ථාපනයේ පස්සේ ප්\u200dරධාන වින්යාසයේ තීරණය සහ ප්\u200dරධාන වින්යාසය සඳහා ඉන්තර්නේට් චිත්\u200dරපණ දත්ත බේස් (IMDB) සහ ට්', 'sv': 'Den massiva mängden flerformaterad information som finns tillgänglig på webben kräver design av mjukvarusystem som utnyttjar denna information för att få kunskap som är giltig och användbar. Den största utmaningen är att upptäcka relevant information och kontinuerligt uppdatera, berika och integrera kunskap från olika källor av strukturerad och ostrukturerad data. Denna uppsats presenterar ramverket Learning Engine Through Ontologies (LETO), en arkitektur för kontinuerlig och inkrementell upptäckt av kunskap från flera källor till ostrukturerad och strukturerad data. Vi motiverar huvudbeslutet bakom LETO:s arkitektur och utvärderar ramverkets genomförbarhet med hjälp av Internet Movie Data Base (IMDB) och Twitter som praktisk tillämpning.', 'ta': 'வலையமைப்பில் கிடைக்கும் பல வடிவமைப்பு தகவல்களின் பெரிய அளவு மென்பொருள் அமைப்புகளின் வடிவமைப்பு தேவைப்படுகிறது, அது செல்லும் பயனுள்ளத முக்கிய சவால் தொடர்புடைய தகவலை கண்டுபிடிக்கவும், தொடர்ந்து புதுப்பிக்கவும், உருவாக்கப்பட்ட மற்றும் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் ம இந்த காகிதத்தின் படிப்பு இயந்திரம் இணைய நிரல்கள் மூலமாக, தொடர்ந்து மற்றும் அதிகமாக அறிவு கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்ட பல மூலங்களிலிருந்து உள்ளமைக்கப்பட்ட மற்ற நாம் LETO உருவாக்கத்திற்கு பின்னால் முக்கிய வடிவமைப்பு தீர்வு நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் இணைய படத்தின் தகவல் தளத்தை பயன்படுத்தி சட்டத்தின', 'mt': 'The massive amount of multi-formatted information available on the Web necessitates the design of software systems that leverage this information to obtain knowledge that is valid and useful.  L-isfida ewlenija hija l-iskoperta ta’ informazzjoni rilevanti u l-aġġornament kontinwu, l-arrikkiment u l-integrazzjoni tal-għarfien minn diversi sorsi ta’ dejta strutturata u mhux strutturata. This paper presents the Learning Engine Through Ontologies(LETO) framework, an architecture for the continuous and incremental discovery of knowledge from multiple sources of unstructured and structured data.  Aħna niġġustifikaw id-deċiżjoni ewlenija tad-disinn wara l-arkitettura tal-LETO u nivvalutaw il-fattibbiltà tal-qafas bl-użu tal-Bażi tad-Dejta tal-Internet Movie (IMDB) u Twitter bħala applikazzjoni prattika.', 'ur': 'ویب پر موجود بہت سی فرموٹی معلومات کی زیادہ مقدار ہے جو سوفٹر سیستموں کی طراحی کی ضرورت ہے جو اس معلومات کو معلومات حاصل کرنے کے لئے مطابق اور مفید معلومات حاصل کرنے کے لئے لازم ہے. اصلی چال یہ ہے کہ معاملہ معلومات تلاش کرنا اور ہمیشہ اضافہ کرنا، ثروت اور علم کو مختلف ساختہ اور غیرساختہ ڈیٹا کے منبع سے متفرق کرنا ہے. یہ کاغذ اُنٹلولوژی(LETO) کے ذریعہ سے سیکھنے کا انجین پیش کرتا ہے، ایک معماری ہے جو ہمیشہ اور زیادہ اضافہ کے علم کی تعلیم کی مختلف منبع سے بصنعت اور ساختہ ڈیٹا کے لئے ہے. ہم نے LETO کی معماری کے پیچھے مولی طراحی کا فیصلہ ثابت قدم رکھا ہے اور انٹرنیٹ فلم ڈیٹ بیس (IMDB) اور ٹویٹر کو عمدہ کاربرد کے طور پر استعمال کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "@ info The main challenge is to discover relevant information and continuously update, enrich and integrate knowledge from various sources of structured and unstructured data.  Bu qogʻoz, Ontologiya (LETO) freymi orqali o'rganish mashinasi, ko'pchilik va yaratilgan maʼlumot bir necha manbalardan foydalanish uchun arxituvchi. Biz LETO'ning architektorlarining asosiy dizayning muammolarini amalga oshirimiz va Internetning Film Data Base (IMDB) va Twitter bilan foydalanish imkoniyatini qiymatimiz.", 'vi': 'Một lượng lớn các thông tin đa dạng có sẵn trên web đòi hỏi thiết kế các hệ thống phần mềm có thể sử dụng thông tin này để đạt được những kiến thức có giá trị và hữu ích. Vấn đề chính là tìm kiếm thông tin liên quan và liên tục cập nhật, cải thiện và hòa nhập kiến từ các nguồn cung cấp dữ liệu cấu trúc và không xây dựng. Tờ giấy này giới thiệu cơ khí Học Thừa Trực Tiến, một kiến trúc cho việc phát hiện kiến thức liên tục và tăng dần từ nhiều nguồn cung cấp dữ liệu không xây dựng và cơ cấu trúc. Chúng tôi biện minh cho quyết định thiết kế chính đằng sau kiến trúc của LETO và đánh giá khả năng của bộ khung s ử dụng thông tin điện ảnh trên mạng (trang mạng) và Twitter như một ứng dụng thực tế.', 'bg': 'Огромното количество многоформатна информация, налична в интернет, налага проектирането на софтуерни системи, които използват тази информация, за да получат валидни и полезни знания. Основното предизвикателство е откриването на съответна информация и непрекъснатото актуализиране, обогатяване и интегриране на знания от различни източници на структурирани и неструктурирани данни. Настоящата статия представя рамката на Учебния механизъм чрез Онтологии (архитектура за непрекъснато и постепенно откриване на знания от множество източници на неструктурирани и структурирани данни. Ние оправдаваме основното решение за проектиране зад архитектурата на ЛЕТО и оценяваме осъществимостта на рамката, като използваме интернет филмовата база данни и Туитър като практическо приложение.', 'hr': 'Velika količina višeformatiranih informacija dostupnih na internetu potrebna je dizajniranje softvera sustava koji utječu na te informacije kako bi dobili znanje koje je vrijedno i korisno. Glavni izazov je otkriti relevantne informacije i stalno aktualizirati, obogatiti i integrirati znanje iz različitih izvora strukturnih i neostrukturnih podataka. Ovaj papir predstavlja učenje motora kroz okvir Ontologija (LETO), arhitekturu za kontinuirano i povećavajuće otkriće znanja iz višestrukih izvora neostrukturnih i strukturiranih podataka. Mi opravdavamo glavnu odluku o dizajnu iza arhitekture LETO-a i procjenjujemo mogućnost okvira koristeći internetsku bazu filmskih podataka (IMDB) i Twitter kao praktičnu aplikaciju.', 'da': "Den massive mængde multi-formaterede information tilgængelig på internettet kræver design af softwaresystemer, der udnytter disse oplysninger til at opnå viden, der er gyldig og nyttig. Den største udfordring er at opdage relevant information og løbende opdatere, berige og integrere viden fra forskellige kilder til strukturerede og ustrukturerede data. Denne artikel præsenterer Learning Engine Through Ontologies (LETO), en arkitektur til kontinuerlig og inkrementel opdagelse af viden fra flere kilder til ustrukturerede og strukturerede data. Vi retfærdiggør den vigtigste designbeslutning bag LETO's arkitektur og vurderer rammernes gennemførlighed ved hjælp af Internet Movie Data Base (IMDB) og Twitter som en praktisk applikation.", 'nl': "De enorme hoeveelheid multi-geformatteerde informatie beschikbaar op het web vereist het ontwerp van softwaresystemen die deze informatie gebruiken om kennis te verkrijgen die geldig en nuttig is. De belangrijkste uitdaging is om relevante informatie te ontdekken en kennis uit verschillende bronnen van gestructureerde en ongestructureerde data continu bij te werken, te verrijken en te integreren. Deze paper presenteert het Learning Engine Through Ontologies (LETO) framework, een architectuur voor de continue en incrementele ontdekking van kennis uit meerdere bronnen van ongestructureerde en gestructureerde data. We rechtvaardigen de belangrijkste ontwerpbeslissing achter LETO's architectuur en evalueren de haalbaarheid van het framework met behulp van de Internet Movie Database (IMDB) en Twitter als praktische toepassing.", 'de': 'Die enorme Menge an multi-formatierten Informationen, die im Web verfügbar sind, erfordert das Design von Softwaresystemen, die diese Informationen nutzen, um valides und nützliches Wissen zu erhalten. Die größte Herausforderung besteht darin, relevante Informationen zu entdecken und Wissen aus verschiedenen Quellen strukturierter und unstrukturierter Daten kontinuierlich zu aktualisieren, anzureichern und zu integrieren. Dieser Beitrag stellt das Learning Engine Through Ontologies (LETO) Framework vor, eine Architektur für die kontinuierliche und inkrementelle Entdeckung von Wissen aus mehreren Quellen unstrukturierter und strukturierter Daten. Wir begründen die wesentliche Designentscheidung hinter der LETO-Architektur und bewerten die Machbarkeit des Frameworks anhand der Internet Movie Database (IMDB) und Twitter als praktische Anwendung.', 'id': 'Jumlah besar informasi multiformat yang tersedia di Web membutuhkan desain sistem perangkat lunak yang menggunakan informasi ini untuk mendapatkan pengetahuan yang valid dan berguna. Tantangan utama adalah menemukan informasi relevan dan terus-menerus memperkemaskini, memperkaya dan mengintegrasikan pengetahuan dari berbagai sumber data strukturasi dan tidak strukturasi. Kertas ini mempersembahkan Mesin Belajar melalui rangkaian Ontologi (LETO), arsitektur untuk penemuan terus menerus dan incremental pengetahuan dari berbagai sumber data yang tidak terstrukturasi dan strukturasi. Kami membenarkan keputusan desain utama di balik arsitektur LETO dan mengevaluasi feasibilitas kerangka menggunakan Internet Movie Data Base (IMDB) dan Twitter sebagai aplikasi praktis.', 'fa': 'مقدار بزرگی از اطلاعات چندین فرمود موجود در وب نیاز دارد طراحی سیستم\u200cهای نرم\u200cافزار که این اطلاعات را برای دریافت دانشی که قابل و مفید است به ارائه می\u200cدهد. چالش اصلی اینه که اطلاعات مربوط به کشف رسیدن و همیشه روزگاری کردن، ثروتمندی و جمع علم از منبع مختلف داده های ساخته و ساخته نشده است. این کاغذ موتور یادگیری را از طریق چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار ما تصمیم اصلی طراحی پشت معماری LETO را درست می\u200cکنیم و با استفاده از بنیاد داده\u200cهای فیلم\u200cهای اینترنت (IMDB) و توئیتر به عنوان یک کاربرد عملی ارزش می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'Kiwango kikubwa cha taarifa zinazopatikana katika mtandao wa intaneti kinahitaji ubunifu wa mfumo wa programu unaotumia taarifa hizi ili kupata taarifa ambayo ina sahihi na yenye manufaa. Changamoto kuu ni kugundua taarifa zinazohusiana na kupata taarifa, kutajirisha na kuunganisha maarifa kutoka vyanzo mbalimbali vya ujenzi na zilizojengwa. This paper presents the Learning Engine Through Ontologies(LETO) framework, an architecture for the continuous and incremental discovery of knowledge from multiple sources of unstructured and structured data.  Tunafanya uamuzi mkuu wa ubunifu nyuma ya ujenzi wa LETO na kutathmini uwezekano wa mradi huo kwa kutumia msingi wa filamu za mtandao wa intaneti (IMDB) na Twita kama matumizi ya uhalisia.', 'ko': '인터넷에는 다양한 형식의 정보가 대량으로 존재하기 때문에 소프트웨어 시스템을 설계하여 이러한 정보를 이용하여 효과적이고 유용한 지식을 얻어야 한다.주요 도전은 관련 정보를 발견하고 각종 구조화와 비구조화된 데이터 원천에서 나온 지식을 끊임없이 갱신하고 풍부하게 통합하는 것이다.본고는 본체 학습 엔진(LETO) 구조를 소개했는데 이것은 여러 개의 비구조화와 구조화된 데이터 원본에서 지식을 연속하고 증량적으로 발견하는 체계 구조이다.우리는 인터넷 영화 데이터베이스(IMDB)와 트위터를 실제 응용으로 하여 러시망 구조 배후의 주요 디자인 결정을 검증하고 이 구조의 타당성을 평가했다.', 'tr': "Web üzerinde elýeterli köp formatly maglumatlar üçin bu maglumaty ýetirmek üçin meňzeş we faydaly bilgi almak üçin saýlaw sistemlerinin düzenlemesi gerek. Esasy kynçylyk şudyr möhüm maglumatlary tapmak we daşary täzeden güncelleştirmek, dürli strukturylmadyk we strukturylmadyk maglumatlaryň bilgilerini baglaşdyrmak we çykarmak. Bu kagyz Ontologi(LETO) çerçevesinden öwrenmek Motoryny, strukturulmadyk we strukturmadyk maglumatyň birnäçe çeşmelerinden bilgi tapmaklygy üçin arhitektura ýazylýar. LETO arhitekteginiň arkasynda esasy tasarlama kararyny çözdirip, we internet Film Maglumaty Basesyny(IMDB) we Twitter'i praktik bir uygulama hökmünde çözdirip barýarys.", 'sq': 'Shumica masive e informacionit të shumëformatuar në dispozicion në internet kërkon dizajnin e sistemeve programike që përdorin këtë informacion për të marrë njohuri të vlefshme dhe të dobishme. Sfida kryesore është zbulimi i informacionit të rëndësishëm dhe përditësimi i vazhdueshëm, pasurimi dhe integrimi i njohurive nga burime të ndryshme të të dhënave të strukturuara dhe të pastrukturuara. This paper presents the Learning Engine Through Ontologies(LETO) framework, an architecture for the continuous and incremental discovery of knowledge from multiple sources of unstructured and structured data.  Ne justifikojmë vendimin kryesor të dizajnit prapa arkitekturës s ë LETO dhe vlerësojmë realizueshmërinë e kuadrit duke përdorur Bazën e të dhënave të filmit të internetit (IMDB) dhe Twitter si një aplikim praktik.', 'af': "Die groot hoeveelheid multiformeerde inligting beskikbaar op die Web benodig die ontwerp van sagteware stelsels wat hierdie inligting verwyder om kennis te kry wat geldig en nuttig is. Die hoof uitdaging is om relevante inligting te ontdek en voortdurende opdateer, ryk en integreer kennis van verskeie bronne van struktureerde en onstruktureerde data te vind. Hierdie papier beveel die Leer Masjien deur Ontologies(LETO) raamwerk, 'n Arkitektuur vir die voortdurende en inkremensiele ontdekking van kennis van veelvuldige bronne van onstruktureerde en struktureerde data. Ons regverdig die hoof ontwerp besluit agter LETO se arkitektuur en evalueer die raamwerk se feasibiliteit met die gebruik van die Internet Film Data Base (IMDB) en Twitter a s 'n praktiese toepassing.", 'am': "የበይነመረብ ላይ የተገኘው የበዛ የፎርማት መረጃዎች የሶፍትዌር ሲስተም ማቀናጃ ያስፈልጋል፤ ይህ መረጃ እውነተኛ እና የተጠቃሚ እውቀትን ለማግኘት ያስፈልጋል። የዋነቱ ግንኙነት የግንኙነት መረጃዎችን ማግኘት እና ሁል ጊዜ ማሻሻል፣ እውቀትን ለመጠቀም እና ማጠቃቀል ነው፡፡ ይህ ፕሮግራም በኦንተሎጂዎች (LETO) ፍሬማት የተማሪን የኢንተርኢንጂን፣ የዘወትር እና የበዛ እውቀትን ለማግኘት የመሠረተ መሠረት ነው፡፡ We justify the main design decision behind LETO's architecture and evaluate the framework's feasibility using the Internet Movie Data Base(IMDB) and Twitter as a practical application.", 'hy': 'Համացանցում հասանելի բազմաձևավորված տեղեկատվության հսկայական քանակը պահանջում է ծրագրային համակարգերի դիզայնը, որոնք օգտագործում են այս տեղեկատվությունը, որպեսզի ստանան ճշգրիտ և օգտակար գիտելիք: Հիմնական մարտահրավերը կայանում է նշանակալի տեղեկատվություն հայտնաբերելու և անընդհատ վերականգնելու, հարստացնելու և ինտեգրելու գիտելիքները տարբեր կառուցվածքավորված և անկառուցվածքավորված տվյալների աղբյուրն Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է սովորելու շարժիչը Օնտելոգիայի (LEto) միջոցով, ճարտարապետություն անընդհատ և անընդհատ հայտնաբերելու համար անկառուցված և կառուցվածված տվյալների բազմաթիվ աղբյուրներից: Մենք արդարացնում ենք LETo-ի ճարտարապետության հիմնական դիզայնի որոշումը և գնահատում ենք շրջանակի իրականացվությունը օգտագործելով ինտերնետային ֆիլմի տվյալների հիմքը (ԻՄԴԲ) և Թվիթերը որպես գործնական ծրագիր:', 'bn': 'ওয়েবের ব্যাপক তথ্যের পরিমাণ বিশাল তথ্য পাওয়া যাচ্ছে যা সফটওয়্যার সিস্টেমের ডিজাইন প্রয়োজন যা এই তথ্য প্রদান করে যাতে জ্ঞান পাওয়া যা প্রধান চ্যালেঞ্জ হচ্ছে সংশ্লিষ্ট তথ্য আবিষ্কার এবং ক্রমাগত আপডেট, সমৃদ্ধ এবং জ্ঞান একত্রিত করার জন্য বিভিন্ন কাঠামো এবং আ This paper presents the Learning Engine Through Ontologies(LETO) framework, an architecture for the continuous and incremental discovery of knowledge from multiple sources of unstructured and structured data.  আমরা লেটোর আর্কিটেক্টারের পেছনে প্রধান ডিজাইনের সিদ্ধান্ত ন্যায়বিচার এবং ইন্টারনেট চলচ্চিত্র ডেটা বেস (আইএমডিবি) এবং টুইটারের ব্যবহার কর', 'az': "İnternettə faydalanmış çoxlu formatlı məlumatların böyük miktarı bu məlumatları mümkün və faydalı bilgi almaq üçün sağlayan proqramlı sistemlərin tasarımı lazımdır. Ən böyük çətinlik məlumatı müxtəlif məlumatı keşf etmək və həmişə yenilənmək, müxtəlif quruluş və müəyyən edilməmiş məlumatın mənbələrindən bilikləri zəngindirməkdir. Bu kağıt Ontologiya(LETO) çerçevesi ilə öyrənmə motorunu göstərir, müəyyən və artırmaq məlumatların çoxlu mənbələrindən elmi keşfetməsi üçün bir arhitektir. Biz LETO'nin arhitektürünün arxasınlığının əs a s tasarımını təsdiqləyirik və internet Film Data Base (IMDB) və Twitter'i praktik bir uyğulama olaraq istifadə edirik.", 'cs': 'Obrovské množství víceformátovaných informací dostupných na webu vyžaduje návrh softwarových systémů, které tyto informace využívají k získání platných a užitečných znalostí. Hlavní výzvou je objevovat relevantní informace a průběžně aktualizovat, obohacovat a integrovat znalosti z různých zdrojů strukturovaných a nestrukturovaných dat. Tento článek představuje rámec Learning Engine Through Ontologies (LETO), architekturu pro kontinuální a inkrementální objevování znalostí z více zdrojů nestrukturovaných a strukturovaných dat. Odůvodníme hlavní konstrukční rozhodnutí architektury LETO a hodnotíme proveditelnost rámce pomocí Internet Movie Database (IMDB) a Twitteru jako praktické aplikace.', 'bs': 'Velika količina višeformatiranih informacija koje su dostupne na internetu potrebna je dizajn softvera koji utiču na ovu informaciju kako bi dobili znanje koje je vrijedno i korisno. Glavni izazov je otkriti relevantne informacije i stalno aktualizirati, obogatiti i integrirati znanje iz različitih izvora strukturiranih i neostrukturiranih podataka. Ovaj papir predstavlja učenje motora kroz okvir Ontologija (LETO), arhitektura za kontinuirano i incrementalno otkriće znanja iz višestrukih izvora neostrukturnih i strukturiranih podataka. Mi opravdavamo glavnu odluku o dizajnu iza arhitekture LETO-a i procjenjujemo mogućnost okvira koristeći bazu interneta filmskih podataka (IMDB) i Twitter kao praktičnu aplikaciju.', 'et': 'Veebis saadaval oleva mitmevormindatud teabe tohutu hulk nõuab tarkvarasüsteemide projekteerimist, mis kasutavad seda teavet, et saada õigeid ja kasulikke teadmisi. Peamine väljakutse on leida asjakohast teavet ning pidevalt ajakohastada, rikastada ja integreerida teadmisi erinevatest struktureeritud ja struktureerimata andmete allikatest. Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse õppemootorit Ontoloogiate kaudu (LETO) raamistikku, mis on struktureerimata ja struktureerimata andmete mitmest allikast pärit teadmiste pidevaks ja järkjärguliseks avastamiseks. Põhjendame LETO arhitektuuri peamist projekteerimisotsust ja hindame raamistiku teostatavust, kasutades praktilise rakendusena interneti filmide andmebaasi (IMDB) ja Twitterit.', 'fi': 'Monimuotoisen tiedon valtava määrä verkossa edellyttää sellaisten ohjelmistojärjestelmien suunnittelua, jotka hyödyntävät tätä tietoa saadakseen pätevää ja hyödyllistä tietoa. Tärkeimpänä haasteena on löytää relevanttia tietoa ja jatkuvasti päivittää, rikastuttaa ja integroida tietoa erilaisista strukturoiduista ja strukturoimattomista tietolähteistä. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään Learning Engine Through Ontologies (LETO) -viitekehys, arkkitehtuuri tiedon jatkuvaan ja asteittaiseen löytämiseen useista strukturoimattoman ja strukturoimattoman tiedon lähteistä. Perustelemme LETO:n arkkitehtuurin taustalla olevan pääsuunnittelupäätöksen ja arvioimme kehyksen toteutettavuutta käyttämällä IMDB:n (Internet Movie Data Base) ja Twitteriä käytännön sovelluksena.', 'ca': "La quantitat massiva de informació multiformatada disponible a la Web necessita el disseny de sistemes de software que utilitzen aquesta informació per obtenir coneixements válids i útils. The main challenge is to discover relevant information and continuously update, enrich and integrate knowledge from various sources of structured and unstructured data.  This paper presents the Learning Engine Through Ontologies(LETO) framework, an architecture for the continuous and incremental discovery of knowledge from multiple sources of unstructured and structured data.  We justify the main design decision behind LETO's architecture and evaluate the framework's feasibility using the Internet Movie Data Base(IMDB) and Twitter as a practical application.", 'jv': 'Tanggang akeh akeh akeh informasi sing dibutungan ning web kudu seneng nggawe sistem sing software sing diranggawe informasi iki kanggo awak dhéwé sing apik dhéwé, sing apik dhéwé. Aswi sing dipun ngomong nik kuwi ngdago informasi sing bebas lan ngulinakake atualizasi, ngregah lan entekake ulêng-ingkang sampeyan pakan dengan data sak nguasai sak-sampeyan. Gambar iki bakal mudheng kelas Learning engines ning sampeyan Ontolog(Leto), aketura kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan karo akeh dumadhi lan ijol-ijolan ingkang dipuangkapan kelas nang sampeyan sampek sak sebera sak data sing bisa nguasai. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno perusahaan nggawe sawar nggawe architecture sing nggawe nyebute kanggo nggawe barang kanggo ngilangno Internet Film data basa (SMDB) lan Google nganggo aplikasi pratiki.', 'he': 'כמות מסיבית של מידע מורכב זמין באינטרנט דורשת עיצוב מערכות תוכנה שמשתמשים במידע הזה כדי להשיג ידע שקיים וימושי. האתגר העיקרי הוא לגלות מידע רלוונטי וממשיך לעדכן, לעשיר ולהשתלב ידע ממקורים שונים של מידע מבוסס ולא מבוסס. This paper presents the Learning Engine Through Ontologies(LETO) framework, an architecture for the continuous and incremental discovery of knowledge from multiple sources of unstructured and structured data.  אנו מצדיקים את החלטת העיצוב העיקרית מאחורי הארכיטקטורה של LETO ולעריך את האפשרות של המסגרת באמצעות בסיס נתוני הסרט האינטרנט (IMDB) וטוויטר כתכנית מעשית.', 'ha': "Kidã yawan information wanda ke iya amfani da multi-formated kan Web, na ƙayyade tsarin shiryoyin ayukan kwamfyutan tebur wanda ke ƙara wa wannan maɓalli dõmin ya sami ilmi wanda ya inganci kuma yana da amfani. Kikacin bayani na gane information masu hushi na daidai, za'a rikitar da kuma a haɗe ilmi daga manyan sources masu da aka gina da shi. Wannan karatun na gaya Maintainer Mai Learni Gani da aka iya samar da Ontoogies (LETO), wani arziki na iya ƙara gane zane daga manyan sources masu da ba'asar da aka saje. Tuna justifiɗa umarni bakin layin LETO da kuma Mu ƙaddara abincin firam da ke amfani da Intanet Data Base (IMDB) da Twitter kamar wata applet mai gaskatãwa.", 'sk': 'Velika količina večformatiranih informacij, ki so na voljo na spletu, zahteva oblikovanje programskih sistemov, ki izkoriščajo te informacije za pridobivanje veljavnega in uporabnega znanja. Glavni izziv je odkrivanje relevantnih informacij ter nenehno posodabljanje, obogatitev in integriranje znanja iz različnih virov strukturiranih in nestrukturiranih podatkov. V prispevku je predstavljen okvir Learning Engine Through Ontologies (LETO), arhitektura za stalno in postopno odkrivanje znanja iz več virov nestrukturiranih in strukturiranih podatkov. Opravičujemo glavno oblikovalsko odločitev za LETO arhitekturo in ocenimo izvedljivost okvira z uporabo internetne zbirke podatkov o filmih (IMDB) in Twitterja kot praktične aplikacije.', 'bo': "The massive amount of multi-formated information available on the Web requires the design of the software systems that leverage this information to get knowledge that is valid and useful. རྩ་བའི་གདོང་ལེན་དགོས་དེ་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་དང་འཕྲོ་མཐུད་ཡོད་ཚད་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་། རྒྱལ་སྐྱོར་དང་དབྱིབས This paper presents the Learning Engine Through Ontologies(LETO) framework, an architecture for the continuous and incremental discovery of knowledge from multiple sources of unstructured and structured data. We justify the main design decision behind LETO's architecture and evaluate the framework's feasibility using the Internet Movie Data Base(IMDB) and Twitter as a practical application."}
{'en': 'Sentence Simplification for Semantic Role Labelling and Information Extraction', 'ar': 'تبسيط الجملة لوصف الدور الدلالي واستخراج المعلومات', 'fr': "Simplification des phrases pour l'étiquetage sémantique des rôles et l'extraction", 'pt': 'Simplificação de frases para rotulagem de papéis semânticos e extração de informações', 'es': 'Simplificación de oraciones para el etiquetado semántico de roles y la extracción de información', 'ru': 'Упрощение предложения для семантической маркировки ролей и извлечения информации', 'ja': 'セマンティックロールラベルと情報抽出の文の簡略化', 'zh': '语义角色标签及信息提取句简化', 'ga': 'Pianbhreith a Shimpliú le haghaidh Lipéadú Róil Shéimeantach agus Eastóscadh Faisnéise', 'hi': 'शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलिंग और जानकारी निष्कर्षण के लिए वाक्य सरलीकरण', 'hu': 'mondat egyszerűsítése a szemantikus szerepkörök címkézéséhez és az információk kivonásához', 'el': 'Απλοποίηση φράσεων για την επισήμανση σημασιολογικών ρόλων και την εξαγωγή πληροφοριών', 'it': "Semplificazione delle frasi per l'etichettatura semantica dei ruoli e l'estrazione delle informazioni", 'lt': 'Semantinio vaidmens ženklinimo ir informacijos gavimo bausmės supaprastinimas', 'kk': 'Semantic Role Labelling мен Information Extraction үшін сөзді қарапайым', 'mk': 'Едноставување на речениците за семантичко означување на улогата и екстракција на информации', 'ms': 'Permudahan perkataan untuk Label Rol Semantik dan Ekstraksi Maklumat', 'ka': 'Semantic Role Labelling და Information Extraction', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് റോള്\u200d ലാബെലിങ്ങും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനും ശിക്ഷ ലളിതമാക്കുക', 'mt': 'Simplifikazzjoni tas-Sentenza għat-Tikkettar tar-Rwol Semantiku u l-Estrazzjoni tal-Informazzjoni', 'mn': 'Semantic Role Labelling, Information Extraction үгнэлтийн хялбарчлал', 'no': 'Uttrykk for semiantisk roletiketting og utpakking av informasjon', 'pl': 'Uproszczenie zdania dla oznaczania roli semantycznej i ekstrakcji informacji', 'ro': 'Simplificarea sentinței pentru etichetarea rolurilor semantice și extragerea informațiilor', 'sr': 'Jednostavno rečenje za semantičku oznake uloge i izvlačenje informacija', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් භාවිතාවක් ලේබෙලින් සහ තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය සඳහා වාර්තාව', 'so': 'Ku fududdeynta daryeelka galmada iyo ka bixinta macluumaadka', 'sv': 'Förenkling av meningar för semantisk rollmärkning och informationsutvinning', 'ta': 'Sentence Simplification for Semantic Role Labelling and Information Extraction', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی رول لابلینگ اور معلومات اخراج کے لئے سنت سادگی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đơn giản hóa câu thần chú cho hiệu chỉnh và chiết xuất thông tin', 'bg': 'Опростяване на изреченията за етикетиране на семантична роля и извличане на информация', 'hr': 'Jednostavno kazne za snimanje semantičke uloge i izvlačenje informacija', 'da': 'Forenkling af sætninger for semantisk rollemærkning og informationsudvinding', 'nl': 'Vereenvoudiging van zin voor semantische roletikettering en informatieextractie', 'de': 'Satzvereinfachung für semantische Rollenkennzeichnung und Informationsextraktion', 'fa': 'ساده\u200cسازی کلمه برای برچسب نقش\u200cهای سیمانتی و اخراج اطلاعات', 'id': 'Simplifikasi Perkataan untuk Label Rol Semantik dan Ekstraksi Informasi', 'ko': '의미 역할 표시와 정보 추출의 문장 간소화', 'sw': 'Hukumu rahisi kwa Msingi wa Semantic Role na Utoa wa Habari', 'af': 'Uitdrukking Vereenvoudiging vir Semantiese rol etiket en informasie uitpakking', 'tr': 'Semantik Rol Etiketleme we Maglumat Açmak üçin sözleri Basitlendirmek', 'sq': 'Simplifikimi i dënimit për etiketën e rolit Semantik dhe nxjerrjen e informacionit', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'সেম্যান্টিক রোল ল লেবেলিং এবং তথ্য বিক্রেতার জন্য সাধারণ শাস্তি', 'az': 'Semantik rol etiketi v톛 m톛lumat 칞캼xarmas캼 칲칞칲n S칬z칲 Basizl톛m톛si', 'ca': 'Simplificació de sentences per etiquetar i extrair informació el paper semàntic', 'et': 'Semantilise rolli märgistamise ja teabe väljavõtmise lausete lihtsustamine', 'cs': 'Zjednodušení věty pro označování sémantických rolí a extrakci informací', 'bs': 'Jednostavno kazne za semantičku oznake uloga i izvlačenje informacija', 'fi': 'Lausekkeiden yksinkertaistaminen semanttisten roolimerkintöjen ja tietojen keruun osalta', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Poenostavitev stavka za označevanje semantične vloge in pridobivanje informacij', 'bo': 'Semantic Role Labelling and Information Extraction for Sentence Simplification', 'he': 'הפשטת גזרה לטביעות תפקיד סמנטי ומוציאת מידע'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we report on the extrinsic evaluation of an automatic sentence simplification method with respect to two NLP tasks : semantic role labelling (SRL) and information extraction (IE). The paper begins with our observation of challenges in the intrinsic evaluation of sentence simplification systems, which motivates the use of extrinsic evaluation of these systems with respect to other NLP tasks. We describe the two NLP systems and the test data used in the extrinsic evaluation, and present arguments and evidence motivating the integration of a sentence simplification step as a means of improving the accuracy of these systems. Our evaluation reveals that their performance is improved by the simplification step : the SRL system is better able to assign semantic roles to the majority of the arguments of verbs and the IE system is better able to identify fillers for all IE template slots.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث ، نقدم تقريرًا عن التقييم الخارجي لطريقة تبسيط الجملة التلقائية فيما يتعلق بمهمتين في معالجة اللغات الطبيعية: تسمية الدور الدلالي (SRL) واستخراج المعلومات (IE). تبدأ الورقة بملاحظتنا للتحديات في التقييم الجوهري لأنظمة تبسيط الجملة ، والتي تحفز استخدام التقييم الخارجي لهذه الأنظمة فيما يتعلق بمهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية الأخرى. نصف نظامي البرمجة اللغوية العصبية وبيانات الاختبار المستخدمة في التقييم الخارجي ، ونقدم الحجج والأدلة التي تحفز تكامل خطوة تبسيط الجملة كوسيلة لتحسين دقة هذه الأنظمة. يكشف تقييمنا أن أدائهم قد تحسن من خلال خطوة التبسيط: نظام SRL قادر بشكل أفضل على تعيين الأدوار الدلالية لغالبية حجج الأفعال ونظام IE قادر بشكل أفضل على تحديد الحشوات لجميع فتحات قوالب IE.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, relatamos a avaliação extrínseca de um método de simplificação automática de sentenças em relação a duas tarefas de PNL: rotulagem de papéis semânticos (SRL) e extração de informações (IE). O artigo começa com nossa observação de desafios na avaliação intrínseca de sistemas de simplificação de sentenças, o que motiva o uso de avaliação extrínseca desses sistemas em relação a outras tarefas de PNL. Descrevemos os dois sistemas de PNL e os dados de teste usados na avaliação extrínseca, e apresentamos argumentos e evidências que motivam a integração de uma etapa de simplificação de sentenças como forma de melhorar a precisão desses sistemas. Nossa avaliação revela que seu desempenho é aprimorado pela etapa de simplificação: o sistema SRL é mais capaz de atribuir funções semânticas à maioria dos argumentos dos verbos e o sistema IE é mais capaz de identificar preenchimentos para todos os slots de modelo IE.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons l'évaluation extrinsèque d'une méthode de simplification automatique des phrases par rapport à deux tâches de TAL\xa0: l'étiquetage sémantique des rôles (SRL) et l'extraction d'informations (IE). L'article commence par notre observation des défis liés à l'évaluation intrinsèque des systèmes de simplification des phrases, ce qui motive l'utilisation de l'évaluation extrinsèque de ces systèmes par rapport à d'autres tâches de PNL. Nous décrivons les deux systèmes de PNL et les données de test utilisées dans l'évaluation extrinsèque, et présentons des arguments et des preuves motivant l'intégration d'une étape de simplification de phrase comme moyen d'améliorer la précision de ces systèmes. Notre évaluation révèle que leur performance est améliorée par l'étape de simplification\xa0: le système SRL est mieux en mesure d'attribuer des rôles sémantiques à la majorité des arguments des verbes et le système IE est mieux à même d'identifier les remplisseurs pour tous les emplacements de modèles IE.", 'ja': '本稿では、意味役割ラベリング（ SRL ）と情報抽出（ IE ）の2つのNLPタスクに関して、自動文章簡略化手法の外因的評価について報告する。本論文は、文章簡略化システムの本質的評価における課題の観察から始まり、他のNLPタスクに対するこれらのシステムの本質的評価の使用を動機づけている。外部評価で使用される2つのNLPシステムとテストデータを説明し、これらのシステムの精度を向上させる手段として文の簡略化ステップの統合を動機づける議論と証拠を提示する。私たちの評価では、単純化ステップによってパフォーマンスが向上していることが明らかになりました。SRLシステムは動詞の引数の大部分にセマンティックロールを割り当てることができ、IEシステムはすべてのIEテンプレートスロットのフィラーを識別することができます。', 'es': 'En este artículo, informamos sobre la evaluación extrínseca de un método de simplificación automática de oraciones con respecto a dos tareas de PNL: etiquetado semántico de roles (SRL) y extracción de información (IE). El artículo comienza con nuestra observación de los desafíos en la evaluación intrínseca de los sistemas de simplificación de oraciones, lo que motiva el uso de la evaluación extrínseca de estos sistemas con respecto a otras tareas de PNL. Describimos los dos sistemas de PNL y los datos de prueba utilizados en la evaluación extrínseca, y presentamos argumentos y pruebas que motivan la integración de un paso de simplificación de oraciones como medio para mejorar la precisión de estos sistemas. Nuestra evaluación revela que su rendimiento mejora con el paso de simplificación: el sistema SRL es más capaz de asignar roles semánticos a la mayoría de los argumentos de los verbos y el sistema IE es más capaz de identificar los rellenos para todos los espacios de plantillas de IE.', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы сообщаем о внешней оценке метода автоматического упрощения предложений в отношении двух задач NLP: семантической маркировки ролей (SRL) и извлечения информации (IE). Работа начинается с нашего наблюдения за проблемами в внутренней оценке систем упрощения предложений, что мотивирует использование внешней оценки этих систем по отношению к другим задачам NLP. Мы описываем две системы NLP и тестовые данные, используемые в внешней оценке, и представляем аргументы и доказательства, мотивирующие интеграцию шага упрощения предложения как средства повышения точности этих систем. Наша оценка показывает, что их производительность улучшается на этапе упрощения: система SRL лучше способна назначать семантические роли большинству аргументов глаголов, а система IE лучше способна идентифицировать заполнители для всех слотов шаблонов IE.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, tuairiscímid ar an meastóireacht eistreach ar mhodh uathshimplithe pianbhreithe maidir le dhá thasc NLP: lipéadú ról shéimeantach (SRL) agus eastóscadh faisnéise (IE). Tosaíonn an páipéar lenár mbreathnóireacht ar dhúshláin sa mheastóireacht intreach ar chórais simplithe abairtí, a spreagann úsáid meastóireachta eistreach ar na córais seo maidir le tascanna NLP eile. Déanaimid cur síos ar an dá chóras NLP agus ar na sonraí tástála a úsáideadh sa mheastóireacht eistreach, agus cuirimid i láthair argóintí agus fianaise a spreagann comhtháthú céim shimplithe abairte mar mhodh chun cruinneas na gcóras seo a fheabhsú. Léiríonn ár meastóireacht go bhfuil a bhfeidhmíocht feabhsaithe ag céim an tsimplithe: is fearr an córas SRL róil shéimeantacha a shannadh d’fhormhór argóintí na mbriathra agus is fearr a bheidh an córas IE in ann líontóirí a shainaithint do gach sliotán teimpléad IE.', 'zh': '本文,我们告诉自己句子简化方法相对于两个NLP务的外评:语义角色标记(SRL)和信息提取(IE)。 本文先看我们对句子简化系统内在评估中的挑战,这促使这些系统在他NLP任中用外在评估。 述二NLP系统及外估中所用测试数据,并推整合句简步骤以为准确性据据。 吾评显,简步骤增其性:SRL统能善为动词者多参数分语义角色,IE统能善识IE模板插槽填充物。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम दो एनएलपी कार्यों के संबंध में एक स्वचालित वाक्य सरलीकरण विधि के बाहरी मूल्यांकन पर रिपोर्ट करते हैं: शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलिंग (एसआरएल) और सूचना निष्कर्षण (आईई)। पेपर वाक्य सरलीकरण प्रणालियों के आंतरिक मूल्यांकन में चुनौतियों के हमारे अवलोकन के साथ शुरू होता है, जो अन्य एनएलपी कार्यों के संबंध में इन प्रणालियों के बाहरी मूल्यांकन के उपयोग को प्रेरित करता है। हम दो एनएलपी प्रणालियों और बाह्य मूल्यांकन में उपयोग किए जाने वाले परीक्षण डेटा का वर्णन करते हैं, और इन प्रणालियों की सटीकता में सुधार के साधन के रूप में एक वाक्य सरलीकरण चरण के एकीकरण को प्रेरित करने वाले तर्क और सबूत प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमारे मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि उनके प्रदर्शन को सरलीकरण चरण द्वारा बेहतर बनाया गया है: एसआरएल सिस्टम क्रियाओं के अधिकांश तर्कों को शब्दार्थ भूमिकाओं को असाइन करने में सक्षम है और आईई सिस्टम सभी आईई टेम्पलेट स्लॉट के लिए भराव की पहचान करने में बेहतर है।', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, αναφέρουμε την εξωτερική αξιολόγηση μιας μεθόδου αυτόματης απλούστευσης προτάσεων σε σχέση με δύο καθήκοντα: σημασιολογική σήμανση ρόλων (SRL) και εξαγωγή πληροφοριών (IE). Η εργασία ξεκινά με την παρατήρηση των προκλήσεων στην εγγενή αξιολόγηση των συστημάτων απλοποίησης των προτάσεων, η οποία παρακινεί τη χρήση εξωτερικής αξιολόγησης αυτών των συστημάτων σε σχέση με άλλα καθήκοντα NLP. Περιγράφουμε τα δύο συστήματα και τα δεδομένα δοκιμής που χρησιμοποιήθηκαν στην εξωτερική αξιολόγηση και παρουσιάζουμε επιχειρήματα και αποδεικτικά στοιχεία που παρακινούν την ενσωμάτωση ενός σταδίου απλούστευσης των προτάσεων ως μέσο βελτίωσης της ακρίβειας αυτών των συστημάτων. Η αξιολόγησή μας αποκαλύπτει ότι η απόδοσή τους βελτιώνεται με το βήμα απλούστευσης: το σύστημα είναι καλύτερα σε θέση να εκχωρήσει σημασιολογικούς ρόλους στα περισσότερα επιχειρήματα των ρήμων και το σύστημα είναι καλύτερα σε θέση να προσδιορίσει πληρωτικά για όλες τις υποδοχές προτύπων ΙΕ.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban egy automatikus mondatszerűsítési módszer külső értékeléséről számolunk be két NLP feladat tekintetében: szemantikus szerepkörjelölés (SRL) és információkinyerés (IE). A tanulmány azzal kezdődik, hogy megfigyeljük a mondatszerűsítő rendszerek belső értékelésében rejlő kihívásokat, amelyek motiválják ezen rendszerek külső értékelését más NLP feladatokkal szemben. Leírjuk a két NLP rendszert és a külső értékelésben használt tesztadatokat, valamint olyan érveket és bizonyítékokat mutatunk be, amelyek motiválják a mondat egyszerűsítési lépésének integrációját, hogy javítsák ezen rendszerek pontosságát. Értékelésünk kimutatja, hogy teljesítményüket az egyszerűsítési lépéssel javítja: az SRL rendszer jobban képes szemantikai szerepeket rendelni az igék argumentumainak többségéhez, az IE rendszer pedig jobban képes azonosítani az összes IE sablonnyíláshoz.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნში ჩვენ ავტომატური სიტყვების გამოყენების მეტის გამოყენება, რომელიც ორი NLP დავალების შესახებ: სიმენტიკური პროლის მარტიკაცია (SRL) და ინფორმაციის გამოყენება (IE). დააწყება ჩვენი განსაზღვრებით გადავიწყებთ სისტემის განსაზღვრების ინტერნექტური განსაზღვრებით, რომელიც მოტივირდება ამ სისტემის გამოყენება სხვა NLP დავალების განსაზღვრებით. ჩვენ განახსენებთ ორი NLP სისტემი და ტესტის მონაცემები, რომელიც გამოყენებული ექსტრინიური განახსენებაში, და ახლა არგორმენტები და მოწმები, რომელიც მუშაობის განახსენება სისტემის სიმართლეობ ჩვენი განსაზღვრება აღმოჩნდა, რომ მათი განსაზღვრებულობა უფრო უფრო უკეთესია განსაზღვრებულება: SRL სისტემა უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უკეთესია სიმენტიკური პროლის დააყენება ვი', 'it': "In questo articolo riportiamo la valutazione estrinseca di un metodo di semplificazione automatica delle frasi rispetto a due compiti NLP: l'etichettatura semantica dei ruoli (SRL) e l'estrazione delle informazioni (IE). L'articolo inizia con la nostra osservazione delle sfide nella valutazione intrinseca dei sistemi di semplificazione delle frasi, che motiva l'uso della valutazione estrinseca di questi sistemi rispetto ad altri compiti del PNL. Descriviamo i due sistemi PNL e i dati di test utilizzati nella valutazione estrinseca, e presentiamo argomenti e prove che motivano l'integrazione di una fase di semplificazione delle frasi come mezzo per migliorare l'accuratezza di questi sistemi. La nostra valutazione rivela che le loro prestazioni sono migliorate dalla fase di semplificazione: il sistema SRL è più in grado di assegnare ruoli semantici alla maggior parte degli argomenti dei verbi e il sistema IE è più in grado di identificare i filler per tutti gli slot template IE.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз екі NLP тапсырмасына қатынау арқылы автоматты түрде қарапайым түрлендіру әдісін бағалаймыз: semantic role labelling (SRL) және мәлімет тарқату (IE). Бұл қағаз сөйлемелерді қарапайым жүйелерді қарапайым жасау жүйелердің ішкі оқиғаларын бақылап бастады. Бұл жүйелерді басқа NLP тапсырмаларына қарай сыртқы оқиғаларды қолдануға мүмкіндік береді. Біз екі NLP жүйесін және сыртқы оқиғанда қолданылатын сынақтар деректерін, аргументтерді және мәліметтерді қарапайым түрлендіру қадамын осы жүйелердің дұрыстығын жақсарту үшін қолданып тұрады. Біздің оқиғамыз, олардың істемісін қарапайым қадамымен жақсартылып жатқанын көрсетеді: SRL жүйесі вербалардың аргументтерінің көпшілігіне semantiкалық рольдерді таңдауға мүмкіндік береді және IE жүйесі барлық IE үлгі слоттарын', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pranešame apie automatinio sakinių supaprastinimo metodo išorinį vertinimą dviejų NLP užduočių atžvilgiu: semantinio vaidmens ženklinimo (SRL) ir informacijos gavimo (IE). Dokumentas prasideda nuo mūsų iššūkių stebėjimo atliekant nuoseklų sakinių supaprastinimo sistemų vertinimą, kuris motyvuoja šių sistemų išorinį vertinimą kitų NLP užduočių atžvilgiu. Apibrėžiamos dvi NLP sistemos ir išoriniame vertinime naudojami bandymų duomenys, taip pat pateikiami argumentai ir įrodymai, motyvuojantys sąvokų supaprastinimo etapo integraciją kaip šių sistemų tikslumo gerinimo priemonę. Mūsų vertinimas rodo, kad jų veiklos rezultatai pagerėja supaprastinimo etapu: SRL sistema geriau gali skirti semantinius vaidmenis daugumai žodžių argumentų, o IE sistema geriau gali nustatyti užpildytuvus visiems IE šablonų laiko tarpsniams.', 'mk': 'In this paper, we report on the extrinsic evaluation of an automatic sentence simplification method with respect to two NLP tasks: semantic role labelling (SRL) and information extraction (IE).  Документот започнува со нашето набљудување на предизвиците во внатрешната проценка на системите за поедноставување на речениците, што го мотивира употребата на надворешна проценка на овие системи во однос на другите задачи на НЛП. Ги опишуваме двата НЛП системи и тестовите податоци кои се користат во екстринзичката проценка, и ги претставуваме аргументите и доказите кои мотивираат интеграцијата на чекорот на поедноставување на речениците како средство за подобрување на точноста на овие системи. Нашата оценка открива дека нивната перформанса е подобрена со чекорот на едноставуваое: СРЛ системот е подобро способен да им додели семантични улоги на повеќето аргументи на речениците и ИЕ системот е подобро способен да ги идентификува полните места за сите слотови на шаблоните на ИЕ.', 'ms': 'In this paper, we report on the extrinsic evaluation of an automatic sentence simplification method with respect to two NLP tasks: semantic role labelling (SRL) and information extraction (IE).  The paper begins with our observation of challenges in the intrinsic evaluation of sentence simplification systems, which motivates the use of extrinsic evaluation of these systems with respect to other NLP tasks.  Kami menggambarkan dua sistem NLP dan data ujian yang digunakan dalam penilaian ekstrinsik, dan mempersembahkan argumen dan bukti yang mendorong integrasi langkah pemudahan kalimat sebagai cara untuk meningkatkan ketepatan sistem ini. Evaluasi kami menunjukkan bahawa prestasi mereka diperbaiki oleh langkah pemudahan: sistem SRL lebih baik mampu menyerahkan peranan semantik kepada kebanyakan argumen verb dan sistem IE lebih baik mampu mengenali pengenalan bagi semua slot templat IE.', 'ml': 'In this paper, we report on the extrinsic evaluation of an automatic sentence simplification method with respect to two NLP tasks: semantic role labelling (SRL) and information extraction (IE).  വാക്ക് എളുപ്പമാക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഉള്ളില്\u200d വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d നോക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ പേപ്പറ് തുടങ്ങുന്നു. അത് മറ്റു NLP ജോലികള നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് NLP സിസ്റ്റം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. പുറത്തുള്ള പരീക്ഷണവിശദീകരണത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ വാക്കുകളും തെളിവുകളും വ എളുപ്പമുള്ള പടിയാല്\u200d അവരുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ വിലയില്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. എസ്ആര്\u200dഎല്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും വാര്\u200dത്തകള', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, nirrappurtaw dwar l-evalwazzjoni esterna ta’ metodu ta’ simplifikazzjoni awtomatika tas-sentenza fir-rigward ta’ żewġ kompiti NLP: it-tikkettar tar-rwol semantiku (SRL) u l-estrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni (IE). Id-dokument jibda bl-osservazzjoni tagħna tal-isfidi fl-evalwazzjoni intrinsika tas-sistemi ta’ simplifikazzjoni tas-sentenzi, li timmotiva l-użu ta’ evalwazzjoni esterna ta’ dawn is-sistemi fir-rigward ta’ kompiti oħra tal-NLP. Aħna niddeskrivu ż-żewġ sistemi NLP u d-dejta tat-test użata fl-evalwazzjoni esterna, u nippreżentaw argumenti u evidenza li jimmotivaw l-integrazzjoni ta’ pass ta’ simplifikazzjoni tas-sentenza bħala mezz għat-titjib tal-preċiżjoni ta’ dawn is-sistemi. L-evalwazzjoni tagħna turi li l-prestazzjoni tagħhom tittejjeb permezz tal-pass ta’ simplifikazzjoni: is-sistema SRL tista’ tassenja rwoli semantiċi aħjar lill-maġġoranza tal-argumenti tal-verbs u s-sistema IE tista’ tidentifika aħjar il-fillers għas-slots kollha tal-mudelli IE.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид NLP хоёр даалгавартай холбоотой автоматически өгүүлбэр хялбарчлах аргын гадна дүгнэлт (SRL) болон мэдээллийн гаргах аргыг харуулж байна. Энэ цаас бидний харж байгаа сорилтуудыг харж эхэлнэ. Энэ нь өгүүлбэр хялбарчлалын системийн дотоод шалгалтын тухай. Энэ нь эдгээр системийн бусад НLP ажлын тухай гадна шалгалтыг ашиглах боломжтой. Бид хоёр НЛП системийг, экстринско оюутнуудад хэрэглэгдсэн тест өгөгдлийг тайлбарлаж байна. Мөн энэ системийн зөв байдлыг сайжруулахын тулд өгүүлбэрийг хялбарчлах алхам болон баталгаа өгүүлж байна. Бидний шалгалт нь тэдний үйл ажиллагааг хялбарчлалын алхам дээр сайжруулсан гэдгийг харуулж байна: SRL систем нь хэлний аргументын ихэнх аргументууд болон IE систем нь бүх IE үлгэрийн слотуудын дүүрэгчийг илүү сайжруулж чадна.', 'no': 'I denne papiret rapporterer vi om den eksterne evalueringa av ein automatisk setningsmetode med hensyn til to NLP- oppgåver: semantisk rolletiketting (SRL) og utpakking av informasjon (IE). Papiret startar med vårt observasjon av utfordringar i den interne evalueringa av setningssystemet, som motiverer bruken av ekstrinske evalueringa av desse systema med respekt til andre NLP-oppgåver. Vi beskriver dei to NLP-systema og test data som vert brukte i ekstrinske evalueringa, og gjeldande argumenter og beviser som motiverer integreringa av eit setningsstrukt som ein måte for å forbetra nøyaktigheten av desse systema. Evalueringa vårt viser at utviklinga sine er forbetra av forenklingsteget: SRL-systemet er bedre i stand til å tilordna semantiske roller til dei fleste av argumentene av verbar og IE-systemet er bedre i stand til å identifisera fyller for alle IE-mal-plassar.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono zewnętrzną ocenę metody automatycznego uproszczenia zdań w odniesieniu do dwóch zadań NLP: semantycznego oznaczania roli (SRL) i ekstrakcji informacji (IE). Artykuł rozpoczyna się od obserwacji wyzwań związanych z wewnętrzną oceną systemów uproszczenia zdań, która motywuje wykorzystanie zewnętrznej oceny tych systemów w odniesieniu do innych zadań NLP. Opisujemy dwa systemy NLP oraz dane testowe wykorzystane w ocenie zewnętrznej oraz przedstawiamy argumenty i dowody motywujące integrację etapu uproszczenia zdań jako środka poprawy dokładności tych systemów. Z naszej oceny wynika, że ich wydajność ulega poprawie dzięki kroku uproszczenia: system SRL jest w stanie lepiej przypisać role semantyczne większości argumentów czasowników, a system IE jest w stanie lepiej zidentyfikować wypełniacze dla wszystkich gniazd szablonów IE.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, raportăm evaluarea extrinsă a unei metode automate de simplificare a frazelor în ceea ce privește două sarcini PNL: etichetarea rolurilor semantice (SRL) și extragerea informației (IE). Lucrarea începe cu observarea provocărilor în evaluarea intrinsecă a sistemelor de simplificare a frazelor, care motivează utilizarea evaluării extrinsice a acestor sisteme în raport cu alte sarcini PNL. Descriem cele două sisteme PNL și datele de testare utilizate în evaluarea extrinsică și prezentăm argumente și dovezi care motivează integrarea unei etape de simplificare a frazelor ca mijloc de îmbunătățire a acurateții acestor sisteme. Evaluarea noastră arată că performanța lor este îmbunătățită prin etapa de simplificare: sistemul SRL este mai capabil să atribuie roluri semantice majorității argumentelor verbelor, iar sistemul IE este mai capabil să identifice umplerele pentru toate sloturile de șabloane IE.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru izvještavamo o ekstrinskoj procjeni metode pojednostavljanja automatske rečenice u pogledu dva zadataka NLP-a: označavanje semantičke uloge (SRL) i izvlačenje informacija (IE). Novinar počinje sa našim posmatranjem izazova u unutrašnjoj procjeni sistema pojednostavljanja rečenica, koji motivira korištenje ekstrinske procjene tih sistema u pogledu drugih zadataka NLP-a. Mi opisujemo dve NLP-ove sisteme i test podatke korištene u ekstrinskoj procjeni, i predstavljamo argumente i dokaze koji motiviraju integraciju koraka pojednostavljanja rečenica kao sredstvo poboljšanja tačnosti ovih sistema. Naša procjena pokazuje da je njihov učinkovit poboljšan korakom pojednostavljanja: sistem SRL je bolji u stanju da odredi semantičke uloge većini argumenata verba i sistem IE je bolji u stanju da identifikuje napunitele za sve mesta IE template.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය වාර්තාවක් සම්පූර්ණ වාර්තාවක් ගැන ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිත වාර්තාවක් ගැන වාර්තාව කරනවා NLP වැඩ දෙකක් ගැ පත්තර පටන් ගන්නවා අපේ අභ්\u200dයාගයක් පටන් ගන්නවා වචන පද්ධතියේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණ පද්ධතියේ අභ්\u200dයාගයක් පටන් ගන්න, ඒකෙන් අනිත් NLP අපි NLP පද්ධතිය දෙකක් සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ පරීක්ෂණ දත්ත පාවිච්චි කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ සාක්ෂියක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වාක්ෂාව සමාන්\u200dය ව අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරමාණය සරලකුණු පැත්තෙන් වැඩි වෙනවා කියලා: SRL පද්ධතිය හොඳයි විශ්ලේෂණයේ බොහෝම ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ IE පද්ධතිය හැම', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu wargelinaynaa qiimeynta dibadda ah ee qaababka fududaada oo ah labada shaqaalaha NLP: halka qayb ah iyo sawirka macluumaadka (IE). Qoraabku wuxuu bilaabaa aragtideena dhibaatooyin aan ku qiimeynayno nidaamka fududaanka xafiiska, kaas oo ku hagaajiya isticmaalka qiimeynta dibadda ee nidaamkan ee shaqada kale ee NLP. Waxaynu qoraynaa labada nidaam ee NLP iyo data imtixaanka ee lagu isticmaalay qiimeynta dibadda ah, isla markaasna waxaan ku qoraynaa qiimaha iyo caddeynta joogta ah oo ku hagaajiya la qabsashada ereyga fudud sida qalabka hagaajinta saxda nidaamkan. Qiimeyntayada waxaa muuqanaya in horumarinta lagu kordhiyo tallaabada sahliga ah: nidaamka SRL waxaa ka wanaagsan in uu qayb u dhigi karo qiimaha hadallada badan iyo nidaamka IE-da oo dhan si wanaagsan u aqoonsan fililayaasha meelaha macbudka ah ee IE oo dhan.', 'sv': 'I den här uppsatsen redogör vi för den yttre utvärderingen av en automatisk mening förenklingsmetod med avseende på två NLP-uppgifter: semantisk rollmärkning (SRL) och informationsutvinning (IE). Uppsatsen inleds med vår observation av utmaningar i den inneboende utvärderingen av meningsförklaringssystem, vilket motiverar användningen av extern utvärdering av dessa system i förhållande till andra NLP-uppgifter. Vi beskriver de två NLP-systemen och testdata som används i den yttre utvärderingen, och presenterar argument och bevis som motiverar integrationen av ett meningsförklaringssteg som ett sätt att förbättra riktigheten i dessa system. Vår utvärdering visar att deras prestanda förbättras genom förenklingssteget: SRL-systemet kan bättre tilldela semantiska roller till majoriteten av verbens argument och IE-systemet kan bättre identifiera fyllmedel för alla IE mallplatser.', 'ta': 'இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் தானியங்கிய வாக்கு சுலபமான முறைமையைப் பற்றி அறிவிக்கிறோம். இரண்டு NLP பணிகளை பற்றி: பாதிப்பு பங்கு விளிம்புகள் (SRL) மற் இந்த தாள் எங்கள் சவால்களை பார்த்துக் கொண்டு தொடங்குகிறது வாக்கு எளிதாக்குதல் அமைப்புகளின் உள்ளிருந்து பரிசோதனையில் ஆரம்பிக்கிறது, அது வெளிய We describe the two NLP systems and the test data used in the extrinsic evaluation, and present arguments and evidence motivating the integration of a sentence simplification step as a means of improving the accuracy of these systems.  எளிய படியால் அவர்களுடைய செயல்பாடு மேம்படுத்தப்பட்டது என்பதை எங்கள் மதிப்பு குறிப்பிடுகிறது: சொற்களின் பெரும்பாலான வார்த்தைகளில் இருந்து பாதிப்பு பங்களை ஒப்பிட', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں دو NLP کاموں کے معاملہ میں ایک دوسرے سفارشی فیصلہ کا خارجی ارزش کے بارے میں راپورت کرتے ہیں: سیمانٹی رول لابلینگ (SRL) اور اطلاعات اضافہ (IE) کے معاملہ میں۔ یہ کاغذ ہماری نظر سے شروع ہوتا ہے کہ کلمہ سادھاتی سیسٹموں کی داخلی ارزیابی میں چلنے والی چالوں کے ذریعہ، جو ان سیسٹموں کی خارجی ارزیابی کا استعمال کرتا ہے اور دوسرے NLP کے کاموں کے بارے میں۔ ہم نے ان دونوں NLP سیستموں کو اور ان کی آزمائش ڈیٹوں کو خارجی امتحان میں استعمال کیا گیا ہے، اور موجود دلیلیں اور دلیلیں جنہیں یہ سیستموں کی صحیح تدبیر کرنے کے لئے ایک جماعت سفارش قدم کی ترکیب دیتی ہے۔ ہمارا ارزیابی ظاہر کرتا ہے کہ ان کی فعالیت سادگی سٹم سے بہتر ہوتی ہے: SRL سیسٹم بہت اچھی باتوں کی اکثریت کے ارزیابوں کے لئے سیمنٹی رول مقرر کرسکتا ہے اور IE سیسٹم بہتر ہے کہ تمام IE ٹیپلٹ لٹوں کے لئے فلیروں کو پہچان سکتا ہے.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda biz ikki NLP vazifalar haqida avtomatik soʻzni aniqlash usuli haqida xabar beramiz: semantik role labellish (SRL) va maʼlumot chiqarish (IE). Qogʻoz oddiylik tizimini qiymatlashimiz mumkin. Bu tizimlarni boshqa NLP vazifalar haqida qiymatni o'zgartiradi. We describe the two NLP systems and the test data used in the extrinsic evaluation, and present arguments and evidence motivating the integration of a sentence simplification step as a means of improving the accuracy of these systems.  Bizning qiymatlarimiz oddiylik darajada bajariladigan amalni aniqlash mumkin: SRL tizimi ko'pchilik soʻzlarning ko'pchiligi qiymatlariga semantik qobiliyatni ajratish mumkin va IE tizimi hamma IE namunalar uchun fililarni aniqlash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi báo cáo về việc đánh giá triệt để một phương pháp đơn giản hóa bản án tự động với hai nhiệm vụ không phải chọc ngoáy chữ nghĩa vụ (SR) và khai thác thông tin (IE). Bài báo bắt đầu bằng việc quan sát những thử thách trong việc đánh giá bản thân hệ thống mô phỏng bản án, thúc đẩy việc sử dụng các hệ thống được đánh giá triệt để với những nhiệm vụ khác của NMB. Chúng tôi mô tả hai hệ thống ngôn ngữ chọc dò tủy sống và dữ liệu thử nghiệm được sử dụng trong việc đánh giá khéo léo, và đưa ra các lý lẽ và bằng chứng để thúc đẩy việc ghép một bước đơn giản câu nói thành một phương tiện để cải thiện độ chính xác của các hệ thống này. Bản đánh giá của chúng tiết lộ khả năng của chúng được cải thiện bằng một bước tiến hóa: hệ thống SLOL có khả năng phân biệt khái niệm với hầu hết các lý lẽ của các động từ và hệ thống Iễ có khả năng xác định các khớp cho mọi thời gian biểu Iễ.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия докладваме за външната оценка на метода за автоматично опростяване на изреченията по отношение на две задачи на НЛП: семантично етикетиране на ролята и извличане на информация. Статията започва с наблюдението на предизвикателствата в присъщата оценка на системите за опростяване на изреченията, което мотивира използването на външна оценка на тези системи по отношение на други задачи на НЛП. Описваме двете системи за НЛП и тестовите данни, използвани при външната оценка, и представяме аргументи и доказателства, мотивиращи интегрирането на стъпка за опростяване на изреченията като средство за подобряване на точността на тези системи. Нашата оценка показва, че ефективността им се подобрява от етапа на опростяване: системата е по-способна да присвоява семантични роли на по-голямата част от аргументите на глаголите, а системата е по-способна да идентифицира пълнители за всички слотове за шаблони.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel rapporteren we over de extrinsieke evaluatie van een automatische zinsvereenvoudigingsmethode met betrekking tot twee NLP taken: semantische rollabeling (SRL) en informatie extractie (IE). Het artikel begint met onze observatie van uitdagingen in de intrinsieke evaluatie van zinsvereenvoudigingssystemen, die het gebruik van extrinsieke evaluatie van deze systemen met betrekking tot andere NLP-taken motiveert. We beschrijven de twee NLP-systemen en de testgegevens die worden gebruikt in de extrinsieke evaluatie, en presenteren argumenten en bewijsmateriaal die de integratie van een zinsvereenvoudigingsstap motiveren om de nauwkeurigheid van deze systemen te verbeteren. Onze evaluatie toont aan dat hun prestaties worden verbeterd door de vereenvoudigingsstap: het SRL-systeem is beter in staat om semantische rollen toe te wijzen aan de meerderheid van de argumenten van werkwoorden en het IE-systeem is beter in staat om fillers voor alle IE-sjabloon slots te identificeren.', 'da': 'I denne artikel rapporterer vi om den eksterne evaluering af en automatisk sætning forenkling metode med hensyn til to NLP-opgaver: semantisk rollemærkning (SRL) og informationsudvinding (IE). Artiklen begynder med vores observation af udfordringer i den iboende evaluering af sætningsfornklingssystemer, som motiverer brugen af ekstern evaluering af disse systemer i forhold til andre NLP-opgaver. Vi beskriver de to NLP-systemer og de testdata, der anvendes i den eksterne evaluering, og præsenterer argumenter og beviser, der motiverer integrationen af en sætning forenkling trin som et middel til at forbedre nøjagtigheden af disse systemer. Vores evaluering afslører, at deres ydeevne forbedres af forenklingstrinet: SRL-systemet er bedre i stand til at tildele semantiske roller til størstedelen af argumenterne i verber, og IE-systemet er bedre i stand til at identificere fyldstoffer for alle IE skabelon slots.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru izvješćujemo o ekstrinskoj procjeni metode pojednostavljanja automatske rečenice u pogledu dva zadatka NLP-a: označavanje semantičke uloge (SRL) i izvlačenje informacija (IE). Papir počinje s našem posmatranjem izazova u unutrašnjoj procjeni sustava pojednostavljanja rečenica, koji motivira korištenje ekstrinske procjene tih sustava u pogledu drugih zadataka NLP-a. Opišemo dva sustava NLP-a i test podataka korišćene u ekstrinskoj procjeni, i predstavljamo argumente i dokaze koji motiviraju integraciju koraka pojednostavljanja rečenica kao način poboljšanja preciznosti tih sustava. Naša procjena pokazuje da je njihov učinkovit poboljšan korakom pojednostavljanja: sustav SRL je bolji u stanju odrediti semantičke uloge većini argumenata verba i sustav IE-a je bolji u stanju identificirati punjenje za sve slojeve IE-a.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag berichten wir über die extrinsische Bewertung einer automatischen Satzvereinfachungsmethode in Bezug auf zwei NLP-Aufgaben: semantische Rollenkennzeichnung (SRL) und Informationsextraktion (IE). Der Beitrag beginnt mit unserer Beobachtung von Herausforderungen in der intrinsischen Bewertung von Satzvereinfachungssystemen, die den Einsatz extrinsischer Evaluation dieser Systeme in Bezug auf andere NLP-Aufgaben motiviert. Wir beschreiben die beiden NLP-Systeme und die Testdaten, die in der extrinsischen Auswertung verwendet werden, und präsentieren Argumente und Beweise, die die Integration eines Satzvereinfachungsschritts motivieren, um die Genauigkeit dieser Systeme zu verbessern. Unsere Bewertung zeigt, dass ihre Leistung durch den Vereinfachungsschritt verbessert wird: Das SRL-System ist besser in der Lage, den meisten Argumenten von Verben semantische Rollen zuzuweisen und das IE-System ist besser in der Lage, Füller für alle IE-Template-Slots zu identifizieren.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami melaporkan tentang evaluasi ekstrinsik dari metode penyimplifikasi kalimat otomatis terhadap dua tugas NLP: label peran semantis (SRL) dan ekstraksi informasi (IE). Kertas dimulai dengan pengamatan kita terhadap tantangan dalam evaluasi intrinsik sistem penyimplifikasi kalimat, yang mendorong penggunaan evaluasi ekstrinsik sistem ini terhadap tugas NLP lainnya. Kami menggambarkan dua sistem NLP dan data tes yang digunakan dalam evaluasi ekstrinis, dan mempersembahkan argumen dan bukti yang mendorong integrasi langkah penyimplifikasi kalimat sebagai cara untuk meningkatkan akurasi sistem ini. Evaluasi kami mengungkapkan bahwa prestasi mereka diperbaiki dengan langkah penyimplifikasi: sistem SRL lebih baik mampu mengatur peran semantis kepada kebanyakan argumen verb dan sistem IE lebih baik mampu mengidentifikasi penuhi untuk semua slot templat IE.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 자동 문장 간소화 방법의 외적 평가를 보고했다. 이 방법은 두 가지 NLP 임무인 의미 역할 표시(SRL)와 정보 추출(IE)을 포함한다.본고는 먼저 문장 간소화 시스템의 내재적 평가에 대한 도전을 관찰하여 다른 NLP 임무에서 이러한 시스템의 외재적 평가를 사용하도록 한다.우리는 두 개의 자연 언어 처리 시스템과 외부 평가에서 사용되는 테스트 데이터를 묘사하고 논점과 증거를 제시하여 이러한 시스템의 정확성을 높이는 수단으로 문장의 절차를 간소화하고 통합시켰다.우리의 평가에 의하면 절차를 간소화하여 그들의 성능을 향상시켰다. SRL시스템은 의미 역할을 동사의 대다수 파라미터에 더욱 잘 분배할 수 있고 IE시스템은 모든 IE템플릿 슬롯의 충전물을 더욱 잘 식별할 수 있다.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما در مورد ارزیابی خارجی یک روش ساده\u200cسازی مجوز خودکار در مورد دو کار NLP گزارش می\u200cدهیم: نقشه\u200cی semantic labelling (SRL) و اخراج اطلاعات (IE). این کاغذ با مشاهده کردن چالش\u200cهای ما در ارزیابی داخلی از سیستم\u200cهای ساده\u200cسازی جمله شروع می\u200cشود که استفاده از ارزیابی خارجی این سیستم\u200cها را با ارزیابی دیگر از کار NLP انگیز می\u200cکند. ما دو سیستم NLP و داده\u200cهای آزمایش که در ارزیابی خارجی استفاده می\u200cشود، توصیف می\u200cکنیم، و ارزیابی و مدرک\u200cهای حاضر که به عنوان وسیله\u200cی improving precision of these systems motivating the integration of a sentence simplification step. ارزیابی ما نشان می دهد که عملکرد آنها توسط قدم ساده\u200cسازی بهتر شده: سیستم SRL بهتر است که نقش\u200cهای semantic را به اکثریت arguments verbs و سیستم IE قادر به شناسایی پر\u200cکننده\u200cها برای تمام نقطه\u200cهای الگوی IE باشد.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons rapporteer op die extrinsic evaluering van 'n outomatiese seting eenvoudiging metode met betrekking na twee NLP opdragte: semantiese roletiketing (SRL) en inligting uittrek (IE). Die papier beginne met ons opmerking van uitdagings in die binneste evaluering van setinge eenvoudiging stelsels, wat motiveer die gebruik van ekstrinsiese evaluering van hierdie stelsels met betrekking tot ander NLP opdragte. Ons beskryf die twee NLP stelsels en die toets data gebruik word in die extrinsic evaluering, en voorneem argumente en bevestighede wat die integrasie van 'n seting eenvoudiging stap as 'n betekening om die presisiteit van hierdie stelsels te verbeter. Ons evaluering vertoon dat hulle prestasie is verbeter deur die eenvoudiging stap: die SRL stelsel is beter in staat om semantiese roles te toewys aan die meeste van die argumente van verbe en die IE stelsel is beter in staat om vullers te identifiseer vir alle IE sjabloon slots.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, raportojmë mbi vlerësimin ekstrinzik të një metode automatike të thjeshtësimit të fjalëve lidhur me dy detyra NLP: etiketat semantike të rolit (SRL) dhe nxjerrjen e informacionit (IE). Gazeta fillon me vëzhgimin tonë të sfidave në vlerësimin e brendshëm të sistemeve të thjeshtësimit të fjalëve, që motivon përdorimin e vlerësimit të jashtëm të këtyre sistemeve lidhur me detyrat e tjera të NLP. Ne i përshkruajmë dy sistemet NLP dhe të dhënat e testit të përdorura në vlerësimin jashtëm dhe paraqesim argumente dhe prova që motivojnë integrimin e një hapi të thjeshtësimit të fjalëve si një mjet për përmirësimin e saktësisë së këtyre sistemeve. Vlerësimi ynë zbulon se performanca e tyre përmirësohet nga hapi i thjeshtësimit: sistemi SRL është më i aftë të caktojë role semantike shumicës së argumenteve të verbëve dhe sistemi IE është më i aftë të identifikojë plotësimet për të gjitha slots të modelit IE.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili, tunaripoti kuhusu tathmini za nje ya utafiti wa njia ya urahisi wa hukumu moja kwa moja kwa kuhusiana na kazi mbili za NLP: jukumu la kimapenzi (SRL) na utekelezaji wa taarifa (IE). Gazeti hilo linaanza kwa kuangalia changamoto zetu katika tathmini za ndani ya mfumo wa urahisi wa hukumu, ambao unahamasisha matumizi ya mifumo haya ya nje kwa ajili ya kazi nyingine za NLP. Tunaelezea mifumo miwili ya NLP na taarifa za majaribio yaliyotumika katika uchunguzi wa nje, na hoja na ushahidi ambao unahamasisha kuunganisha hatua ya urahisi wa hukumu kama njia ya kuboresha uhalisia wa mifumo haya. Utafiti wetu unaonyesha kwamba utendaji wao umeboreshwa na hatua ya urahisi: mfumo wa SRL una uwezo wa kuweka jukumu la kimapenzi kwa majadiliano mengi ya maneno na mfumo wa Umoja wa Mataifa wa Umoja wa Mataifa ni bora zaidi kuwatambua wachambuzi kwa viwanja vyote vya IE.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz NLP iki işi barada awtomatik sözlem ýeňlemek yöntemi (SRL) we informasiýa gaýşartmak üçin ekstrinsici deňlemegi barada bildirip otyrýarys. Kagyzyň biziň sözlerin ýeňilişlemek sistemalarynda kynçylyklary gözlemegimiz bilen başlaýar. Bu sistemalar başga NLP işine görä çykyş ýüze çykyş ýüze çykyşlygyny üýtgedýär. Biz iki NLP sistemini we ekstrinsici deňlemede ulanylýan testiň maglumatyny tassyýardyk, we şu wagt argumlarymyň we çözümleriň ýeňşiklik adımynyň integrasyny bu sistemleriň dogrylygyny bejermek üçin üýtgetmek üçin hereket edip berýäris. Biziň deňlemegimiz olaryň tanyşylygynyň esaslaşdyrylygy görä gowydyrylygyny görkezýär: SRL sistemi verbleriň köpüsi argümlerine semantik rolleri bejermek üçin gowydyr we IE sistemi dolduranlary hemme IE modalaryň ýerlerini tanyşdyrmak üçin gowydyr.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք զեկույց ենք տալիս ավտոմատիկ նախադասությունների պարզաբանման մեթոդի արտաքին գնահատման մասին երկու ՆԼՊ-ի առաջադրանքների վերաբերյալ. սեմանտիկ դերի պիտակ (ՍՌL) և տեղեկատվության վերացման (ԻԵ). Այս թղթին սկսում է մարտահրավերների դիտարկումից նայելով նախադասությունների պարզաբանման համակարգերի ներքին գնահատման մեջ, ինչը խթանում է այս համակարգերի արտաքին գնահատման օգտագործումը այլ ՆԼՊ-ի խնդիրների հետ կապված: Մենք նկարագրում ենք երկու ՆԼՊ համակարգերը և փորձարկման տվյալները, որոնք օգտագործվում են արտաքին գնահատման մեջ, և ներկայացնում ենք փաստարկներ և ապացույցներ, որոնք խթանում են նախադասությունների պարզաբանման քայլի ինտեգրացիան որպես միջոց բարելավելու այս համա Մեր գնահատումը ցույց է տալիս, որ նրանց արտադրողությունը բարելավվում է պարզաբանության քայլի միջոցով. Սերմատիկ համակարգը ավելի լավ կարող է սեմանտիկ դերեր տալ բայերի մեծամասնության բանավեճերին, իսկ ԱԲ համակարգը ավելի լավ կարող է ճանաչել լրացողները բոլոր ԱԲ կաղապարների համար:', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ሁለት NLP አድራጊዎች የውጭ የፍርድ ቀላል ሥርዓት ማረጋገጫ እና የኢ.E. ፕሬዝዳንቱ የውጤት ቀላል ስርዓት ውጤት በሚያሳየው ግንኙነታችንን ማሳየት ይጀምራል፤ ይህም የውጭ ስርዓቶች ውጤቶች ለሌሎቹ NLP ስርዓቶች ማረጋገጫ ያሳስፋል፡፡ የሁለቱን NLP ስርዓቶች እና የውጭ ማስታወቂያው የተጠቀሙትን የድምፅ መረጃዎች እና አሁን ያሉትን ክርክሮች እና ማስረጃ የቃላትን ቅድሚያ እርምጃን ለመጠቀም እንደምናስፈልገው የእነዚህን ስርዓቶች እርግጠኛ ማድረግ ማግኘት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ግንኙነታችን የኢሜይል መክፈቻ አካባቢ ስርዓት እንዲበጅል ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে একটি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে শাস্তির মূল্যের বিষয়ে রিপোর্ট করি দুই এনএলপি কাজের ব্যাপারে: সেমেন্টিক ভূমিকা লেবেল এই কাগজটি আমাদের চ্যালেঞ্জের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি দিয়ে শুরু হয়েছে শাস্তি সুস্পষ্ট ব্যবস্থার ব্যবস্থার ব্যাপারে, যা অন্যান্য এনএলপি কাজের প্রতি ব আমরা দুটি এনএলপি সিস্টেম এবং বাইরের পরীক্ষার তথ্য ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে এবং বর্তমান যুক্তি এবং প্রমাণ যে এই ব্যবস্থাগুলোর সঠিকভাবে উন্নত করার জন্য একটি বাক্যের সাথে  আমাদের মূল্য প্রকাশ করা হয়েছে যে সুস্পষ্ট পদক্ষেপে তাদের কর্মকাণ্ড উন্নয়ন করা হয়েছে: এসআরএল সিস্টেম বেশীরভাগ ভার্ভের ব্যাপারে সেম্যান্টিক ভূমিকা দিতে পারে এবং আইই', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru izvještavamo o ekstrinskoj procjeni metode pojednostavljanja automatske rečenice u pogledu dva zadatka NLP-a: etiketiranje semantičke uloge (SRL) i ekstrakcije informacija (IE). Papir počinje s našem posmatranjem izazova u unutrašnjoj procjeni sustava pojednostavljanja kazne, koji motivira korištenje ekstrinske procjene tih sustava u pogledu drugih zadataka NLP-a. Mi opisujemo dva sustava NLP-a i test podataka korištenih u ekstrinskoj procjeni, i predstavljamo argumente i dokaze koji motiviraju integraciju koraka pojednostavljanja rečenica kao sredstvo poboljšanja preciznosti tih sustava. Naša procjena pokazuje da je njihov učinkovit poboljšan korakom pojednostavljanja: sistem SRL je bolji u stanju da odredi semantičke uloge većini argumentacija verba i sistem IE je bolji u stanju da identifikuje napunitele za sve mjesta IE template.', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪzda, iki NLP iŇüi il…ô birlikd…ô avtomatik c√ľml…ôl…ôri t…ômizl…ôm…ô metodunun extrinsici deńüerlendirm…ôsi haqqńĪnda x…ôb…ôr veririk: semantik rol etiketi (SRL) v…ô m…ôlumat ekstraksiyasńĪ (IE). KańüńĪt bizim c√ľml…ôl…ôr…ô sad…ôc…ô olaraq t…ôcav√ľzl…ôrimizin g√∂zl…ôm…ôsi il…ô baŇülar ki, bu sisteml…ôrin baŇüqa NLP iŇül…ôrin…ô qarŇüńĪ istifad…ô etm…ôsini motiv edir. Biz iki NLP sistemini v…ô extrinsic deńüerlendirm…ôd…ô istifad…ô edil…ôn sńĪnama veril…ônl…ôri t…ôsdiql…ôyirik, h…ômin argumentl…ôri v…ô kanńĪtlarńĪ bu sisteml…ôrin dońüruluńüunu yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn t…ôsdiql…ôyirik. Bizim deńüerlendirm…ôk onlarńĪn performanslarńĪnńĪn basitlaŇüdńĪrma adńĪmlarńĪ il…ô yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪńüńĪnńĪ g√∂st…ôrir: SRL sistemi verbl…ôrin …ôks…ôriyy…ôtin…ô semantik roll…ôrini t…ôyin ed…ô bil…ôr v…ô IE sistemi b√ľt√ľn IE Ňüablon slotlarńĪ √ľ√ß√ľn Fillers t…ôyin ed…ô bil…ôr.', 'ca': "In this paper, we report on the extrinsic evaluation of an automatic sentence simplification method with respect to two NLP tasks: semantic role labelling (SRL) and information extraction (IE).  El paper comença amb la nostra observació dels reptes en l'evaluació intrínseca dels sistemes de simplificació de frases, que motiva l'ús de l'evaluació extrínsica d'aquests sistemes en relació a altres tasques del NLP. Descrivem els dos sistemes NLP i les dades de prova utilitzades en l'evaluació extrínsica, i presentem arguments i evidències que motiven l'integració d'un pas de simplificació de frases com a mitjà de millorar la precisió d'aquests sistemes. La nostra evaluació revela que el seu rendiment es millora pel pas de simplificació: el sistema SRL és millor capaç d'asignar rols semàntics a la majoria dels arguments dels verbs i el sistema IE és millor capaç d'identificar els llençadors de tots els slots de models IE.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku se zabýváme extrinsickým vyhodnocením metody automatického zjednodušení vět s ohledem na dva úlohy NLP: sémantické označování rolí (SRL) a extrakce informací (IE). Příspěvek začíná pozorováním výzev při vnitřním hodnocení systémů zjednodušení vět, které motivuje využití extrinsického hodnocení těchto systémů s ohledem na další úlohy NLP. Popisujeme oba NLP systémy a testovací data použitá při extrinsickém hodnocení a předkládáme argumenty a důkazy motivující integraci kroku zjednodušení věty jako prostředek ke zlepšení přesnosti těchto systémů. Naše hodnocení ukazuje, že jejich výkon je zlepšen krokem zjednodušení: SRL systém je lépe schopen přiřadit sémantické role většině argumentů slovesa a IE systém je lépe schopen identifikovat plniče pro všechny IE šablony slotů.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös anname aru automaatse lauselihtsustamise meetodi ekstrinsiinsest hindamisest seoses kahe NLP ülesandega: semantilise rolli märgistamine (SRL) ja informatsiooni ekstraktsioon (IE). Artikkel algab meie vaatlusega väljakutsetest lausete lihtsustamise süsteemide sisemises hindamises, mis motiveerib nende süsteemide välise hindamise kasutamist seoses teiste NLP ülesannetega. Kirjeldame kahte NLP süsteemi ja välishindamisel kasutatud katseandmeid ning esitame argumendid ja tõendid, mis motiveerivad lause lihtsustamise etapi integreerimist, et parandada nende süsteemide täpsust. Meie hinnang näitab, et nende tulemuslikkust parandab lihtsustamise samm: SRL-süsteem suudab paremini määrata semantilisi rolle enamikule tegusõnade argumentidele ja IE-süsteem suudab paremini tuvastada täiteaineid kõigile IE mallipesadele.', 'fi': 'T瓣ss瓣 artikkelissa raportoimme automaattisen lauseiden yksinkertaistamismenetelm瓣n ulkoisesta arvioinnista kahden NLP-teht瓣v瓣n osalta: semanttinen roolimerkint瓣 (SRL) ja tiedonhankinta (IE). Ty繹 alkaa havainnoimalla lauseiden yksinkertaistamisj瓣rjestelmien sis瓣isten arviointien haasteita, mik瓣 motivoi n瓣iden j瓣rjestelmien ulkoista arviointia suhteessa muihin NLP-teht瓣viin. Kuvaamme kahta NLP-j瓣rjestelm瓣瓣 ja ulkoisessa arvioinnissa k瓣ytettyj瓣 testitietoja sek瓣 esit瓣mme argumentteja ja todisteita lauseiden yksinkertaistamisvaiheen integroinnista keinona parantaa j瓣rjestelmien tarkkuutta. Arviointimme osoittaa, ett瓣 niiden suorituskyky瓣 parantaa yksinkertaistamisvaihe: SRL-j瓣rjestelm瓣 pystyy paremmin osoittamaan semanttisia rooleja suurimmalle osalle verbien argumenteista ja IE-j瓣rjestelm瓣 pystyy tunnistamaan paremmin t瓣yteaineet kaikille IE-mallipaikoille.', 'sk': 'V prispevku poročamo o zunanjem vrednotenju metode samodejne poenostavitve stavkov v zvezi z dvema nalogama NLP: semantično označevanje vlog (SRL) in pridobivanje informacij (IE). Prispevek se začne z opazovanjem izzivov v notranjem vrednotenju sistemov poenostavitve stavkov, kar motivira uporabo zunanjega vrednotenja teh sistemov glede na druge naloge NLP. Opisujemo dva sistema NLP in preskusne podatke, uporabljene pri zunanjem vrednotenju, ter predstavljamo argumente in dokaze, ki motivirajo integracijo koraka poenostavitve stavka kot sredstvo za izboljšanje natančnosti teh sistemov. Naša ocena pokaže, da se njihova učinkovitost izboljša s korakom poenostavitve: sistem SRL je bolje sposoben dodeliti semantične vloge večini argumentov glagolov, sistem IE pa je bolje sposoben prepoznati polnila za vse reže IE predlog.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã bãyar da lãbãri a kan tunkuɗe wa ɗabi'a farat ɗaya a cikin shirin ayuka biyu na NLP: aikin semantic role labelin (SRL) da cire-bayani (IU). Gagon takarda na fara da taƙaitar da musamman cikin muhalli na cikin muhalli na mutane, wanda ke ƙara amfani da amfani da waɗannan na'urar haske a cikin aikin NLP. Tuna bayyana masu tsari biyu na NLP da data na jarraba wanda aka yi amfani da cikin evaluci na ƙarƙashin, da bayani na yanzu masu motsari da shaidar da ke haramtar da haɗin maganar da aka sauƙa ƙara, kamar hanyar ya gyãra tsarin wannan na'ura. Ana ƙaddara tana bayyana cewa an improve aikin su da hanyarsu na sauƙi: na'urar SRL ya fi zama mafiya alhẽri ga ya raba aikin semanti zuwa mafi yawan jãyayya masu nau'i masu yawa na rubutun masu nau'in rubutu kuma na'anar IU ya fi zama mafiya alhẽri ga ya gane fililer wa duk na layin IU.", 'jv': 'In this paper, we report on the extinSic assertion of an automatically Simplification method with responses to the second NLP tasks: semanti rol label (SSL) and information extration (SE). Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé rambarang sistem NLP durung lan dadi nyong nggunakake iki dadi panggunakake kapan kawit perintah dhéwé, lan babagan barang nggawe sistem sing gak dhéwé nggawe barang kelas Simplification kuwi arep kuwi nggawe barang nggawe sistem iki. Isobanuré awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé kanggo nggawe gerakdhéwé ning kelompok Simplification: sistem CVL sing luwih apik dhéwé iso ngewehku sistem semanti sing gawe gerakdhéwé karo akeh argument yang verb lan sistem CVS sing luwih apik dhéwé, gawe nguasai perusahaan kanggo sabané perusahaan kanggo sabané', 'bo': 'In this paper, we report on the extrinsic evaluation of an automatic sentence simplification method with respect to two NLP tasks: semantic role labelling (SRL) and information extraction (IE). ཤོག ང་ཚོས་NLP མ་ལག་གི་གཉིས་དང་རིམ་པ་གྱི་དཔྱད་བརྟག ང་ཚོའི་དཔྱད་ཞིག་ནི་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ལས་འགན་སྐྱོང་བའི་གྲལ་རིམ་གྱི་རྒྱས་སྤྲོད་དེ་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཡོད་མི་:', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מדווחים על הערכה החיצונית של שיטת פשטות משפטים אוטומטית בנוגע לשני משימות NLP: תיקון תפקיד סמנטי (SRL) והוציאה מידע (IE). העיתון מתחיל עם הבחנה שלנו באתגרים בערכת הערכה הפנימית של מערכות הפשטות משפטים, שמניע את השימוש בערכת הערכה החיצונית של מערכות אלה בנוגע למשימות NLP אחרות. We describe the two NLP systems and the test data used in the extrinsic evaluation, and present arguments and evidence motivating the integration of a sentence simplification step as a means of improving the accuracy of these systems.  Our evaluation reveals that their performance is improved by the simplification step: the SRL system is better able to assign semantic roles to the majority of the arguments of verbs and the IE system is better able to identify fillers for all IE template slots.'}
{'en': 'OlloBot-Towards A Text-Based Arabic Health Conversational Agent : Evaluation and Results', 'ar': 'OlloBot - نحو وكيل محادثة صحية عربي نصي: التقييم والنتائج', 'fr': 'OlloBot - Vers un agent conversationnel de santé arabe basé sur le texte\xa0: évaluation et résultats', 'es': 'OlloBot - Hacia un agente conversacional de salud árabe basado en texto: evaluación y resultados', 'pt': 'OlloBot - Rumo a um agente de conversação de saúde árabe baseado em texto: avaliação e resultados', 'ja': 'OlloBot -テキストベースのアラビア語健康会話エージェントに向けて：評価と結果', 'hi': 'OlloBot - एक पाठ-आधारित अरबी स्वास्थ्य संवादी एजेंट की ओर: मूल्यांकन और परिणाम', 'zh': 'OlloBot - 迈向文本阿拉伯语健康会话代评终', 'ru': 'OlloBot - К тексту на арабском языке: оценка и результаты', 'ga': 'OlloBot - I dTreo Gníomhaire Comhráite Sláinte Araibis Téacsbhunaithe: Meastóireacht agus Torthaí', 'ka': 'Ollobot - ტექსტის ბაზეული აპაბური ჯანმრთელობის შესახებ', 'hu': 'OlloBot - Egy szövegalapú arab egészségügyi beszélgetési ügynök felé: értékelés és eredmények', 'el': 'Προς έναν αραβικό παράγοντα συζήτησης υγείας με βάση το κείμενο: Αξιολόγηση και Αποτελέσματα', 'it': 'OlloBot - Verso un agente di conversazione sulla salute araba basato sul testo: valutazione e risultati', 'mk': 'OlloBot - Напред на текстовиот арапски здравствен конверзационален агент: евалуација и резултати', 'kk': 'Ollobot - Мәтін негіздеген араб саулық қатынау агенті: оценка және нәтижелер', 'lt': 'OlloBot – Tekstinis arabų sveikatos konversijos agentas: vertinimas ir rezultatai', 'ms': 'OlloBot - Ke arah Ejen Perbualan Kesehatan Arab berdasarkan Teks: Evaluasi dan Hasil', 'mt': 'OlloBot - Lejn A ġent Konversazzjonali Għarbi tas-Saħħa bbażat fuq it-Test: Evalwazzjoni u Riżultati', 'ml': 'ഓള്\u200dലോബോട്ട്- അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു പദാവലി അറബി ആഭ്യസ്ഥാനമായ ആഭ്യസ്ഥാന സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഏജന്റ്: Evaluation and Results', 'mn': 'Ollobot - Текст суурилсан Араб эрүүл мэндийн ярилцлагын агент: оюун үнэлгээ, үр дүнг', 'no': 'Ollobot – Gå til ein tekstbasert arabisk helseskonvensjonsverktøy: Evaluering og resultat', 'ro': 'OlloBot - Către un agent arab de conversație privind sănătatea bazat pe text: Evaluare și rezultate', 'pl': 'OlloBot w kierunku tekstowego arabskiego agenta konwersacji zdrowotnej: ocena i wyniki', 'sr': 'Ollobot - prema tekstualnom arapskom razgovoru o zdravlju: Evaluacija i rezultati', 'so': 'OlloBot - Towards A text-based caafimaad Carabi: Evaluation and Results', 'sv': 'OlloBot - Mot en textbaserad arabisk hälsosamtalsagent: Utvärdering och resultat', 'ta': 'OlloBot - Towards A Text-Based Arabic Health Conversational Agent: Evaluation and Results', 'si': 'OlloBot - A Text-based Arab Health Conversations Agent: evalution and Outlook', 'ur': 'Ollobot - ایک متن بنیادی عربی سلامتی مکالمانی اگنٹ کی طرف: Evaluation and Results', 'uz': 'OlloBotStencils', 'vi': 'Một đặc vụ y tế A Văn bản: Đánh giá và kết quả', 'bg': 'Към текстово базиран арабски здравни разговори: оценка и резултати', 'nl': 'OlloBot: Naar een tekst-based Arabisch Health Conversational Agent: Evaluatie en Resultaten', 'hr': 'Ollobot - prema tekstualnom arapskom razgovoru o zdravlju: procjena i rezultati', 'da': 'OlloBot - Mod en tekstbaseret arabisk sundhedssamtaler: Evaluering og resultater', 'de': 'OlloBot auf dem Weg zu einem textbasierten arabischen Gesundheitsdialog: Evaluation und Ergebnisse', 'fa': 'Ollobot - به سمت یک مامور مکالمات سلامتی عربی بنیاد متن: ارزیابی و نتیجه', 'id': 'OlloBot - Menuju Agen Persekutuan Arab Berdasarkan Teks: Evaluasi dan Hasil', 'ko': 'OlloBot - 텍스트 기반의 아랍어 건강 대화 에이전트: 평가 및 결과', 'tr': 'OlloBot - Metin tabanly Arapça Saýlaw Gürüşleri', 'af': "Ollobot - Na 'n Teksbaseerde Arabiese Geselskapsagent: Evaluering en Resultate", 'sq': 'OlloBot - Towards A Text-Based Arabic Health Conversational Agent: Evaluation and Results', 'am': 'OlloBot - ወደላይ A-Text-Based Arabic Health Conversational Agent: Evaluation and Results', 'sw': 'OlloBot - Upande wa Asili ya Afya ya Kiarabu inayotumiwa na maandishi: Uthibitisho na Matokeo', 'hy': 'ՕլոԲոթ - Տեքստի հիմնված արաբական առողջության հաղորդակցման գործակալ՝ գնահատում և արդյունքներ', 'az': 'OlloBot - Metin-tabanlı Arapça Sağlığın Konuşuşuş A ğantısına tərəf: Qıymet və Sonuçlar', 'ca': 'OlloBot - cap a un agent de conversació àrab de salut basat en text: Evaluació i resultats', 'cs': 'OlloBot: Směrem k textově založenému arabskému zdravotnímu konverzačnímu agentovi: hodnocení a výsledky', 'et': 'OlloBot - Tekstipõhise araabia tervisealase vestlusagendi suunas: hindamine ja tulemused', 'bn': 'অল্লোবোট - একটি টেক্সট ভিত্তিক আরবী স্বাস্থ্য আলোচনায় এজেন্ট: পরিমাণ এবং ফলাফল', 'bs': 'Ollobot - prema tekstualnom arapskom razgovoru o zdravlju: procjena i rezultati', 'fi': 'OlloBot - Kohti tekstipohjaista arabialaista terveyskeskustelua: arviointi ja tulokset', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'jv': 'Ollbot - Tahuran A Text-basa Ndoleh sing Hawih Jawih', 'he': 'OlloBot - Towards a Text-Based Arabic Health Conversation Agent: Evaluation and Results', 'sk': 'OlloBot - K besedilni arabski zdravstveni pogovorni agent: ocena in rezultati', 'bo': 'OlloBot - ཡི་གེ་ལ་བསྟེན་ནས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་སྐྱོན་སྐྱོན་གཏམ་གླེང་མོལ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་: བགོ་སྐབས་དང་གྲུབ་འབ'}
{'en': 'We introduce OlloBot, an Arabic conversational agent that assists physicians and supports patients with the care process. It does n’t replace the physicians, instead provides health tracking and support and assists physicians with the care delivery through a conversation medium. The current model comprises healthy diet, physical activity, mental health, in addition to food logging. Not only OlloBot tracks user daily food, it also offers useful tips for healthier living. We will discuss the design, development and testing of OlloBot, and highlight the findings and limitations arose from the testing.', 'ar': 'نقدم أولوبوت ، وكيل المحادثة باللغة العربية الذي يساعد الأطباء ويدعم المرضى في عملية الرعاية. إنه لا يحل محل الأطباء ، بل يوفر بدلاً من ذلك تتبعًا ودعمًا للصحة ويساعد الأطباء في تقديم الرعاية من خلال وسيط محادثة. يشتمل النموذج الحالي على نظام غذائي صحي ونشاط بدني وصحة عقلية بالإضافة إلى تسجيل الطعام. لا يتتبع OlloBot طعام المستخدم اليومي فحسب ، بل يقدم أيضًا نصائح مفيدة لحياة أكثر صحة. سنناقش تصميم وتطوير واختبار OlloBot ، وسنسلط الضوء على النتائج والقيود التي نشأت عن الاختبار.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o OlloBot, um agente de conversação em árabe que auxilia os médicos e apoia os pacientes no processo de atendimento. Ele não substitui os médicos, em vez disso fornece acompanhamento e suporte de saúde e auxilia os médicos na prestação de cuidados por meio de um meio de conversa. O modelo atual contempla alimentação saudável, atividade física, saúde mental, além do registro alimentar. O OlloBot não apenas rastreia a alimentação diária do usuário, mas também oferece dicas úteis para uma vida mais saudável. Discutiremos o design, desenvolvimento e teste do OlloBot e destacaremos as descobertas e limitações decorrentes dos testes.', 'es': 'Presentamos OlloBot, un agente conversacional árabe que ayuda a los médicos y apoya a los pacientes en el proceso de atención. No reemplaza a los médicos, sino que proporciona seguimiento y apoyo de la salud y ayuda a los médicos con la prestación de la atención a través de un medio de conversación. El modelo actual comprende una dieta saludable, actividad física, salud mental, además del registro de alimentos. OlloBot no solo rastrea la comida diaria de los usuarios, sino que también ofrece consejos útiles para una vida más saludable. Discutiremos el diseño, el desarrollo y las pruebas de OlloBot, y destacaremos los hallazgos y las limitaciones que surgieron de las pruebas.', 'fr': "Nous présentons OlloBot, un agent conversationnel en arabe qui aide les médecins et soutient les patients dans le processus de soins. Il ne remplace pas les médecins, mais fournit un suivi et un soutien de la santé et aide les médecins dans la prestation des soins par le biais d'un support de conversation. Le modèle actuel comprend une alimentation saine, l'activité physique, la santé mentale, en plus de l'exploitation des aliments. OlloBot suit non seulement la nourriture quotidienne des utilisateurs, mais il offre également des conseils utiles pour un mode de vie plus sain. Nous discuterons de la conception, du développement et des tests d'OlloBot, et soulignerons les résultats et les limites découlant des tests.", 'ja': 'OlloBotは、医師を支援し、患者のケアプロセスをサポートするアラビア語の会話エージェントです。医師に代わるものではなく、健康トラッキングとサポートを提供し、会話メディアを介したケアの提供を支援します。現在のモデルは、食品伐採に加えて、健康的な食事、身体活動、メンタルヘルスを含みます。OlloBotはユーザーの毎日の食事を追跡するだけでなく、より健康的な生活のための有用なヒントを提供します。OlloBotの設計、開発、テストについて説明し、テストから生じた知見と制限を強調します。', 'zh': '言OlloBot者,阿拉伯语会话代也,助医而持之。 不能代医者,以健助医也。 今之饮食,身体动静,心理健康及食物记录。 OlloBot非徒可以踵用户之饮食,又可以资有用之用。 将论OlloBot之计,开而试之,强其见局限性。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем OlloBot, арабский разговорный агент, который помогает врачам и поддерживает пациентов в процессе ухода. Он не заменяет врачей, а вместо этого обеспечивает отслеживание состояния здоровья и поддержку, а также помогает врачам с оказанием медицинской помощи через средство общения. Нынешняя модель включает в себя здоровое питание, физическую активность, психическое здоровье, а также заготовку продуктов питания. OlloBot не только отслеживает ежедневную еду пользователя, но и предлагает полезные советы для более здоровой жизни. Мы обсудим дизайн, разработку и тестирование OlloBot, а также выделим выводы и ограничения, возникшие в результате тестирования.', 'hi': 'हम OlloBot, एक अरबी संवादी एजेंट का परिचय देते हैं जो चिकित्सकों की सहायता करता है और देखभाल प्रक्रिया के साथ रोगियों का समर्थन करता है। यह चिकित्सकों को प्रतिस्थापित नहीं करता है, इसके बजाय स्वास्थ्य ट्रैकिंग और समर्थन प्रदान करता है और बातचीत के माध्यम से देखभाल वितरण के साथ चिकित्सकों की सहायता करता है। वर्तमान मॉडल में खाद्य लॉगिंग के अलावा स्वस्थ आहार, शारीरिक गतिविधि, मानसिक स्वास्थ्य शामिल हैं। न केवल OlloBot उपयोगकर्ता दैनिक भोजन को ट्रैक करता है, यह स्वस्थ रहने के लिए उपयोगी सुझाव भी प्रदान करता है। हम OlloBot के डिजाइन, विकास और परीक्षण पर चर्चा करेंगे, और परीक्षण से उत्पन्न निष्कर्षों और सीमाओं को उजागर करेंगे।', 'ga': "Cuirimid OlloBot i láthair, gníomhaire comhrá Arabach a chuidíonn le lianna agus a thacaíonn le hothair leis an bpróiseas cúraim. Ní ghlacann sé ionad na lianna, ina ionad sin cuireann sé rianú agus tacaíocht sláinte ar fáil agus cabhraíonn sé le lianna cúram a sheachadadh trí mheán comhrá. Cuimsíonn an tsamhail reatha aiste bia sláintiúil, gníomhaíocht fhisiciúil, meabhairshláinte, chomh maith le logáil bia. Ní hamháin go rianaíonn OlloBot bia laethúil úsáideoirí, cuireann sé leideanna úsáideacha ar fáil freisin maidir le maireachtáil níos sláintiúla. Pléifimid dearadh, forbairt agus tástáil OlloBot, agus leagfaimid béim ar na torthaí agus na teorainneacha a d'eascair as an tástáil.", 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε έναν αραβικό συνομιλητή που βοηθά τους γιατρούς και υποστηρίζει τους ασθενείς με τη διαδικασία φροντίδας. Δεν αντικαθιστά τους γιατρούς, αντίθετα παρέχει παρακολούθηση και υποστήριξη υγείας και βοηθά τους γιατρούς με την παροχή φροντίδας μέσω ενός μέσου συνομιλίας. Το σημερινό μοντέλο περιλαμβάνει υγιεινή διατροφή, σωματική δραστηριότητα, ψυχική υγεία, καθώς και καταγραφή τροφίμων. Όχι μόνο παρακολουθεί το καθημερινό φαγητό των χρηστών, προσφέρει επίσης χρήσιμες συμβουλές για πιο υγιεινή διαβίωση. Θα συζητήσουμε το σχεδιασμό, την ανάπτυξη και τη δοκιμή του και θα επισημάνουμε τα ευρήματα και τους περιορισμούς που προέκυψαν από τη δοκιμή.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აპაბური კონტაქციო ადვნენტი Ollobot, რომელიც ფიზიკონტებს დახმარებს და პოციენტებს დახმარებს პროცესზე. ეს არ შეცვლა ფიქტორიების შეცვლა, მაგრამ საცოცხოვრებას სინამდვილეების შენახვა და დაეხმარებას და დახმარებას ფიქტორიების შესაძლებელება საუბრო მედიაში. მიმდინარე მოდელის შეფარდება ჯანმრთელი განახლება, ფიზიკური განახლება, ფიზიკური განახლება, ფექციალური ჯანმრთელობა, სახლის დამატებით ნვ ჟამჲ ჲლლლჲბჲრ ჟლვეთ ევნზთნჟკთ ჳპანა ნა ოჲლჱთრვლთრვ, რჲგა ოპველჲზაგა თ ოჲლჲზთრვლნთ ოჲლჲგთნთ ჱა ჱეპაგვნ ზთგ. ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ორლობოტის განვითარება, განვითარება და ტესტის განვითარება, და გააღწეროთ შესაძლებლობები და ზომილებები, რომლებიც შეიძლება ტესტიდან.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk az OlloBotot, egy arab beszélgető ügynököt, amely segíti az orvosokat és támogatja a betegeket az ellátási folyamatban. Nem helyettesíti az orvosokat, hanem egészségügyi nyomon követést és támogatást biztosít, és segíti az orvosokat az ellátás átadásában egy beszélgetőeszközön keresztül. A jelenlegi modell magában foglalja az egészséges táplálkozást, a fizikai aktivitást, a mentális egészséget, valamint az élelmiszer-naplózás mellett. Az OlloBot nem csak nyomon követi a felhasználók napi ételeit, hanem hasznos tippeket is kínál az egészségesebb élethez. Megbeszéljük az OlloBot tervezését, fejlesztését és tesztelését, valamint kiemeljük a vizsgálat eredményeit és korlátait.', 'it': "Presentiamo OlloBot, un agente conversazionale arabo che assiste i medici e supporta i pazienti nel processo di cura. Non sostituisce i medici, fornisce invece monitoraggio della salute e supporto e assiste i medici nella consegna delle cure attraverso un mezzo di conversazione. Il modello attuale comprende una dieta sana, l'attività fisica, la salute mentale, oltre alla registrazione degli alimenti. Non solo OlloBot tiene traccia del cibo quotidiano degli utenti, ma offre anche consigli utili per una vita più sana. Discuteremo la progettazione, lo sviluppo e il test di OlloBot, e evidenzieremo i risultati e le limitazioni derivanti dal test.", 'lt': "Mes pristatome OlloBot, arabų kalbos agent ą, kuris padeda gydytojams ir remia pacientus priežiūros procese. It doesn't replace the physicians, instead provides health tracking and support and assists physicians with the care delivery through a conversation medium.  Dabartinis modelis apima sveiką mitybą, fizinį aktyvumą, psichinę sveikatą, be maisto medienos ruošimo. OlloBot ne tik seka vartotojo kasdienį maistą, bet ir teikia naudingų patarimų sveikesniam gyvenimui. Mes aptars OlloBot projektavimą, kūrimą ir bandymus ir pabrėšime bandymų rezultatus ir apribojimus.", 'mk': 'Го претставуваме ОлоБот, арапски разговарачки агент кој им помага на лекарите и ги поддржува пациентите со процесот на грижа. Тоа не ги замени лекарите, наместо тоа обезбедува здравствено следење и поддршка и им помага на лекарите со обезбедување на грижата преку медиум за разговор. Сегашниот модел вклучува здрава диета, физичка активност, ментално здравје, покрај дрвјата на храната. Не само што ОлоБот ја следи секојдневната храна на корисниците, туку и нуди корисни совети за поздрав живот. Ќе разговараме за дизајнот, развојот и тестирањето на ОлоБот и ќе ги истакнеме откритијата и ограничувањата што се појавија од тестирањето.', 'kk': 'Біз дәрігерлерге көмектесетін және пациенттерге көмектесетін араб консультациялық агентін оллоботты таңдаймыз. Бұл дәрігерлерді алмастырмайды, әрі саулық қадағалау және қолдау және дәрігерлерді сөйлесу медиақшасынан көмектеседі. Қолданыстағы үлгі саулы диеттер, физикалық белсенділік, психикалық саулық, жұмыс журналына қосымша. Тек OlloBot пайдаланушылардың күнделік тамағын жазып отырмайды, сондай-ақ ол саулық өмір үшін пайдаланушыларды ұсынады. Оллобот дизайны, жасау және сынақтарын талқылап, сынақтан тапсырмалар мен шектеулерді бояулады.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan OlloBot, ejen perbualan Arab yang membantu doktor dan menyokong pesakit dengan proses rawatan. Ia tidak menggantikan doktor, tetapi menyediakan pengesan kesehatan dan sokongan dan membantu doktor dengan penghantaran rawatan melalui medium perbualan. Model semasa mengandungi diet yang sehat, aktiviti fizikal, kesehatan mental, selain dari logging makanan. Bukan sahaja OlloBot mengesan makanan harian pengguna, ia juga menawarkan nasihat berguna untuk hidup yang lebih sehat. Kami akan membincangkan rancangan, pembangunan dan ujian OlloBot, dan mempertimbangkan penemuan dan keterangan yang muncul dari ujian.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഓള്\u200dലോബോട്ടിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഒരു അറബി സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഏജന്\u200dറിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് വിദ് അത് വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200dക്ക് പകരം സ്വീകരിക്കാന്\u200d പറ്റുന്നില്ല, അതിനു പകരം ആരോഗ്യം ട്രാക്കിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും പ The current model comprises healthy diet, physical activity, mental health, in addition to food logging.  ഓള്\u200dലോബോട്ട് ദിവസവും ഭക്ഷണം മാത്രം ഉപയോക്താവിനെ ട്രാക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നില്ല, അതും സുഖകരമായ ജീവിക്കു നമ്മള്\u200d ഓള്\u200dലോബോട്ടിന്\u200dറെ ഡിസൈന്\u200d, വികസിപ്പ്, പരീക്ഷണത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് സംസാരിക്കും, പരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും നിര്\u200dണ', 'mn': 'Бид эмч нарт тусламжтайгаар, өвчтөнүүдэд тусламжтайгаар тусламжтайгаар Арабын ярианы агент Ollobot-г танилцуулдаг. Үүний оронд эмч нарыг эрүүл мэндийн ажиллагаа, дэмжиж, эмч нарыг харилцааны дурангаар эмч нарт туслах тусламжгүй. Харин одоогийн загвар нь эрүүл хоол, физик үйл ажиллагаа, сэтгэл санааны эрүүл мэндэд, хоолны логингоор нэмэгддэг. Зөвхөн OlloBot хэрэглэгчийн өдөр тутмын хоолыг дамжуулдаг биш, мөн эрүүл амьдралын тулд ашигтай санал өгдөг. Бид Оллоботын дизайн, хөгжлийн болон тестийн талаар ярилцаж, шалгалтаас гарсан зүйлсийг тодорхойлох болно.', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu OlloBot, aġent ta’ konverżjoni Għarbi li jassisti lit-tobba u jappoġġja lill-pazjenti bil-proċess tal-kura. Ma tissostitwixxix lit-tobba, minflok tipprovdi traċċar u appoġġ tas-saħħa u tgħin lit-tobba fit-twassil tal-kura permezz ta’ mezz ta’ konverżjoni. Il-mudell attwali jinkludi dieta b’saħħitha, attività fiżika, saħħa mentali, flimkien mal-qtugħ tal-ikel. Mhux biss OlloBot jittraċċa l-ikel ta’ kuljum tal-utent, iżda joffri wkoll pariri utli għal għajxien aktar b’saħħtu. Ser niddiskutu d-disinn, l-iżvilupp u l-ittestjar ta’ OlloBot, u nibqgħu enfasizzati s-sejbiet u l-limitazzjonijiet li nħolqu mill-ittestjar.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy OlloBot, arabski środek rozmowy, który pomaga lekarzom i wspiera pacjentów w procesie opieki. Nie zastępuje lekarzy, zamiast tego zapewnia śledzenie i wsparcie zdrowia oraz pomaga lekarzom w świadczeniu opieki za pośrednictwem nośnika konwersacji. Obecny model obejmuje zdrową dietę, aktywność fizyczną, zdrowie psychiczne oraz rejestrację żywności. OlloBot nie tylko śledzi codzienną żywność użytkowników, oferuje również przydatne wskazówki dotyczące zdrowszego życia. Omówimy projekt, rozwój i testowanie OlloBota oraz podkreślimy ustalenia i ograniczenia wynikające z testów.', 'ro': 'Introducem OlloBot, un agent arab de conversație care asistă medicii și sprijină pacienții în procesul de îngrijire. Acesta nu înlocuiește medicii, în schimb oferă urmărirea sănătății și sprijin și asistă medicii cu livrarea îngrijirii printr-un mediu de conversație. Modelul actual cuprinde dieta sanatoasa, activitatea fizica, sanatatea mentala, pe langa logarea alimentelor. Nu numai că OlloBot urmărește alimentele zilnice ale utilizatorilor, oferă, de asemenea, sfaturi utile pentru o viață mai sănătoasă. Vom discuta despre proiectarea, dezvoltarea și testarea OlloBot și vom evidenția constatările și limitările apărute în urma testării.', 'sr': 'Upoznajemo Ollobota, arapskog razgovornog agenta koji pomaže liječnicima i podržava pacijente u procesu zaštite. To ne zameni liječnike, umjesto toga pruža zdravstveno praćenje i podršku i pomaže liječnicima sa dostavljanjem brige kroz razgovorni medij. Trenutni model uključuje zdravu dijetu, fizičku aktivnost, mentalno zdravlje, u dodatnom dnevniku hrane. Ne samo Ollobot prati svakodnevnu hranu korisnika, nego takođe nudi korisne savete za zdravlje živote. Razgovaraćemo o dizajnu, razvoju i testiranju Ollobota, i osvjetlićemo nalaze i ograničenja iz testiranja.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer OlloBot, ein arabisk samtaleagent som hjelper legene og støttar pasienter med behandlingsprosessen. Det byter ikkje ut legene, i staden tilbyr helsesporing og støtte og hjelper legene med forskyvinga gjennom eit samtalemedium. Det gjeldande modellen inneheld helse diet, fysisk aktivitet, mentale helse, i tillegg til matlogging. Ikkje berre OlloBot spor brukarar daglig mat, men det tilbyr også nyttige tips for helgare liv. Vi vil diskutera utviklinga, utviklinga og testing av Ollobot, og merke opplysningane og begrensningane som oppstod frå testen.', 'so': 'Waxaannu soo bandhignaa OlloBot oo ah dhakhtarka hadalka Carabiga ah oo caawinaya dhakhtarka iyo kaalmeynta daryeelka caafimaadka. Dhakhaatiirta uma beddelo, taas oo ka bedela waxay dhakhtarka ka caafimaadka iyo caawimaad ka heli karaan in daryeelka caafimaadka lagu soo daayo dhexdhexe talo ah. Tusaale joogta ah waxaa ka mid ah cuntada caafimaadka, dhakhtarka jimicsiga, caafimaadka dhimirka ka sokow ogeysiiska cuntada. Maalin walba cuntada ee OlloBot oo keliya maaha isticmaalaha, waxay sidoo kale siisaa tijaamo faa’iido leh oo ku saabsan nolosha caafimaadka. Waxaannu ka sheekaynaynaa sawirada, horumarinta iyo imtixaanka OlloBot, waxaana tusaynaa dhammaadka iyo xadhigyada imtixaanka ka soo baxay.', 'si': 'අපි ඔල්ලෝබෝට්ව ප්\u200dරදානය කරනවා, අරාබි කතා කරණාකරණ නියෝජිතයෙක්, වෛද්\u200dයාවරුන්ට උදව් කරනවා සහ ර ඒක වෛද්\u200dයවර්තයෝ වෙනස් කරන්නේ නැහැ, ඒකෙන් ස්වාස්ත්වය පරීක්ෂණය සහ උදව් කරන්න සහ වෛද්\u200dයාවර්තයෝ විද්\u200dයාපා දැන් මොඩල් එක්ක ස්වාස්ථ්\u200dය දේවල්, භෞතික ක්\u200dරියාත්මක, මන්ත්\u200dරික ස්වාස්ත්මක, කෑම ලොග් එක් OlloBot විතරයි හැමදාම ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ කෑමක් පරික්ෂා කරන්නේ නැහැ, ඒකෙන් හොඳ ජීවත් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරය අපි ඔල්ලෝබෝට්ගේ සිද්ධානය, විකාශය, පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය කතා කරනවා, පරීක්ෂණයෙන් සොයාගන්න සහ සීමාවන', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar OlloBot, en arabisk samtalsagent som hjälper läkare och stöder patienter i vårdprocessen. Det ersätter inte läkarna utan ger istället hälsospårning och stöd och hjälper läkare med vårdleverans via ett konversationsmedium. Den nuvarande modellen omfattar hälsosam kost, fysisk aktivitet, psykisk hälsa, förutom matloggning. OlloBot spårar inte bara användarens dagliga mat, det erbjuder också användbara tips för ett hälsosammare liv. Vi kommer att diskutera design, utveckling och testning av OlloBot, samt belysa fynd och begränsningar som uppstått från testningen.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு அரபி பேச்சு முகவரை அறிவிக்கிறோம். அது மருத்துவர்களுக்கு உதவி மற்றும் நோயாளிகளுக்கு ஆதரிக்கிறது. இது மருத்துவர்களை மாற்றுவதில்லை, பதிலாக சுகாதார பாதுகாப்பு மற்றும் ஆதரவு வழங்குகிறது மற்றும் ஒரு பேச்சு நடுவாக தற்போதைய மாதிரி உடல் சரியான உணவு, உடல் செயல்பாடு, மனசூழ்ச்சியை கூடுகிறது, உணவு பதிவு கூடுதல். OlloBot மட்டும் தொடர்ந்து பயனர் ஒவ்வொரு நாளும் உணவை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கவில்லை, அதும் உடலானவர்கள் வாழ்க்கைக்கு பயன நாம் ஓல்லோபோட்டின் வடிவமைப்பு, உருவாக்கம் மற்றும் சோதனையை விவாதம் செய்ய வேண்டும், மற்றும் சோதனையில் இருந்து தே', 'ur': 'ہم Ollobot کو معرفی کرتے ہیں، ایک عربی مکالمانی اژنٹ جو پزشکوں کی مدد کرتا ہے اور بیماروں کی مدد کرتا ہے۔ یہ ڈاکٹروں کو بدل نہیں دیتا، اس کے بدلے سلامتی ترکینگ اور مدد دیتا ہے اور ڈاکٹروں کو ایک صحبت میڈی کے ذریعہ سے مدد دیتا ہے. موجود موڈل میں سلامتی کھانا، فیزیکی فعالیت، ذهنی سلامتی، غذا لگ کرنے کے علاوہ بھی ہے. Ollobot صرف روزانی کھانے کے لئے استعمال کرنے والے کو ترک نہیں کرتا، یہ بھی بہت سالم زندگی کے لئے فائدہ نصیحت کرتا ہے. ہم Ollobot کی طراحی، توسعہ اور آزمائش کے بارے میں بحث کریں گے اور آزمائش سے نتیجے اور محدودیت کو روشن کریں گے۔', 'uz': "We introduce OlloBot, an Arabic conversational agent that assists physicians and supports patients with the care process.  Bu doktorlarga o'zgartirib boʻlmaydi, o'rniga tibbiy qidirish va qo'llashni qo'shish va taxminan narsa orqali qo'shishga yordam beradi. Joriy model sog'loqni qo'shishdan qo'shish, fysik aktivlik, mental tibbiy soʻzni qo'shish uchun. Bu faqat OlloBot foydalanuvchiga har kuni chakula qo'yish uchun foydalanuvchini ko'rsatadi. Bu qo'shimcha hayot uchun foydalanuvchilarni qo'llaydi. Biz OlloBotning dizayni, taʼminlovchi va sinov qilamiz, va tizimning natijalari va chegaralarini ko'rsatamiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu OlloBot, một đại diện đối thoại Ả Rập hỗ trợ các bác sĩ và hỗ trợ các bệnh nhân chăm sóc. Nó không thay thế các bác sĩ, thay vào đó cung cấp theo dõi và hỗ trợ sức khỏe và hỗ trợ y t ế với sự cung cấp chăm sóc qua một phương tiện đối thoại. Phương pháp hiện thời gồm ăn uống lành mạnh, hoạt động vật lý, sức khỏe tinh thần, ngoài khai thác khai thác thực phẩm. Không chỉ OlloBot đánh dấu thức ăn hàng ngày của người dùng, còn cung cấp mẹo hữu ích để sống khỏe mạnh hơn. Chúng ta sẽ thảo luận về thiết kế, phát triển và thử nghiệm của OlloBot, và nhấn mạnh những kết quả và giới hạn do thử nghiệm đưa ra.', 'bg': 'Представяме ви арабски разговорен агент, който подпомага лекарите и подпомага пациентите в процеса на грижа. Той не замества лекарите, вместо това осигурява проследяване на здравето и подкрепа и помага на лекарите при предоставянето на грижи чрез медия за разговор. Настоящият модел включва здравословно хранене, физическа активност, психично здраве, в допълнение към събирането на храна. Не само следи ежедневната храна на потребителите, но и предлага полезни съвети за по-здравословен живот. Ще обсъдим дизайна, разработването и тестването на ОлоБот и ще подчертаем констатациите и ограниченията, възникнали от тестването.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo Arapskog razgovornog agenta OlloBota koji pomaže liječnicima i podržava pacijente s procesom zaštite. To ne zamjenjuje liječnike, umjesto toga pruža zdravstveno praćenje i podršku i pomaže liječnicima dostavljanjem brige kroz razgovorni medij. Trenutni model uključuje zdravu dijetu, fizičku aktivnost, mentalno zdravlje, u dodatnom dnevniku hrane. Ne samo da OlloBot prati svakodnevnu hranu korisnika, nego također nudi korisne savjete za zdraviji život. Razgovarat ćemo o dizajnu, razvoju i testiranju Ollobota i osvjetliti nalaze i ograničenja iz testa.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer OlloBot, en arabisk samtaleagent, der hjælper læger og støtter patienter med plejeprocessen. Det erstatter ikke lægerne, i stedet giver sundhedsporing og støtte og hjælper lægerne med plejeleveringen gennem et samtalemedicin. Den nuværende model omfatter sund kost, fysisk aktivitet, mental sundhed samt madlogning. Ikke kun OlloBot sporer brugerens daglige mad, det tilbyder også nyttige tips til sundere liv. Vi vil diskutere design, udvikling og test af OlloBot, og fremhæve de fund og begrænsninger, der opstod af testen.', 'nl': 'We introduceren OlloBot, een Arabisch gespreksmiddel dat artsen helpt en patiënten ondersteunt bij het zorgproces. Het vervangt de artsen niet, maar biedt gezondheidstracking en ondersteuning en helpt artsen bij de zorgverlening via een gespreksmedium. Het huidige model omvat gezonde voeding, lichamelijke activiteit, geestelijke gezondheid, naast voedsellogging. OlloBot houdt niet alleen dagelijks voedsel bij, maar biedt ook handige tips voor gezonder leven. We bespreken het ontwerp, de ontwikkeling en het testen van OlloBot en belichten de bevindingen en beperkingen die voortvloeien uit het testen.', 'ko': '아랍어 대화 에이전트인 올로봇을 소개해 의사와 환자의 간호 과정을 돕는다.그것은 의사를 대신하지 않고 건강 추적과 지원을 제공하고 대화 매체를 통해 의사의 간호를 돕는다.현재의 모델은 건강한 음식, 체육 활동, 심리 건강과 음식 기록을 포함한다.올로봇은 이용자의 일상적인 식사를 추적할 뿐 아니라 건강에 유익한 생활 팁을 제공한다.OlloBot의 설계, 개발 및 테스트에 대해 논의하고 테스트 결과와 한계를 강조합니다.', 'de': 'Wir stellen OlloBot vor, ein arabisches Gesprächsmittel, das Ärzte unterstützt und Patienten bei der Pflege unterstützt. Es ersetzt nicht die Ärzte, sondern bietet Gesundheitstracking und Unterstützung und unterstützt Ärzte bei der Versorgung durch ein Gesprächsmedium. Das aktuelle Modell umfasst gesunde Ernährung, körperliche Aktivität, psychische Gesundheit sowie Nahrungsmittelprotokollierung. OlloBot verfolgt nicht nur die tägliche Ernährung des Benutzers, sondern bietet auch nützliche Tipps für ein gesünderes Leben. Wir werden das Design, die Entwicklung und das Testen von OlloBot diskutieren und die Erkenntnisse und Einschränkungen hervorheben, die sich aus dem Testen ergeben.', 'sw': 'Tunatambulisha OlloBot, ajenda wa mazungumzo ya Kiarabu inayowasaidia madaktari na kuwasaidia wagonjwa wenye mchakato wa huduma. Haibadilishi madaktari, badala yake inatoa ufuatiliaji wa afya na kuunga mkono na kuwasaidia madaktari kwa kutolewa huduma kwa njia ya mazungumzo. Mfano wa sasa unajumuisha chakula cha afya, shughuli za kimwili, afya ya kiakili, zaidi ya kuandika chakula. Sio tu OlloBot hufuatilia watumiaji wa chakula cha kila siku, pia hutoa tiba muhimu kwa ajili ya maisha ya afya. Tutajadili ubunifu, maendeleo na jaribio la OlloBot, na tutaonyesha matokeo na mipaka yaliyotokea kwenye jaribio hilo.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan OlloBot, agen percakapan Arab yang membantu dokter dan mendukung pasien dengan proses perawatan. Ini tidak menggantikan dokter, tetapi menyediakan pelacakan kesehatan dan dukungan dan membantu dokter dengan pengiriman perawatan melalui media percakapan. Model saat ini mengandung diet yang sehat, aktivitas fisik, kesehatan mental, tambahan pada logging makanan. Tidak hanya OlloBot melacak makanan sehari-hari pengguna, tapi juga menawarkan tips yang berguna untuk kehidupan yang lebih sehat. Kita akan mendiskusikan desain, pengembangan dan tes OlloBot, dan mempertimbangkan penemuan dan batasan yang muncul dari tes.', 'fa': 'ما اولوبوت را معرفی می کنیم، یک مامور صحبت عربی که پزشکان را کمک می کند و بیماران را در حال مراقبت پشتیبانی می کند. به جای آن، پزشکان را جایگزین نمی کند، به جای آن، ردیابی و پشتیبانی سلامتی را می دهد و پزشکان را از طریق یک رسانه صحبت کمک می کند. مدل فعلی شامل رژیم سالم، فعالیت فیزیکی، سلامتی روانی، در addition to food logging. نه تنها اولوبوت هر روز غذای کاربر را دنبال می\u200cکند، بلکه برای زندگی سالم\u200cتر نیز نوشته\u200cهای مفید می\u200cکند. ما در مورد طراحی، توسعه و آزمایش اولوبوت صحبت می کنیم، و نتیجه\u200cها و محدودیت\u200cها را از آزمایش بیرون می\u200cآوریم.', 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë OlloBot, një agjent arab biseda që ndihmon mjekët dhe mbështet pacientët me procesin e kujdesit. Ajo nuk zëvendëson mjekët, në vend t ë kësaj ofron ndjekje shëndetësore dhe mbështetje dhe ndihmon mjekët me furnizimin e kujdesit nëpërmjet një mjedisi bisedimi. Modeli aktual përfshin diet ë të shëndetshme, aktivitet fizik, shëndet mental, përveç shkëmbimit të ushqimeve. Jo vetëm OlloBot ndjek ushqimin e përditshëm të përdoruesve, ajo ofron gjithashtu këshilla të dobishme për jetesë më të shëndetshme. Ne do të diskutojmë projektimin, zhvillimin dhe testimin e OlloBot dhe do të theksojmë gjetjet dhe kufizimet që kanë ardhur nga testimi.', 'tr': "Biz lukmanlara kömek edip, hastalary gözlemek prosesi bilen destekleýän bir arabça sohbet ajaýyny OlloBot'y tanyşdyrýarys. Bu lukmanlaryň ýerine saglyk gözlemegini we desteklemegini saýlamaýar we lukmanlary söhbetdeşlik ortasyndan saýlamaýar. Häzirki nusga saglykly diýmek, fizik janlaýyşlyklary, garşy saglyklary, iýmit günlügine golaýlaşyklaryna golaýlaýar. Diňe OlloBot günlük naharyny sözleýän däl, şol hem sağlıklyk ýaşaýan üçin faydaly tipler saýlaýar. Ollobot'un tasarımı, gelişmeyi ve sınamasını tartışacağız ve testinden gelen çözümleri ve sınırlarını aydınlatacağız.", 'am': 'በሐሳቦች ላይ የሚረዳ የሆኑት እና በቤተ ክርስቲያን ጉዳይ ላይ የሚረዳውን አረቢያ የሚናገር የኦሎቦትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ባለ መድኃኒቶችን አይለውጥም፤ በአካባቢው መካከለኛ ድጋፍ የጤና መግለጫ እና የደግሞት መድኃኒቶችን ይረዳል፡፡ የአሁኑ ሞዴል ጤናዊ መብል፣ አካባቢ ሥራ፣ የmental ጤና ነው፡፡ የኦሎቦት ቀኑን መብል ብቻ አይደለም፣ ለጤናዊ መኖሪያ የሚጠቅመውን ጥቅም ለማድረግ ነው፡፡ የኦሎቦት ፍጥረት እናውቃለን የምንሞከረውንም ፍጥረት እናነጋግራለን፥ ከፈተናውም ፍጥረቱንና ግንኙነቱን እናሳይራለን።', 'az': "Biz bir ərəbcə danışma aģentəsi Ollobot'u tanıdırırıq ki, doktorlara kömək edir və xəstələrə gözləmə prosesi ilə dəstəkləyir. Bunun yerinə t əhsil izləməsi və dəstəkləməsi və təhsil vasitəsilə təhsil edilməsi üçün təhsil edən doktorları əvəz etməz. Hazırkı modeli sağlam yemək, fizik aktivitet, mental sağlamlıq, yemək logging istifadəsində. OlloBot yalnız günlük yemək istifadəçisini izləyir, həmçinin daha sağlamlı yaşam üçün faydalı nəsihətlər də təklif edir. Ollobot dizaynı, gelişməsi və sınaması barəsində mübahisə edəcəyik və sınaqdan gələn tapıları və sınırları işıqlandıracağıq.", 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ՕլոԲոթին, արաբական հաղորդակցման գործակալ, որը օգնում է բժիշկներին և աջակցում է հիվանդներին խնամքի գործընթացով: Այն չի փոխարինում բժիշկներին, փոխարենը ապահովում է առողջապահության հետազոտություն և աջակցություն, և օգնում է բժիշկներին խնամքի մատուցման միջոցով խոսակցության միջոցով: Այսօրվա մոդելը բաղկացած է առողջ սննդի, ֆիզիկական ակտիվության, հոգեկան առողջության, նաև սննդի փայտից: Ոչ միայն ՕլոԲոտը հետևում է օգտագործողների առօրյա սնունդը, այլ նաև օգտակար խորհուրդ է տալիս առողջարար ապրելու համար: Մենք կքննարկենք ՕլոԲոտի դիզայնը, զարգացումը և փորձարկումները, և կնշենք փորձարկումների արդյունքները և սահմանափակումները:', 'bn': 'আমরা একজন আরবী আলোচনাকারী এজেন্টের সাথে অল্লোবোটের পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যারা চিকিৎসাকে সাহায্য করে এবং সেবা প্রক্রি এটা চিকিৎসার পরিবর্তে স্বাস্থ্য ট্র্যাকিং এবং সমর্থন প্রদান করে এবং সেবা প্রদান করে একটি কথোপকথন মাধ্যমের মাধ্যমে। বর্তমান মডেলের মধ্যে স্বাস্থ্য খাদ্য, শারীরিক কার্যক্রম, মানসিক স্বাস্থ্য, খাদ্য লগিং ছাড়া। প্রতিদিনের খাবার ব্যবহারকারীরা শুধু অল্লোবোট ট্র্যাক করে না, এটি স্বাস্থ্য বাস করার জন্য ব্যবহারকারীদের ক আমরা অল্লোবোটের ডিজাইন, উন্নয়ন এবং পরীক্ষা নিয়ে আলোচনা করব এবং পরীক্ষার ফলাফল এবং সীমাবদ্ধতা উল্লেখ করব।', 'af': "Ons introduiseer Ollobot,  'n Arabske gesprekslykagent wat dokters assistent en paciente ondersteun met die sorg proses. Dit vervang nie die dokters nie, in plaas verskaf geen gesondige volg en ondersteun en assistent die dokters met die sorgverkry deur 'n gespreksmedium nie. Die huidige model bevat gesond diet, fisiese aktiwiteit, mentale gesondheid, in addition to food logging. Nie net OlloBot snit gebruiker daglige kos nie, dit gee ook nuttige tipes vir gesondiger lewe. Ons sal die ontwerp, ontwikkeling en toets van Ollobot bespreek en die gevindings en beperking van die toets verlig.", 'bs': 'Upoznajemo OlloBota, arapskog razgovornog agenta koji pomaže liječnicima i podržava pacijente s procesom zaštite. To ne zamjenjuje liječnike, umjesto toga pruža zdravstveno praćenje i podršku i pomaže liječnicima dostaviti pažnju kroz razgovorni medij. Trenutni model uključuje zdravu dijetu, fizičku aktivnost, mentalno zdravlje, u dodatnom dnevniku hrane. Ne samo OlloBot prati svakodnevnu hranu korisnika, nego također nudi korisne savjete za zdraviji život. Razgovarat ćemo o dizajnu, razvoju i testiranju Ollobota, i osvjetlićemo nalaze i ograničenja iz testa.', 'cs': 'Představujeme OlloBot, arabský konverzační agent, který pomáhá lékařům a podporuje pacienty v procesu péče. Nenahrazuje lékaře, místo toho poskytuje sledování a podporu zdraví a pomáhá lékařům s poskytováním péče prostřednictvím konverzačního média. Současný model zahrnuje zdravou stravu, fyzickou aktivitu, duševní zdraví, kromě protokolování potravin. Nejen, že OlloBot sleduje každodenní potraviny uživatelů, nabízí také užitečné tipy pro zdravější život. Budeme diskutovat o návrhu, vývoji a testování OlloBotu a upozorníme na zjištění a omezení vyplývající z testování.', 'ca': "Apresentem OlloBot, un agent de conversació àrab que ajuda als metges i ajuda als pacients amb el procés de cura. No substitueix els metges, en comptes d'això proporciona seguiment i suport de salut i ajuda els metges a prestar atenció a través d'un mitjà de conversa. El model actual consisteix en dieta saludable, activitat física, salut mental, a més dels boscos alimentaris. No només l'OlloBot segueix el menjar diari dels usuaris, també ofereix consells útils per a viure més saludable. Discutirem el disseny, el desenvolupament i les proves d'OlloBot, i destacarem els descobriments i limitacions que van sorgir dels proves.", 'et': 'Tutvustame OlloBoti, araabia vestlusagenti, mis abistab arste ja toetab patsiente raviprotsessis. See ei asenda arste, vaid pakub tervise jälgimist ja tuge ning abistab arste ravi osutamisel vestlusmeediumi kaudu. Praegune mudel hõlmab tervislikku toitumist, füüsilist aktiivsust, vaimset tervist, lisaks toidukogumisele. OlloBot mitte ainult ei jälgi kasutaja igapäevast toitu, vaid pakub ka kasulikke nõuandeid tervislikumaks eluks. Arutame OlloBoti projekteerimist, arendamist ja testimist ning tõstame esile testimisest tekkinud leiud ja piirangud.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme OlloBotin, arabialaisen keskustelukumppanin, joka auttaa l채채k채reit채 ja tukee potilaita hoitoprosessissa. Se ei korvaa l채채k채reit채, vaan tarjoaa terveydentilan seurantaa ja tukea sek채 auttaa l채채k채reit채 hoidon toimittamisessa keskusteluv채lineen kautta. Nykyinen malli sis채lt채채 terveellisen ruokavalion, liikunnan, mielenterveyden sek채 ruoankeruun. OlloBot ei vain seuraa k채ytt채j채n p채ivitt채ist채 ruokaa, se tarjoaa my철s hy철dyllisi채 vinkkej채 terveellisemp채채n el채m채채n. Keskustelemme OlloBotin suunnittelusta, kehitt채misest채 ja testauksesta sek채 korostamme testauksesta syntyneit채 havaintoja ja rajoituksia.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nglanggar OlLObot, karo Perusahaan Perusahaan Rasané sing nyebutaké dhéwé lan nglanggar barang seneng pisan Care. Ora ono ndabah sawian sing perbudhakan nganggep nglanggar oleh, lan nglanggar barang kelas karo dolanan sing perbudhakan nganggep kuwi layang maning. Model sing ngentambah nduwe masa sing wér, aksis fêsik, sing larang resan, ngono nganggep kanggo ngilangno mangan. Ora bener Ollo bot sing menehi nggawe barang wektu, dadi nyimpen sugilan kanggo ngerasai ora. Awak dhéwé bakal nggunakake design, nggunakake lan ujian OlLObot, lan nglanggar kuwi nggawe barang lan ujian sisan gawan testing.', 'ha': "Tuna introduce OlloBot, mai taƙaitãwa na Larabci, wanda ke taimakon daktari da mataimaki da kuma ke ƙarfafa mataimaki da ma'abũcin taƙaita. Bai musanya madaidaici, kuma yana ƙara taimakon afya da mataimaki da kuma yana taimakon daktari da matsayi da za'a samu'a da mazaɓa. Ana ƙunsa da abincin mai amfani da shi a yanzu, yana da amfani da halin rai, da abin da ke ƙara shiga matsayin. Ba ta zama ba fãce OlloBot na biyar amfani da abincin a koyau, kuma yana bãyar da misãlai masu amfani ga masu da mazaunin a mazaɓa. Zã mu yi magana a kan design, Development da jarrabin OlloBot, kuma Mu shine fassaran da ƙaddara daga jarrabãwa.", 'he': 'אנחנו מכירים את אולובוט, סוכן שיחה ערבי שעוזר לרופאים ותומך במטופלים בתהליך הטיפול. זה לא מחליף את הרופאים, במקום זה מספק מעקב בריאות ותמיכה ועוזר לרופאים בשלוח הטיפול דרך מדיום שיחה. הדוגמא הנוכחית כוללת דיאטה בריאה, פעילות פיזית, בריאות נפשית, בנוסף לתעלות מזון. לא רק אולובוט עוקב אחרי אוכל יומי משתמש, הוא גם מציע טיפים שימושיים לחיים בריאים יותר. אנחנו נדון על עיצוב, פיתוח ובדיקות של אולובוט, ונדגיש את הממצאים והמגבלות שנוצאו מהבדיקות.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo OlloBot, arabski pogovorni agent, ki pomaga zdravnikom in podpira bolnike pri procesu oskrbe. Ne nadomešča zdravnikov, namesto tega zagotavlja sledenje zdravju in podporo ter pomaga zdravnikom pri zagotavljanju oskrbe prek medija za pogovor. Trenutni model obsega zdravo prehrano, telesno aktivnost, duševno zdravje, poleg beleženja hrane. Ne samo, da OlloBot spremlja dnevno hrano uporabnikov, ampak ponuja tudi koristne nasvete za bolj zdravo življenje. Razpravljali bomo o oblikovanju, razvoju in testiranju OlloBota ter poudarili ugotovitve in omejitve, ki so nastale pri testiranju.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་སྨན་པ་ཚོར་རྨན་པ་དང་སྨན་པ་ཚོར་གྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་ཨ་ལོ་བོ་དང་བཅས་ཀྱི་ དེ་འདིས་སྨན་པ་ཚོར་ཚབ་བཅུག་མི་བྱེད་པར། ཨ་ནོ་སྐྱོན་རྗེས་ཀྱི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་དང་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མེད་པར། ཨ་ནོ་ས ད་ལྟོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དུ་ནད་མེད་སྔར་བས་ནད་མེད་དུས་བདེ་འཇགས་ཀྱི་་ཞུགས་དང་། སྐྱེས་ཆེན་སྐྱོན་དང་། ཡང་ན སྐབས་དེར་OlloBot དྲ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་གཅིག་མིན་པ་ལས་ནད་མེད་པར། དེ་ནི་ཡང་ནད་མེད་པའི་འཚོ་སྐྱོན་ ང་ཚོས་OlloBot(OlloBot)ཡི་བཟོ་བརྗོད་དང་། ཡར་རྒྱས་ལྗོངས་དང་བརྟག་དཔྱད་བྱེད་དགོས་བརྗོད་བྱེད་དགོས།'}
{'en': 'Summarizing Legal Rulings : Comparative Experiments', 'fr': 'Synthèse des décisions juridiques\xa0: expériences comparatives', 'es': 'Resumiendo las sentencias legales: experimentos comparativos', 'ar': 'تلخيص الأحكام الشرعية: تجارب مقارنة', 'pt': 'Resumindo Normas Jurídicas: Experimentos Comparativos', 'ja': '法的判断のまとめ：比較実験', 'zh': '法断总结:较实验', 'hi': 'कानूनी नियमों को सारांशित करना: तुलनात्मक प्रयोग', 'ru': 'Суммирование правовых решений: сравнительные эксперименты', 'ga': 'Achoimre ar Rialuithe Dlíthiúla: Turgnaimh Chomparáideacha', 'ka': 'კონფიგურაცია წესილური პროლინდები: შესაბამისი ექსპერიმენტები', 'el': 'Σύνοψη νομικών αποφάσεων: Συγκριτικά πειράματα', 'hu': 'Jogi döntések összefoglalása: összehasonlító kísérletek', 'it': 'Sintesi delle decisioni giuridiche: esperimenti comparativi', 'kk': 'Тұжырымдамасы: Қарастырылған тәжірибелер', 'lt': 'Teisinių sprendimų santrauka: lyginamieji eksperimentai', 'mk': 'Резимирање на правните одлуки: споредливи експерименти', 'ml': 'നിയമപരമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ചുരുക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Sommarju tar-Regolamenti Legali: Esperimenti komparattivi', 'mn': 'Шуль хууль шалтгаан дээр дуусгах: Хасах туршилт', 'ms': 'Mengringkasan Peraturan Hukum: Eksperimen Berbanding', 'no': 'Samandringa av juridiske rulingar: Samandrande eksperimenter', 'pl': 'Podsumowanie orzeczeń prawnych: eksperymenty porównawcze', 'ro': 'Rezumatul hotărârilor juridice: Experimente comparative', 'sr': 'Sažetivanje pravnih rulinga: usporedni eksperimenti', 'so': 'Summary of sharciga: Comparative Experiments', 'sv': 'Sammanfattning av rättsliga avgöranden: Jämförande experiment', 'ta': 'சட்ட விதிமுறைகளை சுருக்குதல்: ஒப்பிடும் சோதனைகள்', 'si': 'සම්පූර්ණ විධානය සම්පූර්ණය: සම්පූර්ණ පරීක්ෂණය', 'ur': 'قانونی رولینگ جمع کرتا ہے: مقابلہ تجربے', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Tóm tắt các quy tắc pháp lý:', 'hr': 'Sažetak pravnih rulinga: usporedni eksperimenti', 'da': 'Sammenfattende retsafgørelser: Sammenlignende eksperimenter', 'bg': 'Обобщение на правните решения: сравнителни експерименти', 'de': 'Zusammenfassung der Rechtsprechung: Vergleichsversuche', 'nl': 'Samenvatting van juridische uitspraken: vergelijkende experimenten', 'id': 'Summarizing Legal Rulings: Comparative Experiments', 'ko': '총괄 법률 판결: 비교 실험', 'tr': 'Hukuk azatları toplamlaşdırılýar: Taýraty deneyler', 'af': 'Opsomming van wetlike rulings: Vergelyklike eksperimente', 'sq': 'Përshkrimi i Vendimeve ligjore: Eksperimente krahasuese', 'fa': 'جمع کردن رولینگ\u200cهای قانونی: تجربه\u200cهای مقایسه', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa Utawala wa Sheria: Comparative Experiments', 'am': 'Comparative Experiments', 'az': '奡磅鿄넠創汩湧泉饲椠呯灬懅齤쒱牭慱㨠兡祡珄넠쒰얟汥浬즙爊', 'bs': 'Sažetivanje pravnih rulinga: usporedni eksperimenti', 'hy': 'Օրինակական որոշումների համառոտագրությունը. համեմատական փորձեր', 'bn': 'আইনের সামার্মিটিং: তুলনামূলক পরীক্ষা', 'cs': 'Shrnutí právních rozhodnutí: srovnávací experimenty', 'ca': 'Resumir les Regles Jurídices: Experiments Comparatius', 'et': 'Õiguslike otsuste kokkuvõte: võrdlevad katsed', 'fi': 'Oikeudellisten päätösten yhteenveto: vertailevat kokeet', 'jv': 'name', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'סכם החלטות משפטיות: ניסויים שווותיים', 'sk': 'Povzetek pravnih sodb: primerjalni poskusi', 'bo': 'རྩིས་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་བསྡུས་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'In the context of text summarization, texts in the legal domain have peculiarities related to their length and to their specialized vocabulary. Recent neural network-based approaches can achieve high-quality scores for text summarization. However, these approaches have been used mostly for generating very short abstracts for news articles. Thus, their applicability to the legal domain remains an open issue. In this work, we experimented with ten extractive and four abstractive models in a real dataset of legal rulings. These models were compared with an extractive baseline based on heuristics to select the most relevant parts of the text. Our results show that abstractive approaches significantly outperform extractive methods in terms of ROUGE scores.', 'ar': 'في سياق تلخيص النص ، تتمتع النصوص في المجال القانوني بخصائص تتعلق بطولها ومفرداتها المتخصصة. يمكن للنهج القائمة على الشبكة العصبية الحديثة أن تحقق درجات عالية الجودة لتلخيص النص. ومع ذلك ، فقد تم استخدام هذه الأساليب في الغالب لتوليد ملخصات قصيرة جدًا للمقالات الإخبارية. وبالتالي ، فإن قابليتها للتطبيق على المجال القانوني تظل قضية مفتوحة. في هذا العمل ، جربنا عشرة نماذج استخلاصية وأربعة نماذج تجريدية في مجموعة بيانات حقيقية للأحكام القانونية. تمت مقارنة هذه النماذج بخط أساس استخلاصي قائم على الاستدلال لتحديد الأجزاء الأكثر صلة من النص. تظهر نتائجنا أن الأساليب التجريدية تتفوق بشكل كبير على الأساليب الاستخراجية من حيث درجات ROUGE.', 'pt': 'No contexto da sumarização de textos, os textos do domínio jurídico apresentam peculiaridades relacionadas à sua extensão e ao seu vocabulário especializado. Abordagens recentes baseadas em redes neurais podem alcançar pontuações de alta qualidade para sumarização de texto. No entanto, essas abordagens têm sido usadas principalmente para gerar resumos muito curtos para artigos de notícias. Assim, sua aplicabilidade ao domínio jurídico permanece uma questão em aberto. Neste trabalho, experimentamos dez modelos extrativos e quatro abstrativos em um banco de dados real de decisões jurídicas. Esses modelos foram comparados com uma linha de base extrativa baseada em heurísticas para selecionar as partes mais relevantes do texto. Nossos resultados mostram que as abordagens abstrativas superam significativamente os métodos extrativos em termos de pontuações ROUGE.', 'fr': 'Dans le contexte de la synthèse de textes, les textes du domaine juridique présentent des particularités liées à leur longueur et à leur vocabulaire spécialisé. Les approches récentes basées sur les réseaux de neurones peuvent obtenir des scores de haute qualité pour la synthèse de texte Cependant, ces approches ont surtout été utilisées pour générer de très courts résumés pour des articles de presse. Leur applicabilité au domaine juridique reste donc une question ouverte. Dans ce travail, nous avons expérimenté dix modèles extractifs et quatre modèles abstraits dans un ensemble de données réelles de décisions juridiques. Ces modèles ont été comparés à une base extractive basée sur des heuristiques afin de sélectionner les parties les plus pertinentes du texte. Nos résultats montrent que les approches abstraites surpassent de manière significative les méthodes extractives en termes de scores ROUGE.', 'es': 'En el contexto de la síntesis de textos, los textos en el dominio legal tienen peculiaridades relacionadas con su longitud y su vocabulario especializado. Los enfoques recientes basados en redes neuronales pueden lograr puntuaciones de alta calidad para el resumen de textos. Sin embargo, estos enfoques se han utilizado principalmente para generar resúmenes muy breves para artículos de noticias. Por lo tanto, su aplicabilidad al dominio legal sigue siendo un tema abierto. En este trabajo, experimentamos con diez modelos extractivos y cuatro abstractivos en un conjunto de datos real de sentencias legales. Estos modelos se compararon con una línea de base extractiva basada en heurística para seleccionar las partes más relevantes del texto. Nuestros resultados muestran que los enfoques abstractivos superan significativamente a los métodos extractivos en términos de puntuaciones ROUGE.', 'ja': 'テキストの要約の文脈では、法的領域のテキストには、その長さと専門的な語彙に関連する特異性があります。最近のニューラルネットワークベースのアプローチは、テキスト要約のための高品質のスコアを達成することができる。しかし、これらのアプローチは、主にニュース記事の非常に短い要約を生成するために使用されてきました。したがって、法的領域への適用性は依然として未解決の問題である。この研究では、10の抽象的モデルと4つの抽象的モデルを、法的判断の実際のデータセットで実験しました。これらのモデルをヒューリスティックに基づいた抽出ベースラインと比較し、テキストの最も関連性の高い部分を選択した。私たちの結果は、抽象的アプローチが抽出方法よりもROUGEスコアの点で著しく優れていることを示しています。', 'zh': '文本摘要之背景,法域之文本,有关长词汇之特殊性。 近者神经网络之法,可以成文本摘要之高质量分。 然此术主于新闻文成短摘要。 故其于法域者适用性犹一悬而未决也。 于此之中,吾于法断之实数集试十取四象。 比之启发式基线,以择其最者也。 吾之的结果表明,ROUGE评分而言之,抽象之明优于取也。', 'ru': 'В контексте обобщения текста тексты в правовой области имеют особенности, связанные с их объемом и их специализированным словарным запасом. Недавние подходы, основанные на нейронной сети, могут достичь высококачественных баллов для обобщения текста. Однако эти подходы использовались главным образом для подготовки очень кратких тезисов новостных статей. Таким образом, их применимость к правовой сфере остается открытым вопросом. В этой работе мы экспериментировали с десятью добывающими и четырьмя абстрактными моделями в реальном наборе данных правовых решений. Эти модели сравнивались с экстрактивной базовой линией на основе эвристики для выбора наиболее релевантных частей текста. Наши результаты показывают, что абстрактные подходы значительно превосходят экстрактивные методы по показателям РУЖА.', 'hi': 'पाठ सारांशीकरण के संदर्भ में, कानूनी डोमेन में ग्रंथों में उनकी लंबाई और उनकी विशेष शब्दावली से संबंधित विशिष्टताएं हैं। हाल ही में तंत्रिका नेटवर्क-आधारित दृष्टिकोण पाठ सारांशीकरण के लिए उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले स्कोर प्राप्त कर सकते हैं। हालांकि, इन दृष्टिकोणों का उपयोग ज्यादातर समाचार लेखों के लिए बहुत कम सार उत्पन्न करने के लिए किया गया है। इस प्रकार, कानूनी डोमेन के लिए उनकी प्रयोज्यता एक खुला मुद्दा बनी हुई है। इस काम में, हमने कानूनी फैसलों के वास्तविक डेटासेट में दस निष्कर्षण और चार अमूर्त मॉडल के साथ प्रयोग किया। इन मॉडलों की तुलना पाठ के सबसे प्रासंगिक भागों का चयन करने के लिए ह्यूरिस्टिक्स के आधार पर एक निष्कर्षण आधार रेखा के साथ की गई थी। हमारे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि अमूर्त दृष्टिकोण काफी रूज स्कोर के मामले में निष्कर्षण विधियों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ga': 'I gcomhthéacs achoimriú téacs, tá tréithe ag baint le téacsanna sa réimse dlíthiúil a bhaineann lena bhfad agus lena sainfhoclóir. Is féidir le cuir chuige néaracha líonra-bhunaithe le déanaí scóir ardcháilíochta a bhaint amach maidir le hachoimriú téacs. Mar sin féin, baineadh úsáid as na cineálacha cur chuige seo go príomha chun achoimrí an-ghearr a ghiniúint d’ailt nuachta. Mar sin, tá a n-infheidhmeacht i leith an fhearainn dhlíthiúil ina saincheist oscailte fós. Sa saothar seo, rinneamar tástáil ar dheich gcinn de mhúnlaí eastóscacha agus ceithre mhúnla teibí i bhfíor-thacar sonraí de rialuithe dlíthiúla. Cuireadh na samhlacha seo i gcomparáid le bonnlíne eastóscach bunaithe ar heuristic chun na codanna is ábhartha den téacs a roghnú. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go sáraíonn cur chuige teibí modhanna eastóscacha go mór i dtéarmaí scóir ROUGE.', 'el': 'Στο πλαίσιο της σύνοψης κειμένων, τα κείμενα στον νομικό τομέα έχουν ιδιαιτερότητες που σχετίζονται με το μήκος τους και το εξειδικευμένο λεξιλόγιο τους. Πρόσφατες προσεγγίσεις με βάση τα νευρωνικά δίκτυα μπορούν να επιτύχουν υψηλής ποιότητας βαθμολογίες για την περίληψη κειμένου. Ωστόσο, αυτές οι προσεγγίσεις έχουν χρησιμοποιηθεί κυρίως για τη δημιουργία πολύ σύντομων αφηρημάτων για άρθρα ειδήσεων. Έτσι, η εφαρμογή τους στον νομικό τομέα παραμένει ανοικτό ζήτημα. Στην εργασία αυτή, πειραματιστήκαμε με δέκα εξαγωγικά και τέσσερα αφηρημένα μοντέλα σε ένα πραγματικό σύνολο νομικών αποφάσεων. Τα μοντέλα αυτά συγκρίθηκαν με μια αναλυτική βάση βάσης βασισμένη σε heuristics για την επιλογή των πιο συναφών τμημάτων του κειμένου. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι οι αφηρημένες προσεγγίσεις ξεπερνούν σημαντικά τις εξαγωγικές μεθόδους όσον αφορά τις βαθμολογίες ROUGE.', 'hu': 'A szövegösszefoglalás összefüggésében a jogi szövegek hosszával és speciális szókincseikkel kapcsolatos sajátosságokkal rendelkeznek. A legújabb neurális hálózati alapú megközelítések kiváló minőségű pontszámokat érhetnek el a szövegösszefoglaláshoz. Ezeket a megközelítéseket azonban leginkább arra használták, hogy nagyon rövid összefoglalókat készítsenek a hírekhez. Így a jogi területre való alkalmazhatóságuk továbbra is nyitott kérdés. Ebben a munkában tíz extraktív és négy absztraktív modellel kísérleteztünk egy valódi jogítéletben. Ezeket a modelleket egy heurisztikán alapuló extraktív alaprajzzal hasonlítottuk össze a szöveg legrelevánsabb részeinek kiválasztásához. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy az absztraktív megközelítések jelentősen felülmúlják az extraktív módszereket a ROUGE pontszámok tekintetében.', 'ka': 'ტექსტის კონტექსტურაციის კონტექსტურაციაში, სექსტური დიომინის ტექსტი აქვს განსხვავებული სიგრძე და სპეციალური სიგრძე. მიმდინარე ნეიროლური ქსელის მიღება შეიძლება ტექსტის სიმბოლოებისთვის მარტივი წოგების მიღება. მაგრამ, ეს პროგრამები უფრო მეტად გამოყენებულია აბსტრაქტის შექმნავისთვის. ამიტომ, მათი სახელსაწინო დიომინში სახელსაწინო პროგრამები დარჩენა გახსნილი პროგრამები. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტით 10 ექსტრაქტური და 4 აბსტრაქტური მოდელებით წესილური წესების რეალური მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია. ეს მოდელები ტექსტის ყველაზე მნიშვნელოვანი ნაწილეების შესაბამისად ექსტრაქტიური ფესტური ხაზი დაბათებულია. ნაქთრვ პვჱსლრართ ოჲკაჱგაარ, ფვ აბჟრპაკრთგნთრვ ოპთჟლვეგარ მნჲდჲ ოჲგვფვ ჲრ თკჟრპაკრთგნთრვ მვრჲეთ ოჲ ოჲჟლვეგანვრჲ ნა ROUGE.', 'it': "Nel contesto della sintesi testuale, i testi in ambito giuridico presentano peculiarità legate alla loro lunghezza e al loro vocabolario specializzato. Recenti approcci basati su reti neurali possono ottenere punteggi di alta qualità per la sintesi del testo. Tuttavia, questi approcci sono stati utilizzati principalmente per generare abstract molto brevi per articoli di notizie. Pertanto, la loro applicabilità al settore giuridico rimane una questione aperta. In questo lavoro, abbiamo sperimentato dieci modelli estrattivi e quattro astratti in un vero e proprio dataset di sentenze legali. Questi modelli sono stati confrontati con una base di riferimento estrattiva basata sull'euristica per selezionare le parti più rilevanti del testo. I nostri risultati mostrano che gli approcci astratti superano significativamente i metodi estrattivi in termini di punteggi ROUGE.", 'kk': 'Мәтін тұжырымдамасында жаңа домендегі мәтіндердің ұзындығына және өзінің арнаулы сөздігіне қатынау мүмкіндіктері бар. Жуырдағы невралдық желінің негіздеген қасиеттері мәтін тұжырымдамасының жоғары сапаттамасын жеткізе алады. Бірақ бұл жағдайларды жаңалық мақалалар үшін көп қысқа абстракты құру үшін қолданылады. Сондықтан, олардың жаңа доменге қолдануға мүмкіндігі ашық мәселе болады. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз оның есікті және төрт абстрактивті үлгілерді жалғыз ережелердің деректер жиынында тәжірибедік. Бұл үлгілер мәтіннің ең маңызды бөлшектерін таңдау үшін геуристиканың негізгі сызығымен салыстырылды. Біздің нәтижелеріміз, абстрактивтік жағдайда ROUGE нәтижелерінің сәйкестіктеріне көмектесу әдістерін көмектеседі.', 'lt': 'Teksto apibendrinimo kontekste teisinės srities tekstai turi ypatumus, susijusius su jų ilgiu ir specializuotu žodynu. Naujausi nervų tinklu pagrįsti metodai gali pasiekti aukštos kokybės rezultatus teksto santraukai. Tačiau šie metodai daugiausia buvo naudojami rengiant labai trumpas naujienų straipsnių abstraktus. Taigi jų taikymas teisinei sričiai išlieka atviras klausimas. Šiame darbe išbandėme dešimt ekstraktyvių ir keturių abstrakcinių modelių iš tikrųjų teisinių sprendimų rinkinio. Šie modeliai buvo lyginami su ekstraktyvia baze, pagrįsta heuristika, siekiant atrinkti svarbiausias teksto dalis. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad abstraktyvūs metodai gerokai viršija gavybos metodus ROUGE rezultatų atžvilgiu.', 'mk': 'Во контекст на резултатот на текстот, текстовите во правниот домен имаат особности поврзани со нивната должина и со нивниот специјализиран речник. Recent neural network-based approaches can achieve high-quality scores for text summarization.  Сепак, овие пристапи се користат претежно за генерирање на многу кратки апстракти за вести. Така, нивната апликабилност во правниот домен останува отворено прашање. Во оваа работа експериментиравме со десет екстрактивни и четири апстрактивни модели во вистински податоци на правни одлуки. Овие модели беа споредени со екстрактивна основа базирана на хеористика за избор на најрелевантните делови од текстот. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека апстрактивните пристапи значително ги надминуваат екстрактивните методи во поглед на ROUGE резултатите.', 'ms': 'Dalam konteks ringkasan teks, teks dalam domain undang-undang mempunyai peculiariti berkaitan dengan panjang dan vokbulari khusus mereka. Pendekatan berasaskan rangkaian saraf baru-baru ini boleh mencapai skor kualiti tinggi untuk ringkasan teks. Namun, pendekatan ini telah digunakan kebanyakan untuk menghasilkan abstrak yang sangat pendek untuk artikel berita. Oleh itu, kemampuan mereka untuk domain undang-undang tetap isu terbuka. Dalam kerja ini, kami eksperimen dengan sepuluh model ekstraktif dan empat model abstraktif dalam set data sebenar keputusan undang-undang. Model ini dibandingkan dengan dasar ekstraktif berdasarkan heuristik untuk memilih bahagian paling relevan teks. Hasil kita menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan abstraktif jauh lebih daripada kaedah ekstraktif dalam terma skor ROUGE.', 'mt': 'Fil-kuntest tas-sommarju tat-test, it-testi fil-qasam legali għandhom partikolaritajiet relatati mat-tul tagħhom u mal-vokabulari speċjalizzat tagħhom. Approċċi reċenti bbażati fuq in-netwerk newrali jistgħu jiksbu punteġġi ta’ kwalità għolja għas-sommarju tat-test. Madankollu, dawn l-approċċi ntużaw l-aktar għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ astratti qosra ħafna għall-artikoli tal-aħbarijiet. Għalhekk, l-applikabbiltà tagħhom għad-dominju legali tibqa’ kwistjoni miftuħa. F’dan ix-xogħol, esperimentajna b’għaxar mudelli estrattivi u erba’ mudelli astratti f’sett ta’ dejta reali ta’ deċiżjonijiet legali. Dawn il-mudelli tqabblu ma’ linja bażi estrattiva bbażata fuq l-ewristika biex jintgħażlu l-partijiet l-aktar rilevanti tat-test. Our results show that abstractive approaches significantly outperform extractive methods in terms of ROUGE scores.', 'ml': 'പദാവലിയുടെ ചുരുക്കത്തിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d, നിയമമായ ഡോമെയിനിലെ പദാവലികള്\u200d അവയുടെ നീളവും പ്രത്യേക വാക്കുകളുമായി ബന്ധപ് അടുത്തിടെയുള്ള നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറുവല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ സ്കോര്\u200dട്ടുകള്\u200d പദാവലിയുടെ ചുരുക്ക എന്നാലും ഈ സമ്പാദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d മിക്കവാറും വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ പേരില്\u200d വളരെ ചെറുതായ അബ്രാക്ട്രാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കു അതുകൊണ്ട് അവരുടെ നിയമമായ ഡോമെയിനുള്ള പ്രയോഗം തുറന്ന പ്രശ്നമാണ്. ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പത്ത് എക്രട്ടീവിനും നാല് പ്രത്യേക മോഡലുകളുമായി പരീക്ഷിച്ചു. യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വിധികളില്\u200d നിയമങ്ങള വാചകത്തിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാന്\u200d ഹൂരിസ്റ്റിക്സ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d എ Our results show that abstractive approaches significantly outperform extractive methods in terms of ROUGE scores.', 'mn': 'Текст хэвлэлийн тухай хууль хэлбэрийн текст нь урт болон мэргэжлийн үгийг холбогдож байдаг. Саяхан мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд суурилсан арга баримтууд текст цуглуулах үед өндөр чанартай оноо гаргаж чадна. Гэвч эдгээр арга баримтууд мэдээллийн баримтуудын тулд ихэнхдээ богино хэмжээсүүд бий болгоход хэрэглэгдсэн. Тиймээс тэдний хууль хэлбэрт хэрэглэх нь нээлттэй асуудал байдаг. Энэ ажил дээр бид хуулийн шийдвэр дээр 10 нэмэлт, 4 abstractive загвартай туршиж үзсэн. Эдгээр загварууд текстийн хамгийн чухал хэсгийг сонгохын тулд хюристикийн үндсэн суурь шулуунтай харьцуулсан. Бидний үр дүнд abstractive approaches нь ROUGE тооны хувьд нэмэлт арга замыг илүү үр дүнтэй болгодог гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'W kontekście podsumowania tekstów teksty w dziedzinie prawnej mają specyfikę związaną z długością i specjalistycznym słownictwem. Najnowsze podejścia oparte na sieci neuronowej mogą osiągnąć wysokiej jakości wyniki podsumowania tekstu. Jednak podejścia te zostały wykorzystane głównie do generowania bardzo krótkich streszczeń dla artykułów wiadomościowych. Zastosowanie ich w dziedzinie prawnej pozostaje zatem kwestią otwartą. W niniejszej pracy eksperymentowaliśmy z dziesięcioma modelami ekstrakcyjnymi i czterema abstrakcyjnymi w realnym zbiorze danych orzeczeń prawnych. Modele te zostały porównane z wydobywczą bazą bazową opartą na heurystyce w celu wybrania najbardziej istotnych części tekstu. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że podejścia abstrakcyjne znacznie przewyższają metody ekstrakcyjne pod względem wyników ROUGE.', 'no': 'I sammendrag med tekstsammendrag har tekstar i rettdomenet eigenskapar relaterte til lengden og spesialiserte ordbokstavar. Nyleg brukte nøyralnettverksbaserte tilnærmingar kan oppnå høg kvalitetscorer for sammendraging av tekst. Desse tilnærmingane er imidlertid brukte for å laga svært kort abstrakt for nye artiklar. Derfor er dei tilgjengelege tilgjengelege tilgjengelege tilgjengelege tilgjengelege tilgjengelege domenet eit opna problem. I denne arbeiden eksperimenterte vi med ti ekstraktiv og fire abstraktive modeller i eit verkeleg datasett av rettreglar. Desse modelane vart samanlikna med eit ekstraktivt baseline basert på heuristikk for å velja dei mest relevante delene av teksten. Resultatet våre viser at abstraktive tilnærmingar går betydelig enn ekstraktiv metodar i forhold til ROUGE-poeng.', 'ro': 'În contextul rezumatului textelor, textele din domeniul juridic au particularități legate de lungimea lor și de vocabularul lor specializat. Abordările recente bazate pe rețele neurale pot obține scoruri de înaltă calitate pentru rezumarea textului. Cu toate acestea, aceste abordări au fost folosite în principal pentru generarea rezumatelor foarte scurte pentru articole de știri. Astfel, aplicabilitatea lor în domeniul juridic rămâne o problemă deschisă. În această lucrare, am experimentat zece modele extractive și patru modele abstractive într-un set real de date de hotărâri juridice. Aceste modele au fost comparate cu o referință extractivă bazată pe euristică pentru a selecta cele mai relevante părți ale textului. Rezultatele noastre arată că abordările abstractive depășesc semnificativ metodele extractive în ceea ce privește scorurile ROUGE.', 'sr': 'U kontekstu sažetanja teksta, teksti u pravnom domenu imaju posebnosti vezane za njihovu dužinu i za njihov specijalizovani rečenik. Nedavni pristupi na neuronskoj mreži mogu postići visoke kvalitetne rezultate za sažetak teksta. Međutim, ovi pristupi su uglavnom korišteni za stvaranje vrlo kratkih apstrakta za novinske članake. Dakle, njihova primjena na pravnu domenu ostaje otvorena pitanja. U ovom poslu smo eksperimentirali sa deset ekstraktivnih i četiri apstraktivnih modela u pravom setu podataka pravnih odluka. Ovi modeli su uspoređeni sa ekstraktivnom početnom linijom na temelju heuristike da bi odabrali najvažnije dijelove teksta. Naši rezultati pokazuju da apstraktivni pristup značajno iznosi ekstraktivne metode u smislu rezultata ROUGE-a.', 'so': 'Xiriirka qoraalka waxaa ku qoran qoraalka gudaha sharciga ah oo la xiriira dhererkooda iyo hadalkooda gaarka ah. Dhaqdhaqaalaha shabakadda neurada ee ugu dambeeyay waxay heli karaan qiimaha sare ee heerka qoraalka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qaababkan waxaa inta badan loo isticmaalay in ay sameeyaan dhamaanyo gaaban oo aad u gaaban. Sidaa darteed sharcigu wuxuu ku habboon yahay arrin furan. Shaqadan, waxan ku jirrabnay toban qof oo dhaqdhaqaaq ah iyo afar noocyo oo cayilo ah, si dhab ah looga baaraandegay xukunka sharciga. Tusaaladan waxaa la barbaray qoraal ah oo ku saleysan heuristic si loo doorto qaybaha ugu muhiimsan ee qoraalka. Abaalkayaga waxay muuqataa in qofka aan dhaqdhaqaaqsanayn uu si weyn u soo dhaqdhaqaaqo qaabab la baxsado oo ku saabsan scoraha ROUGE.', 'sv': 'I samband med textsammanfattning har texter inom det juridiska området särdrag relaterade till deras längd och deras specialiserade ordförråd. Nya neurala nätverksbaserade tillvägagångssätt kan uppnå högkvalitativa poäng för textsammanfattning. Dessa metoder har dock främst använts för att generera mycket korta abstracts för nyhetsartiklar. Följaktligen är deras tillämplighet på det rättsliga området fortfarande en öppen fråga. I detta arbete experimenterade vi med tio extraktiva och fyra abstraktiva modeller i en verklig datauppsättning rättsliga avgöranden. Dessa modeller jämfördes med en extraktiv baslinje baserad på heuristik för att välja de mest relevanta delarna av texten. Våra resultat visar att abstrakta metoder avsevärt överträffar extraktiva metoder när det gäller ROUGE poäng.', 'si': 'පාළ සම්පූර්ණයේ සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, නීතිය ස්ථානයේ පාළුවන්ට ඔවුන්ගේ ලාම සහ ඔවුන්ගේ විශේෂ ශබ්ද ශබ්ද පාළුවන් සුරකුණු වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබෙන්න පුළුවන්. නමුත්, මේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් වැඩියෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරලා තියෙනවා වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න. ඉතින්, ඔවුන්ගේ නීතික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නීතික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. මේ වැඩේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරලා නීතිය නියෝජනයේ ඇත්තම දත්ත සූදානයක් තියෙනවා. මේ මොඩේල්ස් එක්ක හෙයුරිස්ටික්ස් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විස අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අවස්ථාවක් ගොඩක් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාර විදිහට ROUGE', 'ta': 'உரை சுருக்கம் செய்யும் பொழுது, சட்டப்பகுதியில் உள்ள உரைகள் அவர்களுடைய நீளம் மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய சொல்வளத்தின் சிறப்பு சொல்லு Recent neural network-based approaches can achieve high-quality scores for text summarization.  ஆனால், இந்த அணுகல்கள் பெரும்பாலாகவே செய்தி கட்டுரைகளுக்கு சிறிய குறைந்த ஒதுங்குப்பெண்களை உருவாக் அதனால், அவர்களுடைய சட்ட களத்தின் பயன்பாடு திறந்த பிரச்சனையில் இருக்கிறது. இந்த வேலையில், நாங்கள் பத்து வெளியேற்றுதல் மற்றும் நான்கு சோதனையில் செய்தோம் ஒரு உண்மையான விதிவாக்குகளில்  இந்த மாதிரிகள் உரையின் மிக முக்கியமான பகுதிகளை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க அடிப்படையில் செயல்படுத்தும் அடிப்படையில் ஒப் நம்முடைய முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது என்றால் வெளியேற்ற முறைகளை மிகவும் வெளியேற்றும் வழிகளில் செயல்படுத்தும் என்', 'ur': 'ٹیکسٹ جمع کرنا کے متعلق، قانون ڈومین کے متعلق پیغام کے متعلق ان کی طول اور ان کی مخصوص صحبت کے متعلق مخصوص اختیار ہیں. اچھی نئورل نیٹ ورک کی بنیاد رکھی ہوئی تقریبا ٹکسٹ سکونٹ کے لئے بہت سی کیفیت سکونٹ پہنچ سکتی ہے. لیکن یہ طریقے اخباروں کے لئے بہت چھوٹے آب تراکٹ پیدا کرنے کے لئے استعمال کئے گئے ہیں. اسی طرح، ان کے قانون ڈومین پر ان کی کاربردی ایک کھلی مسئلہ ہے۔ ہم نے اس کام میں دس اضافہ اور چار اضافہ موڈل کے ساتھ ایک حقیقی ڈیٹ سٹ قانونی قوانین میں آزمائش کی۔ یہ موڈلے ایک اخلاقی بنیس لین کے ساتھ مقایسہ کیے گئے ہیں جو ہوریسٹیکس پر بنیاد رکھی گئی تھی تاکسٹ کے سب سے اخلاقی قسموں کو انتخاب کرنے کے لئے۔ ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ آب تراکٹیوں کی تقریبا بہت اضافہ طریقے سے کام لیتے ہیں', 'uz': "Matn hisoblanishi muhitida, sharciga domenning matnlar uzunligi va ularning махсус луғатлар bilan bog'liq. Yaqinda yangi tarmoq asosida murojaat qilingan murojaat darajalari matnni tahrirlash uchun yuqori darajaga ega boʻlishi mumkin. Lekin, bu murakkablarning ko'pchiligi yangi maqolalar uchun juda qisqa abstraktlar yaratish uchun ishlatiladi. Shunday qilib, ularning qoidagi domen dasturlari ochiq muammolar. Bu ishda biz yetti ekstraktiv va to'rtta ta'sirlik modellari bilan ishlab chiqardik, bu haqiqiqiy ma'lumotlar qoidalarida. Ushbu modellar matnning eng muhim qismlarini tanlash uchun heuristik asosida yaratilgan ekstraktiv baseline bilan kamaytirilgan. Bizning natijalarimizni ko'rsatadi, abstraktiv murakkablarini ROUGE scorlari bilan ajratish usullarini juda muhim qiladi.", 'vi': 'Trong trường hợp tổng hợp văn bản, văn bản trong lĩnh vực pháp lý có những đặc điểm riêng biệt liên quan đến độ dài và từ điển chuyên môn của họ. Cách tiếp cận mạng thần kinh gần đây có thể đạt điểm cao cho việc tổng kết văn bản. Tuy nhiên, các phương pháp này được dùng hầu hết để tạo ra các trừu tượng rất ngắn cho các bài báo. Do đó, họ vẫn còn tồn tại trong lãnh vực pháp lý. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi thí nghiệm với mười mẫu trích dẫn và bốn mẫu trích dẫn trong một tập tin đầy đủ các phán quyết pháp luật. Những mẫu này được so sánh với một cơ sở cơ bản khai thác dựa trên thần kinh để chọn phần liên quan nhất của văn bản. Kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy các phương pháp trừu tượng còn tệ hơn các phương pháp trích dẫn nhiều về điểm của ROG.', 'da': 'I forbindelse med tekstsammenfatningen har tekster på det juridiske område særlige forhold i forhold til deres længde og deres specialiserede ordforråd. Nylige neurale netværksbaserede tilgange kan opnå høj kvalitet scores for tekst opsummering. Disse tilgange er imidlertid primært blevet brugt til at generere meget korte abstracts til nyhedsartikler. Derfor er deres anvendelighed på det juridiske område stadig et åbent spørgsmål. I dette arbejde eksperimenterede vi med ti ekstraktive og fire abstraktive modeller i et reelt datasæt af retsafgørelser. Disse modeller blev sammenlignet med en ekstraktiv basislinje baseret på heuristik for at vælge de mest relevante dele af teksten. Vores resultater viser, at abstraktive tilgange betydeligt overgår ekstraktive metoder med hensyn til ROUGE scores.', 'hr': 'U kontekstu sažetke teksta, teksti u pravnom domenu imaju posebnosti povezane s njihovom dužinom i sa njihovim specijaliziranim riječnikom. Nedavni pristupi na temelju neurone mreže mogu postići visoke kvalitetne rezultate za sažetak teksta. Međutim, ovi pristupi su uglavnom korišteni za stvaranje vrlo kratkog apstrakta za novinske članake. Dakle, njihova primjena na pravnu domenu ostaje otvorena pitanja. U ovom poslu smo eksperimentirali sa deset ekstraktivnih i četiri apstraktivnih modela u pravom setu podataka pravnih odluka. Ovi modeli su uspoređeni s ekstraktivnom početnom linijom na temelju heuristike kako bi odabrali najvažnije dijelove teksta. Naši rezultati pokazuju da apstraktivni pristupi značajno iznosi ekstraktivne metode u smislu rezultata ROUGE-a.', 'nl': 'In het kader van tekstsamenvatting hebben teksten in het juridische domein eigenaardigheden met betrekking tot hun lengte en hun gespecialiseerde woordenschat. Recente neurale netwerkgebaseerde benaderingen kunnen hoogwaardige scores voor tekstsamenvatting bereiken. Deze benaderingen zijn echter vooral gebruikt voor het genereren van zeer korte abstracts voor nieuwsberichten. De toepasbaarheid ervan op het juridische domein blijft dus een open kwestie. In dit werk experimenteerden we met tien extractieve en vier abstractieve modellen in een reële dataset van juridische rulings. Deze modellen werden vergeleken met een extractieve baseline op basis van heuristiek om de meest relevante delen van de tekst te selecteren. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat abstractieve benaderingen aanzienlijk beter presteren dan extractieve methoden in termen van ROUGE scores.', 'de': 'Im Rahmen der Textzusammenfassung weisen Texte im Rechtsbereich Besonderheiten hinsichtlich ihrer Länge und ihres Fachvokabulars auf. Neuere neuronale Netzwerkbasierte Ansätze können qualitativ hochwertige Ergebnisse für die Textzusammenfassung erzielen. Diese Ansätze wurden jedoch meist zur Erzeugung sehr kurzer Abstracts für Nachrichtenartikel verwendet. Ihre Anwendbarkeit auf den Rechtsbereich bleibt daher offen. In dieser Arbeit experimentierten wir mit zehn extraktiven und vier abstraktiven Modellen in einem realen Datensatz von Rechtsprechung. Diese Modelle wurden mit einer extraktiven Baseline auf Basis von Heuristiken verglichen, um die relevantesten Textteile auszuwählen. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass abstraktive Ansätze in Bezug auf ROUGE-Scores die extraktiven Methoden deutlich übertreffen.', 'id': 'In the context of text summarization, texts in the legal domain have peculiarities related to their length and to their specialized vocabulary.  Pendekatan jaringan saraf terbaru dapat mencapai skor kualitas tinggi untuk penerangan teks. Namun, pendekatan ini telah digunakan kebanyakan untuk menghasilkan abstrak yang sangat pendek untuk artikel berita. Jadi, aplikabilitas mereka pada bidang hukum tetap masalah terbuka. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami bereksperimen dengan sepuluh model ekstraktif dan empat model abstraktif dalam dataset yang nyata keputusan hukum. Model-model ini dibandingkan dengan dasar ekstraktif berdasarkan heuristik untuk memilih bagian yang paling relevan dari teks. Our results show that abstractive approaches significantly outperform extractive methods in terms of ROUGE scores.', 'bg': 'В контекста на обобщаването на текстовете текстовете в правната сфера имат особености, свързани с тяхната дължина и специализиран речник. Последните подходи, базирани на невронна мрежа, могат да постигнат висококачествени резултати за обобщаване на текста. Тези подходи обаче се използват предимно за генериране на много кратки резюмета за новинарски статии. По този начин приложимостта им към правната сфера остава отворен въпрос. В тази работа експериментирахме с десет екстрактивни и четири абстрактни модела в реален набор от правни решения. Тези модели са сравнени с екстрактивна базова база, базирана на евристика, за да се изберат най-подходящите части от текста. Нашите резултати показват, че абстрактните подходи значително превъзхождат екстрактивните методи по отношение на оценките на ROUGE.', 'ko': '텍스트 요약에서 법률 분야의 텍스트는 그 길이와 전문 어휘와 관련된 특징을 가지고 있다.최근 신경 네트워크를 기반으로 한 방법으로 고품질의 텍스트 요약 점수를 얻을 수 있다.그러나 이러한 방법은 주로 뉴스 기사를 위해 매우 간단한 요약을 만드는 데 쓰인다.따라서 법률 분야에서의 적용성은 여전히 현안으로 남아 있다.우리는 10개의 추상적인 법률 모델에서 실험을 진행했다.이 모델들을 계발식 추출 기선을 바탕으로 텍스트에서 가장 관련된 부분을 선택하도록 비교합니다.우리의 연구 결과에 의하면 연지 평점에 있어서 추상적인 방법은 추출 방법보다 현저히 낫다고 한다.', 'fa': 'در محیط جمع کردن متن، متن\u200cها در حوزه قانونی ویژه\u200cهایی دارند که با طول و کلمات ویژه\u200cهایشان ارتباط دارند. روش\u200cهای شبکه\u200cهای عصبی اخیرا می\u200cتوانند امتیاز\u200cهای کیفیت بالا برای جمع کردن متن را به دست آورد. با این حال، این روش\u200cها بیشتر برای تولید مطلق\u200cهای خیلی کوتاه برای مقاله\u200cهای خبری استفاده می\u200cشود. بنابراین، کاربردی آنها به دامنه قانونی یک مسئله باز است. در این کار، ما با ده مدل خارجی و چهار مدل خارجی در یک مجموعه داده های حقیقی از قوانین قانونی آزمایش کردیم. این مدلها با یک خط پایین خارجی بر اساس هوریستیک مقایسه شدند که برای انتخاب بیشترین بخش های متن ارتباط داشته باشد. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که نزدیک\u200cهای abstractive به طور کلی از روش\u200cهای خارجی به عنوان نمونه\u200cهای ROUGE بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'Metin toplantısında, yasal domenydaki metinler uzunluğuyla we özellikle sözleriyle ilgili özellikler bar. Ýakynda näyral şebeke tabanly gollanmalar metin holasasy üçin ýokarylyk notlary ýetip biler. Ýöne bu golaýlar täzelikler üçin köplenç örän gysga abstrakt döretmek üçin ulanylýarlar. Bu şekilde yasa alanına uygulanmaları açık bir mesele kalır. Bu işde on tapylyk we dört abstraktiw nusgalar bilen çykyp bardyk. Bu nusgalar tekstiň iň möhüm böleklerini saýlamak üçin ekstra aktiw bir baseçin bilen daşlyşdyryldy. Biziň netijelerimiz ROUGE notlary ýaly abstraktiw ýagdaýlaryň çykyşyndan has gowy bir şekilde çykýandygyny görkez.', 'sw': 'In the context of text summarization, texts in the legal domain have peculiarities related to their length and to their specialized vocabulary.  Matokeo ya hivi karibuni yanayotokana na mtandao wa neura yanaweza kupata vipimo vya kiwango kikubwa kwa ajili ya muhtasari wa maandishi. Hata hivyo, mbinu hizi zimetumiwa kwa ajili ya kutengeneza picha fupi kwa ajili ya makala za habari. Kwa hiyo, matumizi yao ya sheria yanabaki kuwa suala la wazi. Katika kazi hii, tulijaribu kwa mifano kumi na wanne wa kutengeneza mifano ya utetezi katika seti ya taarifa halisi ya sheria. Mfano huu ulilinganishwa na msingi wa kituo cha utoaji kilichotokana na utaalamu wa kutangaza sehemu muhimu zaidi ya maandishi. Our results show that abstractive approaches significantly outperform extractive methods in terms of ROUGE scores.', 'sq': 'Në kontekstin e përmbledhjes së tekstit, tekstet në fushën ligjore kanë veçanësi lidhur me gjatësinë e tyre dhe me fjalorin e tyre të specializuar. Përqasjet e fundit të rrjetit nervor mund të arrijnë rezultate të cilësisë së lartë për përmbledhjen e tekstit. Megjithatë, këto qasje janë përdorur kryesisht për të krijuar abstrakta shumë të shkurtra për artikujt e lajmeve. Kështu, zbatimi i tyre në fushën ligjore mbetet një çështje e hapur. Në këtë punë, ne eksperimentuam me dhjetë modele ekstraktive dhe katër abstraktive në një grup të dhënash të vërtetë të vendimeve ligjore. Këto modele u krahasuan me një bazë ekstraktive bazuar në heuristikë për të zgjedhur pjesët më të rëndësishme të tekstit. Rezultatet tona tregojnë se qasjet abstraktive tejkalojnë ndjeshëm metodat ekstraktive në lidhje me rezultatet ROUGE.', 'af': "In die konteks van opsomming van teks, het tekste in die wetlike domein spesialiserings verwante met hul lengte en hul spesialiseerde woordeboek. Onlangse neuralnetwerk-gebaseerde toegange kan hoë- kwaliteit telling vir teks opsomming bereik. Maar hierdie toegang is meeste gebruik vir die genereer van baie kort abstrakte vir nuusartikels. So, hulle toepassing aan die wetlike domein bly 'n oopgemaakte probleem. In hierdie werk het ons eksperimenteer met tien ekstraktiewe en vier abstraktiewe modele in 'n regte datastel van wetlike reëls. Hierdie modele is vergelyk met 'n ekstraktiewe basislien gebaseer op heuristiek om die mees relevante dele van die teks te kies. Ons resultate wys dat abstraktiewe toegang betekenlik uitvoer ekstraktiewe metodes in terms of ROUGE scores.", 'hy': 'Տեքստի համառոտագրության կոնտեքստում իրավական ոլորտի տեքստները ունեն հատկանիշներ, որոնք կապված են իրենց երկարության և մասնագիտական բառարանի հետ: Վերջին նյարդային ցանցի հիմնված մոտեցումները կարող են հասնել տեքստի համառոտագրման համար բարձր որակի գնահատականներ: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս մոտեցումները օգտագործվել են հիմնականում շատ կարճ վերացրակտներ ստեղծելու համար նորությունների հոդվածների համար: Այսպիսով, նրանց կիրառելիությունը իրավական ոլորտում մնում է բաց խնդիր: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք փորձեցինք տասը արտադրողական և չորս վերացական մոդելներով իրավական որոշումների իրական տվյալների համակարգում: Այս մոդելները համեմատեցին տեքստի ամենակարևոր մասերը ընտրելու հիմքում հիմնված արտադրողական հիմքի հետ: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ վերացրատիվ մոտեցումները նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում են ROUGe-ի գնահատման մեթոդները:', 'am': 'በጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል፣ የሕግ አካባቢ ጽሑፎች ርዝመት እና ለራሳቸው የተለየ ቃላት የሚያስታወቅ የዕድል ግንኙነት አላቸው፡፡ የአሁኑን የውይይት መረብ ላይ የተደረገ ጥያቄዎች የጽሑፍ አቀማመጥ እንዲያገኙ ይችላል። However, these approaches have been used mostly for generating very short abstracts for news articles.  ስለዚህ የሕግ ዶሜን መግባታቸው የተከፈተ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ አሥር እና አራት አካባቢ የሕግ ሥርዓት መፈትነናል፡፡ እነዚህም ምሳሌዎች የጽሑፉን ክፍሎች ለመምረጥ በአውራሲ ላይ በሚያሳየው የውጤት መሳሳይ የተደረጉ ናቸው። ፍሬዎቻችን የውጤት አካባቢ የውጤት ደረጃዎች በሮጉጂ ነጥቦች እንደሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'টেক্সট সংক্ষেপের প্রেক্ষাপটে, আইন ডোমেইনের লেখাগুলো তাদের দীর্ঘ এবং তাদের বিশেষ শব্দভাণ্ডারের সাথে সম্পর্কিত বি Recent neural network-based approaches can achieve high-quality scores for text summarization.  তবে সংবাদ প্রবন্ধের জন্য বেশীরভাগ সংক্ষিপ্ত অক্ষর তৈরি করার জন্য এই পদক্ষেপ ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। তাই আইনি ডোমেইনে তাদের প্রয়োজন এখনো একটা খোলা বিষয়। এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা ১০ জন বেরিয়ে নিয়েছি এবং চারজন অস্বীকৃতিক মডেল দিয়ে পরীক্ষা করেছি একটি সত্যিকারের তথ্যের বিধানের এই মডেলগুলো লেখার সবচেয়ে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অংশ নির্বাচনের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক এক্সট্রেক্ট বেসেলাইনের সাথে তুলন আমাদের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে রুজের স্কোরের মাধ্যমে অস্বীকৃতিক পদ্ধতির বিরুদ্ধে অস্বীকৃতিকারীদের কাছে প্রয', 'az': 'Metin təmizlənməsi məlumatlarının məlumatlarının uzunluğuna və özlərinə məxsusdur. Son nöral ağ tərəfindən tərəfindən yüksək kaliteli nöqtələri metin tərəfindən istifadə edə bilər. Ancaq bu tərzlərin çox qısa abstraktlar yaratmaq üçün istifadə edilmişdir. Beləliklə, onların qanunlıq domenasına uyğunluğu açıq bir məsələdir. Bu işdə, biz on ekstraktiv və dörd abstraktiv modellərlə həqiqi verilən hökmlərin qurmasında təcrübə etdik. Bu modellər məktubun ən münasibətli parçalarını seçmək üçün heuristik vasitəsilə istifadə edilmişdir. Bizim sonuçlarımız abstraktiv yaxınlıqların ROUGE nöqtələri ilə ekstraktif metodlarından daha çox üstün olduğunu göstərir.', 'bs': 'U kontekstu sažetke teksta, teksti u pravnom domenu imaju posebne osobine povezane sa njihovom dužinom i sa njihovim specijaliziranim riječnikom. Nedavni pristupi na temelju neurone mreže mogu postići visoke kvalitetne rezultate za sažetak teksta. Međutim, ovi pristupi su uglavnom korišteni za stvaranje vrlo kratkog apstrakta za novinske članake. Stoga, njihova primjena na pravnu domenu ostaje otvorena pitanja. U ovom poslu, eksperimentirali smo sa deset ekstraktivnih i četiri apstraktivnih modela u pravom setu podataka pravnih odluka. Ovi modeli su uspoređeni s ekstraktivnom početnom linijom na temelju heuristike kako bi odabrali najvažnije dijelove teksta. Naši rezultati pokazuju da apstraktivni pristupi značajno iznosi ekstraktivne metode u smislu rezultata ROUGE-a.', 'cs': 'V kontextu shrnutí textů mají texty v právní oblasti zvláštnosti týkající se jejich délky a specializované slovní zásoby. Nedávné přístupy založené na neuronových sítích mohou dosáhnout vysoce kvalitního skóre pro shrnutí textu. Tyto přístupy se však používají především pro generování velmi krátkých abstraktů pro zpravodajské články. Jejich použitelnost na právní doménu tedy zůstává otevřenou otázkou. V této práci jsme experimentovali s deseti extraktivními a čtyřmi abstraktivními modely v reálném datovém souboru právních rozhodnutí. Tyto modely byly porovnány s extraktivním základním základem založeným na heuristice pro výběr nejvýznamnějších částí textu. Naše výsledky ukazují, že abstraktivní přístupy výrazně převyšují extrakční metody z hlediska ROUGE skóre.', 'et': 'Teksti kokkuvõtliku koostamise kontekstis on õigusvaldkonna tekstidel eripära, mis on seotud nende pikkuse ja spetsialiseeritud sõnavaraga. Hiljutised närvivõrgupõhised lähenemisviisid võivad saavutada teksti kokkuvõtte kvaliteetseid tulemusi. Kuid neid lähenemisviise on kasutatud peamiselt väga lühikeste kokkuvõtete koostamiseks uudisteartiklite jaoks. Seega jääb nende kohaldatavus õigusvaldkonnas lahtiseks küsimuseks. Käesolevas töös eksperimenteerisime kümne ekstraktiivse ja nelja abstraktse mudeliga reaalses õiguskorralduste andmekogumis. Neid mudeleid võrreldi heuristikal põhineva ekstraktiivse algväärtusega, et valida teksti kõige olulisemad osad. Meie tulemused näitavad, et abstraktsed lähenemisviisid on ROUGE skoori osas märkimisväärselt suuremad ekstraktiivsetest meetoditest.', 'ca': "En el context de la resumida del text, els textos del domini legal tenen peculiaritats relacionades amb la seva llargada i amb el vocabulari especialitzat. Els enfocaments recents basats en la xarxa neuronal poden aconseguir puntuacions d'alta qualitat per a resumir el text. Però aquests enfocaments s'han utilitzat principalment per generar abstracts molt curts per a articles de notícies. Thus, their applicability to the legal domain remains an open issue.  En aquest treball, vam experimentar amb 10 models extractius i quatre abstractius en un conjunt de dades reals de decisions legals. These models were compared with an extractive baseline based on heuristics to select the most relevant parts of the text.  Els nostres resultats demostren que els enfocaments abstractius superen significativament els mètodes extractius en termes de puntuacions ROUGE.", 'fi': 'Tekstin yhteenvedon yhteydessä oikeudellisilla teksteillä on erityispiirteitä, jotka liittyvät niiden pituuteen ja erikoissanastoon. Viimeaikaiset neuroverkkopohjaiset lähestymistavat voivat saada korkealaatuisia pisteitä tekstin yhteenvetoon. Näitä lähestymistapoja on kuitenkin käytetty lähinnä hyvin lyhyiden tiivistelmien tuottamiseen uutisartikkeleita varten. Näin ollen niiden soveltaminen oikeudelliseen alaan on edelleen avoin kysymys. Tässä työssä kokeilimme kymmentä ekstraktivista ja neljää abstraktista mallia todellisessa oikeuskäytäntöaineistossa. Näitä malleja verrattiin heuristiikkaan perustuvaan ekstraktiiviseen lähtötilanteeseen tekstin olennaisimpien osien valitsemiseksi. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että abstraktit lähestymistavat suoriutuvat ROUGE-pisteissä merkittävästi ekstraktivista menetelmistä.', 'jv': 'In the context of text combining politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nanging, akeh sing ditambah akeh iki dipunangé kanggo ngilanggar alam-alam sing mbutuhaké kanggo artik balêr. So, their Application to the right domain is an open question. Nang barêng-barêng iki, awak dhéwé éntuk karo model sing wis metu akeh lan nganggo perusahaan sing larang dataset kuwi barang hukum. Laptop" and "Desktop Rejalaké dhéwé ngerasai bener neng akeh trakhis nggawe diutag-bener manut sing dikarolaké rot.', 'sk': 'Besedila s pravnega področja imajo v kontekstu povzetka besedil posebnosti, povezane s svojo dolžino in specializiranim besednjakom. Nedavni pristopi, ki temeljijo na nevronskem omrežju, lahko dosežejo visokokakovostne ocene za povzetek besedila. Vendar pa so se ti pristopi uporabljali predvsem za ustvarjanje zelo kratkih povzetkov za novinarske članke. Zato njihova uporaba na pravnem področju ostaja odprto vprašanje. V tem delu smo eksperimentirali z desetimi ekstraktivnimi in štirimi abstraktivnimi modeli v resničnem podatkovnem naboru pravnih odločb. Te modele so primerjali z ekstraktivnim osnovnim izhodiščem na podlagi heuristike, da bi izbrali najpomembnejše dele besedila. Naši rezultati kažejo, da abstraktivni pristopi bistveno presegajo ekstraktivne metode v smislu ROUGE rezultatov.', 'he': 'בקשר לסכם הטקסט, לטקסטים בתחום המשפטי יש מיוחדות קשורות לאורך שלהם ולמילון המיוחד שלהם. גישות חדשות מבוססות ברשת עצבית יכולות להשיג נקודות איכות גבוהה לסיום טקסט. עם זאת, גישות אלה השתמשו בעיקר לייצור אסטרקטים קצרים מאוד למאמרים חדשות. כך, שימושיהם לתחום המשפטי נשאר בעיה פתוחה. בעבודה הזו, ניסונו עם עשר דוגמנים חושפים וארבעה דוגמנים אוסטרקטיביים בתוך קבוצת נתונים אמיתית של שליטות משפטיות. These models were compared with an extractive baseline based on heuristics to select the most relevant parts of the text.  התוצאות שלנו מראות שגישות אוסטרקטיביות יוצאות משמעות יותר משיטות חולץ במונחים של נקודות ROUGE.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Tsarin zane-zane na zane-zane na yanzu, za'a iya sãmun score mai girma wa muharin matsayin. A lokacin da, waɗannan hanyoyin sun yi amfani da mafiya yawa don ya sami karatun masu nauyi wa makampuni masu basĩri. Saboda haka, adadin ayukansu zuwa daidai ta zama wani abu mai bayani. Daga wannan aikin, muka jarrabi misãlai gõma na taskiya da huɗu masu kandamta a cikin tsarin mutane masu gaskiya. Wannan motel ne aka daidaita da wani bango mai gabatar da shi a kan heuristics dõmin ya zãɓi rabon masu da muhimmi na matsayin. MatamayinMu na nũna cewa, kanrakati za'a sami hanyoyin ta'ura mai girma a cikin muhimmin fassarar-nau'i na GUGE.", 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་བཅུད་སྡུད་མངོན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཐོག་རིམ་འདི་ནི་ཁོང་ཚོའི་རིང་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ཁྱད་པར Recent neural network-based approaches can achieve high-quality scores for text summarization. ཡིན་ནའང་། གསར་འགུལ་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་དག་ཆེས་སུ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཚོར་ཐག་ཆེ་བའི་ཐོག་ཁྲམ་བ་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དེར་བརྟེན། ཁོང་ཚོའི་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་བྱ་རིམ་དེ་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་དོན་ལྟར་ཞིག་རེད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཉེན་ཁ་བྱེད་པའི་མིག་རྩལ་གསུམ་དང་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་མིག་རྩལ་གསུམ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྒྲི རྣམ་གྲངས་འདི་ཚོ་ནི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་ཆ་ཤས་ཆེས་ཤོག་བྱེད་པའི་ཚད་གཞི་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་དང་མཉམ་འབྱུང་བ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་འབྲས་བ་དག་གིས་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྟར་འགྱུར་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཕན་ཐུབ་བྱེད་མི་འདུག'}
{'en': 'Comparing Automated Methods to Detect Explicit Content in Song Lyrics', 'ar': 'مقارنة الطرق الآلية لاكتشاف المحتوى الصريح في كلمات الأغاني', 'pt': 'Comparando métodos automatizados para detectar conteúdo explícito em letras de músicas', 'es': 'Comparación de métodos automatizados para detectar contenido explícito en las letras de canciones', 'fr': 'Comparaison des méthodes automatisées pour détecter le contenu explicite dans les paroles de chansons', 'zh': '较自动化法以检歌词露骨', 'hi': 'गीत गीत में स्पष्ट सामग्री का पता लगाने के लिए स्वचालित विधियों की तुलना करना', 'ja': '歌詞の明示的な内容を検出するための自動化されたメソッドの比較', 'ru': 'Сравнение автоматизированных методов обнаружения явного содержания в тексте песни', 'ga': 'Comparáid a dhéanamh ar Mhodhanna Uathoibrithe chun Ábhar Soiléir i Lyrics Amhrán a Bhrath', 'hu': 'Automatizált módszerek összehasonlítása a kifejezett tartalom felismerésére a dalszövegben', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Σύγκριση αυτοματοποιημένων μεθόδων για την ανίχνευση ρητού περιεχομένου σε στίχους τραγουδιών', 'it': 'Confronto dei metodi automatizzati per rilevare contenuti espliciti nei testi delle canzoni', 'kk': 'Автоматты әдістерді әдістер тізімдерінде бұл мазмұнын анықтау үшін салыстыру', 'lt': 'Automatinių metodų, skirtų aiškiam dainų tekstų turiniui nustatyti, palyginimas', 'mk': 'Споредување на автоматизирани методи за откривање на јасна содржина во песните зборови', 'ms': 'Comparing Automated Methods to Detect Explicit Content in Song Lyrics', 'ml': 'പാട്ട് ലൈറ്റുകളിലുള്ള വിദ്യാഭാഷയിലുള്ളവയെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനായി സ്വയം മാറ്റിയിട്ടുള്ള വഴ', 'mt': 'It-tqabbil tal-Metodi Awtomatizzati biex jiġi Detettat Kontenut Espliċitu fil-Liriki tal-Kangeri', 'mn': 'Шинжлэх дугаарын шинжлэх ухааны автоматтын аргыг харьцуулах', 'no': 'Sammenliknar automatiske metodar for å finna eksplisitt innhald i songtekstar', 'pl': 'Comparing Automated Methods to Detect Explicit Content in Song Tekst piosenki', 'ro': 'Compararea metodelor automatizate pentru detectarea conținutului explicit în versurile melodiilor', 'sr': 'Uspoređivanje automatskih metoda za otkrivanje ekskluzivnog sadržaja u tekstima pjesme', 'si': 'සංගීත වර්තනයේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය සංවේදනය හොයාගන්න ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විධානය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න', 'so': 'Isbarbarbardhigga qaababka Automatic-Detect Explicit Content in Song Lyrics', 'sv': 'Jämföra automatiserade metoder för att upptäcka explicit innehåll i sångtexter', 'ta': 'Comparing Automated Methods to Detect Explicit Content in Song Lyrics', 'ur': 'سونگ لیریک میں اپنا منظم پتچانے کے لئے آٹوٹی طریقے کی ترکیب کرتے ہیں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đối tượng tự động để phân tích nội dung biểu hiện trong văn bản', 'da': 'Sammenligning af automatiserede metoder til at detektere eksplicit indhold i sangtekster', 'bg': 'Сравняване на автоматизираните методи за откриване на изрично съдържание в текстовете на песни', 'nl': 'Geautomatiseerde methoden vergelijken om expliciete inhoud in songteksten te detecteren', 'id': 'Comparing Automated Methods to Detect Explicit Content in Song Lyrics', 'hr': 'Uspoređivanje automatskih metoda za otkrivanje ekskluzivnog sadržaja u tekstima pjesme', 'de': 'Vergleiche automatisierter Methoden zum Erkennen expliziter Inhalte in Songtexten', 'ko': '가사의 현식 내용을 자동으로 검출하는 방법 비교', 'fa': 'مقایسه روش\u200cهای خودکار برای شناسایی محتوای مفصلی در زبانهای آهنگ', 'sw': 'Unaweza kulinganisha njia za kujitegemea Kugundua Kizuizi katika Lugha za Song', 'tr': 'Ses sözlerinde ahtarmak üçin Otomatik Metirler', 'sq': 'Comparing Automated Methods to Detect Explicit Content in Song Lyrics', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'af': 'Vergelyk Automatiese Metodes om Explicit Inhoud in Songlys te vind', 'bs': 'Uspoređivanje automatskih metoda za otkrivanje ekskluzivnog sadržaja u tekstima pjesme', 'hy': 'Համեմատելով հստակ պարունակության հայտնաբերման մեթոդները երգչախմբերում', 'ca': 'Comparar mètodes automàtics per detectar continguts explícits en les lletres de cançó', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সংগীত লাইকগুলোতে এক্সপ্লিকেট বিষয়বস্তু সনাক্ত করার জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মিনি', 'cs': 'Porovnání automatizovaných metod pro detekci explicitního obsahu v textech písní', 'et': 'Automaatsete meetodite võrdlemine selgesõnalise sisu tuvastamiseks laulusõnades', 'az': 'Şarkı Sözlərində Sözlük Məzmunlarını Açırmaq üçün Avtomatik Metodoları', 'fi': 'Automaattisten menetelmien vertailu eksplisiittisen sisällön havaitsemiseksi laulun sanoituksissa', 'sk': 'Primerjava avtomatiziranih metod za zaznavanje eksplicitne vsebine v besedilih pesmi', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'שיוות שיטות אוטומטיות כדי לגלות תוכן ברור במילים שירים', 'bo': 'ཞབས་ཁྲ་བརྗོད་ནང་དུ་འཕགས་པའི་ནང་དོན་ཡུལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་བཟོ་བྱས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་བ'}
{'en': 'The Parental Advisory Label (PAL) is a warning label that is placed on audio recordings in recognition of profanity or inappropriate references, with the intention of alerting parents of material potentially unsuitable for children. Since 2015, digital providers   such as iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music and Deezer   also follow PAL guidelines and tag such tracks as explicit. Nowadays, such labelling is carried out mainly manually on voluntary basis, with the drawbacks of being time consuming and therefore costly, error prone and partly a subjective task. In this paper, we compare automated methods ranging from dictionary-based lookup to state-of-the-art deep neural networks to automatically detect explicit contents in English lyrics. We show that more complex models perform only slightly better on this task, and relying on a qualitative analysis of the data, we discuss the inherent hardness and subjectivity of the task.', 'ar': 'الملصق الاستشاري للوالدين (PAL) عبارة عن ملصق تحذير يتم وضعه على التسجيلات الصوتية اعترافًا بالألفاظ النابية أو المراجع غير الملائمة ، بهدف تنبيه الآباء إلى المواد التي يحتمل أن تكون غير مناسبة للأطفال. منذ عام 2015 ، يتبع مزودو الخدمات الرقمية - مثل iTunes و Spotify و Amazon Music و Deezer - إرشادات PAL ويضعون علامات على مثل هذه المسارات على أنها "صريحة". في الوقت الحاضر ، يتم تنفيذ هذه العلامات بشكل أساسي يدويًا على أساس طوعي ، مع وجود عيوب تتمثل في كونها مضيعة للوقت وبالتالي مكلفة وعرضة للخطأ ومهمة ذاتية جزئيًا. في هذا البحث ، نقوم بمقارنة الأساليب الآلية التي تتراوح من البحث المستند إلى القاموس إلى الشبكات العصبية العميقة الحديثة للكشف تلقائيًا عن المحتويات الصريحة في كلمات الأغاني الإنجليزية. نظهر أن النماذج الأكثر تعقيدًا تؤدي أداءً أفضل قليلاً في هذه المهمة ، وبالاعتماد على التحليل النوعي للبيانات ، نناقش الصلابة المتأصلة والذاتية للمهمة.', 'es': 'La etiqueta de advertencia para padres (PAL) es una etiqueta de advertencia que se coloca en las grabaciones de audio en reconocimiento de blasfemias o referencias inapropiadas, con la intención de alertar a los padres de material potencialmente inadecuado para los niños. Desde 2015, los proveedores digitales, como iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music y Deezer, también siguen las pautas de PAL y etiquetan esas pistas como «explícitas». Hoy en día, este etiquetado se lleva a cabo principalmente de forma manual y voluntaria, con el inconveniente de ser lento y, por lo tanto, costoso, propenso a errores y, en parte, una tarea subjetiva. En este artículo, comparamos métodos automatizados que van desde búsquedas basadas en diccionarios hasta redes neuronales profundas de última generación para detectar automáticamente contenidos explícitos en las letras en inglés. Demostramos que los modelos más complejos funcionan solo ligeramente mejor en esta tarea, y confiando en un análisis cualitativo de los datos, discutimos la dureza inherente y la subjetividad de la tarea.', 'fr': "Le Parental Advisory Label (PAL) est une étiquette d'avertissement placée sur les enregistrements audio en reconnaissance de blasphèmes ou de références inappropriées, dans le but d'avertir les parents d'un matériel potentiellement inapproprié pour les enfants. Depuis 2015, les fournisseurs numériques, tels qu'iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music et Deezer, suivent également les directives PAL et étiquettent ces titres comme «\xa0explicites\xa0». De nos jours, cet étiquetage est effectué principalement manuellement sur une base volontaire, avec les inconvénients d'être long et donc coûteux, sujet à des erreurs et en partie une tâche subjective. Dans cet article, nous comparons des méthodes automatisées allant de la recherche basée sur un dictionnaire aux réseaux de neurones profonds de pointe afin de détecter automatiquement les contenus explicites dans les paroles en anglais. Nous montrons que les modèles plus complexes ne sont que légèrement meilleurs pour cette tâche, et en nous appuyant sur une analyse qualitative des données, nous discutons de la dureté et de la subjectivité inhérentes à la tâche.", 'pt': 'O Parental Advisory Label (PAL) é um rótulo de advertência que é colocado em gravações de áudio em reconhecimento de palavrões ou referências inadequadas, com a intenção de alertar os pais sobre material potencialmente inadequado para crianças. Desde 2015, provedores digitais – como iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music e Deezer – também seguem as diretrizes PAL e marcam essas faixas como “explícitas”. Hoje em dia, essa rotulagem é realizada principalmente manualmente de forma voluntária, com as desvantagens de ser demorada e, portanto, cara, propensa a erros e, em parte, uma tarefa subjetiva. Neste artigo, comparamos métodos automatizados que variam de pesquisa baseada em dicionário a redes neurais profundas de última geração para detectar automaticamente conteúdos explícitos em letras em inglês. Mostramos que modelos mais complexos têm um desempenho apenas um pouco melhor nessa tarefa e, com base em uma análise qualitativa dos dados, discutimos a dureza e a subjetividade inerentes à tarefa.', 'ja': 'ペアレンタルアドバイザリーラベル（ PAL ）は、不適切な言及や不適切な言及を認識して、子供に適していない可能性のある資料を保護者に警告することを意図して、録音に配置される警告ラベルです。2015年以降、iTunes、Spotify、Amazon Music、DeezerなどのデジタルプロバイダーもPALガイドラインに従い、「明示的」などのトラックにタグ付けしています。現在では、このようなラベル付けは主に自発的に手動で行われており、時間がかかるためコストがかかり、エラーが発生しやすく、部分的には主観的な作業であるという欠点がある。本稿では、英語歌詞の明示的な内容を自動的に検出するために、辞書ベースの検索から最先端のディープニューラルネットワークまでの自動化された手法を比較する。私たちは、より複雑なモデルがこのタスクでわずかに優れたパフォーマンスを発揮することを示し、データの定性的分析に依存して、タスクの固有の硬さと主観性を議論します。', 'zh': '家长忠告标签者(PAL)置录音上之戒标,以识亵渎不当之引,所以明父母或非童子之材也。 自2015以来,数提供商(如iTunes,Spotify,Amazon Music、Deezer)亦循PAL指南,而著其曲曰"明"。 今贴标主于愿,手动于耗时,故成本高昂,易失而主观也。 于本文中,较自动化法,于字典得最先进之深神经网络,以自动检测英语歌词之显式。 吾言杂形于此者略胜一筹,而恃数之定性分析,论其固硬度主观性。', 'hi': 'माता-पिता सलाहकार लेबल (PAL) एक चेतावनी लेबल है जिसे ऑडियो रिकॉर्डिंग पर अपवित्रता या अनुचित संदर्भों की मान्यता में रखा जाता है, जो माता-पिता को बच्चों के लिए संभावित रूप से अनुपयुक्त सामग्री के बारे में सचेत करने के इरादे से रखा जाता है। 2015 के बाद से, डिजिटल प्रदाता - जैसे कि आईट्यून्स, स्पॉटिफाई, अमेज़ॅन म्यूजिक और डीज़र - भी पाल दिशानिर्देशों का पालन करते हैं और "स्पष्ट" जैसे ट्रैक को टैग करते हैं। आजकल, इस तरह के लेबलिंग को मुख्य रूप से स्वैच्छिक आधार पर मैन्युअल रूप से किया जाता है, जिसमें समय लेने वाली और इसलिए महंगा, त्रुटि प्रवण और आंशिक रूप से एक व्यक्तिपरक कार्य होने की कमियां होती हैं। इस पेपर में, हम स्वचालित रूप से अंग्रेजी गीतों में स्पष्ट सामग्री का पता लगाने के लिए शब्दकोश-आधारित लुकअप से लेकर अत्याधुनिक गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क तक के स्वचालित तरीकों की तुलना करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि अधिक जटिल मॉडल इस कार्य पर केवल थोड़ा बेहतर प्रदर्शन करते हैं, और डेटा के गुणात्मक विश्लेषण पर भरोसा करते हुए, हम कार्य की अंतर्निहित कठोरता और व्यक्तिपरकता पर चर्चा करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Родительская консультативная этикетка (PAL) - это предупреждающая этикетка, которая помещается на аудиозаписи в знак признания ненормативной лексики или ненадлежащих ссылок с целью предупреждения родителей о материалах, потенциально непригодных для детей. С 2015 года цифровые провайдеры – такие как iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music и Deezer – также следуют рекомендациям PAL и отмечают такие треки как «явные». В настоящее время такая маркировка осуществляется главным образом вручную на добровольной основе с недостатками, заключающимися в том, что она занимает много времени и, следовательно, является дорогостоящей, подверженной ошибкам и отчасти субъективной задачей. В этой статье мы сравниваем автоматизированные методы, начиная от поиска на основе словаря и заканчивая современными глубокими нейронными сетями, чтобы автоматически обнаруживать явное содержание в английской лирике. Показано, что более сложные модели выполняют эту задачу лишь немного лучше, и, опираясь на качественный анализ данных, мы обсуждаем присущую задаче твердость и субъективность.', 'ga': 'Lipéad rabhaidh is ea an Lipéad Comhairleach do Thuismitheoirí (PAL) a chuirtear ar thaifeadtaí fuaime mar aitheantas do chaint nó tagairtí míchuí, agus é ar intinn tuismitheoirí a chur ar an eolas faoi ábhar a d’fhéadfadh a bheith mí-oiriúnach do leanaí. Ó 2015 i leith, leanann soláthraithe digiteacha - cosúil le iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music agus Deezer - treoirlínte PAL agus clibeáil rianta mar "follasaí". Sa lá atá inniu ann, déantar an lipéadú sin de láimh go príomha ar bhonn deonach, agus na míbhuntáistí a bhaineann leis a bheith am-íditheach agus mar sin costasach, seans maith go earráidí agus go páirteach ina thasc suibiachtúil. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid comparáid idir modhanna uathoibrithe ó chuardaigh foclóir-bhunaithe go líonraí néarúla doimhne den scoth chun inneachar follasach i liricí Béarla a bhrath go huathoibríoch. Léirímid nach bhfeidhmíonn samhlacha níos casta ach beagán níos fearr ar an tasc seo, agus ag brath ar anailís cháilíochtúil ar na sonraí, pléimid cruas agus suibiachtúlacht bhunúsach an taisc.', 'ka': "ბავშვების კონსვიზორი ლაბელია (PAL) არის სხვადასხვა ლაბელია, რომელიც აუდიო წერტილებში დაყენებულია წერტილებების განაცნობაში ან არსწორი რეფენციების განაცნობაში, რომელიც მართლას პოციალურად უნდა გა 2015 წლიდან, დიზიტალური მომხმარებელი - როგორც iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music და Deezer - ასევე მომხმარებელია PAL მომხმარებელი და მონიშნელია, როგორც 'ექსპლიკტი'. ახლა ასეთი მარტიკალის ჩატვირთვა ჩატვირთვალურად გავაკეთება, რომლებიც დროის გამოყენება და ამიტომ ძალიან ძალიან შეცდომა და ნაწილად სუბექტიური დავალება. ამ წიგში ჩვენ ავტომატიკური მეტოვების შედგომარება, რომელიც სიტყვებით დაფარდებულია სიტყვებით დაბათებით სიტყვებით სიტყვებით სიტყვებით სიტყვებით ავტომატიკურად განახ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ უფრო კომპლექსიკური მოდელები ამ რაოდენობაზე მხოლოდ უფრო უკეთესი გავაკეთებთ, და კოლექტიტური ანალიზაციაზე დავიწყენებთ, ჩვენ განვისაუბრებთ", 'el': 'Η ετικέτα γονικής συμβουλής (ΠΑΛ) είναι μια προειδοποιητική ετικέτα που τοποθετείται σε ηχογραφήσεις ως αναγνώριση βλαβών ή ακατάλληλων αναφορών, με σκοπό να ειδοποιήσει τους γονείς για υλικό που ενδεχομένως δεν είναι κατάλληλο για παιδιά. Από το 2015, οι ψηφιακοί πάροχοι, όπως το iTunes, το Spotify, το Amazon Music και το Deezer, ακολουθούν επίσης τις οδηγίες PAL και επισημαίνουν αυτά τα κομμάτια ως "ρητά". Σήμερα, μια τέτοια επισήμανση πραγματοποιείται κυρίως χειροκίνητα σε εθελοντική βάση, με τα μειονεκτήματα ότι είναι χρονοβόρα και επομένως δαπανηρή, επιρρεπής σε σφάλματα και εν μέρει υποκειμενική εργασία. Σε αυτή την εργασία, συγκρίνουμε αυτοματοποιημένες μεθόδους που κυμαίνονται από αναζήτηση με βάση λεξικά έως σύγχρονα βαθιά νευρωνικά δίκτυα για να ανιχνεύσουμε αυτόματα ρητά περιεχόμενα σε αγγλικούς στίχους. Δείχνουμε ότι πιο σύνθετα μοντέλα αποδίδουν ελάχιστα καλύτερα σε αυτό το έργο, και βασιζόμενοι σε μια ποιοτική ανάλυση των δεδομένων, συζητάμε την εγγενή σκληρότητα και υποκειμενικότητα του έργου.', 'hu': 'A szülői tanácsadó címke (PAL) egy figyelmeztető címke, amely hangfelvételeken káromkodás vagy nem megfelelő hivatkozások elismerésére kerül elhelyezésre azzal a céllal, hogy figyelmeztesse a szülőket a gyermekek számára potenciálisan alkalmatlan anyagokról. 2015 óta a digitális szolgáltatók – mint például az iTunes, a Spotify, az Amazon Music és a Deezer – szintén követik a PAL irányelveket és "explicit" címkézik az ilyen számokat. Manapság az ilyen címkézést főként manuálisan, önkéntes alapon végzik, azzal a hátránnyal, hogy időigényes, ezért költséges, hibázható és részben szubjektív feladat. Ebben a tanulmányban automatizált módszereket hasonlítunk össze a szótár alapú kereséstől a legkorszerűbb mélyneurális hálózatokig, hogy automatikusan felismerjük az angol szövegek explicit tartalmát. Megmutatjuk, hogy a bonyolultabb modellek csak kissé jobban teljesítenek ebben a feladatban, és az adatok minőségi elemzésére támaszkodva megvitatjuk a feladat eredendő keménységét és szubjektivitását.', 'it': 'Il Parental Advisory Label (PAL) è un\'etichetta di avvertimento che viene posta sulle registrazioni audio in riconoscimento di parolacce o riferimenti inappropriati, con l\'intenzione di avvisare i genitori di materiale potenzialmente inadatto per i bambini. Dal 2015, anche i fornitori digitali - come iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music e Deezer - seguono le linee guida PAL e etichettano tali tracce come "esplicite". Oggi tale etichettatura viene effettuata principalmente manualmente su base volontaria, con lo svantaggio di essere dispendiosa in termini di tempo e quindi costosa, soggetta a errori e in parte soggettiva. In questo articolo, confrontiamo metodi automatizzati che vanno dalla ricerca basata sul dizionario alle reti neurali profonde all\'avanguardia per rilevare automaticamente contenuti espliciti nei testi inglesi. Mostriamo che i modelli più complessi funzionano solo leggermente meglio su questo compito, e basandosi su un\'analisi qualitativa dei dati, discutiamo la durezza intrinseca e la soggettività del compito.', 'lt': 'Tėvų patariamasis ženklas (PAL) yra įspėjamasis ženklas, kuris įrašomas į garso įrašus, pripažįstant nuorodas į gėdingumą arba netinkamas nuorodas, siekiant įspėti tėvus apie medžiagą, kuri gali būti netinkama vaikams. Nuo 2015 m. skaitmeniniai paslaugų teikėjai, pavyzdžiui, iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music ir Deezer, taip pat laikosi PAL gairių ir ženklina tokius kelius kaip "aiškiai". Šiandien toks ženklinimas daugiausia atliekamas rankiniu būdu savanoriškai, nepakankamai laiko reikalaujant ir todėl brangus, klaidų tikimybė ir iš dalies subjektyvus uždavinys. Šiame dokumente palyginame automatizuotus metodus: nuo žodynų paieškos iki pažangiausių giliųjų nervų tinklų, kad būtų automatiškai aptiktas aiškus turinys anglų tekstuose. Mes rodome, kad sudėtingesni modeliai šioje užduotyje tik šiek tiek geresni, ir remdamiesi kokybine duomenų analize, diskutuojame apie užduoties sudėtingumą ir subjektyvumą.', 'kk': 'Аталық консультативті жарлық (PAL) деген аудио жазуына немесе жарамсыз сілтемелерді анықтау үшін, балаларға мүмкін емес материалды ата-аналарды ескерту үшін қолданылатын ескерту жарлығы. 2015 жылдан бастап, цифрлық провидерлер - iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music және Deezer секілді - сондай-ақ PAL бағыттауларын және "explicit" деп аталады. Қазір бұл жарлық жарлықты көңіл көмегімен қолмен жазылады. Уақыт пайдалануының қатесі, сондықтан бағалап, қатесі көмегімен бірнеше мақсатты тапсырманың қатесі. Бұл қағаздың автоматты түрде сөздігінен негізделген іздеу әдістерін ағылшын тіліктерінде автоматты түрде анықтау үшін түсінікті невралдық желіктерге салыстырып тұрмыз. Біз осы тапсырманың көпшілікті үлгілерін жақсы жасап, деректердің көпшілікті анализациясына көмектесіп, тапсырманың көпшілікті және тапсырманың маңыздылығын талқылаймыз.', 'mk': 'Родителската советна етикета (PAL) е предупредувачка етикета која се става на аудиоснимки во признавање на непријатност или несоодветни референции, со цел да ги предупреди родителите за материјал кој е потенцијално несоодветен за децата. Од 2015 година дигиталните обезбедувачи - како што се iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music и Deezer - исто така ги следат упатствата на PAL и ги означуваат таквите траги како „експлицитни“. Денес, ваквото означување се спроведува главно рачно на доброволна основа, со недостатоците од потрошувањето на време и затоа скапи, погрешни и делумно субјективна задача. Во овој документ, ги споредуваме автоматизираните методи кои се движат од барање на речници до најдобрите длабоки нервни мрежи за автоматски да се детектираат експлицитни содржини во англиските реченици. Ние покажуваме дека покомплексните модели работат само малку подобро на оваа задача, и врз основа на квалитетна анализа на податоците, дискутираме за природната тешкост и субјективност на задачата.', 'ms': "Label Penawaran Ibu Bapa (PAL) adalah label amaran yang ditempatkan pada rekaman audio sebagai pengenalan rahsia atau rujukan yang tidak sesuai, dengan niat untuk memberi amaran kepada ibu bapa bahan yang berpotensi tidak sesuai untuk kanak-kanak. Sejak 2015, penyedia digital - seperti iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music dan Deezer - juga mengikut panduan PAL dan tag trek seperti 'eksplicit'. Pada hari ini, label tersebut dilakukan terutama secara manual pada dasar sukarela, dengan kelemahan yang menghabiskan masa dan oleh itu mahal, cenderung ralat dan sebahagian-sebahagian tugas subjektif. In this paper, we compare automated methods ranging from dictionary-based lookup to state-of-the-art deep neural networks to automatically detect explicit contents in English lyrics.  Kami menunjukkan bahawa model yang lebih kompleks hanya melakukan sedikit lebih baik pada tugas ini, dan bergantung pada analisis kualitatif data, kami membincangkan kesukaran dan subjektif tugas tersebut.", 'mt': "The Parental Advisory Label (PAL) is a warning label that is placed on audio recordings in recognition of profanity or inappropriate references, with the intention of alerting parents of material potentially unsuitable for children.  Mill-2015, il-fornituri diġitali - bħall-iTunes, Spotify, il-Mużika Amazon u Deezer - isegwu wkoll il-linji gwida PAL u jimmarkaw tali binarji bħala 'espliċiti'. Illum, tikkettar bħal dan isir primarjament manwalment fuq bażi volontarja, bl-iżvantaġġi li jikkonsmaw il-ħin u għalhekk jiswew ħafna flus, suxxettibbli għall-iżbalji u parzjalment kompitu suġġettiv. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nqabblu metodi awtomatizzati li jvarjaw minn tfittxija bbażata fuq id-dikjarazzjoni sa netwerks newrali profondi l-aktar avvanzati biex awtomatikament jinstabu kontenut espliċitu fil-lirika Ingliża. Aħna nuru li mudelli aktar kumplessi jwettqu biss ftit a ħjar fuq dan il-kompitu, u abbażi ta' analiżi kwalitattiva tad-dejta, niddiskutu l-ebusija u s-suġġettività inerenti tal-kompitu.", 'no': 'Parental Advisory Label (PAL) er eit åtvaringsmerkelapp som er plassert på lyd-opptak i gjenkjenning av profanitet eller ikkje tilgjengelege referanser, med hjelp til å varsla foreldre av materialet som er potensielt ukjent for barn. Siden 2015 følgjer digitale tilbyarar – som iTunes, Spotify, Amazon musikk og Deezer – også PAL-retningslinjer og merker slike spor som «eksplisitt». Denne merkelappen vert utført i dag hovudsakelig manuelt på frivillig måte, med uttrykk av å vera tidsbruk, og derfor kostnadst, feil ved høve og delvis ein subjektiv oppgåve. I denne papiret samanliknar vi automatiske metodar frå ordbokbasert oppslag til stått av kunsten dype neuralnettverk for å automatisk oppdaga eksplisitt innhald i engelsk tekst. Vi viser at meir komplekse modeller gjer berre litt bedre på denne oppgåva, og på ein kvalitativ analyse av data, diskuterer vi den innhaldne hardleiken og subjektiviteten av oppgåva.', 'ml': 'മാതാപിതാവിന്\u200dറെ ആലോചിക ലേബെല്\u200d (PAL) ഒരു മുന്നറിയിപ്പ് ലേബല്\u200d ആണ് കുട്ടികള്\u200dക്ക് അസാധ്യമായ വസ്തുക്കളുടെ മാതാപിതാക്കളെ മുന്നറിയിപ്പ് നല്\u200dകുവാന്\u200d സാ 2015 മുതല്\u200d ഡിജിറ്റല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d, ഐട്ടിയൂണുകള്\u200d, സ്പോട്ടിഫിക്ക്, അമാസോന്\u200d സംഗീതകം, ഡീസെര്\u200d, പാഎല്\u200d വഴികാട്ടുകളും പിന്തുടരുന്നു. പ്രത്യക ഇന്ന് ഇത്തരം ചിത്രം സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യത്തില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. സമയത്തെ ഉപജീവനത്തിന്റെ പിന്നില്\u200d പോകുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് അത ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നിഘണ്ടില്\u200d നിന്നും അടിസ്ഥാനമായ പരിശോധിയില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയം താല്\u200dക്കാലികമായ രീതികളിലേക്ക് താല്\u200dക്കാലികമായ രീതികളിലേക്ക്  നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് കൂടുതല്\u200d സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d കുറച്ച് നന്നായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് മാത്രമാണ്. ഡേറ്റാകളുടെ ക്വാ', 'mn': 'Эцэг эхийн тусламжлалт (PAL) бол хүүхдүүдэд материал эцэг эхийнхээ тусламжгүй байх боломжгүй гэдгийг мэдэхэд аудио бичлэг дээр зарцуулагдсан захирал юм. 2015 оноос хойш Дижитал хандивлагчид - iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music and Deezer - мөн PAL удирдлагааг дагаж "тодорхой" хэлбэртэй. Өнөөдөр ийм маркинг нь сайн дурын үндсэн дээр гараараа хийгддэг, цаг хугацааны хэрэглээнд бага зэрэг үнэ цэнэтэй, алдаа болон нэг хэсгийг сурагчийн даалгавар юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид автоматжуулагдсан арга зэрэг сөрөгч дээр суурилсан судалгаанаас англи хэлний үгийг автоматжуулахын тулд автоматжуулагдсан арга зэрэг харьцуулдаг. Бид илүү төвөгтэй загварууд энэ ажил дээр зөвхөн бага зэрэг илүү сайн ажиллаж, өгөгдлийн чадвартай шинжилгээнд итгэдэг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид ажлын хамгийн хэцүү чадварыг, сургууль чадварыг ярьж байна.', 'pl': 'Etykieta Doradcza Rodziców (PAL) jest etykietą ostrzegawczą umieszczaną na nagraniach dźwiękowych w celu uznania wulgarności lub niewłaściwych odniesień, w celu powiadomienia rodziców o materiałach potencjalnie nieodpowiednich dla dzieci. Od 2015 dostawcy cyfrowi, taki jak iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music i Deezer, również stosują się do wytycznych PAL i oznaczają takie utwory jako "explicite". Obecnie takie etykietowanie odbywa się głównie ręcznie na zasadzie dobrowolności, z wadami tego, że jest czasochłonne, a zatem kosztowne, podatne na błędy, a częściowo subiektywne zadanie. W artykule porównujemy zautomatyzowane metody począwszy od wyszukiwania opartego na słowniku po najnowocześniejsze głębokie sieci neuronowe, aby automatycznie wykrywać wyraźne treści w angielskich tekstach tekstowych. Pokazujemy, że bardziej złożone modele sprawdzają się tylko nieznacznie lepiej w tym zadaniu, a opierając się na jakościowej analizie danych, omawiamy nieodłączną twardość i subiektywność zadania.', 'ro': 'Eticheta Parental Advisory Label (PAL) este o etichetă de avertizare care este plasată pe înregistrările audio ca recunoaștere a blasfemiilor sau referințelor inadecvate, cu intenția de a alerta părinții despre materiale potențial inadecvate pentru copii. Din 2015, furnizorii digitali - cum ar fi iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music și Deezer - urmează, de asemenea, ghidurile PAL și etichetează piesele ca fiind "explicite". În prezent, o astfel de etichetare se efectuează în principal manual pe bază voluntară, dezavantajele fiind consumatoare de timp și, prin urmare, costisitoare, predispuse la erori și parțial o sarcină subiectivă. În această lucrare, comparăm metode automatizate variind de la căutarea bazată pe dicționar la rețele neurale profunde de ultimă generație pentru a detecta automat conținutul explicit în versurile în limba engleză. Aratăm că modelele mai complexe performează doar puțin mai bine în această sarcină, iar bazându-ne pe o analiză calitativă a datelor, discutăm duritatea și subiectivitatea inerentă a sarcinii.', 'si': "The parental advissory Label (PAL) is a alert label that is set on sound Recording in the ackendment of profanity or inappropriate references, with the endment of alert parents of Potensively non-Utilible for ළමයින්ට. 2015 පස්සේ, ඩිජිටල් ප්\u200dරදානකරුවන් - iTunes, Spotypy, Amazone Music and Deezer වගේම - PAL ප්\u200dරදානකය සහ 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්' වගේම ට්\u200dරේක් පස්සෙන් පස්සෙ අදින්, එහෙම ලෙබෙල්ලිග් ප්\u200dරධාන විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් සැකසුම් විදිහට පත් කරනවා, වෙලාව භාවිතා කරනවා කියලා, ඉතින් විශ මේ පත්තරේ අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට සම්පූර්ණ විදියට සම්පූර්ණ විදියට සම්පූර්ණ විදියට සම්පූර්ණ විදියට ඉ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ තව ප්\u200dරශ්ණ මදුල් මේ වැඩේ ටිකක් හොඳ විතරයි, ඒ වගේම දත්තේ විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි මේ වැඩේ අ", 'so': "Lacagta la talinta waalidka (PAL) waa calaamad looga digay oo lagu qoray diiwaanka codsiga, in lagu aqoonsado aqoonsashada aqoonsashada xirfadeed ama faa’iido ah, taas oo la xiriira in waalidiinta looga digo waxyaabaha ay cunugga u suurtowdo. Tan iyo 2015, bixiyayaasha digital - tusaale ahaan iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music and Deezer - waxay sidoo kale raacaan hagooyin PAL iyo tag tusaale ahaan waddooyinka ''bayaan'. Maanta, imtixaanka caynkaas waxaa si ugu horeysa lagu sameeyaa waxqabad ikhtiyaar ah, dib u qaadashada wakhtiga la isticmaalayo, sababtaas darteed kharashka waxaa lagu caddeeyaa waxyaabo la xiriira. Kanu warqaddan ayaannu isbarbardhignaa qaabab iskumar ah oo ka soo jeedaya raadinta luqada ku qoran iyo shabakada farshaxanka hoose ee qoraalka Ingiriiska. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababka adag oo ka mid ah ay shaqadaas ku sameeyaan wax yar oo ka wanaagsan, waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa baaritaanka aqoonta macluumaadka, waxaynu kala sheekaynaa dhibaatada ku jirta iyo waxyaabaha shaqada ku jira.", 'sv': 'Parental Advisory Label (PAL) är en varningsetikett som placeras på ljudinspelningar för att erkänna svordomar eller olämpliga referenser, med avsikt att varna föräldrar om material som kan vara olämpligt för barn. Sedan 2015 följer digitala leverantörer - som iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music och Deezer - också PAL riktlinjer och taggar sådana spår som "explicit". Numera sker en sådan märkning huvudsakligen manuellt på frivillig basis, med nackdelarna med att den är tidskrävande och därmed kostsam, felbenägen och delvis subjektiv uppgift. I denna uppsats jämför vi automatiserade metoder som sträcker sig från ordlista baserad uppslag till state-of-the-art djupa neurala nätverk för att automatiskt upptäcka explicit innehåll i engelska texter. Vi visar att mer komplexa modeller bara presterar något bättre på denna uppgift, och med hjälp av en kvalitativ analys av data diskuterar vi uppgiftens inneboende hårdhet och subjektivitet.', 'sr': 'Roditeljska savjetnička etiketa (PAL) je upozorenja koja se stavlja na audio snimke u priznanje dubokosti ili neprikladnih referencija, sa namjerom upozorenja roditelja materijala potencijalno neprikladnih za decu. Od 2015. godine, digitalni pružatelji - poput iTunes, Spotify, Amazon muzika i Deezer - takođe prate vodične linije PAL-a i označavaju tragove poput "eksplicita". Danas se takva etiketa proizvodi uglavnom na dobrovoljnoj osnovi, s nedostatkama potrošenja vremena i stoga skuplja, greška izravna i djelomično subjektivna zadatka. U ovom papiru uspoređujemo automatske metode od traženja na rečniku do dubokih neuralnih mreža da automatski otkrijemo pojasno sadržanje engleskih tekstova. Pokazujemo da kompleksniji modeli izvršavaju samo malo bolje na ovom zadatku, i oslanjajući se na kvalitativnu analizu podataka, razgovaramo o inherenciji teškosti i subjektivnosti zadatka.', 'ta': "பெற்றோர் ஆலோசனை விளக்கச்சீட்டு (PAL) குழந்தைகளுக்கு தகுதியான பொருட்களின் பெற்றோர்களை எச்சரிக்கை செய்ய முடியாத ஒலி பதிவுகளில் அமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது சொ 2015 முதலில், ஐடியூன்ஸ், ஸ்போடிக், அமாசான் இசை மற்றும் Deezer போன்ற டிஜிட்டல் வழங்குபவர்கள் 'வெளிப்படையாக' போன்ற தடங்களை பின்பற்றுங்கள். இப்போது, இத்தகைய குறிப்புகள் முக்கியமாக தானாகவே செயல்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, நேரம் செலவு செய்யும் பின்புறம், பிழை தெளிவாக்கப்படுகிறது மற்று இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் தன்னியக்க முறைகளை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் அகராதி அடிப்படையில் தேடுதலிலிருந்து நிலையில் ஆழமான புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்களுக்கு த நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் அதிக சிக்கலான மாதிரிகள் இந்த செயல்பாட்டில் சிறிது சிறப்பாக செயல்படுத்துகிறது மற்றும் தகவலின் குறிப்பான ஆய்வ", 'ur': "والدین مشوری لابل (PAL) ایک ڈرانی لابل ہے جو آڈیو ریکورینگ پر ڈال دی جاتی ہے کہ بے حیائی یا غلطی نسبتوں کی پہچان کرتی ہے اور ماں باپ کو ڈرانا چاہتا ہے کہ ماں باپ کو بچوں کے لئے غلطی ہو سکے۔ 2015 سے پہلے، ڈیجیٹل پرویڈر - جیسے iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music and Deezer - بھی پیل ہدایت لینوں کے پیچھے چل رہے ہیں اور ایسے ٹراکیوں کی طرح ٹاگ چل رہے ہیں جیسے 'صریح'. آج ایسی لابلینگ آزادی کے ذریعے اپنے ہاتھ سے کام کی جاتی ہے، اس لئے زمانہ کھانے کی کمی ہے اور اس لئے بہت قیمت کے ذریعے گمراہی آزاد ہے اور بعض بعض بعض موجود کام کی جاتی ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم آٹوماٹ طریقے کی مثالیں مقایسہ کرتے ہیں، جو لکھنے کے باعث لکھنے سے سیٹی-of-the-art-deep neural networks سے انگلیسی لکھنے کے لئے اپنا صاف صاف منصوبات پہچان سکتے ہیں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ بہت پیچیدہ موڈل اس کام پر صرف تھوڑا بہتر عمل کرتے ہیں، اور ڈاٹوں کی ایک کیلوٹیٹی تحلیل پر بھروسہ کرتے ہیں، ہم اس کام کی اصلی سختی اور سرگوشی سے بحث کرتے ہیں.", 'vi': 'The Parental advvấn Label (PAL) là một nhãn cảnh báo được dán trên các đoạn ghi âm để nhận dạng ngôn ngữ không phù hợp, với mục đích cảnh báo cha mẹ về vật liệu có thể không phù hợp với trẻ con. Kể từ bây giờ tê phẩm, các nhà cung cấp số như iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music và Deezer, cũng theo các chỉ dẫn PAL và đánh dấu như là "explicit". Ngày nay, một loại nhãn được thực hiện chủ động tự nguyện, với những khuyết điểm khi mất thời gian và do đó tốn kém, dễ bị lỗi và có phần là một nhiệm vụ chủ quan. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi so sánh các phương pháp tự động, từ từ điển tìm kiếm đến mạng thần kinh sâu nhất mới tinh vi để tự động phát hiện nội dung của lời bài hát Anh. Chúng tôi cho thấy các mô hình phức tạp chỉ làm tốt hơn một chút trên nhiệm vụ này, và dựa trên một phân tích tính chất của dữ liệu, chúng tôi bàn về tính cứng rắn và tính người của nhiệm vụ này.', 'uz': 'Name 2015 yildan yigʻilgan, iTunes, Spotify, Amazon musiqa va Deezer kabi raqamli serverlar - balki "ошкоро" kabi PAL yordamchilarga qoʻshish va yoʻllar. Bugun hozirda, bu tugmalar qo\'lbola qo\'lbola ishlaydi, vaqt ishlatish uchun bajarish orqali bajaradi va shunday sababda qiymati, xato taʼminlovchi va bir qiymati vazifani bajaradi. Bu qogʻozda, biz lugʻatdagi lugʻatdagi qidirish va eng yuqori tarmoq tarmoqlariga avtomatik o\'xshash tarkibini aniqlash uchun avtomatik tarkibini aniqlash. Biz ko\'proq murakkab modellar shu vazifani faqat yaxshi bajaradi va maʼlumotlarning kvalifik analyzerini ishlatamiz, biz vazifaning davomida qisqarli qatlam va muhimligini bilamiz.', 'bg': 'Етикетът за родителска консултация (ПАЛ) е предупредителен етикет, който се поставя върху аудиозаписи в знак на признание за псувни или неподходящи препратки, с цел да предупреди родителите за материал, потенциално неподходящ за деца. От 2015 г. дигиталните доставчици - като също следват насоките на PAL и маркират такива песни като "изрични". В днешно време такова етикетиране се извършва главно ръчно на доброволна основа, като недостатъците са, че отнема време и следователно е скъпо, склонно към грешки и отчасти е субективна задача. В тази статия сравняваме автоматизирани методи, вариращи от речник-базирано търсене до най-съвременни дълбоки невронни мрежи, за автоматично откриване на изрично съдържание в текстовете на английски език. Показваме, че по-сложните модели се представят само малко по-добре по тази задача и разчитайки на качествен анализ на данните, обсъждаме присъщата твърдост и субективност на задачата.', 'da': 'Parental Advisory Label (PAL) er et advarselsmærke, der er placeret på lydoptagelser som anerkendelse af bandeord eller upassende referencer, med det formål at advare forældre om materiale, der potentielt er uegnet til børn. Siden 2015 følger digitale udbydere - såsom iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music og Deezer - også PAL retningslinjer og mærker sådanne numre som "eksplicit". I dag foretages en sådan mærkning hovedsagelig manuelt på frivilligt grundlag med ulemperne ved at være tidskrævende og derfor dyr, fejltilbøjelig og delvist en subjektiv opgave. I denne artikel sammenligner vi automatiserede metoder, der spænder fra ordbogbaseret opslag til state-of-the-art dybe neurale netværk til automatisk at registrere eksplicit indhold i engelske tekster. Vi viser, at mere komplekse modeller kun klarer sig lidt bedre på denne opgave, og ved hjælp af en kvalitativ analyse af dataene diskuterer vi opgavens iboende hårdhed og subjektivitet.', 'nl': "Het Parental Advisory Label (PAL) is een waarschuwingslabel dat op geluidsopnames wordt geplaatst ter erkenning van godslastering of ongepaste verwijzingen, met de bedoeling ouders te waarschuwen voor materiaal dat mogelijk ongeschikt is voor kinderen. Sinds 2015 volgen digitale providers zoals iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music en Deezer ook PAL richtlijnen en taggen dergelijke tracks als 'expliciet'. Tegenwoordig gebeurt dergelijke etikettering voornamelijk handmatig op vrijwillige basis, met als nadeel dat ze tijdrovend en dus kostbaar is, foutgevoelig en deels subjectief is. In dit artikel vergelijken we geautomatiseerde methoden variërend van woordenboek-based lookup tot state-of-the-art diepe neurale netwerken om automatisch expliciete inhoud in Engelse teksten te detecteren. We laten zien dat complexere modellen slechts iets beter presteren op deze taak, en uitgaand van een kwalitatieve analyse van de gegevens bespreken we de inherente hardheid en subjectiviteit van de taak.", 'hr': "Roditeljska savjetnička etiketa (PAL) je značka upozorenja koja se stavlja na zvukovne snimke u priznanje dubokosti ili neprikladnih referencija, s namjerom upozoriti roditelje materijala potencijalno neprikladne za djecu. Od 2015. godine, digitalni pružatelji - poput iTunes, Spotify, Amazon muzika i Deezer - također prate uputstva PAL-a i označavaju tragove poput 'eksplicita'. Danas se takva označavanja proizvodi uglavnom na dobrovoljnoj osnovi, s nedostatkom potrošenja vremena i stoga skupo, pogreške izražene i djelomično subjektivne zadatke. U ovom papiru uspoređujemo automatske metode od traženja na rečniku do dubokih neuralnih mreža kako bi automatski otkrili pojasno sadržanje engleskih tekstova. Pokazujemo da kompleksniji modeli obavljaju samo malo bolje na tom zadatku, a oslanjajući se na kvalitativnu analizu podataka, razgovaramo o sadrženoj teškosti i subjektivnosti zadatka.", 'de': 'Das Parental Advisory Label (PAL) ist ein Warnetikett, das in Anerkennung von Profanität oder unangemessenen Referenzen auf Audioaufnahmen angebracht wird, mit der Absicht, Eltern auf Material aufmerksam zu machen, das möglicherweise für Kinder ungeeignet ist. Seit 2015 folgen auch digitale Anbieter wie iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music und Deezer den PAL-Richtlinien und markieren solche Tracks als "explizit". Heutzutage erfolgt eine solche Kennzeichnung hauptsächlich manuell auf freiwilliger Basis, mit den Nachteilen, dass sie zeitaufwendig und damit kostspielig, fehleranfällig und teilweise subjektiv ist. In diesem Beitrag vergleichen wir automatisierte Methoden, die vom Wörterbuch-basierten Nachschlagen bis hin zu hochmodernen tiefen neuronalen Netzwerken reichen, um explizite Inhalte in englischen Texten automatisch zu erkennen. Wir zeigen, dass komplexere Modelle bei dieser Aufgabe nur geringfügig besser abschneiden, und ausgehend von einer qualitativen Analyse der Daten diskutieren wir die inhärente Härte und Subjektivität der Aufgabe.', 'id': "Label penasehat ibu bapa (PAL) adalah label peringatan yang ditempatkan pada rekaman audio sebagai pengakuan keburukan atau referensi yang tidak sesuai, dengan niat memperingatkan ibu bapa tentang bahan yang potensi tidak sesuai untuk anak-anak. Sejak 2015, penyedia digital - seperti iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music dan Deezer - juga mengikuti panduan PAL dan menandai trek seperti 'eksplicit'. Hari ini, label tersebut dilakukan terutama secara manual pada dasar sukarela, dengan kelemahan waktu yang memakan dan karena itu mahal, kesalahan cenderung dan sebagian dari tugas subjektif. Dalam kertas ini, kita membandingkan metode otomatis yang berasal dari pencarian berdasarkan kamus hingga jaringan saraf mendalam yang terbaik untuk secara otomatis mendeteksi isi eksplicit dalam lirik Inggris. We show that more complex models perform only slightly better on this task, and relying on a qualitative analysis of the data, we discuss the inherent hardness and subjectivity of the task.", 'ko': "학부모 상담 레이블(PAL)은 모독이나 부적절한 인용을 식별하기 위해 녹음에 놓인 경고 레이블로, 어린이에게 적합하지 않을 수 있는 자료에 대한 주의를 환기하기 위한 것이다.아이튠즈, 스포티파이, 아마존 뮤직, 데저 등 디지털 제공자도 2015년 이후 PAL의 가이드라인을 따르며 이런 곡을'explicit'로 표기해왔다.현재 이런 라벨은 주로 자원에 기초하여 수동으로 진행되는 것으로 시간이 소모되기 때문에 원가가 높고 실수하기 쉬우며 일부는 주관적인 임무이다.본고에서 우리는 사전을 바탕으로 가장 선진적인 심도 신경 네트워크를 찾아내는 자동 방법을 비교하여 영어 가사의 명확한 내용을 자동으로 검출했다.우리는 더욱 복잡한 모델이 이 임무에서의 표현이 조금 좋았을 뿐이고 데이터에 대한 정성 분석에 의존하여 임무의 내재적인 경도와 주관성을 토론했다.", 'fa': 'برچسب مشاوره پدر (PAL) یک برچسب هشداری است که بر ضبط\u200cهای صوتی در شناسایی یادآوری\u200cهای غیرقابل یا غیرقابل ارتباط قرار می\u200cگیرد، با هدف هشدار دادن پدر و مادر ماده\u200cای که ممکن است برای بچه\u200cها غیرقابل استفاده باشد. از سال ۲۰۱۵، پردازگاران دیجیتال - مثل iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music and Deezer - همچنین هدایت\u200cهای PAL را دنبال می\u200cکنند و ترکیب\u200cهای مانند «مشخص». امروز، این نقاشی را به طور کلی به صورت داوطلب انجام می\u200cدهد، با کمی از اینکه زمان مصرف می\u200cکند، و بنابراین با ارزش، خطای آشکار و بخشی یک کار موجود است. در این کاغذ، ما روش\u200cهای اتوماتیک را از طریق جستجویی بر اساس آهنگ به شبکه\u200cهای عصبی عمیق هنر برای خودکار پیدا کردن محتویات خاصی در زبان انگلیسی مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که مدل های پیچیده تری فقط کمی بهتر روی این کار انجام می دهند، و بر یک تحلیل کیفیت داده ها اعتماد می کنیم، ما در مورد سختی و خصوصیت کار صحبت می کنیم.', 'af': "Die ouderlande raadskrywing etiket (PAL) is 'n waarskuwing etiket wat op oudio opneem is in herken van profaniteit of onpasbare verwysing, met die intensie van waarskuwing van ouers van materiaal potensielik onuitbaar vir kinders. Van 2015 af, digitale verskaffers - soos iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Musiek en Deezer - ook volg PAL gidsline en etiket soos snitte as 'explicit'. Vandag word sodanige etiketting heeltemal op vrolikheid basis uitgevoer, met die tekeninge van tyd verconsuming en daarom kosbaar, fout voorspoedig en gedeeltelik 'n subjektiewe taak. In hierdie papier vergelyk ons outomatiese metodes vanaf woordeboek-gebaseerde soek tot state-of-the-art diep neuralnetwerke om outomaties eksplisiese inhoud in Engelske lyrike te ontdek. Ons wys dat meer komplekse modele net klein beter uitvoer op hierdie taak, en op 'n kwaliteit analiseer van die data vertrou, ons bespreek die inherende hardheid en subjektiviteit van die taak.", 'tr': "Aýratyn Maýyp Etiketi 2015-nji ýyldan bäri, dijital teminatçiler - iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Müzik we Deezer - hem PAL gurlap hatlaryny we çykyşlaryny 'explicit' ýaly tägleri diýip tägler. Häzirki günlerde, bu etiketler meýletin esasy bilen meýletinde geçirilýär, wagt tüketmesinden boşandyrylýar we şonuň üçin deňli, hata täsirli we bölegi meýdança täze bir işi bolup geçirilýär. Bu kagyzda sözlükden gözlemek üçin awtomatik taýýarlanan yöntemleri iňlisçe sözleriň içinde aydınlaşyk maslahatlaryny otomatik aňladýarys. Biz köp karmaşık nusgalaryň bu zada biraz gowy dowam edýändigini görkeýäris we maglumatyň esasy kynçylyklaryny we subjektini çykarýarys.", 'sw': 'Label a ya Ushauri wa Wazazi (PAL) ni alama ya maonyo inayowekwa kwenye rekodi za sauti kwa kutambua utaratibu au maoni yasiyo sahihi, kwa lengo la kuwaonya wazazi wa vitu vinavyoweza kuwa na uwezekano wa kutosha kwa watoto. Tangu 2015, watengenezaji wa kidijitali - kama iTunes, Spotify, Music Amazon na Deezer - pia wafuatilia miongozo ya PAL na viungo kama vile ‘wazi’. Leo hivi sasa, michoro kama haya yanafanywa kwa mikononi, kwa kutumia mgongo wa matumizi ya muda na kwa hiyo gharama, makosa yanaonyesha na sehemu ya kazi yenye madaraka. Katika karatasi hii, tunalinganisha mbinu za kujitegemea zinazotokana na utafutaji wa lugha iliyokuwa na lugha ya lugha ya Kiingereza mpaka kwenye mitandao ya kisasa ya kisasa ili kujigundua vilivyomo wazi. Tunaonyesha kuwa mifano ya tatizo zaidi yanafanya kazi hii kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi, na tunategemea uchambuzi wa vipimo vya taarifa, tunajadili hali ngumu na umuhimu wa kazi hiyo.', 'am': 'የወላጆች ምክር ምልክት (PAL) ለልጆቹ የማይጠቅመውን ማህበረሰብ እናቶች ለማስጠንቀቂያ በሚችል ማህበረሰብ ላይ ድምፅ ማዘጋጀት የሚደረገው ማስጠንቀቂያ ምልክት ነው፡፡ ከ2015 ጀምሮ፣ ዲጂተል ሰናዳፊዎች - እንደኢትዮን፣ Spotify፣ አማዞን ሙዚቃ እና Deezer - እንደዚህ ‘ግልፅ’ የሚል የPAL መሪ መሪ እና የመግለጫ ምልክቶች ተከተሉ፡፡ Nowadays, such labelling is carried out mainly manually on voluntary basis, with the drawbacks of being time consuming and therefore costly, error prone and partly a subjective task.  በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የመዝገበ ቋንቋ-ተመሳሳይ የቋንቋ-የራቀ የጥልቅ የናውሬት መረብ ላይ የተለየውን የግልፅ የግልፅ ቋንቋዎች በይንግሊዝኛ ቋንቋ ለመግለጥ እናስተያየዋለን፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን፣ አብዛኛዎቹ አካባቢዎች በዚህ ስራ ላይ ጥቂት የሚሻሉትን እናደርጋለን፣ ዳራዎችን በተመሳሳይ እናደጋግማለን፣ የስራውን ድካም እናስገራለን፡፡', 'sq': "The Parental Advisory Label (PAL) is a warning label that is placed on audio recordings in recognition of profanity or inappropriate references, with the intention of alerting parents of material potentially unsuitable for children.  Since 2015, digital providers - such as iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music and Deezer - also follow PAL guidelines and tag such tracks as 'explicit'.  Sot, një etiketë e tillë kryesisht zbatohet manualisht në bazë vullnetare, me dëmtimet e kohës së konsumuar dhe prandaj të kushtueshme, të prirura për gabime dhe pjesërisht një detyrë subjektive. In this paper, we compare automated methods ranging from dictionary-based lookup to state-of-the-art deep neural networks to automatically detect explicit contents in English lyrics.  Ne tregojmë se modelet më komplekse kryejnë vetëm pak më mirë në këtë detyrë, dhe mbështetur në një analizë kualitative të të dhënave, ne diskutojmë vështirësinë dhe subjektivitetin e saj.", 'hy': 'Ծնողների խորհրդատվության պիտակ է, որը տեղադրվում է ձայնային ձայնագրությունների վրա, որպեսզի ճանաչվի անհարմար կամ անհարմար խորհուրդներ, որպեսզի խորհուրդներ տա ծնողներին երեխաների համար պոտենցիալ անհարմար նյութերի մասին: 2015 թվականներից սկսած թվային պարտադրողները, ինչպիսիք են iTunes-ը, SpoTiy-ը, Amazon Music-ը և Deeler-ը, նաև հետևում են պալ գծերի ուղղություններին և նշանակում են «բացատրական»։ Այսօր այդպիսի պիտակ կատարվում է հիմնականում ձեռքով կամավոր հիմքով, ժամանակի պահանջման թերություններով, ինչը հետևաբար թանկ է, սխալների հակված է և մասամբ սուբյեկտիվ խնդիր: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք համեմատում ենք ավտոմատիկ մեթոդներ, որոնք սկսում են բառարանի հիմնված որոնումից մինչև ամենաբարձր նյարդային ցանցեր, որպեսզի ինքնաբերաբար հայտնաբերեն անգլերեն լեզուներում բացատրված պարունակությունը: We show that more complex models perform only slightly better on this task, and relying on a qualitative analysis of the data, we discuss the inherent hardness and subjectivity of the task.', 'az': "Üstünlük Advisory Label (PAL) çocuklar üçün mümkün olmayan materyal valideynlərini xəbərdar etmək niyyətində səs kayıtlarına qoyulmuş xəbərdarlıq etiketidir. 2015-dən bu yana, iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Müziki və Deezer kimi dijital təmin edənlər də PAL hidayətlərini takip edir və 'açıq-aydın' kimi izlər kimi etiket edirlər. Bugünlərdə bu etiketlər gönüllü olaraq, zamanı istifadə etmək və buna görə də dəyərli səhv və bir qismində istifadə etmək lazımdır. Bu kağızda, sözlük tabanlı gözləmə tərəfindən İngilizə sözlərində açıq-aydın içərilərini avtomatik olaraq tanıtmaq üçün avtomatik olaraq avtomatik metodları ilə qarşılaşdırırıq. Biz daha kompleks modellərin bu işdə ancaq az daha yaxşı işlər edir və məlumatların qiymətli analizinə təvəkkül edirik, işin sadəcə çətinliklərini və subjektini mübahisə edirik.", 'bn': 'প্যারেন্টাল পরামর্শ লেবেল (পিএএল) একটি সতর্কীকরণ লেবেল যা অডিও রেকর্ডে রেকর্ড করা হয়েছে যাতে শিশুদের জন্য সম্ভবত সতর্ক করার উদ্দেশ্যে। ২০১৫ সাল থেকে ডিজিটাল প্রদানকারীরা - যেমন আইটিউনিস, স্পোটিফি, আমাজোন সঙ্গীত এবং ডিজার- এছাড়াও প্যাপেলের নির্দেশ এবং ট্র্যাগ অনুসরণ করু বর্তমানে এই ধরনের লেবেলিং মূলত স্বেচ্ছাসেবক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে প্রকাশ করা হয়, যার ফলে সময় খাওয়ার পিছনে দাম, ত্র এই কাগজটিতে আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক অনুসন্ধান থেকে গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে তুলনা করি ইংরেজি ভাষায় বিষয়বস্তু স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাব আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আরো জটিল মডেল এই কাজে শুধুমাত্র কিছুটা ভালো কাজ করে এবং তথ্য বিশ্লেষণের উপর নির্ভর করি, আমরা কাজের বিভিন্ন কঠোর এবং বিশ্বাস', 'ca': "The Parental Advisory Label (PAL) is a warning label that is placed on audio recordings in recognition of profanity or inappropriate references, with the intention of alerting parents of material potentially unsuitable for children.  Des del 2015, els proveedors digitals - com iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music i Deezer - també segueixen les directrices PAL i etiqueten pistes com 'explícites'. Avui en dia, aquesta etiquetada es fa principalment manualment sobre la base voluntaria, amb els inconvenients de ser temps consumidor i per tant costós, propensius a errors i en part una tasca subjectiva. En aquest article, comparem mètodes automatitzats que van des de la cerca basada en diccionaris fins a les xarxes neuronales més modernes fins a detectar automàticament continguts explícits en les lletres angleses. Mostrem que models més complexos només desempenyen una mica millor aquesta tasca, i confiant en una anàlisi qualitativa de les dades, discutem la dificultat i subjectivitat inherents de la tasca.", 'cs': 'Rodičovský poradenský štítek (PAL) je varovný štítek, který je umístěn na zvukových nahrávkách v uznání hanebnosti nebo nevhodných odkazů s cílem upozornit rodiče na materiál potenciálně nevhodný pro děti. Od 2015 se digitální poskytovatelé, jako jsou iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music a Deezer, také řídí pokyny PAL a označují tyto skladby jako "explicitní". V současné době se takové označování provádí především ručně na dobrovolném základě, s nevýhodami toho, že je časově náročné, a tudíž nákladné, náchylné k chybám a částečně subjektivní úkol. V tomto článku porovnáváme automatizované metody od vyhledávání založené na slovníku až po nejmodernější hluboké neuronové sítě, které automaticky detekují explicitní obsah v anglických textech. Ukazujeme, že složitější modely při tomto úkolu fungují jen o mírně lépe a na základě kvalitativní analýzy dat diskutujeme inherentní tvrdost a subjektivitu úkolu.', 'et': 'Vanemliku nõustamise märgis (PAL) on hoiatusmärk, mis pannakse helisalvestistele, et ära tunda sõnakuulmatust või ebasobivaid viiteid, eesmärgiga teavitada vanemaid materjalist, mis võib olla lastele sobimatu. Alates 2015. aastast järgivad digitaalsed teenusepakkujad, nagu iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music ja Deezer, samuti PAL juhiseid ja märgistavad selliseid lugusid kui "selgesõnalised". Tänapäeval toimub selline märgistamine peamiselt käsitsi vabatahtlikkuse alusel, mille puudused on aeganõudev ja seega kulukas, veaohtlik ja osaliselt subjektiivne ülesanne. Selles töös võrdleme automatiseeritud meetodeid alates sõnastikupõhisest otsingust kuni kaasaegsete sügavate närvivõrkudeni, et automaatselt tuvastada selgesõnaline sisu inglise sõnades. Näitame, et keerulisemad mudelid toimivad selle ülesande täitmisel vaid veidi paremini, ning tuginedes andmete kvalitatiivsele analüüsile arutleme ülesande olemuslikku kõvadust ja subjektiivsust.', 'fi': 'Vanhempainneuvontamerkki (PAL) on varoitusmerkki, joka asetetaan äänitallenteille tunnistamaan kiroilua tai sopimattomia viittauksia, tarkoituksena varoittaa vanhempia materiaalista, joka saattaa olla sopimatonta lapsille. Vuodesta 2015 lähtien digitaaliset palveluntarjoajat, kuten iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music ja Deezer, noudattavat myös PAL-ohjeita ja merkitsevät kappaleet "eksplisiittiseksi". Nykyisin tällaiset merkinnät tehdään pääasiassa manuaalisesti vapaaehtoisesti, minkä haittapuolina on aikaa vievä ja näin ollen kallis, virhealtis ja osittain subjektiivinen tehtävä. Tässä artikkelissa vertaamme automatisoituja menetelmiä sanakirjapohjaisesta hausta viimeisimpiin syvähermoverkkoihin, jotta voimme tunnistaa automaattisesti eksplisiittisen sisällön englanninkielisistä sanoituksista. Osoitamme, että monimutkaisemmat mallit suoriutuvat tehtävässä vain hieman paremmin, ja aineiston laadullisen analyysin pohjalta keskustelemme tehtävän luontaisesta kovuudesta ja subjektiivisuudesta.', 'bs': "Roditeljska savjetnička etiketa (PAL) je značka upozorenja koja se stavlja na audio snimke u priznanje dubokosti ili neprikladnih referencija, sa namjerom upozorenja roditelja materijala potencijalno neprikladne za djecu. Od 2015. godine, digitalni pružatelji - poput iTunes, Spotify, Amazon muzika i Deezer - također prate uputstva PAL-a i označavaju tragove poput 'eksplicita'. Danas se takva etiketa proizvodi uglavnom na dobrovoljnoj osnovi, s nedostatkama potrošenja vremena i stoga skuplja, greška izravna i djelomično subjektivna zadatka. U ovom papiru uspoređujemo automatske metode od traženja na rečniku do dubokih neuralnih mreža kako bi automatski otkrili pojasno sadržanje engleskih tekstova. Pokazujemo da kompleksniji modeli obavljaju samo malo bolje na ovom zadatku, a oslanjajući se na kvalitativnu analizu podataka, razgovaramo o nasljednoj teškosti i subjektivnosti zadatka.", 'jv': 'The Paraental AdvIsary Label (PAL) is a warning label that is inserted on the sound registry there politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nyong-jenis, lho etiket dadi wis digawe manut nang voluntari biasa Nang pepulan iki, kita nambah layanan sampeyan karo aturan sing basa gambar kelas nang dikenar-ingkang sampeyan karo hal-nambah layanan alat sing nguasai perusahaan seneng pisan bangsane Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing komplikasi luwih akeh lagi nggawe gerakan karo nggawe barang, lan mulasakno nyong beraksi dadi, kita ngubah dhéwé ngerasakno karo sakjane sakjane lan sakjane sakjane sak kudu nggawe', 'ha': "@ label Tan 2015, masu azurtãwa na digitalar - kamar iTunes, Speotfy, Music na Amzon da Deezer - don su bi shiryoyin PAL da tags kamar 'bayyane'. A yanzu, wannan littafi ana samar da shi kaɗan a kan yardarsa, da bakin bayayyar matuƙar da ake ci wa lokaci, kuma don haka yana da kyauta, sai an jarraba ɓata da rabo wani aikin mai ƙanƙanci. In this paper, we compare automated methods ranging from dictionary-based lookup to state-of-the-art deep neural networks to automatically detect explicit contents in English lyrics.  Munã nũna wa misãlai masu adadi sun yi aiki a kan wannan aikin da ke da abu kaɗan mafi alhẽri, kuma munã dõgara a kan anayyar-lissafi na data, za mu yi jayayya a cikin haƙƙin da muhimmanci na aikin wannan.", 'sk': 'Oznaka starševskega svetovanja (PAL) je opozorilna oznaka, ki je nameščena na zvočne posnetke kot prepoznavanje prekletstva ali neprimernih referenc z namenom opozoriti starše o gradivu, ki bi lahko bilo neprimerno za otroke. Od leta 2015 digitalni ponudniki, kot so iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music in Deezer, sledijo tudi smernicam PAL in označujejo skladbe kot "eksplicitne". Danes se takšno označevanje izvaja predvsem ročno na prostovoljni osnovi, s pomanjkljivostmi, da je dolgotrajno in zato drago, nagnjeno k napakam in delno subjektivno nalogo. V tem prispevku primerjamo avtomatizirane metode, ki segajo od iskanja na slovarju do najsodobnejših globokih nevronskih omrežij za samodejno zaznavanje eksplicitne vsebine v angleških besedilih. Pokazujemo, da bolj kompleksni modeli delujejo pri tej nalogi le nekoliko bolje, na podlagi kvalitativne analize podatkov pa razpravljamo o neločljivi trdoti in subjektivnosti naloge.', 'bo': "The Parental Advisory Label (PAL) is a warning label that is placed on audio recordings in recognition of profanity or inappropriate references, with the intention of alerting parents of material potentially unsuitable for children. Since 2015, digital providers - such as iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music and Deezer - also follow PAL guidelines and tag such tracks as 'explicit'. Nowadays, such labelling is carried out mainly manually on voluntary basis, with the drawbacks of being time consuming and therefore costly, error prone and partly a subjective task. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་ཆེ་བའི་མིག་དཔེ་གཟུགས་རིས་དེ་ལས་བྱ་འགུལ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ལས་ཉུང་བའི་ལྟ་བ་ཞིབ", 'he': "The Parental Advisory Label (PAL) is a warning label that is placed on audio recordings in recognition of profanity or inappropriate references, with the intention of alerting parents of material potentially unsuitable for children.  מאז 2015, מספקים דיגיטליים - כמו iTunes, Spotify, Amazon Music ודיזר - גם עוקבים אחרי המדרגות PAL ותגיעו עקבות כאלה כמו 'ברצינות'. כיום, סימנים כאלה מבצעים בעיקר בידיים על בסיס נדיבי, עם החסרונות של להיות זמן משתמש ולכן יקר, נוטה לשגיאות וחלק משימה סוביקטיבית. בעיתון הזה, אנו שווים שיטות אוטומטיות שמגיעות מחפש מבוסס במילונים לרשתות עצביות עמוקות מוקדמות אנחנו מראים שמודלים מורכבים יותר מבצעים רק מעט יותר טוב על המשימה הזאת, ובסמכות על ניתוח איכותי של הנתונים, אנחנו מדברים על הקשה והסוביקטיבות הנכונה של המשימה."}
{'en': 'Linguistic classification : dealing jointly with irrelevance and inconsistency', 'ar': 'التصنيف اللغوي: التعامل بشكل مشترك مع اللامبالاة وعدم الاتساق', 'es': 'Clasificación lingüística: abordar conjuntamente la irrelevancia y la incoherencia', 'fr': "Classification linguistique\xa0: gérer conjointement la non-pertinence et l'incohérence", 'pt': 'Classificação linguística: lidando conjuntamente com a irrelevância e a inconsistência', 'ja': '言語分類：無関係性と不整合性を共同で扱う', 'ru': 'Лингвистическая классификация: совместная работа с нерелевантностью и непоследовательностью', 'hi': 'भाषाई वर्गीकरण: अप्रासंगिकता और असंगतता के साथ संयुक्त रूप से काम करना', 'zh': '言语分类:同不相关', 'ga': 'Aicmiú teangeolaíoch: déileáil i gcomhpháirt le neamhábharthacht agus le neamhréireacht', 'el': 'Γλωσσολογική ταξινόμηση: αντιμετώπιση από κοινού της ασάφειας και της ασυνέπειας', 'hu': 'Nyelvi besorolás: a lényegtelenség és a következetlenség együttes kezelése', 'ka': 'ლინგურისტიკური კლასიფიკაცია: ერთადერთად უკავშირებული და უკავშირებული', 'kk': 'Лингистикалық классификация: қатынасыз және қатынасыз', 'lt': 'Kalbos klasifikacija: bendras neatitikimo ir nenuoseklumo sprendimas', 'it': "Classificazione linguistica: trattare congiuntamente l'irrilevanza e l'incoerenza", 'mk': 'Лингвистичка класификација: заеднички справување со нерелевантноста и несогласеноста', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi bahasa: berurusan bersama dengan ketidakpertimbangan dan ketidakkonsistens', 'mt': 'Linguistic classification: dealing jointly with irrelevance and inconsistency', 'ml': 'ലിന്\u200dഗ്വിസ്റ്റിക്ക് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d: അസാധ്യതയും അസാധ്യതയുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്നു', 'mn': 'Лингистик хуваалтын хуваалтыг: хоорондоо холбоотой, холбоотой', 'no': 'Lingsklassifikasjon: handling saman med ulikhet og inkonsistens', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja językowa: wspólne radzenie sobie z nieistotnością i niespójnością', 'ro': 'Clasificarea lingvistică: abordarea în comun a irelevanței și a inconsecvenței', 'sr': 'Lingistička klasifikacija: postupanje zajedno sa nepriličnošću i neskladnošću', 'si': 'ලින්ග්යුසිටික් විශේෂණය: සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණය', 'so': 'Takhasuska luqada: ka shaqeeya iskaashatada iyo shaqo la’aanta', 'sv': 'Språklig klassificering: att gemensamt hantera irrelevans och inkonsekvens', 'ta': 'வரிசை வகுப்பு: உயர்ந்த மற்றும் பொருத்தமுடியாத', 'ur': 'Linguistic classification: joint dealing with irrelevance and inconsistency', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phân loại ngôn ngữ: giải quyết không đáng tin và mâu thuẫn', 'bg': 'Лингвистична класификация: справяне съвместно с неуместността и несъответствието', 'nl': 'Taalkundige classificatie: samen omgaan met irrelevantie en inconsistentie', 'hr': 'Lingistička klasifikacija: zajednički rješavanje s nepriličnošću i neskladnošću', 'da': 'Sprog klassificering: behandling af irrelevans og inkonsekvens i fællesskab', 'de': 'Sprachliche Klassifizierung: gemeinsamer Umgang mit Irrelevanz und Inkonsistenz', 'ko': '언어 분류: 연합 처리는 무관하고 일치하지 않는다', 'fa': 'کلیسازی لینگ: با همدیگر با بی ارزشی و بی ارزشی', 'id': 'Klasifikasi bahasa: berurusan bersama dengan ketidakpertimbangan dan ketidakkonsistens', 'sw': 'Ufanuzi wa lugha: kushirikiana na ushirikiano na upinzani', 'tr': 'Sözgürlük klasifikasyon:çözümsiz ve düşmezlik bilen bir araya geçmek', 'af': 'Linguistiese klasifikasie: saamgegaan met onheiligheid en onheiligheid', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi gjuhësor: trajtimi i përbashkët me pavarësinë dhe moskonsistencën', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'hy': 'Լեզունական դասակարգման. միասին վերաբերվում է անկարևորության և անհամապատասխանատվության հետ', 'bn': 'লিঙ্গিস্টিক ক্লাসাফিকেশন: অযৌক্তিক এবং অযোগ্যতার সাথে যুক্ত করা', 'az': 'Linguistik klasifikasiya: …Щlaq…Щsizlik v…Щ inconsistenci il…Щ birlikd…Щ', 'bs': 'Lingistička klasifikacija: suočavanje zajedničkog sa neovisnošću i neskladnošću', 'ca': "Classificació lingüística: tractar conjuntament de l'irrelevance i l'inconsistencia", 'cs': 'Jazyková klasifikace: společné řešení irelevantnosti a nesouladu', 'et': 'Keeleline klassifikatsioon: ühiselt käsitletakse ebaolulisust ja vastuolulisust', 'fi': 'Kielellinen luokittelu: epäolennaisuuden ja epäjohdonmukaisuuden käsitteleminen yhdessä', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Jezikovna klasifikacija: skupno obravnavanje nepomembnosti in neskladnosti', 'he': 'מסווג שפתי: להתמודד ביחד עם חוסר רלוונטיות וחסר תואמות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་མཐུན་མེད་པའི་དབྱེ་རིགས།'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present new methods for language classification which put to good use both syntax and fuzzy tools, and are capable of dealing with irrelevant linguistic features (i.e. features which should not contribute to the classification) and even inconsistent features (which do not make sense for specific languages). We introduce a metric distance, based on the generalized Steinhaus transform, which allows one to deal jointly with irrelevance and inconsistency. To evaluate our methods, we test them on a syntactic data set, due to the linguist G. Longobardi and his school. We obtain phylogenetic trees which sometimes outperform the ones obtained by Atkinson and Gray.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons de nouvelles méthodes de classification des langues qui font bon usage à la fois de la syntaxe et des outils flous, et qui sont capables de traiter des caractéristiques linguistiques non pertinentes (c'est-à-dire des caractéristiques qui ne devraient pas contribuer à la classification) et même des caractéristiques incohérentes (qui n'ont pas de sens pour des langues). Nous introduisons une distance métrique, basée sur la transformée de Steinhaus généralisée, qui permet de traiter conjointement la non-pertinence et l'incohérence. Pour évaluer nos méthodes, nous les testons sur un ensemble de données syntaxiques, grâce au linguiste G. Longobardi et à son école. Nous obtenons des arbres phylogénétiques qui surpassent parfois ceux obtenus par Atkinson et Gray.", 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم طرقًا جديدة لتصنيف اللغة والتي تستخدم أدوات بناء الجملة والأدوات الغامضة ، وقادرة على التعامل مع السمات اللغوية غير ذات الصلة (أي الميزات التي لا ينبغي أن تساهم في التصنيف) وحتى السمات غير المتسقة (التي لا تفعل ذلك). منطقيًا للغات معينة). نقدم مسافة مترية ، بناءً على تحويل Steinhaus المعمم ، والذي يسمح للفرد بالتعامل بشكل مشترك مع عدم الملاءمة وعدم الاتساق. لتقييم أساليبنا ، قمنا باختبارها على مجموعة بيانات نحوية ، بفضل اللغوي جي لونجوباردي ومدرسته. نحصل على أشجار النشوء والتطور التي تتفوق أحيانًا على تلك التي حصل عليها أتكينسون وجراي.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos nuevos métodos para la clasificación de idiomas que aprovechan tanto la sintaxis como las herramientas difusas, y son capaces de tratar características lingüísticas irrelevantes (es decir, características que no deberían contribuir a la clasificación) e incluso características inconsistentes (que no tienen sentido para idiomas). Introducimos una distancia métrica, basada en la transformación generalizada de Steinhaus, que permite tratar conjuntamente la irrelevancia y la inconsistencia. Para evaluar nuestros métodos, los probamos en un conjunto de datos sintácticos, gracias al lingüista G. Longobardi y su escuela. Obtenemos árboles filogenéticos que a veces superan a los obtenidos por Atkinson y Gray.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos novos métodos de classificação de linguagens que fazem bom uso tanto de ferramentas sintáticas quanto fuzzy, e são capazes de lidar com características linguísticas irrelevantes (ou seja, características que não devem contribuir para a classificação) e até mesmo características inconsistentes (que não fazem sentido para idiomas específicos). Introduzimos uma distância métrica, baseada na transformada de Steinhaus generalizada, que permite lidar conjuntamente com irrelevância e inconsistência. Para avaliar nossos métodos, nós os testamos em um conjunto de dados sintáticos, devido ao linguista G. Longobardi e sua escola. Obtemos árvores filogenéticas que às vezes superam as obtidas por Atkinson e Gray.', 'ja': '本稿では、構文とファジィツールの両方をうまく活用し、無関係な言語学的特徴（すなわち、分類に寄与しない特徴）、さらには矛盾した特徴（特定の言語にとって意味をなさない特徴）に対処できる言語分類のための新しい方法を提示する。一般化されたスタインハウス変換に基づいて、無関係性と矛盾性を共同で扱うことができるメートル法の距離を導入しました。私たちの方法を評価するために、言語学者のG. Longobardiと彼の学校のために、構文データセットでそれらをテストします。アトキンソンとグレイによって得られたものを上回ることもある系統樹を得る。', 'zh': '本文有新语分类之法,备用语法模糊之具,而处不相关之语(即不应有助于分类者)至于不一者(无谓特定)。 引入广义斯坦豪斯度量,许人同不关。 论我之法,试之语法数集上,归功于语言学家G. Longobardi与学校也。 得系统发育树,或优于AtkinsonGray之树。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम भाषा वर्गीकरण के लिए नए तरीके पेश करते हैं जो वाक्यविन्यास और फजी टूल दोनों का अच्छा उपयोग करते हैं, और अप्रासंगिक भाषाई विशेषताओं (यानी ऐसी विशेषताएं जिन्हें वर्गीकरण में योगदान नहीं देना चाहिए) और यहां तक कि असंगत विशेषताओं (जो विशिष्ट भाषाओं के लिए समझ में नहीं आता है) से निपटने में सक्षम हैं। हम सामान्यीकृत स्टीनहॉस ट्रांसफॉर्म के आधार पर एक मीट्रिक दूरी का परिचय देते हैं, जो किसी को अप्रासंगिकता और असंगतता के साथ संयुक्त रूप से निपटने की अनुमति देता है। हमारे तरीकों का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए, हम उन्हें एक वाक्यात्मक डेटा सेट पर परीक्षण करते हैं, भाषाविद् जी लोंगोबार्डी और उनके स्कूल के कारण। हम phylogenetic पेड़ जो कभी कभी Atkinson और ग्रे द्वारा प्राप्त लोगों को पछाड़ प्राप्त प्राप्त करते हैं.', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем новые методы классификации языков, которые хорошо используют как синтаксис, так и нечеткие инструменты и способны иметь дело с нерелевантными лингвистическими особенностями (т.е. особенностями, которые не должны способствовать классификации) и даже несогласованными особенностями (которые не имеют смысла для конкретных языков). Введем метрическое расстояние, основанное на обобщенном преобразовании Штайнхауса, которое позволяет совместно иметь дело с нерелевантностью и непоследовательностью. Чтобы оценить наши методы, мы тестируем их на синтаксическом наборе данных, благодаря лингвисту Г. Лонгобарди и его школе. Мы получаем филогенетические деревья, которые иногда превосходят деревья, полученные Аткинсоном и Грэем.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair modhanna nua d’aicmiú teanga a bhain úsáid mhaith as uirlisí comhréire agus doiléire, agus atá in ann déileáil le gnéithe neamhábhartha teangeolaíochta (i.e. gnéithe nár cheart go gcuirfeadh siad leis an rangú) agus fiú gnéithe neamhréireacha (nach mbaineann). ciall a bhaint as teangacha ar leith). Tugaimid achar méadrach isteach, bunaithe ar an gclaochlú ginearálaithe Steinhaus, a ligeann do dhuine déileáil i gcomhpháirt le neamhábharthacht agus neamhréireacht. Chun ár modhanna a mheas, déanaimid tástáil orthu ar thacar sonraí comhréire, mar gheall ar an teangeolaí G. Longobardi agus a scoil. Faighimid crainn phylogenetic uaireanta níos fearr ná na cinn a fhaigheann Atkinson agus Gray.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban olyan új nyelvi osztályozási módszereket mutatunk be, amelyek jól használják mind a szintaxist, mind a fuzzy eszközöket, és képesek kezelni a lényegtelen nyelvi jellemzőket (azaz olyan jellemzőket, amelyek nem járulhatnak hozzá az osztályozáshoz), sőt következetlen jellemzőket (amelyek bizonyos nyelveknél nincsenek értelme). Bevezetünk egy metrikus távolságot, amely az általánosított Steinhaus transzformáción alapul, lehetővé teszi, hogy közösen kezeljük a lényegtelenséget és a következetlenséget. A módszereink értékeléséhez G. Longobardi nyelvész és iskolája segítségével szintaktikus adatkészleten teszteljük őket. Olyan filogenetikus fákat kapunk, amelyek néha felülmúlják az Atkinson és Gray által nyert fákat.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε νέες μεθόδους ταξινόμησης γλωσσών που χρησιμοποιούν σωστά τόσο τη σύνταξη όσο και τα ασαφή εργαλεία, και είναι σε θέση να αντιμετωπίσουν άσχετα γλωσσικά χαρακτηριστικά (δηλαδή χαρακτηριστικά που δεν θα πρέπει να συμβάλλουν στην ταξινόμηση) και ακόμη και ασυνεχή χαρακτηριστικά (που δεν έχουν νόημα για συγκεκριμένες γλώσσες). Εισάγουμε μια μετρική απόσταση, βασισμένη στον γενικευμένο μετασχηματισμό Στάινχαουζ, η οποία επιτρέπει σε κάποιον να ασχοληθεί από κοινού με την ασάφεια και την ασυνέπεια. Για να αξιολογήσουμε τις μεθόδους μας, τις δοκιμάζουμε σε ένα συντακτικό σύνολο δεδομένων, που οφείλεται στον γλωσσολόγο Γ. Longobardi και το σχολείο του. Λαμβάνουμε φυλλογεννητικά δέντρα που μερικές φορές ξεπερνούν αυτά που αποκτούν ο Άτκινσον και ο Γκρέι.', 'ka': 'ამ წიგში ჩვენ ჩვენ ახალი წიგნის კლასიფიკაციის მეტოვები, რომელიც საშუალოდ გამოყენებს სინტაქქსის და მუშაობელი ხელსაწყოთან და შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ მუშაობელი ენგუფიკაციის ფუნქციების შესახებ (მაგალითად, ფუნქციები, რომელი ჩვენ მივიღებთ მეტრიკური განტოლება, რომელიც გენერალიზებული სტეინჰაუსის ტრანფორმაციის ბაზედ, რომელიც ერთად უნდა გავაკეთოთ განტოლებას და განსხვავებას. ჩვენი მეტოვების შესახებ, ჩვენ ისინი სინტაქტიკური მონაცემების შესახებ ლინგუბორდის და მას სკოლაში გავცვლეთ. ჩვენ მივიღებთ ფილოგენეტიკური ეხეები, რომლებიც პირველად უფრო გავაკეთებენ ატკინსონ და დრეიდან მივიღებენ.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, тілдерді шектеу үшін жаңа әдістерін таңдаймыз. Бұл синтаксис мен жұмыс құрылғылар де қолданып, тілдерді шектеу мүмкіндіктері (мысалы, шектеу үшін қатынау мүмкіндіктері) және тілдерге қатынау мүмкіндіктері де (бұл Метрикалық қашықтығын келтіреміз, көпшілік Стейнхаус түрлендіріміне негізделген, бұл бірінің қашықтығымен қатыстығымен біріктіруге мүмкіндік береді. Біздің әдістерімізді оқу үшін, оларды лингвистік G. Longobardi және оның мектепінің синтактикалық деректер жиынына тексереміз. Біз филогенетикалық ағаштарды аламыз. Кейбірде Аткинсон мен Сұр жеткізілген ағаштардан артық болады.', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo nuovi metodi di classificazione linguistica che mettono a buon uso sia gli strumenti sintattici che quelli sfocati, e sono in grado di affrontare caratteristiche linguistiche irrilevanti (cioè caratteristiche che non dovrebbero contribuire alla classificazione) e anche caratteristiche incoerenti (che non hanno senso per lingue specifiche). Introducemo una distanza metrica, basata sulla trasformazione Steinhaus generalizzata, che permette di affrontare congiuntamente l'irrilevanza e l'incoerenza. Per valutare i nostri metodi, li testiamo su un set di dati sintattici, grazie al linguista G. Longobardi e alla sua scuola. Otteniamo alberi filogenetici che talvolta superano quelli ottenuti da Atkinson e Gray.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome naujus kalbų klasifikavimo metodus, kurie tinkamai naudoja sintaksinę ir nenuoseklią įrangą ir gali spręsti nereikšmingas kalbines savybes (t. y. savybes, kurios neturėtų prisidėti prie klasifikavimo) ir net nenuoseklias savybes (kurios konkrečioms kalboms neturi prasmės). Įvedame metrinį atstumą, pagrįstą generalizuotu Steinhaus transformavimu, kuris leidžia bendrai spręsti nereikšmingumą ir nenuoseklumą. Norėdami įvertinti mūsų metodus, bandome juos su sintaksiniais duomenimis dėl kalbininko G. Longobardi ir jo mokyklos. Mes gauname filogenetinius medžius, kurie kartais viršija Atkinsono ir Gray gautus medžius.', 'mk': 'Во овој документ, претставуваме нови методи за класификација на јазикот кои добро ги користат синтаксичните и нејасните алатки и се способни да се справат со нерелевантните јазички карактеристики (т.е. карактеристики кои не треба да придонесат во класификацијата) и дури и неконзистентните карактеристики (кои не имаат смисла за специ Ние воведуваме метрична оддалеченост, базирана на генерализираната трансформација на Стеинхаус, која овозможува еден да се справи заедно со нерелевантноста и несогласноста. To evaluate our methods, we test them on a syntactic data set, due to the linguist G. Longobardi and his school.  Добиваме филогенетски дрвја кои понекогаш ги надминуваат оние што ги добија Аткинсон и Греј.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan kaedah baru untuk kelasukan bahasa yang digunakan dengan baik baik alat sintaks dan kelabu, dan mampu berurusan dengan ciri-ciri bahasa tidak relevan (iaitu ciri-ciri yang tidak patut menyumbang kepada kelasukan) dan juga ciri-ciri tidak konsisten (yang tidak masuk akal untuk bahasa tertentu). Kami memperkenalkan jarak metrik, berdasarkan perubahan Steinhaus yang terbesar, yang membenarkan satu untuk menangani bersama-sama dengan ketidakpertimbangan dan ketidakkonsistens. To evaluate our methods, we test them on a syntactic data set, due to the linguist G. Longobardi and his school.  Kami mendapatkan pokok filogenetik yang kadang-kadang melebihi yang diperoleh oleh Atkinson dan Gray.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കേഷന്റെ പുതിയ രീതികള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അത് സിന്റാക്സും അസാധാരണയുമായ ഉപകരണങ്ങളും ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d നല്ല രീതികള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. പിന്നീട് അപരിചിതമായ ഭാഷ വി We introduce a metric distance, based on the generalized Steinhaus transform, which allows one to deal jointly with irrelevance and inconsistency.  നമ്മുടെ രീതികളെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സിനിട്ടാക്കിക് ഡേറ്റാസ്റ്റ് സെറ്റില്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന് നമുക്ക് ഫൈലോജനറ്റിക് വൃക്ഷങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭിക്കുന്നു. ചിലപ്പോള്\u200d ആറ്റ്കിന്\u200dസണും ഗ്രേയും ലഭിച്ചതിനെക്ക', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw metodi ġodda għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-lingwi li jużaw tajjeb kemm l-għodod tas-sintaks kif ukoll dawk bla xkiel, u li huma kapaċi jittrattaw karatteristiċi lingwistiċi irrelevanti (jiġifieri karatteristiċi li m’għandhomx jikkontribwixxu għall-klassifikazzjoni) u anki karatteristiċi inkonsistenti (li ma jagħmlux sens għal lingwi speċifiċi). Aħna nintroduċu distanza metrika, ibbażata fuq it-trasformazzjoni ġeneralizzata ta’ Steinhaus, li tippermetti li wieħed jittratta b’mod konġunt l-irrelevanza u l-inkonsistenza. Biex jevalwaw il-metodi tagħna, a ħna ntestjawhom fuq sett ta’ dejta sintattika, minħabba l-lingwist G. Longobardi u l-iskola tiegħu. Inkisbu siġar filoġenetiċi li xi kultant jaqbżu dawk miksuba minn Atkinson u Gray.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэлний хуваалцааны шинэ арга загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь синтаксис болон шинэ хэрэгсэл ашиглаж, хэлний хуваалцааны чадвартай хамаарах боломжгүй (яг л хэлний хуваалцаанд нэмэгдэх боломжгүй) боломжтой тэгш байдлыг харуулж чадна. Бид ерөнхийлөгчийн Стейнхаусын шилжүүлэлтийн үндсэн метрийн зайг танилцуулж байна. Энэ нь нэгнийгээ хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо холбогдох боломжтой. Өөрсдийнхөө аргыг үнэлэхэд бид тэднийг нэг шинжлэх өгөгдлийн тоо хэмжээний сургуульд G. Longobardi болон түүний сургуульд шалгаж үзсэн. Бид филогенетик мод авдаг. Заримдаа Аткинсон болон Грей авсан зүйлсийг дамжуулдаг.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi nye metodar for språkklassifikasjon som blir brukt både syntaks og feilverktøy, og er i stand til å handsama med uavhengige lingviske funksjonar (t.d. funksjonar som ikkje bør bidra til klassifikasjonen) og til og med inkonsistente funksjonar (som ikkje har mening for spesifikke språk). Vi introduserer ein metrisk avstanden, basert på den generelliserte transformasjonen av Steinhaus, som tillater ein å handtera saman med ulikhet og ulikhet. For å evaluera metodane våre, tester vi dei på eit syntaktisk datasett på grunn av linguist G. Longobardi og skolen hans. Vi får filogenetiske trær som noen ganger utfører dei som er henta av Atkinson og Gray.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiono nowe metody klasyfikacji języków, które dobrze wykorzystują zarówno narzędzia składni, jak i rozmyte oraz są w stanie poradzić sobie z nieistotnymi cechami językowymi (tj. cechami, które nie powinny przyczyniać się do klasyfikacji), a nawet niespójnymi cechami (które nie mają sensu dla poszczególnych języków). Wprowadzamy odległość metryczną, opartą na uogólnionej transformacji Steinhausa, która pozwala wspólnie radzić sobie z nieistotnością i niespójnością. Aby ocenić nasze metody, testujemy je na zbiorze danych składniowych, dzięki lingwistowi G. Longobardiemu i jego szkole. Otrzymujemy drzewa filogenetyczne, które czasem przewyższają te uzyskane przez Atkinsona i Graya.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm noi metode de clasificare a limbilor care utilizează atât instrumentele sintaxiale, cât și cele neclare și sunt capabile să abordeze caracteristici lingvistice irelevante (adică caracteristici care nu ar trebui să contribuie la clasificare) și chiar caracteristici inconsistente (care nu au sens pentru anumite limbi). Introducem o distanță metrică, bazată pe transformarea Steinhaus generalizată, care permite să se ocupe împreună de irelevanță și inconsecvență. Pentru a evalua metodele noastre, le testăm pe un set de date sintactice, datorită lingvistului G. Longobardi și școlii sale. Obținem copaci filogenetici care uneori depășesc cele obținute de Atkinson și Gray.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo nove metode za klasifikaciju jezika koje su dobre upotrebe sintaksa i bezveznih alata, i sposobne da se bave nepodnošenim jezičkim karakteristikama (tj. karakteristike koje ne bi trebale doprinijeti klasifikaciji) i čak i nepristojnim karakteristikama (koje nemaju smisla za posebne jezike). Predstavljamo metričku udaljenost, zasnovanu na generalizovanoj transformaciji Steinhaus a, koja omogućava jednom da se suoči sa nepriličnošću i nepristojenošću. Da bismo procenili naše metode, testirali smo ih na sintaktičkom setu podataka, zbog lingvista G. Longobardija i njegove škole. Dobijamo filogenetičko drvo koje ponekad iznose one koje su dobili Atkinson i Gray.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ, අපි භාෂාව විශේෂණ සඳහා අළුත් විධානය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් භාෂාව සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ උපකරණය සඳහා හොඳට භාෂාව භාවිතා කරන්න, සමහර විශේෂ භාෂාවි අපි මෙට්\u200dරික් දුරක්ෂණයක් ප්\u200dරදානය කරනවා, සාමාන්\u200dය ස්ටින්හායුස් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් ආධාරය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් එක්කෙනෙක්ට අ අපේ පද්ධතිය අවශ්\u200dයය කරන්න, අපි ඔවුන්ව සංකේතික දත්ත සූදානයක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා, භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාඥය G. Longobrdi සහ ඔ අපිට පිලෝගෙනෙටික් ගස්සක් ලැබෙනවා. සමහර වෙලාවට අට්කින්සන් සහ ග්\u200dරේයිස් වලින් ලැබෙන ප්\u200dරතිකාර', 'so': 'Kanu warqaddan waxaan ku soo qoraynaa qaabab cusub oo fasaxa luuqada ah oo si wanaagsan u isticmaalaya alaabta kaalmada iyo qasabka, waxaana awoodi karnaa inay ka macaamiloodaan heerarka luuqada e e aan la mid ahayn (tusaale ahaan tayooyin aan fasaxa u bixin) iyo xittaa tayooyin aan la mid ahayn (taas oo aan waxba ugu garanayn luuqadaha cayiman). Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa fog, taasoo ku saleysan isbedelka Steinhaus, taasoo u ogolaada in qof uu iskula macaamiloodo iskala xiriirta caasinimada iyo baaritaanta. Si aan u qiimeyno qaababkayaga, waxaynu ku tijaabinaynaa kooxda macluumaadka la-talinta, sababtoo ah afka G. Longobardi iyo iskuulkiisa. Waxaynu helaynaa geedo afylogenetic ah, kuwaas oo marwalba ka sii badnaan waxa soo helay Atkinson iyo Gray.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi nya metoder för språkklassificering som utnyttjar både syntax och fuzzy verktyg och kan hantera irrelevanta språkliga egenskaper (dvs egenskaper som inte bör bidra till klassificeringen) och även inkonsekventa egenskaper (som inte är vettiga för specifika språk). Vi introducerar ett metriskt avstånd, baserat på den generaliserade Steinhaus-transformationen, som gör att man tillsammans kan hantera irrelevans och inkonsekvens. För att utvärdera våra metoder testar vi dem på en syntaktisk datauppsättning, tack vare lingvisten G. Longobardi och hans skola. Vi får fylogenetiska träd som ibland överträffar de som erhållits av Atkinson och Gray.', 'ta': 'இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் மொழி வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு புதிய முறைமைகளை கொடுக்கிறோம். அது சிறப்பு மொழிகளுக்கும் குறிப்பிட்ட கருவிகளுக்கும் நல்ல பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும், மற்றும் மொழிகளுக்கு  We introduce a metric distance, based on the generalized Steinhaus transform, which allows one to deal jointly with irrelevance and inconsistency.  ஜி லாங்கோபார்டி மற்றும் அவன் பள்ளி நாங்கள் சில நேரங்களில் அட்கின்சன் மற்றும் கிரேக் கிடைத்ததை விட செயல்படுத்துகிறோம்.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں نو طریقے پیش کرتے ہیں زبان کلاسیفوں کے لئے جو بہترین استعمال کرتی ہیں سینٹکس اور فازیز ابزار کے ساتھ اور بے اثر زبان شناسی فرضیات کے ساتھ (یعنی فرضیات جنہیں کلاسیفوں کے ساتھ مدد نہ کرنا چاہیے) اور حتی ناپاکیزہ فرضیات (جن کی تعریف زبانوں کے لئے مطلع نہیں ہے) ۔ ہم ایک متریک فاصلہ معلوم کرتے ہیں، جو عمومی استینهاوس کی تغییر پر بنیاد ہے، جو ایک کو غیر مساوی اور غیر مساوی کے ساتھ کام کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے. ہمارے طریقے کا ارزش کرنا، ہم انہیں ایک سینٹکتیک ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزماتے ہیں، زبان شناس جی Longobardi اور اس کی سکول کے سبب۔ ہم فیلوگنیٹیک درخت حاصل کرتے ہیں جو بعض اوقات میں آٹکینسون اور خاکسترین درختوں سے زیادہ ہیں', 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi có những phương pháp phân loại ngôn ngữ mới, dùng cả các công cụ cú pháp lẫn mờ, và có khả năng xử lý các yếu tố ngôn ngữ không liên quan (tức là tính năng không liên quan đến phân loại) và thậm chí các tính chất mâu thuẫn (không hợp lý cho ngôn ngữ cụ thể). Chúng tôi tạo ra một khoảng cách đo lường dựa trên việc Biến hình của Steinhaus bình thường. Nó cho phép một người hợp tác với không đáng tin và mâu thuẫn. Để đánh giá phương pháp của chúng tôi, chúng tôi kiểm tra chúng trên một bộ dữ liệu cú pháp, nhờ nhà ngôn ngữ G. Longobardi và trường của hắn. Chúng tôi có những cây phong sinh đôi khi vượt trội những cây được Atkinson và Gray lấy.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz tillar classifikasining yangi usullarni koʻrsatish mumkin. Sintaks va kichkina asboblar yordamida yaxshi foydalanishi mumkin, va bu tillarning imkoniyatlarini boshqarish imkoniyatlariga ega bo'lishi mumkin, balki darajaga qoʻllanmagan imkoniyatlarni ko'rsatish imkoniyatlariga ega bo'ladi. Biz bir metrik masofadagi Steinhaus o'zgarishga asoslangan darajaga qaramaymiz. Bu bir narsa bir xil va muvaffaqiyatli bilan birlashtirishga ruxsat beradi. Biz usullarni qiymatish uchun biz ularni sintaktik maʼlumotlar tartibini o'rganamiz, G. Longobardi va maktabning sababi. Biz feylogenetik daraxtlarimizni olib keldik. Ba'zida Atkinson va Gray orqali o'zgarishni bajaradi.", 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi nye metoder til sprogklassifikation, som bruger både syntaks- og fuzzy-værktøjer, og som er i stand til at håndtere irrelevante sproglige træk (dvs. træk, der ikke bør bidrage til klassifikationen) og endda inkonsekvente træk (som ikke giver mening for bestemte sprog). Vi introducerer en metrisk afstand, baseret på den generaliserede Steinhaus transformation, som gør det muligt at håndtere i fællesskab irrelevans og inkonsekvens. For at evaluere vores metoder tester vi dem på et syntaktisk datasæt, på grund af lingvisten G. Longobardi og hans skole. Vi opnår fylogenetiske træer, som undertiden overstiger dem, Atkinson og Gray opnår.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме нови методи за езикова класификация, които използват добре както синтаксисни, така и мъгливи инструменти и са способни да се справят с нерелевантни езикови особености (т.е. особености, които не трябва да допринасят за класификацията) и дори непоследователни особености (които нямат смисъл за конкретни езици). Въвеждаме метрично разстояние, базирано на генерализираното трансформация на Стайнхаус, което позволява да се справим съвместно с неуместността и несъответствието. За да оценим методите си, ние ги тестваме на синтактичен набор от данни, благодарение на лингвиста Г. Лонгобарди и неговото училище. Получаваме филогенетични дървета, които понякога превъзхождат тези, получени от Аткинсън и Грей.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we nieuwe methoden voor taalclassificatie die zowel syntaxis als fuzzy tools goed gebruiken, en in staat zijn om te gaan met irrelevante linguïstische kenmerken (dat wil zeggen kenmerken die niet moeten bijdragen aan de classificatie) en zelfs inconsistente kenmerken (die niet logisch zijn voor specifieke talen). We introduceren een metrische afstand, gebaseerd op de algemene Steinhaus transformatie, die het mogelijk maakt om gezamenlijk om te gaan met irrelevantie en inconsistentie. Om onze methoden te evalueren, testen we ze op een syntactische dataset, dankzij de taalkundige G. Longobardi en zijn school. We krijgen fylogenetische bomen die soms beter presteren dan die van Atkinson en Gray.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo nove metode za klasifikaciju jezika koje su dobro upotrebljavale sintaksiju i nepristojne alate te su sposobne za rješavanje nepriličnih jezičkih karakteristika (tj. karakteristike koje ne bi trebale doprinijeti klasifikaciji) i čak i nepristojne karakteristike (koje nemaju smisla za specifične jezike). Predstavljamo metričku udaljenost na temelju generaliziranog transformacije Steinhaus a, što omogućava jednom da se zajedno postupa s nepriličnošću i nesporednošću. Da bismo procijenili naše metode, testirali smo ih na sintaktičkom setu podataka zbog jezičkog G. Longobardija i njegove škole. Dobijamo filogenetičko drvo koje ponekad iznose one koje su dobili Atkinson i Gray.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir neue Methoden der Sprachklassifizierung vor, die sowohl Syntax- als auch Fuzzy-Werkzeuge sinnvoll nutzen und in der Lage sind, mit irrelevanten linguistischen Merkmalen (d.h. Merkmalen, die nicht zur Klassifizierung beitragen sollten) und sogar inkonsistenten Merkmalen (die für bestimmte Sprachen keinen Sinn ergeben) umzugehen. Wir führen eine metrische Distanz ein, basierend auf der generalisierten Steinhaus-Transformation, die es erlaubt, gemeinsam mit Irrelevanz und Inkonsistenz umzugehen. Um unsere Methoden zu evaluieren, testen wir sie auf einem syntaktischen Datensatz, der dem Linguisten G. Longobardi und seiner Schule zu verdanken ist. Wir erhalten phylogenetische Bäume, die manchmal die von Atkinson und Gray erhaltenen übertreffen.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 새로운 언어 분류 방법을 제시했다. 이 방법은 문법과 모호한 도구를 충분히 활용하여 관련되지 않은 언어 특징(즉 분류에 도움이 되지 않는 특징), 심지어 일치하지 않는 특징(특정 언어에 의미가 없음)을 처리할 수 있다.우리는 광의의 스탄호스를 바탕으로 변환된 도량 거리를 도입했는데, 이것은 우리가 관련되지 않고 일치하지 않는 것을 공동으로 처리할 수 있도록 한다.우리의 방법을 평가하기 위해서, 우리는 문법 데이터 집합에서 그것들을 테스트했다. 이것은 언어학자 G 랑그바르디와 그의 학파가 제기한 것이다.우리가 얻은 계통발육수는 때때로 아토킨슨과 그레이보다 낫다.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan metode baru untuk klasifikasi bahasa yang digunakan dengan baik baik sintaks dan alat-alat kabur, dan mampu menghadapi fitur bahasa tidak relevan (i.e. fitur yang tidak seharusnya berkontribusi ke klasifikasi) dan bahkan fitur yang tidak konsisten (yang tidak masuk akal untuk bahasa spesifik). Kami memperkenalkan jarak metrik, berdasarkan transformasi Steinhaus yang terbesar, yang memungkinkan seseorang untuk berurusan bersama dengan ketidakrelevan dan ketidakkonsistens. Untuk mengevaluasi metode kita, kita mengujinya pada set data sintaksi, karena bahasa G. Longobardi dan sekolahnya. We obtain phylogenetic trees which sometimes outperform the ones obtained by Atkinson and Gray.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما روش\u200cهای جدید برای گروه\u200cسازی زبان را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که برای استفاده خوب از ابزار\u200cهای سنتاکس و غریب استفاده می\u200cکند، و می\u200cتوانیم با ویژگی\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی بی\u200cاثری (که نباید به گروه\u200cسازی) و حتی ویژگی\u200cهای غیرقابل توجه کنند (که برای زبان\u200cهای خاص معنی ندار ما یک فاصله متریک را معرفی می کنیم، بر اساس تغییر استینهاوس ژنرالیز، که به یکی اجازه می دهد که با ناراحتی و ناراحتی کند. برای ارزیابی روش\u200cهای ما، ما آنها را روی مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cهای سنتاکتیک آزمایش می\u200cکنیم، به دلیل زبان\u200cشناس G. Longobardi و مدرسه\u200cاش. ما درختان فلوژنتیک را می\u200cگیریم که گاهی از آن\u200cها که توسط آتکینسون و گری گرفته\u200cاند بیشتر از آن می\u200cکنند.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz diller klasifikasynda täze yöntemleri gowy ulanýarys. Bu hat hem syntaks hem çyzgyş esbaplar üçin we çykyş diller bilen nähili möhüm karakterlerle çykyp bilýäris (meseläpli klasifikasyna kömek etmeli däldir) we hatta durmadyk özellikler bilen çykyp bilýäris. Biz metriýa aralygyny, jeneral Steinhaus üýtgetmegine daýanýar we munuň birine çykyşsyzlyk we çykyşsyzlyk bilen bir aralygy bilen çykmak üçin mümkin edýäris. Metodolarymyzy deňlemek üçin, olaryň sintaktik maglumatlaryny J. Longobardi we mekdepi sebäbi test edip görýäris. Biz filogenetik agaçlary alýarys käwagt Atkinson we Gray tarapyndan gazanýanlardan üstün.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mbinu mpya za usambazaji wa lugha ambazo zinaweza kutumia vifaa vyema vya syntax na vigumu, na tunaweza kukabiliana na tabia za lugha zisizo na maana (yaani sifa ambazo hazijapaswa kusaidia darasa) na hata vipengele vinavyofanikiwa (ambavyo havina maana kwa lugha maalum). Tunawasilisha umbali wa kiwango, kwa kutumia mabadiliko ya ujumla wa Steinhaus, ambayo inaruhusu mtu kukabiliana na kutokuwepo kwa usawa na ukosefu. Ili kutathmini njia zetu, tunawajaribu kwenye seti ya takwimu za pamoja, kwa sababu ya lugha ya G. Longobardi na shule yake. Tunapata miti ya kijinsia ambayo mara nyingine hufanya zaidi ya yale yaliyopata na Atkinson na Gray.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, laat ons nuwe metodes voorsien vir taal klasifikasie wat aan goeie gebruik van sintaks sowel as gewone nutsprogramme, en is in staat om met onbelangrike lingwisiese funksies te behandel (bv. funksies wat nie by die klasifikasie bydraai nie) en selfs ongelukkige funksies (wat nie sin vir spesifieke tale maak nie). Ons introduseer 'n metriese afstand, gebaseer op die generelliseerde Steinhaus-transformasie, wat toelaat een om saamstig te behandel met ongelukkigheid en ongelukkigheid. Om ons metodes te evalueer, probeer ons hulle op 'n sintaktieke data stel, vanweë die lingviste G. Longobardi en sy skool. Ons kry filogenetiese bome wat soms uitvoer die wat deur Atkinson en Grys ontvang is.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim metoda të reja për klasifikimin e gjuhës që vënë në përdorim të mirë si sintaksi ashtu edhe mjete të ngatërruara dhe janë në gjendje të trajtojnë me karakteristika gjuhësore të papërshtatshme (i.e. karakteristika që nuk duhet të kontribuojnë në klasifikim) dhe madje karakteristika të papërshtatshme (që nuk kanë kuptim për gjuhët specifike). Ne futim një distancë metrike, bazuar në transform ën e gjeneralizuar Steinhaus, që lejon një të trajtojë së bashku me pavarësinë dhe moskonsistencën. Për të vlerësuar metodat tona, i testojmë në një set sintaktike të dhënash, për shkak të gjuhëtarit G. Longobardi dhe shkollës së tij. Ne marrim pemë filogenetike që ndonjëherë tejkalojnë ato të fituara nga Atkinson dhe Grey.', 'am': 'በዚህ ካላት አዲስ የቋንቋ ክፍል አቀማመጥን እና የሲንካስር እና ቀላል መሣሪያዎችን ለመጠቀም እና ለቋንቋው ማቀናቀል ማቀናቀል እና ለክፍለ ቋንቋዎች ማቀናቀል አይችልም፡፡ የስቴንሆስ ውጤት በተደረገው የሜትሪክ ርቀት እናሳውቃለን፤ ይህም አንዱን በጥያቄ እና በጥያቄ ለመቀበል ይችላል፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋው G. Longobardi እና ትምህርቱ ምክንያት የድምፅ መረጃዎችን ለማስተካከል እናሞክራቸዋለን፡፡ የአትኪኖን እና ግራይ ካገኘው የፍልጃኖnetic ዛፎችን አንዳንድ ጊዜ ከዚያ በላይ አግኝተዋል፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪzda, dil klasifikasyonun yeni metodlarńĪnńĪ g√∂st…ôririk ki, sintaksi d…ô, f…ôrqli vasit…ôl…ôri d…ô istifad…ô ed…ôr v…ô dill…ôrin …ôlaq…ôsizl…ôri il…ô m√ľdafi…ô ed…ô bilm…ôz (m…ôs…ôl…ôn, klasifikasyona k√∂m…ôk ed…ô bilm…ôy…ôn f…ôrql…ôr) v…ô h…ôtta m√ľ…ôyy…ôn f…ôrql…ôr (m…ôs…ôl…ôn dill…ôr…ô anlama g…ôlm…ôz). Biz metrik m…ôsaf…ôni, generalized Steinhaus transformasyonuna dayandńĪrńĪrńĪq ki, birinin …ôlaq…ôsizlik v…ô inconsistenci il…ô birlikd…ô √ß…ôkilm…ôsin…ô imkan verir. Bizim metodlarńĪmńĪzńĪ deńüerl…ôŇüdirm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn, dil√ßi G. Longobardi v…ô m…ôkt…ôbin…ô g√∂r…ô onlarńĪ sintaktik veril…ôr seti il…ô imtahana √ß…ôkirik. Biz filogenetik ańüaclarńĪ alńĪrńĪq ki, b…ôz…ôn Atkinson v…ô Gray vasit…ôl…ôrind…ôn daha √ľst√ľn olur.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք լեզվի դասակարգման նոր մեթոդներ, որոնք լավ օգտագործում են սինտաքսի և խառն գործիքներ և կարող են գործել անկարևոր լեզվական առանձնահատկությունների հետ (այսինքն առանձնահատկությունների հետ, որոնք չեն պետք է ներդրեն դասակարգման մեջ) և նույնիսկ անհամապատասխանատու առան Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մետրական հեռավորություն, հիմնված ընդհանուր Ստեյնային վերափոխման վրա, որը թույլ է տալիս մեկին միասին գործ ունենալ անկարևորության և անհամապատասխանության հետ: To evaluate our methods, we test them on a syntactic data set, due to the linguist G. Longobardi and his school.  Մենք ստանում ենք ֆիլոգենետիկ ծառեր, որոնք երբեմն գերազանցում են Աթկինսոնի և Գրեյի կողմից ստացած ծառերը:', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ভাষা শ্রেণীকরণের জন্য নতুন পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি যা সিন্ট্যাক্স এবং অজ্ঞাত টুল ব্যবহারের জন্য ভালোভাবে ব্যবহার করে এবং তারা অসম্পূর্ণ ভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যের (যেমন ব আমরা একটি মেট্রিক দূরত্ব পরিচালনা করি, সাধারণ স্টিনাহস পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিতে, যার ফলে একে অযৌক্তিক এবং অযোগ্যতার সাথে যুক্ত করতে পারে। আমাদের পদ্ধতি মূল্যায়নের জন্য আমরা তাদের সাথে সিন্ট্যাক্টিক ডাটা সেটে পরীক্ষা করি, ভাষাবাদী জি লংগোবার্ডি এবং তার স আমরা ফিলিজেনেটিক গাছগুলো পেয়েছি যা মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে এটকিনসন এবং গ্রে', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme nové metody jazykové klasifikace, které dobře využívají syntaxi i fuzzy nástroje a jsou schopny řešit irelevantní jazykové rysy (tj. rysy, které by neměly přispívat k klasifikaci) a dokonce nekonzistentní rysy (které nemají pro konkrétní jazyky smysl). Představujeme metrickou vzdálenost založenou na zobecněné Steinhausově transformaci, která umožňuje společně řešit irelevanci a nekonzistenci. Pro vyhodnocení našich metod je testujeme na syntaktickém datovém souboru, díky lingvistovi G. Longobardimu a jeho škole. Získáváme fylogenetické stromy, které někdy překonávají ty, které získali Atkinson a Gray.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame uusi keele klassifitseerimise meetodeid, mis kasutavad hästi nii süntaksit kui ka hägune tööriist ning on võimelised tegelema ebaoluliste keeleliste omadustega (st omadustega, mis ei tohiks kaasa aidata klassifitseerimisele) ja isegi ebajärjekindlate omadustega (mis ei ole konkreetsete keelte puhul mõistlikud). Tutvustame üldistel Steinhause teisendustel põhineva meetrilise kauguse, mis võimaldab ühiselt käsitleda ebaolulisust ja vastuolulisust. Meie meetodite hindamiseks testime neid süntaktilisel andmekogumil, tänu keeleteadlasele G. Longobardile ja tema koolile. Me saame fülogeneetilised puud, mis mõnikord ületavad need, mis on saadud Atkinson ja Gray.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo nove metode za klasifikaciju jezika koje su dobro upotrebljavale sintaksiju i bezvezne alate i sposobne da se bave nepodnošenim jezičkim karakteristikama (tj. karakteristike koje ne bi trebale doprinijeti klasifikaciji) i čak i nepristojnim karakteristikama (koje nemaju smisla za specifične jezike). Predstavljamo metričku udaljenost, temeljenu na generaliziranoj transformaciji Steinhaus a, koja omogućava jednom da se suoči zajedno sa nezavisnošću i neskladnošću. Da bismo procijenili naše metode, testirali smo ih na sintaktičkom setu podataka, zbog lingvista G. Longobardija i njegove škole. Dobijamo filogenetičko drvo koje ponekad iznose one koje su dobili Atkinson i Gray.', 'ca': "En aquest paper, presentem nous mètodes de classificació del llenguatge que utilitzen bé les eines sintaxis i confuses, i són capaços de tractar amb característiques lingüístices irrelevants (i.e. característiques que no haurien de contribuir a la classificació) i fins i tot característiques inconsistents (que no tenen sentit per a llengües específices). Introduïm una distància mètrica, basada en la transformació generalitzada de Steinhaus, que permet tractar conjuntament amb l'irrelevance i l'inconsistencia. Per avaluar els nostres mètodes, els testem en un conjunt de dades sinàctiques, a causa del lingüista G. Longobardi i la seva escola. Obtenim arbres filogenètics que a vegades superen els obtinguts per Atkinson i Gray.", 'fi': 'T채ss채 artikkelissa esitell채채n uusia kieliluokittelumenetelmi채, jotka hy철dynt채v채t sek채 syntaksia ett채 sumeita ty철kaluja ja pystyv채t k채sittelem채채n ep채olennaisia kielellisi채 ominaisuuksia (eli ominaisuuksia, jotka eiv채t saisi vaikuttaa luokitukseen) ja jopa ep채johdonmukaisia piirteit채 (jotka eiv채t ole j채rkevi채 tietyill채 kielill채). Esittelemme yleisen Steinhausin muunnokseen perustuvan metrisen et채isyyden, jonka avulla voidaan k채sitell채 yhdess채 ep채olennaisuutta ja ep채johdonmukaisuutta. Menetelmiemme arvioimiseksi testaamme niit채 synteettisell채 aineistolla kielitieteilij채n G. Longobardin ja h채nen koulunsa ansiosta. Saamme fylogeenisi채 puita, jotka joskus suoriutuvat enemm채n kuin Atkinson ja Gray.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé, ngéwé éntuk sistem anyar kanggo kelas nglarasi luwih dumadhi iki dadi seneng nggawe sistem sing, lan akeh iso nggawe nguasakno karo perusahaan langgunaké sing ora nggawe (ta ngomong: caret sing isiné iso nggawe nguasakno) lan akeh iso nggawe nguasakno sing dumadhakan (sing bisa nik ingkang dipunangé luwih dumadhi kapan banget). Awak dhéwé nggawe aturan tapi tanggal metir, dadi saben gejer-saben transform stênêr, sing supoyo saben nggawe gerakan karo cah-saben gawe nguasai mêr terus kuwi tanggal gawe. Genjer-genjer langgar sing ditambahak dhéwé, dhéwé ngejer-seneng pisan seneng dadi sinaksi sing bakal seneng nggambar nggambar G. lengobar karo sekolah dhéwé. Awak dhéwé ngewat pernik-pernik nik nik uwis layang seneng dipunangé Atkin karo Gray', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo nove metode klasifikacije jezikov, ki dobro uporabljajo tako sintaksna kot mehka orodja in so sposobne obravnavati nepomembne jezikovne značilnosti (tj. značilnosti, ki ne bi smele prispevati k klasifikaciji) in celo nedosledne značilnosti (ki za določene jezike nimajo smisla). Uvedli smo metrično razdaljo, ki temelji na splošni Steinhausovi transformaciji, ki omogoča skupno obravnavanje nepomembnosti in neskladnosti. Za vrednotenje naših metod jih preizkusimo na sintaktičnem naboru podatkov, ki ga je zahvalil jezikoslovnik G. Longobardi in njegova šola. Pridobimo filogenetska drevesa, ki včasih presegajo tista, ki sta jih pridobila Atkinson in Gray.', 'he': "בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים שיטות חדשות לטיפול שפות אשר משתמשים בצורה טובה גם בכלי סינטקס וגם כלים מעורפלים, והם מסוגלים להתמודד עם תכונות שפותיות לא רלוונטיות (כלומר תכונות שלא צריכות לתרום לטיפול) ואפילו תכונות לא תואמות (שאין הגיון לשפות ספציפיות). אנחנו מציגים מרחק מטרי, מבוסס על השינוי סטינאוס הגנרליזציבי, שמאפשר לאחד להתמודד ביחד עם חוסר רלוונציה וחסר תואמות. כדי להעריך את השיטות שלנו, אנחנו בודקים אותם על קבוצת נתונים סינטקטיים, בגלל השפתן ג'י לונגוברדי ובית הספר שלו. אנחנו מקבלים עצים פילוגנטיים שלפעמים מעלים את אלה שקיבלו אטקינסון וגריי.", 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã zo da wasu hanyoyin sãbuwa wa fassarar harshen, wanda za'a yi amfani da su ga amfani da dukkan aikin synkassi da kuma zanen zartar da sauri, kuma masu iya iya shawara da fasihi na'urar lingui (misali, misãlin tayari da ba za'a yi amfani da shi ba ga fassarar) da kuma ko da wasu fassara ba (waɗanda bã su kasancẽwa masu hankali ga lugha masu ƙayyade). Tuna fara wani gwargwadon mutane, a kan shige na mai gabatar da Stinhaus, wanda ke yarda da ya yi amfani da ɗayan su yi aiki da ba'a taɓa. To, domin ka ƙaddara hanyõyinmu, za'a jarraba su a kan tsarin data mai haɗiya, saboda harshen G. Longobardi da kuma iskalinsa. Tuna sami itãcen fylognet da za'a karɓe ta daga waɗancan da Atkinson da Gray ke samu.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་ཡིག་དབྱེ་བཟོ་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ཕན་ཚུལ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྒྱུ་དང་། སྐད་རིགས་ཁྱད་པར་མཉམ་དུ་བསླབས ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་གྲངས་དབུས་མཐུན་དང་མཐུན་མེད་པའི་Steinhaus་བཟོ་བཅོས་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་མཐའ་དབུས་ཐོག་ཅིག་སྟོན་གསལ། དེ་ནི་གཅིག་གིས ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་ན་ང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་དབྱེ་རིགས་གནས་ཚུལ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྐྱེས་དངོས་འབྱུང་མཁན་དེ་ཚོར་Atkinson དང་Gray གཉིས་ལ་རྗེས་ཐུབ་པའི་དབྱིབས་ཤིང་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Two Discourse Tree-Based Approaches to Indexing Answers', 'ar': 'نهجان يعتمدان على شجرة الخطاب لفهرسة الإجابات', 'pt': 'Duas Abordagens Baseadas em Árvore do Discurso para Indexar Respostas', 'fr': "Deux approches basées sur l'arbre de discours pour indexer les réponses", 'es': 'Dos enfoques basados en el árbol del discurso para indexar respuestas', 'ja': '2つのディスコースツリー-回答をインデックス化するためのアプローチ', 'zh': '二话语树 - 基于索引对案之法', 'hi': 'दो प्रवचन ट्री - अनुक्रमणिका उत्तर के लिए आधारित दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'Дерево двух дискурсов - основанные на индексировании подходы к ответам', 'ga': 'Dhá Chrann Dioscúrsa - Cur Chuige Bunaithe ar Fhreagraí a Innéacsú', 'hu': 'Két beszédfa - alapú megközelítések a válaszok indexelésére', 'el': 'Δύο βασισμένες στο δέντρο συζήτησης προσεγγίσεις για την ευρετηρίαση απαντήσεων', 'ka': 'ორი პარამეტრების ხე - ბაზი მიღებები ინდექსირების პარამეტრებისთვის', 'it': "Due alberi del discorso - Approcci basati sull'indicizzazione delle risposte", 'lt': 'Dvi diskursiniai medžiai – pagrįsti indeksavimo atsakymų metodai', 'kk': 'Екі дискурс бұтағы - Индекс жауаптарының негізгі жағдайлары', 'mk': 'Две дискурсивни дрвја - Базирани пристапи до индексирачките одговори', 'mt': 'Żewġ Indikaturi – Approċċi Bażati għat-Tweġibiet għall-Indikazzjoni', 'ml': 'രണ്ടു ഡിസ്കോര്\u200dസ് വൃക്ഷത്തില്\u200d - സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഉത്തരങ്ങളിലേക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി എത്തുന്നു', 'ms': 'Two Discourse Tree - Based Approaches to Indexing Answers', 'mn': 'Хоёр ярианы мод - Индексийн хариултын үндсэн ойлголт', 'no': 'To opplesingstre – Baserte tilnærmingar til indekseringsverdiar', 'ro': 'Două arbori de discurs - abordări bazate pe indexarea răspunsurilor', 'pl': 'Dwa podejścia oparte na drzewie dyskursu do indeksowania odpowiedzi', 'sr': 'Dva drveta diskursa - Na osnovu pristupa odgovorima za indeksiranje', 'si': 'විශ්වාස කකුරු දෙකක් - ඉන්දික්ෂණය ප්\u200dරතිච්චිත ප්\u200dරතිචාරයට අධාරණය', 'sv': 'Två diskursträd - baserade metoder för indexering av svar', 'so': 'Two Discourse Tree - Based Approaches to Indexing answers', 'ta': 'இரண்டு விஷயங்கள் மரம் - அடிப்படையான சுட்டுவரிசைக்கு செல்லும் பதில்கள்', 'ur': 'دو درخت درخت - انڈیکس کینگ جواب کے بنیاد تقریب', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hai phương pháp tham khảo gần trả lời ước tính', 'bg': 'Две дървото на дискурсите - базирани подходи към индексиране на отговорите', 'nl': 'Twee discoursboomgebaseerde benaderingen voor het indexeren van antwoorden', 'hr': 'Dva drveta diskursa - Na temelju pristupa odgovorima za indeksiranje', 'da': 'To diskurstræ - baserede metoder til indeksering af svar', 'de': 'Zwei Diskursbaum-basierte Ansätze zur Indexierung von Antworten', 'id': 'Dua pohon diskursus - pendekatan berdasarkan untuk menjawab indeks', 'fa': 'دو درخت سخنرانی - نزدیک\u200cهای بنیادی به پاسخ\u200cدهندگان', 'ko': '언어 트리에 기반한 두 가지 답안 인덱스 방법', 'tr': 'Iki Gürüş Treei - Indeks Cevaplarynyň esasy', 'sw': 'Mti wawili wa Utadili - Mpango wa Kuanzia Jibu', 'af': 'Twee Woordeskryf Boom - Basiese Toegang na Indeksering Antwoordes', 'az': 'İki Söhbət Ağacı - İndeks Cevaplarının temel Yaxınlıqları', 'sq': 'Dy pemë diskutimi - Përqasje bazuar në përgjigjet e indeksimit', 'hy': 'Two Discourse Tree - Based Approaches to Indexing Answers', 'am': 'ሁለት ምርጫዎች', 'ca': "Dos arbres de discurs - Pròpies basats en les respostes d'indexació", 'bn': 'দুই তথ্য বৃক্ষ - সংক্রান্ত উত্তরের ভিত্তিক কাছে', 'bs': 'Dva drveta diskursa - Na osnovu pristupa odgovorima za indeksiranje', 'cs': 'Dva diskursní strom založené přístupy k indexování odpovědí', 'et': 'Kaks diskursuspuu - põhinevad lähenemisviisid vastuste indekseerimisele', 'fi': 'Kaksi diskurssipuuta - Based Approaches to Indexing Answers', 'jv': 'Two', 'ha': "Tree ta Tsariya Du'a - Gansa da Ƙaramiwa zuwa Ansari", 'sk': 'Dva drevesa diskurza - temelji pristopi k indeksiranju odgovorov', 'he': 'שתי עצי דיסקורס - גישות מבוססות לתשובות מערכות', 'bo': 'སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་སྡོང་བོའི་དབྱིབས་གཉིས་དང་། གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་ཟུར་ཐོའི་གནད་སུ་གཏོང་བ'}
{'en': 'We explore anatomy of answers with respect to which text fragments from an answer are worth matching with a question and which should not be matched. We apply the Rhetorical Structure Theory to build a discourse tree of an answer and select elementary discourse units that are suitable for indexing. Manual rules for selection of these discourse units as well as automated classification based on web search engine mining are evaluated con-cerning improving search accuracy. We form two sets of question-answer pairs for FAQ and community QA search domains and use them for evaluation of the proposed indexing methodology, which delivers up to 16 percent improvement in search recall.', 'ar': 'نستكشف تشريح الإجابات فيما يتعلق بأجزاء النص من الإجابة التي تستحق المطابقة مع سؤال والتي لا ينبغي مطابقتها. نطبق نظرية البنية البلاغية لبناء شجرة خطاب للإجابة واختيار وحدات الخطاب الأولية المناسبة للفهرسة. يتم تقييم القواعد اليدوية لاختيار وحدات الخطاب هذه بالإضافة إلى التصنيف الآلي القائم على التنقيب في محرك البحث على شبكة الإنترنت فيما يتعلق بتحسين دقة البحث. نشكل مجموعتين من أزواج الأسئلة والأجوبة للأسئلة الشائعة ومجالات بحث ضمان الجودة للمجتمع ونستخدمها لتقييم منهجية الفهرسة المقترحة ، والتي توفر ما يصل إلى 16 بالمائة من التحسين في استدعاء البحث.', 'pt': 'Exploramos a anatomia das respostas com relação a quais fragmentos de texto de uma resposta valem a pena corresponder a uma pergunta e quais não devem ser correspondidos. Aplicamos a Teoria da Estrutura Retórica para construir uma árvore discursiva de uma resposta e selecionar unidades discursivas elementares que sejam adequadas para indexação. As regras manuais para seleção dessas unidades de discurso, bem como a classificação automatizada baseada na mineração de mecanismos de busca na web, são avaliadas no que diz respeito à melhoria da precisão da busca. Formamos dois conjuntos de pares de perguntas e respostas para domínios de pesquisa de perguntas frequentes e controle de qualidade da comunidade e os usamos para avaliação da metodologia de indexação proposta, que oferece até 16% de melhoria na recuperação da pesquisa.', 'es': 'Exploramos la anatomía de las respuestas con respecto a qué fragmentos de texto de una respuesta vale la pena hacer coincidir con una pregunta y cuáles no deberían coincidir. Aplicamos la Teoría de la Estructura Retórica para construir un árbol de discurso de una respuesta y seleccionamos unidades de discurso elementales que son adecuadas para la indexación. Las reglas manuales para la selección de estas unidades de discurso, así como la clasificación automatizada basada en la minería de motores de búsqueda web, se evalúan con respecto a la mejora de la precisión de la búsqueda. Formamos dos conjuntos de pares de preguntas y respuestas para los dominios de búsqueda de preguntas frecuentes y control de calidad de la comunidad y los utilizamos para evaluar la metodología de indexación propuesta, que ofrece una mejora de hasta un 16 por ciento en la recuperación de búsquedas.', 'fr': "Nous explorons l'anatomie des réponses en fonction des fragments de texte d'une réponse qui méritent d'être mis en correspondance avec une question et ceux qui ne devraient pas l'être. Nous appliquons la théorie de la structure rhétorique pour construire un arbre de discours d'une réponse et sélectionner les unités de discours élémentaires qui conviennent à l'indexation. Les règles manuelles pour la sélection de ces unités de discours ainsi que la classification automatisée basée sur l'exploration des moteurs de recherche Web sont évaluées en ce qui concerne l'amélioration de la précision de la recherche. Nous formons deux ensembles de paires question-réponse pour les domaines de recherche FAQ et AQ de la communauté et les utilisons pour évaluer la méthodologie d'indexation proposée, ce qui permet d'améliorer jusqu'à 16\xa0% la mémorisation des recherches.", 'zh': '探对剖析,文本片段匹,非所宜匹。 宜以修辞构对语语树,并择索引要语单元。 评估此语单元者手动择法则及网络搜索引擎掘自类,以崇搜索准确性。 臣等为常见问题解答及社区 QA 搜域成两组问对,并用其估议索引法,以召率增 16%。', 'ja': '回答のどのテキスト断片が質問と一致する価値があり、一致すべきではないかについて、回答の解剖学的構造を探ります。我々は修辞構造理論を応用して答えの論証木を構築し、索引付けに適した基本的な論証単位を選択する。これらの言説単位の選択のためのマニュアルルールと、ウェブ検索エンジンのマイニングに基づく自動分類は、検索精度を向上させることで評価される。私たちは、FAQとコミュニティQA検索ドメインのための2組の質問回答ペアを形成し、提案されたインデックス作成方法論の評価に使用します。これは、検索リコールで最大16パーセントの改善をもたらします。', 'ru': 'Мы исследуем анатомию ответов, в отношении которых фрагменты текста из ответа стоят сопоставления с вопросом и которые не должны быть сопоставлены. Мы применяем теорию риторической структуры для построения дерева дискурса ответа и выбираем элементарные единицы дискурса, подходящие для индексирования. Оценивают ручные правила выбора этих блоков дискурса, а также автоматизированную классификацию на основе поиска в поисковике, что повышает точность поиска. Мы формируем два набора вопросов и ответов для поисковых доменов FAQ и QA сообщества и используем их для оценки предлагаемой методологии индексирования, которая обеспечивает до 16 процентов улучшения поискового вызова.', 'hi': 'हम उत्तरों की शारीरिक रचना का पता लगाते हैं कि उत्तर के किस संबंध में एक उत्तर से पाठ के टुकड़े एक प्रश्न के साथ मिलान करने के लायक हैं और जिसका मिलान नहीं किया जाना चाहिए। हम एक उत्तर के एक प्रवचन पेड़ का निर्माण करने के लिए बयानबाजी संरचना सिद्धांत को लागू करते हैं और अनुक्रमण के लिए उपयुक्त प्राथमिक प्रवचन इकाइयों का चयन करते हैं। इन प्रवचन इकाइयों के चयन के लिए मैनुअल नियमों के साथ-साथ वेब खोज इंजन खनन के आधार पर स्वचालित वर्गीकरण का मूल्यांकन किया जाता है, खोज सटीकता में सुधार करने के लिए con-cerning। हम अक्सर पूछे जाने वाले प्रश्न और समुदाय क्यूए खोज डोमेन के लिए प्रश्न-उत्तर जोड़े के दो सेट बनाते हैं और प्रस्तावित अनुक्रमण पद्धति के मूल्यांकन के लिए उनका उपयोग करते हैं, जो खोज याद में 16 प्रतिशत तक सुधार प्रदान करता है।', 'ga': 'Déanaimid iniúchadh ar anatamaíocht na bhfreagraí maidir le cad iad na blúirí téacs ó fhreagra is fiú a mheaitseáil le ceist agus nár cheart a mheaitseáil. Cuirimid an Teoiric Struchtúr Reitrice i bhfeidhm chun crann dioscúrsa de fhreagra a thógáil agus roghnóimid bunaonaid dioscúrsa atá oiriúnach le haghaidh innéacsú. Déantar rialacha láimhe maidir le roghnú na n-aonad dioscúrsa seo chomh maith le haicmiú uathoibrithe bunaithe ar mhianadóireacht inneall cuardaigh gréasáin a mheas maidir le cruinneas cuardaigh a fheabhsú. Déanaimid dhá shraith de phéirí ceisteanna-freagra le haghaidh réimsí cuardaigh CCanna agus pobail QA agus úsáidimid iad chun meastóireacht a dhéanamh ar an modheolaíocht innéacsaithe atá beartaithe, a sheachadann suas le 16 faoin gcéad feabhas ar aisghairm chuardaigh.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განსხვავებთ განსხვავებების ანტომია, რომელიც ტექსტის ფრადმენტები განსხვავებიდან უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, რომელიც არ უნდა იყოს. ჩვენ რეტორიკალური სტრუქტურის ტეორიის გამოყენება, რომ პასუხის დეკურსური ხელი შექმნა და ამორჩევთ ელემენტური დეკურსური ერთეულები, რომელიც ინდეკურაციისთვის საჭირო ამ დისკურსის ერთეულების მონიშნისთვის ხელსახური წესები და ავტომატიური კლასიფიკაცია, რომელიც ვების ძიება მანქანაზე დაბათებულია, იმუშაობა, რომ ძიება მუშაობას უფ ჩვენ შევქმნით ორი კითხვა-პასუხის კომპონტები FAQ და საზოგადოებო QA ძიება დიომენტებისთვის და ისინი გამოყენებთ მინდომარებული ინდექსის მეტოდოლოგიის შესაბამისთვის, რომელიც 16 პრო', 'el': 'Εξετάζουμε την ανατομία των απαντήσεων σε σχέση με τα αποσπάσματα κειμένου από μια απάντηση που αξίζουν να ταιριάξουν με μια ερώτηση και ποια δεν πρέπει να αντιστοιχιστούν. Εφαρμόζουμε τη θεωρία ρητορικής δομής για να χτίσουμε ένα δέντρο λόγου μιας απάντησης και να επιλέξουμε στοιχειώδεις μονάδες λόγου που είναι κατάλληλες για ευρετήριο. Αξιολογούνται χειρωνακτικοί κανόνες επιλογής αυτών των μονάδων ομιλίας καθώς και αυτοματοποιημένη ταξινόμηση με βάση την εξόρυξη μηχανών αναζήτησης ιστού με σκοπό τη βελτίωση της ακρίβειας αναζήτησης. Σχηματίζουμε δύο σύνολα ζευγαριών ερώτησης-απάντησης για τομείς αναζήτησης και κοινοτικής QA και τα χρησιμοποιούμε για την αξιολόγηση της προτεινόμενης μεθοδολογίας ευρετηρίου, η οποία παρέχει έως και 16 τοις εκατό βελτίωση στην ανάκληση αναζήτησης.', 'hu': 'A válaszok anatómiáját vizsgáljuk, hogy mely szövegtöredékek érdemesek összehangolni egy kérdéssel, és melyeket nem szabad összehangolni. A retorikai struktúra elméletet arra alkalmazzuk, hogy egy válasz diskurzusfáját építsük fel, és olyan elemi diskurzus egységeket válasszuk ki, amelyek alkalmasak az indexelésre. Ezen diskurzusenységek kiválasztásának manuális szabályait, valamint a webes keresőmotorbányászaton alapuló automatizált osztályozást a keresési pontosság javítása érdekében értékeljük. Két kérdés-válasz párt alkotunk a GYIK és a közösségi QA keresési tartományok számára, és ezeket használjuk a javasolt indexelési módszer értékelésére, ami akár 16 százalékos javulást eredményez a keresési visszahívásban.', 'lt': 'We explore anatomy of answers with respect to which text fragments from an answer are worth matching with a question and which should not be matched.  We apply the Rhetorical Structure Theory to build a discourse tree of an answer and select elementary discourse units that are suitable for indexing.  Vertinamos šių diskursinių vienetų atrankos vadovinės taisyklės ir automatizuota klasifikacija, grindžiama internetinių paieškos variklių kasyba, siekiant pagerinti paieškos tikslumą. Mes sudarome dvi klausimų ir atsakymų poras FAQ ir bendruomenės QA paieškos sritims ir naudojame jas siūlomos indeksavimo metodikos vertinimui, dėl kurios paieškos atšaukimo pagerėja iki 16 proc.', 'it': "Esploriamo l'anatomia delle risposte rispetto a quali frammenti di testo di una risposta vale la pena abbinare con una domanda e quali non dovrebbero essere abbinati. Applichiamo la Teoria della Struttura retorica per costruire un albero di discorso di una risposta e selezioniamo unità di discorso elementari adatte all'indicizzazione. Vengono valutate le regole manuali per la selezione di queste unità di discorso e la classificazione automatizzata basata sul web search engine mining per migliorare l'accuratezza della ricerca. Formiamo due serie di coppie domanda-risposta per i domini di ricerca FAQ e QA della comunità e li utilizziamo per la valutazione della metodologia di indicizzazione proposta, che offre un miglioramento fino al 16% nel richiamo della ricerca.", 'mk': 'Истражуваме анатомија на одговорите во врска со кои текстови фрагменти од одговорот вредат да се совпаѓаат со прашање и кои не треба да се совпаѓаат. Ја применуваме Теоријата на реторичката структура за да изградиме дискурс дрво од одговор и да избереме елементарни дискурс единици кои се соодветни за индексирање. Manual rules for selection of these discourse units as well as automated classification based on web search engine mining are evaluated con-cerning improving search accuracy.  Ние формираме два пара прашања-одговори за FAQ и заеднички домени за пребарување на QA и ги користиме за проценка на предложената методологија на индексирање, која дава до 16 проценти подобрување во пребарувањето.', 'kk': 'Біз қай жауаптың бөлшектерінің сұраққа сәйкес келетін жауаптардың анатомиясын зерттеп, сәйкес келмейді. Біз реторикалық құрылғы теориясын жауаптың дискурстардың ағашын құру үшін қолданып, индекстеу үшін қолданылатын элементтік дискурстардың бірлігін таңдаймыз. Бұл дискурс бірліктерін таңдау үшін қолмен ережелер және веб- іздеу тетігіне негізделген автоматты түрде шектеу үшін іздеу дұрыстығын жақсарту үшін бағалады. Біз FAQ және қоғамдық QA іздеу домендеріне екі сұрақ және жауап жауап қорларын құрып, оларды қолданып, іздеу үшін 16 пайызына жақсартуға мүмкіндік береді.', 'ml': 'മറുപടികളുടെ ഉത്തരം നമ്മള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. മറുപടിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഏതൊരു ചോദ്യം പൊരുതുന്നതാണ നമ്മള്\u200d റെറ്റോറിക്കല്\u200d സ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ടര്\u200d തിയറി പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ഉത്തരം സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വൃക്ഷത്തെ ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതി ഈ സംസാരത്തിന്റെ യൂണിറ്റുകള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനും വെബ്ത് തെരച്ചിലെ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനും സ്വയം ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനുമായി സ് നമ്മള്\u200d FAQ-നും ക്യൂഎ സമൂഹത്തിനും രണ്ട് ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ജോടികളെ ഉണ്ടാക്കുകയും, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഇന്\u200dക്സിക്സിങ് രീതിയില്\u200d വിലയിക്', 'ms': 'Kami mengeksplorasi anatomi jawapan mengenai mana fragmen teks dari jawapan layak sepadan dengan soalan dan yang tidak sepatutnya sepadan. We apply the Rhetorical Structure Theory to build a discourse tree of an answer and select elementary discourse units that are suitable for indexing.  Manual rules for selection of these discourse units as well as automated classification based on web search engine mining are evaluated con-cerning improving search accuracy.  Kami membentuk dua set pasangan soalan-jawapan untuk FAQ dan domain carian QA komuniti dan menggunakannya untuk penilaian metodologi indeksi yang diusulkan, yang menyediakan hingga 16 peratus peningkatan dalam pengingatan carian.', 'mt': 'Aħna nesploraw l-anatomija tat-tweġibiet fir-rigward ta’ liema frammenti tat-test minn tweġiba huma ta’ valur li jitqabblu ma’ mistoqsija u li m’għandhomx jitqabblu. Aħna napplikaw it-Teorija tal-Istruttura Retorika biex nibnu siġra ta’ diskors ta’ tweġiba u nagħżlu unitajiet elementari ta’ diskors li huma adattati għall-indiċjar. Ir-regoli manwali għall-għażla ta’ dawn l-unitajiet ta’ diskors kif ukoll il-klassifikazzjoni awtomatizzata bbażata fuq tħaffir fil-minjieri tal-magni tat-tiftix fuq l-internet huma evalwati fir-rigward tat-titjib tal-preċiżjoni tat-tiftix. Aħna nħolqu żewġ settijiet ta’ pari ta’ mistoqsijiet u tweġibiet għal oqsma ta’ tfittxija tal-QA tal-komunità u nużawhom għall-evalwazzjoni tal-metodoloġija ta’ indiċjar proposta, li twassal għal titjib sa 16 fil-mija fit-tfittxija lura.', 'mn': 'Бид хариултын хэсэг хэсэг хэсэг нь асуултайгаа холбогдох үнэ цэнэтэй, хариултын анатомийг судалж байна. Бид реторик структур теорийг хариултын ярианы модыг бүтээхэд, индекс хийх хэрэгтэй элемент ярианы нэгжүүдийг сонгох болно. Эдгээр ярианы нэгжүүдийн сонголтын гарын дүрэм болон веб-агуулах хөдөлгөөн дээр автоматжуулагдсан хуваалцаа нь хайлтын зөв байдлыг сайжруулж байдаг. Бид FAQ болон нийгмийн QA хайх сүлжээний хоёр асуулт хариултын хоёр хэсэг бүтээж, үүнийг хайх санаанд 16 хувь сайжруулах арга барилгыг шалгахын тулд ашиглаж байна.', 'no': 'Vi undersøker anatomien av svar på kva tekstfragmenter frå ein svar er verdi for å passa med eit spørsmål og som ikkje skal passast. Vi bruker retoriske struktureteorien for å bygge eit diskurstrå på ein svar og velja elementære diskurseiningar som er passande for indeksering. Manuelle reglar for utval av desse diskurseiningane, og automatisk klassifikasjon basert på nettsøkjemotor er evaluert med å forbetra søkjetakritet. Vi lagar to sett spørsmål- svar- par for FAQ og fellesske QA- søkdomene og brukar dei for evaluering av den foreslåde indekseringsmetodulogien, som gjer opp til 16 prosent forbetringa i søkjemetodulet.', 'pl': 'Badamy anatomię odpowiedzi, w odniesieniu do których fragmentów tekstu z odpowiedzi warto dopasować do pytania, a których nie należy dopasować. Stosujemy teorię struktury retorycznej, aby zbudować drzewo dyskursu odpowiedzi i wybrać elementarne jednostki dyskursu, które nadają się do indeksowania. Oceniane są ręczne zasady wyboru tych jednostek dyskursu oraz automatyczna klasyfikacja oparta na wydobyciu wyszukiwarek internetowych w celu poprawy dokładności wyszukiwania. Tworzymy dwa zestawy par pytania-odpowiedzi dla domen wyszukiwania FAQ i społeczności QA i wykorzystujemy je do oceny proponowanej metodologii indeksowania, która zapewnia nawet 16-procentową poprawę wyszukiwania.', 'ro': 'Explorăm anatomia răspunsurilor cu privire la care fragmente de text dintr-un răspuns merită să fie potrivite cu o întrebare și care nu ar trebui să fie potrivite. Aplicăm teoria structurii retorice pentru a construi un arbore de discurs al unui răspuns și selectăm unități elementare de discurs care sunt potrivite pentru indexare. Regulile manuale pentru selectarea acestor unități de discurs, precum și clasificarea automată bazată pe mineritul motoarelor de căutare web sunt evaluate în ceea ce privește îmbunătățirea acurateții căutării. Formăm două seturi de perechi de întrebări și răspunsuri pentru domeniile de căutare FAQ și QA comunității și le folosim pentru evaluarea metodologiei de indexare propuse, ceea ce oferă o îmbunătățire de până la 16% în rechemarea căutărilor.', 'sr': 'Istražujemo anatomiju odgovora u pogledu kojih tekstskih delimenata odgovora vrijedi odgovarati pitanju i koje se ne bi trebalo odgovarati. Primjenjujemo teoriju retoričke strukture da izgradimo drvo diskursa odgovora i odaberemo elementarne diskurske jedinice koje su odgovarajuće za indeksiranje. Ručna pravila za izbor tih diskurskih jedinica, kao i automatska klasifikacija bazirana na rudarstvu mrežnih pretraživača procjenjuju se potvrđujući poboljšanje tačnosti pretraživanja. Postavljamo dva seta odgovora na pitanje za FAQ i zajedničke potragu QA domena i koristimo ih za procjenu predložene metodologije indeksacije, koja dostavlja do 16 posto poboljšanja u sjećanju pretraživanja.', 'so': "Waxaynu baaraynaa fikrada jawaabaha ku saabsan qeybaha ay qoraalka ka yimaadaan ay istaahilaan inay u eg tahay su'aal, taasoo a an la mid aheyn. Waxaynu u codsanaynaa qoraalka dhismaha Rhetorical si a an u dhisno geed hadal ah oo jawaab ah, oo aan dooranno qaybaha hoose ee hadalka oo u habboon sawiridda. Qawaanka qaabilsan ee doorashada qeybaha hadalka iyo baabuurta mashiinka raadinta ee internetka waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa qaynuunnada ku saabsan dhamaanka raadinta. Waxaannu u sameynaa laba nooc oo su'aalo ah oo FAQ iyo goobaha raadinta ee QA, waxaynu isticmaalnaa qiimeynta qaababka la soo jeeday oo ka horumarinayo 16 boqolkiiba oo lagu beddelayo xusuusta raadinta.", 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සමග ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සමග විශ්වාස කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිච්චියක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සමග විශ්වාස කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වර්ගයක් හදන්න රෙටෝරික් සංවිධානයක් භාවිත කරන්න සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වර්ගයක් හදන්න සහ ප්\u200dරත මෙම කතාවක් යුනිත්වය තෝරාගන්න ලැබුණු නීතිය සහ වෙබ් හොයාගන්න එන්ජින් මිනිත්වය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාස කර අපි FAQ සහ සමාජ්\u200dය QA පරීක්ෂණ ඩෝමේන්ස් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්න-උත්තර දෙකක් සූදානම් කරනවා ඒ වගේම ඔවුන්ව ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය විද්\u200dයාව', 'sv': 'Vi undersöker svarens anatomi med avseende på vilka textfragment från ett svar som är värda att matcha med en fråga och vilka som inte ska matchas. Vi tillämpar retorisk strukturteori för att bygga ett diskursträd av ett svar och välja elementära diskursenheter som är lämpliga för indexering. Manuella regler för val av diskursenheter samt automatiserad klassificering baserad på sökmotormining utvärderas med avseende på att förbättra söknoggrannheten. Vi bildar två uppsättningar frågor-svar par för FAQ och community QA sökdomäner och använder dem för utvärdering av den föreslagna indexeringsmetoden, vilket ger upp till 16 procent förbättring i sökåterkallelse.', 'ta': 'ஒரு கேள்வியில் இருந்து உரை துண்டுகள் எந்த விடையில் இருந்து உரை துண்டுகள் பொருத்தமாக இருக்கும் என்பதை நாம் விடையின நாம் ஒரு விடையின் பேச்சு மரத்தை உருவாக்க மற்றும் சுட்டுவதற்கு பொருத்தமான உறுப்புப் பேச்சு அலகுகளை தேர்வு செய்யவும். இந்த பேச்சு அலகுகளை தேர்ந்தெடுப்பதற்கான கைமுறை விதிகள் மற்றும் வலை தேடும் இயந்திரத்தை அடிப்படையான தன்னியக்கமாக வகுப்பு விதிகள் தேட FAQ மற்றும் QA தேடுதல் தளங்களுக்கும் இரண்டு கேள்வி விடையின் ஜோடிகளை நாம் உருவாக்குகிறோம் மற்றும் நாம் அவற்றை பயன்படுத்தி தேடும் நினைவி', 'ur': 'ہم جواب کے آناتومی کا تحقیق کرتے ہیں جن کے بارے میں ایک جواب کے ٹکڑے کیلئے ایک سوال کے مطابق ملنے کے ارزش ہیں اور جو مطابق نہ ہونا چاہیے۔ ہم ایک جواب کے بحث درخت بنانے کے لئے ریٹروریک ساختار تئوری کا استعمال کرتے ہیں اور ایک اصلی گفتگو یونیٹوں کو انتخاب کرتے ہیں جو indexing کے لئے مناسب ہیں. ان ڈیکورس یونیٹوں کے انتخاب کے لئے مجانی قوانین اور ویب تلاش انجینٹ مینینگ پر آسان کرلیسی کے ساتھ استعمال کیے گئے ہیں۔ ہم FAQ اور کمونٹی QA تلاش ڈومین کے لئے دو سؤال-جواب جوڑوں کا جوڑا بناتے ہیں اور ان کا استعمال کرتے ہیں پیشنهاد ادھیرنے کے مطالعہ کے مطالعہ کے لئے، جو 16 فیصد تک تلاش کے ذکر میں بہترین ترقی کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz javoblarni o'rganamiz, javob javobladan qanday matn qismlari savol bilan mos keladigan qiymati va u ishga tushirilmasligi kerak. Biz Rhetorik tuzuvchi mavzuni qo'llamiz, javob darajadagi so'zlarni yaratish va xizmatga mos keladigan elemental qismlar birikmasini tanlash uchun. @ info: whatsthis Biz FAQ va QA qidirish domenelari uchun ikkita guruhni qo'llamiz va ularni qidirish uchun foydalanamiz. Bu qidirish xossalariga 16% yaxshi o'zgarishga qo'shiladi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi khám phá giải phẫu các câu trả lời về các mảnh chữ từ câu trả lời mà đáng để so sánh với một câu hỏi mà không nên trùng khớp. Chúng tôi áp dụng lý thuyết cấu trúc tu từ để xây dựng một cây trong ngôn ngữ của câu trả lời và chọn các đơn vị dạy tiểu học thích hợp để phục hưng. Quy tắc thủ công cho việc chọn các đơn vị đàm luận này và quy trình tự động dựa trên khai thác động cơ tìm kiếm trên mạng được đánh giá liên quan đến việc tăng độ chính xác tìm kiếm. Chúng tôi tạo ra hai nhóm câu hỏi-đáp trả cho các khu vực tìm kiếm kiểu FAQ và cộng đồng QA và dùng chúng để đánh giá phương pháp phục hồi tính đề xuất, tiến tới 16 phần trăm cải tiến trong việc thu hồi tìm kiếm.', 'bg': 'Изследваме анатомията на отговорите по отношение на това кои текстови фрагменти от отговор си струват да съответстват на въпрос и кои не трябва да бъдат съвпадани. Ние прилагаме теорията на реторичната структура за изграждане на дискурсно дърво на отговор и избираме елементарни дискурсни единици, които са подходящи за индексиране. Оценяват се ръчните правила за подбор на тези дискурсни единици, както и автоматизираната класификация въз основа на добив на уеб търсачки с цел подобряване на точността на търсенето. Ние формираме два комплекта двойки въпроси-отговори за домейни за търсене на въпроси и отговори в общността и ги използваме за оценка на предложената методология за индексиране, която осигурява до 16% подобрение в отзоваването на търсенето.', 'hr': 'Istražujemo anatomiju odgovora u pogledu kojih dijelova teksta odgovora vrijedi odgovarati pitanju i koje se ne smiju odgovarati. Primjenjujemo teoriju retoričke strukture kako bi izgradili drvo diskursa odgovora i odabrali elementarne diskurske jedinice koje su odgovarajuće za indeksiranje. Ručna pravila za izbor tih diskurskih jedinica, kao i automatska klasifikacija na temelju rudarstva mrežnih pretraživača procjenjuju se potvrđujući poboljšanje točnosti pretraživanja. Postavljamo dva seta odgovora na pitanje za FAQ i zajedničke QA potragu domene i koristimo ih za procjenu predložene metodologije indeksacije, koja dostavlja do 16 posto poboljšanja u sjećanju potragu.', 'da': 'Vi undersøger svarenes anatomi med hensyn til, hvilke tekstfragmenter fra et svar der er værd at matche med et spørgsmål, og hvilke der ikke bør matches. Vi anvender retorisk strukturteori til at opbygge et diskurstræ af et svar og vælge elementære diskursenheder, der er egnede til indeksering. Manuelle regler for udvælgelse af disse diskursenheder samt automatiseret klassificering baseret på web-søgemaskine mining evalueres med henblik på at forbedre søgenøjagtigheden. Vi danner to sæt spørgsmål-svar par til FAQ og community QA-søgemæner og bruger dem til evaluering af den foreslåede indekseringsmetode, som giver op til 16 procent forbedring i søgetilbagekaldelse.', 'nl': 'We onderzoeken de anatomie van antwoorden met betrekking tot welke tekstfragmenten uit een antwoord de moeite waard zijn om met een vraag te matchen en welke niet. We passen de Rhetorische Structuurtheorie toe om een discoursboom van een antwoord op te bouwen en elementaire discourseenheden te selecteren die geschikt zijn voor indexering. Handmatige regels voor de selectie van deze discours units en geautomatiseerde classificatie op basis van web search engine mining worden geëvalueerd om de zoeknauwkeurigheid te verbeteren. We vormen twee sets vraag-antwoord paren voor FAQ en community QA zoekdomeinen en gebruiken deze voor de evaluatie van de voorgestelde indexeringsmethodologie, die tot 16 procent verbetering in zoekherinnering oplevert.', 'de': 'Wir erforschen die Anatomie der Antworten, welche Textfragmente einer Antwort es wert sind, mit einer Frage abzugleichen und welche nicht abgeglichen werden sollten. Wir verwenden die Rhetorische Strukturtheorie, um einen Diskursbaum einer Antwort zu bauen und elementare Diskurseinheiten auszuwählen, die für die Indexierung geeignet sind. Manuelle Regeln für die Auswahl dieser Diskurseinheiten sowie automatisierte Klassifizierung auf Basis von Web Search Engine Mining werden evaluiert, um die Suchgenauigkeit zu verbessern. Wir bilden zwei Sätze von Frage-Antwort-Paaren für FAQ- und Community-QA-Suchdomänen und verwenden diese zur Evaluierung der vorgeschlagenen Indexierungsmethode, die eine bis zu 16-prozentige Verbesserung des Suchabrufs ermöglicht.', 'ko': '우리는 답안의 해부 구조, 즉 답안 중의 어떤 텍스트 부분이 문제와 일치할 가치가 있고 어떤 것이 일치하지 말아야 하는지를 탐색한다.우리는 수사 구조 이론을 활용하여 답안의 문장 트리를 구축하고 색인에 적합한 기본 문장 단원을 선택했다.검색 정확도를 높이기 위해 이러한 언어 단원을 선택하는 수동 규칙과 웹 검색 엔진을 바탕으로 발굴한 자동 분류를 평가했다.FAQ 및 커뮤니티 QA 검색 영역에 대한 두 가지 질문(정답 쌍)을 작성하여 제안된 색인 방법을 평가함으로써 검색 리콜율을 16% 높일 수 있습니다.', 'fa': 'ما آناتومی از جواب\u200cها را در مورد کدام قطعه\u200cهای متن از یک جواب ارزش دارند که با یک سوال هماهنگ می\u200cشوند و کدام یک جواب نباید هماهنگ شود. ما تئوری ساختار ریتوریک را برای ساختن یک درخت صحبت از یک جواب و برگزیدن واحدهای صحبت ابتدایی که مناسب برای indexing هستند استفاده می کنیم. قانون دستی برای انتخاب این واحدهای صحبت و گروه\u200cبندی خودکار بر اساس خرید موتور جستجو وب ارزش داده می\u200cشود که دقیق جستجو را بهتر می\u200cکند. ما دو مجموعه جواب سوال و جواب را برای دامنه\u200cهای جستجوی QA و اجتماعی استفاده می\u200cکنیم و آنها را برای ارزیابی metodologiی پیشنهاد تحلیل کردن استفاده می\u200cکنیم، که تا ۱۶ درصد بهترین توسعه در یاد جستجوی را می\u200cرساند.', 'id': 'Kami mengeksplorasi anatomi jawaban mengenai mana fragmen teks dari jawaban layak cocok dengan pertanyaan dan yang seharusnya tidak cocok. Kami menerapkan Teori Struktur Rhetorical untuk membangun pohon diskors dari jawaban dan memilih unit diskors dasar yang cocok untuk indeksi. Aturan manual untuk pemilihan unit diskors ini serta klasifikasi otomatis berdasarkan mesin pencarian web penambangan diteliti berkaitan dengan meningkatkan akurasi pencarian. Kami membentuk dua set pasangan pertanyaan-jawaban untuk FAQ dan domain pencarian QA komunitas dan menggunakannya untuk evaluasi metodologi indeksi yang diusulkan, yang memberikan hingga 16 persen peningkatan dalam pencarian kembali.', 'sw': 'Tunafahamu maarufu ya majibu kwa kuhusiana na vipi vipi vipande vya ujumbe kutoka majibu vinasaidia kuunganisha na swali ambalo halipaswi kulingana na. Tunatumia nadharia ya Miundombinu ya Rhetorical ili kujenga mti wa mazungumzo wa jibu na kuchagua vitengo vya muhimu vya mazungumzo yanayopaswa kufanya uchunguzi. Manual rules for selection of these discourse units as well as automated classification based on web search engine mining are evaluated con-cerning improving search accuracy.  Tunaweza kutengeneza matokeo mawili ya majibu kwa ajili ya FAQ na jumuiya ya kutafuta maeneo ya QA na tunatumia kwa ajili ya kutathmini mbinu zilizopendekezwa za ufundi, ambazo zinaleta hadi asilimia 16 ya kuboreshwa kwa kutafuta kukumbuka.', 'af': "Ons ondersoek anatomie van antwoorde met respek na wat teks fragmente van 'n antwoord is waarde ooreenstem met 'n vraag en wat nie ooreenstem moet word nie. Ons toewend die retoriese struktuur teoriee om 'n diskursie boom van' n antwoord te bou en kies elementêre diskursie eenhede wat is geskik vir indeksering. Hand reëls vir kies van hierdie diskursie eenhede as ook outomatiese klasifikasie gebaseer op web soektog masjien mining word uitgewerk con- cerning verbetering soektog presies. Ons formeer twee stel vraag-antwoord paar vir FAQ en gemeenskap QA soektog domeine en gebruik hulle vir evaluering van die voorgestelde indekseringmetodologie, wat tot 16 persent verbetering in soektog herhaal verkry word.", 'sq': 'Ne eksplorojmë anatominë e përgjigjeve në lidhje me cilat fragmente teksti nga një përgjigje vlen të përputhen me një pyetje dhe të cilat nuk duhet të përputhen. Ne aplikojmë teorinë e strukturës retorike për të ndërtuar një pemë diskursi të një përgjigje dhe për të zgjedhur njësitë elementare diskursi që janë të përshtatshme për indeksimin. Rregullat manuale për zgjedhjen e këtyre njësive diskursore si dhe klasifikimin automatik bazuar në minierën e motorit të kërkimit në internet janë vlerësuar lidhur me përmirësimin e saktësisë së kërkimit. Ne formojmë dy grupe çiftesh pyetjeje-përgjigje për FAQ dhe domenet e kërkimit QA të komunitetit dhe i përdorim ato për vlerësimin e metodologjisë së propozuar indeksimi, e cila jep deri në 16 përqind përmirësim në kërkimin e kujtimit.', 'tr': 'Biz janlaryň anatomiýasyny barlap haýsy jogabynyň haýsy üçin bir soragla eşleşmäge deň. Biz bir jogabyň diskurs agajyny gurmak üçin retorik struktur teorisini uygulapdyk we indeks üçin gerekli elementer diskurs birimlerini saýlamak üçin. Bu diskler birbirlerini saýlamak üçin el kararlar we web gözatçilerini ahtarmak üçin awtomatik taýýarlama kararlaryna görkezilýär. Biz FAQ we jemgyýetçilik QA arama alanlarynyň iki sany sorag-jogabat çipi şekillendirdik we olaryň öngörülen indeks methodologiýasyny deňlemek üçin ulanýarys. Bu arama ýagdaýynda 16 prosent gelişmegi başarýar.', 'am': 'የመልስ መልስ ፍጥረቶችን ለማንኛውም መልስ ጥያቄን ለመቀበል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የሬትሮቲካዊ መሠረት ታሪያ የንግግር ዛፍ ለመሥራት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የዚህን ንግግር ክፍሎች ለመምረጥ የዕቅድ ሕግ እና የበይነመረብ መረጃ የኢንተርኔት ማነሻ ማነሻ ላይ የተመሳሳይ ክፍሎች ለመሻለል ይጠቅማል፡፡ ሁለትን የጥያቄ መልስ ሁለት ሁለት ዓይነቶችን ለFAQ እና ለQA የፍለጋዊ መረጃዎች እና በተዘጋጀው የጥያቄ ማሰናከል እናደርጋቸዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք պատասխանների անատոմիան այն մասին, թե որպիսի տեքստի կտորները պատասխանից արժանի են համապատասխանել հարցի հետ և որոնք չպետք է համապատասխանվեն: Մենք օգտագործում ենք Ռետորական կառուցվածքի տեսությունը պատասխանի խոսակցության ծառի կառուցելու և տարրական խոսակցության միավորների ընտրելու համար, որոնք համապատասխանում են ինդեքսի համար: Այս խոսակցության միավորների ընտրության ձեռավարական կանոնները, ինչպես նաև ցանցային որոնման շարժիչների հանքագործման հիմնված ավտոմատիկ դասակարգումը գնահատվում են որոնման ճշգրիտության բարելավման հետ կապված: Մենք կառուցում ենք երկու հարցերի և պատասխանների զույգ ՀՀՀ-ի և համայնքի ՀՀՀ-ի որոնման ոլորտների համար և օգտագործում ենք դրանք առաջարկած ինդեքսի մեթոդոլոգիայի գնահատման համար, ինչը հանգեցնում է մինչև 16 տոկոս բարելավման որոնման հիշեցու', 'bn': 'কোন উত্তর থেকে টেক্সট সংক্রান্ত প্রশ্নের সাথে মিলে যাওয়ার মাধ্যমে আমরা উত্তরের বিষয়টিকে বিশ্লেষণ করি এবং যে প্রশ্নের ম আমরা রেটোরিক্যাল কাঠামো থিওরিকে প্রয়োগ করি একটি উত্তরের বৃক্ষ তৈরি করার জন্য এবং সংযুক্ত করার জন্য মৌলিক কথোপকথন ইউনিট নির্বাচন কর এই কথোপকথন ইউনিট নির্বাচনের জন্য নিয়মিত নিয়ম এবং ওয়েব সার্চ ইঞ্জিন মিনিং ভিত্তিক স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিভিন্ন স্থ আমরা FAQ এবং কিউএ সম্প্রদায়ের জন্য প্রশ্নের উত্তর দুটি জোড় তৈরি করি এবং প্রস্তাবিত ইন্ডিক্সিং পদ্ধতির মূল্যায়নের জন্য তাদের ব্যবহার করি, যা অনুসন্ধান', 'az': 'Biz hansı mətn parçalarının bir suala uyğulması və buna uyğulmamalı olduğuna dair cavab verilmiş anatomiyanı keşfetirik. Biz bir cavab a ğacını inşa etmək üçün retorik struktur teorisini uygulayıq və indeksi üçün uyğun ilk diskurs birliklərini seçirik. Bu söhbət birliklərinin seçilməsi üçün əlli qaydalar və web arama maşınına dayanan otomatik klasifikasiya təyin edilir. Biz FAQ və cəmiyyət QA arama domenaları üçün iki sorğu-cavab çift yaradırıq və onları təklif edilmiş indeks metodolojisini değerləşdirmək üçün istifadə edirik. Bu, arama yadına salmaq üçün 16%-ə qədər yaxşılaşdırılır.', 'cs': 'Zkoumáme anatomii odpovědí s ohledem na to, které textové fragmenty z odpovědi stojí za srovnání s otázkou a které by neměly být srovnány. Používáme teorii rétorické struktury k vytvoření diskurzního stromu odpovědi a vybíráme elementární diskurzní jednotky, které jsou vhodné pro indexování. Vyhodnocována jsou manuální pravidla pro výběr těchto diskurzních jednotek a automatizovaná klasifikace založená na dolování webových vyhledávačů za účelem zlepšení přesnosti vyhledávání. Vytvoříme dvě sady párů otázek-odpověď pro FAQ a komunitní QA vyhledávací domény a využíváme je k hodnocení navrhované metodiky indexování, která přináší až 16procentní zlepšení vyhledávání.', 'ca': "Explorem anatomia de respostes en relació a quins fragments de text d'una resposta val la pena combinar amb una pregunta i que no haurien de ser combinats. Aplicam la Teoria de l'Estructura Retòrica per construir un arbre de discurs d'una resposta i seleccionar unitats de discurs elementars que siguin adequades per a indexar. Les normes manuals de selecció d'aquestes unitats de discurs i la classificació automatitzada basada en la mineria de motors de cerca web es valoren en relació a la millora de la precisió de la cerca. Formem dos conjunts de parells de preguntes-respostes per dominys de cerca QA de la FAQ i de la comunitat i els utilitzem per avaluar la metodologia d'indexació proposada, que proporciona fins al 16% millora en la recuperació de cerca.", 'bs': 'Istražujemo anatomiju odgovora u pogledu kojih dijelova teksta iz odgovora vrijedi odgovarati pitanju i koje ne bi trebalo odgovarati. Primjenjujemo teoriju retoričke strukture da izgradimo drvo diskursa odgovora i odaberemo elementarne diskurske jedinice koje su odgovarajuće za indeksiranje. Ručna pravila za izbor tih diskurskih jedinica, kao i automatska klasifikacija na temelju rudarstva mrežnih pretraživača procjenjuju se potvrđujući poboljšanje preciznosti pretraživanja. Mi formiramo dva seta odgovora na pitanje za FAQ i zajedničke potragu QA domena i koristimo ih za procjenu predložene metodologije indeksacije, koja dostavlja do 16 posto poboljšanja u sjećanju pretraživanja.', 'et': 'Me uurime vastuste anatoomiat seoses sellega, millised tekstifragmendid vastusest on väärt vastavust küsimusega ja millised ei tohiks sobitada. Me rakendame retoorilist struktuuri teooriat vastuse diskursuspuu ehitamiseks ja valime indekseerimiseks sobivad elementaarsed diskursusüksused. Hinnatakse nende diskursusüksuste käsitsi valimise reegleid ja veebiotsingumootorite kaevandamisel põhinevat automatiseeritud klassifikatsiooni, mis parandab otsingu täpsust. Me moodustame KKK ja kogukonna kvaliteedi tagamise domeenide jaoks kaks küsimuste ja vastuste paari ning kasutame neid kavandatud indekseerimismetoodika hindamiseks, mis pakub kuni 16% paremat otsingu tagasikutsumist.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme vastausten anatomiaa sen suhteen, mitkä tekstifragmentit vastauksesta ovat vastaamisen arvoisia kysymykseen ja mitä ei pitäisi sovittaa yhteen. Sovellamme retorista rakenneteoriaa vastauksen diskurssipuun rakentamiseen ja valitsemme indeksointiin sopivia diskurssiyksiköitä. Näiden diskurssiyksiköiden valinnassa arvioidaan manuaalisia sääntöjä sekä hakukonelouhintaan perustuvaa automaattista luokittelua haun tarkkuuden parantamiseksi. Muodostamme kaksi kysymys-vastausparia usein kysytyihin kysymyksiin ja yhteisön laadunvarmistuksen verkkotunnuksiin ja käytämme niitä arvioidessamme ehdotettua indeksointimenetelmää, joka parantaa hakujen takaisinkutsua jopa 16 prosentilla.', 'jv': 'Anyone Awak dhéwé ngerti nggambar Trabah Ributir Manual rule for select of this disc Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing duwé perusahaan-suaraning nggawe barang-barang kanggo ngilanggar barang nggawe barang-barang kanggo ngilanggar nggawe sistem iniksi yang dipunanggé, tanggal nambah 16% kebutuhan langgar.', 'ha': "Munã jarraba masu jayayar su da wanne gauran matsayi daga jawãbin su yana da daidai da wani tambayi kuma ba ya kasancẽwa ya kamata da shi. Tuna amfani da jigon Mai Réorical Tilasar da za'a samar da wata magana na'ura, kuma Mu zãɓe sunayen mazaɓa da masu daidai wa indeks. Ana ƙaddara Rukuman daidaita wa zaɓen wannan ayuka da aka samu classified farat ɗaya a kan madowa masu shawarar searches na web, don a canza tsarin search-inganci. Mu ƙiƙira nau'i biyu na tambayi wa FAQ da jamii QA masu amfani da su dõmin ka yi amfani da su ga tundiyori wanda aka buƙata na index, da kuma yana ƙara zuwa asilimi 16an mai kyautatawa a lokacin search.", 'he': 'אנו חוקרים אנטומיה של תשובות בנוגע לאיזה חלקיקי טקסט מתשובה שווים להתאים לשאלה ולא צריך להתאים. אנו משתמשים בתיאוריית המבנה הרטורית כדי לבנות עץ דיבור של תשובה ולבחר יחידות דיבור יסודיות שמתאימות לאינדקס. חוקים ידניים לבחירה של יחידות דיבור אלה, כמו גם קליזציה אוטומטית מבוססת על מכרות מנועי חיפוש באינטרנט, מוערכים בנוגע לשיפור בדיקת חיפוש. אנו נוצרים שני קבוצות של זוגות תשובות-שאלות לתחום חיפוש של FAQ וקהילה QA ולהשתמש בהם כדי להעריך את מטופולוגית ההודקסים המוצעת, אשר מספק עד 16 אחוז שיפור בחזרה חיפוש.', 'sk': 'Raziskujemo anatomijo odgovorov glede na to, kateri deli besedila iz odgovora so vredni ujemati z vprašanjem in kateri se ne bi smeli ujemati. Teorijo retorične strukture uporabljamo za gradnjo diskurznega drevesa odgovora in izbiro osnovnih diskurznih enot, primernih za indeksiranje. Ocenjujemo ročna pravila za izbiro teh diskurznih enot in avtomatizirano klasifikacijo na podlagi rudarjenja spletnih iskalnikov, kar zadeva izboljšanje natančnosti iskanja. Oblikujemo dva sklopa parov vprašanj-odgovorov za iskanje po vprašanjih in odgovorih v skupnosti ter jih uporabljamo za oceno predlagane metodologije indeksiranja, ki omogoča do 16-odstotno izboljšanje iskanja.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ལན་གསལ་ཚིག་གི་དབུགས་ཅིག་གི་ཡིག་གི་ཆ་ཤས་ཀྱི་རྩིས་འབྲི་བ་ཅིག་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པ་དང་མི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག We apply the Rhetorical Structure Theory to build a discourse tree of an answer and select elementary discourse units that are suitable for indexing. Manual rules for selection of these discourse units as well as automated classification based on web search engine mining are evaluated con-cerning improving search accuracy. ང་ཚོས་FAQ དང་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་QA འཚོལ་བཤེར་གྱི་གནས་ཁོངས་ལ་རྗེས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་དབུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'On a Chatbot Providing Virtual Dialogues', 'ar': 'على Chatbot توفير حوارات افتراضية', 'fr': 'Sur un chatbot fournissant des dialogues virtuels', 'pt': 'Em um chatbot fornecendo diálogos virtuais', 'es': 'En un chatbot que proporciona diálogos virtuales', 'hi': 'एक चैटबॉट पर आभासी संवाद प्रदान करना', 'ja': '仮想ダイアログを提供するチャットボット', 'zh': '供虚拟对语机器人上', 'ru': 'На чат-боте, обеспечивающем виртуальные диалоги', 'ga': 'Ar Chatbot Ag Soláthar Comhphlé Fíorúil', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Σε ένα Chatbot που παρέχει εικονικούς διαλόγους', 'hu': 'Virtuális párbeszédeket biztosító csevegőroboton', 'it': 'Su un Chatbot che fornisce dialoghi virtuali', 'lt': 'Name', 'kk': 'Name', 'mk': 'Name', 'mt': 'Dwar Djalogi Virtwali', 'ms': 'Pada Butang Sembang Menyediakan Dialog Maya', 'ml': 'വിര്\u200dച്ച്വല്\u200d ഡയലോഗുകള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്ന ചാറ്റ്ബോട്ടില്\u200d', 'mn': 'Чатбот дээр виртуал диалогуудыг хангах', 'pl': 'Na chatbotzie udostępniającym wirtualne dialogi', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Pe un Chatbot care furnizează dialoguri virtuale', 'sr': 'Na Chatbotu koji pruža virtualne dijaloge', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'On a Chatbot Providing Dialogues Virtual', 'sv': 'På en Chatbot som tillhandahåller virtuella dialoger', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trong hộp thoại Chatbot cung cấp Ảo', 'hr': 'Name', 'da': 'På en chatbot, der leverer virtuelle dialoger', 'nl': 'Op een chatbot die virtuele dialogen aanbiedt', 'bg': 'На чатбот Предоставяне на виртуални диалози', 'id': 'Dalam Batang Bicara Menyediakan Dialog Virtual', 'ko': '채팅 로봇에 가상 대화를 제공하다', 'de': 'Auf einem Chatbot, der virtuelle Dialoge bereitstellt', 'fa': 'Name', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Katika Chatbot inayotoa Mazungumzo ya Kifaransa', 'tr': 'Sanal dialoglar temin edip duran bir Chatbot', 'sq': 'Në një bisedë që ofron dialogu virtual', 'hy': 'Վիրտուալ հաղորդագրություններ տրամադրելու համար', 'am': 'የውይይት መድረክ', 'az': 'Virtual Dialoglar t톛min ed톛n Chatbotda', 'bn': 'ভার্চুয়াল ডায়ালগ প্রদান করছে', 'bs': 'Na Chatbotu pružavajući virtualne dijaloge', 'ca': 'En una conversa proporcionant diàleg virtual', 'cs': 'Na chatbotu poskytujícím virtuální dialogy', 'et': 'Virtuaalsete dialoogide pakkumine jutubotis', 'fi': 'Chatbotissa Virtuaalisten dialogien tarjoaminen', 'jv': 'Name', 'he': 'על שיחת שיחה שמספקת דיאלוגים וירטואליים', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Na chatbotu, ki zagotavlja virtualna pogovorna okna', 'bo': 'གླེང་མོལ་བྱེད་པའི་བར་སྟོན་གྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་ཐོག་ཏུ་བྱིན་པ'}
{'en': 'We present a chatbot that delivers content in the form of virtual dialogues automatically produced from the plain texts that are extracted and selected from the documents. This virtual dialogue content is provided in the form of answers derived from the found and selected documents split into fragments, and questions that are automatically generated for these answers based on the initial text.', 'ar': 'نقدم روبوت محادثة يقدم محتوى في شكل حوارات افتراضية يتم إنتاجها تلقائيًا من النصوص العادية التي يتم استخراجها واختيارها من المستندات. يتم توفير محتوى الحوار الافتراضي هذا في شكل إجابات مشتقة من المستندات التي تم العثور عليها والمختارة مقسمة إلى أجزاء ، والأسئلة التي يتم إنشاؤها تلقائيًا لهذه الإجابات بناءً على النص الأولي.', 'es': 'Presentamos un chatbot que entrega contenido en forma de diálogos virtuales producidos automáticamente a partir de los textos sin formato que se extraen y seleccionan de los documentos. Este contenido de diálogo virtual se proporciona en forma de respuestas derivadas de los documentos encontrados y seleccionados divididos en fragmentos, y preguntas que se generan automáticamente para estas respuestas en función del texto inicial.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um chatbot que entrega conteúdo na forma de diálogos virtuais produzidos automaticamente a partir dos textos simples que são extraídos e selecionados dos documentos. Esse conteúdo de diálogo virtual é fornecido na forma de respostas derivadas dos documentos encontrados e selecionados divididos em fragmentos e perguntas que são geradas automaticamente para essas respostas com base no texto inicial.', 'fr': 'Nous présentons un chatbot qui fournit du contenu sous la forme de dialogues virtuels produits automatiquement à partir de textes simples extraits et sélectionnés à partir des documents. Ce contenu de dialogue virtuel est fourni sous la forme de réponses dérivées des documents trouvés et sélectionnés divisés en fragments, et de questions qui sont générées automatiquement pour ces réponses sur la base du texte initial.', 'ja': 'ドキュメントから抽出および選択されたプレーンテキストから自動的に生成された仮想ダイアログ形式のコンテンツを提供するチャットボットを提示します。このバーチャルダイアログコンテンツは、検出されたドキュメントと選択されたドキュメントから分割された回答、および最初のテキストに基づいてこれらの回答に対して自動的に生成される質問の形式で提供されます。', 'zh': '发一聊天机器人,资以虚拟言,取诸文档纯文本自生也。 虚拟以文档中派生对,拆为片段,因初文本自生。', 'hi': 'हम एक चैटबॉट प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो आभासी संवादों के रूप में सामग्री वितरित करता है जो स्वचालित रूप से सादे ग्रंथों से उत्पादित होते हैं जिन्हें दस्तावेजों से निकाला और चुना जाता है। यह वर्चुअल संवाद सामग्री पाए गए और चयनित दस्तावेज़ों से प्राप्त उत्तरों के रूप में प्रदान की जाती है, जो टुकड़ों में विभाजित होती हैं, और प्रारंभिक पाठ के आधार पर इन उत्तरों के लिए स्वचालित रूप से उत्पन्न होने वाले प्रश्न।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем чат-бот, который доставляет контент в виде виртуальных диалогов, автоматически создаваемых из простых текстов, которые извлекаются и выбираются из документов. Этот контент виртуального диалога предоставляется в виде ответов, полученных из найденных и выбранных документов, разбитых на фрагменты, и вопросов, которые автоматически генерируются для этих ответов на основе исходного текста.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid chatbot i láthair a sheachadann ábhar i bhfoirm comhráite fíorúla a tháirgtear go huathoibríoch ó na gnáth-théacsanna a bhaintear agus a roghnaítear as na doiciméid. Cuirtear an t-ábhar dialóige fíorúil seo ar fáil i bhfoirm freagraí a thagann ó na doiciméid aimsithe agus roghnaithe roinnte ina blúirí, agus ceisteanna a ghintear go huathoibríoch do na freagraí seo bunaithe ar an téacs tosaigh.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ საუბოტი, რომელიც სამყარო ვირტუალური დიალოგიების ფორმაში ავტომატურად გამოიყენებული სამყარო ტექსტიდან, რომელიც დოკუმენტიდან გამო ამ ვირტუალური დიალოგის შემდგომარების ფორმაში, რომელიც მოიძებნა და მონიშნული დოკუმენტების ფორმაში გაყოფილი ფრადმენტებში, და კითხვები, რომლებიც ავტომატურად შექმნილი ამ პა', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα που παραδίδει περιεχόμενο με τη μορφή εικονικών διαλόγων που παράγονται αυτόματα από τα απλά κείμενα που εξάγονται και επιλέγονται από τα έγγραφα. Αυτό το εικονικό περιεχόμενο διαλόγου παρέχεται με τη μορφή απαντήσεων που προέρχονται από τα έγγραφα που βρέθηκαν και επιλεγμένα χωρίζονται σε αποσπάσματα και ερωτήσεις που δημιουργούνται αυτόματα για αυτές τις απαντήσεις με βάση το αρχικό κείμενο.', 'it': 'Vi presentiamo un chatbot che fornisce contenuti sotto forma di dialoghi virtuali prodotti automaticamente dai testi semplici estratti e selezionati dai documenti. Questo contenuto di dialogo virtuale è fornito sotto forma di risposte derivate dai documenti trovati e selezionati divisi in frammenti, e domande che vengono generate automaticamente per queste risposte in base al testo iniziale.', 'kk': 'Біз құжаттардан тарқату мен таңдалған кәдімгі мәтіндерден автоматты түрде жасалған виртуалды диалогтар түрінде мазмұнын беретін шат батырмасын көрсету. Бұл виртуалды диалог мазмұны табылған және таңдалған құжаттардан бөлікті жауаптар түрінде келтіріледі, және бастапқы мәтіннен негізінде автоматты түрде осы жауаптар үшін құрылған сұрақта', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome pokalbio botą, kuris pristato turinį virtualių dialogų form a, automatiškai pagamintą iš paprastų tekstų, ištrauktų ir atrinktų iš dokumentų. Šis virtualaus dialogo turinys pateikiamas atsakymais, gautais iš rastų ir atrinktų dokumentų, suskirstytais į fragmentus, ir klausimais, kurie automatiškai kyla šiems atsakymams remiantis pradiniu tekstu.', 'mk': 'Презентираме chatbot кој дава содржина во форма на виртуелни дијалози автоматски произведени од обичните тексти кои се извадени и избрани од документите. Оваа содржина на виртуелниот дијалог е обезбедена во форма на одговори изведени од пронајдените и избраните документи поделени на фрагменти и прашања кои се автоматски генерирани за овие одговори врз основа на почетниот текст.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan chatbot yang menghantar kandungan dalam bentuk dialog maya yang secara automatik dihasilkan dari teks biasa yang diekstrak dan dipilih dari dokumen. Kandungan dialog maya ini disediakan dalam bentuk jawapan yang berasal dari dokumen yang ditemui dan dipilih dibahagi menjadi fragmen, dan soalan yang secara automatik dijana untuk jawapan ini berdasarkan teks awal.', 'ml': 'രേഖകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെടുകയും തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെടുകയും ചെയ്യുന്ന വാര്\u200dച്ചുവലിയ ഡയലോഗുകളുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും  @ info', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw chatbot li jwassal kontenut fil-form a ta’ djalogi virtwali awtomatikament prodotti mit-testi sempliċi li jiġu estratti u magħżula mid-dokumenti. Dan il-kontenut ta’ djalogu virtwali huwa pprovdut fil-forma ta’ tweġibiet derivati mid-dokumenti misjuba u magħżula maqsuma fi frammenti, u mistoqsijiet li huma ġenerati awtomatikament għal dawn it-tweġibiet ibbażati fuq it-test inizjali.', 'mn': 'Бид бичил баримтуудаас автоматаар гаргаж, сонгогдсон энгийн текстүүдийн хэлбэрээр бүтээгдэхүүнийг виртуал диалогуудын хэлбэрээр автоматаар бий болгож байна. Энэ виртуал диалогын contentment нь олсон, сонгогдсон баримтуудын хариултуудын хэлбэрээс нь хуваагдсан бөгөөд эхний текст дээр автоматаар үүсгэгдсэн асуултууд юм.', 'no': 'Vi viser eit pratbot som leverer innhaldet i form av virtuelle dialogar automatisk laga frå dei enkle tekstane som vert ekstrahert og valde frå dokumenta. Dette virtuelt dialoginnhaldet er oppgjeven i form av svar som er oppteken frå dei funne og valde dokumenta delt inn i fragmenter, og spørsmåla som vert automatisk oppretta for desse svara basert på den opphavlege teksten.', 'pl': 'Prezentujemy chatbot, który dostarcza treści w postaci wirtualnych dialogów automatycznie produkowanych z tekstów zwykłych, które są ekstraktowane i wybierane z dokumentów. Ten wirtualny dialog dostarczany jest w postaci odpowiedzi pochodzących z znalezionych i wybranych dokumentów podzielonych na fragmenty oraz pytań, które są automatycznie generowane dla tych odpowiedzi na podstawie tekstu początkowego.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm un chatbot care oferă conținut sub formă de dialoguri virtuale produse automat din textele simple extrase și selectate din documente. Acest conținut de dialog virtual este furnizat sub formă de răspunsuri derivate din documentele găsite și selectate împărțite în fragmente și întrebări care sunt generate automat pentru aceste răspunsuri pe baza textului inițial.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo govornicu koja dostavlja sadržaj u obliku virtualnih dijaloga automatski proizvedenih iz prostih tekstova koji su izvedeni i odabrani iz dokumenta. Ovaj sadržaj virtualnog dijaloga se predstavlja u obliku odgovora iz pronađenih i odabranih dokumenta podijeljenih u komadiće, i pitanja koja se automatski proizvode za te odgovore na osnovu početnog teksta.', 'si': 'අපි චැට්බෝට් එකක් පෙන්වනවා ඒකෙන් වාස්තවික සංවාදයේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් නිර්මාණය කරනවා සහ දස මේ අභාවිත සංවාදය සාමාන්ත්\u200dරික සාමාන්ත්\u200dරික ප්\u200dරතිචාරය හොයාගත්ත සහ තෝරාගත්ත ලිපිණිපත් වලින් පැත්තක් වලින්', 'so': "Waxaannu soo bandhignaa qoraalka saxda ah oo ka soo saara qoraalka saxda ah oo laga soo doortay dukumentiyada. Waxyaabaha ku qoran diyaarinta bulshadan waxaa lagu sameeyaa qaab u eg jawaabaha laga helay, dukumentiyada la doortayna waxay u kala dillaacaan burbur, iyo su'aalaha si bilowga ah loo soo dejiyo jawaabahaas ku saleysan qoraalkii hore.", 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy chatbotot, amely a dokumentumokból kivont és kiválasztott egyszerű szövegekből automatikusan létrehozott virtuális párbeszédek formájában biztosítja a tartalmat. Ezt a virtuális párbeszédtartalmat a talált és kiválasztott dokumentumokból származó válaszok formájában, töredékekre osztva, valamint az eredeti szöveg alapján automatikusan generálódó kérdések formájában adják meg.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en chatbot som levererar innehåll i form av virtuella dialoger som automatiskt produceras från vanliga texter som extraheras och väljs ut ur dokumenten. Detta virtuella dialoginnehåll tillhandahålls i form av svar som härrör från de hittade och markerade dokumenten uppdelade i fragment, och frågor som automatiskt genereras för dessa svar baserat på den ursprungliga texten.', 'ta': 'மெய்நிகர் உரையாடல் வடிவத்தில் உள்ளடக்கத்தை கொடுக்கும் ஒரு அரட்டை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம். அது ஆவணங்களிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப் @ info', 'ur': 'ہم ایک چاٹبوٹ کو پیش کرتے ہیں جو مجارس دیالوگ کی شکل میں موتوں کو اضافہ کرتا ہے جو سیدھے پیغام سے اٹھائے جاتے ہیں اور دکھانے سے انتخاب کئے جاتے ہیں۔ This virtual dialog content is provided in the form of answers derived from the found and selected documents split into fragments, and questions that are automatically generated for these answers based on the initial text.', 'uz': 'Biz hujjatlardan tashlangan va tanlangan oddiy matnlardan avtomatik yaratilgan muloqat shaklida maʼlumot joʻnatiladi. @ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi trình bày một con robot chat chuyên cung cấp nội dung bằng cách cấu hình ảo sản xuất tự động từ các văn bản đơn được lấy ra và chọn trong các tài liệu. Đây là nội dung cuộc đối thoại ảo được cung cấp bằng các câu trả lời từ các tài liệu đã tìm thấy và chọn được chia thành các mảnh, và các câu hỏi sẽ tự động được tạo ra dựa trên các câu trả lời ban đầu.', 'bg': 'Представяме чатбот, който доставя съдържание под формата на виртуални диалози, автоматично произведени от обикновените текстове, които се извличат и избират от документите. Съдържанието на виртуалния диалог се предоставя под формата на отговори, получени от намерените и избрани документи, разделени на фрагменти, и въпроси, които автоматично се генерират за тези отговори въз основа на първоначалния текст.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en chatbot, der leverer indhold i form af virtuelle dialoger automatisk produceret ud fra de almindelige tekster, der udtrækkes og vælges fra dokumenterne. Dette virtuelle dialogindhold leveres i form af svar afledt af de fundne og valgte dokumenter opdelt i fragmenter, og spørgsmål, der automatisk genereres til disse svar baseret på den oprindelige tekst.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een chatbot die inhoud levert in de vorm van virtuele dialogen die automatisch worden geproduceerd uit de platte teksten die worden geëxtraheerd en geselecteerd uit de documenten. Deze virtuele dialooginhoud wordt geleverd in de vorm van antwoorden afgeleid van de gevonden en geselecteerde documenten gesplitst in fragmenten, en vragen die automatisch worden gegenereerd voor deze antwoorden op basis van de oorspronkelijke tekst.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo govornicu koja dostavlja sadržaj u obliku virtualnih dijaloga automatski proizvedenih iz običnih tekstova koji su izvučeni i odabrani iz dokumenta. Ovaj sadržaj virtualnog dijaloga predstavlja se u obliku odgovora iz pronađenih i odabranih dokumenta podijeljenih u dijelove i pitanja koje se automatski proizvode za te odgovore na temelju početnog teksta.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren einen Chatbot, der Inhalte in Form von virtuellen Dialogen automatisch aus den extrahierten und aus den Dokumenten selektierten Klartexten erzeugt. Dieser virtuelle Dialoginhalt wird in Form von Antworten bereitgestellt, die aus den gefundenen und ausgewählten Dokumenten abgeleitet werden, die in Fragmente unterteilt sind und für diese Antworten automatisch anhand des Ausgangstextes generiert werden.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan chatbot yang menyediakan isi dalam bentuk dialog virtual yang secara otomatis diproduksi dari teks biasa yang diekstraksi dan dipilih dari dokumen. Konten dialog virtual ini disediakan dalam bentuk jawaban yang berasal dari dokumen yang ditemukan dan dipilih dibagi menjadi fragmen, dan pertanyaan yang secara otomatis dihasilkan untuk jawaban ini berdasarkan teks awal.', 'ko': '우리는 문서에서 추출하고 선택한 순수한 텍스트가 자동으로 생성된 가상 대화의 형식으로 내용을 제공하는 채팅 로봇을 제시했다.이러한 가상 대화 내용은 발견된 문서와 선택한 문서에서 답을 추출하여 세그먼트로 분할한 다음 초기 텍스트에 따라 자동으로 답을 생성하는 형식이다.', 'fa': 'ما یک صحبت را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که محتویات را در شکل گفتگوهای مجازی به طور خودکار از متن\u200cهای معمولی که از سند\u200cها خارج و انتخاب می\u200cشوند و از آن خارج می\u200cشوند، تولید می\u200cکند. این محتوای محاورۀ محاورۀ محاورۀ مجازی در شکل جواب\u200cهایی که از سند پیدا شده و انتخاب شده به بخش\u200cهای پراکنده شده و سوال\u200cهایی که به طور خودکار برای این جواب\u200cها بر اساس متن اولیه تولید می\u200cشوند.', 'tr': 'Biz senediň içinde ahyrylan we saýlanan hatlary wirtual dialoglaryň biçiminde alýan bir toplanty görkezip Bu wirtual dialogda tapılan we saýlanan senediň parçalara bölünen jogabalar şeklinde üýtgedildi we bu jogablar üçin otomatik eden soraglar.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuweka mjadala wa mazungumzo yanayotoa maudhui katika namna ya mazungumzo ya kiraia yaliyotengenezwa kwa wenyewe kutoka kwenye maandishi ya wazi yanayotengenezwa na kuchaguliwa kutoka kwenye nyaraka. Mazungumzo haya ya mazungumzo ya mtandaoni yanatolewa kwa namna ya majibu yaliyotokana na kutambuliwa na nyaraka zilizochaguliwa zinagawanyika katika vipande vipande, na maswali yanayotengenezwa kwa ajili ya majibu haya kwa kutumia maandishi ya mwanzo.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n geselskappy voor wat inhoud in die vorm van virtuele dialoog outomaties uitgevoer word van die eenvoudige teks wat uit die dokumente uitgevoer word en gekies word. Hierdie virtuele dialoog inhoud word verskaf in die vorm van antwoordes afgelei van die gevinde en gekose dokumente deel in fragmente, en vrae wat outomaties genereer word vir hierdie antwoordes gebaseer op die aanvanklike teks.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një chatbot që jep përmbajtje në form ën e dialogeve virtual ë të prodhuara automatikisht nga tekstet e thjeshta që janë nxjerrë dhe zgjedhur nga dokumentet. Ky përmbajtje dialogu virtual ofrohet në form ën e përgjigjeve të nxjerra nga dokumentet e gjetura dhe të zgjedhura të ndara në fragmente dhe pyetje që janë krijuar automatikisht për këto përgjigje bazuar në tekstin fillestar.', 'am': 'ከሰነዶች ውስጥ ካለፉና በተመረጠው የጽሑፎች አካባቢ ጽሑፎች በተለየ የውይይት አካባቢ አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይህ የፊደል ቅርጽ ጥያቄ ጥያቄ በመግኘት እና የተመረጠው ሰነዱን ክፍሎች በተለየ ጥያቄ እና የመጀመሪያው ጽሑፍ በተደረገው ጥያቄዎች በጥያቄ የተደረገ ጥያቄ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի շտաբոտ, որը ներկայացնում է պարունակությունը վիրտուալ հաղորդագրությունների ձևով, որոնք ինքնաբերաբար արտադրվում են պարզ տեքստներից, որոնք դուրս են բերվում և ընտրվում փաստաթղթերից: Այս վիրտուալ հատվածը տրամադրվում է գտնվող և ընտրված փաստաթղթերից ստացված պատասխանների տեսքով, որոնք բաժանվում են մասերի, և հարցերի տեսքով, որոնք ինքնաբերաբար ստեղծվում են այս պատասխանների համար, հիմնված սկզբնական տեքստ', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি চ্যাটবোট উপস্থাপন করি যা ভার্চুয়াল ডায়ালগের রূপে বিষয়বস্তু প্রদান করে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে উৎপাদন করা হয় এবং নথিপত্র থেকে নি এই ভার্চুয়াল ডায়ালগের বিষয়বস্তু পাওয়া যায় প্রাথমিক লেখার ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক উত্তর থেকে পাওয়া যায় এবং নির্বাচিত নথি ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিত্ত', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo govornicu koja dostavlja sadržaj u obliku virtualnih dijaloga automatski proizvedenih iz prostih tekstova koji su izvučeni i odabrani iz dokumenta. Ovaj sadržaj virtualnog dijaloga se predstavlja u obliku odgovora iz pronađenih i odabranih dokumenta podijeljenih na dijelove i pitanja koja se automatski proizvode za te odgovore na temelju početnog teksta.', 'ca': "Presentam un chatbot que proporciona continguts en form a de diàlegs virtuals produïts automàticament dels textos senzills que s'extraeixen i seleccionen dels documents. Aquest contingut de diàleg virtual es proporciona en forma de respostes derivades dels documents trobads i seleccionats dividits en fragments, i preguntes que es generen automàticament per aquestes respostes basades en el text inicial.", 'az': 'Biz müəyyən məlumatları bildirən və belələrdən seçilən düz məlumatlardan avtomatik olaraq ürəkləndirilən virtual dialogların formasında təbliğ edirik. Bu sanal dialog məlumatı tapılan və seçilmiş məlumatlardan parçalara bölünən cavabların formasında təmin edilir, və bu cavabların başlangıç məlumatına dayanan otomatik olaraq təhsil edilir.', 'cs': 'Představujeme chatbot, který dodává obsah ve formě virtuálních dialogů automaticky vytvořených z prostých textů, které jsou extrahovány a vybírány z dokumentů. Obsah virtuálního dialogu je poskytován ve formě odpovědí odvozených z nalezených a vybraných dokumentů rozdělených na fragmenty a otázek, které jsou pro tyto odpovědi automaticky generovány na základě původního textu.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme chatbotin, joka toimittaa sisältöä virtuaalisten dialogien muodossa, joka tuotetaan automaattisesti dokumenteista poimituista ja valituista yksinkertaisista teksteistä. Tämä virtuaalinen dialogi-sisältö tarjotaan löydetyistä ja valituista asiakirjoista johdetuina vastauksina, jotka on jaettu osiin, ja kysymyksiä, jotka luodaan automaattisesti näille vastauksille alkuperäisen tekstin perusteella.', 'et': 'Esitleme jutuboti, mis edastab sisu virtuaalsete dialoogide kujul automaatselt loodud lihtsatest tekstidest, mis on ekstraheeritud ja valitud dokumentidest. Virtuaalse dialoogi sisu esitatakse leitud ja valitud dokumentidest saadud vastuste vormis, mis on jagatud killudeks, ning küsimuste vormis, mis vastavatele vastustele automaatselt genereeritakse algse teksti alusel.', 'jv': 'Awak dh챕w챕 ng챕w챕 capot sing nyimpen neng kalung챕 ning diwangak챕 conversasi birtual long', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo klepetalni bot, ki zagotavlja vsebino v obliki virtualnih dialogov, samodejno izdelanih iz navadnih besedil, ki so izvlečena in izbrana iz dokumentov. Vsebina virtualnega dialoga je zagotovljena v obliki odgovorov iz najdenih in izbranih dokumentov, razdeljenih na drobce, vprašanj, ki se samodejno ustvarijo za te odgovore na podlagi začetnega besedila.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים chatbot שמעביר תוכן בצורה של דיאלוגים וירטואליים שנוצרים באופן אוטומטי מהטקסטים הפשוטים שנוצרים ונבחרים מהמסמכים. תוכן הדיולוג וירטואלי הזה נותן בצורה של תשובות שנוצרות מהמסמכים הממצאים והבחרים מתחלקים לחתיכות, ושאלות שנוצרות באופן אוטומטי לתשובות הללו מבוססות על הטקסט הראשון.', 'ha': 'Tuna gabatar da wani hoto wanda ke samar da maɓallin zauren akwatin bayani na farat ɗaya, daga takardun takardar da aka nuna kuma aka zãɓe su. Wannan maɓalli na zauren akwatin zauren farat-farat ke samar da tsari wanda aka samu daga gano, kuma takardun takardun da aka zãɓe su tsattsãge, kuma masu tambayar da aka nuna wa masu jibar da farat ɗaya kan matsayin na farko.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྩ་བསྐྲད་ཐུབ་དང་འདེམས་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ཐོག་ལས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཐོག་གི་གླེང་མོལ་ལྟ་ཀློག་པ This virtual dialog content is provided in the form of answers derived from the found and selected documents split into fragments, and questions that are automatically generated for these answers based on the initial text.'}
{'en': 'Assessing socioeconomic status of Twitter users : A survey', 'pt': 'Avaliando o status socioeconômico dos usuários do Twitter: uma pesquisa', 'es': 'Evaluación del estado socioeconómico de los usuarios de Twitter: una encuesta', 'ar': 'تقييم الحالة الاجتماعية والاقتصادية لمستخدمي تويتر: مسح', 'fr': 'Évaluation du statut socio-économique des utilisateurs de Twitter\xa0: une enquête', 'zh': '评估Twitter用户世经济状:一勘', 'ja': 'Twitterユーザーの社会経済状況の評価：アンケート', 'hi': 'चहचहाना उपयोगकर्ताओं की सामाजिक आर्थिक स्थिति का आकलन: एक सर्वेक्षण', 'ru': 'Оценка социально-экономического статуса пользователей Twitter: опрос', 'ga': 'Stádas socheacnamaíoch úsáideoirí Twitter a mheas: Suirbhé', 'ka': 'Twitter მომხმარების საზოგადო კონომიკური სტატისტატის შესახებ: შესახებ', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση της κοινωνικοοικονομικής κατάστασης των χρηστών του Twitter: Μια έρευνα', 'hu': 'A Twitter felhasználók társadalmi-gazdasági helyzetének felmérése: felmérés', 'it': 'Valutazione dello stato socioeconomico degli utenti di Twitter: un sondaggio', 'kk': 'Твиттер пайдаланушыларының жалпы экономикалық күйін оқу: Сұрақ', 'mk': 'Оценувањето на социоекономскиот статус на корисниците на Твитер: истражување', 'lt': 'Twitter naudotojų socialinės ir ekonominės būklės vertinimas: apklausa', 'ms': 'Assessing socioeconomic status of Twitter users: A survey', 'ml': 'ടൂട്ടര്\u200d ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ സാമൂഹിക സ്ഥിതി: ഒരു പരിശോധന', 'mt': 'Valutazzjoni tal-istatus soċjoekonomiku tal-utenti ta’ Twitter: Stħarriġ', 'mn': 'Твиттерийн хэрэглэгчийн нийгмийн эдийн засгийн байдлыг үнэлэх:', 'no': 'Å vurdere sosial-økonomisk status av Twitter-brukarar: A survey', 'pl': 'Ocena statusu społeczno-ekonomicznego użytkowników Twittera: ankieta', 'ro': 'Evaluarea statutului socio-economic al utilizatorilor Twitter: Un sondaj', 'sr': 'Procjenjivanje socioekonomičkog statusa korisnika Twitter: istraživanje', 'si': 'Twitter ප්\u200dරයෝජකයන්ගේ සාමාජික සමාජික ස්ථිතිය අවශ්\u200dයය: A search', 'so': 'Qiimeynta sharciga bulshada ee isticmaalayaasha Twitter:', 'sv': 'Bedömning av Twitter-användares socioekonomiska status: En undersökning', 'ta': 'Twitter பயனர்களின் சமூகமான நிலை: ஒரு பரிசோதனை', 'ur': 'ٹویٹر کارساز کے اجتماعی اقتصادی موقعیت کا تحقیق کرتا ہے: ایک تحقیق', 'uz': 'Twitterdan foydalanuvchilarning jamiyatik holatini tasavvur qilish:', 'vi': 'Đánh giá địa vị xã hội của người dùng Twitter: A khảo sát', 'bg': 'Оценка на социално-икономическия статус на потребителите на Туитър: проучване', 'da': 'Vurdering af Twitter-brugernes socioøkonomiske status: En undersøgelse', 'nl': 'Evaluatie van de sociaaleconomische status van Twitter-gebruikers: een enquête', 'hr': 'Procjenjivanje socioekonomičkog statusa korisnika Twitter-a: istraživanje', 'de': 'Bewertung des sozioökonomischen Status von Twitter-Nutzern: Eine Umfrage', 'ko': '트위터 사용자의 사회적 경제적 지위 평가: 조사', 'id': 'Mengevaluasi status sosioekonomi pengguna Twitter: Survei', 'sw': 'Kushuhudia hali ya kijamii ya watumiaji wa Twita: Utafiti', 'fa': 'ارزیابی وضعیت اجتماعی اقتصادی کاربران توئیتر: یک تحقیق', 'af': 'Assessering sosiale-ekonomiese status van Twitter-gebruikers: √¢¬Ä¬ôn ondersoek', 'tr': 'Twitter Ullançylaryň sosyal-ekonomik durumyny barlamak:', 'am': 'የTwitter ተጠቃሚዎች ማኅበራዊ ስህተት: ምርመራ', 'hy': 'Թվիթերի օգտագործողների սոցիոտնտեսական կարգավիճակի գնահատումը. հետազոտություն', 'az': 'Twitter istifad톛칞il톛rinin sosial ekonomik stat칲s칲n칲 t톛sdiql톛yici:', 'sq': 'Vlerësimi i statusit socioekonomik të përdoruesve të Twitterit: Një sondazh', 'bn': 'Assessing socioeconomic status of Twitter users: A survey', 'bs': 'Procjenjivanje socioekonomičkog statusa korisnika Twitter-a: istraživanje', 'ca': "Evaluació de l'estatus socioeconòmic dels usuaris de Twitter: Una encuesta", 'cs': 'Hodnocení socioekonomického stavu uživatelů Twitteru: průzkum', 'et': 'Twitteri kasutajate sotsiaalmajandusliku staatuse hindamine: uuring', 'fi': 'Twitterin käyttäjien sosioekonomisen aseman arviointi: Kysely', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah durung soko-konomik lan gambar Tutter: Ndheke', 'ha': 'Kunna aikin jamii', 'sk': 'Ocena socialno-ekonomskega položaja uporabnikov Twitterja: anketa', 'he': 'הערכה של המצב הסוציוכלי של משתמשים בטוויטר: סקר', 'bo': 'ཌིས་ཌིར་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'Every day, the emotion and opinion of different people across the world are reflected in the form of short messages using microblogging platforms. Despite the existence of enormous potential introduced by this data source, the Twitter community is still ambiguous and is not fully explored yet. While there are a huge number of studies examining the possibilities of inferring gender and age, there exist hardly researches on socioeconomic status (SES) inference of Twitter users. As socioeconomic status is essential to treating diverse questions linked to human behavior in several fields (sociology, demography, public health, etc.), we conducted a comprehensive literature review of SES studies, inference methods, and metrics. With reference to the research on literature’s results, we came to outline the most critical challenges for researchers. To the best of our knowledge, this paper is the first review that introduces the different aspects of SES inference. Indeed, this article provides the benefits for practitioners who aim to process and explore Twitter SES inference.', 'ar': 'كل يوم ، تنعكس مشاعر وآراء مختلف الأشخاص في جميع أنحاء العالم في شكل رسائل قصيرة باستخدام منصات المدونات الصغيرة. على الرغم من وجود إمكانات هائلة قدمها مصدر البيانات هذا ، لا يزال مجتمع Twitter غامضًا ولم يتم استكشافه بالكامل بعد. في حين أن هناك عددًا كبيرًا من الدراسات التي تبحث في احتمالات استنتاج الجنس والعمر ، لا تكاد توجد أبحاث حول استدلال الحالة الاجتماعية والاقتصادية (SES) لمستخدمي تويتر. نظرًا لأن الحالة الاجتماعية والاقتصادية ضرورية لمعالجة الأسئلة المتنوعة المرتبطة بالسلوك البشري في العديد من المجالات (علم الاجتماع ، والديموغرافيا ، والصحة العامة ، وما إلى ذلك) ، فقد أجرينا مراجعة شاملة للأدبيات لدراسات SES وطرق الاستدلال والمقاييس. بالإشارة إلى البحث حول نتائج الأدبيات ، توصلنا إلى تحديد أهم التحديات التي يواجهها الباحثون. على حد علمنا ، هذه الورقة هي المراجعة الأولى التي تقدم الجوانب المختلفة لاستدلال SES. في الواقع ، توفر هذه المقالة الفوائد للممارسين الذين يهدفون إلى معالجة واستكشاف استنتاج Twitter SES.', 'pt': 'Todos os dias, a emoção e a opinião de diferentes pessoas em todo o mundo são refletidas na forma de mensagens curtas usando plataformas de microblogging. Apesar da existência de um enorme potencial introduzido por esta fonte de dados, a comunidade Twitter ainda é ambígua e ainda não totalmente explorada. Embora haja um grande número de estudos examinando as possibilidades de inferir gênero e idade, existem poucas pesquisas sobre inferência de status socioeconômico (SES) de usuários do Twitter. Como o status socioeconômico é essencial para tratar diversas questões ligadas ao comportamento humano em vários campos (sociologia, demografia, saúde pública, etc.), realizamos uma revisão abrangente da literatura de estudos SES, métodos de inferência e métricas. Com referência à pesquisa dos resultados da literatura, viemos delinear os desafios mais críticos para os pesquisadores. Até onde sabemos, este artigo é a primeira revisão que apresenta os diferentes aspectos da inferência SES. De fato, este artigo fornece os benefícios para os profissionais que pretendem processar e explorar a inferência do Twitter SES.', 'fr': "Chaque jour, l'émotion et l'opinion de différentes personnes à travers le monde se reflètent sous forme de courts messages utilisant des plateformes de microblogging. Malgré l'existence d'un énorme potentiel introduit par cette source de données, la communauté Twitter reste ambiguë et n'est pas encore totalement explorée. Bien qu'il existe un grand nombre d'études examinant les possibilités de déduire le sexe et l'âge, il existe peu de recherches sur l'inférence du statut socio-économique (SSE) des utilisateurs de Twitter. Comme le statut socio-économique est essentiel pour traiter diverses questions liées au comportement humain dans plusieurs domaines (sociologie, démographie, santé publique, etc.), nous avons mené une revue complète de la littérature sur les études sur le SSE, les méthodes d'inférence et les métriques. En ce qui concerne les résultats de la recherche sur les résultats de la littérature, nous en sommes venus à souligner les défis les plus critiques pour les chercheurs. À notre connaissance, cet article est la première revue qui présente les différents aspects de l'inférence SSE. En effet, cet article fournit les avantages aux praticiens qui souhaitent traiter et explorer l'inférence Twitter SES.", 'es': 'Todos los días, la emoción y la opinión de diferentes personas de todo el mundo se reflejan en forma de mensajes cortos que utilizan plataformas de microblogging. A pesar de la existencia de un enorme potencial introducido por esta fuente de datos, la comunidad de Twitter sigue siendo ambigua y aún no se ha explorado completamente. Si bien hay un gran número de estudios que examinan las posibilidades de inferir el género y la edad, apenas existen investigaciones sobre la inferencia del estatus socioeconómico (SES) de los usuarios de Twitter. Como el nivel socioeconómico es esencial para tratar diversas cuestiones relacionadas con el comportamiento humano en varios campos (sociología, demografía, salud pública, etc.), realizamos una revisión exhaustiva de la literatura de estudios, métodos de inferencia y métricas de SES. Con referencia a la investigación sobre los resultados de la literatura, llegamos a describir los desafíos más críticos para los investigadores. Hasta donde sabemos, este artículo es la primera revisión que presenta los diferentes aspectos de la inferencia de SES. De hecho, este artículo proporciona los beneficios para los profesionales que pretenden procesar y explorar la inferencia de SES de Twitter.', 'ja': '毎日、世界中のさまざまな人々の感情と意見は、マイクロブログプラットフォームを使用した短いメッセージの形で反映されます。 このデータソースによって導入された巨大な可能性が存在するにもかかわらず、Twitterコミュニティはまだ曖昧であり、まだ完全には探求されていません。 性別と年齢を推論する可能性を検討する研究は膨大であるが、Twitterユーザーの社会経済的地位（ SES ）推論に関する研究はほとんど存在しない。 社会経済的地位は、いくつかの分野（社会学、人口学、公衆衛生学など）で人間の行動に関連する多様な問題を扱うために不可欠であるため、SES研究、推論方法、および指標の包括的な文献レビューを実施した。 文献の結果に関する研究を参考に、研究者にとって最も重要な課題を概説した。 私たちの知る限りでは、本稿はSES推論のさまざまな側面を紹介した最初のレビューです。 実際、この記事では、Twitter SESの推論を処理し、探求することを目指す実践者にメリットを提供しています。', 'zh': '每日,世界各地异人情义,皆以微博台短消息言之。 此数据源虽有巨浸,Twitter社区犹依违,未得穷索。 虽多所讨论推断性别及年齿之可能,殆无Twitter用户世(SES)推之。 盖地位于数域(社会学,人民统计学,公共卫生等)治与人行相关者至重,故究之于SES,推术指标综述之。 参之文献,概述之至要。 以吾所知,本文第一SES推理异论。 事实,本文为旨在理探Twitter SES推理之从业者为利。', 'hi': 'हर दिन, दुनिया भर में विभिन्न लोगों की भावना और राय माइक्रोब्लॉगिंग प्लेटफार्मों का उपयोग करके छोटे संदेशों के रूप में परिलक्षित होती है। इस डेटा स्रोत द्वारा पेश की गई विशाल क्षमता के अस्तित्व के बावजूद, ट्विटर समुदाय अभी भी अस्पष्ट है और अभी तक पूरी तरह से पता नहीं लगाया गया है। जबकि लिंग और उम्र का अनुमान लगाने की संभावनाओं की जांच करने वाले बड़ी संख्या में अध्ययन हैं, ट्विटर उपयोगकर्ताओं की सामाजिक आर्थिक स्थिति (एसईएस) अनुमान पर शायद ही कभी शोध मौजूद हैं। चूंकि सामाजिक आर्थिक स्थिति कई क्षेत्रों (समाजशास्त्र, जनसांख्यिकी, सार्वजनिक स्वास्थ्य, आदि) में मानव व्यवहार से जुड़े विभिन्न प्रश्नों के इलाज के लिए आवश्यक है, इसलिए हमने एसईएस अध्ययन, अनुमान विधियों और मीट्रिक की एक व्यापक साहित्य समीक्षा की। साहित्य के परिणामों पर शोध के संदर्भ में, हम शोधकर्ताओं के लिए सबसे महत्वपूर्ण चुनौतियों को रेखांकित करने के लिए आए थे। हमारे ज्ञान का सबसे अच्छा करने के लिए, यह पेपर पहली समीक्षा है जो एसईएस अनुमान के विभिन्न पहलुओं का परिचय देती है। दरअसल, यह लेख उन चिकित्सकों के लिए लाभ प्रदान करता है जो ट्विटर एसईएस अनुमान को संसाधित करने और उनका पता लगाने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं।', 'ru': 'Каждый день эмоции и мнения разных людей по всему миру отражаются в виде коротких сообщений с использованием платформ микроблогов. Несмотря на существование огромного потенциала, создаваемого этим источником данных, сообщество Twitter все еще является неоднозначным и еще не полностью изучено. Хотя существует огромное число исследований, изучающих возможности установления пола и возраста, практически не существует исследований социально-экономического статуса (СЭС) пользователей Twitter. Поскольку социально-экономический статус необходим для решения различных вопросов, связанных с поведением человека в нескольких областях (социология, демография, общественное здравоохранение и т.д.), мы провели всесторонний обзор литературы по исследованиям SES, методам вывода и метрикам. Ссылаясь на исследования по результатам литературы, мы пришли, чтобы наметить наиболее критические задачи для исследователей. Насколько нам известно, этот документ является первым обзором, в котором представлены различные аспекты вывода SES. Действительно, эта статья предоставляет преимущества для практиков, которые стремятся обрабатывать и исследовать вывод Twitter SES.', 'ga': 'Gach lá, léirítear mothúcháin agus tuairimí daoine éagsúla ar fud an domhain i bhfoirm teachtaireachtaí gearra ag baint úsáide as ardáin mhicrabhálaíochta. In ainneoin go bhfuil acmhainneacht ollmhór tugtha isteach ag an bhfoinse sonraí seo, tá pobal Twitter fós débhríoch agus níl sé á iniúchadh go hiomlán fós. Cé go bhfuil líon mór staidéar a scrúdaíonn na féidearthachtaí a bhaineann le tátal a bhaint as inscne agus aois, is ar éigean go bhfuil taighde déanta ar stádas socheacnamaíoch (SES) úsáideoirí Twitter. Toisc go bhfuil stádas socheacnamaíoch riachtanach chun déileáil le ceisteanna éagsúla a bhaineann le hiompar daonna i réimsí éagsúla (socheolaíocht, déimeagrafaíocht, sláinte an phobail, etc.), rinneamar athbhreithniú cuimsitheach litríochta ar staidéir SES, modhanna tátail, agus méadracht. Ag tagairt don taighde ar thorthaí na litríochta, thángamar ar na dúshláin is tábhachtaí do thaighdeoirí a leagan amach. Chomh fada agus is eol dúinn, is é an páipéar seo an chéad athbhreithniú a thugann isteach na gnéithe éagsúla de thátal SES. Go deimhin, soláthraíonn an t-alt seo na buntáistí do chleachtóirí a bhfuil sé mar aidhm acu tátal SES Twitter a phróiseáil agus a iniúchadh.', 'ka': 'ყოველ დღე, განსხვავებული ადამიანების ემოცია და აღმოჩენება მსოფლიოში გამოყენებული კონტაქტის ფორმაში გამოყენებული მიკრობლოგური პლატატურები. ამ მონაცემების გამოყენებული ძალიან პოტენციალური პოტენციალის არსებობისთვის, Twitter-ის საზოგადოება უკვე არსებობს და არსებობს უკვე განსხვავებული. თუმცა რამდენიმე კვლევები არსებობს, რომლებიც გენექცია და ასაკის შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობა, რამდენიმე სოციო-კონომიკური სტატისტატისტატისტატისტატი რადგან საზოგადო კონომიკური სტატისთვის მნიშვნელოვანია განსხვავებული კითხვების შესახებ, რომლებიც ადამიანის ქცევაზე (სოციოლოგია, დემოგრაფია, საზოგადო ჯანმრთელობა, და. შ.), ჩვენ ვაკეთეთ ლიტერტურის შედეგების განსხვავებაზე, ჩვენ მივიღეთ ყველაზე კრიტიკური გამოცდილებების განსხვავებას. ჩვენი უკეთესი მეცნიერებისთვის, ეს წიგნი არის პირველი განახლება, რომელიც SES ინფრენციის განსხვავებული აპექტიკების შესახებ. ნამდვილად, ეს პრაქტიკის გამოიყენება პრაქტიკონტერებისთვის, რომელიც მინდომარებული Twitter SES ინფრენციის პროცესი და განსხვავება.', 'el': 'Κάθε μέρα, το συναίσθημα και η γνώμη διαφορετικών ανθρώπων σε όλο τον κόσμο αντανακλώνται με τη μορφή σύντομων μηνυμάτων χρησιμοποιώντας πλατφόρμες μικροblogging. Παρά την ύπαρξη τεράστιων δυνατοτήτων που εισάγει αυτή η πηγή δεδομένων, η κοινότητα του Twitter εξακολουθεί να είναι διφορούμενη και δεν έχει διερευνηθεί πλήρως ακόμα. Ενώ υπάρχει ένας τεράστιος αριθμός μελετών που εξετάζουν τις δυνατότητες συναπόφασης φύλου και ηλικίας, υπάρχουν ελάχιστες έρευνες σχετικά με το συμπέρασμα της κοινωνικοοικονομικής κατάστασης (SES) των χρηστών του Twitter. Δεδομένου ότι η κοινωνικοοικονομική κατάσταση είναι απαραίτητη για την αντιμετώπιση ποικίλων ζητημάτων που συνδέονται με την ανθρώπινη συμπεριφορά σε διάφορους τομείς (κοινωνιολογία, δημογραφία, δημόσια υγεία κ.λπ.), πραγματοποιήσαμε μια ολοκληρωμένη βιβλιογραφική ανασκόπηση μελετών SES, μεθόδων συμπερασμάτων και μετρήσεων. Αναφορικά με την έρευνα των αποτελεσμάτων της βιβλιογραφίας, ήρθαμε να περιγράψουμε τις πιο κρίσιμες προκλήσεις για τους ερευνητές. Από ό,τι γνωρίζουμε, η παρούσα εργασία είναι η πρώτη ανασκόπηση που εισάγει τις διαφορετικές πτυχές της συμπερασμάτων SES. Πράγματι, αυτό το άρθρο παρέχει τα οφέλη για τους επαγγελματίες που επιδιώκουν να επεξεργαστούν και να διερευνήσουν τα συμπεράσματα του SES στο Twitter.', 'hu': 'Minden nap a világ különböző embereinek érzelmei és véleménye tükröződik rövid üzenetek formájában mikroblogolási platformokon keresztül. Annak ellenére, hogy ez az adatforrás hatalmas potenciállal rendelkezik, a Twitter közösség még mindig kétértelmű és még nem fedezi fel teljesen. Bár rengeteg tanulmány vizsgálja a nem és életkor következtetésének lehetőségeit, alig léteznek kutatások a Twitter felhasználók társadalmi-gazdasági státuszának (SES) következtetéséről. Mivel a társadalmi-gazdasági státusz elengedhetetlen az emberi viselkedéshez kapcsolódó különböző kérdések kezeléséhez számos területen (szociológia, demográfia, közegészségügy stb.), átfogó irodalmi áttekintést végeztünk a SES tanulmányokról, következtetési módszerekről és mutatókról. Az irodalmi eredmények kutatásával a kutatók számára legkritikusabb kihívásokat vázoltuk fel. Legjobb tudásunk szerint ez a tanulmány az első áttekintés, amely bemutatja a SES következtetésének különböző aspektusait. Ez a cikk valójában előnyöket biztosít azoknak a gyakorlóknak, akik a Twitter SES következtetéseinek feldolgozására és feltárására törekszenek.', 'it': "Ogni giorno, l'emozione e l'opinione di diverse persone in tutto il mondo si riflettono sotto forma di brevi messaggi utilizzando piattaforme di microblogging. Nonostante l'esistenza di un enorme potenziale introdotto da questa fonte di dati, la community di Twitter è ancora ambigua e non è ancora pienamente esplorata. Mentre ci sono un gran numero di studi che esaminano le possibilità di dedurre sesso ed età, non esistono ricerche sull'inferenza dello status socioeconomico (SES) degli utenti di Twitter. Poiché lo status socioeconomico è essenziale per trattare diverse questioni legate al comportamento umano in diversi campi (sociologia, demografia, salute pubblica, ecc.), abbiamo condotto una revisione completa della letteratura degli studi SES, dei metodi di inferenza e delle metriche. Con riferimento alla ricerca sui risultati della letteratura, siamo venuti a delineare le sfide più critiche per i ricercatori. Per quanto ci risulta, questo articolo è la prima revisione che introduce i diversi aspetti dell'inferenza SES. In effetti, questo articolo fornisce i vantaggi per i professionisti che intendono elaborare ed esplorare l'inferenza di Twitter SES.", 'lt': 'Every day, the emotion and opinion of different people across the world are reflected in the form of short messages using microblogging platforms.  Nepaisant didžiulio šio duomenų šaltinio potencialo, Twitter bendruomenvis dar dviprasmiška ir dar nėra visapusiškai ištirta. Nors yra daug tyrimų, kuriuose nagrinėjamos galimybės daryti išvadas dėl lyties ir amžiaus, beveik nėra mokslinių tyrimų dėl Twitter naudotojų socialinės ir ekonominės būklės (SES). Kadangi socialinis ir ekonominis statusas yra labai svarbus sprendžiant įvairius klausimus, susijusius su žmogaus elgesiu keliose srityse (sociologija, demografija, visuomenės sveikata ir t. t.), atlikome išsamią SES tyrimų, išvadų metodų ir metrinių duomenų literatūros apžvalgą. Kalbant apie literatūros rezultatų mokslinius tyrimus, atėjome apibūdinti svarbiausius mokslininkų uždavinius. Geriausiai žinome, kad šis dokumentas yra pirmoji peržiūra, kurioje pateikiami skirtingi SES išvados aspektai. Iš tiesų šiame straipsnyje teikiama nauda specialistams, kurie siekia apdoroti ir išnagrinėti Twitter SES išvadas.', 'kk': 'Әрбір күнде әлемдегі әртүрлі адамдардың емоциялары мен ойлары микроблог платформаларын қолданатын қысқа хаттардың түрінде көрсетіледі. Бұл деректер көзінен келтірілген көп мүмкіндіктер бар болса да, Твиттердің көзі әлі білмейді және әлі толық зерттелмейді. Бірақ бірнеше зерттеулері гендерді және жастарын бақылау мүмкіндігін тексергенде, Twitter пайдаланушыларының социологиялық экономикалық күйін (SES) бақылау мүмкіндігін зерттеулері бар. Социология, демография, жалпы саулық және метрикалық зерттеулерге қатынаған әртүрлі сұрақтарды қалау үшін көпшілік экономикалық күй- жай күй- жай күй- жай күй- жай күй- жай күй- жай күй- жай жә Әдебиеттің нәтижелері туралы зерттеулерге сәйкес келеді, біз зерттеулердің ең маңызды мәселелерін таңдау үшін келдік. Біздің біліміміздің ең жақсы түсініктерімізге, бұл қағаз бірінші қарау - SES бақылауының түрлі аспектерін көрсетеді. Шынымен, бұл мақала Твиттердің SES бағдарламасын өзгерту және зерттеу үшін жұмыс істейтін профессионалдар үшін ашықтарын береді.', 'mk': '小械泻芯褬 写械薪 械屑芯褑懈懈褌械 懈 屑懈褋谢械褮械褌芯 薪邪 褉邪蟹谢懈褔薪懈褌械 谢褍褤械 薪懈蟹 褑械谢懈芯褌 褋胁械褌 褋械 褉械褎谢械泻褌懈褉邪邪褌 胁芯 褎芯褉屑邪 薪邪 泻褉邪褌泻懈 锌芯褉邪泻懈 泻芯褉懈褋褌械褬褱懈 屑懈泻褉芯斜谢芯谐芯胁懈 锌谢邪褌褎芯褉屑懈. 袠 锌芯泻褉邪褬 锌芯褋褌芯械褮械褌芯 薪邪 芯谐褉芯屑械薪 锌芯褌械薪褑懈褬邪谢 胁芯胁械写械薪 芯写 芯胁芯褬 懈蟹胁芯褉 薪邪 锌芯写邪褌芯褑懈, 孝胁懈褌械褉 蟹邪械写薪懈褑邪褌邪 械 褋茅 褍褕褌械 薪械褬邪褋薪邪 懈 褋茅 褍褕褌械 薪械 械 褑械谢芯褋薪芯 懈褋褌褉邪卸械薪邪. 袠邪泻芯 锌芯褋褌芯褬邪褌 芯谐褉芯屑薪懈 褋褌褍写懈懈 泻芯懈 谐懈 懈褋锌懈褌褍胁邪邪褌 屑芯卸薪芯褋褌懈褌械 蟹邪 蟹邪泻谢褍褔褍胁邪褮械 薪邪 锌芯谢芯褌 懈 胁芯蟹褉邪褋褌, 械写胁邪褬 锌芯褋褌芯褬邪褌 懈褋褌褉邪卸褍胁邪褮邪 蟹邪 褋芯褑懈芯械泻芯薪芯屑褋泻懈芯褌 褋褌邪褌褍褋 (小袝小) 薪邪 泻芯褉懈褋薪懈褑懈褌械 薪邪 孝胁懈褌械褉. 袘懈写械褬褱懈 褋芯褑懈芯械泻芯薪芯屑褋泻懈芯褌 褋褌邪褌褍褋 械 褋褍褕褌懈薪褋泻懈 蟹邪 褌褉械褌懈褉邪褮械 薪邪 褉邪蟹谢懈褔薪懈 锌褉邪褕邪褮邪 锌芯胁褉蟹邪薪懈 褋芯 褔芯胁械褔泻芯褌芯 芯写薪械褋褍胁邪褮械 胁芯 薪械泻芯谢泻褍 芯斜谢邪褋褌懈 (褋芯褑懈芯谢芯谐懈褬邪, 写械屑芯谐褉邪褎懈褬邪, 褬邪胁薪芯 蟹写褉邪胁褬械 懈褌薪.), 褋锌褉芯胁械写芯胁屑械 褋械芯锌褎邪褌械薪 锌褉械谐谢械写 薪邪 谢懈褌械褉邪褌褍褉邪褌邪 薪邪 褋褌褍写懈懈褌械 薪邪 小袝小, 屑械褌芯写懈褌械 薪邪 懈薪褎械褉械薪褑懈褬邪 小芯 芯写薪芯褋 薪邪 懈褋褌褉邪卸褍胁邪褮械褌芯 蟹邪 褉械蟹褍谢褌邪褌懈褌械 薪邪 谢懈褌械褉邪褌褍褉邪褌邪, 写芯褬写芯胁屑械 写邪 谐懈 芯锌懈褕械屑械 薪邪褬泻褉懈褌懈褔薪懈褌械 锌褉械写懈蟹胁懈褑懈 蟹邪 懈褋褌褉邪卸褍胁邪褔懈褌械. 小锌芯褉械写 薪邪褕械褌芯 蟹薪邪械褮械, 芯胁芯褬 写芯泻褍屑械薪褌 械 锌褉胁懈芯褌 锌褉械谐谢械写 泻芯褬 谐懈 胁芯胁械写褍胁邪 褉邪蟹谢懈褔薪懈褌械 邪褋锌械泻褌懈 薪邪 小袝小 泻芯薪褎械褉械薪褑懈褬邪褌邪. 袧邪胁懈褋褌懈薪邪, 芯胁邪邪 褋褌邪褌懈褬邪 芯斜械蟹斜械写褍胁邪 斜械薪械褎懈褑懈懈 蟹邪 锌褉邪泻褌懈褔邪褉懈褌械 泻芯懈 懈屑邪邪褌 蟹邪 褑械谢 锌褉芯褑械褋懈褉邪褮械 懈 懈褋褌褉邪卸褍胁邪褮械 薪邪 蟹邪泻谢褍褔芯褑懈褌械 薪邪 孝胁懈褌械褉 小袝小.', 'ms': 'Setiap hari, emosi dan pendapat orang-orang yang berbeza di seluruh dunia diperlihatkan dalam bentuk mesej pendek menggunakan platform mikroblog. Walaupun terdapat potensi besar yang diperkenalkan oleh sumber data ini, komuniti Twitter masih ambiguh dan belum sepenuhnya dieksplorasi lagi. Walaupun terdapat bilangan besar kajian yang memeriksa kemungkinan untuk menyimpulkan jenis dan usia, hampir tidak ada kajian tentang status sosioekonomi (SES) kesimpulan pengguna Twitter. Sebagai status sosioekonomi penting untuk merawat soalan berbeza yang berhubungan dengan perilaku manusia dalam beberapa bidang (sosiologi, demografi, kesehatan awam, dll.), kami melakukan kajian literatur yang meliputi kajian SES, kaedah kesimpulan, dan metrik. Dengan rujukan kepada kajian mengenai hasil literatur, kami datang untuk menggambarkan cabaran yang paling kritikal bagi peneliti. Menurut pengetahuan kita, kertas ini adalah ulasan pertama yang memperkenalkan aspek yang berbeza dari kesimpulan SES. Sebenarnya, artikel ini memberikan keuntungan bagi orang-orang yang bermaksud memproses dan mengeksplorasi kesimpulan SES Twitter.', 'mt': "Kull jum, l-emozzjoni u l-opinjoni ta’ nies differenti madwar id-dinja huma riflessi fil-forma ta’ messaġġi qosra bl-użu ta’ pjattaformi ta’ mikroblogging. Minkejja l-eżistenza ta’ potenzjal enormi introdott minn dan is-sors ta’ dejta, il-komunità ta’ Twitter għadha ambigwa u għadha mhijiex esplorata bis-sħiħ. Filwaqt li hemm għadd kbir ta’ studji li jeżaminaw il-possibbiltajiet li jiġu inferiti s-sessi u l-età, ma jeżistux riċerki dwar l-inferenza tal-istatus soċjoekonomiku (SES) tal-utenti ta’ Twitter. Billi l-istatus soċjoekonomiku huwa essenzjali għat-trattament ta’ kwistjonijiet varji marbuta mal-imġiba tal-bniedem f’diversi oqsma (soċjoloġija, demografija, saħħa pubblika, eċċ.), għamilna reviżjoni komprensiva tal-letteratura tal-istudji SES, metodi ta’ inferenza, u metriċi. B'referenza għar-riċerka dwar ir-riżultati tal-letteratura, waslna biex inħarsu lejn l-isfidi l-aktar kritiċi għar-riċerkaturi. Għall-aħjar għarfien tagħna, dan id-dokument huwa l-ewwel reviżjoni li tintroduċi l-aspetti differenti tal-inferenza tas-SES. Tabilħaqq, dan l-artikolu jipprovdi l-benefiċċji għall-prattikanti li jimmiraw li jipproċessaw u jesploraw l-inferenza tal-SES Twitter.", 'ml': 'എല്ലാ ദിവസവും ലോകത്തുമുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത ആളുകളുടെ വികാരങ്ങളും വിചാരണകളും മൈക്രോബ്ലോഗിങ്ങ് പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച ഈ ഡേറ്റാ സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു വലിയ സാധ്യതയുണ്ടെങ്കിലും തീര്\u200dച്ചയായും ടൂട്ടര്\u200d സമൂഹത്തിന്  പുരുഷനെയും വയസ്സിനെയും ആക്രമിപ്പിക്കാനുള്ള സാധ്യതകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d, ട്രൂട്ടര്\u200d ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ സ കുറേ പ്രദേശങ്ങളില്\u200d മനുഷ്യസ്വഭാവങ്ങളുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്ന പല ചോദ്യങ്ങളെയും പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d സോഷ്യലോജ്യം, ജനോഗ്രാഫ്റ്റി, എല്ലാവര്\u200dക്കും സെഎസ് പഠനത്തി സാഹിത്യത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള പരിശോധനത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും മികച്ചത്തില്\u200d ഈ പേപ്പ് ആദ്യത്തെ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതാണ് സെഎസ് അപകടത്തിന്റെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭ തീര്\u200dച്ചയായും, ഈ ലേഖനത്തില്\u200d ടൂട്ടര്\u200d സെസിന്\u200dറെ അപകടത്തെ പരിശോധിക്കുവാനും ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്ന പരിശീലകന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്', 'no': 'Kvar dag vert emosjonen og tanken av ulike menneske over verden reflektert i form av korte meldingar med mikrobloggplattformer. Til tross at det finst enorme potensial som er introdusert av denne datakjelden, er Twitter-samfunnet fortsatt utvikla og ikkje fullstendig utforska enno. Selv om det finst mange studier som undersøker muligheten for å få opp seks og alder, finst det vanskeleg forsøk på sosial-økonomisk status (SES) infeksjon av Twitter-brukarar. Som sosiale økonomiske status er viktig for å behandla ulike spørsmål knytta til menneskelige oppførsel i fleire område (sosialogi, demografi, offentlige helse osv.), gjev vi ei komplett undersøking av litteratur om SES-studier, infeksjonsmetoder og metrikar. Med referanse til forskningen om literaturen sin resultat, kom vi til å utforme dei mest kritiske utfordringane for forskere. Dette papiret er den første gjennomgang som introduserer dei ulike aspektane i SES-infeksjonen. Dette artikkelen tilbyr faktisk fordelene for praktiserane som mål å handsama og utforska Twitter-SES-infeksjon.', 'mn': 'Өдөр бүр дэлхий даяар олон хүмүүсийн сэтгэл хөдлөл, санаа бодол нь микроблог платформуудыг ашиглан богино захирагддаг. Энэ мэдээллийн эх үүсвэр танилцуулсан маш олон потенциал байдал ч гэсэн, Твиттерийн нийгэм хэзээ ч хэзээ ч хамаагүй бөгөөд хэзээ ч бүрэн судалгаагүй. Хэдийгээр олон судалгаанууд нь гендер болон нас хүртэл халдварлах боломжуудыг судалж байдаг ч Twitter хэрэглэгчийн нийгмийн эдийн засгийн байдал (SES) тухай судалгаа хэцүү байдаг. Нийгмийн эдийн засгийн байдал нь олон талаар хүн төрөлхтний үйлдэлтэй холбоотой олон асуултуудыг эмчилгэхэд чухал болсон учраас бид SES судалгааны, халдварын арга, метрик судалгааны бүрэн зохиолын шинжилгээ хийсэн. Учир зохиолын үр дүний судалгаагаар бид судлаачидын хамгийн чухал сорилтуудыг тайлбарлаж ирсэн. Хамгийн сайн мэдлэгтэй нь, энэ цаас бол SES-ын халдварын өөр өөр асуудлыг харуулдаг анхны шинжилгээ юм. Үнэндээ энэ бичлэг нь Твиттерийн SES халдварыг судлах зорилготой мэргэжилтнүүдэд ашиг өгдөг.', 'pl': 'Codziennie emocje i opinie różnych ludzi na całym świecie znajdują odzwierciedlenie w postaci krótkich wiadomości za pomocą platform mikroblogowych. Pomimo istnienia ogromnego potencjału wprowadzonego przez to źródło danych, społeczność Twittera nadal jest niejednoznaczna i nie jest jeszcze w pełni zbadana. Chociaż istnieje ogromna liczba badań badających możliwości wnioskowania płci i wieku, nie istnieją prawie badania dotyczące wnioskowania statusu społeczno-ekonomicznego (SES) użytkowników Twittera. Ponieważ status społeczno-społeczny jest niezbędny do rozpatrywania różnorodnych pytań związanych z zachowaniem człowieka w kilku dziedzinach (socjologia, demografia, zdrowie publiczne itp.), przeprowadziliśmy kompleksowy przegląd literatury badań SES, metod wnioskowania i wskaźników. W odniesieniu do badań nad wynikami literatury przyszliśmy zarysować najbardziej krytyczne wyzwania dla naukowców. Z naszej najlepszej wiedzy niniejszy artykuł jest pierwszym przeglądem, który wprowadza różne aspekty wnioskowania SES. W rzeczywistości artykuł ten zapewnia korzyści dla praktyków, którzy dążą do przetwarzania i badania wniosków SES Twittera.', 'ro': 'În fiecare zi, emoțiile și opinia diferitelor persoane din întreaga lume se reflectă sub forma unor mesaje scurte folosind platforme de microblogging. În ciuda existenței unui potențial enorm introdus de această sursă de date, comunitatea Twitter este încă ambiguă și nu este explorată pe deplin încă. Deși există un număr mare de studii care examinează posibilitățile de deducere a sexului și vârstei, nu există cercetări despre inferența statutului socioeconomic (SES) a utilizatorilor Twitter. Deoarece statutul socio-economic este esențial pentru tratarea diverselor întrebări legate de comportamentul uman în mai multe domenii (sociologie, demografie, sănătate publică etc.), am efectuat o analiză cuprinzătoare a literaturii de specialitate a studiilor SES, metodelor de inferență și metricilor. Cu referire la cercetarea rezultatelor literaturii, am ajuns să conturăm cele mai critice provocări pentru cercetători. Din câte știm, această lucrare este prima revizuire care introduce diferitele aspecte ale inferenței SES. Într-adevăr, acest articol oferă beneficiile practicienilor care urmăresc să proceseze și să exploreze inferența Twitter SES.', 'sr': 'Svakog dana emocije i mišljenje različitih ljudi širom svijeta odražavaju se u obliku kratkih poruka koristeći mikrobološke platforme. Uprkos postojanju ogromnog potencijala uvedenog od strane ovog izvora podataka, Twitter zajednica je još uvek nesposobna i još nije potpuno istražena. Iako postoji ogroman broj ispitivanja koji pregledavaju mogućnosti infekcije spola i doba, teško postoje istraživanja o socioekonomičkom stanju (SES) infekciji korisnika Twitter-a. Pošto je socioekonomički status važno za liječenje različitih pitanja vezanih za ljudsko ponašanje na nekoliko polja (sociologa, demografija, javno zdravlje, itd.), proveli smo sveobuhvatni pregled literature studija SES-a, metode infekcije i metrika. S obzirom na istraživanje o rezultatima literature, došli smo da istaknemo najkritičnije izazove istraživača. Za najbolje od našeg znanja, ovaj papir je prvi pregled koji predstavlja različite aspekte infekcije SES-a. Zapravo, ovaj članak pruža prednost praktičnicima koji su cilj da procesiraju i istražuju infekciju Twitter SES-a.', 'so': "Maalin walba, hissiga iyo fikirka dadka kala duduwan oo dunida jooga waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa qaabka macluumaadyo gaaban oo isticmaalaya saqafka microblogging. Inta kastoo ay jirto suurtogal aad u badan oo ay soo bandhigtay asalkan macluumaadka, bulshada Twitterka weli waa caqli aan weli la baarayn. Intii ay jirto waxbarasho badan oo imtixaan suurtagal ah oo ay ka fekeraan jinsi iyo da'da, waxaa jirta waxbarasho aad u adag oo ku saabsan sharciga bulshada (SES) oo aan la xiriirin isticmaalayaasha Twitter. Sida darteed xaaladda bulshada waxaa muhiim ah in loo baaraandegayo su'aalo kala duduwan oo la xiriira dabeecada dadka ee kala duduwan (bulshada, demographiga, caafimaadka dadweynaha, etc.) waxaana sameynay baaritaanka qoraalka hoose ee waxbarashada SES, qaababka infertiga iyo metriciyada. Marka la xiriiro baaritaanka arimaha akhriska, waxaan soo bandhigaynay dhibaatooyinka ugu muhiimsan ee baaritaanka. Tan ugu fiican aqoonteenna, warqaddan waa baaritaanka ugu horeeya ee soo saara dhinacyada kala duduwan ee SES-ka. Sida runta ah warqaddan waxyaabaha ay leedahay shaqo-bixiyayaasha ku talo gala inay kala baaraandegaan iyo baaraandegaan cudurada Twitter SES.", 'sv': 'Varje dag återspeglas känslor och åsikter från olika människor över hela världen i form av korta meddelanden med hjälp av mikrobloggplattformar. Trots förekomsten av en enorm potential som introduceras av denna datakälla är Twitter-communityn fortfarande tvetydig och är inte fullt utforskad än. Även om det finns ett stort antal studier som undersöker möjligheterna att härleda kön och ålder, finns det knappast forskning om socioekonomisk status (SES) slutsats av Twitter-användare. Eftersom socioekonomisk status är avgörande för att behandla olika frågor kopplade till mänskligt beteende inom flera områden (sociologi, demografi, folkhälsa, etc.), genomförde vi en omfattande litteraturöversikt av SES-studier, inferensmetoder och mätvärden. Med hänvisning till forskningen om litteraturens resultat kom vi att beskriva de mest kritiska utmaningarna för forskarna. Såvitt vi vet är denna uppsats den första översynen som introducerar de olika aspekterna av SES-slutsatsen. Faktum är att den här artikeln ger fördelar för utövare som syftar till att bearbeta och utforska Twitter SES slutsatser.', 'si': 'හැමදාම, ලෝකයේ වෙනස් මිනිස්සුන්ගේ හැඟීම සහ හිතය ප්\u200dරතිකෘතියෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකෘති පණිවිඩය ප්\u200dරයෝජන මේ තොරතුරු මූල්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් තියෙන්නේ ගොඩක් අවස්ථාවක් තියෙනවා නමුත්, ට්විටර් සමාජය තවමත් අවස් සමහර විශාල විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා නමුත් විශාල විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට, ට්විටර් ප්\u200dරයෝජකය සාමාජික සමාජික ස්ථිතිය අවශ්\u200dය විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් මිනිස්සු භාවිතාවයෙන් සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට (සමා සාධාරණයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ගැන පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා අපි ආවේ පරීක්ෂකයන්ට ගොඩක් විශේෂ අවශ්\u200dය අවශ්\u200dයාවක් ප්\u200d අපේ දන්නවගේ හොඳම දන්නවට, මේ පළමු පරීක්ෂණය තමයි SES පරීක්ෂණයේ වෙනස් ප්\u200dරතිදේශයක් පෙනුම් කරනවා. ඇත්තටම, මේ ලේඛනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙනවා ඔවුන් ට්විටර්', 'ta': 'ஒவ்வொரு நாளும், உலகில் மாறுபட்ட மக்களின் உணர்வு மற்றும் கருத்துக்கள் மைக்ரோப்பாங்கிங் தளங்களை பயன்படுத்தி சிறிய ச இந்த தரவு மூலத்தால் முன்னேற்றப்பட்ட மிகப்பெரிய சாத்திரம் இருந்தாலும், தொடர்பு சமூகத்தில் இன்னும் முழுமையாக தேடுவத பெரிய படிப்பாடுகள் இருக்கும் போது, பெண்களையும் வயதையும் பாதிக்கும் சாத்தியங்களையும் பரிசோதிக்கும் போது, தொடர்பு பயனர்களின் குறைவான நாங்கள் SES படிப்புகள், நோய் முறைகள், மற்றும் மெட்ரிக்களை செய்து கொண்டிருக்கும் முழுமையான எழுத்துரு முடிவு செய்தோம். நாங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்களுக்கு மிக முக்கியமான சவால்களை குறிப்பிட வேண்டும். எங்கள் அறிவின் மிக சிறந்த காகிதத்திற்கு, இந்த காகிதத்தின் முதல் பார்வை என்று SES பாதிப்பின் வேறு விஷயங்களை அறிவ உண்மையில், இந்த கட்டுரையில் பயிற்சியாளர்', 'ur': 'ہر روز، دنیا میں مختلف لوگوں کا احساس اور نظر، میکروبلوگ پٹرومٹیوں کے مطابق چھوٹے پیغام کے شکل میں تفسیر کی جاتی ہے۔ اس ڈیٹا سورس کے ذریعے معلوم ہونے والی بہت بڑی امکانات کی موجودگی کے باوجود، توئیٹر کی کمونٹی ابھی غیر مشکل ہے اور ابھی پورے طور پر تحقیق نہیں کی جاتی۔ اگرچہ بہت سی مطالعہ ہیں جنس اور عمر کے مطالعہ کی تحقیق کرتی ہیں، ٹویٹر کارساز کے اجتماعی موقعیت (SES) کے بارے میں بہت کم تحقیق ہیں۔ جس طرح ہم نے SES تحقیقات، کفارہ طریقے طریقے طریقے طریقے کی تحقیقات کے لئے اجتماعی اقتصادات کے لئے ضروری ہے۔ سناتور کے نتیجے کے متعلق تحقیق کے ذریعہ، ہم نے تحقیق کرنے والوں کے لئے بہت اہم چالیں بیان کرنے کے لئے آئے ہیں۔ ہمارے سب سے بہترین علم کے لئے، یہ کاغذ پہلی روشنی ہے جو SES inference کے مختلف اندازے پیش کرتا ہے. یقیناً یہ لکھا ہے کہ تمرین کرنے والوں کے لئے فائدہ دے رہا ہے جو توئیٹر SES inferences کا تحقیق کرنا اور تحقیق کرنا چاہتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Har kuni dunyodagi boshqa odamlarning hissiyotlari va hayoti microblogging platformlari yordamida qisqa xabarlarni ko'rsatadi. Bu maʼlumotlar manbasi ishga tushirilgan juda katta tajriba mavjud bo'lsa, Twitter jamiyati hech qachon hamma qidirilmaydi. Bir necha ta'lim o'rganishlarda, jinsiyalarni va yoshni ajratish imkoniyatlarini o'rganadi, Twitter foydalanuvchilari haqida o'zgarishni o'rganadi. Bu paytda, biz SES ta'minlovchilarini, infeksiyatsiya usullarini va metriklarni o'rganishga bir necha savollarni boshqarish muhim edik. With reference to the research on literature's results, we came to outline the most critical challenges for researchers.  Bizning eng yaxshi aniqligimiz uchun, bu qogʻoz SES kasalliklarning turli qismlarini anglatadi. Hullas, bu maqola Twitter SES kasalliklarini ishlab chiqarish va foydalanish uchun foydalanuvchilarga ega.", 'vi': 'Mỗi ngày, cảm xúc và ý kiến của những người khác nhau trên toàn thế giới được phản ánh bằng các thông điệp ngắn, sử dụng các bục vi tải. Mặc dù nguồn dữ liệu này đã tạo ra một tiềm năng khổng lồ, thì tình hình Twitter vẫn mơ hồ và chưa được khám phá đầy đủ. Trong khi có rất nhiều nghiên cứu về khả năng suy luận giới tính và tuổi tác, thì hầu như không có nghiên cứu nào về địa vị xã hội học của người dùng Twitter. Vì trạng thái kinh tế và xã hội là điều cần thiết để giải quyết các vấn đề liên quan đến hành vi con người trong nhiều lĩnh vực khác nhau (xã hội, dân số, sức khỏe cộng đồng, v.v.) chúng tôi đã làm một bài kiểm tra văn học đầy đủ về kiềm chế, phương pháp thiên nhiên, và đo lường. Liên quan đến nghiên cứu về kết quả văn học, chúng tôi đến để vạch ra những thử thách quan trọng nhất cho các nhà nghiên cứu. Theo kiến thức tốt nhất của chúng ta, bài báo này là bài kiểm tra đầu tiên đưa ra các khía cạnh khác nhau của luận khẩu SIS. Thực tế, bài báo này cung cấp lợi ích cho những người tập luyện nhằm khám phá và khám phá suy luận của Twitter SIS.', 'bg': 'Всеки ден емоцията и мнението на различни хора по света се отразяват под формата на кратки съобщения, използващи платформи за микроблог. Въпреки наличието на огромен потенциал, въведен от този източник на данни, общността все още е двусмислена и все още не е напълно проучена. Въпреки че има огромен брой проучвания, изследващи възможностите за извеждане на пол и възраст, едва ли съществуват проучвания за изводите на социално-икономическия статус (СЕС) на потребителите на Туитър. Тъй като социално-икономическият статус е от съществено значение за разглеждането на различни въпроси, свързани с човешкото поведение в няколко области (социология, демография, обществено здраве и др.), проведохме цялостен литературен преглед на проучванията на ЕСС, методите за заключение и показателите. С оглед на изследванията на резултатите от литературата стигнахме до очертаване на най-критичните предизвикателства за изследователите. Доколкото знаем, тази статия е първият преглед, който въвежда различните аспекти на заключението на ЕСС. В действителност, тази статия предоставя ползите за практикуващите, които имат за цел да обработват и изследват заключенията за единно европейско пространство в Туитър.', 'hr': 'Svaki dan, emocije i mišljenje različitih ljudi širom svijeta odražavaju se u obliku kratkih poruka koristeći mikrobloggerske platforme. Uprkos postojanju ogromnog potencijala uvedenog ovim izvorom podataka, Twitter zajednica je još uvijek nesposobna i još nije potpuno istražena. Iako postoji ogroman broj ispitivanja koji pregledavaju mogućnosti infekcije spola i dobi, teško postoje istraživanja o socioekonomičkom stanju (SES) infekciji korisnika Twitter-a. Pošto je socioekonomički status važno za liječenje različitih pitanja vezanih za ljudsko ponašanje u nekoliko polja (sociologa, demografija, javno zdravlje itd.), proveli smo sveobuhvatni pregled literature o ispitivanjima SES-a, metodima infekcije i metrika. S obzirom na istraživanje o rezultatima književnosti, došli smo da istaknemo najkritičnije izazove istraživača. Najbolje od naših znanja, ovaj papir je prvi pregled koji predstavlja različite aspekte infekcije SES-a. Zapravo, ovaj članak predstavlja prednost praktičnicima koji su ciljevi procesirati i istražiti infekciju Twitter SES-a.', 'da': 'Hver dag afspejles følelser og meninger fra forskellige mennesker over hele verden i form af korte beskeder ved hjælp af mikroblogging platforme. På trods af eksistensen af et enormt potentiale introduceret af denne datakilde, Twitter-fællesskabet er stadig tvetydigt og er ikke fuldt udforsket endnu. Mens der er et stort antal undersøgelser, der undersøger mulighederne for at udlede køn og alder, findes der næppe undersøgelser af socioøkonomisk status (SES) konklusion af Twitter-brugere. Da socioøkonomisk status er afgørende for at behandle forskellige spørgsmål relateret til menneskelig adfærd på flere områder (sociologi, demografi, folkesundhed osv.), gennemførte vi en omfattende litteraturgennemgang af SES-undersøgelser, inferensmetoder og metrics. Med hensyn til forskningen i litteraturens resultater kom vi til at skitsere de mest kritiske udfordringer for forskerne. Så vidt vi ved, er dette dokument den første gennemgang, der introducerer de forskellige aspekter af SES-udledning. Denne artikel giver faktisk fordelene for praktiserende, der har til formål at behandle og udforske Twitter SES-konklusion.', 'nl': 'Elke dag worden de emotie en mening van verschillende mensen over de hele wereld weerspiegeld in de vorm van korte berichten met behulp van microblogging platforms. Ondanks het bestaan van een enorm potentieel dat door deze gegevensbron wordt geïntroduceerd, is de Twitter-gemeenschap nog steeds dubbelzinnig en is ze nog niet volledig onderzocht. Hoewel er een groot aantal studies zijn die onderzoeken naar de mogelijkheden om geslacht en leeftijd af te leiden, zijn er nauwelijks onderzoeken naar de sociaaleconomische status (SES) inferentie van Twitter-gebruikers. Aangezien sociaaleconomische status essentieel is voor het behandelen van diverse vragen die verband houden met menselijk gedrag op verschillende gebieden (sociologie, demografie, volksgezondheid, enz.), hebben we een uitgebreide literatuurbeoordeling uitgevoerd van SES-studies, inferentiemethoden en metrics. Aan de hand van het literatuuronderzoek zijn we gekomen om de meest kritische uitdagingen voor onderzoekers te schetsen. Voor zover wij weten, is dit artikel de eerste review die de verschillende aspecten van SES-inferentie introduceert. Dit artikel biedt de voordelen voor beoefenaars die Twitter SES-inferentie willen verwerken en onderzoeken.', 'de': 'Die Emotionen und Meinungen verschiedener Menschen auf der ganzen Welt spiegeln sich täglich in Form von Kurznachrichten auf Microblogging-Plattformen wider. Trotz des enormen Potenzials, das diese Datenquelle bietet, ist die Twitter-Community immer noch unklar und noch nicht vollständig erforscht. Zwar gibt es eine große Anzahl von Studien, die die Möglichkeiten der Ableitung von Geschlecht und Alter untersuchen, jedoch gibt es kaum Studien zur Inferenz des sozioökonomischen Status (SES) von Twitter-Nutzern. Da der sozioökonomische Status für die Behandlung verschiedener Fragen im Zusammenhang mit menschlichem Verhalten in verschiedenen Bereichen (Soziologie, Demographie, öffentliche Gesundheit usw.) unerlässlich ist, haben wir eine umfassende Literaturrecherche zu SES-Studien, Inferenzmethoden und Metriken durchgeführt. Anhand der Literaturrecherche skizzieren wir die kritischsten Herausforderungen für Forscher. Nach bestem Wissen ist dieses Papier der erste Review, der die verschiedenen Aspekte der SES-Inferenz vorstellt. Tatsächlich bietet dieser Artikel den Nutzen für Praktiker, die Twitter SES-Inferenzen verarbeiten und erforschen wollen.', 'id': 'Setiap hari, emosi dan pendapat orang-orang yang berbeda di seluruh dunia terefleksi dalam bentuk pesan pendek menggunakan platform mikroblog. Meskipun ada potensi besar yang diperkenalkan oleh sumber data ini, komunitas Twitter masih ambigus dan belum sepenuhnya dieksplorasi. Sementara ada jumlah besar studi yang memeriksa kemungkinan untuk menyimpulkan jenis dan usia, tidak ada penelitian tentang status sosioekonomi (SES) dari pengguna Twitter. Sebagai status sosioekonomi penting untuk memperlakukan pertanyaan berbeda yang berhubungan dengan perilaku manusia dalam beberapa bidang (sosiologi, demografi, kesehatan masyarakat, dll.), kami melakukan pemeriksaan sastra komprensif dari studi SES, metode kesimpulan, dan metrik. Dengan referensi pada penelitian hasil literatur, kami datang untuk menggambarkan tantangan yang paling kritis bagi peneliti. Menurut pengetahuan terbaik kita, kertas ini adalah penelitian pertama yang memperkenalkan aspek yang berbeda dari kesimpulan SES. Sebenarnya, artikel ini memberikan keuntungan bagi praktek yang bertujuan untuk memproses dan mengeksplorasi kesimpulan Twitter SES.', 'ko': '매일 세계 각지의 다양한 사람들의 정서와 관점은 웨이보 플랫폼의 문자 메시지 형식을 통해 반영된다.이 데이터 원본이 엄청난 잠재력을 가져왔음에도 불구하고 트위터 커뮤니티는 여전히 애매모호하고 충분한 탐색을 얻지 못했다.성별과 나이를 추정할 가능성을 다룬 연구가 많았지만, 트위터 이용자의 사회경제적 지위(SES) 추정에 관한 연구는 거의 없었다.사회 경제적 지위는 여러 분야(사회학, 인구학, 공공위생 등)에서 인류 행위와 관련된 각종 문제를 처리하는 데 매우 중요하기 때문에 우리는 사회 경제적 지위 연구, 추리 방법과 지표에 대해 전면적인 문헌을 종합하여 서술했다.문헌 연구 결과를 참고하여 연구원들이 직면한 가장 관건적인 도전을 개술하자.우리가 아는 바에 의하면 본고는 첫 번째 편에서 SES 추리의 서로 다른 방면을 소개하는 종합 서술이다.사실 본고는 트위터 추리를 처리하고 탐색하는 종사자들에게 좋은 점을 제공한다.', 'fa': 'هر روز، احساسات و نظر افراد مختلف در جهان به شکل پیام کوتاهی با استفاده از platformهای میکروبلاگ نشان داده می شوند. با وجود وجود امکانات بزرگی که توسط این منبع اطلاعات معرفی شده، جامعه توئیتر هنوز بی\u200cنظیر است و هنوز کاملاً تحقیق نشده است. در حالی که تعداد زیادی از تحقیقات وجود دارد که در مورد احتمال آلودگی جنسی و سن تحقیق می کنند، به سختی تحقیقات در وضعیت اجتماعی اقتصادی (SES) از کاربران توئیتر وجود ندارد. در حالی که وضعیت اجتماعی اقتصادی برای درمان سوالات مختلف مرتبط به رفتار انسان در چندین زمینه است (اجتماعی، دموگرافی، سلامت عمومی و غیر از آن) ما یک تحقیق ادبیات کامل از تحقیقات تحقیقات SES، روش آلودگی و متریک انجام دادیم. با ارتباط به تحقیقات نتیجه ادبیات، ما برای تحقیقات بیشترین چالش های مهم برای تحقیقات کنندگان آمدیم. برای بهترین دانش ما، این کاغذ اولین بررسی است که نسبت های مختلف بیماری SES را معرفی می کند. در حقیقت، این مقاله سودها را برای تمرین کنندگان می دهد که هدف دارند به فرایند و تحقیق بیماری SES توئیتر باشند.', 'sw': 'Kila siku, hisia na maoni ya watu tofauti duniani kote yanaonekana katika namna ya ujumbe mfupi kwa kutumia jukwaa za kublogu za microblogu. Pamoja na kuwepo kwa uwezekano mkubwa uliotolewa na chanzo hiki cha taarifa, jumuia ya Twita bado haijatambuliwa na bado haijatambua kabisa. Wakati kuna tafiti nyingi kubwa zinazochunguza uwezekano wa kuwabughudia jinsia na umri wa miaka, kuna utafiti vigumu kuhusu hali ya kijamii (SES) ya kutokuwepo kwa watumiaji wa Twita. Wakati hali ya kijamii ni muhimu katika kukabiliana na maswali mbalimbali yanayohusiana na tabia za binadamu katika maeneo kadhaa (sosialojia, demography, afya ya umma, etc.), tulifanya tafiti ya kina ya kitaaluma za SES, njia za uchunguzi na mitindo. Kuhusu utafiti kuhusu matokeo ya fasihi, tulifika kutangaza changamoto muhimu zaidi kwa watafiti. Kwa ufahamu bora zaidi, gazeti hili ni tafiti ya kwanza ambayo inaonyesha mambo tofauti ya maambukizi ya SES. Kwa hakika, makala hii inawapa manufaa kwa watumiaji ambao wanalenga kuchukua na kuchunguza maambukizi yanayotokana na SES ya Twita.', 'sq': 'Çdo ditë, emocionet dhe opinioni i njerëzve të ndryshëm anembanë botës pasqyrohen në form ën e mesazheve të shkurtër duke përdorur platforma mikrobloguese. Megjithë ekzistencën e potencialit të madh të futur nga ky burim i të dhënave, komuniteti i Twitter-it është ende i paqartë dhe nuk është eksploruar plotësisht ende. Ndërsa ka një numër të madh studimesh që shqyrtojnë mundësitë e përfundimit të gjinisë dhe moshës, nuk ekzistojnë kurrë kërkime mbi përfundimin e statusit socioekonomik (SES) të përdoruesve të Twitterit. Ndërsa statusi socioekonomik është thelbësor për trajtimin e çështjeve të ndryshme të lidhura me sjelljen njerëzore në disa fusha (sociologjia, demografia, shëndeti publik, etj.), ne kryem një përmbledhje të plotë letrare të studimeve SES, metodave të përfundimit dhe metrikave. Me lidhje me kërkimin mbi rezultatet e letërsisë, erdhëm të përshkruajmë sfidat më kritike për kërkuesit. Për më të mirën e njohurive tona, ky dokument është shqyrtimi i parë që paraqet aspektet e ndryshme të përfundimit të SES. Me të vërtetë, ky artikull ofron përfitime për praktikantët që synojnë të procesojnë dhe eksplorojnë përfundimin e Twitter SES.', 'af': "Elke dag word die emosie en die mening van verskillende mense oor die wêreld reflekteer in die vorm van kort boodskappe gebruik van mikrobloggplatforme. Terwyl die bestaande van groot potensiele deur hierdie data bron ingestel is, is die Twitter gemeenskap nog ongelukkig en is nog nie volledig ondersoek nie. Alhoewel daar 'n groot aantal studie ondersoek die moontlikhede van geneem en ouderdom, bestaan daar skaars ondersoek op sosiale ekonomiese status (SES) ondersoek van Twitter gebruikers. Omdat sosiale-ekonomiese status noodsaaklik is om verskeie vraagte te behandel wat aan menslike gedrag in verskeie velde gebruik is (sosialogie, demografie, publieke gesondheid, ensfh.), het ons 'n kompleksievolle literateitshersiening van SES studie, inferensiemetodes en metriek gedoen. Met die verwysing van die ondersoek op die resultate van literature het on s gekom om die mees kritiese uitdrukkings vir ondersoekers te voorsien. Na die beste van ons kennis is hierdie papier die eerste hersiening wat die verskillende aspekte van SES-inferensie voorsien. Wel, hierdie artikel verskaf die voordele vir praktisers wat doel om Twitter SES-inferensie te proses en te ondersoek.", 'tr': 'Her gün, dünýäde dürli adamlaryň duýgyş we pikirleri mikroblogg platformlaryny ulanan gysga mesajlaryň şeklinde görülýär. Bu veri çeşmeleri tarapyndan örän köp potensial bar diýip-de, Twitter jemgyýeti heniz hem wajyp ýok we heniz gözlenmedi. Genç we ýa ş ýaşyny azaltmak mümkinçiliklerini köp sany araştyrýan bir topar bar, Twitter üýtgenleriniň sosiýa-ekonomik durumynda (SES) ýagdaýynyň azalyşygynda diýen ýagdaýlar bar. Sosial-ekonomik durum görä adamlaryň(sosyologiýa, demografiýa, jemgyýetçilik saglyklary we bölegi) işlerinde näçe soraglary barlamak üçin wajyplyg däldir. SES aramalaryny, a şyk taryşlaryny we metrikleriň äpet bir edebiýatyny bardyk. edebiýatlygyň netijelerini barlap çykarmak bilen, istrawçylar üçin iň wajyp kynçylyklary tassyklamak üçin geldik. Bilgimiziň iň gowy görä, bu kagyz SES aşygynyň dürli aspektlerini tanyşdyran ilkinji çözümleri. Çyndanam, bu makala Twitter SES hasaplamagyna amap eden praktikantlar üçin fayda berýär.', 'am': 'በየቀኑ፣ የዓለማዊ ልዩ ሕዝብ ስህተት እና አስተያየት በሚኮብቦሎጊ ፕላጦማር በመጠቀም ትንሽ መልዕክት ላይ ይታያል፡፡ ከዚህም አዲስ መልዕክት የተገኘው ብዙ ኃይል ቢሆን እንኳን፣ ትዊተር ማኅበረሰብ ገና ፍጹም አይመረመርም፡፡ የሴሰኝነትን እና የዕድሜን ማነቃቀፍ የሚችሉትን ብዙ ትምህርት ሲመርምሩ፣ የኢኮኖማዊ ስርዓት (SES) በትዊተር ተጠቃሚዎች ግንኙነት በጭንቅ ምርምር አሉ፡፡ ማኅበራዊ ግንኙነት በብዙ እርሻዎች ውስጥ ከሰው ሁኔታ ጋር የተያያያየውን ብዙ ጥያቄዎችን ለመቀበል ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የጽሕፈት ውጤቶች ላይ ትምህርት በተመለከተ፣ ለተማሪዎቹ በጣም አስቸጋሪ ጥያቄዎችን ለመግለጥ መጣን፡፡ To the best of our knowledge, this paper is the first review that introduces the different aspects of SES inference.  በእውነት ይህ ጽሑፍ ትዊተር SES ጉዳይ መፍታትን ለመፈለግ ለሚፈልጉት ለባለሟጋቾች ጥቅሞችን ይሰጣል፡፡', 'hy': 'Ամեն օր աշխարհի տարբեր մարդկանց զգացմունքները և կարծիքները արտացոլվում են կարճ հաղորդագրությունների ձևով, օգտագործելով միկրոբլոգի հարթակներ: Despite the existence of enormous potential introduced by this data source, the Twitter community is still ambiguous and is not fully explored yet.  Մինչդեռ շատ ուսումնասիրություններ կան, որոնք ուսումնասիրում են սեռի և տարիքի եզրակացության հնարավորությունները, գրեթե չկան ուսումնասիրություններ Թվիթերի օգտագործողների սոցիալական տնտեսական կարգավիճակի (SES) եզրակացության մասին: Քանի որ սոցիալական-տնտեսական կարգավիճակը կարևոր է մարդկային վարքագծի հետ կապված բազմազան հարցերի վերաբերյալ բազմաթիվ ոլորտներում (սոցիալոլոգիա, դեմոգրաֆիա, հանրային առողջություն, և այլն), մենք կատարեցինք SES ուսումնասիրությունների, հետևանքն Հաշվի առնելով գրականության արդյունքների ուսումնասիրություններին, մենք եկել ենք գտնել հետազոտողների համար ամենակարևոր մարտահրավերները: Մեր լավագույն գիտելիքներից այս աշխատանքը առաջին վերլուծությունն է, որը ներկայացնում է SES-ի հետևանքի տարբեր ասպեկտները: Իրականում, այս հոդվածը օգուտ է տալիս փորձագետներին, ովքեր նպատակում են աշխատել և ուսումնասիրել Twitter SES-ի եզրակացությունը:', 'bn': 'প্রতিদিন বিশ্বের বিভিন্ন মানুষের আবেগ এবং মতামত মাইক্রোব্লগিং প্ল্যাটফর্ম ব্যবহার করে সংক্ষিপ্ত বার্তার মাধ্যম এই তথ্য উৎস প্রকাশিত বিশাল সম্ভাবনা সত্ত্বেও টুইটার সম্প্রদায় এখনো বিস্মিত এবং এখনো সম্পূর্ণ তদন্ত করা হয়নি। যদিও বিশাল গবেষণা রয়েছে যে লিঙ্গ ও বয়সে আক্রান্ত হওয়ার সম্ভাবনা পরীক্ষা করছে, তবে টুইটার ব্যবহারকারীদের সামাজিক যোগাযোগ্য অবস্থা (সিএস) নির্মাণ যেহেতু সামাজিক যোগাযোগ্য অবস্থা বিভিন্ন ক্ষেত্রে মানুষের আচরণের সাথে সম্পর্কিত বিভিন্ন প্রশ্নের প্রয়োজনীয় (সামাজিক, গণগ্রাফি, জনস্বাস্থ্য ইত্যাদি) আমরা সি সাহিত্যের ফলাফল সম্পর্কে গবেষণার ব্যাপারে আমরা গবেষকদের জন্য সবচেয়ে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ চ্যালেঞ্জের ব্যাপারে জানি আমাদের জ্ঞানের সবচেয়ে ভালোভাবে এই পত্রিকাটি হচ্ছে প্রথম পর্যবেক্ষণ যা সেসের অস্থিরতার বিভিন্ন প্রতিক্রিয়া তু সত্যিই এই প্রবন্ধে টুইটারের সিসের অস্থিরতা প্রক্রিয়া এবং সন্ধান করার উদ্দেশ্যে প্রক্রিয়া এবং টুইটারের ব্যবহারকা', 'ca': "Cada dia, les emocions i l'opinió de diferents persones de tot el món es reflecteixen en forma de curts missatges utilitzant plataformes de microblog. Malgrat l'existència de potencial enorme introduït per aquesta font de dades, la comunitat de Twitter encara és ambigua i encara no està completament explorada. Mentre hi ha un gran nombre d'estudis que estudien les possibilitats de deduir gènere i edat, gairebé no existeixen investigacions sobre la inferència de l'estatus socioeconòmic (SES) dels usuaris de Twitter. Com que l'estatus socioeconòmic és essencial per tractar diverses qüestions relacionades amb el comportament humà en diversos camps (sociologia, demografia, salut pública, etc.), vam fer una revisió completa de la literatura d'estudis SES, mètodes de inferència i mètrics. With reference to the research on literature's results, we came to outline the most critical challenges for researchers.  Per millor que sabem, aquest paper és la primera revisió que introdueix els diferents aspectes de la inferència SES. Indeed, this article provides the benefits for practitioners who aim to process and explore Twitter SES inference.", 'az': 'Hər gün, dünyadakı müxtəlif insanların emosiyası və düşüncəsi mikroblogg platformlarını istifadə edərək qısa mesajların formu ilə görünür. Bu məlumat mənbəsi ilə təşkil edilmiş böyük potensial varlığına rağmen, Twitter toplumunu hələ də münasibdir və hələ tamamilə keşfedilməz. Genç və yaşlığın mümkünlüyünü incitməyə çalışan bir çox təhsil vardır, Twitter istifadəçilərinin sosial ekonomik statüsü haqqında çox az araştırmalar var. Biz SES araşdırmalarını, infeksiya metodlarını və metriklərini müxtəlif təhsil etdik. Mədəbiətlərin sonuçları barəsindəki araştırmalarına baxmayaraq, araştırmaların ən kritik çətinliklərini təsbit etmək üçün gəldik. Bizim elmimizin ən yaxşısına görə bu kağıt SES infeksiyonunun müxtəlif aspektlərini tanıyan ilk tərzidir. Şübhəsiz ki, bu məlumat Twitter SES infeksiyonu təhsil etmək və təhsil etmək niyyətində olan praktikçilər üçün faydalar verir.', 'bs': 'Svaki dan, emocije i mišljenje različitih ljudi širom svijeta odražavaju se u obliku kratkih poruka koristeći mikroblogging platforme. Uprkos postojanju ogromnog potencijala uvedenog ovim izvorom podataka, Twitter zajednica je još uvijek nesposobna i još nije potpuno istražena. Iako postoji ogroman broj ispitivanja koji pregledavaju mogućnosti infekcije spola i dobi, teško postoje istraživanja o socioekonomičkom stanju (SES) infekciji korisnika Twitter-a. Budući da je socioekonomički status važno za liječenje različitih pitanja vezanih za ljudsko ponašanje u nekoliko polja (sociologa, demografija, javno zdravlje itd.), proveli smo sveobuhvatni pregled literature studija SES-a, metoda infekcije i metrika. S obzirom na istraživanje o rezultatima literatura, došli smo da istaknemo najkritičnije izazove istraživača. Najbolje od naših znanja, ovaj papir je prvi pregled koji predstavlja različite aspekte infekcije SES-a. Zapravo, ovaj članak predstavlja korist praktičnicima koji su ciljevi da procesiraju i istražuju infekciju Twitter SES-a.', 'cs': 'Každý den se emoce a názory různých lidí po celém světě odrážejí ve formě krátkých zpráv pomocí mikroblogových platforem. Navzdory existenci obrovského potenciálu, který tento zdroj dat přináší, je komunita Twitteru stále nejednoznačná a ještě není plně prozkoumána. Zatímco existuje velké množství studií zkoumajících možnosti odvození pohlaví a věku, existují stěží výzkumy o inferenci socioekonomického stavu (SES) uživatelů Twitteru. Vzhledem k tomu, že socioekonomický stav je nezbytný pro řešení různých otázek spojených s lidským chováním v několika oblastech (sociologie, demografie, veřejné zdraví apod.), jsme provedli komplexní literární přehled studie SES, metod inference a metrik. S odkazem na výzkum literatury jsme přišli nastínit nejkritičtější výzvy pro výzkumné pracovníky. Podle našich nejlepších znalostí je tento článek prvním přehledem, který představuje různé aspekty závěrů SES. Tento článek skutečně poskytuje výhody pro odborníky, kteří se snaží zpracovat a zkoumat závěry SES Twitteru.', 'et': 'Iga päev peegelduvad erinevate inimeste emotsioonid ja arvamused mikroblogiplatvormide abil lühikeste sõnumite kujul. Vaatamata selle andmeallika tohutule potentsiaali olemasolule on Twitteri kogukond endiselt ebaselge ja seda ei ole veel täielikult uuritud. Kuigi on olemas tohutu hulk uuringuid, mis uurivad soo ja vanuse järeldamise võimalusi, on Twitteri kasutajate sotsiaalmajandusliku seisundi (SES) järelduste uuringuid vaevalt olemas. Kuna sotsiaalmajanduslik staatus on oluline mitmesuguste inimkäitumisega seotud küsimuste lahendamiseks mitmes valdkonnas (sotsioloogia, demograafia, rahvatervis jne), viisime läbi põhjaliku kirjandusülevaate SES uuringutest, järeldusmeetoditest ja mõõdikutest. Kirjanduse tulemuste uurimise põhjal jõudsime välja tuua teadlaste jaoks kõige kriitilisemad väljakutsed. Meie teadmiste kohaselt on käesolev dokument esimene ülevaade, mis tutvustab ühtse taeva järelduste erinevaid aspekte. Tõepoolest, see artikkel pakub kasu praktikutele, kes püüavad töödelda ja uurida Twitter SES järeldusi.', 'fi': 'Joka päivä eri ihmisten tunteet ja mielipiteet ympäri maailmaa heijastuvat lyhyinä viesteinä mikrobloggausalustoilla. Vaikka tämä tietolähde tarjoaa valtavan potentiaalin, Twitter-yhteisö on edelleen epäselvä eikä sitä ole vielä täysin tutkittu. Vaikka on olemassa valtava määrä tutkimuksia, joissa tarkastellaan mahdollisuuksia päätellä sukupuolen ja iän, Twitterin käyttäjien sosioekonomisesta asemasta (SES) on tuskin olemassa tutkimuksia. Koska sosioekonominen asema on välttämätön erilaisten ihmisten käyttäytymiseen liittyvien kysymysten käsittelemiseksi useilla aloilla (sosiologia, väestötiede, kansanterveys jne.), suoritimme kattavan kirjallisuuskatsauksen SES-tutkimuksista, päättelymenetelmistä ja mittareista. Kirjallisuustutkimuksen perusteella päädyimme hahmottelemaan tutkijoille kriittisimmät haasteet. Tietojemme mukaan tämä artikkeli on ensimmäinen katsaus, jossa esitellään yhtenäisen eurooppalaisen ilmatilan päättelyn eri näkökohtia. Tämä artikkeli tarjoaa etuja ammattilaisille, jotka pyrkivät käsittelemään ja tutkimaan Twitterin SES-johtopäätöksiä.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé, sampeyan karo akeh penting kanggo wong-wong wong iki luwih nyong maneh gawe nguasai pergambar gawe sistem sing miklog. Nanging kabèh liyane kabèh dumadhi sing gawe nggawe Perangkat-ingkang dadi iki, komunitas Google isih mlaku diulengkap lan ora iso disindelok liyane. Genjer-genjer diunting akeh akeh akeh pisan winih sing bisa nguasai pernik nggawe winih karo hal-hal, kaya nguasai kapan kanggo nambah urip-urip sing gak dhéwé kuwi sabanjuré iki luwih (SES). Taning ing pangan soko-konomik sing dikarepaké supaya sing gak bener nggawe gerakan karo perkaraan sing nyimpen karo perkaraan sing gak dhéwé (soko-sistem, depografi, sing resak publika, itl.) Dino perusahaan kanggo resmi banjur dadi, awak dhéwé ngerasai perusahaan sing nggawe barang nggawe barang nggo cerêt. Panjenengan langkung awak dhéwé, kartu iki dadi sing pertualangan nggawe nguasai tanggal karo SES piye cara-ne. Lah, artik iki dipunangé kapan kanggo kelas praksi sing bisa nggawe ngulinakake lan kelas i SES susahe Google.', 'bo': 'ཉིན་རེར་མི་སེམས་ཚོར་དང་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ནི་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡོད་པའི་མི་རྣམས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཕྲིན་རིམ་ཐག ང་ཚོའི་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་འདིའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡོད་ཚད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་སྟེ། སྐྱེས་མེད་དང་སྐྱེས་པ་ཚོར་ཉུང་བསྐྱེད་པའི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡོད་ཚད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་ཀྱང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་གནས་སྟངས་བཅས་ཀྱི་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་དེ་བསྟ སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གནས་སྟངས་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་མཐུན་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག་དང་མི་འདྲི་ཚིག་དག་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདྲ་ཡིན་པ་དང་། འུ་ཚོས་གཞུང་ལུགས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིན་ན་ངེད་ཚོས་མཁན་མཐུན་གཏོང་བྱེ ང་ཚོའི་ཆེད་དུ་འཕགས་པ་ཤོག་བྱས་པ་དེ་ལ། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་SES གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་དང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད། དངོས་འབྲེལ་བ་འདིས། དམིགས་བསལ་ཡོད་པའི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོར་ཌིས་སྒོ་ལས་རྗེས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་དང་།', 'he': 'כל יום, הרגשות והדעה של אנשים שונים ברחבי העולם משקפים בצורה של הודעות קצרות באמצעות פלטפורמות מיקרובלוגים. למרות הקיום של פוטנציאל עצום שהופיע על ידי מקור המידע הזה, קהילת הטוויטר עדיין ספורנית ולא נחקרה לחלוטין עדיין. למרות שיש מספר עצום של מחקרים שבדיקות את האפשרויות להוציא מין וגיל, בקושי קיימים מחקרים על סטטוס סוציו-כלכלי (SES) של משתמשים בטוויטר. As socioeconomic status is essential to treating diverse questions linked to human behavior in several fields (sociology, demography, public health, etc.), we conducted a comprehensive literature review of SES studies, inference methods, and metrics.  בהקשר למחקר על תוצאות הספרות, הגענו לתאר את האתגרים הקריטיים ביותר למחקרים. לפי הידע הטוב ביותר שלנו, העיתון הזה הוא הביקור הראשון שמציג את היבטים השונים של המסקנה SES. למעשה, המאמר הזה מספק את היתרונות למרפאים שמתכוונים לעבד ולחקור את ההנחה של הטוויטר SES.', 'sk': 'Vsak dan se čustva in mnenje različnih ljudi po vsem svetu odražajo v obliki kratkih sporočil s platformami za mikrobloganje. Kljub obstoju ogromnega potenciala, ki ga uvaja ta vir podatkov, je skupnost Twitter še vedno dvoumna in še ni v celoti raziskana. Čeprav obstaja veliko število študij, ki proučujejo možnosti sklepanja spola in starosti, ni raziskav o sklepanju socialno-ekonomskega statusa (SES) uporabnikov Twitterja. Ker je socialno-ekonomski status ključnega pomena za obravnavanje različnih vprašanj, povezanih z vedenjem ljudi na več področjih (sociologija, demografija, javno zdravje itd.), smo izvedli celovit pregled literature študij SES, sklepnih metod in metrik. S sklicevanjem na rezultate literature smo prišli opisati najbolj kritične izzive za raziskovalce. Kolikor vemo, je ta prispevek prvi pregled, ki predstavlja različne vidike sklepanja enotnega evropskega neba. Ta članek dejansko zagotavlja koristi za strokovnjake, ki si prizadevajo obdelati in raziskati sklepe o SES Twitterju.', 'ha': "Ko da yau, hison da mawaɓan mutãne dabam-dabam a cikin duniya, ana kange su cikin tsarin maganar fudud da za'a yi amfani da platformi masu micrologogin. Inã da ingawa da ke da ƙarfi mai girma wanda ya introduce na wannan sourcen data, sai jumuiya na Twitter yana mai saurarwa kuma ba za a sami kwamfyuta ba. Waka da akwai jama'a mãsu yawa na karantawa, sunã jarraba ikon za'a iya buga mutane da tsohon da tsohon, sai na da ƙidãya masu yin kashẽwa a kan sitar sosialokomomi (SAS) ya kasancẽwa na kasancẽwa ga mutane na Twitter. As socioeconomic status is essential to treating diverse questions linked to human behavior in several fields (sociology, demography, public health, etc.), we conducted a comprehensive literature review of SES studies, inference methods, and metrics.  Ina bincike da research na fassarar littafan, sai muka bayyana mafiya muhimmada masu muhimu wa watani. Ga mafi kyaun saninmu, wannan takardar ta zama na farkon jarrabi wanda ke ƙara masu cikin kashi na SAS. Ga da gaske, wannan makala yana da amfani ga masu amfani da ke nufi wajen tafiyar da kuma su sami kasar SS na Twitter."}
{'en': 'Divide and Extract   Disentangling Clause Splitting and Proposition Extraction', 'ar': 'قسّم واستخرج - فصل شرط فك التشابك واستخراج الاقتراح', 'fr': "Diviser et extraire — Démêler le fractionnement des clauses et l'extraction de propositions", 'es': 'Divide y extrae — Separación de cláusulas de separación y extracción de proposiciones', 'pt': 'Dividir e Extrair - Divisão de Cláusula Desembaraçada e Extração de Proposição', 'ja': '分割と抽出–分離条項の分割と提案の抽出', 'ru': 'Разделение и извлечение – Разъясняющая оговорка Разделение и извлечение предложений', 'zh': '分而提 —— 解子句分命取之', 'hi': 'विभाजित करें और निकालें - Disentangling खंड विभाजन और प्रस्ताव निष्कर्षण', 'ga': 'Roinn agus Sliocht – Clásal a Dhícheangal Scoilteadh agus Eastóscadh Tairiscintí', 'hu': 'Elosztás és kivonás - Szétbontó záradék osztás és tétel kivonás', 'el': 'Διαίρεση και εξαγωγή της ρήτρας διασποράς και εξαγωγής προτάσεων', 'it': 'Dividere ed estrarre - Dividere e Estrarre Clausola di Disentangling Splitting and Proposition Extraction', 'lt': 'Dalis ir ekstraktas – išskaidymas ir siūlymo ekstraktas', 'mk': 'Делирај и извади - раздвојувачки дел на клаузулата и извади предлог', 'ms': 'Divide and Extract - Disentangling Clause Splitting and Proposition Extraction', 'ml': 'വിഭാഗം ചെയ്യുകയും പുറത്താക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുക - ക്ലൌസ് വിഭാഗിക്കുന്നതും പ്രോപ്ഷഷഷന്\u200d പുറത്താക്കുന്', 'mt': 'Diviżjoni u Estratt - Tqassim u Estrazzjoni tal-Propożizzjoni tal-Klawżola li Tixgħel', 'mn': 'Тайлбарлаж, татаж - Сүйтгэл хөдлөл хуваагдах, тайлбарлах', 'no': 'Stencils', 'ka': 'გაყოფილი და ექსტრაქტირება - გაყოფილი კლასების გაყოფილი და პროპოზაციის ექსტრაქცია', 'ro': 'Împărțirea și extragerea - clauza de dezlegare scindarea și extragerea propunerii', 'pl': 'Podział i ekstrakcja klauzuli rozłączenia i ekstrakcja propozycji', 'sr': 'Razdvajanje i izvlačenje - razdvajanje klase i izvlačenje prijedloga', 'sv': 'Dela och extrahera - Avdelningsklausul Splitting och Proposition Extraction', 'ta': 'பிரித்து பிரி', 'kk': 'Бөлу және тарқату - Класстарды бөлу және қарсы тарқату', 'ur': 'Divide and Extract - Disentangling Clause Splitting and Proposition Extraction', 'so': 'qeybinta iyo soo bixinta- qeybinta fasaxa', 'si': 'Name', 'uz': 'Ajratish va ajratishStencils', 'vi': 'Phân chia và Phát biểu - phân chia và kế hoạch', 'bg': 'Разделяне и извличане - разделяне на клауза за разделяне и извличане на пропозиции', 'hr': 'Razdvajanje i izvlačenje - razdvajanje klase i izvlačenje prijedloga', 'nl': 'Verdelen en Extraheren van Disentangling Clause Splitting en Propositie Extractie', 'da': 'Opdel og udtræk - Disentangling Clause Splitting og Proposition Extraction', 'de': 'Teilen und Extrahieren der Disentangling Clause Splitting und Proposition Extrahieren', 'id': 'Divide and Extract - Disentangling Clause Splitting and Proposition Extraction', 'ko': '분구와 추출-분구 분해와 명제 추출', 'fa': 'تقسیم کردن و خارج کردن - جدا کردن کلاس جدا کردن و خارج کردن پیشنهاد', 'af': 'Deel en uitpak - Ontwikkeling Klasse Splitting en Proposisie uitpak', 'sq': 'Divide and Extract - Disturbing Clause Splitting and Proposition Extraction', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sw': 'Kugawanya na kutengeneza - Kugawanywa na Kutenga', 'hy': 'Բաժանել և դուրս բերել - Առաջացնող պայմանագրի բաժանելը և առաջարկությունը դուրս բերել', 'az': 'Bölüşdür və çıxart - Dəstələndirilən Klaus Bölüşdürmə və Tərslənmə Extraction', 'ca': 'Dividir i extreure - Extracció de la divisió i la proposició de la cláusula desalentant', 'bs': 'Razdvajanje i izvlačenje - razdvajanje klase i izvlačenje prijedloga', 'cs': 'Rozdělit a extrahovat doložku rozdělení a extrakce propozice', 'tr': 'Paýla we Aç', 'et': 'Jagamine ja ekstraheerimine - eemaldamisklausli jagamine ja ettepaneku ekstraheerimine', 'fi': 'Jakaa ja purkaa - purkamiskauseen jakaminen ja proposition uuttaminen', 'bn': 'বিভক্ত এবং এক্সট্র্যাক্ট করো - ক্লাস বিভক্ত করা এবং বিভাগ বিনিময়ের বিনিময়', 'sk': 'Razdeli in izvleči – razdelitvena klavzula in izvleček predloga', 'jv': 'layer-mode-effects', 'he': 'החלק והוציא - החלק והוציא הצעה', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'བཤད་པ་དང་ཕྱིར་འདྲེན། སྒྲིག་འཇུག་དགོས་པའི་སྡེར་རིས་བཤད་པ་དང་གནས་སྟངས་ཕྱིར་འདོན'}
{'en': 'Proposition extraction from sentences is an important task for information extraction systems Evaluation of such systems usually conflates two aspects : splitting complex sentences into clauses and the extraction of propositions. It is thus difficult to independently determine the quality of the proposition extraction step. We create a manually annotated proposition dataset from sentences taken from restaurant reviews that distinguishes between clauses that need to be split and those that do not. The resulting proposition evaluation dataset allows us to independently compare the performance of proposition extraction systems on simple and complex clauses. Although performance drastically drops on more complex sentences, we show that the same systems perform best on both simple and complex clauses. Furthermore, we show that specific kinds of subordinate clauses pose difficulties to most systems.', 'ar': 'يعد استخلاص الاقتراح من الجمل مهمة مهمة لأنظمة استخراج المعلومات ، وعادةً ما يخلط تقييم مثل هذه الأنظمة بين جانبين: تقسيم الجمل المعقدة إلى جمل واستخراج الافتراضات. وبالتالي ، من الصعب تحديد جودة خطوة استخلاص الاقتراح بشكل مستقل. نقوم بإنشاء مجموعة بيانات عرض مشروحة يدويًا من الجمل المأخوذة من تقييمات المطاعم والتي تميز بين البنود التي يجب تقسيمها وتلك التي لا تحتاج إلى ذلك. تسمح لنا مجموعة بيانات تقييم الاقتراح الناتجة بمقارنة أداء أنظمة استخلاص الاقتراح بشكل مستقل في الجمل البسيطة والمعقدة. على الرغم من انخفاض الأداء بشكل كبير في الجمل الأكثر تعقيدًا ، فإننا نظهر أن نفس الأنظمة تعمل بشكل أفضل في كل من الجمل البسيطة والمعقدة. علاوة على ذلك ، نظهر أن أنواعًا معينة من الجمل الثانوية تشكل صعوبات لمعظم الأنظمة.', 'es': 'La extracción de proposiciones de oraciones es una tarea importante para los sistemas de extracción de información. La evaluación de estos sistemas generalmente combina dos aspectos: la división de oraciones complejas en cláusulas y la extracción de proposiciones. Por lo tanto, es difícil determinar de forma independiente la calidad de la etapa de extracción de la proposición. Creamos un conjunto de datos de propuestas anotado manualmente a partir de frases tomadas de reseñas de restaurantes que distingue entre las cláusulas que deben dividirse y las que no. El conjunto de datos de evaluación de propuestas resultante nos permite comparar de forma independiente el rendimiento de los sistemas de extracción de propuestas en cláusulas simples y complejas. Aunque el rendimiento disminuye drásticamente en oraciones más complejas, demostramos que los mismos sistemas funcionan mejor en cláusulas simples y complejas. Además, demostramos que tipos específicos de cláusulas subordinadas plantean dificultades a la mayoría de los sistemas.', 'pt': 'A extração de proposições de sentenças é uma tarefa importante para sistemas de extração de informação A avaliação de tais sistemas geralmente combina dois aspectos: a divisão de sentenças complexas em cláusulas e a extração de proposições. Portanto, é difícil determinar independentemente a qualidade da etapa de extração da proposição. Criamos um conjunto de dados de proposição anotado manualmente a partir de frases retiradas de avaliações de restaurantes que distingue entre cláusulas que precisam ser divididas e aquelas que não precisam. O conjunto de dados de avaliação de proposições resultante nos permite comparar independentemente o desempenho de sistemas de extração de proposições em cláusulas simples e complexas. Embora o desempenho caia drasticamente em sentenças mais complexas, mostramos que os mesmos sistemas têm melhor desempenho em cláusulas simples e complexas. Além disso, mostramos que tipos específicos de orações subordinadas apresentam dificuldades para a maioria dos sistemas.', 'fr': "L'extraction de propositions à partir de phrases est une tâche importante pour les systèmes d'extraction d'informations. L'évaluation de tels systèmes confond généralement deux aspects\xa0: la division de phrases complexes en clauses et l'extraction de propositions. Il est donc difficile de déterminer indépendamment la qualité de l'étape d'extraction de proposition. Nous créons un jeu de données de propositions annoté manuellement à partir de phrases tirées de critiques de restaurants qui fait la distinction entre les clauses qui doivent être divisées et celles qui ne le sont pas. Le jeu de données d'évaluation de propositions qui en résulte nous permet de comparer indépendamment les performances des systèmes d'extraction de propositions sur des clauses simples et complexes. Bien que les performances diminuent considérablement sur les phrases plus complexes, nous montrons que les mêmes systèmes fonctionnent mieux avec les clauses simples et les clauses complexes. En outre, nous montrons que des types spécifiques de clauses subordonnées posent des difficultés à la plupart des systèmes.", 'ja': '文章からの命題抽出は、情報抽出システムにとって重要なタスクです。このようなシステムの評価は、通常、複雑な文章を句に分割し、命題を抽出するという2つの側面を混同しています。したがって、命題抽出ステップの品質を独立して決定することは困難である。レストランのレビューから採取した文章から手動で注釈付きの提案データセットを作成し、分割する必要がある条項とそうでない条項を区別します。結果として得られる命題評価データセットにより、単純で複雑な条項に対する命題抽出システムのパフォーマンスを独立して比較することができます。より複雑な文ではパフォーマンスが大幅に低下しますが、同じシステムが単純な文と複雑な文の両方で最も優れたパフォーマンスを発揮することが示されています。さらに、特定の種類の従属条項は、ほとんどのシステムに困難をもたらすことを示しています。', 'hi': 'वाक्यों से प्रस्ताव निष्कर्षण सूचना निष्कर्षण प्रणालियों के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है ऐसी प्रणालियों का मूल्यांकन आमतौर पर दो पहलुओं को जोड़ता है: जटिल वाक्यों को खंडों में विभाजित करना और प्रस्तावों का निष्कर्षण। इस प्रकार प्रस्ताव निष्कर्षण चरण की गुणवत्ता को स्वतंत्र रूप से निर्धारित करना मुश्किल है। हम रेस्तरां समीक्षाओं से लिए गए वाक्यों से मैन्युअल रूप से एनोटेट किए गए प्रस्ताव डेटासेट बनाते हैं जो उन खंडों के बीच अंतर करते हैं जिन्हें विभाजित करने की आवश्यकता होती है और जो नहीं करते हैं। परिणामी प्रस्ताव मूल्यांकन डेटासेट हमें स्वतंत्र रूप से सरल और जटिल खंडों पर प्रस्ताव निष्कर्षण प्रणालियों के प्रदर्शन की तुलना करने की अनुमति देता है। यद्यपि प्रदर्शन अधिक जटिल वाक्यों पर काफी कम हो जाता है, हम दिखाते हैं कि एक ही सिस्टम सरल और जटिल दोनों खंडों पर सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम दिखाते हैं कि विशिष्ट प्रकार के अधीनस्थ खंड अधिकांश प्रणालियों के लिए कठिनाइयों का सामना करते हैं।', 'zh': '取命题者,信息提取系统之要务 也,常以两混为一谈:拆复杂句为子句命题取之。 故难独立命题提取步驿之质。 臣等于餐厅论中得句创立一手动注命题数集,当数集区别拆分子句与不须拆分子句。 因此命题评估数据集使我们能独立较命题提取系统在简易和复杂子句上的性能。 虽复杂句,性能急剧下降,然同系简杂,皆最为上。 此外,特定从句会多难也。', 'ru': 'Извлечение предложений из предложений является важной задачей для систем извлечения информации Оценка таких систем обычно объединяет два аспекта: разделение сложных предложений на клаузулы и извлечение предложений. Таким образом, трудно самостоятельно определить качество этапа извлечения предложения. Мы создаем вручную аннотированный набор данных о предложениях из предложений, взятых из обзоров ресторанов, в котором проводится различие между пунктами, которые должны быть разделены, и теми, которые не разделены. Полученный набор данных оценки предложения позволяет самостоятельно сравнивать производительность систем извлечения предложения по простым и сложным пунктам. Хотя производительность резко падает на более сложных предложениях, мы показываем, что одни и те же системы работают лучше как на простых, так и на сложных предложениях. Кроме того, мы показываем, что конкретные виды второстепенных клаузул создают трудности для большинства систем.', 'ga': 'Is tasc tábhachtach é eastóscadh tairiscintí as abairtí do chórais asbhainte faisnéise De ghnáth déanann meastóireacht ar chórais den sórt sin dhá ghné a chomhdhlúthú: abairtí casta a roinnt ina gclásail agus asbhaint tairiscintí. Tá sé deacair mar sin cáilíocht chéim eastósctha an tairisceana a chinneadh go neamhspleách. Cruthaímid tacar sonraí de thairiscintí atá anótáilte de láimh ó abairtí a tógadh ó athbhreithnithe bialainne a dhéanann idirdhealú idir clásail nach mór a roinnt agus clásail nach ndéanann. Ligeann an tacar sonraí meastóireachta tairgí dá bharr sin dúinn comparáid neamhspleách a dhéanamh ar fheidhmíocht na gcóras astarraingthe tairgí ar chlásail shimplí agus chasta. Cé go dtagann laghdú suntasach ar fheidhmíocht ar abairtí níos casta, léirímid gurb iad na córais chéanna is fearr a fheidhmíonn ar chlásail shimplí agus chasta araon. Ina theannta sin, léirímid go gcruthaíonn cineálacha sainiúla fochlásail deacrachtaí don chuid is mó de na córais.', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή προτάσεων από προτάσεις είναι ένα σημαντικό έργο για τα συστήματα εξαγωγής πληροφοριών Η αξιολόγηση τέτοιων συστημάτων συνήθως συγχέει δύο πτυχές: τον διαχωρισμό σύνθετων προτάσεων σε ρήτρες και την εξαγωγή προτάσεων. Είναι επομένως δύσκολο να καθοριστεί ανεξάρτητα η ποιότητα του βήματος εξαγωγής πρότασης. Δημιουργούμε ένα χειροκίνητα σχολιασμένο σύνολο δεδομένων προτάσεων από προτάσεις που λαμβάνονται από κριτικές εστιατορίων που διακρίνει μεταξύ ρητών που πρέπει να χωριστούν και εκείνων που δεν το κάνουν. Το σύνολο δεδομένων αξιολόγησης προτάσεων που προκύπτει μας επιτρέπει να συγκρίνουμε ανεξάρτητα την απόδοση των συστημάτων εξαγωγής προτάσεων σε απλές και σύνθετες ρήτρες. Αν και η απόδοση μειώνεται δραστικά σε πιο σύνθετες προτάσεις, δείχνουμε ότι τα ίδια συστήματα αποδίδουν καλύτερα τόσο σε απλές όσο και σε σύνθετες ρήτρες. Επιπλέον, καταδεικνύουμε ότι συγκεκριμένα είδη δευτερεύουσας ρήτρες δημιουργούν δυσκολίες στα περισσότερα συστήματα.', 'hu': 'Az ilyen rendszerek értékelése általában két aspektust ötvöz: a komplex mondatok záradékokra történő felosztása és a javaslatok kivonása. Ezért nehéz önállóan meghatározni a javaslat extrakciós lépésének minőségét. Kézzel jegyzetelt ajánlatadatkészletet hozunk létre éttermi értékelésekből származó mondatokból, amelyek megkülönböztetik a felosztandó és azok között, amelyek nem. Az így kapott javaslatértékelési adatkészlet lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy önállóan összehasonlítsuk a javaslatkivonó rendszerek teljesítményét egyszerű és összetett záradékokon. Bár a teljesítmény drasztikusan csökken a bonyolultabb mondatoknál, megmutatjuk, hogy ugyanazok a rendszerek teljesítenek a legjobban mind az egyszerű, mind az összetett mondatoknál. Ezenkívül megmutatjuk, hogy az alárendelt záradékok konkrét fajtái nehézségeket okoznak a legtöbb rendszer számára.', 'it': "L'estrazione di proposizioni da frasi è un compito importante per i sistemi di estrazione delle informazioni La valutazione di tali sistemi di solito confonde due aspetti: la divisione di frasi complesse in clausole e l'estrazione di proposizioni. È quindi difficile determinare autonomamente la qualità della fase di estrazione della proposizione. Creiamo un set di dati delle proposizioni annotati manualmente partendo da frasi tratte dalle recensioni dei ristoranti che distinguono tra le clausole che devono essere divise e quelle che non lo fanno. Il set di dati di valutazione delle proposizioni risultante ci permette di confrontare autonomamente le prestazioni dei sistemi di estrazione delle proposizioni su clausole semplici e complesse. Anche se le prestazioni scendono drasticamente su frasi più complesse, mostriamo che gli stessi sistemi funzionano meglio sia su frasi semplici che su frasi complesse. Inoltre, mostriamo che tipi specifici di clausole subordinate pongono difficoltà alla maggior parte dei sistemi.", 'lt': 'Pasiūlymas išbraukti iš sakinių yra svarbi informacijos gavimo sistemų užduotis Tokių sistemų vertinimas paprastai sutampa su dviem aspektais: sudėtingų sakinių padalijimas į punktus ir pasiūlymų išbraukimas. It is thus difficult to independently determine the quality of the proposition extraction step.  Mes sukuriame rankiniu būdu anotuotus pasiūlymų duomenų rinkinį iš sakinių, gautų iš restoranų peržiūrų, kurie skiriasi tarp išlygų, kurias reikia padalyti, ir tų, kurios nėra. Iš to gautas pasiūlymų vertinimo duomenų rinkinys leidžia mums nepriklausomai palyginti pasiūlymų gavimo sistemų veiksmingumą su paprastomis ir sudėtingomis išlygomis. Nors rezultatai drastiškai mažėja dėl sudėtingesnių sakinių, mes rodome, kad tos pačios sistemos geriausiai veikia ir paprastomis, ir sudėtingomis sąlygomis. Be to, rodome, kad daugumai sistemų kyla sunkumų dėl konkrečių subordinuotų sąlygų rūšių.', 'mk': 'Предлогот за извлекување од речениците е важна задача за системите за извлекување информации Евалуацијата на ваквите системи обично конфликтира два аспекти: поделба на комплексни реченици во клаузули и извлекување на предлози. Затоа е тешко независно да се одреди квалитетот на чекорот на извлекувањето на предлогот. Ние создаваме рачно анотиран податок на предлозите од речениците земени од рецензиите на рестораните кои разликуваат меѓу клаузулите кои треба да се подели и оние кои не. The resulting proposition evaluation dataset allows us to independently compare the performance of proposition extraction systems on simple and complex clauses.  Иако резултатите драстично се намалуваат на покомплексни реченици, покажуваме дека истите системи се најдобри за едноставни и комплексни клаузули. Покрај тоа, покажуваме дека специфичните видови на подредени клаузули предизвикуваат тешкотии за повеќето системи.', 'ms': 'Ekstrasi cadangan dari kalimat adalah tugas penting untuk sistem ekstraksi maklumat Evaluasi sistem seperti itu biasanya berkonflik dua aspek: membahagi kalimat kompleks ke klawsul dan ekstraksi cadangan. Jadi sukar untuk menentukan kualiti langkah ekstraksi cadangan secara independen. Kami mencipta set data tawaran yang dicatat secara manual dari kalimat yang diambil dari ulasan restoran yang membezakan antara klawsul yang perlu dibahagi dan yang tidak. Set data penilaian cadangan hasilnya membolehkan kita membandingkan secara independen prestasi sistem ekstraksi cadangan pada klawsul sederhana dan kompleks. Although performance drastically drops on more complex sentences, we show that the same systems perform best on both simple and complex clauses.  Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bahawa jenis tertentu klawsul subordinat mengakibatkan kesulitan bagi kebanyakan sistem.', 'mt': 'L-estrazzjoni tal-proposta mis-sentenzi hija kompitu importanti għas-sistemi ta’ estrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni L-evalwazzjoni ta’ sistemi bħal dawn normalment tikkonflitti żewġ aspetti: il-qsim ta’ sentenzi kumplessi f’klawżoli u l-estrazzjoni ta’ proposti. Għalhekk huwa diffiċli li tiġi ddeterminata b’mod indipendenti l-kwalità tal-pass tal-estrazzjoni tal-proposta. Aħna nħolqu sett tad-dejta tal-proposti annotati manwalment minn sentenzi meħuda minn reviżjonijiet tar-ristoranti li jiddistingwu bejn klawżoli li jeħtieġ li jinqasmu u dawk li ma jagħmlux. Is-sett tad-dejta tal-evalwazzjoni tal-proposti li jirriżulta jippermettilna li nqabblu b’mod indipendenti l-prestazzjoni tas-sistemi tal-estrazzjoni tal-proposti fuq klawżoli sempliċi u kumplessi. Għalkemm il-prestazzjoni tonqos drastikament fuq sentenzi aktar kumplessi, nuru li l-istess sistemi jwettqu l-aħjar fuq klawżoli kemm sempliċi kif ukoll kumplessi. Barra minn hekk, nuru li tipi speċifiċi ta’ klawżoli subordinati joħolqu diffikultajiet għall-biċċa l-kbira tas-sistemi.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പ്രോപ്ഷഷഷന്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നത് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട് അതുകൊണ്ട് സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായി പ്രോദ്യോഷന്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്ന പടിയുടെ ഗുണത്തെ തീരുമാനിക്ക റെസ്റ്റോറന്റ് പരിശോധനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിധിച്ച വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മള്\u200d കൈകാര്യമായി പ്രോജക്ഷന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് ഉണ്ടാക പ്രോദ്യോഷന്\u200d വിലാസപ്രകാരം ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യത്തോട് പ്രോജക്ഷന്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം സാധാരണമ കൂടുതല്\u200d കുഴപ്പമുള്ള വാക്കുകളില്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് പോലും നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, അതേ സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200d സാധാരണമായും  അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് വിശിഷ്ടമായ തരത്തിലുള്ള വ്യവസ്ഥകള്\u200d മിക്കവാറും സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200dക്ക് പ്', 'kk': 'Сөздерден артықшылық тарқату - мәліметті тарқату жүйелерінің оқиғасы бұл жүйелердің екі бөлігіне сәйкес келеді: комплекс сөздерді сөздерге бөлу және ұсыныстарды тарқату үшін маңызды тапсырм Бұл үшін таңдау қадамының сапасын тәуелсіз анықтау қиын. Біз ресторанттың редакцияларынан алынған сұлбалардан қолмен белгіленген деректер қорын құрамыз, бөлу керек және бөлмейтін сұлбалар арасында бөлу керек. Сонымен қарапайым және комплекс клауз үшін таңдау жүйелерін қарапайым және таңдау жүйелерін тәуелсіз салыстыруға мүмкіндік береді. Бірақ жылдамдықтар көптеген сөйлемелерді көптеген қарапайым және комплекс клаузаларда бір жүйелерді жақсы жұмыс істейтінін көрсетеді. Сонымен қатар, біз бұл көпшіліктердің көпшілігіне мәселелерді көрсетедік.', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja propozycji ze zdań jest ważnym zadaniem dla systemów ekstrakcji informacji Ocena takich systemów zwykle łączy dwa aspekty: podział złożonych zdań na klauzule oraz ekstrakcję propozycji. Trudno zatem samodzielnie określić jakość etapu ekstrakcji propozycji. Tworzymy ręcznie annotowany zestaw danych propozycji ze zdań pochodzących z recenzji restauracji, który rozróżnia klauzule, które muszą być podzielone, a te, które nie. Powstały zestaw danych oceny propozycji pozwala nam samodzielnie porównać wydajność systemów ekstrakcji propozycji na klauzulach prostych i złożonych. Chociaż wydajność drastycznie spada na bardziej złożonych zdaniach, pokazujemy, że te same systemy sprawdzają się najlepiej zarówno na prostych, jak i złożonych klauzulach. Ponadto pokazujemy, że określone rodzaje klauzul podporządkowych stanowią trudności dla większości systemów.', 'ro': 'Extragerea propunerilor din propoziții este o sarcină importantă pentru sistemele de extragere a informațiilor Evaluarea unor astfel de sisteme confundă de obicei două aspecte: divizarea propozițiilor complexe în clauze și extragerea propozițiilor. Prin urmare, este dificil să se determine independent calitatea etapei de extragere a propunerii. Creăm un set de date de propuneri adnotate manual din propoziții preluate din recenziile restaurantelor, care distinge între clauzele care trebuie divizate și cele care nu. Setul de date rezultat de evaluare a propunerilor ne permite să comparăm independent performanța sistemelor de extragere a propunerilor pe clauze simple și complexe. Deși performanța scade drastic pe propoziții mai complexe, arătăm că aceleași sisteme funcționează cel mai bine atât pe clauze simple, cât și pe cele complexe. Mai mult, arătăm că anumite tipuri de clauze subordonate prezintă dificultăți majorității sistemelor.', 'mn': 'Үүнээс илэрхийлэл гаргах нь мэдээллийн гаргах системийн чухал задалга юм. Ийм системийн оюун санаа нь ихэвчлэн хоёр асуудлуудтай холбогдож байна: комплекс өгүүлбэрүүдийг гүйцэтгэх, зөвлөмжүүдийг гаргах. Үүнээс өөрсдийгөө хадгалахын тулд тайлбарлах нь хэцүү. Бид хоолны шүүмжлээс авсан өгөгдлийн санал санал өгөгдлийн санал гараараа бий болгож, хуваагдах шаардлагатай, хуваагдахгүй хүмүүсийн хоорондоо ялгаатай. Үүний үр дүнд гарсан санал өгөгдлийн сангууд бидэнд энгийн, төвөгтэй гүйцэтгэл дээр гаргах үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагааг өөрсдөө харьцуулах боломжтой болгодог. Хэдийгээр үйл ажиллагаа илүү төвөгтэй өгүүлбэрүүдийг багасгаж байгаа ч бид ижил системүүд энгийн болон төвөгтэй холбоонууд дээр хамгийн сайн ажилладаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Үүнээс гадна бид тодорхой төрлийн загварууд ихэнх системд хэцүү байдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Uttrekking av proposisjon frå setningar er ein viktig oppgåve for informasjonsekstraksjonssystemEvaluering av slike systemer tilsvarar to aspektar: Del komplekse setningar i klausar og uttrekking av forslag. Det er derfor vanskeleg å avgjere kvaliteten på utpakkingsstegnet uavhengig. Vi oppretter ei manuelt oppmerking av førehandsinnstillingar frå setningar som vert henta frå restorasjonsgjennomsikt som distirerer mellom klausar som treng å dele og dei som ikkje gjer. Det følgjande datasettet for evaluering av førehandsvising kan sammenligne oss uavhengig med utføringssystemet for utpakking av førehandsvising på enkle og komplekse klausar. Selv om utviklinga drastisk nedtrer på meir komplekse setningar, viser vi at dei same systema utfører best på både enkle og komplekse klausar. I tillegg viser vi at spesifikke slags underordningsklassar fører vanskelighetar til dei fleste systema.', 'so': 'Xiriiridda ka soo bixinta qoraalka waa shaqo muhiim ah in la sameeyo nidaamka soo saaridda macluumaadka lagu xaqiijiyo nidaamkan sida caadiga ah waxay ku qeybiyaan laba dhinac: kala qeybinaya hadallada complex iyo in la soo saaro waxyaabaha lagu soo jeedo. Sidaa darteed waa adag tahay in si xor ah u go’aanta go’aanka soo bixinta. Waxaannu sameynaa macluumaad la soo jeedo oo si rasmi ah looga baaraandegay oo laga soo qoray baaritaanka kafeenada, kaas oo kala soocaa fasaxyada u baahan inay kala dilaan iyo kuwa aan ahayn. Kaartaynta qiimeynta ee sababtu wuxuu inagu fasaxaa si xor ah oo aan isbarbardhigno sameynta nidaamka soo saarashada ee fudud oo adag. In kastoo ay sameyntu aad u dhaqdhaqaaqdo, waxaynu muujinnaa in isku nidaamka ay si fiican u sameeyaan fasax fudud iyo qallafsan. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu tusnaynaa in noocyo cayiman oo cayiman ay dhibaato u leeyihiin nidaamka badan.', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija prijedloga iz rečenica je važan zadatak za sisteme izvlačenja informacija koja obično odgovara dva aspekta: podeljenje složenih rečenica u klauzule i izvlačenje prijedloga. Tako je teško neovisno odrediti kvalitet koraka izvlačenja prijedloga. Napravili smo ruèno annotiran set podataka prijedloga iz rečenica preuzeta iz restoranskih pregleda koje razlikuje između klauzula koje moraju biti podeljene i one koje ne rade. Rezultatni set podataka za procjenu prijedloga omogućava nam da nezavisno usporedimo učinkovitost sistema izvlačenja prijedloga o jednostavnim i kompleksnim klauzulama. Iako izvedba drastično pada na kompleksnije rečenice, pokazujemo da isti sistemi najbolje izvode na jednostavnim i složenim klauzulama. Osim toga, pokazujemo da posebne vrste podordinatnih klauzula predstavljaju teškoće većini sistema.', 'ka': 'სიტყვებისგან პროპოზაციის ექსპორცია მნიშვნელოვანი საქმე ინფორმაციის ექსპროქციის სისტემის განსაზღვრებას ორი აპექტირების განსაზღვრებაა: კომპლექციული სიტყვების გაყოფილი კლასში ამიტომ ძალიან შესაძლებელია თავისუფალურად განსაზღვრება პროგრამების გამოკლების კვალეტაცია. ჩვენ ხელსახურად მოწყობინებული მონაცემების მონაცემების საქაღალდე, რომელიც რესტორანტის განაცემებით განსხვავებს კლასების შორის, რომელიც უნდა გაყოფილი და რომელიც არ არის. შესაძლებელი პროგრამების განსაზღვრების მონაცემების საზოგადომი მონაცემების საზოგადოება გვაქვს, რომ საზოგადომის განსაზღვრების გამოყენება სისტემის გამო თუმცა კომპლექტიკური სიტყვების შესახებ ძალიან კომპლექტიკური სიტყვების შესახებ, ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ იგივე სისტემები უფრო ძალ დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ განსაკუთრებული საპირო საპირო კლასები უფრო მეტის სისტემის შესაძლებლობა.', 'sv': 'Propositionsextraktion från meningar är en viktig uppgift för informationsextraktionssystem Utvärdering av sådana system sammanfaller vanligtvis två aspekter: uppdelning av komplexa meningar i satser och extraktion av satser. Det är därför svårt att självständigt bestämma kvaliteten på propositionsextraktionssteget. Vi skapar ett manuellt kommenterat propositionsdataset från meningar hämtade från restaurangrecensioner som skiljer mellan klausuler som behöver delas och de som inte gör det. Datauppsättningen för utvärdering av förslag gör det möjligt för oss att självständigt jämföra prestandan hos system för utvinning av förslag på enkla och komplexa satser. Även om prestandan drastiskt sjunker på mer komplexa meningar, visar vi att samma system presterar bäst på både enkla och komplexa satser. Dessutom visar vi att specifika typer av underordnade klausuler utgör svårigheter för de flesta system.', 'ur': 'جماعتوں سے تقسیم نکالنے کا ایک اہم کام ہے جو اطلاعات اخراج سیستموں کے لئے ایک اہم کام ہے اس طرح کے سیستموں کی Evaluation معمولاً دو قسمتوں سے مختلف ہوتی ہے: پیچیدہ جماعتوں کو کلاس میں تقسیم کرنے اور پیشنهادوں کے اخراج کرنے کے لئے۔ اسی طرح آزاد ہونے کا مشکل ہے کہ پیشنهاد اٹھانے کے سطح کا کیفیت مقرر کرے۔ ہم نے رستوران رستوران سے لیے ہوئے جماعتوں سے ایک دستی سے اظہار کی پیشنهاد ڈیٹ سٹ پیدا کیا ہے جو کلیزوں کے درمیان جدائی کرتی ہیں جو تقسیم کرنے کی ضرورت ہے اور جو نہیں کرتی۔ نتیجۂ پیشنهاد کے ارزیابی ڈیٹ سٹ ہمیں آسان اور پیچیدہ کلاس پر پیشنهاد اضافہ سیستموں کی فعالیت کے مطابق مثالی کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے۔ اگرچہ عملکرد زیادہ پیچیدہ جماعتوں پر ڈوبتا ہے، ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ سادہ اور پیچیدہ کلاس پر ایک ہی سیستم بہتر عمل کرتا ہے۔ اور ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ مخصوص مخصوص مخصوص مخصوص مخصوص مخصوص کو اکثر سیستموں کے لئے مشکل بناتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'வாக்கியங்களிலிருந்து வெளியேறுதல் தகவல் பிரிப்பு அமைப்புகளுக்கு முக்கியமான செயல் It is thus difficult to independently determine the quality of the proposition extraction step.  நாம் வாக்கியங்களிலிருந்து எடுத்துக் கொண்ட வாக்குகளிலிருந்து ஒரு கைமுறையாக குறிப்பிட்ட பிரிக்கப்பட்டுள்ள பரிந்துர முடிவுகளின் பரிந்துரையின் மதிப்பீடு தரவுத்தளத்தை சுலபமான மற்றும் சிக்கலான குறிப்புகளில் செயல்படுத்தும் முன்னோ மேலும் சிக்கலான வாக்கியங்கள் மீது செயல்படுத்தும் போதும், அதே அமைப்புகள் சுலபமான மற்றும் சிக்கலான விளக்கங்களிலும் ச அதற்கு மேலும், நாம் குறிப்பிட்ட வகைகளை குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட வகைகள் பெரும்பாலான கணினிகளுக்கு கடினம', 'si': 'වාක්යෙන් පිළිබඳින් පිළිබඳින් පිළිබඳ වැඩක් තොරතුරු පිළිබඳ පද්ධතියට විශේෂ පද්ධතියක් විශ්වාස කරන්න සාමාන්\u200dය වි ඒ වගේම අමාරුයි ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශේෂය නිර්ධාරණය කරන්න. අපි අයිතියෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනව ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශේෂණ දත්ත සැට අපිට ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සම්පූ ඒ වගේම අපි පෙන්වන්නම් වැඩි සංකුර්ණ වචන වචන වලට වැඩියි, ඒ වගේම පද්ධතිය හා සංකුර්ණ සංකුර්ණ වල තවත්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරමාණ වර්ගයක් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරමාණ වර්ගයක් ගොඩක් පද්ධතියට අමාරුයි', 'uz': "Name Шундай қилиб, аввалги суҳбат тарқатувчининг сифатини аниқлаш мумкин. Biz restaurant tahrirlaridan tashlangan so'zlar tarkibini qoʻlbola qo'lbola qilish uchun maʼlumot tarkibini yaratishmiz. Bu soʻzlarni ajratish kerak va qaytarish kerak emas. Name Ko'pchilik murakkab so'zlar sohasida bajarayotganda, biz bir xil tizim oddiy va murakkab klassilarga yaxshi ishlaydi. Ko'rsatganda, biz ko'pchilik tizimga ma'lum xil turlarini ko'rsamiz.", 'vi': 'Việc trích xuất từ lời phạt là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng cho hệ thống thông tin. Bài đánh giá về các hệ thống này thường kết hợp hai khía cạnh: việc chia câu phức tạp thành các nguyên tắc và giải quyết các dự án. It is so hard to independently determine the chất lượng of the proposion trích step. Chúng tôi tạo ra một tập tin đề xuất được ghi chú bằng tay từ câu từ đánh giá nhà hàng mà phân biệt giữa những điều khoản cần phải chia ra và những điều không làm. Kết quả của bộ dữ liệu đánh giá triển vọng cho phép chúng ta độc lập so sánh khả năng sử dụng hệ thống trích xuất vị trí theo các quy tắc đơn giản và phức tạp. Mặc dù hiệu suất giảm xuống trầm trọng ở các câu phức tạp hơn, nhưng chúng tôi cho thấy rằng cùng một hệ thống hoạt động tốt nhất với những điều khoản đơn giản và phức tạp. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi cho thấy các loại chi tiết phụ thuộc gây khó khăn cho hầu hết các hệ thống.', 'da': 'Forslagsudtrækning fra sætninger er en vigtig opgave for informationsudvindingssystemer Evaluering af sådanne systemer samler normalt to aspekter: opdeling af komplekse sætninger i sætninger og udtrækning af sætninger. Det er derfor vanskeligt selvstændigt at bestemme kvaliteten af forslagsudvindingstrin. Vi opretter et manuelt kommenteret tilbudsdatasæt ud fra sætninger taget fra restaurantanmeldelser, der skelner mellem klausuler, der skal deles, og dem, der ikke gør det. Det resulterende datasæt til evaluering af forslag giver os mulighed for uafhængigt at sammenligne ydeevnen af forslag ekstraktionssystemer på enkle og komplekse satser. Selvom ydeevnen drastisk falder på mere komplekse sætninger, viser vi, at de samme systemer fungerer bedst på både enkle og komplekse sætninger. Desuden viser vi, at specifikke former for underordnede klausuler skaber vanskeligheder for de fleste systemer.', 'nl': 'Voorstel extractie uit zinnen is een belangrijke taak voor informatieextractiesystemen Evaluatie van dergelijke systemen combineert meestal twee aspecten: het splitsen van complexe zinnen in clausules en het extraheren van proposities. Het is dus moeilijk om zelfstandig de kwaliteit van de propositie extractie stap te bepalen. We maken een handmatig geannoteerde propositie dataset van zinnen uit restaurantbeoordelingen die onderscheid maken tussen clausules die gesplitst moeten worden en clausules die niet gesplitst moeten worden. De resulterende propositie evaluatie dataset stelt ons in staat om onafhankelijk de prestaties van propositie extractie systemen te vergelijken op eenvoudige en complexe clausules. Hoewel de prestaties drastisch dalen bij complexere zinnen, laten we zien dat dezelfde systemen het beste presteren op zowel eenvoudige als complexe zinnen. Bovendien tonen we aan dat specifieke soorten ondergeschikte clausules problemen opleveren voor de meeste systemen.', 'bg': 'Извличането на предложения от изречения е важна задача за системите за извличане на информация Оценката на такива системи обикновено обединява два аспекта: разделяне на сложни изречения на клаузи и извличане на предложения. Поради това е трудно независимо да се определи качеството на етапа на извличане на предложението. Създаваме ръчно анотиран набор от данни от предложения от изречения, взети от рецензии на ресторанти, който разграничава клаузите, които трябва да бъдат разделени и тези, които не го правят. Полученият набор от данни за оценка на предложенията ни позволява самостоятелно да сравняваме ефективността на системите за извличане на предложения върху прости и сложни клаузи. Въпреки че ефективността драстично намалява при по-сложни изречения, ние показваме, че едни и същи системи работят най-добре както при прости, така и при сложни клаузи. Освен това показваме, че специфични видове подчинени клаузи създават трудности за повечето системи.', 'id': 'Ekstraksi proposisi dari kalimat adalah tugas penting untuk sistem ekstraksi informasi Evaluasi sistem seperti itu biasanya berkonflikasi dua aspek: membagi kalimat kompleks ke klausul dan ekstraksi proposisi. Jadi sulit untuk menentukan secara independen kualitas langkah ekstraksi proposisi. Kami menciptakan dataset proposisi yang dicatat secara manual dari kalimat yang diambil dari resensi restoran yang membedakan antara klausul yang perlu dibagi dan yang tidak. Seting data evaluasi proposisi yang menghasilkan memungkinkan kita secara independen membandingkan prestasi dari sistem ekstraksi proposisi pada klausul sederhana dan kompleks. Meskipun prestasi secara drastis menurun pada kalimat yang lebih kompleks, kita menunjukkan bahwa sistem yang sama berhasil terbaik pada kedua kalimat sederhana dan kompleks. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bahwa jenis spesifik klausul subordinat menghasilkan kesulitan bagi kebanyakan sistem.', 'fa': 'اخراج پیشنهاد از جمله\u200cها یک کار مهم برای سیستم\u200cهای اخراج اطلاعات است. ارزیابی این سیستم\u200cها معمولاً دو قسمت مختلف می\u200cشود: جدا کردن جمله\u200cهای پیچیده به کلاس\u200cها و اخراج پیشنهاد\u200cها. بنابراین برای تعیین کردن کیفیت قدم استخراج پیشنهاد به خصوصی سخت است. ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای پیشنهاد دستی را از مجموعه\u200cهایی که از بازرسی\u200cهای رستوران گرفته\u200cاند، که بین مجموعه\u200cهایی که باید تقسیم شوند و آن\u200cها که نمی\u200cکنند، تفاوت می\u200cدهیم. به نتیجه، مجموعه داده\u200cهای ارزیابی پیشنهاد اجازه می\u200cدهد که عملکرد سیستم\u200cهای استخراج پیشنهاد را در کلاس ساده و پیچیده مقایسه کنیم. اگرچه عملکرد در جمله\u200cهای پیچیده\u200cتر فرود می\u200cآید، نشان می\u200cدهیم که همان سیستم\u200cها بهترین عمل می\u200cکنند در کلاس\u200cهای ساده و پیچیده\u200cتر. علاوه بر این، ما نشان می دهیم که نوع مخصوص قوانین پایین مشکلات را برای بیشتر سیستم قرار می دهد.', 'ko': '문장에서 명제를 추출하는 것은 정보 추출 시스템의 중요한 임무이다. 이런 시스템에 대한 평가는 보통 두 가지 측면을 포함한다. 복잡한 문장을 자구와 명제의 추출로 나누는 것이다.따라서 명제 추출 절차의 질을 독립적으로 정하기는 어렵다.우리는 식당 평론의 문장에 따라 수동 주석의 명제 데이터 집합을 만들고 분리가 필요한 자구와 분리가 필요 없는 자구를 구분한다.이로 인해 발생한 명제 평가 데이터 집합은 명제 추출 시스템이 간단한 자구와 복잡한 자구의 성능을 독립적으로 비교할 수 있도록 한다.더 복잡한 문장에서 성능이 급격히 떨어졌지만 같은 시스템이 간단한 자구와 복잡한 자구에서 가장 잘 나타난다는 것을 보여준다.그 밖에 우리는 특정 종류의 종문이 대다수 시스템에 있어 어렵다는 것을 발견했다.', 'tr': 'Sözlerden aýrym almak maglumatlary açmak sistemalary üçin wajyp zadyr. Şol sistemleriň deňlemesi adatça iki aspekte çalyşýar: sözlerni klawuslara aýrylýar we maslahatlaryň açylygy üçin. Bu şekilde teklib açma aýratynyň kalitesini boýun-boýun çykmak kyn. Biz restoran çykyşlardan alan sözlerinden elimizden bildirilen bir teklip sanatyny çykarýarys. Bu kararlar bölmeli we bolmalylar arasynda tapawutlar. Sonuçta teklip değerlendirme veri setegi bize basit we çykyş klawutlarda teklip etmek sistemlerinin eserini çykarmagyna mümkin edir. Görniş şeklinde gaty karmaşık sözleriň üstüne düşerse hem, bir sistemiň hem basit hem karmaşık klawuslarda gowy işleýändigini görkezýäris. Mundan soňra, biz esasy takyk görnüşler köp sistemalara kynlaşdyrýarys.', 'de': 'Die Propositionsextraktion aus Sätzen ist eine wichtige Aufgabe für Informationsextraktionssysteme Die Evaluation solcher Systeme vereint in der Regel zwei Aspekte: die Aufteilung komplexer Sätze in Sätze und die Extraktion von Sätzen. Es ist daher schwierig, die Qualität des Propositionsextraktionsschrittes unabhängig zu bestimmen. Wir erstellen einen manuell kommentierten Satz-Datensatz aus Sätzen aus Restaurantbewertungen, der zwischen Klauseln unterscheidet, die geteilt werden müssen und Klauseln, die nicht geteilt werden. Der resultierende Datensatz zur Propositionsbewertung ermöglicht es uns, die Leistung von Proposition-Extraktionssystemen unabhängig von einfachen und komplexen Klauseln zu vergleichen. Obwohl die Leistung bei komplexeren Sätzen drastisch sinkt, zeigen wir, dass dieselben Systeme sowohl für einfache als auch für komplexe Sätze am besten funktionieren. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, dass bestimmte Arten von Nebensätzen für die meisten Systeme Schwierigkeiten bereiten.', 'hr': 'Izvlačenje prijedloga iz kazne je važan zadatak za sisteme izvlačenja informacija obično uključuje dva aspekta: razdvajanje složenih kazna u klauzule i izvlačenje prijedloga. Tako je teško neovisno odrediti kvalitet koraka izvlačenja prijedloga. Mi stvorimo ručno označene podatke o prijedlogu iz kazne preuzete iz restoranskih pregleda koje razlikuju između klauzula koje moraju biti podijeljene i one koje ne mogu. U rezultativnoj grupi podataka za procjenu prijedloga omogućava nam da nezavisno usporedimo učinkovitost sustava izvlačenja prijedloga o jednostavnim i složenim klauzulama. Iako izvedba drastično pada na kompleksnije rečenice, pokazujemo da isti sustavi najbolje izvode na jednostavnim i složenim klauzulama. Osim toga, pokazujemo da posebne vrste podordenatnih klauzula predstavljaju teškoće većini sustava.', 'am': 'Proposition extraction from sentences is an important task for information extraction systems Evaluation of such systems usually conflates two aspects: splitting complex sentences into clauses and the extraction of propositions.  It is thus difficult to independently determine the quality of the proposition extraction step.  ከrestaurant መልዕክቶች በተለየ ክፍሎች መካከል የሚለይ ክፍሎች እና የማያደርጉት ክፍሎች መካከል የሚለየውን የውይይት አካባቢ ዳታ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የፍላጎት አካሄዱ ዳታ ሰርቨሮች በተቃውሞ እና በተጨማሪው ግንኙነት ላይ የውጤት ውጤት ስርዓቶችን በማስተካከል በብልሃት እና በተጨማሪው ክስተት እንዲያስተካክል ይችላል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የድምፅ ውጤቶች በተጨማሪው ውጤቶች ላይ ሲያሳየው፣ በአንድ ስርዓት በትክክል እና በተጨማሪው ክፍሎች ላይ ጥሩ እንዲያደርጉ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የተለያዩ ዓይነቶች አካባቢ ቋንቋዎች ለብዙዎቹ ሥርዓቶች ችግር እንዲሆን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'sw': 'Uchaguzi wa sheria kutoka hukumu ni jukumu muhimu kwa mfumo wa utekelezaji wa taarifa Kupima mifumo kama hizi mara nyingi huzungumzia vipengele viwili: Kugawanya hukumu tatizo katika vipengele na utekelezaji wa pendekezo. Kwa hiyo ni vigumu kuamua ubora wa hatua ya utekelezaji wa pendekezo hilo. Tunaweza kutengeneza taarifa za pendekezo lililotengenezwa kwa mikononi kutoka hukumu zilizochukuliwa kutoka kwenye mtazamo wa mgahawa unaofautiana na vipengele vinavyopaswa kugawanyika na wale wasio. Taasisi ya taarifa za uchunguzi wa pendekezo zinazosababisha inatuwezesha kuunganisha kwa uhuru na utendaji wa mfumo wa uteuzi wa mapendekezo katika vipengele rahisi na vigumu. Ingawa utendaji unapungua kwa kiasi kikubwa kwenye sentensi tata zaidi, tunaonyesha kuwa mfumo huo unafanya vizuri zaidi katika vipengele rahisi na vigumu. Furthermore, we show that specific kinds of subordinate clauses pose difficulties to most systems.', 'hy': "Պատասխաններից արտադրված առաջարկները տեղեկատվական համակարգերի արտադրման կարևոր խնդիր են, այս համակարգերի գնահատումը սովորաբար խառնում է երկու ասպեկտներ' բարդ նախադասությունների բաժանելը պայմաններով և առաջարկների արտադրումը: Այսպիսով, դժվար է անկախ որոշել առաջարկության վերացման քայլի որակը: Մենք ստեղծում ենք ձեռքով գրված առաջարկների տվյալներ ռեստորանների վերլուծություններից վերցված նախադասություններից, որոնք տարբերակում են բաժանվող և ոչ բաժանվող կանոնների միջև: The resulting proposition evaluation dataset allows us to independently compare the performance of proposition extraction systems on simple and complex clauses.  Although performance drastically drops on more complex sentences, we show that the same systems perform best on both simple and complex clauses.  Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ հատուկ տեսակի ենթակապակցված պայմանները դժվարություններ են առաջացնում համակարգերի մեծ մասի համար:", 'af': "Voorskrifte uittrek van setinge is 'n belangrike taak vir inligting uittrek stelsels Evaluering van sodanige stelsels is gewoonlik twee aspekte in gelyk: verdeel van komplekse setinge in klauses en uittrek van voorskrifte. Dit is so moeilik om onôfhanklik die kwaliteit van die voorstel uittrekking stap te bepaal. Ons skep 'n hand aangetelde voorstellingsdatastel van setinge wat van restaurant hersienings geneem word wat tussen klauses verkies wat moet geskep word en die wat nie doen nie. Die resulteerde voorstellings evaluering datastel laat ons toe om die prestasie van voorstellings uittrekking stelsels op eenvoudige en komplekse klauses te vergelyk. Alhoewel die prestasie drastiese val op meer komplekse setings, wys ons dat dieselfde stelsels beter uitvoer op eenvoudige en komplekse klauses. Ons wys ook dat spesifieke soorte subordeente klauses moeilikhede aan die meeste stelsels stel.", 'az': 'Sözümlərdən təkrar çıxarılması məlumatlar çıxarılması sistemlərin değerlendirməsi olaraq iki aspektə qarışır: kompleks cümlələri klauzulara bölüşdürmək və təsirlərin çıxarılması. Bu qədər təklif çıxarma adımının keyfiyyətini bağımsız təyin etmək çətin. Biz restoran tərzimlərindən alınan cümlələrdən əlavə bildirilmiş tərzim verilənlərin qurmasını yaratdıq ki, ayrılması lazım olan və olmayan clauslar arasında ayırır. Sonra gələn təbliğ değerlendirmə verilər qutusu bizə sadəcə və kompleks klauzularla təbliğ etmə sistemlərinin performansını müəyyən edilməsinə imkan verir. Həqiqətən, performans daha kompleks cümlələr üzərində drastik düşmüş olsa da, aynı sistemlər hər ikisinin basit və kompleks clausunda ən yaxşı işlər edir. Daha çox sistemlərə çətin olanları göstəririk.', 'bn': 'সাধারণত এই সিস্টেমের বিনিময়ে তথ্য বের করার জন্য প্রযুক্ত কাজ: কমপ্লিকেল বিভক্ত করা এবং প্রস্তাবের বিনিময়ে বিভক্ত করা হয়। এভাবেই স্বাধীনভাবে প্রস্তাব বের করার মান নির্ধারণ করা কঠিন। We create a manually annotated proposition dataset from sentences taken from restaurant reviews that distinguishes between clauses that need to be split and those that do not.  ফলাফলের প্রস্তাবের মূল্যায়নের ডাটাসেট আমাদের স্বাধীনভাবে প্রস্তাব বের করার প্রক্রিয়া সাধারণ এবং জটিল ক্লাসের উপর তুলন যদিও বেশী জটিল বাক্যের উপর প্রদর্শনীর প্রদর্শনীর ক্ষেত্রে ব্যবস্থা নির্মাণ করে, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে একই সিস্টেম সাধারণ এবং জটি এছাড়াও, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে বেশীরভাগ সিস্টেমের জন্য নির্দিষ্ট বিভিন্ন ধরনের সাবভাবে ক্লাসের ক্ষেত্র', 'bs': 'Izvukanje prijedloga iz kazne je važan zadatak za sisteme izvlačenja informacija obično sukladuje sa dva aspekta: podeljenje složenih kazna u klauzule i izvlačenje prijedloga. Tako je teško neovisno odrediti kvalitet koraka izvlačenja prijedloga. Mi stvaramo podatke o prijedlogu iz kazne preuzete iz restoranskih pregleda koje razlikuju klauzule koje moraju biti podijeljene i one koje ne rade. Rezultatni set podataka za procjenu prijedloga omogućava nam da nezavisno usporedimo učinkovitost sustava izvlačenja prijedloga o jednostavnim i kompleksnim klauzulama. Iako izvedba drastično pada na kompleksnije rečenice, pokazujemo da isti sistemi najbolje izvode na jednostavnim i složenim klauzulama. Osim toga, pokazujemo da posebne vrste podordenatnih klauzula predstavljaju teškoće većini sustava.', 'sq': 'Proposition extraction from sentences is an important task for information extraction systems Evaluation of such systems usually conflates two aspects: splitting complex sentences into clauses and the extraction of propositions.  Kështu është e vështirë të përcaktohet në mënyrë të pavarur cilësia e hapit të nxjerrjes së propozimit. We create a manually annotated proposition dataset from sentences taken from restaurant reviews that distinguishes between clauses that need to be split and those that do not.  Të dhënat e vlerësimit të propozimeve që rezultojnë na lejojnë të krahasojmë në mënyrë të pavarur performancën e sistemeve të nxjerrjes së propozimeve në klauzula të thjeshta dhe komplekse. Megjithëse paraqitja bie drastikisht në fjalime më komplekse, ne tregojmë se të njëjtat sisteme bëjnë më të mirën si në klauzula të thjeshta ashtu edhe në klauzula komplekse. Përveç kësaj, ne tregojmë se llojet specifike të klauzulave të nënshtruara paraqesin vështirësi për shumicën e sistemeve.', 'cs': 'Extrakce návrhů z vět je důležitým úkolem pro informační extrakční systémy Hodnocení těchto systémů obvykle spojuje dva aspekty: rozdělení složitých vět do vět a extrakci vět. Proto je obtížné samostatně určit kvalitu kroku extrakce návrhu. Z vět převzatých z recenzí restaurací vytváříme ručně anotovaný datový soubor propozic, který rozlišuje mezi větami, které je třeba rozdělit a těmi, které ne. Výsledná sada hodnocení propozic nám umožňuje nezávisle porovnat výkonnost extrakčních systémů propozic na jednoduchých a složitých klauzulích. Ačkoli výkon drasticky klesá u složitějších vět, ukazujeme, že stejné systémy fungují nejlépe na jednoduchých i složitých větách. Dále ukazujeme, že specifické druhy podřízených doložek představují pro většinu systémů obtíže.', 'ca': "L'extracció de proposicions de frases és una tasca important per sistemes d'extracció d'informació La valoració d'aquests sistemes normalment conflitza dos aspectes: dividir frases complexes en clàusules i l'extracció de proposicions. Així que és difícil determinar de manera independent la qualitat del pas d'extracció de proposició. Creem un conjunt de dades de proposicions anotats manualment a partir de frases fetes de revisions de restaurants que distingeixen entre clàusules que s'han de dividir i les que no. El conjunt de dades d'evaluació de proposicions resultant ens permet comparar de manera independent el rendiment dels sistemes d'extracció de proposicions en clàusules simples i complexes. Encara que el rendiment disminueix dràsticament en frases més complexes, demostram que els mateixos sistemes actuen millor en clàusules simples i complexes. A més, demostram que tipus específics de clàusules subordinades posen dificultats a la majoria dels sistemes.", 'et': 'Ettepanekute ekstraheerimine lausetest on infosüsteemide jaoks oluline ülesanne Selliste süsteemide hindamine ühendab tavaliselt kaks aspekti: keerukate lausete jagamine klausliteks ja ettepanekute ekstraheerimine. Seega on raske sõltumatult kindlaks määrata ettepaneku ekstraheerimisetapi kvaliteeti. Loome käsitsi annoteeritud ettepanekute andmekogumi restorani ülevaatetest võetud lausetest, mis eristab klausleid, mis tuleb jagada ja neid, mis ei ole. Saadud ettepanekute hindamise andmekogum võimaldab meil iseseisvalt võrrelda ettepanekute ekstraheerimise süsteemide toimivust lihtsate ja keerukate klauslite puhul. Kuigi jõudlus väheneb drastiliselt keerulisemate lausete puhul, näitame, et samad süsteemid toimivad kõige paremini nii lihtsate kui ka keeruliste lausete puhul. Lisaks näitame, et konkreetsed allklauslid tekitavad enamikule süsteemidele raskusi.', 'fi': 'Näiden järjestelmien arvioinnissa yhdistyvät yleensä kaksi näkökohtaa: monimutkaisten lauseiden jakaminen lauseisiin ja ehdotusten erottaminen. Näin ollen on vaikea itsenäisesti määrittää ehdotuksen uuttamisvaiheen laatua. Luomme ravintolaarvosteluista käsin annotoidun proposition datajoukon, joka erottaa toisistaan lauseet, jotka on jaettava ja jotka eivät. Tuloksena saadun proposition evaluation aineiston avulla voimme vertailla proposition uuttamisjärjestelmien suorituskykyä itsenäisesti yksinkertaisilla ja monimutkaisilla lausekkeilla. Vaikka suorituskyky laskee huomattavasti monimutkaisemmissa lauseissa, osoitamme, että samat järjestelmät toimivat parhaiten sekä yksinkertaisissa että monimutkaisissa lauseissa. Lisäksi osoitamme, että tietyt toissijaiset lausekkeet aiheuttavat vaikeuksia useimmille järjestelmille.', 'jv': 'Cage Kaya susah-susahe kanggo ngerasakno ning kealitas ning pancen tanggal Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan manut kanggo ngerasakno dadi nggawe sapa perusahaan winih restoran dataset politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Ngitompok, kéné ngerasakno ngono cah-cah sing akeh apat kanggo ngerasar sistem sing apik.', 'he': 'הוצאת הצעה משפטים היא משימה חשובה עבור מערכות הוצאת מידע הערכה של מערכות כאלה בדרך כלל מבלבלת שני היבטים: כך קשה לקבוע באופן עצמאי את איכות צעד ההוצאה. אנו יוצרים קבוצת מידע הצעות שנמצאת בידי משפטים שנלקחו מבחינות מסעדות שמבדקים בין פסקים שצריכים להיפצל ואלה שלא. קבוצת מידע הערכת ההצעה הנוצאה מאפשרת לנו להשוות באופן עצמאי את ההפעלות של מערכות החלץ ההצעה על פסקים פשוטים ומסובכים. למרות שהביצועים נופלים באופן דרסטי על משפטים מורכבים יותר, אנחנו מראים שאותות המערכות מבצעות הכי טובות על פסקים פשוטים וממורכבים. בנוסף, אנחנו מראים שסוגים מסויימים של פסקולים מתורדים יוצרים קשים לרוב המערכות.', 'sk': 'Pridobivanje predlogov iz stavkov je pomembna naloga za sisteme za pridobivanje informacij Vrednotenje takih sistemov običajno združuje dva vidika: razdelitev kompleksnih stavkov v klavzule in pridobivanje predlogov. Zato je težko neodvisno določiti kakovost koraka ekstrakcije predloga. Iz stavkov iz pregledov restavracij ustvarimo ročno označen nabor podatkov o predlogih, ki razlikuje med klavzulami, ki jih je treba razdeliti in tistimi, ki jih ni. Dobljeni nabor podatkov o vrednotenju predlogov nam omogoča neodvisno primerjavo učinkovitosti sistemov za ekstrakcijo predlogov na enostavnih in kompleksnih klavzulah. Čeprav se zmogljivost drastično zmanjša pri bolj kompleksnih stavkih, pokažemo, da isti sistemi delujejo najbolje pri preprostih in kompleksnih stavkih. Poleg tega pokažemo, da posebne vrste podrejenih klavzul povzročajo težave večini sistemov.', 'ha': "Cire cewa daga cewa, yana da wani aikin muhimu wa masu zartar da shiryoyin ayukan ayukan bayani na'urar bayani, Ana nuna wasu na'urar wannan na'ura ko da ɗabi'a, yana ƙara sauri biyu: rarraba ayuka masu husu'a cikin ƙayyade kuma ana ƙayyade zaɓoyoyai. Ina ƙunci a lokacin ka ƙayyade tsarin hanyarwa na zaɓen fitarwa. Tuna ƙiƙira danna ɗabi'a da hannayen da aka zartar da shi daga gareshi wanda aka riƙe daga kafiratan, da rarrabe tsakanin ayuka da za'a tsãge su da waɗanda ba su sani ba. QXml Kuma kõ da mafarin aiki na ƙara kan sigarin da aka fi tsanani, sai mu nuna cewa masu daidaita na'ura masu amfani da su masu sauran da kuma masu husũma. Furan haka, Munã nũna wa wasu misãlai na dabam'a masu nau'i ne ga masu ƙaranci.", 'bo': 'ཚིག་གི་གནས་བཤད་ཀྱི་དམིགས་བསལ་ནི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གསར་བསྐྲུན་གྱི་མ་ལག རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་རྒྱས་བཤད་ཀྱི་གཞན་རྩིས་ཐོག་གི་ཁྱད་ཚད་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་གཏན་ཁེལ་ཐབས་མེད། ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་གསལ་རྗེས་ཐོག་ལས་དུས་གཏོང་བའི་ཚིག་རྗེས་ཐོག་ལས་སྤྱོད་པའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཆར་བརྗོད་བྱས་ཙམ་མེ འོན་ཀྱང་། རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གྱི་བསམ་ཚུལ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་གིས་ང་ཚོར་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་འཆར་ལས་འཕར་རིས་ལག་སྟར་མ འོན་ཀྱང་། ལས་སྒྲུབ་གྱིས་ཚོར་ཆུང་ཧ་ཅང་བ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་འིས་ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དམིགས་པ་དེ་མ་ལག་གི་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་དཀའ་ངལ་བྱུང་བ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Automatic Question Answering for Medical MCQs : Can It go Further than Information Retrieval?', 'ar': 'الإجابة التلقائية عن الأسئلة المتعلقة بأسئلة الأسئلة الشائعة (MCQs) الطبية: هل يمكن أن تذهب إلى أبعد من استرجاع المعلومات؟', 'fr': "Réponse automatique aux questions pour les QCM médicaux\xa0: est-ce que cela peut aller plus loin que la récupération d'informations\xa0?", 'pt': 'Resposta automática de perguntas para MCQs médicos: pode ir além da recuperação de informações?', 'es': 'Respuesta automática a preguntas para preguntas frecuentes médicas: ¿puede ir más allá de la recuperación de información?', 'ja': '医療用MCQの自動質問回答：情報検索よりも先に進めることはできますか？', 'hi': 'मेडिकल MCQs के लिए स्वचालित प्रश्न उत्तर: क्या यह सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति से आगे बढ़ सकता है?', 'ru': 'Автоматический ответ на вопросы для медицинских MCQ: Может ли он пойти дальше, чем извлечение информации?', 'zh': '医MCQ自问:能远于信息检索乎?', 'ga': 'Freagra Uathoibríoch ar Cheisteanna le haghaidh Ceisteanna Coitianta Míochaine: An Féidir leis Dul Níos faide ná Aisghabháil Faisnéise?', 'ka': 'ავტომატიკური კითხვების პასუხი მედიციო MCQs: შეიძლება იქნება ინფორმაციის მიღება დამატებით?', 'el': 'Αυτόματη απάντηση ερωτήσεων για ιατρικές Μπορεί να πάει πέρα από την ανάκτηση πληροφοριών;', 'hu': 'Automatikus kérdések megválaszolása orvosi MCQ-k esetében: Lehet, hogy tovább menjen, mint az információk visszaszerezése?', 'it': 'Risposta automatica alle domande per MCQ medici: Può andare oltre il recupero delle informazioni?', 'lt': 'Automatic Question Answering for Medical MCQs: Can It go Further than Information Retrieval?', 'mk': 'Автоматски одговор на прашања за медицинските MCQ: Може ли да оди понатаму од добивањето информации?', 'kk': 'Медицикалық MCQs- ге автоматты сұрақ жауап беру: Мәліметті алу алдында артық бола ма?', 'ms': 'Jawapan soalan automatik untuk MCQ perubatan: Boleh ia pergi lebih jauh daripada Pemulihan Maklumat?', 'mt': 'Rispons Awtomatiku għal Mistoqsijiet għal MCQs Mediċi: Tista’ tmur lil hinn mill-ksib ta’ informazzjoni?', 'ml': 'മെഡിക്കല്\u200d എംസിക്യൂസിന്റെ ഉത്തരം സ്വയം ചോദ്യം: വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പോകാന', 'mn': 'Автоматтын асуултын хариулт: Мэдээлэл татгалзаас илүү байж болох уу?', 'no': 'Automatisk svar på spørsmål for medisinske MCQs: Kan det gå meir enn informasjonshenting?', 'pl': 'Automatyczne odpowiadanie na pytania dla medycznych MCQ: Czy może iść dalej niż pozyskiwanie informacji?', 'ro': 'Răspunsul automat la întrebări pentru MCQ medicale: Poate merge mai departe decât recuperarea informațiilor?', 'sr': 'Odgovor na automatsko pitanje za medicinske MCQs: Može li ići dalje od prikupljanja informacija?', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් MCQs වෙනුවෙන්: ඒක තොරතුරු අල්ලගන්න පුළුවන', 'so': "Jawaabta su'aalaha bilowga ah ee MCQ: Miyey u socon kartaa wax ka sii dheeraad ah bogga soo celinta macluumaadka?", 'sv': 'Automatiskt frågesvar för medicinska MCQs: Kan det gå längre än informationshämtning?', 'ta': 'மருத்துவ எம்சிகியூகளுக்கு தானாகவே கேள்வி பதில்: தகவல் மீட்டுதலை விட அதிகமாக செல்ல முடியுமா?', 'ur': 'پزشکی MCQs کے لئے اپنا سؤال جواب دیتا ہے: کیا یہ معلومات پھیرنے سے زیادہ جاسکتا ہے؟', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trả lời câu hỏi tự động cho các MCQs y khoa: Nó có thể đi xa hơn Thu thập thông tin không?', 'bg': 'Автоматично отговаряне на въпроси за медицински МКК: Може ли да отиде по-далеч от събирането на информация?', 'hr': 'Odgovor na automatsko pitanje za medicinske MCQs: Može li ići dalje od prikupljanja informacija?', 'da': 'Automatisk spørgsmål besvarelse af medicinsk MCQs: Kan det gå videre end information hentning?', 'nl': 'Automatisch Vragen Beantwoord voor Medische MCQs: Kan het verder gaan dan Informatie Ophalen?', 'de': 'Automatische Beantwortung von Fragen für medizinische MCQs: Kann es weiter gehen als Information Retrieval?', 'ko': '의학 MCQ의 자동 퀴즈: 정보 검색보다 더 진일보할 수 있을까?', 'id': 'Jawaban Pertanyaan Otomatis untuk MCQ Medis: Bisakah lebih jauh dari Penerimaan Informasi?', 'sw': 'Swali lazima la kujibu MCQ: Je, Inaweza kwenda zaidi kuliko kurudishwa kwa taarifa?', 'sq': 'Automatic Question Answering for Medical MCQs: Can It go Further than Information Retrieval?', 'am': 'የጥያቄ መልስ ለማህበራዊ MCQ: ከመረጃ መመለስ ይችላልን?', 'hy': 'Բժշկական MCQ-ների հեռավոր հարցերի պատասխանը. Կարո՞ղ է այն գնալ ավելի հեռու, քան տեղեկատվության ստանալը:', 'fa': 'پاسخ سوال خودکار برای MCQs پزشکی: آیا می تواند بیشتر از بازیابی اطلاعات بروید؟', 'az': 'T톛bbi MCQs 칲칞칲n otomatik sual cavab verir: Bu m톛lumatlardan daha 칞ox olar?', 'tr': 'Sanal MCK üçin otomatik soragy jogap berilip: Bu Maglumaty Eşitden Gaýtalap bilermi?', 'af': 'Outomatiese vraag Antwoord vir Mediese MCQ: Kan dit gaan Verder as Informasie Herhaal?', 'bn': 'মেডিকেল এমসিকিউর জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয় প্রশ্নের উত্তর: তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধারের চেয়ে আরো বেশি যেতে পারে?', 'bs': 'Odgovor na automatsko pitanje za medicinske MCQs: Može li ići dalje od prikupljanja informacija?', 'et': 'Automaatne küsimustele vastamine meditsiinilistele MCQdele: kas see võib minna kaugemale kui teabe hankimine?', 'fi': 'Automaattinen kysymysvastaus lääketieteellisille MCQ: Voiko se mennä pidemmälle kuin tietojen nouto?', 'cs': 'Automatick챕 zodpov휎zen챠 ot찼zek pro l챕ka힂sk챕 MCQ: M킁탑e j챠t d찼l ne탑 z챠sk찼v찼n챠 informac챠?', 'ca': "Resposta automàtica a preguntes per MCQ mèdics: Pot anar més enllà de la recepció d'informació?", 'jv': 'Automatically question responses for therapist', 'sk': 'Samodejno odgovarjanje na vprašanja za medicinske MCQ: Ali lahko gre dlje kot pridobivanje informacij?', 'he': 'תשובה אוטומטית לשאלות עבור MCQ רפואי: האם זה יכול ללכת רחוק משיגת מידע?', 'ha': 'Qs', 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལ་ལན་གསལ་མཁན་གྱི་MCQs(Medical MCQs)ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལ་ལན་གསལ་མེད་པ། དེ་གསལ་བཤད་'}
{'en': 'We present a novel approach to automatic question answering that does not depend on the performance of an information retrieval (IR) system and does not require that the training data come from the same source as the questions. We evaluate the system performance on a challenging set of university-level medical science multiple-choice questions. Best performance is achieved when combining a neural approach with an IR approach, both of which work independently. Unlike previous approaches, the system achieves statistically significant improvement over the random guess baseline even for questions that are labeled as challenging based on the performance of baseline solvers.', 'ar': 'نقدم طريقة جديدة للإجابة التلقائية للأسئلة لا تعتمد على أداء نظام استرجاع المعلومات (IR) ولا تتطلب أن تأتي بيانات التدريب من نفس مصدر الأسئلة. نقوم بتقييم أداء النظام على مجموعة صعبة من أسئلة الاختيار من متعدد في العلوم الطبية على مستوى الجامعة. يتم تحقيق أفضل أداء عند الجمع بين نهج عصبي ونهج IR ، وكلاهما يعمل بشكل مستقل. على عكس الأساليب السابقة ، يحقق النظام تحسينًا مهمًا إحصائيًا على خط الأساس للتخمين العشوائي حتى بالنسبة للأسئلة التي تم تصنيفها على أنها صعبة بناءً على أداء الحلول الأساسية.', 'es': 'Presentamos un enfoque novedoso para la respuesta automática a preguntas que no depende del rendimiento de un sistema de recuperación de información (IR) y no requiere que los datos de capacitación provengan de la misma fuente que las preguntas. Evaluamos el rendimiento del sistema en un conjunto desafiante de preguntas de opción múltiple de ciencias médicas de nivel universitario. El mejor rendimiento se logra cuando se combina un enfoque neuronal con un enfoque IR, ambos funcionan de forma independiente. A diferencia de los enfoques anteriores, el sistema logra una mejora estadísticamente significativa con respecto a la línea de base de estimación aleatoria, incluso para preguntas que se etiquetan como desafiantes en función del rendimiento de los solucionadores de referencia.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma nova abordagem para resposta automática de perguntas que não depende do desempenho de um sistema de recuperação de informações (IR) e não requer que os dados de treinamento venham da mesma fonte que as perguntas. Avaliamos o desempenho do sistema em um conjunto desafiador de perguntas de múltipla escolha em ciências médicas de nível universitário. O melhor desempenho é alcançado ao combinar uma abordagem neural com uma abordagem IR, ambas funcionando de forma independente. Ao contrário das abordagens anteriores, o sistema alcança uma melhoria estatisticamente significativa em relação à linha de base de estimativa aleatória, mesmo para perguntas rotuladas como desafiadoras com base no desempenho dos solucionadores de linha de base.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une nouvelle approche de la réponse automatique aux questions qui ne dépend pas de la performance d'un système de récupération d'informations (IR) et qui n'exige pas que les données de formation proviennent de la même source que les questions. Nous évaluons les performances du système sur un ensemble complexe de questions à choix multiples en sciences médicales de niveau universitaire. Les meilleures performances sont obtenues en combinant une approche neuronale et une approche IR, qui fonctionnent toutes deux indépendamment. Contrairement aux approches précédentes, le système obtient une amélioration statistiquement significative par rapport à la base des suppositions aléatoires, même pour les questions étiquetées comme difficiles en fonction des performances des solveurs de référence.", 'ja': '情報検索（ IR ）システムのパフォーマンスに依存せず、トレーニングデータが質問と同じソースから提供されることを必要としない、自動質問回答の新規アプローチを提示します。私たちは、大学レベルの医学多肢選択式質問の難しいセットでシステムのパフォーマンスを評価します。最高のパフォーマンスは、ニューラルアプローチとIRアプローチを組み合わせたときに達成されます。どちらも独立して機能します。これまでのアプローチとは異なり、システムは、ベースラインソルバーのパフォーマンスに基づいて挑戦的とラベル付けされた質問であっても、ランダムな推測ベースラインよりも統計的に有意な改善を達成する。', 'zh': '新自问答,不依信息检索(IR)统,不求训数以同本末。 我们评料了一朋挑战性的大学级医学多选择题的系统性能。 合神经于IR,可以获得最佳性,二者皆可以独立。 与前法不同,比于随机测基线,当系统虽基线求解器之性,表为挑战性,亦能通计上显进。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем новый подход к автоматическому ответу на вопросы, который не зависит от производительности системы поиска информации (IR) и не требует, чтобы обучающие данные поступали из того же источника, что и вопросы. Мы оцениваем производительность системы на сложном наборе вопросов с множественным выбором для медицинских наук университетского уровня. Наилучшая производительность достигается при совмещении нейронного подхода с ИК подходом, оба из которых работают независимо. В отличие от предыдущих подходов, система достигает статистически значимого улучшения по сравнению с базовым уровнем случайных предположений даже для вопросов, которые помечены как сложные на основе производительности решателей базового уровня.', 'hi': 'हम स्वचालित प्रश्न उत्तर देने के लिए एक उपन्यास दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति (आईआर) प्रणाली के प्रदर्शन पर निर्भर नहीं करता है और इसकी आवश्यकता नहीं है कि प्रशिक्षण डेटा प्रश्नों के समान स्रोत से आए। हम विश्वविद्यालय स्तर के चिकित्सा विज्ञान बहुविकल्पीय प्रश्नों के एक चुनौतीपूर्ण सेट पर सिस्टम प्रदर्शन का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। आईआर दृष्टिकोण के साथ एक तंत्रिका दृष्टिकोण के संयोजन पर सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन प्राप्त किया जाता है, जो दोनों स्वतंत्र रूप से काम करते हैं। पिछले दृष्टिकोणों के विपरीत, सिस्टम यादृच्छिक अनुमान बेसलाइन पर सांख्यिकीय रूप से महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्राप्त करता है, यहां तक कि उन प्रश्नों के लिए भी जिन्हें बेसलाइन सॉल्वर के प्रदर्शन के आधार पर चुनौतीपूर्ण के रूप में लेबल किया जाता है।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid cur chuige nua i láthair maidir le freagra uathoibríoch ceisteanna nach mbraitheann ar fheidhmiú córais aisghabhála faisnéise (IR) agus nach n-éilíonn go dtiocfaidh na sonraí oiliúna ón bhfoinse chéanna leis na ceisteanna. Déanaimid meastóireacht ar fheidhmíocht an chórais ar thacar dúshlánach ceisteanna ilroghnacha eolaíocht leighis ag leibhéal na hollscoile. Baintear an fheidhmíocht is fearr amach nuair a chomhcheanglaítear cur chuige néarúil le cur chuige IR, a oibríonn an dá cheann acu go neamhspleách. Murab ionann agus cuir chuige roimhe seo, baineann an córas feabhas suntasach go staitistiúil amach ar an mbonnlíne tomhais randamach fiú i gcás ceisteanna atá lipéadaithe mar dhúshlánach bunaithe ar fheidhmíocht na réititheoirí bonnlíne.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση για την αυτόματη απάντηση ερωτήσεων που δεν εξαρτάται από την απόδοση ενός συστήματος ανάκτησης πληροφοριών (IR) και δεν απαιτεί τα δεδομένα κατάρτισης να προέρχονται από την ίδια πηγή με τις ερωτήσεις. Αξιολογούμε την απόδοση του συστήματος σε ένα απαιτητικό σύνολο θεμάτων ιατρικής επιστήμης πανεπιστημιακού επιπέδου πολλαπλών επιλογών. Η καλύτερη απόδοση επιτυγχάνεται όταν συνδυάζεται μια νευρωνική προσέγγιση με μια προσέγγιση υπερύθρων, οι οποίες λειτουργούν ανεξάρτητα. Σε αντίθεση με τις προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις, το σύστημα επιτυγχάνει στατιστικά σημαντική βελτίωση έναντι της βάσης τυχαίας εικασίας ακόμη και για ερωτήσεις που χαρακτηρίζονται ως προκλητικές με βάση την απόδοση των λύσεων βάσης.', 'hu': 'Olyan új megközelítést mutatunk be az automatikus kérdésre, amely nem függ egy információvisszakereső (IR) rendszer teljesítményétől, és nem követeli meg, hogy a képzési adatok ugyanabból a forrásból származjanak, mint a kérdések. A rendszer teljesítményét kihívást jelentő egyetemi szintű orvostudományi többválasztású kérdések során értékeljük. A legjobb teljesítmény akkor érhető el, ha egy idegi megközelítést és egy IR megközelítést kombinál, amely mindkettő önállóan működik. A korábbi megközelítésektől eltérően a rendszer statisztikailag szignifikáns javulást ér el a véletlenszerű találgatási alaphelyzethez képest még olyan kérdések esetében is, amelyeket kihívásnak minősítenek a kiindulási megoldók teljesítménye alapján.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ავტომატიკური კითხვის პასუხისთვის პრომენტის მიღება, რომელიც არ დააყენებს ინფორმაციის მიღება (IR) სისტემის გამოყენებაზე და არ მოჭირდება, რომ განაყენება მონაცემები იგივე ფეს ჩვენ სისტემის გამოყენებას გავამუშავებთ განსაზღვრებელი სამუშაო სამუშაო სუნივერტის მედიცინური მეცნიერების განსაზღვრება. საუკეთესო გამოსახულება იქნება, როდესაც ნეიროლური დაწყება IR დაწყებით, რომელიც ორივე მუშაობაში მუშაობა. მიმდინარე წინაღების განმავლობაში, სისტემა სტატისტიკურად მნიშვნელოვანი გაუქმედება შემდეგ გადაწყვეტილებელი წინაღებისთვის, მაგრამ კითხვებისთვის, რომლებიც აღნიშვნენ, რო', 'it': 'Presentiamo un nuovo approccio alla risposta automatica alle domande che non dipende dalle prestazioni di un sistema di recupero delle informazioni (IR) e non richiede che i dati di formazione provengano dalla stessa fonte delle domande. Valutiamo le prestazioni del sistema su una serie impegnativa di domande a risposta multipla di scienze mediche a livello universitario. Le migliori prestazioni si ottengono combinando un approccio neurale con un approccio IR, entrambi funzionanti indipendentemente. A differenza degli approcci precedenti, il sistema ottiene un miglioramento statisticamente significativo rispetto alla base di ipotesi casuali anche per le domande che sono etichettate come impegnative in base alle prestazioni dei risolutori di base.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame naują požiūrį į automatinį atsakymą į klausimus, kuris nepriklauso nuo informacijos gavimo (IR) sistemos veikimo ir nereikalauja, kad mokymo duomenys būtų gauti iš to paties šaltinio kaip ir klausimai. Vertiname sistemos veiksmingumą sprendžiant sudėtingus universiteto lygmens medicinos mokslo klausimus, susijusius su įvairiais pasirinkimais. Geriausi rezultatai pasiekti derinant nervinį metodą su IR metodu, kurie veikia nepriklausomai. Priešingai nei ankstesni metodai, sistema statistiškai reikšmingai pagerina atsitiktinių spėjimų pradinę vertę net ir tais klausimais, kurie yra pažymėti kaip sunkūs, remiantis pradinių tirpiklių veiksmingumu.', 'kk': 'Біз автоматты сұрақтардың жауап беру (IR) жүйесіне тәуелді емес, оқыту деректері сұрақтардың бір көзінен келтірілмейді. Біз жүйелік әрекеттерін бірнеше таңдау сұрақтарының көпшілікті университеттік деңгейіндегі медицина ғылымдарын бағалаймыз. Невралдық қасиеттерді IR қасиеттерімен біріктіру кезінде ең жақсы әрекеттер жеткізіледі, екеуі бөлек жұмыс істейді. Алдыңғы жағдайларына қарамастан, жүйе негізгі шешімдердің жылдамдығына негізделген сұрақтар үшін, кездейсоқ жағдайлардың негізгі жұмысына арналған сұрақтардың негізінде статистикалық түрлі жақсартыл', 'mk': 'Презентираме нов пристап до автоматски одговор на прашања кој не зависи од извршувањето на системот за преземање информации (IR) и не бара податоците за обука да доаѓаат од истиот извор како и прашањата. Ги проценуваме системските резултати на тешки прашања за медицинска наука на универзитетско ниво. Најдобрите резултати се постигнуваат кога се комбинира неурален пристап со ИР пристап, кои двете функционираат независно. За разлика од претходните пристапи, системот постигнува статистички значително подобрување во однос на базата на случајните претпоставувања дури и за прашања кои се означени како предизвикувачки базирани на резултатите на основните решители.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan baru untuk menjawab soalan automatik yang tidak bergantung pada prestasi sistem pemulihan maklumat (IR) dan tidak memerlukan data latihan datang dari sumber yang sama dengan soalan. Kami menilai prestasi sistem pada set cabaran sains perubatan tahap universiti soalan-pilihan berbilang. Performasi terbaik dicapai bila menggabungkan pendekatan saraf dengan pendekatan IR, kedua-duanya berfungsi secara bebas. Tidak seperti pendekatan terdahulu, sistem mencapai peningkatan statistik yang signifikan atas dasar tekaan rawak walaupun untuk soalan yang ditanda sebagai cabaran berdasarkan prestasi penyelesair dasar.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഉത്തരം നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവലിന്റെ വഴിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നു. അത് വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വീണ്ടെടുക്ക യൂണിവേഴ്സിറ്റിയിലെ മെഡിക്കല്\u200d ശാസ്ത്ര ശാസ്ത്രത്തിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രകടനത്തെ വി ഒരു ന്യൂറല്\u200d നടപടിയുമായി കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d എത്തിയെടുക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d രണ് മുമ്പുള്ള മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്തമായി സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത്', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw approċċ ġdid għat-tweġiba awtomatika għall-mistoqsijiet li ma jiddependix fuq il-prestazzjoni ta’ sistema ta’ ġbir ta’ informazzjoni (IR) u ma jirrikjedix li d-dejta tat-taħriġ tiġi mill-istess sors bħall-mistoqsijiet. Nivvalutaw il-prestazzjoni tas-sistema fuq sett ta’ sfidi ta’ mistoqsijiet ta’ għa żla multipla fix-xjenza medika fil-livell universitarju. L-a ħjar prestazzjoni tinkiseb meta jiġi kkombinat approċċ newrali ma’ approċċ IR, li t-tnejn jaħdmu b’mod indipendenti. Għall-kuntrarju tal-approċċi preċedenti, is-sistema tikseb titjib statistikament sinifikanti fuq il-linja bażi tal-ħsibijiet aleatorji anki għal mistoqsijiet li huma ttikkettati bħala sfida bbażati fuq il-prestazzjoni tas-solventi tal-linja bażi.', 'mn': 'Бид автоматически асуултын хариултын шинэ арга зам өгдөг. Энэ нь мэдээллийг авах (IR) системээс хамаарахгүй ба сургалт өгөгдлийг асуултуудтай адилхан эх үүсвэрээс гаргах хэрэггүй. Бид системийн үйл ажиллагааг университетийн түвшинд эмнэлгийн шинжлэх ухааны олон сонголт асуултын тухай шаардлагатай. Хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагаа нь мэдрэлийн ойлголтыг IR арга замаар нэгтгэх үед гарч ирнэ. Хоёулаа ганцаараа ажилладаг. Өмнөх ойлголтын ялгаа, систем нь суурь шугамын шийдвэрлэгчдийн үйл ажиллагааны үндсэн асуултууд болон санамсаргүй санааны суурь шугам дээр статистик хэмжээтэй сайжруулж чадна.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein novel tilnærming til automatisk spørsmål som ikkje avhengig av utviklinga av eit informasjonshenting (IR) system og krev ikkje at opplæringsdata kommer frå same kjelde som spørsmålene. Vi evaluerer systemutviklinga på eit vanskeleg sett med universitetsvitenskap med fleire val. Den beste utviklinga er oppnådd når ein neuralnærminga kombinerer med ein IR-tilnærming, både arbeider uavhengig. I motsetning til førre tilnærmingar, oppnår systemet statistisk betydelig forbedring over tilfeldig gjette baselinja sjølv for spørsmål som er merket som vanskeleg basert på utviklinga av baselinjesløysar.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm o abordare nouă a răspunsului automat la întrebări care nu depinde de performanța unui sistem de recuperare a informațiilor (IR) și nu necesită ca datele de formare să provină din aceeași sursă ca întrebările. Evaluăm performanța sistemului pe un set provocator de întrebări de știință medicală la nivel universitar cu răspuns multiplu. Cea mai bună performanță se obține atunci când combină o abordare neurală cu o abordare IR, ambele lucrând independent. Spre deosebire de abordările anterioare, sistemul obține o îmbunătățire semnificativă statistic față de valoarea de referință a presupunerii aleatorii chiar și în cazul întrebărilor care sunt etichetate ca fiind provocatoare pe baza performanței solutorilor de referință.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy nowatorskie podejście do automatycznego odpowiadania na pytania, które nie zależy od wydajności systemu odzyskiwania informacji (IR) i nie wymaga, aby dane treningowe pochodziły z tego samego źródła co pytania. Oceniamy wydajność systemu na wymagającym zestawie pytań wielokrotnego wyboru na poziomie uniwersyteckim medycyny. Najlepszą wydajność osiąga się przy połączeniu podejścia neuronowego z podejściem IR, które obie działają niezależnie. W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich podejść system osiąga statystycznie znaczącą poprawę w stosunku do losowych odgadywań bazowych nawet w przypadku pytań, które są oznaczone jako trudne w oparciu o wydajność rozwiązań bazowych.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo nov pristup automatskom odgovoru na pitanje koja ne zavisi od učinka sustava prikupljanja informacija (IR) i ne zahteva da podaci obuke dolaze iz istog izvora kao i pitanja. Procjenjujemo sistemski izvedbe na izazovnom setu medicinskih pitanja na nivou univerziteta. Najbolji nastup se postigne kada se kombinira neuralni pristup sa IR pristupom, koji oboje rade nezavisno. Za razliku od prethodnih pristupa, sistem postiže statistički značajno poboljšanje nad nasumičnim pogodima čak i za pitanja koje su označene kao izazovne na osnovu provedbe početnih rješavača.', 'si': 'අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න (IR) පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසිද අපි පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස්ත්වයේ වෛද්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද හොඳම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා IR ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරන්න, ඒ දෙන්නම ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් වැඩ කරන්න. මුලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වි', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett nytt tillvägagångssätt för automatiskt frågesvar som inte beror på prestanda hos ett informationshämtningssystem (IR) och som inte kräver att träningsdata kommer från samma källa som frågorna. Vi utvärderar systemets prestanda på en utmanande uppsättning medicinska frågor på universitetsnivå. Bästa prestanda uppnås när man kombinerar en neural approach med en IR approach, som båda fungerar självständigt. Till skillnad från tidigare tillvägagångssätt uppnår systemet statistiskt signifikant förbättring jämfört med baslinjen för slumpmässiga gissningar även för frågor som är märkta som utmanande baserat på prestanda hos baslinjen lösare.', 'so': "Waxaannu keennaa qaabab warqad ah oo a an ka jawaabayno su'aalo automatic ah oo aan ku xirnayn sameynta nidaamka helitaanka macluumaadka (IR) oo aan u baahneyn in macluumaadka waxbarashadu ay ka timaadaan asalka su'aalaha oo kale. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa muuqashada nidaamka oo ku saabsan su'aalo kala duwan oo iskuulka caafimaadka ee jaamacadda. Waxaa la sameynayaa sameynta ugu wanaagsan marka lagu soo ururiyo qaab caqabad ah oo IR ah, kaasoo labadoodaba si xor ah u shaqeeya. Iska duwan qaababka hore, nidaamka wuxuu ka helaa kororsasho qiimaan ah oo ka sii korodhsan qoraalka qiyaasta ah, xataa su'aalaha looga magacaabay inay tacliin ku saleysan sameynta sameynta qoraalka.", 'ta': 'நாம் தானியங்கி கேள்வி பதில் கேட்கும் ஒரு புதிய செயல்பாட்டை கொண்டுள்ளோம். அது தகவல் மீட்டெடுக்கும் (IR) அமைப்பின் சார்ந்திருக்காத கல்லூரி நிலையில் மருத்துவ அறிவியல் பல தேர்வு கேள்வி சிறந்த செயல்பாடு அடைக்கப்படும் போது ஒரு புதிய அணுக்கத்தை IR சேர்க்கும் போது, அதில் இருவரும் தனிப்பட்ட செயல் முந்தைய செயல்பாடுகளை வித்தியாசமாக முறைமையில், முறைமையில் குறிப்பிட்ட முன்னேற்றம் பெறுகிறது குறிப்பிட்ட எண்ணுக்கைக்கு மே', 'ur': 'ہم اپنی سؤال کے جواب کے لئے ایک نئی طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں جو کوئی معلومات حاصل کرنے (IR) سیسٹم کے اعتباری پر نابستہ نہیں ہے اور اس کی نیاز نہیں ہے کہ تدریس ڈیٹا اسی طرح سے آئے۔ ہم نے یونیورسیٹ سطح کے مطابق بہت سی انتخاب کے سوال کے مشکل سطح پر سیستم کی پرورش کا ارزش کیا ہے بہترین عملکرد حاصل کی جاتی ہے جب ایک نیورال تقریبا IR کے ساتھ مل جاتی ہے، ان دونوں کو آپس میں کام کرتا ہے. پہلے کی تقریبا کے بغیر، سیستم نے ایسٹیسیٹی طور پر اضافی اضافہ کر دی ہے کہ اسٹیسیٹ اسٹیسیٹ لین کے ذریعہ اسٹیسیٹ لین پر بھی اضافہ ہو جاتی ہے، اگرچہ اسٹیسیٹ لین حل کرنے والوں کے عملکرد پر بھی اضا', 'uz': "Biz avtomatik savol javob beruvchi yangilikni hozir qilamiz, bu maʼlumot olish tizimi (IR) tizimini bajarishga murakkab emas va maslahatlaridan foydalanish uchun taʼminlovchi maʼlumot kerak emas. Biz tizimning tasavvurini ko'p ta'minlovchi darajadagi darajadagi darajada o'qituvchimiz. IR usuli bilan birlashtirilganda eng yaxshi bajarish imkoniyatini amalga oshirish mumkin, bu ikkita ikkita ishni o'xshab qiladi. Oldingi usullar boʻyicha, tizim cheksiz hisoblanuvchi baseline asosida statistik juda muhim improvementni bajaradi. Xato, asosiy soʻzlar asosida bajariladigan maslahatlarni bajarishga qaramadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp mới để trả lời câu hỏi tự động không phụ thuộc vào hiệu quả của một hệ thống truy tìm thông tin (IR) và không yêu cầu dữ liệu đào tạo đến từ cùng nguồn với các câu hỏi. Chúng tôi đánh giá khả năng hệ thống trên một tập đầy đủ các câu hỏi khoa học y khoa đa lựa chọn đại học. Hiệu quả tốt nhất khi kết hợp hệ thần kinh với một khả năng hồng ngoại, cả hai đều hoạt động độc lập. Không giống các phương pháp trước, hệ thống đạt tới một cải tiến số quan trọng trên cơ sở dự đoán ngẫu nhiên thậm chí đối với những câu hỏi được đánh giá là thách thức dựa trên hiệu quả của các giải quyết.', 'bg': 'Представяме нов подход към автоматичното отговаряне на въпроси, който не зависи от ефективността на системата за извличане на информация (ИР) и не изисква данните за обучение да идват от същия източник като въпросите. Ние оценяваме ефективността на системата по предизвикателен набор от въпроси с многократен избор на медицински науки на университетско ниво. Най-добра производителност се постига при комбиниране на невронен подход с инфрачервен подход, и двата от които работят самостоятелно. За разлика от предишните подходи, системата постига статистически значимо подобрение спрямо базата на случайни предположения дори за въпроси, които са обозначени като предизвикателни въз основа на ефективността на изходните решаващи устройства.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en ny tilgang til automatisk spørgsmålsbesvarelse, der ikke afhænger af effektiviteten af et informationssøgningssystem (IR) og ikke kræver, at træningsdata kommer fra samme kilde som spørgsmålene. Vi evaluerer systemets ydeevne på et udfordrende sæt af medicinsk videnskab multiple-choice spørgsmål på universitetsniveau. Bedste ydeevne opnås ved at kombinere en neural tilgang med en IR tilgang, som begge fungerer uafhængigt. I modsætning til tidligere tilgange opnår systemet statistisk signifikant forbedring i forhold til baseline for tilfældige gæt, selv for spørgsmål, der er mærket som udfordrende baseret på resultaterne af baseline-løsere.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een nieuwe benadering van automatisch antwoord op vragen die niet afhankelijk is van de prestaties van een information retrieval (IR) systeem en niet vereist dat de trainingsgegevens uit dezelfde bron komen als de vragen. We evalueren de systeemprestaties op een uitdagende reeks medische meerkeuzevragen op universitair niveau. De beste prestaties worden bereikt door een neurale benadering te combineren met een IR benadering, die beide onafhankelijk werken. In tegenstelling tot eerdere benaderingen bereikt het systeem statistisch significante verbetering ten opzichte van de random guess baseline, zelfs voor vragen die worden gelabeld als uitdagend op basis van de prestaties van baseline solvers.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo nov pristup automatskom odgovoru na pitanje koja ne zavisi od učinka sustava prikupljanja informacija (IR) i ne zahtijeva da podaci obuke dolaze iz istog izvora kao i pitanja. Procjenjujemo provod sustava na izazovnom setu medicinskih znanstvenih pitanja na razini univerziteta. Najbolji učinkoviti se postignu u kombinaciji neuralnog pristupa s IR pristupom, koji oboje rade nezavisno. Za razliku od prethodnih pristupa, sustav postiže statistički značajno poboljšanje nad nasumičnim početnim pogađanjem čak i za pitanja koje su označene kao izazovne na temelju učinka početnih rješavača.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren einen neuartigen Ansatz zur automatischen Beantwortung von Fragen, der nicht von der Leistung eines Informations-Retrieval-Systems (IR) abhängt und nicht erfordert, dass die Trainingsdaten aus derselben Quelle wie die Fragen stammen. Wir evaluieren die Systemleistung an einer herausfordernden Reihe medizinischer Multiple-Choice-Fragen auf universitärer Ebene. Die beste Leistung wird erzielt, wenn ein neuronaler Ansatz mit einem IR-Ansatz kombiniert wird, die beide unabhängig voneinander arbeiten. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Ansätzen erzielt das System statistisch signifikante Verbesserungen gegenüber der Random-Rate-Baseline auch bei Fragen, die aufgrund der Leistung von Baseline-Lösern als herausfordernd bezeichnet werden.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan pendekatan baru untuk menjawab pertanyaan otomatis yang tidak bergantung pada prestasi sistem penemuan informasi (IR) dan tidak memerlukan bahwa data latihan berasal dari sumber yang sama dengan pertanyaan. Kami mengevaluasi prestasi sistem pada set tantangan sains medis tingkat universitas pertanyaan multi pilihan. Performasi terbaik dicapai ketika menggabungkan pendekatan saraf dengan pendekatan IR, keduanya bekerja secara independen. Tidak seperti pendekatan sebelumnya, sistem mencapai peningkatan statistik yang signifikan atas dasar tebakan acak bahkan untuk pertanyaan yang ditandai sebagai tantangan berdasarkan prestasi penyelesair dasar.', 'ko': '우리는 정보 검색 (IR) 시스템의 성능에 의존하지 않고, 문제와 같은 출처에서 데이터를 훈련하는 것을 요구하지 않는 새로운 자동 퀴즈 방법을 제시했다.우리는 도전적인 대학 수준의 의학 다중 선택 문제에서 시스템 성능을 평가했다.신경 방법을 IR 방법과 결합할 때 최상의 성능을 얻을 수 있는데 이 두 가지 방법은 모두 독립적으로 일한다.이전의 방법과 달리 이 시스템은 랜덤으로 기선을 추측하는 것보다 통계적으로 현저히 높아졌다. 기선 해산기의 성능에 따라 도전적인 문제로 표시되어도.', 'sw': 'Tunatoa mbinu ya riwaya ya kujibu maswali ya kujitegemea ambayo haitegemea utendaji wa mfumo wa upya wa habari (IR) na haihitaji taarifa za mafunzo zinazotoka kwenye chanzo hilo kama maswali. Tunatathmini utendaji wa mfumo wa changamoto wa maswali mengi ya sayansi ya afya ya chuo kikuu. Utendaji bora unapatikana pale unapounganisha mbinu za kisasa na mbinu za IR, ambazo zote mbili zinafanya kazi kwa uhuru. Tofauti na mbinu zilizopita, mfumo unapata maendeleo muhimu zaidi ya msingi wa dhana isiyo na taratibu hata kwa maswali yanayojulikana kama changamoto kutokana na utendaji wa ufumbuzi wa msingi wa msingi.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një qasje të re për përgjigjen automatike të pyetjeve që nuk varet nga performanca e një sistemi të marrjes së informacionit (IR) dhe nuk kërkon që të dhënat e trajnimit të vijnë nga i njëjti burim si pyetjet. We evaluate the system performance on a challenging set of university-level medical science multiple-choice questions.  Performanca më e mirë arrihet kur kombinohet një qasje nervore me një qasje IR, të cilat funksionojnë në mënyrë të pavarur. Ndryshe nga qasjet e mëparshme, sistemi arrin përmirësim statistikisht të rëndësishëm lidhur me bazën e parashikimit të rastësishëm edhe për pyetjet që janë etiketuar si sfiduese bazuar në performancën e zgjidhësve të bazës.', 'am': 'የኢሜሪክ (IR) ስርዓት ጥያቄን በማይደገፍ የራሱ ጥያቄን ለመመልስ እናስቀራለን፡፡ የዩንቨርስቲ-ደረጃ ጤናዊ የጥምቀት ጥያቄን በብዙ ምርጫ ጥያቄዎችን እናስተዋልታለን፡፡ ከሁለቱም አብልጠው ይሠራሉ፡፡ የቀድሞው ደረጃዎች በተለየ፣ ስርዓቱ በጥያቄ መቆጣጠር በጥያቄ መሆኑን አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ավտոմատիկ հարցերին պատասխանելու նոր մոտեցում, որը կախված չէ տեղեկատվության վերադարձման (ԻՌ) համակարգի արդյունքից և չի պահանջում, որ ուսուցման տվյալները գան նույն աղբյուրից, ինչ հարցերը: Մենք գնահատում ենք համակարգի արտադրողությունը համալսարանի մակարդակի բժշկական գիտության բազմաթիվ ընտրության հարցերի հետ կապված: Լավագույն արդյունքը հասնում է նյարդային մոտեցումը համադրելու և ինտերնետային մոտեցումը, որոնք երկուսն անկախ են աշխատում: Unlike previous approaches, the system achieves statistically significant improvement over the random guess baseline even for questions that are labeled as challenging based on the performance of baseline solvers.', 'fa': 'ما روش نویسی را به پاسخ سوال خودکار پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که به فعالیت سیستم بازیابی اطلاعات (IR) بستگی ندارد و نیازی ندارد که اطلاعات آموزش از یک منبع مانند سوال بیاید. ما عملکرد سیستم را در یک مجموعه مشکل دانش پزشکی در سطح دانشگاه با چند انتخاب انتخاب ارزیابی می کنیم. بهترین عملکرد وقتی یک دستور عصبی با یک دستور IR ترکیب می\u200cکند، هر دو تنها کار می\u200cکنند. برخلاف دسترسی قبلی، سیستم به طور آمریکایی بهترین پیشرفت در حدس اساسی تصادفی حتی برای سوالاتی که بر اساس انجام حل\u200cکنندگان اساسی به عنوان مشکل برنامه می\u200cگیرند رسیده است.', 'az': 'Biz avtomatik suala cavab verm…ôy…ô yeni bir approach g√∂st…ôririk ki, bu m…ôlumat alma sistemin…ô bańülńĪ olmaz v…ô t…ôhsil m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪn soruŇümalarńĪn eyni m…ônb…ôsind…ôn g…ôlm…ôsini ist…ômirik. Biz sistem performansńĪnńĪ √ßoxlu se√ßim suallarńĪndan √ß…ôtin bir √ľniversit…ô s…ôviyy…ôti t…ôhsil elmi il…ô m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edirik. N√∂ral yaxńĪnlńĪńüńĪ IR yaxńĪnlńĪńüńĪyla birl…ôŇüdirdikd…ô …ôn yaxŇüńĪ performans baŇüarńĪlńĪr. ńįkisi d…ô s…ôrb…ôst √ßalńĪŇüńĪr. ∆Źvv…ôlki yaxńĪnlńĪqlarńĪn b…ônz…ôrin…ô baxmayaraq, sistem t…ôhsil √ß…ôk…ônl…ôrin performansńĪna dayanan m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edil…ôn suallar √ľ√ß√ľn statistik olaraq b√∂y√ľk d√ľz…ôltm…ôy…ô malik olar.', 'bn': 'We present a novel approach to automatic question answering that does not depend on the performance of an information retrieval (IR) system and does not require that the training data come from the same source as the questions.  বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের স্তরের চিকিৎসা বিজ্ঞানের বিভিন্ন প্রশ্নের বিষয়ে আমরা বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের চ্যালেঞ্জে যখন একটি নিউরেল উপায়ের সাথে একত্রিত করা হয় তখন সেরা প্রদর্শনের প্রতিষ্ঠান অর্জন করা হয়, যাদের উভয়ে স্বাধীন কাজ করে। পূর্ববর্তী পদ্ধতির ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন প্রশ্নের জন্য সিস্টেম ব্যবস্থার পরিসংখ্যানে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি প', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo nov pristup automatskom odgovoru na pitanje koja ne zavisi od učinka sustava prikupljanja informacija (IR) i ne zahtijeva da podaci obuke dolaze iz istog izvora kao i pitanja. Procjenjujemo sistemski izvod na izazovnom setu medicinske nauke na nivou univerziteta višeizbornih pitanja. Najbolji učinkoviti se postignu u kombinaciji neuralnog pristupa s IR-om pristupom, koji oboje rade nezavisno. Za razliku od prethodnih pristupa, sistem postiže statistički značajno poboljšanje nad nasumičnim pogodima čak i za pitanja koje su označene kao izazovne na temelju učinka početnih rješavača.', 'tr': 'Biz otomatik soraglaryň (IR) sistemasyna baglanmaýan bir nusga görýäris we bu maglumat maglumatyň soraglaryň bir çeşmeden gelmegine gerek däl. Biz sistemiň etkinleşigini uniwersitet derejesinde lukmanyň has sany seçmeli soraglarynda çykýarys. Näyral ýagdaýyny IR golaýy bilen birleşdirýände, ikisi hem özbaşdaky işleýär. Öňki ýagdaýlaryň ýaly sistemi boýunça çözümleriniň başarylygyna daşary ýagdaýda statistik boýunça gelişmeleri başarýar.', 'ca': "Presentam un enfocament nou a la resposta automàtica a preguntes que no depèn del rendiment d'un sistema de recuperació d'informació (IR) i no requereix que les dades d'entrenament provenin de la mateixa font que les preguntes. Evaluam el rendiment del sistema en un conjunt desafiant de preguntes de ciència mèdica a nivell universitari. Els millors resultats s'aconsegueixen combinant un enfocament neuronal amb un enfocament IR, ambdós funcionant independentment. A diferència dels enfocaments anteriors, el sistema aconsegueix una millora estadísticament significativa en relació amb el basal de l'adivinament aleatòri fins i tot per a preguntes que són etiquetades com desafiants basant-se en el rendiment dels solvents de base.", 'cs': 'Představujeme nový přístup k automatickému odpovědi na otázky, který nezávisí na výkonnosti systému vyhledávání informací (IR) a nevyžaduje, aby tréninková data pocházela ze stejného zdroje jako otázky. Hodnotíme výkon systému na náročném souboru univerzitních lékařských věd multiple-choice otázek. Nejlepšího výkonu je dosaženo kombinací neuronového přístupu s IR přístupem, které pracují nezávisle. Na rozdíl od předchozích přístupů dosahuje systém statisticky významného zlepšení oproti náhodnému základnímu odhadu i u otázek, které jsou označeny jako náročné na základě výkonu základních řešitelů.', 'et': 'Esitleme uudset lähenemisviisi automaatsele küsimustele, mis ei sõltu infohankimise (IR) süsteemi jõudlusest ega nõua, et koolitusandmed pärineksid küsimustega samast allikast. Hindame süsteemi jõudlust ülikooli tasemel meditsiiniteaduste mitmevaliku küsimuste keerukas komplektis. Parim jõudlus saavutatakse, kui kombineeritakse neuraalne lähenemine IR lähenemisega, mis mõlemad töötavad iseseisvalt. Erinevalt varasematest lähenemisviisidest saavutab süsteem statistiliselt olulise paranemise juhusliku arvamise algväärtusega võrreldes isegi küsimuste puhul, mida nimetatakse algväärtuse lahendajate tulemuslikkuse põhjal keeruliseks.', 'fi': 'Esitämme uudenlaisen lähestymistavan automaattiseen kysymykseen vastaamiseen, joka ei riipu tiedonhakujärjestelmän suorituskyvystä eikä edellytä, että koulutustiedot tulevat samasta lähteestä kuin kysymykset. Arvioimme järjestelmän suorituskykyä haastavissa yliopistotason lääketieteen monivalintakysymyksissä. Paras suorituskyky saavutetaan yhdistämällä neurolähestymistapa IR-lähestymistapaan, jotka molemmat toimivat itsenäisesti. Toisin kuin aiemmat lähestymistavat, järjestelmä saavuttaa tilastollisesti merkitsevää parannusta satunnaiseen arvaukseen verrattuna jopa kysymyksissä, jotka on luokiteltu haastaviksi perustason ratkaisijoiden suorituskyvyn perusteella.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n nuwe toegang tot outomatiese vraag antwoord wat nie afhang van die prestasie van 'n inligting ontvang (IR) stelsel en nie nodig dat die onderwerp data van dieselfde bron kom as die vraag nie. Ons evalueer die stelsel prestasie op 'n pragtige stel van universiteit-vlak mediese wetenskap veelvuldige keuse vrae. Beste prestasie word bereik wanneer 'n neurale toegang met 'n IR toegang gemeenskap word, albei van wat onveilig werk. Ongelyks soos vorige toegang, word die stelsel statistiese betaling verbetering oor die willekeurige oop basisline selfs vir vrae wat as betekening gebaseer word op die prestasie van basisline oplossers.", 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wani matsayi na yanzu wa masu tambayi farat ɗaya da ba ta ƙayyade game da performance na tsarin da aka riƙe (IR) ma'anar kuma ba ya ƙayyade in lazimta data za su zo daga kilowan da za'a tambayar. Tuna ƙaddara mafarin na'urar system a kan wata tsummai na'urar matsayin da akan da aka sani na zance-zance masu yawa. Ka fi kyakkyawan aikin idan ya haɗa wata rayuwar rayuwar da wata IR, wanda dukansu sunã aiki da kansa da inganci. Fara kwamfyuta da zaman hanyor farko, na'urar system yana sãmun mafiya kyau a statistically significant bisa salon na zaɓen raɗabi'a ko kuma amma wa tambayar da aka sanar da su kamar a yi tsõratar a kan salon da za'a sami-layin basĩri.", 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים גישה חדשה לענות על שאלות אוטומטיות שלא תלויה ביצועים של מערכת השיג מידע (IR) ולא דורשת שמידע האימונים מגיע מאותו מקור כמו השאלות. אנו מעריכים את ההופעה של המערכת על סדר מאתגר של מדע רפואי ברמה אוניברסיטה שאלות בהחלטה רבה. ההופעה הטובה ביותר נעשית כשמשלבת גישה עצבית עם גישה IR, שתיהן עובדות באופן עצמאי. בניגוד לשיטות קודמות, המערכת משיגה שיפור סטטיסטי משמעותי במרחק הניחוש האקראי אפילו לשאלות שמתווידות כאתגרים בהתבסס על ביצועים של מפענחים בסיסיים.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nov pristop k avtomatskemu odgovarjanju na vprašanja, ki ni odvisen od uspešnosti sistema za pridobivanje informacij (IR) in ne zahteva, da podatki o usposabljanju prihajajo iz istega vira kot vprašanja. Učinkovitost sistema ocenjujemo na zahtevnem nizu univerzitetnih medicinskih vprašanj z več izbirami. Najboljša učinkovitost je dosežena pri kombinaciji nevronskega pristopa z IR pristopom, ki oba delujeta neodvisno. Za razliko od prejšnjih pristopov sistem doseže statistično značilno izboljšanje v primerjavi z osnovno vrednostjo naključnih ugibanj tudi pri vprašanjih, ki so označena kot zahtevna glede na uspešnost reševalcev osnovne vrednosti.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk dadi perusahaan kanggo nggabung otomatik sing ngomong nik ora bisa nguasai sistem sing gawe informasi nggawe (IR) lan ora bisa diandewat dhéwé, dadi ngwehkung dolanan sing bakal terus ono wektu nggo ngerasah sing mbukakipun kuwi. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem kanggo nggawe barang nggambar aturan sing paling apik batar tentang kanggo sawar ing sak bantayan. Laptop" and "Desktop Sing cah sabên langgar sampeyan sing luwih, sistem kuwi nggawe akeh perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo kaé supoyo sing luwih apik dhéwé, nganggo perusahaan kanggo diangkat dhéwé nggawe barang nggawe gerakan diolah sing bisa dianggawe barang string.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་དྲི་ཚིག་གི་གནད་སྤྲོད་པར་གསར་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོན་པ་ལས་གནས་ཚུལ་རྗེས་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་གཙོ་རིམ་དུ་འཇ ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་གིས་མཐོ་རིམ་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གནད་མེད་པའི་དབྱིབས་སྨན་རིག་ཚན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གདམ་ཁ་ཚོགས་དང་། ནུས་པ་གཤིས་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡོམས་པའི་སྐབས་ལ་དགའ་ཤོས་ཡོད། Unlike previous approaches, the system achieves statistically significant improvement over the random guess baseline even for questions that are labeled as challenging based on the performance of baseline solvers.'}
{'en': 'Investigating Terminology Translation in Statistical and Neural Machine Translation : A Case Study on English-to-Hindi and Hindi-to-English', 'fr': "Étude de la traduction terminologique dans la traduction automatique statistique et neuronale\xa0: une étude de cas sur l'anglais vers l'hindi et l'hindi vers l'anglais", 'es': 'Investigación de la traducción terminológica en la traducción automática estadística y neuronal: un estudio de caso del inglés al hindi y del hindi al inglés', 'pt': 'Investigando a tradução de terminologia na tradução automática estatística e neural: um estudo de caso sobre inglês para hindi e hindi para inglês', 'ar': 'التحقيق في ترجمة المصطلحات في الترجمة الآلية الإحصائية والعصبية: دراسة حالة من الإنجليزية إلى الهندية ومن الهندية إلى الإنجليزية', 'ja': '統計学と神経機械翻訳における用語の翻訳の調査：英語からヒンディー語とヒンディー語から英語へのケーススタディ', 'hi': 'सांख्यिकीय और तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में शब्दावली अनुवाद की जांच: अंग्रेजी-से-हिंदी और हिंदी-से-अंग्रेजी पर एक केस स्टडी', 'zh': '勘计神经机器翻译中术语译:英语至印地语及印地语英语例究之', 'ru': 'Исследование терминологического перевода в статистическом и нейронном машинном переводе: тематическое исследование английского языка на хинди и хинди на английском языке', 'ga': 'Aistriú Téarmaíochta a Imscrúdú san Aistriúchán Staitistiúil agus Néar-mheabhrach: Cás-staidéar ar Bhéarla go Hiondúis agus Hiondúis-go-Béarla', 'ka': 'ტერმინოლოგიის შეცვლა სტატისტიკური და ნეიროლური მაქინის შეცვლაში: სტატისტიკური და ინგლისური შეცვლაში', 'el': 'Ερευνώντας τη μετάφραση ορολογίας στη στατιστική και νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση: Μια μελέτη περίπτωσης για τα αγγλικά-στα-χίντι και τα χίντι-στα-αγγλικά', 'hu': 'Terminológiai fordítás vizsgálata statisztikai és idegi gépi fordításban: Esettanulmány angol-hindi és hindi-angol', 'it': "Indagine sulla traduzione terminologica nella traduzione automatica statistica e neurale: un caso di studio sull'inglese-hindi e hindi-inglese", 'mk': 'Истражување на терминолошкиот превод во статистички и неврални машински превод: случајна студија на англиско-на-хинди и хинди-на-англиски', 'lt': 'Terminologijos vertimo statistinėmis ir nervinėmis mašinomis tyrimas: anglų kalba į hindų ir hindų kalba į anglų kalbą atvejų tyrimas', 'ms': 'Menyelidiki Terjemahan Terminologi dalam Terjemahan Mesin Statistik dan Neural: Sebuah kajian kes mengenai Inggeris-ke-Hindi dan Hindi-ke-Inggeris', 'kk': 'Статистикалық және невралдық машиналық аудармасында терминология аудармасы: Ағылшын тілде-хинде және хинде тілде-ағылшын тілде оқу үшін', 'ml': 'ടെര്\u200dമിനോളജി പരിഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു: ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d നിന്നും ഹിന്ദിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d നിന്നും ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d ന', 'mn': 'Статистикийн болон мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалтын судалгаа: Англи-хоо-хинди болон хинди-хоо-англи хэлний судалгаа', 'mt': 'Investigating Terminology Translation in Statistical and Neural Machine Translation: A Case Study on English-to-Hindi and Hindi-to-English', 'no': 'Investigating Terminology Translation in Statistical and Neural Machine Translation: A Case Study on English-to-Hindi and Hindi-to-English', 'pl': 'Badanie tłumaczenia terminologicznego w tłumaczeniu maszynowym statystycznym i neuronowym: studium przypadku angielskiego na hindi i hindi na angielski', 'ro': 'Investigarea traducerii terminologice în traducerea automată statistică și neurală: un studiu de caz despre engleză-hindi și hindi-în-engleză', 'si': 'Investigating Terminal Inology translation in Statistic and neural machine translation: A case study on English-to-Hindi and Hindi-to-English', 'so': 'Turjumista Terminology in Statistical and Neural machine Translation: A Case Study on Ingiriis-to-Hindi and Hindi-to-Ingiriis', 'sr': 'Istraživanje terminološkog prevoda u statističkom i neurološkom prevodu: Istraživanje slučaja o engleskom i hindskom i engleskom', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'Utredning av terminologiöversättning i statistisk och neural maskinöversättning: En fallstudie om engelsk-hindi och hindi-till-engelska', 'ur': 'تحقیق ترمینولوژی تعبیر Statistical and Neural Machine Translation: A Case Study on English-to-Hindi and Hindi-to-English', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Điều tra về tiếng khoa học Tiếng Anh và tiếng Hindi (tiếng Hindi) Phiên dịch tiếng Anh (tiếng Hindi)', 'bg': 'Изследване на терминологичния превод в статистическия и невралния машинен превод: казус на английски-хинди и хинди-английски', 'da': 'Undersøgelse af terminologioversættelse i statistisk og neural maskinoversættelse: Et casestudie om engelsk-hindi og hindi-til-engelsk', 'nl': 'Onderzoek naar terminologische vertaling in statistische en neurale machinevertaling: een casestudy over Engels-naar-Hindi en Hindi-naar-Engels', 'hr': 'Istraživanje terminološkog prevoda u statističkom i neurološkom prevodu: Istraživanje slučaja o engleskom i hindskom i engleskom', 'fa': 'تحقیقات ترمینولوژی در ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین آمار و عصبی: یک مطالعه در مورد انگلیسی-تا-هندی و هندی-تا-انگلیسی', 'de': 'Untersuchung der terminologischen Übersetzung in der statistischen und neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung: Eine Fallstudie zum Englisch-ins-Hindi und Hindi-ins-Englisch', 'id': 'Menyelidiki Translation Terminologi dalam Translation Statistical and Neural Machine: A Case Study on English-to-Hindi and Hindi-to-English', 'ko': '통계와 신경기계 번역 중 용어 번역에 대한 연구: 영어에서 인디언과 인디언에서 영어까지의 사례 연구', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Terminalology katika Tafsiri ya Takwimu na Kiasili: Utafiti wa Kesi kuhusu Kiingereza-hadi-Hindi na Kihindi-hadi-Kiingereza', 'tr': 'Investigating Terminology Translation in Statistical and Neural Machine Translation: A Case Study on English-to-Hindi and Hindi-to-English', 'sq': 'Investigating Terminology Translation in Statistical and Neural Machine Translation: A Case Study on English-to-Hindi and Hindi-to-English', 'af': "Voorskou Terminologie Vertaling in Statistiese en Neurale Masjien Vertaling: 'n Kas onderwerp oor Engels-tot-Hindi en Hindi-tot-Engels", 'am': 'ተርሚኖሎጂ ትርጉም በstatistical and Neural Machine ትርጉም: A Case Study on English-to-Hindi and Hindi-to-English', 'hy': 'Տերմինոլոգիայի թարգմանման հետազոտությունը վիճակագրական և նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մեջ. Անգլերեն-հինդի և հինդի-անգլերեն վերաբերյալ մի դեպքի հետազոտություն', 'az': 'Statistik və nöral maşın tərcümündə Terminoloji tərcümünü araşdırma: İngilizdən Hindistan və Hindistan-İngilizdən öyrənmək', 'bn': 'Investigating Terminology Translation in Statistical and Neural Machine Translation: A Case Study on English-to-Hindi and Hindi-to-English', 'bs': 'Istraživanje terminološkog prevoda u statističkom i neurološkom prevodu: Istraživanje slučaja o engleskom i hindskom i engleskom', 'ca': 'Investigar la traducció de terminologia en traducció estadística i neural de màquines: Un estudi de cas sobre anglès-a-Hindi i Hindi-a-anglès', 'et': 'Terminoloogiatõlke uurimine statistilises ja neuroaalses masintõlkes: juhtumiuuring inglise-hindi ja hindi-inglise keele kohta', 'cs': 'Vyšetřování terminologického překladu ve statistickém a neurálním strojovém překladu: Případová studie o angličtině do hindštiny a hindštině do angličtiny', 'fi': 'Tutkimus terminologian kääntämisestä tilasto- ja hermokäännöksessä: tapaustutkimus englanti-hindi- ja hindi-englanti', 'jv': 'istraigating Terminal inulogi Terjamahan kanggo Stasitik lan Neral Masine Terjamahan: Una Kemerdekaan Inggris-to-endi lan barang-endi-to-Inggris', 'sk': 'Raziskovalni terminološki prevod v statističnem in nevralnem strojnem prevajanju: študija primera angleščine v hindijščini in hindijščini v angleščini', 'he': 'חוקר תרגום טרמינולוגי בתרגום של מכונות סטטיסטיות ונוראליות: מחקר מקרים על אנגלית-להינדי והינדי-לאנגלית', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'bo': 'Investigating Terminology Translation in Statistical and Neural Machine Translation: A Case Study on English-to-Hindi and Hindi-to-English'}
{'en': 'Terminology translation plays a critical role in domain-specific machine translation (MT). In this paper, we conduct a comparative qualitative evaluation on terminology translation in phrase-based statistical MT (PB-SMT) and neural MT (NMT) in two translation directions : English-to-Hindi and Hindi-to-English. For this, we select a test set from a legal domain corpus and create a gold standard for evaluating terminology translation in MT. We also propose an error typology taking the terminology translation errors into consideration. We evaluate the MT systems’ performance on terminology translation, and demonstrate our findings, unraveling strengths, weaknesses, and similarities of PB-SMT and NMT in the area of term translation.', 'ar': 'تلعب ترجمة المصطلحات دورًا مهمًا في الترجمة الآلية الخاصة بالمجال (MT). في هذه الورقة ، نجري تقييمًا نوعيًا مقارنًا حول ترجمة المصطلحات في MT الإحصائي القائم على العبارات (PB-SMT) و MT العصبية (NMT) في اتجاهين للترجمة: الإنجليزية إلى الهندية ومن الهندية إلى الإنجليزية. لهذا ، نختار مجموعة اختبار من مجموعة المجال القانوني وننشئ معيارًا ذهبيًا لتقييم ترجمة المصطلحات في الترجمة الآلية. نقترح أيضًا تصنيف خطأ مع مراعاة أخطاء ترجمة المصطلحات. نقوم بتقييم أداء أنظمة الترجمة الآلية في ترجمة المصطلحات ، ونوضح النتائج التي توصلنا إليها ، وكشف نقاط القوة والضعف والتشابه بين PB-SMT و NMT في مجال ترجمة المصطلحات.', 'fr': "La traduction terminologique joue un rôle essentiel dans la traduction automatique (TA) spécifique à un domaine. Dans cet article, nous menons une évaluation qualitative comparative de la traduction terminologique dans la MT statistique basée sur les phrases (PB-SMT) et la MT neuronale (NMT) dans deux directions de traduction\xa0: de l'anglais vers l'hindi et l'hindi vers l'anglais. Pour cela, nous sélectionnons un ensemble de tests dans un corpus de domaines juridiques et créons une norme de référence pour l'évaluation de la traduction terminologique en traduction automatique. Nous proposons également une typologie des erreurs tenant compte des erreurs de traduction terminologique. Nous évaluons les performances des systèmes de traduction automatique en matière de traduction terminologique et démontrons nos conclusions, en démêlant les forces, les faiblesses et les similitudes entre PB-SMT et NMT dans le domaine de la traduction terminologique.", 'pt': 'A tradução de terminologia desempenha um papel crítico na tradução automática de domínio específico (MT). Neste artigo, realizamos uma avaliação qualitativa comparativa da tradução de terminologia em TA estatística baseada em frases (PB-SMT) e TA neural (NMT) em duas direções de tradução: inglês para hindi e hindi para inglês. Para isso, selecionamos um conjunto de testes de um corpus de domínio legal e criamos um padrão-ouro para avaliar a tradução de terminologia em TA. Também propomos uma tipologia de erros levando em consideração os erros de tradução da terminologia. Avaliamos o desempenho dos sistemas de TA na tradução de terminologia e demonstramos nossas descobertas, revelando pontos fortes, fracos e semelhanças de PB-SMT e NMT na área de tradução de termos.', 'es': 'La traducción terminológica desempeña un papel fundamental en la traducción automática (MT) específica del dominio. En este artículo, realizamos una evaluación cualitativa comparativa de la traducción de terminología en MT estadística basada en frases (PB-SMT) y MT neuronal (NMT) en dos direcciones de traducción: de inglés a hindi y de hindi a inglés. Para ello, seleccionamos un conjunto de pruebas de un corpus de dominio legal y creamos un estándar de oro para evaluar la traducción de terminología en MT. También proponemos una tipología de errores que tenga en cuenta los errores de traducción de la terminología. Evaluamos el rendimiento de los sistemas de MT en la traducción de terminología y demostramos nuestros hallazgos, desentrañando las fortalezas, debilidades y similitudes de PB-SMT y NMT en el área de la traducción de términos.', 'ja': '用語の翻訳は、ドメイン固有の機械翻訳（ MT ）において重要な役割を果たします。この論文では、フレーズベースの統計MT （ PB - SMT ）とニューラルMT （ NMT ）における用語の翻訳について、英語からヒンディー語、ヒンディー語から英語の2つの翻訳方向で比較定性的な評価を行っている。このため、法務ドメインコーパスからテストセットを選択し、MTで用語翻訳を評価するためのゴールドスタンダードを作成します。また、用語翻訳の誤りを考慮した誤り類型を提案します。私たちは、用語の翻訳におけるMTシステムのパフォーマンスを評価し、用語翻訳の分野におけるPB - SMTとNMTの知見、強み、弱点、および類似点を示します。', 'zh': '术语译在特定域机器翻译 (MT) 中起有至用。 于本文之中,短语计机器翻译(PB-SMT)与神经机器翻译(NMT)中术语译较定性评估,分为英语至印地语、印地语至英语。 于是于律领语料库中择一测试集,并创估机器翻译中术语翻译黄金之准。 又有一误类型学,兼思术语译之误。 估机器翻译系统于术语翻译,而示之所见,揭PB-SMT与NMT于术语翻译域之胜、劣势、相似之处。', 'hi': 'शब्दावली अनुवाद डोमेन-विशिष्ट मशीन अनुवाद (एमटी) में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाता है। इस पत्र में, हम वाक्यांश-आधारित सांख्यिकीय एमटी (पीबी-एसएमटी) और तंत्रिका एमटी (एनएमटी) में शब्दावली अनुवाद पर दो अनुवाद दिशाओं में तुलनात्मक गुणात्मक मूल्यांकन करते हैं: अंग्रेजी-से-हिंदी और हिंदी-से-अंग्रेजी। इसके लिए, हम एक कानूनी डोमेन कॉर्पस से एक परीक्षण सेट का चयन करते हैं और एमटी में शब्दावली अनुवाद का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए एक स्वर्ण मानक बनाते हैं। हम शब्दावली अनुवाद त्रुटियों को ध्यान में रखते हुए एक त्रुटि टाइपोलॉजी का भी प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम शब्दावली अनुवाद पर एमटी सिस्टम के प्रदर्शन का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, और हमारे निष्कर्षों का प्रदर्शन करते हैं, शब्द अनुवाद के क्षेत्र में पीबी-एसएमटी और एनएमटी की ताकत, कमजोरियों और समानताओं को उजागर करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Перевод терминологии играет решающую роль в машинном переводе, специфичном для конкретной области (MT). В этой статье мы проводим сравнительную качественную оценку перевода терминологии в статистических МП на основе фраз (PB-SMT) и нейронных МП (NMT) в двух направлениях перевода: с английского на хинди и с хинди на английский. Для этого мы выбираем тестовый набор из корпуса юридической области и создаем золотой стандарт для оценки перевода терминологии в MT. Мы также предлагаем типологию ошибок с учетом терминологических ошибок перевода. Мы оцениваем эффективность систем MT при переводе терминологии и демонстрируем наши выводы, сильные и слабые стороны, а также сходства PB-SMT и NMT в области перевода терминов.', 'ga': 'Tá ról ríthábhachtach ag aistriúchán téarmaíochta in aistriúchán meaisín a bhaineann go sonrach le fearann (MT). Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid measúnú cáilíochtúil comparáideach ar aistriúchán téarmaíochta i MT staidrimh frása-bhunaithe (PB-SMT) agus MT néaránach (NMT) i dhá threo aistriúcháin: Béarla go Hiondúis agus Hiondúis-go-Béarla. Chuige seo, roghnaímid tacar tástála ó chorpas fearainn dhlíthiúil agus cruthaímid caighdeán óir chun aistriúchán téarmaíochta in MT a mheas. Molaimid freisin tíopeolaíocht earráide ag cur na hearráidí aistriúcháin téarmaíochta san áireamh. Déanaimid meastóireacht ar fheidhmíocht na gcóras MT ar aistriúchán téarmaíochta, agus léirímid ár dtorthaí, ag nochtadh láidreachtaí, laigí, agus cosúlachtaí PB-SMT agus NMT i réimse an aistriúcháin téarmaíochta.', 'ka': 'Name ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ კომპორატიური კვალიტატიური გავაკეთება ტერმინოლოგიის გავაგრძელებაზე ფრაზების სტატისტიკალური MT (PB-SMT) და ნეიროლური MT (NMT) ორი გავაგრძელებაში: ანგლისური-Hindi და ინ ამისთვის, ჩვენ მონიშნეთ ტესტი, რომელსაც კოპპუსი დემომინის კოპუსიდან და დავაქმნეთ წლის სტანდარტური სტანდარტული MT-ში ტერმინოლოგიის გადაწყვება. ჩვენ ასევე შეცდომა ჩვენ ტერმინოლოგიის გასაგულისხმებისთვის MT სისტემის გამოყენება და ჩვენი წარმოდგენების გამოყენება, ძალადობა, ცოტა და განსხვავება PB-SMT და NMT სისტემის განსხვავებაში.', 'el': 'Η μετάφραση ορολογίας διαδραματίζει κρίσιμο ρόλο στη μηχανική μετάφραση ειδικού τομέα (ΜΤ). Στην παρούσα εργασία, διεξάγουμε μια συγκριτική ποιοτική αξιολόγηση της μετάφρασης ορολογίας σε στατιστικό ΜΤ (PB-SMT) και νευρωνικό ΜΤ (NMT) σε δύο μεταφραστικές κατευθύνσεις: Αγγλικά-στα-Χίντι και Χίντι-στα-Αγγλικά. Για το σκοπό αυτό, επιλέγουμε ένα σετ δοκιμών από ένα νομικό σώμα τομέα και δημιουργούμε ένα χρυσό πρότυπο για την αξιολόγηση της μετάφρασης ορολογίας στο ΜΤ. Επίσης προτείνουμε μια τυπολογία σφαλμάτων λαμβάνοντας υπόψη τα λάθη μετάφρασης ορολογίας. Αξιολογούμε την απόδοση των συστημάτων ΜΤ στη μετάφραση ορολογίας και καταδεικνύουμε τα ευρήματά μας, αποκαλύπτοντας ισχυρές, αδυναμίες και ομοιότητες των ΜΤ και ΜΤ στον τομέα της μετάφρασης όρων.', 'hu': 'A terminológiai fordítás kritikus szerepet játszik a domain-specifikus gépi fordításban (MT). Jelen tanulmányban összehasonlító kvalitatív értékelést végzünk a terminológiai fordítások kifejezésalapú statisztikai MT (PB-SMT) és neurális MT (NMT) két fordítási irányban: angol-hindi és hindi-angol. Ehhez kiválasztunk egy tesztkészletet egy jogi domain korpuszból, és aranyszabványt hozunk létre a terminológiai fordítás értékelésére MT-ben, valamint a terminológiai fordítási hibák figyelembevételével egy hibatípust is javasolunk. Értékeljük az MT rendszerek terminológiai fordítási teljesítményét, és bemutatjuk eredményeinket, felfedve a PB-SMT és NMT erősségeit, gyengeségeit és hasonlóságait a kifejezések fordítása terén.', 'it': "La traduzione terminologica svolge un ruolo fondamentale nella traduzione automatica specifica del dominio (MT). In questo articolo, conduciamo una valutazione qualitativa comparativa sulla traduzione terminologica in MT statistica basata sulle frasi (PB-SMT) e MT neurale (NMT) in due direzioni di traduzione: dall'inglese all'hindi e dall'hindi all'inglese. Per questo, selezioniamo un set di test da un corpus di dominio legale e creiamo un gold standard per valutare la traduzione terminologica in MT. Proponiamo anche una tipologia di errore tenendo conto degli errori di traduzione terminologica. Valutiamo le prestazioni dei sistemi MT sulla traduzione terminologica e dimostriamo i nostri risultati, svelando punti di forza, punti deboli e somiglianze di PB-SMT e NMT nell'area della traduzione terminologica.", 'lt': 'Terminologijos vertimas atlieka svarbų vaidmenį konkrečiai sričiai skirtuose mašininiuose vertimuose (MT). In this paper, we conduct a comparative qualitative evaluation on terminology translation in phrase-based statistical MT (PB-SMT) and neural MT (NMT) in two translation directions: English-to-Hindi and Hindi-to-English.  Šiuo tikslu mes pasirinksime bandymų rinkinį iš teisinės srities corpus ir sukuriame aukso standartą vertinant terminologinį vertimą MT. Mes taip pat siūlome klaidų tipologiją atsižvelgiant į terminologinio vertimo klaidas. Vertiname MT sistemų rezultatus terminologijos vertimo srityje ir parodome savo išvadas, atskleidžiančias PB-SMT ir NMT vertimo žodžiu stiprumus, trūkumus ir panašumus.', 'mk': "Terminology translation plays a critical role in domain-specific machine translation (MT).  Во овој весник, спроведуваме споредлива квалитетна оценка за терминолошкиот превод на статистички мет (ПБ-СМТ) базиран на фрази и неврален мет (НМТ) во две насоки: англиски-на-хинди и хинди-на-англиски. За ова, избираме тест од корпус на правен домен и создаваме златен стандард за проценка на терминолошкиот превод во MT. Ние, исто така, предложуваме грешка типологија земајќи во предвид грешките на терминолошкиот превод. We evaluate the MT systems' performance on terminology translation, and demonstrate our findings, unraveling strengths, weaknesses, and similarities of PB-SMT and NMT in the area of term translation.", 'ms': 'Terjemahan terminologi bermain peran kritik dalam terjemahan mesin-spesifik domain (MT). Dalam kertas ini, kita melakukan penilaian kualitatif perbandingan mengenai terjemahan terminologi dalam MT statistik berdasarkan frasa (PB-SMT) dan MT saraf (NMT) dalam dua arah terjemahan: Bahasa Inggeris-ke-Hindi dan Hindi-ke-Inggeris. Untuk ini, kami memilih set ujian dari domain hukum corpus dan cipta piawai emas untuk menilai terjemahan terminologi dalam MT. Kami juga melamar tipologi ralat untuk mempertimbangkan ralat terjemahan terminologi. Kami menilai prestasi sistem MT pada terjemahan terminologi, dan menunjukkan penemuan kami, mengungkapkan kekuatan, kelemahan, dan persamaan PB-SMT dan NMT dalam kawasan terjemahan terma.', 'kk': 'Терминология аудармасы доменге арнаулы машинаның аудармасында (MT) маңызды рольді орындайды. Бұл қағазда біз терминологиялық аудармасының (PB- SMT) және невралдық MT (NMT) терминологиялық аудармасының салыстырмалы квалификациялық оқиғаны екі аудармасы: ағылшынша-хинди және хинди-ті-ағылшынша. Бұл үшін біз юридикалық домендық корпустың сынақтарын таңдап, MT терминологиялық аудармаларды бағалау үшін алтын стандартты құрамыз. Сонымен қатар терминологиялық аудармалардың қателерін қарастыру үшін қа Біз терминологиялық аудармаларды MT жүйелердің істемін бағалап, табуларымызды, күштерді, бақыттарды және PB-SMT және NMT терминалдық аудармалардың ұқсастығын көрсетедік.', 'ml': 'ടെര്\u200dമിനോളജി പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതു് ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d - പ്രത്യേക യന്\u200d പരിഭാഷത്തില്\u200d ഒരു ഗുരുതരമായ പങ്കാളി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വാക്കില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായിട്ടുള്ള എംടി (PB- SMT) എന്നിട്ടും ന്യൂറല്\u200d എംടി (NMT) രണ്ടു പരിഭാഷത്തിന്റെ വഴികളില്\u200d ഒരു തുല്യമായ വിലാസപ്രകാരം നടത്തുന്ന ഇതിനുവേണ്ടി നാം നിയമമായ ഡൊമെന്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഒരു പരീക്ഷണസെറ്റ് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുകയും എംടിയിലെ ടെര്\u200dമിനോളജി പരിഭാഷണത്തെ പരിശോധിക്കു ടെര്\u200dമിനോളജി പരിഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ എംടി സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രകടനം നമ്മള്\u200d വിലയിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. വാക്ക് പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഭാഗത്ത് നമ്മുടെ കണ്ടുപ', 'mt': 'It-traduzzjoni tat-terminoloġija għandha rwol kritiku fit-traduzzjoni tal-magni speċifika għad-dominju (MT). F’dan id-dokument, nagħmlu evalwazzjoni kwalitattiva komparattiva dwar it-traduzzjoni tat-terminoloġija f’MT statistika bbażata fuq frażi (PB-SMT) u MT newrali (NMT) f’żewġ direzzjonijiet ta’ traduzzjoni: Ingliż-għall-Indjan u Indjan-għall-Ingliż. Għal dan, a ħna nagħżlu sett ta’ test minn korpus ta’ dominju legali u nħolqu standard tad-deheb għall-evalwazzjoni tat-traduzzjoni tat-terminoloġija f’MT. Aħna nipproponu wkoll tipoloġija ta’ żball meta jitqiesu l-iżbalji tat-traduzzjoni tat-terminoloġija. Aħna jevalwaw il-prestazzjoni tas-sistemi MT dwar it-traduzzjoni tat-terminoloġija, u nixhdu s-sejbiet tagħna, niżvelaw il-qawwiet, id-dgħufijiet u s-similaritajiet ta’ PB-SMT u NMT fil-qasam tat-traduzzjoni tat-terminu.', 'ro': 'Traducerea terminologiei joacă un rol esențial în traducerea automată specifică domeniului (MT). În această lucrare, realizăm o evaluare calitativă comparativă a traducerii terminologice în MT statistică bazată pe fraze (PB-SMT) și MT neural (NMT) în două direcții de traducere: engleză-hindi și hindi-în-engleză. Pentru aceasta, selectăm un set de teste dintr-un corpus de domeniu juridic și creăm un standard aur pentru evaluarea traducerii terminologice în MT. Propunem, de asemenea, o tipologie de erori luând în considerare erorile de traducere terminologică. Evaluăm performanța sistemelor MT în traducerea terminologiei și demonstrăm constatările noastre, dezvăluind punctele forte, punctele slabe și similaritățile PB-SMT și NMT în domeniul traducerii termenilor.', 'mn': 'Терминологийн хөрөнгө оруулалт машины хөрөнгө оруулалт (MT) дээр чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Энэ цаасан дээр бид терминологийн хөрөнгө оруулалт (PB-SMT) болон мэдрэлийн MT (NMT) хоёр хөрөнгө оруулалт руу хоёр хэлбэрээр харьцуулсан чадвартай үнэлгээ хийдэг. Үүний тулд бид хуулийн домагийн корпус-аас шалгалтыг сонгож, MT-д терминологийн орчуулалтыг үнэлэх алт стандарт бий болгож байна. Бид терминологийн хөрөнгө оруулалтын MT системийн үйл ажиллагааг үнэлгээж, бидний олж мэдсэн зүйлсийг харуулж, хүчирхэг, хүчтэй байдал, PB-SMT болон NMT-ийн төсөөлдлийг терминологийн хөрөнгө оруулалтын хэсэгт харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Terminologisk omsetjing spelar ein kritisk rolle i domenespesifikke maskinsomsetjing (MT). I denne papiret gjer vi eit sammenlignbare kvalitativ evaluering om terminologisk omsetjing i frasebasert statistisk MT (PB-SMT) og neuralMT (NMT) i to omsetjingsmeldingar: engelsk-til-Hindi og hindi-til-engelsk. For dette, vel vi eit test sett frå eit juridiske domenekorpus og lager eit gull standard for å evaluera terminologisk omsetjing i MT. Vi foreslår også ein feiltypologi for å henta feil i terminologisk omsetjing. Vi evaluerer utviklinga av MT-systemet på terminologisk omsetjing, og demonstrarer våre finningar, utviklinga av styrke, tyrke og liknande PB-SMT og NMT i området av terminomsetjing.', 'pl': 'Tłumaczenie terminologiczne odgrywa kluczową rolę w tłumaczeniu maszynowym dla danej dziedziny (MT). W niniejszym artykule przeprowadzamy porównawczą ocenę jakościową tłumaczenia terminologii w MT statystycznym opartym na frazach (PB-SMT) i neuronowym MT (NMT) w dwóch kierunkach tłumaczenia: angielsko-hindi i hindi-angielski. W tym celu wybieramy zestaw testowy z korpusu domeny prawnej i tworzymy złoty standard oceny tłumaczenia terminologii w MT. Proponujemy również typologię błędów uwzględniającą błędy tłumaczenia terminologii. Oceniamy wydajność systemów MT w zakresie tłumaczenia terminologii i demonstrujemy nasze wyniki, odkrywając mocne, słabe i podobieństwa PB-SMT i NMT w obszarze tłumaczenia terminów.', 'si': 'තාර්මිනෝලික වාර්තාවික භාවිතාව (MT) විශේෂයෙන් ඩොමේන් විශේෂ පරිවර්තනයේ වැදගත්  මේ පැත්තේ, අපි පරිවර්තන විශේෂ අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂයෙන් සම්පූර්ණ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂණයක් කරනවා, ප්\u200dරතිචාර අධ්\u200dයාත්මක MT (PB-SMT) සහ neural MT (NMT) අ මේකට, අපි නියෝජික ඩොමේන් කොර්පුස් වලින් පරීක්ෂණයක් තෝරාගන්න සහ MT වලින් පරීක්ෂණයක් පරීක්ෂණයක් තෝරාගන්න සඳහා රත්\u200dරව අපි MT පද්ධතියේ පද්ධතියේ වාර්ථාවික වාර්ථාව ගැන විශ්වාස කරනවා, අපේ හොයාගත්තොත්, ශක්තිමත්, දුර්වලත්, සහ PB-SMT සහ NMT වගේ වර්ථා', 'sv': 'Terminologiöversättning spelar en avgörande roll i domänspecifik maskinöversättning (MT). I denna uppsats genomför vi en jämförande kvalitativ utvärdering av terminologiöversättning i frasbaserad statistisk MT (PB-SMT) och neural MT (NMT) i två översättningsriktningar: engelsk-till-hindi och hindi-till-engelska. För detta väljer vi ut en testuppsättning från en juridisk domänkorpus och skapar en guldstandard för utvärdering av terminologiöversättning i MT. Vi föreslår också en feltypologi med hänsyn till terminologiöversättningsfel. Vi utvärderar MT-systemens prestanda när det gäller terminologiöversättning, och demonstrerar våra resultat och avslöjar styrkor, svagheter och likheter mellan PB-SMT och NMT inom termöversättning.', 'sr': 'Terminološki prevod igra kritičnu ulogu u prevodu strojnih domena (MT). U ovom papiru vodimo komparativnu kvalitativnu procjenu o prevodu terminologije na frazi baziranom statističkom MT (PB-SMT) i neuralnom MT (NMT) u dva smjera prevoda: engleski-na-hindi i hindi-na-engleski. Za to smo odabrali testove iz pravnog domena korpusa i stvorili zlatni standard za procjenu prevoda terminologije u MT-u. Takođe predlažemo pogrešnu tipologiju uzimajući u obzir greške prevoda terminologije. Procjenjujemo učinkovitost MT sistema o prevodu terminologije i pokazujemo naše nalaze, razvladavanje snaga, slabosti i sličnosti PB-SMT i NMT u oblasti prevoda termina.', 'ta': 'முனைய மொழிபெயர்ப்பு களம்- குறிப்பிட்ட இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் ஒரு முக்கியமான பங்கை வைக்கிறது. இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஒரு ஒப்பிடுமையான மதிப்பீட்டு மதிப்பீடு செய்கிறோம் சொற்றொடர் அடிப்படையான புள்ளிவிவரமான MT (PB- SMT) மற்றும் புதிய MT (NMT) இரு மொழிபெயர இதுக்காக, நாம் ஒரு சட்ட ட டொமைன் குறியீட்டிலிருந்து சோதனையை தேர்ந்தெடு நாங்கள் முனைய மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் MT முறைமைகளின் செயல்பாட்டை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் மொழிமொழிபெயர்ப்பின் பகுதியில் எங்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்புகளை காட்', 'so': 'Turjumista Terminology waxay leedahay qayb muhiim ah oo ku qoran domain-specific machine turjuma (MT). Qoraalkan waxaan ku sameynaa qiimeyn comparative ah oo ku saabsan tarjumaadda terminology oo afka-based statistical MT (PB-SMT) iyo neural MT (NMT) laba hagid oo turjuman: Ingiriis-to-Hindi iyo Hindi-to-Ingiriis. Taas darteed waxaynu dooranaynaa koob baaritaaneed oo sharciga ah, waxaana sameynaa standard dahab ah oo qiimeynaya tarjumaadda terminology ee MT. Waxaynu sidoo kale soo jeedaynaa tusaalo qalad ah oo qaadanaya qalbiyada turjumaadda terminology. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa muuqashada nidaamka MT oo ku saabsan turjumidda terminology, waxaana muujinaynaa cilmigayada, tabaryarada, itaaldarrada, iyo siman tababarka PB-SMT iyo NMT ee ku qoran turjumidda luqada.', 'ur': 'ٹریمینولوژی ترجمہ ڈومین خاص ماشین ترجمہ (MT) میں ایک ضروری رول لگا رہا ہے۔ ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک مقایسہ کیلوٹیٹی ارزیابی کریں گے ٹریمولوژی کی ترجمہ پر فریزوں پر بنیاد رکھی ہوئی ایسٹیٹی MT (PB-SMT) اور نیورال MT (NMT) دو ترجمہ طریقوں میں: انگلیسی-سے-ہندی اور ہندی-سے-انگلیسی. اس کے لئے ہم ایک قانونی ڈومین کورپوس سے ایک امتحان سیٹ کو انتخاب کرتے ہیں اور MT میں ٹومینولوژی ترجمہ کا ارزش کرنے کے لئے سونے کی استاندارڈ بناتے ہیں. ہم نے بھی ٹومینولوژی ترجمہ کی خطا کے ذریعے ایک خطا تایپولوژی کی پیشنهاد کرتی ہم ٹرمنولوژی ترجمہ پر MT سیستم کی فعالیت کا ارزش کرتے ہیں، اور ہمارے نتائج کو دکھاتے ہیں، قوت، ضعیفوں اور PB-SMT اور NMT کی مثالیں ٹرمنول کے منطق میں دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Terminology translation plays a critical role in domain-specific machine translation (MT).  Bu qogʻozda biz terminologiya tarjima tarjimasida qiymatni bir tarjima tarjima qilamiz (PB-SMT) va neural MT (NMT) ikkita tarjima xizmatga bajaramiz: Inglizcha- to-Hindi va Hindi- to-Inglizcha tilida. Bu uchun, biz sharciga domen kompyuterdan bir tizim tanlanamiz va MT tarjimalarini qidirish uchun gull standardini yaramiz. Biz terminology tarjimalarning xatolarini o'ylab turganda xatolik tizimini tahrirlash davom etiladimiz. Biz terminologiya tarjimasida MT tizimning amalni qiymatimiz, va bir tarjima tarjima davridagi natijalarimizni ko'rsatamiz, ko'plamlarimizni saqlab qolmaydigan қувватларимизни, заифҳол va huddi PB-SMT va NMT'ning bir xil tarjimalarini ko'rsamiz.", 'vi': 'Dịch thuật ngữ có vai trò quan trọng trong dịch vụ máy miền (MTV). Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi tiến hành một đánh giá định chất về thuật ngữ trên kênh thống kê dựa trên các cụm từ ngậm (PB-SMT) và mạng lưới thần kinh (NMB) theo hai hướng dịch: Anh-sang-Hindi và Anh-sang-Anh. Vì vậy, chúng tôi chọn một bộ thử từ một tập thể pháp luật và tạo ra một tiêu chuẩn vàng để đánh giá các thuật ngữ của dịch trong kênh MTV. Chúng tôi cũng đề nghị một loại lỗi lầm cân nhắc các lỗi thuật ngữ. Chúng tôi đánh giá khả năng của hệ thống MTV về dịch thuật ngữ, và thể hiện những phát hiện của chúng tôi, chia tách các điểm mạnh, nhược điểm và điểm tương đồng giữa PB-SMT và NMB trong lĩnh vực dịch thuật ngữ.', 'bg': 'Терминологичният превод играе критична роля в специфичния за домейна машинен превод (МТ). В настоящата статия се провежда сравнителна качествена оценка на терминологичния превод на фраза-базиран статистически МТ (PB-SMT) и неврален МТ (НМТ) в две направления на превода: английски-хинди и хинди-английски. За целта избираме тестен комплект от корпус на юридически домейн и създаваме златен стандарт за оценка на терминологичния превод в МТ. Предлагаме и типология на грешките при превода на терминологията. Ние оценяваме ефективността на системите за превод на терминологии и демонстрираме нашите открития, разкриващи силни страни, слабости и прилики на ПБ-СМТ и НМТ в областта на превода на терминологии.', 'da': 'Terminologisk oversættelse spiller en afgørende rolle i domænespecifik maskinoversættelse (MT). I denne artikel foretager vi en sammenlignende kvalitativ evaluering af terminologioversættelse i sætningsbaseret statistisk MT (PB-SMT) og neural MT (NMT) i to oversættelsesretninger: engelsk-til-hindi og hindi-til-engelsk. Til dette formål udvælger vi et testsæt fra et juridisk domænekorpus og skaber en guldstandard til evaluering af terminologioversættelse i MT. Vi foreslår også en fejltypologi under hensyntagen til terminologioversættelsesfejlene. Vi evaluerer MT-systemernes ydeevne inden for terminologioversættelse, og demonstrerer vores resultater, hvor vi afslører styrker, svagheder og ligheder mellem PB-SMT og NMT inden for termoversættelse.', 'hr': 'Terminološki prevod igra kritičnu ulogu u prevodu strojeva za specifičnu domenu (MT). U ovom papiru provodimo komparativnu kvalitativnu procjenu o prevodu terminologije na frazi na statističkom MT (PB-SMT) i neuralnom MT (NMT) u dva smjera prevoda: engleski-na-hindi i hindi-na-engleski. Za to smo odabrali test postavljen iz pravnog domena korpusa i stvorili zlatni standard za procjenu prevoda terminologije u MT-u. Također predlažemo pogrešnu tipologiju uzimajući u obzir greške prevoda terminologije. Procjenjujemo učinkovitost MT-ovih sustava o prevodu terminologije i pokazujemo naše nalaze, razrješavanje snage, slabosti i sličnosti PB-SMT-a i NMT-a u oblasti prevoda termina.', 'nl': 'Terminologische vertaling speelt een cruciale rol in domeinspecifieke machinevertaling (MT). In dit artikel voeren we een vergelijkende kwalitatieve evaluatie uit van terminologie vertaling in frase-based statistisch MT (PB-SMT) en neural MT (NMT) in twee vertaalrichtingen: Engels-naar-Hindi en Hindi-naar-Engels. Hiervoor selecteren we een testset uit een juridisch domein corpus en creëren we een gouden standaard voor het evalueren van terminologie vertaling in MT. We stellen ook een fouttypologie voor waarbij rekening wordt gehouden met terminologie vertaalfouten. We evalueren de prestaties van de MT-systemen op het gebied van terminologie vertaling en demonstreren onze bevindingen, waarbij we sterke, zwakke en gelijkenissen van PB-SMT en NMT op het gebied van termvertaling ontrafelen.', 'id': 'Terjemahan terminologi bermain peran kritis dalam terjemahan mesin spesifik domain (MT). Dalam kertas ini, kami melakukan evaluasi kualitatif perbandingan tentang terjemahan terminologi dalam MT (PB-SMT) statistik berdasarkan frasa dan MT saraf (NMT) dalam dua arah terjemahan: Inggris-ke-Hindi dan Hindi-ke-Inggris. Untuk ini, kami memilih set tes dari domain hukum corpus dan menciptakan standar emas untuk mengevaluasi terjemahan terminologi dalam MT. Kami juga mengusulkan tipologi kesalahan mempertimbangkan kesalahan terjemahan terminologi. Kami mengevaluasi prestasi sistem MT pada terjemahan terminologi, dan menunjukkan penemuan kami, mengungkapkan kekuatan, kelemahan, dan persamaan PB-SMT dan NMT dalam bidang terjemahan terma.', 'de': 'Die terminologische Übersetzung spielt eine entscheidende Rolle in der domänenspezifischen maschinellen Übersetzung (MT). In diesem Beitrag führen wir eine vergleichende qualitative Evaluation der Terminologie-Übersetzung in phrasenbasierter statistischer MT (PB-SMT) und neuronaler MT (NMT) in zwei Übersetzungsrichtungen durch: Englisch-ins-Hindi und Hindi-ins-Englisch. Dazu wählen wir einen Testsatz aus einem juristischen Domänenkorpus aus und schaffen einen Goldstandard für die Bewertung von Terminologie-Übersetzungen in MT. Wir schlagen auch eine Fehlertypologie vor, die die Terminologie-Übersetzungsfehler berücksichtigt. Wir evaluieren die Leistung der MT-Systeme bei der Terminologie-Übersetzung und zeigen unsere Ergebnisse auf, indem wir Stärken, Schwächen und Ähnlichkeiten von PB-SMT und NMT im Bereich der Termübersetzung aufdecken.', 'fa': 'ترجمه ترمینالوژی یک نقش مهم در ترجمه ماشین ویژه\u200cای (MT) را بازی می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما یک ارزیابی قابلیت مقایسه بر ترجمه\u200cشناسی در ترجمه\u200cشناسی MT (PB-SMT) و MT عصبی (NMT) را در دو راهی ترجمه می\u200cکنیم: انگلیسی-به-هندی و هندی-به-انگلیسی. برای این، ما یک امتحان مجموعه از یک کورپوس دامین قانونی را انتخاب می کنیم و یک استاندارد طلا برای ارزیابی ترمینالوژی در MT ایجاد می کنیم. ما همچنین یک تیپولوژی خطایی را پیشنهاد می کنیم که خطاهای ترمینالوژی را در نظر بگیریم. ما عملکرد سیستم\u200cهای MT را در ترجمه\u200cشناسی ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم، و نتیجه\u200cهایمان را نشان می\u200cدهیم، تغییر قوت، ضعف و شبیه\u200cهایی PB-SMT و NMT در منطقه ترجمه\u200cشناسی.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Terminology inacheza nafasi muhimu katika kutafsiri mashine maalum (MT). Katika karatasi hii, tunafanya tathmini yenye uhakika kuhusu tafsiri ya utaratibu wa utamaduni katika maelezo ya takwimu ya MT (PB-SMT) na NMT (NMT) kwa njia mbili za tafsiri: Kiingereza-hadi-Hindi na Kiingereza. Kwa hili, tunachagua kituo cha majaribio kutoka kwenye makampuni ya sheria na kutengeneza kiwango cha dhahabu kwa ajili ya kutathmini tafsiri ya utafiti wa kimataifa katika MT. Pia tunapendekeza utafiti wa makosa kwa kutafakari makosa ya tafsiri ya kimataifa. Tunatathmini utendaji wa mifumo ya MT kuhusu tafsiri ya kimataifa, na kuonyesha matokeo yetu, yasiyoeleweka nguvu, udhaifu na vifano vya PB-SMT na NMT katika maeneo ya tafsiri ya muhula.', 'tr': "Terminologiýa terjime edip dominiýa takyk maşynyň terjimesinde bir nusga çalýar. Bu kagyzda terminologa terjime edilýän statistik MT (PB-SMT) we neural MT (NMT) we iki terjime edilýän yönünde gurlaplaşyk howplykly çykyşlygyny çykardyk. Bu üçin, biz hukuk bir domeny korpusundan bir test setirini saýlap we MT'de terminologiýa terjimesini deňlemek üçin altyn standart bejerdik. Biz hem terminologiýanyň terjime hatalaryny almak üçin hata typologiýany maslahat berdik. Biz terminologiýa terjimelerinde MT sistemleriniň etkinleşigini deňlendirip, tapylarymyzy, güçlerimizi ýok edip, zayıflarymyzy we PB-SMT we NMT-yň terjime edilmesini görkeýäris.", 'af': "Terminologie vertaling speel 'n kritiese rol in domein spesifieke masjien vertaling (MT). In hierdie papier doen ons 'n vergelyklike kwaliteit evaluering op terminologie oorsetting in frase-gebaseerde statistiese MT (PB-SMT) en neurale MT (NMT) in twee oorsettingsdireksies: Engels-tot-Hindi en Hindi-tot-Engels. Vir hierdie kies ons 'n toets stel van 'n wetlike domein korpus en skep 'n goue standaard vir evalueer terminologies vertaling in MT. Ons voorstel ook 'n fout tipologie om die terminologie vertaling foute te te neem in aandag. Ons evalueer die MT stelsels se prestasie op terminologies vertaling, en wys ons gevindings, stregte, swakhede en gelykenisse van PB-SMT en NMT in die area van term vertaling.", 'am': 'ትርሚኖሎጂ ትርጉም በዶሜን-specific machine translation (MT) ያሳያል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሬዝዳንት፣ ተርሚኖሎጂ ትርጓሜን በንግግር የተመሳሳይ አስታሪካዊ MT (PB-SMT) እና የኔural MT (NMT) በሁለት ትርጉም መንገድ ላይ በሚያሳየው አስተያየት አስተያየት እናደርጋለን፤ እንግሊዝኛ-ወደ-Hindi እና Hindi-ወደ-እንግሊዘኛ ነው፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት ከሕግ ዶሜን ካርፓስ ፈተና እንመርጣለን እና ተርሚኖጂ ትርጉም እንዲያስታውስ የወርቅ standard እናደርጋለን። እና ተርሚኖጂ ትርጉም ስህተቶችን በመያሰብ ስህተት የተሳሳተ ጥያቄን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተርሚናሎጂ ትርጉም ላይ የMT ስርዓት ድምፅን እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i terminologjisë luan një rol kritik në përkthimin e makinave specifike në domeni (MT). Në këtë letër, ne kryejmë një vlerësim krahasues kualitativ mbi përkthimin e terminologjisë në MT (PB-SMT) dhe MT neural (NMT) në dy drejtime përkthimi: anglisht-në-Hindi dhe Hindi-në-English. Për këtë, ne zgjedhim një grup test nga një korpus ligjor domeni dhe krijojmë një standard ari për vlerësimin e përkthimit të terminologjisë në MT. Ne gjithashtu propozojmë një tipologji gabimesh duke marrë parasysh gabimet e përkthimit të terminologjisë. Ne vlerësojmë performancën e sistemeve MT në përkthimin e terminologjisë dhe demonstrojmë gjetjet tona, zbulimin e forcave, dobësive dhe ngjashmërive të PB-SMT dhe NMT në fushën e përkthimit të terminologjisë.', 'hy': 'Թերմինոլոգիայի թարգմանությունը կարևոր դեր է խաղում տիեզերական մեխանիզմի թարգմանության (MT) մեջ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք կատարում ենք համեմատական որակային գնահատականներ տերմինոլոգիայի թարգմանման մասին արտահայտությամբ հիմնված վիճակագրական MT (PB-SMT) և նյարդային MT (NMT) երկու ուղղությամբ՝ անգլերեն-հոնդիկ և հոնդիկ-անգլերեն: Այս դեպքում մենք ընտրում ենք փորձարկումներ օրինական ոլորտի կորպոսից և ստեղծում ենք ոսկու ստանդարտ MT-ի տերմինոլոգիայի թարգմանման գնահատելու համար։ Մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք սխալների տիպոլոգիա, որտեղ հաշվի առնենք տերմին Մենք գնահատում ենք MT համակարգերի արտադրողությունը տերմինոլոգիայի թարգմանման հարցում և ցույց ենք տալիս մեր հայտնաբերությունները, բացահայտում ենք PB-SMT և NMT-ի ուժեղությունները տերմինոլոգիայի թարգմանման հարցում:', 'az': 'Terminoloji tercüməti domain-specific maşın tercümətində kritik bir rol oynayır (MT). Bu kağızda, terminoloji tercüməsi barəsində, fraz tabanlı statistik MT (PB-SMT) və nöral MT (NMT) ilə iki tercümə yönəltməsində, əlaqəli qabiliyyətli değerlendiririk: İngilizə-Hindi və Hindi-İngilizə. Buna görə, qanuni domain korpusundan bir sınaq seçir və MT-də terminoloji tercümünü değerləşdirmək üçün altın standart yaradırıq. Biz də terminoloji tercümə hatalarını almaq üçün xəta typoloji təklif edirik. Biz terminoloji çevirilməsi barəsində MT sistemlərin performansını değerləşdiririk, çətinliklərimizi, qüvvətlərimizi, zəiflikləri və PB-SMT və NMT-nin bənzərini term in çevirilməsi bölgesində göstəririk.', 'bn': 'টার্মিনোলজি অনুবাদ ডোমেইন- নির্দিষ্ট মেশিন অনুবাদে একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা প্রদর্শন করে। In this paper, we conduct a comparative qualitative evaluation on terminology translation in phrase-based statistical MT (PB-SMT) and neural MT (NMT) in two translation directions: English-to-Hindi and Hindi-to-English.  এর জন্য আমরা একটি আইনি ডোমেইন কোর্পাস থেকে একটি পরীক্ষা সেট নির্বাচন করি এবং এমটিতে টার্মিনোলজি অনুবাদের মানানোর জন্য একটি সোনা স্ট্যান্ডার তৈরি করি। আমরা টার্মিনোলজি অনুবাদের উপর এমটি সিস্টেমের প্রভাবের মূল্যায়ন করি এবং মেয়াদ অনুবাদের এলাকায় আমাদের আবিস্কার, শক্তি, দুর্বল, এবং এনএমটির একই ধরনের পিবি-এসএ', 'ca': "La traducció terminològica té un paper crític en la traducció de màquines específices per domini (MT). En aquest paper, fem una evaluació qualitativa comparativa sobre la traducció de terminologia en MT estadística basada en frases (PB-SMT) i MT neural (NMT) en dues direccions de traducció: anglès-a-hindí i hindí-a-anglès. Per això, seleccionem un conjunt de tests d'un corpus de domini legal i creem un estàndard d'or per avaluar la traducció terminològica en MT. També proposem una tipologia d'error tenint en compte els errors de traducció terminològica. Evaluam el rendiment dels sistemes MT en la traducció terminològica, i demostram els nostres descobriments, descobrint les forces, les debilitats i les similituds de PB-SMT i NMT en l'àrea de la traducció terminològica.", 'cs': 'Terminologický překlad hraje klíčovou roli v doménově specifickém strojovém překladu (MT). V tomto článku provádíme srovnávací kvalitativní hodnocení překladu terminologie ve frázově založeném statistickém MT (PB-SMT) a neuronovém MT (NMT) ve dvou směrech překladu: angličtino-hindština a hindština-angličtina. Za tímto účelem vybereme testovací sadu z korpusu právní domény a vytvoříme zlatý standard pro hodnocení překladu terminologie v MT. Navrhujeme také typologii chyb s ohledem na chyby překladu terminologie. Hodnotíme výkonnost MT systémů při překladu terminologie a demonstrujeme naše poznatky, odhalujeme silné, slabé a podobné stránky PB-SMT a NMT v oblasti překladu termínů.', 'bs': 'Terminološki prevod igra kritičnu ulogu u prevodu strojeva za specifičnu domenu (MT). U ovom papiru vodimo komparativnu kvalitativnu procjenu o prevodu terminologije na frazi baziranom statističkom MT (PB-SMT) i neuralnom MT (NMT) u dva smjera prevoda: engleski-na-hindi i hindi-na-engleski. Za to smo odabrali test postavljen iz pravnog domena korpusa i stvorili zlatni standard za procjenu prevoda terminologije u MT-u. Također predlažemo pogrešnu tipologiju uzimajući u obzir greške prevoda terminologije. Procjenjujemo učinkovitost MT-ovih sustava o prevodu terminologije i pokazujemo naše nalaze, razrješavanje snage, slabosti i sličnosti PB-SMT-a i NMT-a u oblasti prevoda termina.', 'ko': '용어 번역은 특정 분야의 기계번역(MT)에서 중요한 역할을 한다.본고에서 우리는 단어를 바탕으로 하는 통계기계번역(PB-SMT)과 신경기계번역(NMT)에서의 용어 번역을 두 가지 번역 방향, 즉 영어에서 인디언과 인디언에서 영어로 비교적 정성적인 평가를 실시했다.이를 위해 우리는 법률 분야의 어료 라이브러리에서 테스트 집합을 선택하여 기계 번역에서 용어 번역을 평가하는 황금 기준을 만들었다. 또한 용어 번역의 오류를 고려하는 오류 유형학도 제시했다.우리는 용어 번역 분야에서 기계 번역 시스템의 성능을 평가하고 PB-SMT와 NMT가 용어 번역 분야에서 우세, 열세와 유사성을 보여주었다.', 'et': 'Terminoloogiatõlge mängib valdkonnaspetsiifilises masintõlkes kriitilist rolli. Käesolevas töös teostame võrdleva kvalitatiivse hindamise terminoloogia tõlkimise fraasipõhises statistilises MT (PB-SMT) ja neuraalses MT (NMT) kahes tõlkesuunas: inglise-hindi ja hindi-inglise keeles. Selleks valime juriidilisest domeenikorpusest testikomplekti ja loome kuldstandardi terminoloogilise tõlke hindamiseks MTs. Samuti pakume välja veatüpoloogia, võttes arvesse terminoloogilisi tõlkevige. Hindame MT süsteemide tulemuslikkust terminoloogilise tõlke valdkonnas ning demonstreerime oma tulemusi, PB-SMT ja NMT tugevusi, nõrkusi ja sarnasusi terminitõlke valdkonnas.', 'fi': 'Terminologiak채채nn철ksell채 on ratkaiseva rooli toimialoittakohtaisessa konek채채nn철ksess채 (MT). T채ss채 ty철ss채 suoritamme vertailevan laadullisen arvioinnin terminologian k채채nt채misest채 fraasipohjaisessa tilastollisessa MT:ss채 (PB-SMT) ja neurologisessa MT:ss채 (NMT) kahdessa k채채nn철ssuunnassa: englanti-hindi ja hindi-englanti. T채t채 varten valitaan testisarja juridisesta verkkotunnuskorpuksesta ja luodaan kultainen standardi terminologian k채채nt채misen arvioimiseksi MT: ss채. Ehdotamme my철s virhetypologiaa terminologian k채채nn철svirheet huomioiden. Arvioimme MT-j채rjestelmien suorituskyky채 terminologian k채채nt채misess채 ja esittelemme havaintojamme sek채 PB-SMT:n ja NMT:n vahvuuksia, heikkouksia ja yht채l채isyyksi채 termien k채채nt채misen alalla.', 'jv': 'Terminal translation plays a key roles in domain-special device translation (MT). Nang pepulan iki, kéné gunakake karo kalitas karo nggawe tarjamahan kanggo terjamahan ning basa sing basa dadi, MT (PB-SMT) lan MT (NMT) sing nyebutaké duruha tarjamahan: Inggris-to-endi lan bêng-endi-to-Inggris. For this, we select a test set from a valid domain Body and create a goldfire Standard for asserting terminal translation in MT. We again proposal an error Typogram Taking the terminal translation error to reflection. Awak dhéwé éntuk nggawe sistem MT kanggo tarjamahan, lan mungkahi awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang, ngregani soko nggawe kesèhan kanggo ngerasai PB-SMT lan NMT sing nganggep terjamahan.', 'he': 'התרגום הטרמינולוגי משחק תפקיד קריטי בתרגום מכונות ספציפי לתחום (MT). בעיתון הזה, אנו מבצעים עריכה איכותית שיוותית על תרגום בטרמונולוגיה בסטטיסטי MT (PB-SMT) ובעיצבי MT (NMT) בשני כיוונים תרגום: אנגלית-להינדית והינדינית-לאנגלית. בשביל זה, אנחנו בוחרים קבוצת מבחן מתחום חוקי קורפוס ויוצרים סטנדרט זהב להערכה התרגום הטרמולוגי ב MT. אנחנו גם מציעים טיפולוגיה שטעות בהתחשב בשטעות התרגום הטרמולוגי. אנו מעריכים את ההופעה של מערכות MT על תרגומת הטרמולוגיה, ולהראות את הממצאים שלנו, לחשוף כוחות, חולשות, וכמויות של PB-SMT ו NMT באזור התרגום המונחי.', 'sk': 'Terminološko prevajanje ima ključno vlogo pri strojnem prevajanju (MT) za posamezno področje. V prispevku smo izvedli primerjalno kvalitativno vrednotenje terminološkega prevajanja v frazni statistični MT (PB-SMT) in nevronski MT (NMT) v dveh smereh prevajanja: angleščina-hindijščina in hindijščina-angleščina. V ta namen izberemo testni nabor iz korpusa pravne domene in oblikujemo zlati standard za ocenjevanje terminološkega prevoda v MT ter predlagamo tipologijo napak pri upoštevanju terminoloških prevajalskih napak. Ocenjujemo uspešnost sistemov MT pri terminološkem prevajanju in prikazujemo naše ugotovitve, razkrivanje prednosti, slabosti in podobnosti PB-SMT in NMT na področju prevajanja izrazov.', 'ha': "translation Ga wannan takardan, Munã tafiyar da wani littafi masu daidaita a kan tarjima na garwayalojiya a cikin fassarar-based statistical MT (PB-SMT) da neural MT (NMT) cikin tafarkin biyu: Ingiriya-to-Hidi da-to-Ingiriya. For this, we select a test set from a legal domain corpus and create a gold standard for evaluating terminology translation in MT. We also propose an error typology taking the terminology translation errors into consideration.  Kana ƙayyade aikin MT'ar turjuya masu cikin taƙaitãwa, kuma Muke nuna fassaratan ayukanmu, masu cire ƙarfi, rauni da misãlai na PB-SMT da NMT cikin area of translation.", 'bo': "Terminology translation plays a critical role in domain-specific machine translation (MT). འུ་ཅག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐག་གཟུགས་ཅན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་མིན་འདུག For this, we select a test set from a legal domain corpus and create a gold standard for evaluating terminology translation in MT. We also propose an error typology taking the terminology translation errors into consideration. We evaluate the MT systems' performance on terminology translation, and demonstrate our findings, unraveling strengths, weaknesses, and similarities of PB-SMT and NMT in the area of term translation."}
{'en': 'Beyond English-Only Reading Comprehension : Experiments in Zero-shot Multilingual Transfer for Bulgarian', 'ar': 'ما وراء الفهم القرائي للغة الإنجليزية فقط: تجارب في النقل متعدد اللغات بدون طلقة للبلغارية', 'fr': 'Au-delà de la compréhension de lecture en anglais uniquement\xa0: expériences de transfert multilingue Zero-shot pour le bulgare', 'pt': 'Além da compreensão de leitura somente em inglês: experimentos em transferência multilíngue Zero-shot para búlgaro', 'es': 'Más allá de la comprensión lectora solo en inglés: experimentos de transferencia multilingüe de tiro cero para búlgaro', 'ja': 'Beyond English - Only Reading理解：ブルガリア人のためのゼロショット多言語転送の実験', 'hi': 'अंग्रेजी-केवल पढ़ने की समझ से परे: बल्गेरियाई के लिए शून्य-शॉट बहुभाषी स्थानांतरण में प्रयोग', 'zh': '越英语读解:保加利亚语零镜头多言移之实验', 'ru': 'За пределами понимания английского языка: эксперименты с многоязычным переводом на болгарский язык с нулевым снимком', 'ga': 'Thar Thuiscint Léamh an Bhéarla Amháin: Turgnaimh in Aistriú Ilteangach ná seatanna don Bhulgáiris', 'hu': 'Túl az angol nyelvű olvasási megértésen: kísérletek a bolgár nyelvű zéró lövéses többnyelvű transzferben', 'el': 'Πέρα από την κατανόηση ανάγνωσης μόνο στα Αγγλικά: Πειράματα σε πολύγλωσση μεταφορά μηδενικού πυροβολισμού για τα βουλγαρικά', 'ka': 'მხოლოდ ანგლისური კომპრენციის გარეშე: ბულდარიური მრავალენგური ტრანსტრინციაში გამოცდილება', 'lt': 'Beyond English-Only Reading Comprehension: Experiments in Zero-shot Multilingual Transfer for Bulgarian', 'mk': 'Покрај разбирањето на само англиско читање: Експерименти на нулјазичен мултијазичен трансфер за бугарски', 'it': 'Oltre la comprensione della lettura solo inglese: Esperimenti nel trasferimento multilingue a scatto zero per il bulgaro', 'mt': 'Beyond English-Only Reading Comprehension: Experiments in Zero-shot Multilingual Transfer for Bulgarian', 'kk': 'Тек ағылшын- тек оқу сәйкестігінің үстінен: Болгарша үшін ну- сәйкестік көптілік транформасының эксперименттері', 'ml': 'ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് മാത്രം വായിക്കുന്നതിനു ശേഷം: ബുള്\u200dഗേറിയയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി വെടിവെക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പര', 'ms': 'Selain Pemahaman Pembacaan Bahasa Inggeris sahaja: Eksperimen dalam Pemindahan Berbahasa Zero-shot untuk Bulgarian', 'mn': 'Англи хэлний зөвхөн унших судалгааны дараа: Болгарчуудын олон хэлний трансфертын туршилт', 'pl': 'Poza zrozumieniem czytania tylko w języku angielskim: eksperymenty w transferie wielojęzycznym zero-shot dla bułgarskiego', 'no': 'Utan engelsk- berre lesingskomprehension: Eksperimentar i null- shot Multilingual Transfer for Bulgarsk', 'sr': 'Izvan komprencije samo engleskog čitanja: eksperimenti u multijezičkoj prebacivanju nula za bugarske', 'si': 'ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය- විතරයි කියවන්න පුළුවන්: බුල්ගරියාන්ගේ ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා සීරෝ විත', 'sv': 'Bortom engelskspråkig läsförståelse: Experiment i noll-skott flerspråkig överföring för bulgariska', 'ro': 'Dincolo de înțelegerea doar în limba engleză: Experimente în transferul multilingv zero-shot pentru bulgară', 'ta': 'ஆங்கிலம்- மட்டும் படிப்பது முடிவு', 'ur': 'صرف انگلیسی پڑھنے کی کمپرینس کے علاوہ: بلگاری کے لئے صفر-شٹ Multilingual Transfer میں تجربے', 'so': 'Iska sokow Ingiriis-only Reading Comparison: Imtixaamo in Zero-shot Transfer Multi-Luqad for Bulgarian', 'uz': "Inglizcha- faqat o'qish tugmasi bilan tugadi: Bulgariy uchun Zero- shot Multi-lingʻa tarjima", 'vi': 'Vượt qua quy mô đọc sách duy nhất tiếng Anh: thử nghiệm truyền ngôn ngữ vô ảnh cho Bulgaria', 'bg': 'Отвъд разбирането само на английски език за четене: експерименти в нулевия многоезичен трансфер за български език', 'hr': 'Izvan kompresije samo engleskog čitanja: eksperimenti u multijezičkoj prijenosu za bugarske', 'da': 'Udover engelsk-kun læseforståelse: Eksperimenter i nulskudt flersproget overførsel til bulgarsk', 'nl': 'Meer lezen dan Engels: Experimenten in Zero-shot meertalige overdracht voor Bulgaars', 'de': 'Jenseits des englischsprachigen Leseverständnisses: Experimente im Zero-Shot Mehrsprachentransfer für Bulgarisch', 'id': 'Selain Pembacaan Bahasa Inggris-Hanya: Eksperimen dalam Transfer Berbahasa Berbahasa Zero-shot untuk Bulgarian', 'tr': 'Diňe Iňlisçe Okamak Derjesi: Bulgarça üçin 0-shot Multilingual Transfer Experiments', 'ko': '순수한 영어 읽기 이해 초월: 불가리아어 0회 다중 언어 이동 실험', 'fa': 'جز تأثیر خواندن فقط انگلیسی: تجربه در انتقال زیادی زبان برای بولغاری', 'af': 'Buitend Engels- Slegs lees komprehensie: Experiments in Zero- shot Multilingual Transfer for Bulgarian', 'sw': 'Zaidi ya Uingereza-Kusoma Umoja: Majaribu katika Uhamiaji wa lugha za KiBulgaria', 'am': 'ከኢንጂልኛ-ብቻ አነበብ ውጤት: ፈተናዎች በZero-shot Multilingual Transfer for Bulgarian', 'az': 'Ancaq 캻ngiliz톛 oxuyan S톛f톛r: Bulgarl캼lar 칲칞칲n Zero-shot Multilingual Transfer Experiments', 'bn': 'Beyond English-Only Reading Comprehension: Experiments in Zero-shot Multilingual Transfer for Bulgarian', 'bs': 'Izvan komprencije samo engleskog čitanja: eksperimenti u multijezičkoj prebacivanju nula za bugarske', 'sq': 'Beyond English-Only Reading Comprehension: Experiments in Zero-shot Multilingual Transfer for Bulgarian', 'hy': 'Beyond English-Only Reading Comprehension: Experiments in Zero-shot Multilingual Transfer for Bulgarian', 'fi': 'Vain englanniksi luettavan ymmärtämisen lisäksi: kokeet nollashotin monikielisessä siirrossa bulgariaksi', 'ca': 'Més enllà de la comprensió de llegir només anglès: experiments en transferència multillengua de zero', 'cs': 'Kromě pochopení čtení pouze v angličtině: Experimenty s nulovým vícejazyčným transferem pro bulharštinu', 'et': 'Lisaks inglise keele lugemise mõistmisele: eksperimendid bulgaaria keele null-shot mitmekeelses ülekandes', 'jv': 'Tenggosno Inggris-Perkakas Keterangan Compréncion: Perintah barêng-barêng Multilanguage', 'sk': 'Preko angleškega razumevanja branja: eksperimenti v ničelnem večjezičnem prenosu za bolgarščino', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מעבר להבנה של קריאה בלבד אנגלית: ניסויים בהעברת רבת לשפות אפס', 'bo': 'ཨིན་ཇིའི་ལྷག་ཡིག་ལས་ཁོ་ན་ཀློག་འཇུག་སྟངས་ལ་བསྟུན། བུ་ལྷག་རི་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་བསྐྱེད་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'Recently, reading comprehension models achieved near-human performance on large-scale datasets such as SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, etc. This is largely due to the release of pre-trained contextualized representations such as BERT and ELMo, which can be fine-tuned for the target task. Despite those advances and the creation of more challenging datasets, most of the work is still done for English. Here, we study the effectiveness of multilingual BERT fine-tuned on large-scale English datasets for reading comprehension (e.g., for RACE), and we apply it to Bulgarian multiple-choice reading comprehension. We propose a new dataset containing 2,221 questions from matriculation exams for twelfth grade in various subjects history, biology, geography and philosophy, and 412 additional questions from online quizzes in history. While the quiz authors gave no relevant context, we incorporate knowledge from Wikipedia, retrieving documents matching the combination of question + each answer option. Moreover, we experiment with different indexing and pre-training strategies. The evaluation results show accuracy of 42.23 %, which is well above the baseline of 24.89 %.', 'ar': 'في الآونة الأخيرة ، حققت نماذج فهم القراءة أداءً قريبًا من الإنسان على مجموعات بيانات واسعة النطاق مثل SQuAD و CoQA و MS Macro و RACE وما إلى ذلك. ويرجع ذلك إلى حد كبير إلى إصدار التمثيلات السياقية المدربة مسبقًا مثل BERT و ELMo ، والتي يمكن أن تكون صقل للمهمة المستهدفة. على الرغم من هذه التطورات وإنشاء مجموعات بيانات أكثر تحديًا ، لا يزال معظم العمل يتم للغة الإنجليزية. هنا ، ندرس فعالية BERT متعدد اللغات الذي تم ضبطه بدقة على مجموعات البيانات الإنجليزية واسعة النطاق لفهم القراءة (على سبيل المثال ، لـ RACE) ، ونطبقه على فهم القراءة متعدد الخيارات البلغاري. نقترح مجموعة بيانات جديدة تحتوي على 2221 سؤالاً من امتحانات البجروت للصف الثاني عشر في مواد مختلفة - التاريخ وعلم الأحياء والجغرافيا والفلسفة - و 412 سؤالاً إضافياً من اختبارات التاريخ عبر الإنترنت. بينما لم يقدم مؤلفو الاختبار أي سياق ذي صلة ، فإننا ندمج المعرفة من ويكيبيديا ، ونسترجع المستندات المطابقة لمجموعة الأسئلة + كل خيار إجابة. علاوة على ذلك ، نقوم بتجربة استراتيجيات مختلفة للفهرسة وقبل التدريب. تظهر نتائج التقييم دقة 42.23٪ ، وهو أعلى بكثير من خط الأساس البالغ 24.89٪.', 'pt': 'Recentemente, os modelos de compreensão de leitura alcançaram desempenho próximo ao humano em conjuntos de dados de grande escala, como SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, etc. Isso se deve em grande parte ao lançamento de representações contextualizadas pré-treinadas, como BERT e ELMo, que podem ser ajustado para a tarefa de destino. Apesar desses avanços e da criação de conjuntos de dados mais desafiadores, a maior parte do trabalho ainda é feita para o inglês. Aqui, estudamos a eficácia do BERT multilíngue ajustado em conjuntos de dados em inglês de grande escala para compreensão de leitura (por exemplo, para RACE) e o aplicamos à compreensão de leitura de múltipla escolha búlgara. Propomos um novo conjunto de dados contendo 2.221 questões de exames de matrícula para o 12º ano em várias disciplinas —história, biologia, geografia e filosofia— e 412 questões adicionais de questionários online de história. Embora os autores do questionário não tenham fornecido nenhum contexto relevante, incorporamos o conhecimento da Wikipedia, recuperando documentos que correspondam à combinação de pergunta + cada opção de resposta. Além disso, experimentamos diferentes estratégias de indexação e pré-treinamento. Os resultados da avaliação mostram acurácia de 42,23%, bem acima da linha de base de 24,89%.', 'fr': "Récemment, les modèles de compréhension de lecture ont atteint des performances quasi humaines sur des ensembles de données à grande échelle tels que SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, etc. Cela est dû en grande partie à la publication de représentations contextualisées pré-entraînées telles que BERT et ElMo, qui peuvent être affinées pour la tâche cible. Malgré ces avancées et la création d'ensembles de données plus complexes, la majeure partie du travail est toujours faite pour l'anglais. Ici, nous étudions l'efficacité du BERT multilingue affiné sur des ensembles de données anglais à grande échelle pour la compréhension de la lecture (par exemple, pour RACE), et nous l'appliquons à la compréhension à choix multiples en bulgare. Nous proposons un nouveau jeu de données contenant 2 221 questions issues des examens de fin d'études secondaires pour la douzième année dans diverses matières —histoire, biologie, géographie et philosophie—, et 412 questions supplémentaires issues de quiz en ligne sur l'histoire. Bien que les auteurs du quiz n'aient fourni aucun contexte pertinent, nous intégrons les connaissances de Wikipédia, en récupérant des documents correspondant à la combinaison de la question et de chaque option de réponse. De plus, nous expérimentons différentes stratégies d'indexation et de pré-formation. Les résultats de l'évaluation montrent une précision de 42,23\xa0%, ce qui est bien supérieur au niveau de référence de 24,89\xa0%.", 'es': 'Recientemente, los modelos de comprensión lectora alcanzaron un rendimiento casi humano en conjuntos de datos a gran escala como sQuad, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, etc. Esto se debe en gran parte a la publicación de representaciones contextualizadas previamente entrenadas, como BERT y eLMO, que se pueden ajustar para la tarea objetivo. A pesar de esos avances y la creación de conjuntos de datos más desafiantes, la mayor parte del trabajo todavía está hecho para el inglés. Aquí, estudiamos la eficacia del BERT multilingüe ajustado en conjuntos de datos de inglés a gran escala para la comprensión lectora (por ejemplo, para RACE), y lo aplicamos a la comprensión lectora búlgara de opción múltiple. Proponemos un nuevo conjunto de datos que contiene 2221 preguntas de los exámenes de matriculación para el duodécimo grado en varias materias —historia, biología, geografía y filosofía—, y 412 preguntas adicionales de cuestionarios en línea de historia. Si bien los autores del cuestionario no proporcionaron un contexto relevante, incorporamos el conocimiento de Wikipedia, recuperando documentos que coincidan con la combinación de pregunta y cada opción de respuesta. Además, experimentamos con diferentes estrategias de indexación y preentrenamiento. Los resultados de la evaluación muestran una precisión del 42,23%, que está muy por encima de la línea base del 24,89%.', 'ja': '最近では、読解モデルは、SQuAD、CoQA、MSマクロ、RACEなどの大規模データセットでほぼ人間のパフォーマンスを達成しました。 これは、ターゲットタスクに微調整できるBERTやELMoなどの事前にトレーニングされたコンテキスト化された表現のリリースによるところが大きい。 これらの進歩とより困難なデータセットの作成にもかかわらず、ほとんどの作業はまだ英語で行われています。 ここでは、読解力（例えば、人種）のために大規模な英語データセットで微調整された多言語BERTの有効性を研究し、それをブルガリア語の複数選択の読解力に適用します。 歴史、生物学、地理学、哲学などの様々な科目の12年生の入学試験の2,221問、および歴史のオンラインクイズの412問を含む新しいデータセットを提案します。 クイズの作成者は関連する文脈を提供しませんでしたが、ウィキペディアからの知識を取り入れ、質問と各回答のオプションの組み合わせに一致する文書を取得しました。 さらに、さまざまなインデックス作成戦略と事前トレーニング戦略を実験しています。 評価結果は42.23%の精度であり、ベースラインの24.89%を大きく上回っている。', 'zh': '近读解形于SQuAD,CoQA,MS Macro,RACE等大数集上成近人之性。 此盖发于豫教之上下(BERTELMo),可以针其务也。 虽有此进更具挑战性之数,而大抵犹为英语成也。 于此观之,大英语数据集上微调之多言BERT以观解(如RACE)之有效性,而择其所宜于保加利亚语者。 建一新数据集,包括自史,生物学地理、哲学诸学科十二年入学考试之2,221一问,及在线测验者412他事。 虽测验无背景,整合维基百科知识,检括与问+每对选项合文档。 又试索引预训练之策。 评估结果显示准确率为42.23%,远高于基线24.89%。', 'ru': 'Недавно, чтение моделей понимания достигло почти человеческой производительности на крупномасштабных наборах данных, таких как SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE и т.д. Это в значительной степени связано с выпуском предварительно обученных контекстуализированных представлений, таких как BERT и ELMo, которые могут быть доработаны для целевой задачи. Несмотря на эти достижения и создание более сложных наборов данных, большая часть работы по-прежнему выполняется в отношении английского языка. Здесь мы изучаем эффективность многоязычного BERT, доработанного на крупномасштабных наборах английских данных для понимания чтения (например, для РАСЫ), и применяем его к болгарскому пониманию чтения с множественным выбором. Мы предлагаем новый набор данных, содержащий 2221 вопрос из вступительных экзаменов в двенадцатый класс по различным предметам - истории, биологии, географии и философии, и 412 дополнительных вопросов из онлайн-викторин по истории. Хотя авторы викторины не дали никакого соответствующего контекста, мы включаем знания из Википедии, получая документы, соответствующие комбинации вопроса + каждый вариант ответа. Более того, мы экспериментируем с разными стратегиями индексации и предварительного обучения. Результаты оценки показывают точность 42,23%, что значительно выше базового уровня 24,89%.', 'hi': 'हाल ही में, पढ़ने की समझ मॉडल ने SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, आदि जैसे बड़े पैमाने पर डेटासेट पर निकट-मानव प्रदर्शन हासिल किया। यह काफी हद तक BERT और ELMo जैसे पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित contextualized अभ्यावेदन की रिहाई के कारण है, जिसे लक्ष्य कार्य के लिए ठीक किया जा सकता है। उन अग्रिमों और अधिक चुनौतीपूर्ण डेटासेट के निर्माण के बावजूद, अधिकांश काम अभी भी अंग्रेजी के लिए किया जाता है। यहां, हम पढ़ने की समझ (उदाहरण के लिए, RACE के लिए) के लिए बड़े पैमाने पर अंग्रेजी डेटासेट पर बहुभाषी BERT की प्रभावशीलता का अध्ययन करते हैं, और हम इसे बल्गेरियाई बहु-विकल्प पढ़ने की समझ पर लागू करते हैं। हम एक नए डेटासेट का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसमें विभिन्न विषयों - इतिहास, जीव विज्ञान, भूगोल और दर्शन में बारहवीं कक्षा के लिए मैट्रिक परीक्षा से 2,221 प्रश्न शामिल हैं- और इतिहास में ऑनलाइन क्विज़ से 412 अतिरिक्त प्रश्न। जबकि प्रश्नोत्तरी लेखकों ने कोई प्रासंगिक संदर्भ नहीं दिया, हम विकिपीडिया से ज्ञान को शामिल करते हैं, प्रश्न + प्रत्येक उत्तर विकल्प के संयोजन से मेल खाने वाले दस्तावेजों को पुनर्प्राप्त करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम विभिन्न अनुक्रमण और पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण रणनीतियों के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं। मूल्यांकन परिणाम 42.23% की सटीकता दिखाते हैं, जो 24.89% की आधार रेखा से ऊपर है।', 'ga': 'Le déanaí, bhain samhlacha léamhthuisceana feidhmíocht gar-daonna amach ar thacair sonraí ar scála mór mar SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, etc. Tá sé seo den chuid is mó mar gheall ar scaoileadh léirithe comhthéacsúla réamhoilte mar BERT agus ELMo, ar féidir a bheith ann. mionchoigeartaithe don tasc sprice. In ainneoin an dul chun cinn sin agus cruthú na dtacar sonraí níos dúshlánaí, déantar an chuid is mó den obair don Bhéarla fós. Anseo, déanaimid staidéar ar éifeachtacht ilteangach BERT mionchoigeartaithe ar thacair sonraí Béarla ar mhórscála le haghaidh léamhthuisceana (m.sh., le haghaidh RACE), agus cuirimid i bhfeidhm é ar léamhthuiscint ilroghnacha na Bulgáire. Molaimid tacar sonraí nua ina mbeidh 2,221 ceist ó scrúduithe máithreánach don dóú grád déag in ábhair éagsúla — stair, bitheolaíocht, tíreolaíocht agus fealsúnacht—, agus 412 ceist bhreise ó thráth na gceist ar líne sa stair. Cé nár thug údair na gceistneoir aon chomhthéacs ábhartha, ionchorpraímid eolas ó Vicipéid, ag aisghabháil doiciméid a thagann leis an meascán de cheist + gach rogha freagra. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid triail le straitéisí innéacsaithe agus réamhoiliúna éagsúla. Léiríonn torthaí na meastóireachta cruinneas 42.23%, atá i bhfad os cionn an bhunlíne de 24.89%.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე მოდელები, რომლებიც SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, და განმავლობაში მიღებულია მხოლოდ ადამიანის გამოსახულება, რომლებიც BERT და ELMo, რომლებიც უნდა იყოს მისახულებელი საქაღალდე. ამ პროგრესის და უფრო შესაძლებელი მონაცემების შექმნა, უფრო მეტი სამუშაო მონაცემები ანგლისთვის გავაკეთება. აქ, ჩვენ ვისწავლობთ მრავალენგური BERT-ის ეფექტიურობას, რომელიც დიდი განსაზღვრებული ანგლისური მონაცემების შესახებ (მაგალითად, RACE-ის შესახებ), და ჩვენ ამას ბულდარიური მრავალ განსაზღვრებული ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალი მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც 2,221 კითხვების მარტიკულაციის გამოცემებისთვის 12 წლის განსხვავებაში -ისტორია, ბოლოგია, геოგოფია და ფილოსოფია-, და 412 დამატებული მაგრამ კითხვის ავტორებები არ აკეთებენ შესაბამისი კონტექსტი, ჩვენ ვიკიპედიადან მეცნიერებას ჩვენ დავყენებთ, კითხვის კომბიუნიაციის კომბიუნია დამატებით, ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებით განსხვავებული ინდექსირების და პრეტექტირების სტრატიგიებით. 42,23%, რომელიც უფრო მეტი უფრო მეტი 24,89%-ის ფექცია.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατα, τα μοντέλα κατανόησης ανάγνωσης πέτυχαν σχεδόν ανθρώπινη απόδοση σε σύνολα δεδομένων μεγάλης κλίμακας, όπως κλπ. Αυτό οφείλεται σε μεγάλο βαθμό στην απελευθέρωση προ-εκπαιδευμένων περιβαλλοντολογικών αναπαραστάσεων όπως και οι οποίες μπορούν να προσαρμοστούν για την εργασία στόχου. Παρά τις προόδους αυτές και τη δημιουργία πιο απαιτητικών συνόλων δεδομένων, το μεγαλύτερο μέρος της εργασίας εξακολουθεί να γίνεται για τα αγγλικά. Εδώ, μελετάμε την αποτελεσματικότητα του πολυγλωσσικού BERT συντονισμένου σε μεγάλα σύνολα Αγγλικών δεδομένων για την κατανόηση της ανάγνωσης (π.χ. για το RACE), και το εφαρμόζουμε στη βουλγαρική κατανόηση ανάγνωσης πολλαπλών επιλογών. Προτείνουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων που περιέχει ερωτήσεις 2,221 από τις εξετάσεις εγγραφής για τη δωδέκατη τάξη σε διάφορα θέματα -ιστορία, βιολογία, γεωγραφία και φιλοσοφία- και 412 επιπλέον ερωτήσεις από διαδικτυακά κουίζ στην ιστορία. Ενώ οι συντάκτες του κουίζ δεν έδωσαν σχετικό πλαίσιο, ενσωματώνουμε γνώσεις από τη Βικιπαίδεια, ανακτώντας έγγραφα που ταιριάζουν με τον συνδυασμό της ερώτησης και κάθε επιλογής απάντησης. Επιπλέον, πειραματιζόμαστε με διαφορετικές στρατηγικές ευρετηρίασης και προενταξιακής κατάρτισης. Τα αποτελέσματα της αξιολόγησης δείχνουν ακρίβεια 42,23%, η οποία είναι πολύ πάνω από τη γραμμή αναφοράς 24,89%.', 'it': "Recentemente, i modelli di comprensione della lettura hanno raggiunto prestazioni quasi umane su set di dati su larga scala come SQUAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, ecc. Ciò è dovuto in gran parte al rilascio di rappresentazioni contestualizzate pre-addestrate come BERT e ELMo, che possono essere perfezionate per il compito target. Nonostante questi progressi e la creazione di set di dati più impegnativi, la maggior parte del lavoro è ancora fatto per l'inglese. Qui studiamo l'efficacia del BERT multilingue perfezionato su set di dati inglesi su larga scala per la comprensione della lettura (ad esempio, per RACE), e lo applichiamo alla comprensione della lettura bulgara a scelta multipla. Proponiamo un nuovo set di dati contenente 2.221 domande provenienti dagli esami di immatricolazione per il dodicesimo grado in varie materie - storia, biologia, geografia e filosofia -, e 412 domande aggiuntive da quiz online di storia. Mentre gli autori del quiz non hanno fornito alcun contesto rilevante, incorporamo conoscenze da Wikipedia, recuperando documenti corrispondenti alla combinazione di domanda + ogni opzione di risposta. Inoltre, sperimentiamo diverse strategie di indicizzazione e pre-formazione. I risultati della valutazione mostrano una precisione del 42,23%, che è ben al di sopra del basale del 24,89%.", 'hu': 'A közelmúltban az olvasásértési modellek emberi teljesítményt értek el nagyszabású adathalmazokon, mint például SQUAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE stb. Ez nagyrészt annak köszönhető, hogy előre képzett kontextuális reprezentációkat, mint például a BERT és az ELMo megjelenítettek, amelyek finomhangolhatók a célfeladathoz. Az előrelépések és a nagyobb kihívást jelentő adatkészletek létrehozása ellenére a munka nagy részét még mindig angol nyelven végzik. Itt tanulmányozzuk a többnyelvű BERT hatékonyságát, amelyet nagyszabású angol nyelvű adatkészleteken finomhangoltunk az olvasás értésére (pl. RACE esetében), és ezt a bolgár többválasztású olvasási értésre alkalmazzuk. Javasolunk egy új adatkészletet, amely 2 221 kérdést tartalmaz a tizenkettedik osztályban szereplő felvételi vizsgákról, különböző tárgyakban - történelem, biológia, földrajz és filozófia -, valamint 412 további kérdést az online történelem kvízeiből. Bár a kvíz szerzői nem adtak megfelelő kontextust, a Wikipédiából származó ismereteket magukba foglaljuk, a kérdés + minden válasz lehetőség kombinációjának megfelelő dokumentumokat keresünk. Emellett különböző indexelési és előképzési stratégiákkal kísérletezünk. Az értékelési eredmények 42,23%-os pontosságot mutatnak, ami jóval meghaladja a 24,89%-os kiindulási értéket.', 'kk': 'Жуырда, SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE және т. б. секілді үлкен масштаб деректер қорларында адамдардың жақындағы әсер етіліктерін оқу үлгілерін оқу үлгілері. Бұл мақсатты тапсырма үшін келесі бақылау үшін болады. Бұл бағдарламаларды және көбірек деректер қорларын құруға қарамастан, жұмыс көпшілігі әлі ағылшынша үшін жасалған. Мұнда біз бірнеше тілді BERT- тың көпшілігін оқу үшін үлкен ағылшын деректер жиындарына (мысалы, RACE- тың үшін) түсіндірілген көпшілікті зерттейміз. Бұны Болгариялық бірнеше таңдауларды оқу тү Біз жаңа деректер жинағын 2,221 сұрақ матрикулацияның екінші сыныптарының - тарихы, биология, география және философия -, және тарихдағы онлайн кеңістіктерінің 412 қосымша сұрақтарын жасап береміз Сұрақ авторлары маңызды контексті жоқ болғанда, біз Википедиядан білім беріп, сұрақ тізбегіне сәйкесті құжаттарды алу + әрбір жауап параметріне сәйкесті. Қосымша, біз басқа индекстеу және алдындағы оқыту стратегияларына тәжірибедік. Бағалау нәтижелері 42,23% деген дұрыстығын көрсетеді, бұл 24,89% негізгі жолдан артық.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തുതന്നെ വായിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d എസ്ക്വാഡ്, കോക്യൂഎം, എസ് മാക്രോ എന്ന പോലെയുള്ള വലിയ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റുകളില്\u200d അടുത്തുനിന്ന് മനുഷ്യരുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നു. ഇത് മുമ്പ് പരിശീലനി ആ മുന്നോട്ടുകളും കൂടുതല്\u200d വിലപിടിക്കുന്ന ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ സൃഷ്ടിച്ചാലും മിക്കവാറും ഇംഗ്ലീഷിന്  ഇവിടെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവർത്തികമായ ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ പ്രവർത്തികമാണ് പഠിക്കുന്നത്, വലിയ ഭാഷക്കുള്ള ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d വായിക്ക നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. മാറ്റ്രിക്കലേഷന്\u200d പരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് 2,221 ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. വിവിധ വിഷയങ് ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ എഴുത്തുകാര്\u200dക്ക് വിക്കിപിഡിയയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള അറിവ് ലഭ്യമാക്കിയിട്ടില്ല, ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ + ഓരോ ഉത്തരം ഐച്ഛ അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത സൂചിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d 42. 23 ശതമാനം കാണിക്കുന്നു. അത് 24. 89 ശതമാനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നല്ലതാണ്.', 'mt': "Dan l-aħħar, mudelli ta’ komprensjoni tal-qari miksuba kważi mill-bniedem fuq settijiet ta’ dejta fuq skala kbira bħal SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, eċċ. Dan huwa l-aktar minħabba r-rilaxx ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet kuntestwalizzati mħarrġa minn qabel bħall-BERT u l-ELMo, li jistgħu jiġu aġġustati bir-reqqa għall-kompitu fil-mira. Minkejja dawk il-avvanzi u l-ħolqien ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta aktar ta’ sfida, il-biċċa l-kbira tax-xogħol għadu jsir għall-Ingliż. Hawnhekk, nistudjaw l-effettività tal-BERT multilingwi aġġustati fuq settijiet ta’ dejta Ingliżi fuq skala kbira g ħall-fehim tal-qari (pereżempju, għar-RACE), u napplikawha għall-fehim tal-qari Bulgari b’għażliet multipli. Aħna nipproponu sett ġdid ta' dejta li fih 2,221 mistoqsija minn eżamijiet ta' matrikulazzjoni għat-tnax-il grad f'suġġetti varji - l-istorja, il-bijoloġija, il-ġeografija u l-filosofija -, u 412 mistoqsija addizzjonali minn kwiżiti onlajn fl-istorja. Filwaqt li l-awturi tal-kwiżit ma taw l-ebda kuntest rilevanti, inkorporajna l-għarfien mill-Wikipedia, billi nġabru d-dokumenti li jaqblu mal-kombinazzjoni tal-mistoqsija + kull għażla tat-tweġiba. Barra minn hekk, qed nagħmlu esperimenti b’strateġiji differenti ta’ indiċjar u ta’ qabel it-taħriġ. Ir-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni juru preċiżjoni ta’ 42.23%, li hija ferm ogħla mil-linja bażi ta’ 24.89%.", 'no': 'Nyleg er lesingsmodeller for forståelse oppnådd nær menneskelige utviklingar på store skala datasett, slik som SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE osv. Dette er stort på grunn av avslutting av først trengte kontekstualiserte representasjonar som BERT og ELMo, som kan finnast for måloppgåva. Til tross av desse avanserte og opprettinga av meir vanskelege dataset, er dei fleste av arbeidet fortsatt gjort for engelsk. Her studerer vi effektiviteten av fleirspråk BERT-innstillingar på store angleske datasett for lesing av forståelse (f.eks. for RACE), og vi bruker det til bulgarske fleirval for lesing av forståelse. Vi foreslår eit nytt dataset som inneheld 2,221 spørsmål frå matrikulatingseksamen for to grader i ulike tema -historie, biologie, geografi og filosofia-, og 412 tilleggske spørsmål frå internett-kviser i historie. Mens spørsmålsautorane gjev ingen relevant kontekst, inkluderer vi kunnskap frå Wikipedia, hentar dokument som passar med kombinasjonen av spørsmål + kvar svarvalet. I tillegg eksperimenterer vi med ulike indekseringsstrategiar og føreøvingsstrategiar. Evalueringsresultatet viser nøyaktighet på 42,23 %, som er veldig over baseline på 24,89 %.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үед хүн төрөлхтний ажиллагааны ойролцоогоор хүн төрөлхтний үйл ажиллагааны тухай унших загварууд нь SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE гэх мэт том хэмжээний өгөгдлийн сангууд дээр гарч ирсэн юм. Энэ нь ихэвчлэн зорилготой ажиллагаанд сайжруулж чадах боломжтой болсон орчин да Эдгээр хөгжлийн талаар, илүү хэцүү өгөгдлийн санг бүтээсэн ч ихэнх нь Англи хэлний хувьд хийгдсэн. Энд бид олон хэлний BERT-ын эффективностыг судалж, том хэмжээний Англи хэлний өгөгдлийн санг унших (жишээ нь RACE-ийн төлөө) тодорхойлдог. Бид өөр олон сурагчдын 12-р ангийн матрикулацийн шалгалтаас 2,221 асуулт өгөгдлийн сангуудыг суралцдаг. Шинэ зохиолчид ямар ч хамааралтай нөхцөл байдлыг өгч чадахгүй ч бид Википедиадаас мэдлэг нэмж, асуултын нэгтгэл + хариулт сонголт бүрт холбоотой баримт гаргаж байна. Мөн бид өөр индекс болон урд сургалтын стратегийг туршиж байна. Үүний шалгалтын үр дүнд 42.23%-ын тодорхойлолт харагдаж байна. Энэ нь 24.89%.', 'pl': 'Ostatnio modele zrozumienia czytania osiągnęły wydajność bliską człowieka na dużych zbiorach danych, takich jak SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE itp. Wynika to w dużej mierze z wydania wstępnie przeszkolonych kontekstowych reprezentacji, takich jak BERT i ELMo, które można dostosować do zadania docelowego. Pomimo tych postępów i tworzenia bardziej wymagających zbiorów danych, większość prac nadal jest wykonywana w języku angielskim. Tutaj badamy skuteczność wielojęzycznego BERT dostrojonego na dużych zbiorach danych angielskich dla zrozumienia czytania (np. dla RACE) i stosujemy go do bułgarskiego zrozumienia czytania wielokrotnego wyboru. Proponujemy nowy zestaw danych zawierający pytania 2,221 z egzaminów maturalnych dla dwunastej klasy w różnych przedmiotach – historii, biologii, geografii i filozofii oraz 412 dodatkowe pytania z quizów online z historii. Podczas gdy autorzy quizu nie podali istotnego kontekstu, uwzględniamy wiedzę z Wikipedii, pobierając dokumenty pasujące do kombinacji pytań i każdej opcji odpowiedzi. Ponadto eksperymentujemy z różnymi strategiami indeksowania i przedtreningowymi. Wyniki oceny pokazują dokładność 42,23%, znacznie powyżej wartości wyjściowej 24,89%.', 'ms': 'Baru-baru ini, model pemahaman membaca mencapai prestasi dekat manusia pada set data skala besar seperti SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, dll. Ini sebahagian besar disebabkan pembebasan perwakilan kontekstualisasi terlatih seperti BERT dan ELMo, yang boleh ditetapkan untuk tugas sasaran. Walaupun kemajuan tersebut dan penciptaan set data yang lebih menantang, kebanyakan pekerjaan masih dilakukan untuk bahasa Inggeris. Di sini, kami mempelajari keefektivitas BERT berbilang bahasa ditetapkan pada set data Inggeris skala besar untuk pemahaman membaca (contohnya untuk RACE), dan kami menerapkannya kepada pemahaman pembacaan berbilang pilihan Bulgaria. Kami cadangkan set data baru yang mengandungi 2,221 soalan dari ujian matrikulasi untuk gred ke-12 dalam berbagai subjek - sejarah, biologi, geografi dan filosofi, - dan 412 soalan tambahan dari ujian online dalam sejarah. Sementara penulis ujian tidak memberikan konteks yang relevan, kami memasukkan pengetahuan dari Wikipedia, mengambil dokumen yang sepadan dengan kombinasi soalan + setiap pilihan jawapan. Selain itu, kami eksperimen dengan strategi pengindeks dan pralatihan yang berbeza. Hasil penilaian menunjukkan ketepatan 42.23%, yang jauh di atas asas 24.89%.', 'mk': 'Неодамна, моделите за читање на разбирање постигнаа речиси човечки резултати на големи податоци како што се SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE итн. Ова е во голема мера поради објавувањето на предобучени контекстуални претставувања како што се BERT и ELMo, кои може да се финетизираат за целната задача. И покрај овие напредоци и создавањето попредизвикувачки податоци, повеќето од работите се сé уште се вршат на англиски. Овде ја проучуваме ефикасноста на мултијазичниот БЕРТ финетизиран на големи англиски податоци за разбирање на читањето (на пример, за РАЦЕ), и ја применуваме на бугарското разбирање на читањето со повеќе избори. Предложуваме нов податок кој содржи 2.221 прашања од матрикулациските испитувања за 12-то одделение во различни теми - историја, биологија, географија и филозофија - и 412 дополнителни прашања од онлајн испитувања во историјата. Иако авторите на тестот не дадоа релевантно контекст, ние вклучуваме знаење од Википедија, земајќи документи кои се совпаѓаат со комбинацијата на прашањето + секоја опција на одговор. Moreover, we experiment with different indexing and pre-training strategies.  Резултатите од проценката покажуваат точност од 42,23 отсто, што е значително над основната вредност од 24,89 отсто.', 'sr': 'Nedavno su modeli razumijevanja postigli blizu ljudskog učinka na velikoj skali podataka poput SQuAD, CoQA, MS makro, RACE itd. To je uglavnom zbog oslobađanja predobučenih kontekstualiziranih predstavljanja kao što su BERT i ELMo, koje mogu biti dobro ispravljene za ciljni zadatak. Uprkos tim napredama i stvaranju više izazovnih podataka, većina posla je još uvek radila za engleski. Ovde proučavamo učinkovitost višejezičkih BERT-a koji je napravljen na velikoj engleskoj bazi podataka za čitanje razumijevanja (npr. za RACE) i primjenjujemo ga na Bugarsku razumijevanje višeizbora. Predlažemo novu setu podataka koja sadrži 2.221 pitanja iz ispitivanja matrikulacije za dvanaestog razreda u raznim subjektima - istorija, biologija, geografija i filozofija -, i 412 dodatnih pitanja iz online kviz u istoriji. Iako autori kviz nisu dali nikakvog relevantnog konteksta, uključujemo znanje iz Wikipedije, prikupljamo dokumente koji odgovaraju kombinaciji pitanja + svaka opcija odgovora. Osim toga, eksperimentiramo različite strategije indeksiranja i predobuke. Rezultati procjene pokazuju tačnost 42,23%, što je mnogo iznad početne linije od 24,89%.', 'lt': 'Pastaruoju metu skaitymo supratimo modeliai, kurių rezultatai beveik žmonėms buvo pasiekti plataus masto duomenų rinkiniuose, pavyzdžiui, SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE ir t. t. Tai daugiausia susiję su iš anksto parengtų kontekstinių atstovybių, pavyzdžiui, BERT ir ELMo, išleidimu, kuris gali būti patobulintas tiksliniam uždaviniui atlikti. Nepaisant šių pažangų ir sudėtingesnių duomenų rinkinių kūrimo, dauguma darbų vis dar atliekama anglų kalba. Čia mes tiriame daugiakalbio BERT veiksmingumą, patobulintą didelio masto anglų duomenų rinkiniais skaitymo supratimui (pvz., RACE) ir jį taikome Bulgarijos daugiakalbio skaitymo supratimui. Siūlome naują duomenų rinkinį, kuriame pateikiama 2 221 klausimų iš dvyliktojo klasės matrikuliacinių egzaminų įvairiose srityse - istorijoje, biologijoje, geografijoje ir filosofijoje - ir 412 papildomų klausimų iš istorijos internetinių kvizų. Nors kvizo autoriai nepateikė jokių svarbių kontekstų, mes įtraukiame žinias iš Wikipedia, gaudami dokumentus, atitinkančius klausimo derinį + kiekvieną atsakymo variantą. Be to, eksperimentuojame su skirtingomis indeksavimo ir parengiamojo mokymo strategijomis. Vertinimo rezultatai rodo, kad tikslumas yra 42,23 %, o tai gerokai viršija pradinę 24,89 %.', 'si': 'අවසානයෙන්, කියවන්න පුළුවන් මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයේ දත්ත සේට වගේ SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, ඉතින්. මේක ගොඩක් වැඩියෙන් ඉදිරියට පුළුවන් පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරමාණ ඒ ප්\u200dරධානය සහ තරම් ප්\u200dරශ්ණ දත්ත සේට් සිද්ධ වෙන්න තිබුනොත්, ගොඩක් වැඩ තාමත් ඉංග්\u200dරීසියට කරනවා. මෙතන, අපි ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් BERT ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි දත්ත සේට් වලින් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා (උදාහරණය, RACE වලින්), ඒ වගේම අපි ඒක බුල්ගරියාන අපි අළුත් දත්ත සෙට් එකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ 2,221 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ විවිධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි -ඉතිහාස, ජීවිත, භූතිකාරය විකිපිඩියා වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධතාවක් නැති විදියට, අපි විකිපිඩියා වලින් දන්නවක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, ප්\u200dරශ තවත්, අපි වෙනස් සංකේතනය සහ ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා. විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ 42.23%, ඒක 24.89% විශේෂයෙන් වඩා හොඳයි.', 'ro': 'Recent, modelele de înțelegere a citirii au obținut performanțe aproape umane pe seturi de date la scară largă, cum ar fi SQUAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, etc. Acest lucru se datorează în mare măsură lansării de reprezentări contextualizate pre-instruite, cum ar fi BERT și ELMo, care pot fi reglate fin pentru sarcina țintă. În ciuda acestor progrese și crearea de seturi de date mai dificile, cea mai mare parte a lucrării este încă făcută pentru limba engleză. Aici studiem eficacitatea BERT multilingv, reglată fin pe seturi de date engleze la scară largă pentru înțelegerea citirii (de exemplu, pentru RACE), și o aplicăm în înțelegerea citirii bulgare cu răspunsuri multiple. Vă propunem un nou set de date care conține 2.221 de întrebări din examenele de înscriere pentru clasa a XII-a în diferite subiecte - istorie, biologie, geografie și filozofie -, și 412 de întrebări suplimentare din teste online din istorie. În timp ce autorii testului nu au dat nici un context relevant, noi încorporăm cunoștințe de pe Wikipedia, recuperand documente care corespund combinației de întrebare + fiecare opțiune de răspuns. Mai mult decât atât, experimentăm diferite strategii de indexare și pre-formare. Rezultatele evaluării arată o acuratețe de 42,23%, ceea ce este cu mult peste valoarea inițială de 24,89%.', 'so': "Muddo ugu dambeysay, tusaalaha hoose-hoose-hoose ee u dhow sameynta dadka, sida SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE etc. taas waxaa ugu badnaan in loo sii daayo macaamilooyinka horay-tababarida, sida BERT iyo ELMo, kaas oo u suurtogsan kara shaqada goalka. Inta kastoo uu horumarinayo iyo abuurista kooxda macluumaadka ka adag, shaqada intooda badan weli waxaa loo sameeyaa ingiriisiga. Halkan, waxaynu baranaynaa Effektada BERT e e luuqadaha kala duduwan oo ku qoran koorasyada takhasuska Ingiriiska oo waaweyn ee akhriska (tusaale ahaan RACE), waxaana lagu codsanaynaa kooraska akhriska qoraalka kala duduwan ee Bulgaria. Taariikhda cusub ee macluumaadka waxaa ka soo jeeda su'aalo 2,221 oo ka mid ah imtixaanka takhasuska ee fasalka laba iyo tobnaad ee maadooyinka kala duduwan, taariikhda, biology, geography iyo filosofia iyo 412 su'aalo kale oo ku saabsan ee shabakadda la xiriira. Intii ay qoraalka quis wax ku saabsan aheyn, waxaynu ka qornaa aqoonta Wikipedia, waxaan heli karnaa dukumentiyada oo u eg wadanka su'aalaha + mid kasta oo jawaab leh. Sidoo kale waxaynu ku tijaabinaynaa qoraalo kala duduwan oo wax barashada ka horraysa. Kaartaynta qiimeyntu waxay muuqataa saxda 42.23 boqolkiiba, taas oo ka sarreeya saldhigga 24.89 boqolkiiba.", 'sv': 'Nyligen uppnådde läsförståelsemodeller nästan mänsklig prestanda på storskaliga datauppsättningar som SQUAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, etc. Detta beror till stor del på att förhandsutbildade kontextualiserade representationer som BERT och ELMo släpps, som kan finjusteras för måluppgiften. Trots dessa framsteg och skapandet av mer utmanande datauppsättningar görs det mesta av arbetet fortfarande för engelska. Här studerar vi effektiviteten av flerspråkig BERT finjusterad på storskaliga engelska dataset för läsförståelse (t.ex. för RACE), och vi tillämpar det på bulgariska flervalsläsförståelse. Vi föreslår ett nytt dataset som innehåller 2 221 frågor från studentexamen för tolfteårskurs i olika ämnen -historia, biologi, geografi och filosofi- och 412 ytterligare frågor från onlinefrågesporter i historia. Även om frågeförfattarna inte gav något relevant sammanhang införlivar vi kunskap från Wikipedia och hämtar dokument som matchar kombinationen av fråga + varje svarsalternativ. Dessutom experimenterar vi med olika indexerings- och fortbildningsstrategier. Utvärderingsresultaten visar på en noggrannhet på 42,23%, vilket är långt över baslinjen på 24,89%.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில், பெரிய அளவு தரவுத்தளங்கள் SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE மற்றும் பெரிய தொகுதி மாதிரிகளை படிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் போன்ற பெரும்பாலான தொகுதி மாதிரிகளை வாசிக்கவும். இலக்கு செயல்பாட்டிற்கு  அந்த முன்னேற்றங்கள் மற்றும் அதிக சவாலிக்கும் தரவுத்தளங்களை உருவாக்கும் பொருள்கள் இன்னும் ஆங்கிலத்தி இங்கே நாம் பல மொழிகளின் விளைவுகளை பெரிய அளவு ஆங்கிலத்தின் தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் விளைவுகளைப் படிக்கும் (உதாரணமாக RACE க்கு) நாம் ஒரு புதிய தரவுத்தளத்தில் 2,221 கேள்விகள் இருந்து தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் இதில் இருந்து 12 முழு வகுப்பில் இருந்து கேள்விகள் உள்ளன - வரலாற கேள்வி ஆசிரியர்கள் எந்த தொடர்புடைய சூழலும் கொடுக்கவில்லை, நாம் விகிபிடியாவிலிருந்து தெரிவை உள்ளிடுகிறோம், கேள்வி க மேலும், நாம் வேறு சுட்டுதல் மற்றும் முன் பயிற்சி திட்டங்களைக் கொண்டு பரிசோதிக்கிறோம். மதிப்பின் முடிவுகள் 42. 23% சரியாக காட்டுகிறது, அது 24. 89% அடிப்படையில் நன்றாக இருக்கிறது.', 'ur': 'اچھے سے، لوگوں کے نزدیک عملکرد کے مطابق سمجھنے کی مدل پڑھنے کی وجہ سے بڑی سیکئڈ، CoQA، MS مکرو، RACE، اور اس کے مطابق. یہ بہت زیادہ تعلیم کی پیش آموزش کی کنٹکسٹیول کی اجازت کی وجہ سے ہے جیسے BERT اور ELMo، جو موجود کام کے لئے ٹھیک ٹھیک سمجھ سکتی ہے. اگرچہ ان سے زیادہ مشکل ڈاٹ سٹوں کی پیدائش اور پیدائش کی وجہ سے بہت سی کام انگلیسی کے لئے کیا جاتا ہے۔ یہاں، ہم بہت سی زبان BERT کے مطابق مطابق مطابق کر رہے ہیں جو بہت سی مطابق انگلیسی ڈاٹ سٹ پر مطابق کریں (جیسے RACE کے لئے) اور ہم اسے بلغاریی بہت سی انتخاب پڑھنے کے مطابق پڑھتے ہیں۔ ہم نے ایک نئی ڈیٹ سٹ کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جس میں 2,221 سوال مختلف موضوع میں بارہ گریڈ کی آزمائش کے لئے ہے -تاریخ, زیولوژی, جغرافی اور فلسفی-, اور 412 اضافہ سوال اپنا تاریخ میں آنلاین کیز سے۔ اگرچہ کویز لکھنے والوں نے کوئی معاملہ نہیں دیا تھا، ہم ویکیپیڈیا سے علم میں شامل کر رہے ہیں، پوچھنے کے ساتھ مطابق لکھنے کے لاسوندے حاصل کرتے ہیں + ہر جواب اختیار کے ساتھ۔ اور ہم مختلف اندازے اور پیش آموزش استراتژی کے ساتھ آزمائش کرتے ہیں۔ ارزیابی نتیجے 42.23% کی دقیق دکھاتے ہیں، جو 24.89% کی بنیادی لین پر بہت زیادہ ہے۔', 'uz': "Yaqinda, SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, kabi katta maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi kompyuterni o'qish modellarini o'qish mumkin. Bu juda katta taʼminlovchi tashkilotlar uchun BERT va ELMo kabi taʼminlovchi tashkilotlarni chiqarishga sababi. Ularning tajribalari va ko'proq qiziqarli maʼlumotlar tarkibini yaratishda, ko'pchilik ishlari ingliz tilida bajarildi. Bu yerda biz bir necha tillar BERT ta'sirini o'qish uchun katta ingliz tilidagi ma'lumotlar tarkibida o'rganamiz. Bulgaria bir necha tanlangan o'qish kompyuterga qo'llamiz. Biz bir yangi maʼlumotlar tarkibi 2,221 darajadagi matriculating imtiyolaridan ikkinchi darajadagi savollar bilan boshqa muammolar - tarixi, biologi, geographi va filosofi va tarixidagi bir nechta savollar bilan boshqa so'zlar bilan boshlanamiz. @ info Ko'rib, biz boshqa xizmat va oldingi taʼminlovchi strategiya bilan tajriba qilamiz. Qiymati natijalari 42.23%'ning ko'payligini koʻrsatiladi. Bu 24.89%'ning asosida yaxshi darajada.", 'vi': 'Gần đây, các mô hình hiểu biết được tiến hành gần với con người trên các tập tin lớn như SQurAD, CoQA, bang Macro, race, v.v. Cái này được tạo ra bởi các biểu tượng ngoại hình được rèn luyện trước kia như BERT và ElMo, có thể chỉnh sửa cho nhiệm vụ được nhắm cho mục tiêu. Mặc cho những tiến bộ này và tạo ra những tập tin đầy thử thách, phần lớn công việc vẫn được thực hiện cho người Anh. Ở đây, chúng tôi nghiên cứu hiệu quả của giải mã nhiều loại BERT chỉnh sửa trên các tập tin tiếng Anh rộng lớn để đọc thấu hiểu (v.d. cho Hội Đua ngựa) và áp dụng nó vào hiểu biết nhiều lựa chọn của Bulgaria. Chúng tôi đề nghị một tập tin mới chứa hai,221 câu hỏi từ các bài kiểm tra nội khoa cho học thứ hai trong nhiều môn: lịch sử, sinh học, địa lý và triết học, và 42 câu hỏi thêm từ các bài kiểm tra online trong lịch sử. Trong khi các nhà viết bài kiểm tra không đưa ra ngữ cảnh liên quan, chúng tôi thu thập kiến thức từ Wikipedia, tìm kiếm các tài liệu tương ứng với các câu hỏi chung +mỗi tùy chọn trả lời. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi thử nghiệm với các chiến lược phục hưng. Kết quả đánh giá cho thấy độ chính xác của 2.23 quá cao, Nó vượt quá mức bắt đầu của 24.897.', 'bg': 'Напоследък моделите за разбиране на четенето постигат почти човешко представяне на широкомащабни набори от данни като Това до голяма степен се дължи на пускането на предварително обучени контекстуализирани представи като BERT и ELMo, които могат да бъдат фино настроени за целевата задача. Въпреки тези напредъци и създаването на по-предизвикателни набори от данни, по-голямата част от работата все още е направена за английски език. Тук изучаваме ефективността на многоезичния БЕРТ, фино настроен на широкомащабни английски набори от данни за четене (напр. за РАСЕ), и го прилагаме към българското многостранно четене. Предлагаме нов набор от данни, съдържащ 221 въпроса от матурите за дванадесети клас по различни дисциплини – история, биология, география и философия, както и 412 допълнителни въпроса от онлайн викторини по история. Докато авторите на викторината не дадоха съответния контекст, ние включваме знания от Уикипедия, извличайки документи, съответстващи на комбинацията от въпрос + всеки вариант на отговор. Освен това експериментираме с различни стратегии за индексиране и предобучение. Резултатите от оценката показват точност от 42,23%, което е много над изходната база от 24,89%.', 'hr': 'Nedavno su modeli razumijevanja postigli blizu ljudskog učinka na velikoj mjeri podataka poput SQuAD, CoQA, MS makro, RACE itd. To je u velikoj mjeri zbog oslobađanja predobučenih kontekstualiziranih predstavljanja poput BERT i ELMo, koje se mogu dobro odrediti za ciljni zadatak. Unatoč tim napredama i stvaranju više izazovnih podataka, većina posla još uvijek radi za engleski. Ovdje proučavamo učinkovitost višejezičkih BERT-a u velikoj engleskoj bazi podataka za čitanje razumijevanja (npr. za RACE) i primjenjujemo ga na razumijevanje Bugarskih višeizbora. Predlažemo novu setu podataka koja sadrži 2.221 pitanja iz ispitivanja matrikulacije za dvanaest razreda u raznim subjektima - povijest, biologija, geografija i filozofija -, i 412 dodatnih pitanja iz online kviz u povijesti. Iako autori quiz nisu dali relevantni kontekst, uključujemo znanje iz Wikipedia, prikupljamo dokumente koji odgovaraju kombinaciji pitanja + svaka opcija odgovora. Osim toga, eksperimentiramo različite strategije indeksiranja i predobuke. Rezultati procjene pokazuju točnost 42,23%, što je iznad početne linije 24,89%.', 'da': 'For nylig opnåede læseforståelsesmodeller nær-menneskelige præstationer på store datasæt som SQUAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE osv. Dette skyldes hovedsageligt frigivelsen af præ-trænede kontekstualiserede repræsentationer som BERT og ELMo, som kan finjusteres til målopgaven. På trods af disse fremskridt og oprettelsen af mere udfordrende datasæt, er det meste af arbejdet stadig gjort for engelsk. Her undersøger vi effektiviteten af flersproget BERT finjusteret på store engelske datasæt til læseforståelse (f.eks. for RACE), og vi anvender det til bulgarsk flersproget læseforståelse. Vi foreslår et nyt datasæt, der indeholder 2.221 spørgsmål fra studentereksamen til 12. klasse i forskellige fag -historie, biologi, geografi og filosofi- og 412 yderligere spørgsmål fra online quizzer i historie. Mens quizforfatterne ikke gav nogen relevant kontekst, indarbejder vi viden fra Wikipedia, der henter dokumenter, der matcher kombinationen af spørgsmål + hver svarmulighed. Desuden eksperimenterer vi med forskellige indekserings- og prætræningsstrategier. Evalueringsresultaterne viser en nøjagtighed på 42,23%, hvilket er langt over baseline på 24,89%.', 'nl': 'Onlangs bereikten leesbegripsmodellen bijna menselijke prestaties op grootschalige datasets zoals SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, enz. Dit is grotendeels te wijten aan de introductie van vooraf getrainde contextualiseerde representaties zoals BERT en ELMo, die kunnen worden aangepast aan de doeltaak. Ondanks die vooruitgang en het creëren van uitdagendere datasets, wordt het grootste deel van het werk nog steeds gedaan voor het Engels. Hier bestuderen we de effectiviteit van meertalige BERT, verfijnd op grootschalige Engelse datasets voor leesbegrip (bijvoorbeeld voor RACE), en passen we het toe op Bulgaars meerkeuzeleesbegrip. We stellen een nieuwe dataset voor met 2,221 vragen uit het examen voor twaalfde klas in verschillende vakken -geschiedenis, biologie, geografie en filosofie-, en 412 aanvullende vragen uit online quizzen in de geschiedenis. Hoewel de auteurs van de quiz geen relevante context gaven, integreren we kennis uit Wikipedia, waarbij we documenten ophalen die overeenkomen met de combinatie van vraag en antwoordoptie. Daarnaast experimenteren we met verschillende indexerings- en pre-trainingsstrategieën. De evaluatieresultaten tonen nauwkeurigheid van 42,23%, die ruim boven de baseline van 24,89% ligt.', 'de': 'In letzter Zeit erzielten Leseverständnismodelle eine nahezu menschliche Leistung auf großen Datensätzen wie SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE usw. Dies ist vor allem auf die Veröffentlichung von vortrainierten kontextualisierten Darstellungen wie BERT und ELMo zurückzuführen, die für die Zielaufgabe fein abgestimmt werden können. Trotz dieser Fortschritte und der Erstellung anspruchsvollerer Datensätze wird der Großteil der Arbeit immer noch für Englisch erledigt. Hier untersuchen wir die Wirksamkeit von mehrsprachigem BERT, das auf großen englischen Datensätzen für das Leseverstehen (z.B. für RACE) fein abgestimmt wurde, und wenden es auf bulgarisches Multiple-Choice-Leseverstehen an. Wir schlagen einen neuen Datensatz vor, der 2.221 Fragen aus den Immatrikulationsprüfungen für die zwölfte Klasse in verschiedenen Fächern (Geschichte, Biologie, Geographie und Philosophie) und 412 zusätzliche Fragen aus Online-Quizzen in Geschichte enthält. Während die Quiz-Autoren keinen relevanten Kontext gaben, integrieren wir Wissen aus Wikipedia, indem wir Dokumente abrufen, die der Kombination von Frage und Antwort entsprechen. Darüber hinaus experimentieren wir mit verschiedenen Indexierungs- und Vortrainingsstrategien. Die Auswertungsergebnisse zeigen eine Genauigkeit von 42,23%, die deutlich über der Baseline von 24,89% liegt.', 'fa': 'اخیرا، مدل\u200cهای درک\u200cشناسی که در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مقیاس بزرگ مانند SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE و غیر از آن رسیده\u200cاند. این بسیار زیرا به خاطر آزاد نمایش\u200cهای پیش\u200cآموزش\u200cشده\u200cی متن\u200cآموزش\u200cشده\u200cای مثل BERT و ELMo است که می\u200cتوانند برای کار هدف پاک\u200cسازی شوند. با وجود این پیشرفت و ایجاد مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سخت\u200cتر، بیشتر کار هنوز برای انگلیسی انجام می\u200cشود. ما در اینجا فعالیت BERT چندین زبان را مطالعه می\u200cکنیم که در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای انگلیسی بزرگ برای خواندن درک (مثال برای RACE) استفاده می\u200cکنیم، و آن را برای خواندن درک چندین انتخاب بلگاری استفاده می\u200cکنیم. ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات جدید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که ۲.221 سوال از امتحان ماتریکولی برای درجه دوازدهم در موضوع مختلف است -تاریخ، زیست شناسی، جغرافی و فلسفه-، و 412 سوال اضافه از کویز های آنلاین در تاریخ است. در حالی که نویسندگان سؤال به هیچ موضوع مربوط به آن نداشتند، ما دانش را از ویکیپدییا جمع می\u200cکنیم، با استخدام سند\u200cهایی که با ترکیب سوال و هر گزینه پاسخ می\u200cدهند. در ضمن، ما با استراتژی\u200cهای پیش آموزش و تحقیق مختلف آزمایش می\u200cکنیم. نتایج ارزیابی دقیقات 42.23 درصد را نشان می دهد که بالاتر از خط پایین ۲۴.89 درصد است.', 'sw': 'Hivi karibuni, mbinu za kusoma zilizofanikiwa kwa karibu na utendaji wa binadamu katika seti kubwa za data kama vile SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, etc. Hii ni kwa sababu ya kuachiliwa huru kwa uwakilishi wa zamani waliojifunza kama vile BERT na ELMo, ambayo inaweza kutumika vizuri kwa kazi ya lengo. Pamoja na maendeleo hayo na kutengeneza seti za taarifa za changamoto zaidi, kazi nyingi bado imefanya kwa ajili ya Kiingereza. Hapa, tunasoma ufanisi wa BERT kwa lugha mbalimbali katika seti za data za Kiingereza kwa ajili ya kusoma ufafanuzi (kwa mfano kwa RACE), na tunatumia ufanisi wa kusoma maamuzi kadhaa nchini Bulgaria. Tupendekeza seti mpya ya taarifa yenye maswali 2,221 kutoka kwenye mtihani wa elimu kwa darasa la 12 katika mada mbalimbali -historia, biology, geography na filosofia-, na maswali mengine 412 kutoka kwenye matatizo ya mtandaoni katika historia. Wakati waandishi wa maswali hayo hawakutoa muktadha usio na maana, tunajumuisha maarifa kutoka Wikipedia, kupata nyaraka zinazolinganisha muungano wa swali + kila njia ya jibu. Zaidi ya hayo, tunajaribu na mikakati mbalimbali ya ubunifu na mafunzo ya kabla. The evaluation results show accuracy of 42.23%, which is well above the baseline of 24.89%.', 'ko': '최근 읽기와 이해 모델은 대규모 데이터 집합(예를 들어 SQuad, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE 등)에서 인간에 가까운 모습을 보였다. 이는 BERT와 ELMo 등 예비 훈련의 상황화 표현을 발표했기 때문에 목표 임무에 대해 미세하게 조정할 수 있다.비록 이러한 발전을 이루었고 더욱 도전적인 데이터 집합을 만들었지만, 대부분의 업무는 여전히 영어를 겨냥한 것이다.여기서 우리는 대규모 영어 데이터 집합에서 미세한 다국어 읽기 이해(예를 들어 인종)의 유효성을 연구하고 이를 불가리아의 여러 가지 선택 읽기 이해에 응용했다.우리는 12학년의 각종 과목(역사, 생물, 지리와 철학) 입학시험 2221개와 역사 온라인 시험에서 나온 412개의 추가 문제를 포함하는 새로운 데이터 집합을 제시했다.테스트 작성자는 관련 상하문을 제시하지 않았지만 위키백과에 대한 지식을 결합시켜 문제 + 모든 답안 옵션과 일치하는 문서를 검색했다.그 밖에 우리는 서로 다른 색인과 예비 훈련 전략을 시도했다.평가 결과 정확도는 42.23%로 기준선 24.89%보다 훨씬 높았다.', 'tr': "Soňky wagtlar, SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE ýaly adamlaryň golaý derejesinde ýetip bolan düşünme nusgalarynyň üýtgetmesi üçin ullanylýar. Bu nusga üçin be ýleki terjime edilen däldir BERT we ELMo ýaly beýleki düzümlerniň üýtgetmeginiň sebäbi. Şu gelişmeler we çözgüt veri setirlerini döretmäne rağmen, işiň köp bölegi heniz Iňlisçe üçin edip barýar. Bu ýerde, biz çoklu diller BERT'yň etkinliýetini uly ölçekli Iňlis veri setirlerinde (meselâ, RACE üçin) okamak üçin ullanýarys we ony Bulgarça gaty seçmeli okamak üçin etkinlik isleýäris. Biz materikülasyon sınamalarından ikinji sınıf için 2,221 soru içeren yeni veri setini teklif ediyoruz -history, biologia, geografia ve filosofiya-, ve tarihteki online quizzlerden 412 ekli sorular. Küçük awtoriler wajyp berilmeýän bir kontekst ýok bolsa bolsa biz Wikipediýanyň bilimi birleştirip, soragyň birleşmesi we her cevap seçgisi üçin senedi gaýd etýäris. Daşary başga bir indeks we öňünden öňünden eğitim stratejikleri bilen synanyşdyrýarys. Taýýarlanan netijeler 42,23%-iň dogrylygyny görkezýär. Bu 24,89%-iň esasy üstünde degişli.", 'sq': 'Recently, reading comprehension models achieved near-human performance on large-scale datasets such as SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, etc. This is largely due to the release of pre-trained contextualized representations such as BERT and ELMo, which can be fine-tuned for the target task. Despite those advances and the creation of more challenging datasets, most of the work is still done for English.  Këtu, ne studiojmë efektshmërinë e BERT-it shumëgjuhës të përshtatur në grupe të dhënash angleze në shkallë të madhe për kuptimin e leximit (për shembull për RACE) dhe e aplikojmë atë në kuptimin bullgar të leximit me zgjedhje të shumëfishta. Ne propozojmë një grup të ri të dhënash që përmban 2,221 pyetje nga provimet e matrikulimit për klasën e dymbëdhjetë në subjekte të ndryshme - histori, biologji, gjeografi dhe filozofi, - dhe 412 pyetje shtesë nga quizzes online në histori. Ndërsa autorët e çështjeve nuk dhanë kontekst të rëndësishëm, ne përfshijmë njohuri nga Wikipedia, duke marrë dokumente që përputhen me kombinimin e pyetjes + çdo opsion përgjigje. Përveç kësaj, ne eksperimentojmë me strategji të ndryshme indeksimi dhe paratrajnimi. The evaluation results show accuracy of 42.23%, which is well above the baseline of 24.89%.', 'am': 'በቅርብ ጊዜ እንደSQuAD፣ CoQA፣ MS Macro፣ RACE፣ የሰው አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ እና ELMo፣ ለጉዳዩ ስራ የተደረገውን ብጤት የተጠቃሚ ተሟጋቾችን ለመውጣት ይችላል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የዚህ አካባቢዎች እና የበዛ አቃላፊ ዳታዎችን መፍጠር ቢሆንም፣ አብዛኛዎቹ ሥራው ለእንግሊዝኛ ነው፡፡ Here, we study the effectiveness of multilingual BERT fine-tuned on large-scale English datasets for reading comprehension (e.g., for RACE), and we apply it to Bulgarian multiple-choice reading comprehension.  አዲስ ዳታተር፣ 2,221 ጥያቄዎችን ከሁለተኛው ደረጃ ትምህርት ትምህርት፣ ባይሎጂ፣ geography እና ፊልፎፊ እና 412 ጥያቄዎችን ከታሪክ ጥያቄ የተጨማሪውን ጥያቄዎች እና አዲስ ጥያቄን እናስገድዳለን፡፡ የጥያቄው ጸሐፊዎች ተግባራዊ ግንኙነት ባይኖሩ ጊዜ ከWikipedia እውቀትን እናስገባለን፡፡ Moreover, we experiment with different indexing and pre-training strategies.  የውጤቱ ውጤት 42.23 በመቶ ያህል ነው፤ ከ24.89 በመቶ በላይ ጥሩ ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Son zamanlarda, SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE və ya da bənzər böyük ölçü verilən qurbanlarda insanların ən yaxın performansından başa düşən anlama modelleri oxuyar. Bu çox böyük təhsil edilmiş təhsil edilmiş göstəricilərin, bənzər BERT və ELMo kimi, məqsədilə müəyyən edilə bilər. Bu avanslar və daha çətin veri setlərinin yaradılmasına rağmen, işlərin əksəriyyəti İngilizce üçün işdir. Burada, çoxlu dil BERT-in çoxlu ölçülü İngilizə veri qurularında müfəssəl tərzlərini öyrəndik və bunu Bulgarlıya çoxlu seçim oxuması anlayışına uydururuq. Biz müxtəlif məsələlərdə on ikinci dəfə matrikulaşdırma sınaqlarından 2,221 soruşan yeni verilən qurğu təklif edirik -tarix, bioloji, geografi və filosofi-, və tarixdakı online quizzlərdən 412 əlavə sual veririk. Səniz yazıcılar heç bir məlumat vermədikləri halda, biz Wikipediyadan bilgiləri birləşdirdik, sual kombinatsiyasına uyuşan və hər cevap seçgisinə uyuşan belələri alırıq. Daha sonra, biz müxtəlif indiks və əvvəl təhsil stratejilərlə imtahana çəkirik. Qıymet sonuçları 42,23%-in doğruluğunu göstərir, bu 24,89%-in altındadır.', 'af': "Onlangs, lees verstandige modele wat naby-menslike prestasie bereik het op groot-skaal datastelle soos SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, ensfh. Hierdie is groot gevolg van die verlos van voorafgeleerde contextualiseerde voorstellings soos BERT en ELMo, wat kan wees fyn-toestel vir die doel opdrag. Terwyl daardie vorderings en die skepping van meer belangrike datastelle, is die meeste van die werk nog gedoen vir Engels. Hier, ons studeer die effektiviteit van multilinglike BERT fyn-tuned op groot-skaal Engelske datastelle vir lees verstanding (bv. vir RACE), en ons doen dit toepassing na Bulgariese veelvuldige keuses lees verstanding. Ons voorstel 'n nuwe datastel wat 2,221 vrae bevat van matrikulaasie oorsoeke vir tweelfde grade in verskillende onderwerpe -geskiedenis, biologie, geografie en filosofie-, en 412 addisionele vrae van online quizzes in geskiedenis. Terwyl die quiz-outeurs geen relevante konteks gegee het nie, het ons kennis van Wikipedia inkorporeer en dokumente ontvang met die kombinasie van vraag + elke antwoord opsie. Ook, ons eksperimenteer met verskillende indeksering en vooraf-oefening strategies. Die evalueringsresultate vertoon waardigheid van 42,23%, wat goed bo die basisline van 24,89%.", 'bn': 'Recently, reading comprehension models achieved near-human performance on large-scale datasets such as SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, etc. This is largely due to the release of pre-trained contextualized representations such as BERT and ELMo, which can be fine-tuned for the target task.  Despite those advances and the creation of more challenging datasets, most of the work is still done for English.  এখানে আমরা বুলগেরিয়ার বহুভাষায় বেরেটের কার্যক্রম বিশাল স্ক্যালের ইংরেজি ডাটাসেটের কার্যক্রম পড়ার জন্য (যেমন রেসির জন্য), এবং আমরা এটি বুলগেরিয়ার বহুভাষ আমরা একটি নতুন ডাটাসেট প্রস্তাব করি যার মধ্যে ২,২২১ প্রশ্ন রয়েছে বিভিন্ন বিষয়বস্তুর ইতিহাস, বায়োলজিয়া, ভূমিগ্রাফি এবং ফিলোসাফি এবং ইতিহাসে অনলাইন কিউজে প্রশ্ন + প্রত্যেক উত্তর অপশনের সঙ্গে মিলিত তথ্য আমরা উইকিপিডিয়া থেকে জ্ঞান অন্তর্ভুক্ত করি, প্রশ্ন এবং প্রতিটি উত্তরের সাথে মিলিত নথ এছাড়াও, আমরা বিভিন্ন সংক্রান্ত এবং প্রশিক্ষণের কৌশল দিয়ে পরীক্ষা করছি। এই মূল্যের ফলাফল ৪২. ২৩ শতাংশের সঠিকভাবে দেখা যায়, যা ২৪.', 'ca': "Recently, reading comprehension models achieved near-human performance on large-scale datasets such as SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, etc. This is largely due to the release of pre-trained contextualized representations such as BERT and ELMo, which can be fine-tuned for the target task.  Malgrat aquests avanços i la creació de conjunts de dades més desafiants, la majoria de la feina encara es fa en anglès. Aquí estudiem l'eficacia del BERT multillenguatge perfeccionat en conjunts de dades anglesos a gran escala per a la comprensió de lectura (per exemple, per a RACE), i la aplicam a la comprensió búlgara de lectura de múltiples opcions. Proposem un nou conjunt de dades que contenia 2.221 preguntes d'exàmens de matriculació de 12º grau en diversos temas - història, biologia, geografia i filosofia -, i 412 preguntes adicionals d'exàmens en línia de la història. Mentre que els autors de les preguntes no donaven cap context rellevant, incorporam coneixements de Wikipedia, recuperant documents que coincideixen amb la combinació de pregunta + cada opció de resposta. A més, experimentem amb diferents estratègies d'indexació i de pré-entrenament. Els resultats de l'evaluació mostren la precisió del 42,23%, que és molt més enllà de la base del 24,89%.", 'cs': 'V poslední době modely porozumění čtení dosahovaly téměř lidského výkonu na rozsáhlých datových sadách, jako jsou SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE atd. Je to z velké části způsobeno uvolněním předškolených kontextualizovaných reprezentací, jako jsou BERT a ELMo, které lze jemně ladit pro cílový úkol. Navzdory těmto pokrokům a tvorbě náročnějších datových sad je většina práce stále prováděna pro angličtinu. Zde studujeme efektivitu vícejazyčného BERT vyladěného na rozsáhlých anglických datových sadách pro porozumění čtení (např. pro RACE) a aplikujeme ji na porozumění čtení bulharského multiple-choice. Navrhujeme nový datový soubor obsahující 2,221 otázky z maturitních zkoušek dvanácté třídy v různých předmětech – historie, biologie, zeměpis a filozofie – a 412 další otázky z online kvízů z historie. Zatímco autoři kvízu nedali žádný relevantní kontext, zahrnujeme znalosti z Wikipedie, načítáme dokumenty odpovídající kombinaci otázek a možností odpovědi. Kromě toho experimentujeme s různými indexovacími a předškolicími strategiemi. Výsledky hodnocení ukazují přesnost 42,23%, která je výrazně nad výchozí hodnotou 24,89%.', 'hy': 'Վերջերս կարդալը հասկանալու մոտ մարդկային արտադրողականության մոտ մոտ մոտ մոտ ստացվեց այնպիսի մեծ տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, ինչպիսիք են SQUADը, COQA, SM Մաքրոն, RACE ը և այլն: Սա հիմնականում պատճառ է նախապատրաստված կոնտեքստիալ ներկայացումների, ինչպիսիք են BER-ը և ELMo-ը,  Չնայած այդ առաջընթացներին և ավելի դժվար տվյալների համակարգերին, աշխատանքի մեծ մասը դեռևս կատարվում է անգլերենի համար: Այստեղ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք բազմալեզվով BER-ի արդյունավետությունը, որը լայնածավոր անգլերեն տվյալների համակարգերում է ընթերցման հասկացության համար (օրինակ RAC-ի համար), և կիրառում ենք այն բազմալեզվով ընթերցման հասկացության համար: Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր տվյալների համակարգ, որը ներառում է 2.221 հարց տասներկու դասարանի մայրադասական քննություններից տարբեր թեմաների՝ պատմության, կենսաբանության, երկրաբանության և փիլիսոփայության, և 412 ավելին հարց պատմության առցանց հարցերից: Մինչդեռ փորձարկումների հեղինակները համապատասխանատու կոնտեքստ չունեին, մենք ներառում ենք Վիքիփեդիայից ստացված գիտելիքներ, որոնք համապատասխանում են հարցի + յուրաքանչյուր պատասխանի տարբերակին: Ավելին, մենք փորձում ենք տարբեր ինդեքսի և նախապատրաստման ռազմավարություններով: Ագնահատման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս 42.23 տոկոսի ճշգրտությունը, որը շատ ավելի բարձր է, քան 24.89 տոկոսը:', 'fi': 'Viime aikoina lukuymmärrysmallit saavuttivat lähes ihmisen suorituskyvyn suurissa tietoaineistoissa, kuten SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE jne. Tämä johtuu suurelta osin ennalta koulutettujen kontekstualisoitujen esitysten kuten BERT ja ELMo julkaisemisesta, joita voidaan hienosäätää kohdetehtävään. Näistä edistysaskelista ja haastavampien aineistojen luomisesta huolimatta suurin osa työstä on vielä tehty englanniksi. Tässä tutkimuksessa tutkimme monikielisen BERT:n tehokkuutta, joka on hienoviritetty laajoihin englanninkielisiin tietoaineistoihin lukemisen ymmärtämiseksi (esim. RACE) ja sovellamme sitä bulgarialaiseen monivalintaiseen lukemiseen. Ehdotamme uutta aineistoa, joka sisältää 2 221 kysymystä 12. luokan ylioppilaskokeista eri oppiaineista – historia, biologia, maantiede ja filosofia – sekä 412 lisäkysymystä historian verkkotietokilpailuista. Vaikka tietovisan tekijät eivät antaneet relevanttia kontekstia, me sisällytämme tietoa Wikipediasta ja haemme dokumentteja, jotka vastaavat kysymys + jokainen vastaus vaihtoehto yhdistelmää. Lisäksi kokeilemme erilaisia indeksointi- ja esikoulutusstrategioita. Arviointitulosten tarkkuus on 42,23%, mikä on selvästi yli lähtötilanteen (24,89%).', 'id': 'Baru-baru ini, model pemahaman membaca mencapai prestasi dekat dengan manusia pada set data skala besar seperti SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, dll. Ini sebagian besar karena pembebasan represensi kontekstualisasi terlatih sebelumnya seperti BERT dan ELMo, yang dapat ditetapkan untuk tugas sasaran. Despite those advances and the creation of more challenging datasets, most of the work is still done for English.  Di sini, kami mempelajari efektivitas BERT berbagai bahasa yang disesuaikan dengan baik pada set data Inggris skala besar untuk pemahaman pembacaan (misalnya untuk RACE), dan kami menerapkannya untuk pemahaman pembacaan berbagai pilihan Bulgari. Kami mengusulkan dataset baru yang mengandung 2.221 pertanyaan dari ujian matrikulasi untuk kelas 12 dalam berbagai subjek - sejarah, biologi, geografi dan filosofi -, dan 412 pertanyaan tambahan dari ujian online dalam sejarah. While the quiz authors gave no relevant context, we incorporate knowledge from Wikipedia, retrieving documents matching the combination of question + each answer option.  Selain itu, kami eksperimen dengan strategi indeksi dan prapelatihan yang berbeda. Hasil evaluasi menunjukkan akurasi 42,23%, yang jauh di atas dasar 24,89%.', 'et': 'Hiljuti saavutasid lugemise mõistmise mudelid peaaegu inimliku jõudluse suuremahuliste andmekogumitega nagu SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE jne. See on suures osas tingitud eelnevalt koolitatud kontekstualiseeritud esituste, nagu BERT ja ELMo, väljastamisest, mida saab sihtülesande jaoks täpselt häälestada. Vaatamata nendele edusammudele ja keerulisemate andmekogumite loomisele on suurem osa tööst veel tehtud inglise keeles. Siin uurime mitmekeelse BERT-i tõhusust, mida on täpsustatud suuremahulistel inglise keele andmekogumitel lugemise mõistmiseks (nt RACE jaoks), ja rakendame seda Bulgaaria mitme valikuga lugemise mõistmiseks. Pakume välja uue andmekogumi, mis sisaldab 221 küsimust kaheteistkümnenda klassi üliõpilasteksamitest erinevates ainetes – ajalugu, bioloogia, geograafia ja filosoofia –, ning 412 lisaküsimust ajaloo online viktoriinidest. Kuigi viktoriini autorid ei andnud asjakohast konteksti, lisasime teadmisi Vikipeediast, leides dokumendid, mis sobivad kombinatsiooniga küsimus + iga vastuse valik. Lisaks katsetame erinevaid indekseerimis- ja koolitusstrateegiaid. Hindamistulemused näitavad täpsust 42,23%, mis on oluliselt suurem kui algväärtus 24,89%.', 'bs': 'Nedavno, modeli razumijevanja koji su postigli blizu ljudskog učinka na velikoj skali podataka poput SQuAD, CoQA, MS makro, RACE itd. To je u velikoj mjeri zbog oslobađanja predobučenih kontekstualiziranih predstavljanja poput BERT i ELMo, koje mogu biti dobro određene za ciljni zadatak. Uprkos tim napredama i stvaranju više izazovnih podataka, većina posla još uvijek radi za engleski. Ovdje proučavamo učinkovitost višejezičkih BERT-a koji su napravljeni na velikoj engleskoj bazi podataka za čitanje razumijevanja (npr. za RACE) i primjenjujemo ga na Bugarsku razumijevanje višeizbornog čitanja. Predlažemo novu setu podataka koja sadrži 2.221 pitanja iz ispitivanja matrikulacije za dvanaest razreda u raznim subjektima - povijest, biologija, geografija i filozofija -, i 412 dodatnih pitanja iz online kviz u povijesti. Iako autori kviz nisu dali relevantan kontekst, uključujemo znanje iz Wikipedije, prikupljamo dokumente koji odgovaraju kombinaciji pitanja + svaka opcija odgovora. Osim toga, eksperimentiramo različite strategije indeksiranja i predobuke. Rezultati procjene pokazuju tačnost 42,23%, što je iznad početne linije 24,89%.', 'he': 'לאחרונה, דוגמני הבנה קריאה השיגו ביצועים קרובים לאנושיים על קבוצות נתונים בקנה מידה גדולה כמו SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, וכו"כ. זה בגלל השחרור של מייצגים קונטוקטואליזציונים מאומנים מראש כמו BERT ואלמו, שיכולים להתאים למטרה. למרות ההתקדמות האלה והיצור של קבוצות נתונים מאתגרים יותר, רוב העבודה עדיין נעשה לאנגלית. כאן, אנו לומדים את היעילות של BERT רב-שפתי מתאים על קבוצות נתונים אנגליות במידה גדולה לקריאה הבנה (למשל, עבור RACE), ואנחנו משתמשים בה בהבנה בקריאה רבה בולגרית. אנו מציעים קבוצת נתונים חדשה שמכילה 2,221 שאלות מבחנות המטריקציה לכיתה ה-12 בנושאים שונים - היסטוריה, ביולוגיה, גיאוגרפיה ופילוסופיה - ו-412 שאלות נוספות מבחנות באינטרנט בהיסטוריה. בעוד סופרי החוויזים לא נתנו קשר רלוונטי, אנחנו מכילים ידע מוויקיפדיה, משיגים מסמכים מתאימים לשילוב של שאלה + כל אפשרות תשובה. חוץ מזה, אנו מנסים עם אסטרטגיות אינדיקסים ואימון מראש שונות. תוצאות הערכה מראות מדויקה של 42.23%, שהיא הרבה מעל הבסיס של 24.89%.', 'sk': 'V zadnjem času so modeli bralnega razumevanja dosegli skoraj človeško delovanje na obsežnih naborih podatkov, kot so SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE itd. To je v veliki meri posledica izdaje vnaprej usposobljenih kontekstualiziranih predstavitev, kot sta BERT in ELMo, ki jih je mogoče natančno nastaviti za ciljno nalogo. Kljub temu napredku in ustvarjanju zahtevnejših naborov podatkov je večina dela še vedno opravljenega za angleščino. Tukaj preučujemo učinkovitost večjezičnega BERT-a, natančno nastavljenega na obsežnih angleških podatkovnih naborih za razumevanje branja (npr. za RACE), in ga uporabljamo za bolgarsko razumevanje branja z več izbirami. Predlagamo nov nabor podatkov, ki vsebuje 221 vprašanj iz matrikulacijskih izpitov za 12. razred na različnih predmetih – zgodovina, biologija, geografija in filozofija –, in 412 dodatnih vprašanj iz spletnih kvizov v zgodovini. Medtem ko avtorji kviza niso dali ustreznega konteksta, vključujemo znanje iz Wikipedije, pridobimo dokumente, ki se ujemajo s kombinacijo vprašanja + vsakega odgovora. Poleg tega eksperimentiramo z različnimi strategijami indeksiranja in predusposabljanja. Rezultati ocene kažejo točnost 42,23%, kar je precej nad izhodiščno vrednostjo 24,89%.', 'ha': "A yanzu, misãlai ɗin karantawa da suka sami tsarin mutane a tsakanin tsohon data masu girma kamar SQuAD, CoQA, M. Macro, RaCE, etc. Wannan yana ƙaranci domin sakar da aka saka masu tsari da aka yi wa zaman yin taƙaita kamar BERT da ELMo, wanda za'a iya amfani da shi ga aikin goan. Babu dai da waɗannan masu gabatar da kuma an halitta wasu matsayin mutane masu ƙaranci, sai mafi yawan aikin za'a aikata zuwa Ingiriya. Hali, munã karatun aikin BERT masu cikin mulki-lingui da aka buƙata masu fasalin Ingiriya masu girma wa karãtun littafi (misali, dõmin ACE), kuma munã amfani da shi zuwa matsayin karãtun karatun masu yawa na Bulgaria. Kana goyyar da wani tsarin da ke ƙunsa da maswali 2,22 1 daga matricolin kwanan daraja na 12 cikin masu cikin bayani-historin, bayogi, geography da filosofi-, da 412 masu ƙaranci daga bayanin quizzes. Waka da marubuci na tambayi ba da wani muhimmada ba, sai mu haɗa ilmi daga Wikimedia, idan za'a sami takardar da ke daidaita komai da tambayar+ kowane zaɓen ajiya. Kayya, tuna jarrabi da takiyaki masu dabar-na'ura. Matarin evaluation na nuna tsari na 42.23%, wanda ya fi kyau kan asalin 24.89%.", 'jv': 'Sayensi Saiki ono wektu nggo rerambungan karo hal-hal sing gak dilakon dataset sing gak dilakon, akeh liyane saiki ono wektu nggawe Inggris. Mungkin, awak dhéwé pisan efek karo akeh luwih-luwih basa sing nyebutaké BERT kuwi nggawe barang langgar-kalang basa dadi nggagal kanggo basa perusahaan (isumber, kanggo rata) lan awak dhéwé iso ngubah dhéwé butuhan langgar. Awak dhéwé nggawe dataset sing isiné kanggo 2,441 kesempatan kanggo tukang tanggal dhéwé cara-teka sing karo nggawe barang nggawe -history, biyografi, jeografi lan piliposya-, lan lan liwat-suarané sing isiné online kedhèké nggawe tarjamahan kanggo awak dhéwé. Mungkin autor sing nganggo perusahaan kontribusi sing wis ana, awake dhéwé nggawe kesempatan winih lan wiirke dokumen sing nggawe nggo nambah gerakan karo perusahaan langgar + . Label Rejalaké kapan kanggo ngerasakno akèh sabané, sing wis asèh sabané 24.9%.', 'bo': 'Recently, reading comprehension models achieved near-human performance on large-scale datasets such as SQuAD, CoQA, MS Macro, RACE, etc. This is largely due to the release of pre-trained contextualized representations such as BERT and ELMo, which can be fine-tuned for the target task. ང་ཚོའི་མཐོ་རིམ་དེ་དག་ལ་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེ་བའི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས་ན་ང་ཚོའི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དེ་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱིས་དབ འདིར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་ཆ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྤྱོད་སྟངས་ཆེ་རུ་གཏོང་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་གྲངས་བསྒྲགས་ཅན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཚུ།དཔེར་ན། RACE་དང་། We propose a new dataset containing 2,221 questions from matriculation exams for twelfth grade in various subjects -history, biology, geography and philosophy-, and 412 additional questions from online quizzes in history. The examples are updated on a new database. རྩོམ་པ་པོ་ཚོས་དུས་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་མ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་འབདཝ་དེ་ང་ཚོས་Wikipedia་ནས་མཐུན་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འདྲི་བ་ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་བྱེད་སྟངས་འདྲ་མི་འདྲ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། རྩིས་འབྲས་བ་མངོན་གསལ་བཤེར་གྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་བཞིན་ཡོད། ཚད་ཀྱི་གཞི་གཞི་རྟེན་དེ་ 24.89%.'}
{'en': 'Emoji Powered Capsule Network to Detect Type and Target of Offensive Posts in Social Media', 'ar': 'شبكة كبسولة مدعومة من Emoji لاكتشاف نوع المنشورات الهجومية وهدفها في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي', 'fr': 'Un réseau de capsules alimenté par Emoji pour détecter le type et la cible de publications offensantes sur les réseaux sociaux', 'es': 'Red de cápsulas impulsada por emoji para detectar el tipo y el objetivo de publicaciones ofensivas en las redes sociales', 'pt': 'Rede de cápsulas com tecnologia Emoji para detectar o tipo e o alvo de postagens ofensivas nas mídias sociais', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアの不快な投稿の種類とターゲットを検出する絵文字カプセルネットワーク', 'hi': 'इमोजी पावर्ड कैप्सूल नेटवर्क सामाजिक मीडिया में आक्रामक पोस्ट के प्रकार और लक्ष्य का पता लगाने के लिए', 'zh': '表情符号驱之胶囊网络,以检社交媒体犯性之类', 'ru': 'Emoji Powered Capsule Network для обнаружения типа и цели оскорбительных постов в социальных сетях', 'ga': 'Líonra Capsúil Cumhachtaithe Emoji chun Cineál agus Sprioc Post Ionsaitheach a Bhrath sna Meáin Shóisialta', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Emoji Powered Capsule Network, hogy felismerje a támadó bejegyzések típusát és célpontját a közösségi médiában', 'el': 'Δίκτυο καψών για να ανιχνεύσει τον τύπο και τον στόχο των επιθετικών δημοσιεύσεων στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης', 'kk': 'Емози күшті капсул желіComment', 'it': "Emoji Powered Capsule Network per rilevare il tipo e l'obiettivo dei post offensivi nei social media", 'lt': 'Emoji galingų kapsulių tinklas, skirtas nustatyti pažeidžiamų socialinių žiniasklaidos postų tipą ir tikslą', 'mk': 'Мрежа на капсули со енергија на Емоја за откривање на типот и целта на навредни места во социјалните медиуми', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Netwerk tal-Kapsuli Emoji Powered to Detect Type and Target of Offensive Posts in Social Media', 'mn': 'Emoji Powered Capsule Network to Detect Type and Target of Offensive Posts in Social Media', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Emoji Powered Capsule Network do wykrywania rodzaju i celu ofensywnych postów w mediach społecznościowych', 'sr': 'Emoji Moćna Kapsulna mreža za otkrivanje tipa i cilja neposlušnih postaja u socijalnim medijima', 'ro': 'Rețeaua de capsule alimentată cu emoji pentru a detecta tipul și ținta posturilor ofensive în rețelele de socializare', 'si': 'EmosiComment', 'so': 'Emoji Powered Capsule Network to Detect Type and Target of Offensive Posts in Social Media', 'sv': 'Emoji Powered Capsule Network för att upptäcka typ och mål för offensiva inlägg i sociala medier', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ایموجی پاور کاپسول نیٹ ورک سوسیل میڈیا میں نافذی پوسٹوں کا ٹیپ اور موقع پتچانے کے لئے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Emoji Powered Capsue Network để tim ra kiểu và mục tiêu của hàng lởm trên phương tiện xã hội', 'bg': 'Мрежа с емоджи захранвана капсула за откриване на вида и целта на обидни публикации в социалните медии', 'hr': 'Emoji moćna mreža kapsule za otkrivanje tipa i cilja neposlušnih postaja u socijalnim medijima', 'nl': 'Emoji Powered Capsule Netwerk om Type en Doel van Offensieve Posts in Social Media te detecteren', 'da': 'Emoji drevet kapselnetværk til at opdage type og mål for offensive indlæg i sociale medier', 'de': 'Emoji Powered Capsule Network zur Erkennung von Art und Ziel offensiver Beiträge in sozialen Medien', 'id': 'Jaringan Kapsel Emoji yang berkuasa untuk mendeteksi Jenis dan Sasaran Tugas Serangan di Media Sosial', 'ko': '이모티콘으로 구동되는 캡슐 네트워크는 소셜 미디어에서 공격적인 게시물의 유형과 목표를 측정할 수 있다', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': "Sosial Media'da Ta첵pi we Maksady A챌mak 체챌in G체챌li Kapsul A첵ry", 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Emoji umeshindwa kutambua aina na lengo la Posti Huru kwenye vyombo vya habari vya kijamii', 'sq': 'Emoji Powered Capsule Network to Detect Type and Target of Offensive Posts in Social Media', 'am': 'የኢሜጂ ኃይል የኮምፕላን መረብ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ዓይነት እና ማግኘት አቃራቢያ', 'hy': 'Emoji Powered Capsule Network to Detect Type and Target of Offensive Posts in Social Media', 'af': 'Comment', 'az': "Sosyal Medya'daki Növü və Gözəl Göndərilən Postaları keşfetmək üçün Emoji Güclü Kapsul Ağı", 'bs': 'Emoji moćna mreža kapsule za otkrivanje tipa i cilja neposlušnih postaja u socijalnim medijima', 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে ইমোজি ক্যাপ্সুল নেটওয়ার্ক সনাক্ত করার জন্য টাইপ এবং লক্ষ্য', 'cs': 'Emoji Powered Capsule Network pro detekci typu a cíle útočných příspěvků v sociálních médiích', 'ca': "Emoji Powered Capsule Network per detectar el tipus i l'objectiu dels llocs de posts ofensius als mitjans socials", 'fi': 'Emoji Powered Capsule Network tunnistaa loukkaavien viestien tyypin ja kohteen sosiaalisessa mediassa', 'et': 'Emoji toitel kapslivõrgustik ründavate postituste tüübi ja sihtmärgi tuvastamiseks sotsiaalmeedias', 'jv': 'emuji Tahun Kapsule Network kanggo Ketoke Tipe lan TarGet of offensive', 'ha': 'Media controller element', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'Emoji Powered Capsule Network za odkrivanje vrste in cilj napadalnih objav v socialnih omrežjih', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་ནུས་པའི་རིགས་དང་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་གནས་ཡུལ་རྟོགས་བཤེར་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'This paper describes a novel research approach to detect type and target of offensive posts in social media using a capsule network. The input to the network was character embeddings combined with emoji embeddings. The approach was evaluated on all three subtasks in Task 6-SemEval 2019 : OffensEval : Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media. The evaluation also showed that even though the capsule networks have not been used commonly in natural language processing tasks, they can outperform existing state of the art solutions for offensive language detection in social media.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نهجًا بحثيًا جديدًا لاكتشاف نوع المنشورات المسيئة وهدفها في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي باستخدام شبكة كبسولة. كان الإدخال إلى الشبكة عبارة عن حفلات زفاف شخصية مقترنة بحفلات الزفاف بالرموز التعبيرية. تم تقييم النهج في جميع المهام الفرعية الثلاثة في المهمة 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: تحديد وتصنيف اللغة الهجومية في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. أظهر التقييم أيضًا أنه على الرغم من عدم استخدام شبكات الكبسولة بشكل شائع في مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية ، إلا أنها يمكن أن تتفوق على أحدث الحلول الحالية للكشف عن اللغة الهجومية في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit une nouvelle approche de recherche pour détecter le type et la cible de publications offensantes dans les médias sociaux à l'aide d'un réseau capsule. L'entrée dans le réseau était des incorporations de caractères combinées à des incorporations d'emoji. L'approche a été évaluée pour les trois sous-tâches de la Tâche 6 - SemEval 2019\xa0: OffenseVal\xa0: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media. L'évaluation a également montré que même si les réseaux capsules n'ont pas été couramment utilisés dans les tâches de traitement du langage naturel, ils peuvent surpasser les solutions de pointe existantes pour la détection de langage offensant dans les médias sociaux.", 'es': 'Este artículo describe un enfoque de investigación novedoso para detectar el tipo y el objetivo de publicaciones ofensivas en las redes sociales mediante una red cápsula. La entrada a la red fueron incrustaciones de caracteres combinadas con incrustaciones de emoji. El enfoque se evaluó en las tres subtareas de la Tarea 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Identificación y categorización del lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales. La evaluación también mostró que, aunque las redes cápsula no se han utilizado comúnmente en tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural, pueden superar las soluciones de vanguardia existentes para la detección de lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve uma nova abordagem de pesquisa para detectar o tipo e o alvo de postagens ofensivas nas mídias sociais usando uma rede de cápsulas. A entrada para a rede foi a incorporação de caracteres combinada com a incorporação de emojis. A abordagem foi avaliada em todas as três subtarefas na Tarefa 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Identificando e categorizando linguagem ofensiva nas mídias sociais. A avaliação também mostrou que, embora as redes de cápsulas não tenham sido usadas comumente em tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural, elas podem superar as soluções de última geração existentes para detecção de linguagem ofensiva em mídias sociais.', 'ja': '本稿では、カプセルネットワークを使用してソーシャルメディアにおける不快な投稿の種類とターゲットを検出するための新規研究アプローチについて説明します。ネットワークへの入力は、文字埋め込みと絵文字埋め込みを組み合わせたものでした。このアプローチは、タスク6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Mediaの3つのサブタスクすべてで評価されました。評価はまた、カプセルネットワークが自然言語処理タスクで一般的に使用されていないにもかかわらず、ソーシャルメディアでの不快な言語検出のための既存の最先端のソリューションを上回ることができることを示した。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर एक कैप्सूल नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके सोशल मीडिया में आक्रामक पोस्ट के प्रकार और लक्ष्य का पता लगाने के लिए एक उपन्यास शोध दृष्टिकोण का वर्णन करता है। नेटवर्क के लिए इनपुट इमोजी एम्बेडिंग के साथ संयुक्त चरित्र embeddings था. दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन कार्य 6 में सभी तीन उप-कार्यों पर किया गया था - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: सोशल मीडिया में आक्रामक भाषा की पहचान और वर्गीकरण। मूल्यांकन से यह भी पता चला है कि भले ही कैप्सूल नेटवर्क का उपयोग आमतौर पर प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों में नहीं किया गया है, वे सोशल मीडिया में आक्रामक भाषा का पता लगाने के लिए कला समाधानों की मौजूदा स्थिति से बेहतर प्रदर्शन कर सकते हैं।', 'zh': '本文述用胶囊网络检社交媒体犯性帖之类,与新法。 网络输字符嵌表情符号合。 其法6 - SemEval 2019:OffensEval:识类社交媒体犯性言者三子。 评估犹明,虽胶囊网络未自然语言处事中常用,然其可以优社交媒体中用于攻击性言检者先进解决方案。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается новый подход к исследованию для обнаружения типа и цели оскорбительных постов в социальных сетях с использованием капсульной сети. Входом в сеть были вложения символов в сочетании с вложениями эмодзи. Подход был оценен по всем трем подзадачам в Задаче 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Выявление и категоризация оскорбительного языка в социальных сетях. Оценка также показала, что даже несмотря на то, что капсульные сети обычно не используются в задачах обработки естественного языка, они могут превосходить существующие современные решения для обнаружения оскорбительного языка в социальных сетях.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar chur chuige nua taighde chun cineál agus sprioc post ionsaitheacha a bhrath ar na meáin shóisialta ag baint úsáide as líonra capsúil. Ba é an t-ionchur chuig an líonra ná leabú carachtar in éineacht le leabaithe emoji. Rinneadh an cur chuige a mheas ar na trí fhothasc i dTasc 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Teanga Ionsaitheach a Aithint agus a Chatagóiriú sna Meáin Shóisialta. Léiríodh sa mheastóireacht freisin, cé nach n-úsáidtear na líonraí capsúl go coitianta i dtascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha, is féidir leo sárobair a dhéanamh ar réitigh úrscothacha atá ann cheana maidir le braite teanga maslach ar na meáin shóisialta.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy új kutatási megközelítést mutat be a közösségi médiában lévő sértő bejegyzések típusának és célpontjának felismerésére egy kapszula hálózat segítségével. A hálózat bemenete karakterbeágyazások és emoji beágyazások voltak kombinálva. A megközelítést a 6. feladat - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: OffenzEval: Offenzív nyelv azonosítása és kategorizálása a közösségi médiában. Az értékelés azt is mutatta, hogy bár a kapszula hálózatokat nem használják gyakran természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladatokban, túlléphetnek a meglévő legkorszerűbb megoldásokkal a sértő nyelv felismerésére a közösségi médiában.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει μια νέα ερευνητική προσέγγιση για τον εντοπισμό τύπου και στόχου επιθετικών δημοσιεύσεων στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης χρησιμοποιώντας ένα δίκτυο κάψουλας. Η εισαγωγή στο δίκτυο ήταν ενσωμάτωση χαρακτήρων σε συνδυασμό με ενσωμάτωση emoji. Η προσέγγιση αξιολογήθηκε και στις τρεις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες στην εργασία 6.Εγκληματολογία 2019: Αναγνώριση και κατηγοριοποίηση προσβλητικής γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Η αξιολόγηση έδειξε επίσης ότι παρόλο που τα δίκτυα κάψουλας δεν έχουν χρησιμοποιηθεί συνήθως σε εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας, μπορούν να ξεπεράσουν τις υπάρχουσες λύσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας για την ανίχνευση προσβλητικών γλωσσών στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აღწერს პრომენტური შესწავლობა, რომელიც სოციალური მედიაში არაფერი სოციალური წერტილების ტიპი და მიზეზი გამოყენებული კაპსულის ქსელის ქსელის შეტყობინება იყო სიმბოლოების შეტყობინებები, რომლებიც emoji შეტყობინებებით დაკავშირებულია. პროგრამა გაუმუშავებულია ყველა სამი საკუთარი საკუთარი საქაღალდე 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: სოციალური მედიაში საკუთარი ენის განსაცნობა და კატეგორიზაცია. განსაზღვრებაში ასევე გაჩვენება, რომ თუმცა კაპსულის ქსელები არ გამოყენებულია სახელსახური ენის პროცესი დავალებში, ისინი შეუძლიათ გავაკეთოთ სულის განსაზღვრების განსაზღვრებისთვის სოციალურ', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive un nuovo approccio di ricerca per rilevare tipo e target di post offensivi nei social media utilizzando una rete capsule. L'input alla rete era costituito da incorporazioni di caratteri combinate con incorporazioni emoji. L'approccio è stato valutato su tutte e tre le sottoattività del Task 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Identificare e Categorizzare il linguaggio offensivo nei social media. La valutazione ha anche mostrato che anche se le reti capsule non sono state utilizzate comunemente nelle attività di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale, possono superare le soluzioni esistenti allo stato dell'arte per il rilevamento offensivo del linguaggio nei social media.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз капсуль желіні қолдану үшін әлеуметтік медиақтардың түрін мен мақсаттарын анықтау үшін романдық зерттеу тәсілін анықтайды. Желінің келтірімі emoji ендіруден біріктірілген таңбалар. Тапсырма 6 - 2019 жылдың жарым бағдарламасында барлық үш ішкі сұрақтарды бағалады: OffensEval: Бағдарламалық медиақтар тілді анықтау және санаттарды бағалау. Бұл оқиға қатар, капсуль желілері табиғи тілдерді өңдеу тапсырмаларында көбінде қолданылмаған болса да, олар әлеуметтік медиақтарда қарсы тілдерді анықтау үшін суреттің шешімдерінің күйін жасау', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomas naujas mokslinių tyrimų metodas, skirtas nustatyti pažeidžiamų pareigūnų social in ėje žiniasklaidoje tipą ir tikslą naudojant kapsulių tinklą. Įtraukimas į tinklą buvo simbolių įdėjimas kartu su emoji įdėjimais. Metodas buvo įvertintas atsižvelgiant į visus tris 6 užduoties – 2019 m. pusmetis: OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media klausimus. Vertinimas taip pat parodė, kad nors kapsulių tinklai nebuvo dažnai naudojami gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo užduotims, jie gali viršyti esamus pažangiausius sprendimus, skirtus pažeidžiamoms kalboms nustatyti social in ėje žiniasklaidoje.', 'mk': 'Овој весник опишува нов истражувачки пристап за детектирање на типот и целта на навредни места во социјалните медиуми користејќи капсулска мрежа. Внесувањето во мрежата беше вградување на знаци комбинирано со вградувања на емоџи. Пристапот беше проценет на сите три потпрашања во задачата 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media. Оваа оценка, исто така, покажа дека иако капсулските мрежи не се користат често во природните задачи за обработување јазици, тие можат да ги надминат постојните најсовремени решенија за навредна детекција на јазици во социјалните медиуми.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan pendekatan kajian baru untuk mengesan jenis dan sasaran pos serangan dalam media sosial menggunakan rangkaian kapsul. Input ke rangkaian adalah penyembelihan aksara bergabung dengan penyembelihan emoji. Pendekatan telah diuji pada semua tiga subtaskin dalam Tugas 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media. Evaluasi juga menunjukkan bahawa walaupun rangkaian kapsul tidak digunakan secara biasa dalam tugas pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi, mereka boleh melebihi penyelesaian terbaik yang wujud untuk pengesan bahasa yang menyerang dalam media sosial.', 'mt': 'This paper describes a novel research approach to detect type and target of offensive posts in social media using a capsule network.  L-input għan-netwerk kien l-inkorporazzjoni tal-karattri flimkien ma’ inkorporazzjonijiet tal-emoji. L-approċċ ġie evalwat fuq it-tliet sottomistoqsijiet kollha fil-Kompitu 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Identifikazzjoni u Kategorizzazzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva fil-Midja Soċjali. L-evalwazzjoni wriet ukoll li minkejja li n-netwerks tal-kapsuli ma ntużawx b’mod komuni f’kompiti ta’ pproċessar naturali tal-lingwi, jistgħu jwettqu soluzzjonijiet l-aktar avvanzati eżistenti għall-individwazzjoni offensiva tal-lingwi fil-midja soċjali.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു ക്യാപ്സുള്\u200d നെറ്റ് നോവല്\u200d പരിശോധന നടപടി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള രീതിയിലും സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയിലെ അപക Name ടാസ്ക് 6 - സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019: ഓഫെന്\u200dസ്\u200cവാല്\u200d: സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയയിലെ ഓഫെന്\u200dസ്റ്റീവ് ഭാഷ തിരിച്ചറിയുകയും വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന ഈ വിലാസവും കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d ക്യാപ്സുള്\u200d നേര്\u200dവറുകള്\u200d സാധാരണമായി ഉപയോഗിച്ചിട്ടുമില്', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгч сүлжээ ашигласнаар шинэ судалгааны арга хэлбэрийг олохын тулд шинэ судалгааны арга замыг тайлбарладаг. Шулуун дээр орлуулсан нь эмоджи интербингүүдтэй холбогдсон харилцаа интербингүүд байсан. Үүний арга барилга нь ажлын 6 - SemEval 2019 оны 3 давхар сургууль дээр дүгнэсэн: OffensEval: Нийгмийн мэдээлэл дээрх хүчирхэг хэлний тодорхойлолт, хэлбэрийг тодорхойлдог. Шалгалт нь мөн харуулсан юм. Хэдийгээр капсулын сүлжээг байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн үйлдвэрлэлд ашиглаагүй ч, нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэлбэрээр зориулсан хэлний шийдвэрлэлд оршиж чадна.', 'no': 'Denne papiret skildrar eit nytt forskningstilnærming for å finna type og mål av offensiv postar i sosiale medier med ein kapsulnettverk. Inndata til nettverket var teiknkombinasjonar kombinasjon med emoji- innbygging. Tilnærminga ble evaluert på alle tre understillingar i oppgåve 6 – halvEval 2019: OffensEval: Identifikasjon og kategorisering av offensive språk i sosiale medier. Evalueringa viste også at selv om kapsulnettverket ikkje er brukt vanlegvis i naturspråk-handsamingsoppgåver, kan dei utføra eksisterande tilstand til kunstløysingane for offensiv språk-oppdaging i sosiale medier.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano nowatorskie podejście badawcze do wykrywania typu i celu obraźliwych postów w mediach społecznościowych za pomocą sieci kapsułowej. Wejściem do sieci były osadzenia znaków połączone z osadzeniami emoji. Podejście zostało ocenione we wszystkich trzech podzadaniach w Zadaniu 6.SemEval 2019: OffenEval: Identyfikowanie i Kategorizowanie języka ofensywnego w mediach społecznościowych. Ocena wykazała również, że chociaż sieci kapsułek nie są powszechnie wykorzystywane w zadaniach przetwarzania języka naturalnego, mogą one przewyższać istniejące najnowocześniejsze rozwiązania do wykrywania obraźliwego języka w mediach społecznościowych.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie o nouă abordare de cercetare pentru a detecta tipul și ținta postărilor ofensive în social media folosind o rețea capsulă. Intrarea în rețea a fost încorporarea caracterelor combinate cu încorporarea emoji. Abordarea a fost evaluată pe toate cele trei subactivități din Task 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Identificarea și Categorizarea limbajului ofensiv în Social Media. Evaluarea a arătat, de asemenea, că, deși rețelele capsule nu au fost utilizate frecvent în sarcinile de procesare a limbajului natural, ele pot depăși soluțiile existente de ultimă generație pentru detectarea limbajului ofensator în rețelele de socializare.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje novi istraživački pristup otkrivanju tipa i cilja ofanzivnih postaja u društvenim medijima koristeći mrežu kapsule. Ulaz u mrežu je bio ugraðenje karaktera kombinovano sa emoji ugraðenjem. Pristup je procijenjen na svim tri podataka u zadatku 6 - semiEvalu 2019: OffensEval: Identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima. Procjena je takođe pokazala da, iako mreže kapsula uobičajeno nisu upotrebljene u zadatku prirodnog obradivanja jezika, oni mogu izvršiti postojeće stanje umjetničkih rješenja za detekciju ofanzivnog jezika u društvenim medijima.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ කැප්සුල් ජාලය භාවිතා කරනවා සමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමයේ ප්\u200dරකාරයක් හා ඉලක්කයක් හොයාගන්න අව ජාලයේ ඇතුලත් අක්ෂර ඇම්බෙන්ඩ් එක්ක emoji ඇම්බෙන්ඩ් එක්ක සම්බන්ධයි. සාමාජික භාෂාවේ සාමාජික භාෂාවේ සියළුම තුනක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ කැප්සුල් ජාලය සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණා වැඩකට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා නැති නමුත් ඔවුන්ට පුළුවන් සාමාජි', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran qoraal baaritaanka warqadda ah si aad u ogaato nooca iyo goobaha boostada waxyeellada ah ee ku qoran shabakadda shabakadda bulshada. Dalka shabakadda waxaa lagu soo bandhigay xaraf embeddings ee emoji embeddings. Shaqada 6-SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Identification and categorizing luqada Offensive afka bulshada. Qiimeynta waxyaabaha lagu qiimeeyo waxay sidoo kale ka muuqatay in xataa in kastoo aan lagu isticmaalin shabakadaha iskuullada oo aan lagu isticmaalin hawlaha baaritaanka afka dabiicadda ah, waxay ku sameyn karaan xafiisyada farshaxanka ee ay ku jiraan macluumaadka bulshada.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் ஒரு புதிய ஆராய்ச்சி முறைமையை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் வகையையும் மற்றும் சமூக ஊடகங்களின் இலக்கையையும் காப் The input to the network was character embeddings combined with emoji embeddings.  The approach was evaluated on all three subtasks on Task 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Social Media Identification and categorizing Offensive Language. சாதாரண மொழி செயல்பாடுகளில் பொதுவாக பயன்படுத்தப்படவில்லையென்றாலும் இந்த விளக்கம் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்று கூறினாலும், அவர்கள் சமூக ஊட', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver en ny forskningsmetod för att upptäcka typ och mål av stötande inlägg i sociala medier med hjälp av ett kapselnätverk. Inmatningen till nätverket var teckenbäddningar kombinerade med emojiinbäddningar. Metoden utvärderades på alla tre deluppgifter i Uppgift 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Identifiera och kategorisera Offensivt språk i sociala medier. Utvärderingen visade också att även om kapselnätverken inte har använts ofta i naturliga språkbehandlingsuppgifter kan de överträffa befintliga toppmoderna lösningar för kränkande språkdetektering i sociala medier.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ کاغذ ایک کاپسول نیٹ ورک کے مطابق کاپسول کے مطابق سرکشی پوسٹوں کا طریقہ اور موقع تلاش کرنے کے لئے ایک نئی تحقیق کا طریقہ بیان کرتا ہے. نیٹ ورک کے اندر اینپیٹ کیٹر ایمبڈینگ تھا جو emoji ایمبڈینگ کے ساتھ ملے ہوئے تھے. اس طریقہ کو ٹاکس ۶ - سیم Eval 2019 میں تمام تین سوٹسٹسٹسٹ کے ذریعے مطالعہ کیا گیا تھا: OffensEval: شناسایی اور کاٹسٹریزی زبان سوسیل میڈیا میں. ارزیابی نے بھی دکھائی کہ اگرچہ کاپسول نیٹورک کو طبیعی زبان پردازی کے کاموں میں معمولی طور پر استعمال نہیں کیا گیا ہے، وہ سوسیل میڈیا میں فساد کی زبان شناسی کے لئے هنر کے حل کے موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود مو', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz kapsler tarmoqni ishlatish uchun novel qidirish usulini anglatadi. The input to the network was character embeddings combined with emoji embeddings.  6- SemEval 2019 vazifaning hamma uchta sub-vazifalarda qiymati edi: OffensEval: Social Media'da OffensEval: Identification and categorizing Offensive Language. Ko'rib chiqishni ko'rsatish mumkin, agar kapsler tarmoqlarida oddiy tilni boshqarish vazifalarda ishlatilmagan bo'lsa, ular jamiyat media'da ta'sirli tillarni aniqlash uchun mavjud soʻzni ishlab chiqarishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Bài báo này mô tả một phương pháp nghiên cứu mới nhằm phát hiện loại và mục tiêu của những bài diễn văn tấn công trong các phương tiện xã hội sử dụng mạng tàu. Nhập vào mạng là sự nhúng vào nhân cách kết hợp với sự nhúng vào các giá trị. Cách tiếp cận đã được đánh giá qua ba phần nhỏ trong Nhiệm vụ 6 -SemEvl 209: OffensEval: Nhận diện và phân loại Ngôn ngữ Hành động ở phương tiện xã hội. Bản đánh giá cũng cho thấy mặc dù mạng tàu không được dùng thường xuyên trong các nhiệm vụ xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, nhưng họ có thể hoàn thành các giải pháp nghệ thuật hiện đại để phát hiện ngôn ngữ tấn công trên các phương tiện xã hội.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва нов изследователски подход за откриване на вида и целта на офанзивни публикации в социалните медии чрез капсулна мрежа. Входът в мрежата е вграждане на символи, комбинирано с вграждане на емоджи. Подходът беше оценен и по трите подзадачи в Задача 6 - Идентифициране и категоризиране на офанзивен език в социалните медии. Оценката показа също, че макар мрежите на капсулите да не се използват често в задачите по обработка на естествения език, те могат да надминат съществуващите съвременни решения за откриване на офанзивен език в социалните медии.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft een nieuwe onderzoeksaanpak om type en doelwit van aanvallende berichten in sociale media te detecteren met behulp van een capsulenetwerk. De invoer voor het netwerk was teken embeddings gecombineerd met emoji embeddings. De aanpak werd geëvalueerd op alle drie de subtaken in Taak 6.SemEval 2019: Offensieve Taal identificeren en categoriseren in Social Media. De evaluatie toonde ook aan dat hoewel de capsulenetwerken niet vaak worden gebruikt in natuurlijke taalverwerkingstaken, ze bestaande state-of-the-art oplossingen voor aanstootgevende taaldetectie in sociale media kunnen overtreffen.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje novi istraživački pristup otkrivanju tipa i cilja ofanzivnih mjesta u društvenim medijima koristeći mrežu kapsule. Ulaz u mrežu bio je ugrađenje karaktera kombinovano s emoji ugrađenjem. Pristup je procijenjen na svim tri podataka u zadatku 6 - poluvjetnoj ocjeni 2019: OffensEval: Identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u društvenim medijima. Procjenjivanje je također pokazalo da, iako mreže kapsula uobičajeno nisu upotrebljene u zadatku prirodnog obradivanja jezika, mogu izvršiti postojeće stanje umjetničkih rješenja za otkrivanje ofanzivnih jezika u društvenim medijima.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver en ny forskningstilgang til at opdage type og mål for offensive indlæg i sociale medier ved hjælp af et kapselnetværk. Inputet til netværket var tegn indlejringer kombineret med emoji indlejringer. Tilgangen blev evalueret på alle tre underopgaver i Opgave 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Identificering og Kategorisering af Offensivt Sprog i Sociale Medier. Evalueringen viste også, at selvom kapselnetværket ikke er blevet brugt almindeligt i natursprogbehandlingsopgaver, kan de overgå eksisterende topmoderne løsninger til stødende sprogdetektering i sociale medier.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt einen neuartigen Forschungsansatz, um Art und Ziel offensiver Beiträge in sozialen Medien mithilfe eines Kapselnetzwerks zu erkennen. Die Eingabe in das Netzwerk waren Zeicheneinbettungen kombiniert mit Emoji-Einbettungen. Der Ansatz wurde an allen drei Teilaufgaben in Task 6.SemEval 2019: OffensivEval: Identifizieren und Kategorisieren offensiver Sprache in Social Media evaluiert. Die Auswertung zeigte auch, dass die Kapselnetzwerke zwar nicht häufig in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache eingesetzt wurden, aber bestehende State-of-the-Art-Lösungen zur Erkennung offensiver Sprache in sozialen Medien übertreffen können.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ روش تحقیقات نویسی را برای شناسایی نوع و هدف رسانه های تجاوز در رسانه های اجتماعی با استفاده از شبکه کاپسول توصیف می کند. ورودی به شبکه پیوند\u200cهای شخصیت با پیوند\u200cهای emoji بود. این دستور در تمام سه زیر سؤال در کار ۶ - نیم Eval 2019 ارزیابی شد: OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Language Offensive in Social Media. این ارزیابی همچنین نشان داد که اگرچه شبکه کاپسول عمومی در کار\u200cهای پرداخت زبان طبیعی استفاده نشده باشند، آنها می\u200cتوانند موقعیت موجود در راه حل\u200cهای هنری برای شناسایی زبان\u200cهای تجاوز در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی برتری کنند.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan pendekatan penelitian baru untuk mendeteksi tipe dan sasaran pos ofensif di media sosial menggunakan jaringan kapsul. Input ke jaringan adalah bentuk karakter bergabung dengan bentuk emoji. The approach was evaluated on all three subtasks in Task 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media.  Evaluasi juga menunjukkan bahwa meskipun jaringan kapsul tidak digunakan secara umum dalam tugas proses bahasa alam, mereka dapat melebihi solusi terbaik yang ada untuk deteksi bahasa yang menyerang di media sosial.', 'ko': '본고는 캡슐 네트워크를 이용하여 소셜 미디어에서 공격적인 게시물의 유형과 목표를 측정하는 새로운 연구 방법을 묘사한다.네트워크의 입력은 문자 삽입과 이모티콘 삽입이다.이 방법은 미션 6-2019년SemEval:OffensEval: 소셜 미디어의 공격적인 언어를 식별하고 분류하는 세 가지 하위 미션에서 평가되었다.평가에 따르면 캡슐 네트워크는 아직 자연 언어 처리 임무에 광범위하게 사용되지 않았지만 소셜 미디어에서 공격적인 언어 검측에 있어 기존의 최첨단 해결 방안보다 우수한 것으로 나타났다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mbinu za utafiti wa riwaya za kutambua a in a na lengo la makala za matusi katika mitandao ya kijamii kwa kutumia mtandao wa kompyuta. Kituo hicho kinachoingia kwenye mtandao ulikuwa ni wahusika ulioanganishwa na viungo vya emoji. Mfumo huo ulitatuliwa katika kazi zote tatu katika kazi 6 - SemEval 2019: Utambulisho wa OffensEval: Kutambua na Kugawanya Lugha Huli katika Mitandao ya Kijamii. Tathmini hizo pia zilionyesha kwamba ingawa mitandao ya kapseli hayajatumiwa mara kwa mara katika kazi za uchunguzi wa lugha asili, wanaweza kutengeneza hali ya sasa ya ufumbuzi wa sanaa kwa ajili ya kutambua lugha ya ghasia katika mitandao ya kijamii.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe 'n novele verondersoek toegang om tipe en doel van offensivele pos in sosiale media te beskrywe deur 'n kapsulnetwerk te gebruik. Die invoer na die netwerk was karakter inbêring gekombineer met emoji inbêring. Die toegang is uitgewerk op alle drie subtaske in Opdrag 6 - Semeval 2019: OffensEval: Identifikasie en Kategoriseering van offensive taal in sosiale media. Die evaluasie het ook wys dat selfs die kapsulnetwerke nie gewoonlik gebruik is in natuurlike taal verwerking opdragte nie, kan hulle bestaande staat van die kuns oplossing uitvoer vir offensivele taal-opdekking in sosiale media.", 'tr': "Bu kagyz sosial mediýalarda kapsul şebekesini ulanan hili we maksadyny tapmak üçin roman araştyrma ýaly tassyklady. Aýry gaýd etmek üçin karakter ködlemeleri emoji ködlemeleri bilen birleştirilýär Bu golf çykyş 6-nji Taýdan çykyş üç sany çykyş edildi - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Social Media'da janlaşdyrmak we bellenenleşmek. Taýýarlanma şol ýagdaýda täbiýa dil işleýän çözgütlerde ulanmaýandygyny görkezildi. Olar sosyal medýýatlarda hasaplanjak üçin sungat çözgütlerini çözebilirler.", 'sq': 'Kjo letër përshkruan një metodë të re kërkimi për të zbuluar tipin dhe objektivin e postimeve ofensive në media sociale duke përdorur një rrjet kapsule. Hyrja në rrjet ishte përfshirje karakteresh të kombinuara me përfshirje emoji. Përqasja u vlerësua në të tre nëndetyrat në detyrën 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Identifikimi dhe kategorizimi i gjuhës ofensive në mediat sociale. Vlerësimi tregoi gjithashtu se edhe pse rrjetet e kapsulave nuk janë përdorur zakonisht në detyrat natyrore të përpunimit të gjuhës, ato mund të kalojnë zgjidhjet ekzistuese më të larta për zbulimin ofensiv të gjuhës në media sociale.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም ቁጥጥር የመረጃ ምርጫዎች ዓይነት እና ማኅበራዊ አውታር በመጠቀም የማኅበራዊ አውታር ላይ የሚቃወሙትን ድምፅ ለመግለጽ የሚናገር ነው፡፡ ይዞታዎች ስራ 6 - ስምEval 2019: OffensEval: ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ የሥልጣን ቋንቋ ማሳየት እና በተቃውሞ መፍታት ላይ የሚደረገው የሦስት ደብዳቤዎች ላይ ተረጋገጠ። ማስታወቂያውም ደግሞ ማኅበራዊ አውታር ውስጥ የቋንቋ ማድረጊያውን ምንም እንኳ የተጠቃሚ ቋንቋ ማድረግ ባይጠቀም እንኳን፣ የአሁኑን የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ማግኘት የሚችሉትን የአንዱን ሁኔታ ማቀናቀል ይችላሉ፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է նոր հետազոտության մոտեցում, որպեսզի հայտնաբերենք սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում գտնվող գրավիչ տեղադրությունների տեսակը և նպատակը՝ օգտագործելով խորանոց ցանց: ցանցի ներմուծը բնավորական ներմուծքներ էին, որոնք միավորվում էին էմոջի ներմուծքների հետ: Այս մոտեցումը գնահատվել է բոլոր երեք ենթախնդիրների վրա, որոնք ներկայացվել են Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում գտնվող 6-ի «ՍեմԷվալ 2019»-ի «ՕֆենսԷվալ»-ի «ՕֆենսԷվալ»-ի «ԱֆենսԷվալ Արժեքը նաև ցույց տվեց, որ չնայած, որ կապուլյակների ցանցերը սովորաբար չեն օգտագործվել բնական լեզվի վերամշակման գործառույթներում, դրանք կարող են գերազանցել սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում գոյություն ունեցող լավագույն լուծու', 'az': 'Bu kağıt, sosyal mediyalarda bir kapsul a ğcını istifadə etmək üçün yeni araştırma metodlarını təsdiqləyir. Şebeyə giriş emoji inbingləri ilə birlikdə karakter inbingləri idi. Yaxınlıq 6 - Yarım Eval 2019. Gözəldən üç dəfə çəkildi: OffensEval: Sosyal Medya dillərinin təsdiqlənməsi və kategoriyasını təsdiqlənməsi. Bu değerlendirmə də göstərdi ki, kapsul ağları təbiətli dil işləmə işlərində istifadə edilməmiş olsa da, onlar sosyal media içində həddi dil keçmək üçün quru çətinliklərinin mevcut durumunu yerinə yetirə bilərlər.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje novi istraživački pristup otkrivanju tipa i cilja ofanzivnih postupaka u društvenim medijima koristeći mrežu kapsula. Ulaz u mrežu je bio ugrađenje karaktera kombinovano sa emoji ugrađenjem. Pristup je procijenjen na svim tri podataka u zadatku 6 - semiEvali 2019: OffensEval: Identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima. Procjena je također pokazala da, iako mreže kapsula uobičajeno nisu upotrebljene u zadatku prirodnog obradivanja jezika, mogu izvršiti postojeće stanje umjetničkih rješenja za otkrivanje ofanzivnih jezika u društvenim medijima.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje nový výzkumný přístup k detekci typu a cíle urážlivých příspěvků na sociálních médiích pomocí kapsle sítě. Vstupem do sítě byly vložení znaků v kombinaci s vložením emoji. Přístup byl hodnocen na všech třech dílčích úkolech v Úkolu 6.SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Identifikování a kategorizování útočného jazyka v sociálních médiích. Hodnocení také ukázalo, že i když kapsle sítě nejsou běžně používány v úkolech zpracování přirozeného jazyka, mohou překonat stávající nejmodernější řešení pro detekci urážlivého jazyka v sociálních médiích.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা একটি ক্যাপসুল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে আক্রমণ পোস্টের ধরন এবং লক্ষ্যবস্তুর লক্ষ্যে একটি ন নেটওয়ার্কের ইনপুট ছিল ইমোজি এমপ্রেডিং সহযোগিতার অক্ষর। সামাজিক মিডিয়াতে অফিনসেনভাল: সামাজিক মিডিয়ায় অফিসেন্স ভাষাকে পরিচিত এবং শ্রেণীকৃত ভাষাকে পরিচিত করা হয়েছে। এই মূল্য প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে যে যদিও প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার কাজে ক্যাপসুল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করা হয়নি, তবে তারা সামাজিক মিডিয়ায় আক্রমণ ভাষা সন', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu un nou enfocament de recerca per detectar el tipus i l'objectiu de les publicacions ofensives als mitjans socials fent servir una xarxa de càpsules. La entrada a la xarxa era incorporació de caràcters combinada amb incorporacions emoji. L'enfocament va ser avaluat en totes les tres subterrànies de la tasca 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Identificar i categoritzar el llenguatge ofensiv als mitjans socials. The evaluation also showed that even though the capsule networks have not been used commonly in natural language processing tasks, they can outperform existing state of the art solutions for offensive language detection in social media.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse uudset uurimismeetodit solvavate postituste tüübi ja sihtmärgi tuvastamiseks sotsiaalmeedias kapslivõrgustiku abil. Sisend võrgusse oli märkide manustamine kombineeritud emojide manustamisega. Lähenemisviisi hinnati kõigi kolme alamülesande kohta ülesandes 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: ründava keele tuvastamine ja kategoriseerimine sotsiaalmeedias. Hindamine näitas ka, et kuigi kapslivõrgustikke ei ole tavaliselt kasutatud looduskeele töötlemise ülesannetes, suudavad nad ületada olemasolevaid tipptasemel lahendusi solvava keele tuvastamiseks sotsiaalmeedias.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli kuvaa uudenlaista tutkimuslähestymistapaa loukkaavien viestien tyypin ja kohteen tunnistamiseen sosiaalisessa mediassa kapseliverkoston avulla. Verkkoon syötettiin merkkiupotuksia yhdistettynä emojiupotuksiin. Lähestymistapaa arvioitiin kaikilla kolmella alatehtävällä Task 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Tunnistaa ja luokitella loukkaava kieli sosiaalisessa mediassa. Arviointi osoitti myös, että vaikka kapseliverkostoja ei ole yleisesti käytetty luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtävissä, ne voivat päihittää nykyiset ratkaisut loukkaavan kielen havaitsemiseen sosiaalisessa mediassa.', 'jv': 'Awak iki dadi mbukak dadi pangusahaan kanggo kebonan Tipe lan bukani nggawe oleh pancene kapan-kapan ning media sithik Go Method was asserting on all 3 Subtitles in task 6 - seminval 2011 9: offensinval: ID and category offensive Language in Digital Media. Pesene kuwi wis ngerasakno karo halekaé, nek akeh mbutuhak capsule ora ono usaha bener tentang kanggo tukang nggawe idiwang, dheweke iso ngerasakno akeh durung cara-soko perusahaan kanggo kebonan langkung alêr dumadhi neng media sotih.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na faɗa ɗa wani matsayin lõkaci na yanzu zuwa gane nau'in da aka ƙayyade maimaishi na ƙiyayya a cikin mitandai da jamii, sunã amfani da wani jerin macsule. @ action: button An evaluce wannan a kan duk aikin su sau cikin aikin 6 - Semeval 2019: offenseval: Idonaɗa and Categorize offersive language in social Media. Ana ƙaddara da shi ya nuna cẽwa, kuma kõ dã ba a yi amfani da waɗanan macsules ba da kawaici a cikin aikin aiki na zartar da harshe na asili, sai su iya nuna halin sanatarakin da za'a samu'a wa gano lugha na fassari a cikin mita jamii.", 'he': 'This paper describes a novel research approach to detect type and target of offensive posts in social media using a capsule network.  הכניסה לרשת היתה תוספות אופיים משולבות עם תוספות emoji. הגישה הוערכה על כל שלושת השאלות במשימה 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media. הערכה הראה גם שאפילו שרשת הקפסולות לא השתמשו בדרך כלל במשימות עיבוד שפות טבעיות, הן יכולות להעביר את הפתרונות המאומנות הנוכחיות לגילוי שפות פגיעה בתקשורת חברתית.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan nov raziskovalni pristop za odkrivanje vrste in cilja napadalnih objav v družbenih omrežjih z uporabo kapsule omrežja. Vhod v omrežje so bile vdelave znakov v kombinaciji z vdelavami emojijev. Pristop je bil ocenjen na vseh treh podnalogah v nalogi 6 - SemEval 2019: OffensEval: identifikacija in kategorizacija ofenzivnega jezika v socialnih medijih. Ocena je pokazala tudi, da čeprav kapsulske mreže niso bile pogosto uporabljene pri obdelavi naravnega jezika, lahko presegajo obstoječe najsodobnejše rešitve za odkrivanje žaljivega jezika v družbenih omrežjih.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གསར་བ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་དེ་ལ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ དྲ་ཐོག་གི་གནས་ཡུལ་འདི་ཡི་གེའི་ཁ་འབྱེད་ཀྱིས་emoji་གནས་ཁོངས་དང་མཉམ་སྦྲེལ་བའི་ཡིག་འབྲུ་ཡོད་པ འདི་ལྟ་བུ ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་ན། རྗེས་གཞི་ཚོགས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'Using Syntax to Resolve NPE in English', 'ar': 'استخدام النحو لحل NPE باللغة الإنجليزية', 'fr': 'Utilisation de la syntaxe pour résoudre le NPE en anglais', 'pt': 'Usando sintaxe para resolver NPE em inglês', 'es': 'Uso de la sintaxis para resolver NPE en inglés', 'ja': '構文を使用してNPEを英語で解決する', 'zh': '用语法用英语解析 NPE', 'hi': 'अंग्रेजी में NPE को हल करने के लिए सिंटैक्स का उपयोग करना', 'ru': 'Использование синтаксиса для разрешения NPE на английском языке', 'ga': 'Comhréir a Úsáid chun NPE a Réiteach i mBéarla', 'ka': 'სინტექსტის გამოყენება NPE- ს გადასუქმება ინგლისურად', 'el': 'Χρήση Συντονισμού για την Επίλυση ΝΠΕ στα Αγγλικά', 'kk': 'NPE- ді ағылшынша шешу үшін синтаксисі қолданылады', 'hu': 'A Syntax használata az NPE megoldására angol nyelven', 'it': 'Usare la sintassi per risolvere NPE in inglese', 'ms': 'Mengguna Sintaks untuk menyelesaikan NPE dalam bahasa Inggeris', 'mk': 'Користење синтаксис за решавање на NPE на англиски', 'lt': 'Using Syntax to Resolve NPE in English', 'ml': 'NPE ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കാന്\u200d സിന്\u200dകാസ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Using Syntax to Resolve NPE in English', 'mn': 'NPE-г Англи хэлний шийдвэрлэх синтаксисийг ашиглах', 'no': 'Bruk syntaks for å løysa NPE på engelsk', 'ro': 'Utilizarea sintaxei pentru a rezolva NPE în limba engleză', 'sr': 'Koristenje sintaksa za rješavanje NPE na engleskom', 'si': 'ඇන්ග්\u200dරීසියෙන් NPE විස්තර කරන්න සංකේතය භාවිත කරන්න', 'pl': 'Używanie Syntax do rozwiązywania NPE w języku angielskim', 'ur': 'انگلیسی میں NPE حل کرنے کے لئے سینٹکس استعمال کیا جاتا ہے', 'so': 'Isticmaalka cashuurta la-isticmaalayo in uu u dhamaado NPE afka Ingiriis', 'sv': 'Använda Syntax för att lösa NPE på engelska', 'ta': 'NPE ஆங்கிலத்தில் தீர்வு செய்ய ஒத்திசைவை பயன்படுத்துகிறது', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dùng Syntax để xóa NPRE trên tiếng Anh', 'bg': 'Използване на синтаксис за решаване на НПО на английски език', 'nl': 'Syntaxis gebruiken om NPE op te lossen in het Engels', 'hr': 'Koristeći sintaks za rješavanje NPE na engleskom', 'da': 'Brug af Syntax til at løse NPE på engelsk', 'id': 'Menggunakan Sintaks untuk memecahkan NPE dalam bahasa Inggris', 'de': 'Verwenden von Syntax zur Auflösung von NPE auf Englisch', 'ko': '구문을 사용하여 영어의 NPE 구문 분석', 'fa': 'استفاده از سنتاکس برای حل NPE در انگلیسی', 'sw': 'Kwa kutumia Makosa ya Syntax kulitua NPE kwa Kiingereza', 'tr': "NPE'i Iňlisçe çözmek üçin Sentaks ullan", 'af': 'Gebruik Sintaks na Oplos NPE in Engels', 'hy': 'Օգտագործելով Սինտրաքսին Անգլերենում լուծելու համար', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i Sintaksit për të zgjidhur NPE në anglisht', 'am': 'ኢንጂልኛ', 'az': 'NPE dilind톛 칞톛kilm톛k 칲칞칲n Sintaks qullan캼l캼r', 'bn': 'ইংরেজি ভাষায় NPE সমাধান করার জন্য সিন্ক্যাক্স ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Koristim sintaks za rješavanje NPE na engleskom', 'ca': 'Utilitzant Sintaxi per resoldre NPE en anglès', 'cs': 'Použití syntaxe k řešení NPE v angličtině', 'et': 'Süntaksi kasutamine NPE lahendamiseks inglise keeles', 'fi': 'Syntaksin käyttäminen NPE:n ratkaisemiseen englanniksi', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah Senegas kanggo Resolve NPL nang Inggris', 'he': 'השימוש בסינטקס לפתור NPE באנגלית', 'sk': 'Uporaba sintakse za reševanje NPE v angleščini', 'ha': 'Yi amfani da Tafiyar da Kyauta don ya Cire NPA cikin Ingiriya', 'bo': 'དབྱིན་ཡིག་ནང་ལ་སྐད་ཡིག་སྣོད་འདོར་བ'}
{'en': 'This paper describes a novel, syntax-based system for automatic detection and resolution of Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) in English. The system takes in free input English text, detects the site of nominal elision, and if present, selects potential antecedent candidates. The rules are built using the syntactic information on ellipsis and its antecedent discussed in previous theoretical linguistics literature on NPE. Additionally, we prepare a curated dataset of 337 sentences from well-known, reliable sources, containing positive and negative samples of NPE. We split this dataset into two parts, and use one part to refine our rules and the other to test the performance of our final system. We get an F1-score of 76.47 % for detection and 70.27 % for NPE resolution on the testset. To the best of our knowledge, ours is the first system that detects and resolves NPE in English. The curated dataset used for this task, albeit small, covers a wide variety of NPE cases and will be made public for future work.', 'ar': 'يصف هذا البحث نظامًا جديدًا قائمًا على بناء الجملة للكشف التلقائي عن عبارة Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) باللغة الإنجليزية وحلها. يأخذ النظام إدخالًا مجانيًا للنص الإنجليزي ، ويكتشف موقع الشطب الاسمي ، وإذا كان موجودًا ، يختار المرشحين المحتملين. تم بناء القواعد باستخدام المعلومات النحوية على القطع الناقص وسابقتها التي نوقشت في أدبيات علم اللغة النظرية السابقة على NPE. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقوم بإعداد مجموعة بيانات منظمة من 337 جملة من مصادر موثوقة ومعروفة ، تحتوي على عينات إيجابية وسلبية من NPE. قمنا بتقسيم مجموعة البيانات هذه إلى جزأين ، واستخدام جزء واحد لتحسين قواعدنا والآخر لاختبار أداء نظامنا النهائي. حصلنا على درجة F1 76.47٪ للكشف و 70.27٪ لدقة NPE في مجموعة الاختبار. على حد علمنا ، فإن نظامنا هو أول نظام يكتشف ويحل NPE باللغة الإنجليزية. مجموعة البيانات المنسقة المستخدمة لهذه المهمة ، وإن كانت صغيرة ، تغطي مجموعة متنوعة من حالات NPE وسيتم الإعلان عنها للعمل في المستقبل.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe un novedoso sistema basado en la sintaxis para la detección y resolución automática de elipsis de frases nominales (NPE) en inglés. El sistema toma texto en inglés de entrada libre, detecta el sitio de la elisión nominal y, si está presente, selecciona posibles candidatos antecedentes. Las reglas se construyen utilizando la información sintáctica sobre puntos suspensivos y su antecedente discutido en la literatura lingüística teórica previa sobre NPE. Además, preparamos un conjunto de datos curado de 337 frases de fuentes conocidas y confiables, que contienen muestras positivas y negativas de NPE. Dividimos este conjunto de datos en dos partes y utilizamos una parte para refinar nuestras reglas y la otra para probar el rendimiento de nuestro sistema final. Obtenemos una puntuación F1 del 76,47% para la detección y del 70,27% para la resolución de NPE en el conjunto de pruebas. Hasta donde sabemos, el nuestro es el primer sistema que detecta y resuelve NPE en inglés. El conjunto de datos seleccionado utilizado para esta tarea, aunque pequeño, cubre una amplia variedad de casos de NPE y se hará público para trabajos futuros.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve um novo sistema baseado em sintaxe para detecção e resolução automática de reticências de frases nominais (NPE) em inglês. O sistema recebe texto em inglês de entrada livre, detecta o local da elisão nominal e, se presente, seleciona possíveis candidatos antecedentes. As regras são construídas a partir das informações sintáticas das reticências e seus antecedentes discutidos na literatura linguística teórica anterior sobre NPE. Além disso, preparamos um conjunto de dados com curadoria de 337 sentenças de fontes conhecidas e confiáveis, contendo amostras positivas e negativas de NPE. Dividimos esse conjunto de dados em duas partes e usamos uma parte para refinar nossas regras e a outra para testar o desempenho do nosso sistema final. Obtemos uma pontuação F1 de 76,47% para detecção e 70,27% para resolução NPE no conjunto de testes. Até onde sabemos, o nosso é o primeiro sistema que detecta e resolve NPE em inglês. O conjunto de dados selecionado usado para esta tarefa, embora pequeno, abrange uma ampla variedade de casos de NPE e será divulgado para trabalhos futuros.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit un nouveau système basé sur la syntaxe pour la détection et la résolution automatiques des points de suspension nominaux (NPE) en anglais. Le système prend en charge le texte anglais saisi gratuitement, détecte le site d'élision nominale et, le cas échéant, sélectionne des candidats potentiels antérieurs. Les règles sont construites à partir des informations syntaxiques sur les points de suspension et de leurs antécédents discutés dans la littérature linguistique théorique antérieure sur le NPE. De plus, nous préparons un ensemble de données organisé de 337 phrases provenant de sources fiables et connues, contenant des échantillons positifs et négatifs de NPE. Nous avons scindé ce jeu de données en deux parties, l'une pour affiner nos règles et l'autre pour tester les performances de notre système final. Nous obtenons un score F1 de 76,47\xa0% pour la détection et de 70,27\xa0% pour la résolution NPE sur l'ensemble de tests. À notre connaissance, notre système est le premier qui détecte et résout les NPE en anglais. L'ensemble de données organisé utilisé pour cette tâche, bien que petit, couvre une grande variété de cas de NPE et sera rendu public pour les travaux futurs.", 'zh': '本文言语法之新型统,施于自动检测解析英语之名词短语省略号(NPE)。 统受免费输英文文本,检名省地,若存,则择潜先验候选者。 此则用省略号之句法信息及前NPE论语言学文献所议也。 此外备一由知名337一句精选数集,其中包NPE正负面样本。 分此数聚为二,而用一以优化吾法,一以试吾统之性。 试集上之检,分为 76.47%,NPE 分辨率为 70.27%。 以吾所知,一检解析英语NPE之统也。 用此选数虽小,涵盖NPE例,著于将来。', 'ja': 'この論文では、英語のNPE （ Noun Phrase Ellipsis ）の自動検出と解決のための新規の構文ベースのシステムについて説明します。 このシステムは、自由な入力英語テキストを取り込み、公称精製部位を検出し、存在する場合は、潜在的な先行候補を選択します。 これらの規則は、NPEに関する以前の理論的言語学文献で論じられている省略記号とその前段階に関する構文情報を使用して構築されています。 さらに、NPEの陽性サンプルと陰性サンプルを含む、既知の信頼できるソースからの337の文章のキュレーションされたデータセットを準備します。 このデータセットを2つの部分に分割し、1つの部分を使用してルールを洗練させ、もう1つの部分を使用して最終システムのパフォーマンスをテストします。 F 1スコアは、検出で76.47%、テストセットでNPE分解能で70.27%です。 私たちの知る限りでは、当社は英語でNPEを検出して解決する最初のシステムです。 このタスクに使用されるキュレーションされたデータセットは、小規模ではありますが、幅広い種類のNPEケースをカバーしており、今後の作業のために公開されます。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर अंग्रेजी में संज्ञा वाक्यांश एलिप्सिस (एनपीई) के स्वचालित पता लगाने और संकल्प के लिए एक उपन्यास, वाक्यविन्यास-आधारित प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है। सिस्टम मुफ्त इनपुट अंग्रेजी पाठ में लेता है, नाममात्र एलिज़न की साइट का पता लगाता है, और यदि मौजूद है, तो संभावित पूर्ववर्ती उम्मीदवारों का चयन करता है। नियमों को एलिप्सिस पर वाक्यात्मक जानकारी का उपयोग करके बनाया गया है और एनपीई पर पिछले सैद्धांतिक भाषाविज्ञान साहित्य में चर्चा की गई इसके पूर्ववर्ती हैं। इसके अतिरिक्त, हम अच्छी तरह से ज्ञात, विश्वसनीय स्रोतों से 337 वाक्यों का एक क्यूरेटेड डेटासेट तैयार करते हैं, जिसमें एनपीई के सकारात्मक और नकारात्मक नमूने होते हैं। हम इस डेटासेट को दो भागों में विभाजित करते हैं, और एक हिस्से का उपयोग हमारे नियमों को परिष्कृत करने के लिए करते हैं और दूसरा हमारे अंतिम सिस्टम के प्रदर्शन का परीक्षण करने के लिए। हमें पता लगाने के लिए 76.47% और टेस्टसेट पर एनपीई रिज़ॉल्यूशन के लिए 70.27% का एफ 1-स्कोर मिलता है। हमारे ज्ञान का सबसे अच्छा करने के लिए, हमारा पहला सिस्टम है जो अंग्रेजी में एनपीई का पता लगाता है और हल करता है। इस कार्य के लिए उपयोग किए जाने वाले क्यूरेटेड डेटासेट, हालांकि छोटे, एनपीई मामलों की एक विस्तृत विविधता को कवर करते हैं और भविष्य के काम के लिए सार्वजनिक किए जाएंगे।', 'ru': 'Эта бумага описывает романную, синтаксис-основанную систему для автоматического обнаружения и разрешения Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) на английском языке. Система принимает бесплатный ввод английского текста, обнаруживает место номинального элисиона и, при наличии, выбирает потенциальных кандидатов. Правила построены с использованием синтаксической информации о многоточии и его предшественнике, рассмотренной в предыдущей теоретической лингвистической литературе по NPE. Дополнительно мы готовим курируемый датасет из 337 предложений из хорошо известных, достоверных источников, содержащий положительные и отрицательные образцы NPE. Мы разделяем этот набор данных на две части и используем одну часть для уточнения наших правил, а другую для проверки производительности нашей окончательной системы. Мы получаем оценку F1 76,47% для обнаружения и 70,27% для разрешения NPE на тестовом наборе. Насколько нам известно, наша система является первой системой, которая обнаруживает и разрешает NPE на английском языке. Курируемый набор данных, используемый для этой задачи, хотя и небольшой, охватывает широкий спектр случаев NPE и будет обнародован для будущей работы.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar chóras nua-chomhréir-bhunaithe chun Ainmfhocal Frása Éilipsis (NPE) a bhrath agus a réiteach go huathoibríoch i mBéarla. Glacann an córas téacs saor-ionchuir isteach sa Bhéarla, aimsíonn sé suíomh an scriosta ainmniúil, agus más ann dó, roghnaíonn sé iarrthóirí ionchasacha. Tógtar na rialacha trí úsáid a bhaint as an bhfaisnéis chomhréire ar éilips agus a réamhinsint a pléadh i litríocht theoiriciúil na teangeolaíochta roimhe seo ar NPE. Ina theannta sin, ullmhaímid tacar sonraí coimeádta de 337 abairt ó fhoinsí aitheanta iontaofa, ina bhfuil samplaí dearfacha agus diúltacha de NPE. Roinnimid an tacar sonraí seo ina dhá chuid, agus úsáidimid cuid amháin chun ár rialacha a bheachtú agus an ceann eile chun feidhmíocht ár gcóras deiridh a thástáil. Faighimid scór F1 de 76.47% le haghaidh braite agus 70.27% do réiteach NPE ar an tacar tástála. Chomh fada agus is eol dúinn, is é ár gcóras seo an chéad chóras a bhraitheann agus a réitíonn NPE i mBéarla. Clúdaíonn an tacar sonraí coimeádta a úsáidtear don tasc seo, cé gur beag é, raon leathan cásanna NPE agus déanfar é a phoibliú le haghaidh oibre amach anseo.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი აღწერა პრომენტის, სინტაქსის ბაზეული სისტემის ავტომატური განახსნა და გარეშექმნა ანგლისურად. სისტემა თავისუფალი ინგლისური ტექსტის შეტყობინება, განვიცნობა ნომინალური ელიზიციის სახლის სახლის და თუ არსებობს, მოიცნობა პოციალური ანტიცენტის კა კონტაქტიური ინფორმაციის გამოყენება, რომელიც ელიპსის და მისი ანტერესენტის ანტერესენტის შესახებ, რომელიც წინა თეორეტიური ლენგურიტიკის ლიტარიტაციაში NPE დამატებით, ჩვენ დავაკეთებთ 337 მონაცემების მონაცემების მნიშვნელოვანი, დარწმუნებელი მსოფლიო მსოფლიოებიდან, რომლებიც NPE-ის პოტიფიკაციურ და negaტიურ მო ჩვენ ამ მონაცემების შესახებ ორი ნაწილში გაყოფილი და ერთი ნაწილი გამოყენებთ ჩვენი წესების და მეორე ნაწილის შესახებ ჩვენი ბოლო სისტემის შესახებ. ჩვენ ვიღებთ F1- სოფლიოს 76.47% განახლებისთვის და 70.27% სოფლიოსოფლიოსოფლიოსოფლიოსოფლიოსოფლიოსოფლიოსოფლიოსოფლიოსზე. ჩვენი უკეთესი მეცნიერებისთვის, ჩვენი პირველი სისტემა, რომელიც ანგლისურად NPE-ს განაკვირდება და განაკვირდება. ამ დავალებისთვის გამოყენებული მონაცემები, თუმცა პატარა, უფრო დიდი განსხვავებული NPE მონაცემებისთვის და მომავალეთ სამუშაო დაახლოებით.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει ένα νέο σύστημα με βάση τη σύνταξη για την αυτόματη ανίχνευση και ανάλυση των ουσιαστικών φράσεων στην αγγλική γλώσσα. Το σύστημα λαμβάνει ελεύθερα αγγλικό κείμενο εισαγωγής, ανιχνεύει τον τόπο ονομαστικής απόκλισης και, εάν υπάρχει, επιλέγει πιθανούς υποψήφιους. Οι κανόνες κατασκευάζονται χρησιμοποιώντας τις συντακτικές πληροφορίες σχετικά με την ελλείπση και την προέλευσή της που συζητήθηκαν στην προηγούμενη θεωρητική γλωσσολογική βιβλιογραφία για το ΝΠΕ. Επιπλέον, προετοιμάζουμε ένα επιλεγμένο σύνολο δεδομένων 337 προτάσεων από γνωστές, αξιόπιστες πηγές, που περιέχουν θετικά και αρνητικά δείγματα ΝΠΕ. Χωρίζουμε αυτό το σύνολο δεδομένων σε δύο μέρη, και χρησιμοποιούμε το ένα μέρος για να βελτιώσουμε τους κανόνες μας και το άλλο για να ελέγξουμε την απόδοση του τελικού μας συστήματος. Παίρνουμε μια βαθμολογία 76.47% για ανίχνευση και 70.27% για ανάλυση NPE στο σετ δοκιμής. Από ό,τι γνωρίζουμε, το δικό μας σύστημα είναι το πρώτο που ανιχνεύει και επιλύει ΜΝΠ στα αγγλικά. Το επιλεγμένο σύνολο δεδομένων που χρησιμοποιείται για το έργο αυτό, αν και μικρό, καλύπτει μια μεγάλη ποικιλία περιπτώσεων ΜΚΟ και θα δημοσιοποιηθεί για μελλοντικές εργασίες.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз Ағылшынша Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) тілінде автоматты түрде анықтау мен айырмашылығының романы, синтаксис негіздеген жүйесін анықтайды. Жүйе ағылшын тілінде бос кіріс мәтінді табылады, номиналдық Elision сайтын анықтайды, және қазіргі болса, мүмкін алдындағы кандидаттарды таңдайды. Елипсиясы және оның алдыңғы теориялық лингвистикалық лингвистикалық литературасында талқылатын синтактикалық мәліметті қолдану үшін ережелер құрылады. Қосымша, біз NPE нәтижесінің оң және негативті үлгілері бар 337 мәліметті құрылған деректер жиынын дайындаймыз. Бұл деректер жиынын екі бөлігіне бөліп, бір бөлігін ережелерімізді жаңарту үшін, біріншісін соңғы жүйеңіздің істеуін тексеру үшін қолданамыз. Біз табу үшін 76,47% F1- нұсқасы және NPE айырмашылығының 70,27% нұсқасы бар. Біздің біліміздің ең жақсы біліміздің бірінші жүйесіміз - NPE- ді ағылшын тілінде анықтап шешу жүйесі. Бұл тапсырма үшін қолданылатын деректер жинағы, әйтпесе кішкентай, көптеген NPE жағдайларды жасырып, келесі жұмыс үшін жалғастырылады.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy új, szintaxis alapú rendszert ír le a főnévkifejezés Ellipszis (NPE) automatikus felismerésére és felbontására angol nyelven. A rendszer ingyenes beviteli angol szöveget vesz be, felismeri a névleges elizió helyét, és ha van, kiválasztja a potenciális előző jelölteket. A szabályok az ellipszisre és annak előzményeire vonatkozó szintaktikai információk felhasználásával készülnek, amelyeket az NPE korábbi elméleti nyelvészeti irodalmában tárgyaltunk. Továbbá 337 mondatból álló, jól ismert, megbízható forrásokból álló kurátoros adatkészletet készítünk, amelyek pozitív és negatív NPE mintákat tartalmaznak. Ezt az adatkészletet két részre osztjuk, és az egyik részt használjuk a szabályaink finomítására, a másikat pedig a végső rendszerünk teljesítményének tesztelésére. F1 pontszámot kapunk 76,47%-os detektálásra és 70,27%-os NPE felbontásra a tesztkészleten. Legjobb tudásunk szerint a miénk az első olyan rendszer, amely angolul felismeri és feloldja az NPE-t. Az ehhez a feladathoz használt kurátorozott adatkészlet, bár kicsi, a NPE esetek széles választékát fedi le, és a jövőbeli munkákhoz nyilvánosságra kerül.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive un nuovo sistema basato sulla sintassi per il rilevamento automatico e la risoluzione di Ellipsis (NPE) in inglese. Il sistema prende in ingresso libero testo inglese, rileva il sito di elisione nominale e, se presente, seleziona potenziali candidati antecedenti. Le regole sono costruite utilizzando le informazioni sintattiche sull'ellissi e il suo antecedente discusse nella precedente letteratura linguistica teorica su NPE. Inoltre, prepariamo un set di dati curato di 337 frasi da fonti ben note e affidabili, contenenti campioni positivi e negativi di NPE. Dividiamo questo set di dati in due parti, e usiamo una parte per perfezionare le nostre regole e l'altra per testare le prestazioni del nostro sistema finale. Otteniamo un punteggio F1 del 76,47% per il rilevamento e del 70,27% per la risoluzione NPE sul set di test. Per quanto ne sappiamo, il nostro è il primo sistema che rileva e risolve NPE in inglese. Il set di dati curato utilizzato per questo compito, anche se piccolo, copre un'ampia varietà di casi NPE e sarà reso pubblico per lavori futuri.", 'mk': 'Овој весник опишува нов систем базиран на синтаксија за автоматско детекција и резолуција на Елипсис на фраза на името (NPE) на англиски јазик. Системот зема бесплатен англиски текст, го детектира местото на номиналната елизија, и ако е присутен, ги избира потенцијалните претходни кандидати. Правилата се изградени користејќи ги синтактичките информации за елипсата и нејзиниот претходник дискутиран во претходната теоретска лингвистичка литература за НПЕ. Покрај тоа, подготвуваме куриран податок од 337 реченици од познати, доверливи извори, кои содржат позитивни и негативни примероци на НПЕ. Ги поделиме податоците во два дела, и користиме еден дел за да ги пофинираме нашите правила, а другиот за да ја тестираме извршноста на нашиот финален систем. Добиваме резултат од 76,47% за детекција и 70,27% за НПЕ резолуција на тестот. To the best of our knowledge, ours is the first system that detects and resolves NPE in English.  The curated dataset used for this task, albeit small, covers a wide variety of NPE cases and will be made public for future work.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma nauja, sintaksinė sistema, skirta automatiniam frazės elipsio (NPE) nustatymui ir pertvarkymui anglų kalba. Sistema įrašo nemokamą anglų kalbos tekstą, aptinka vardinės elikcijos vietą ir, jei yra, atrenka galimus anksčiau buvusius kandidatus. The rules are built using the syntactic information on ellipsis and its antecedent discussed in previous theoretical linguistics literature on NPE.  Be to, parengiame tikslų 337 sakinių duomenų rinkinį iš gerai žinomų, patikimų šaltinių, kuriame yra teigiamų ir neigiamų NPE mėginių. Mes suskaičiuojame šį duomenų rinkinį į dvi dalis ir naudojame vieną dalį, kad patobulintume savo taisykles, o kitą, kad išbandytume galutinės sistemos veikimą. Gavome F1 rezultatą 76,47 proc. aptikimui ir 70,27 proc. NPE rezoliucijai bandymų rinkinyje. Mūsų žiniomis, mūsų yra pirmoji sistema, kuri aptinka ir išsprendžia NPE anglų kalba. Šioje užduotyje naudojamas, nors ir nedidelis, apdorotas duomenų rinkinys apima įvairius NPE atvejus ir bus paskelbtas viešai būsimam darbui.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ നോവല്\u200d, സിനാക്സ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സിസ്റ്റം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. നോന്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d എലിപ്പിസിന്റെ (NPE) ഇംഗ്ലീ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d സ്വതന്ത്രമായ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പദാവലിയില്\u200d എടുക്കുന്നു, നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥലം കണ്ടെത്തുന്ന എലിപ്പിസിനെക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള സിനിട്ടാക്കിക് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന് അതുകൂടാതെ, നമ്മള്\u200d 337 വാക്കുകളുടെ മുഴുവന്\u200d വിശ്വസ്തന്ത്ര സ്രോതസ്സുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും മുഴുവന്\u200d വിശ്വസ്തമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d തയ്യാറാക്കുന് We split this dataset into two parts, and use one part to refine our rules and the other to test the performance of our final system.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് 76.47% കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d F1 സ്കോര്\u200d കിട്ടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണസെറ്റില്\u200d NPE റിസ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d 70.27% ക നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ലതിന് നമ്മുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ സിസ്റ്റമാണ് നമ്മുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ സംവിധാനം ഇംഗ്ലീഷി ഈ ജോലിക്കായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് ചെറുതായാലും ചെറുതാണെങ്കിലും NPE കേസുകള്\u200d വിശാലമായി പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പി', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi sistema ġdida bbażata fuq is-sintaks għall-individwazzjoni u r-riżoluzzjoni awtomatiċi ta’ Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) bl-Ingliż. Is-sistema tieħu t-test Ingliż b’input ħieles, tidentifika s-sit tal-eliżjoni nominali, u jekk preżenti, tagħżel kandidati potenzjali anteċedenti. Ir-regoli huma mibnija bl-użu tal-informazzjoni sintattika dwar l-ellipsi u l-anteċedent tagħha diskuss fil-letteratura teoretika lingwistika preċedenti dwar NPE. Barra minn hekk, a ħna nħejju sett ta’ dejta kurat ta’ 337 sentenza minn sorsi magħrufa sew, affidabbli, li fih kampjuni pożittivi u negattivi ta’ NPE. Aħna nqasmu dan is-sett ta’ dejta f’żewġ partijiet, u nużaw parti waħda biex irrifinaw ir-regoli tagħna u l-oħra biex jittestjaw il-prestazzjoni tas-sistema finali tagħna. Għandna punteġġ F1 ta’ 76.47% għad-detezzjoni u 70.27% għar-riżoluzzjoni NPE fuq is-sett tat-test. Għall-aħjar għarfien tagħna, tagħna hija l-ewwel sistema li tidentifika u ssolvi l-NPE bl-Ingliż. Is-sett ta’ dejta kkurat użat għal dan il-kompitu, għalkemm żgħir, ikopri varjetà wiesgħa ta’ każijiet ta’ NPE u se jsir pubbliku għal xogħol futur.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem baru, berdasarkan sintaks untuk pengesan dan resolusi automatik dari Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) dalam bahasa Inggeris. Sistem mengambil teks Inggeris input bebas, mengesan laman elisi nominal, dan jika ada, memilih calon yang terdahulu berpotensi. Peraturan dibangun menggunakan maklumat sintaktik tentang elipsis dan antecedente yang dibincangkan dalam literatur teori bahasa terdahulu tentang NPE. Selain itu, kami menyediakan set data terkurus 337 kalimat dari sumber yang terkenal, yang boleh dipercayai, mengandungi sampel positif dan negatif NPE. Kita bahagikan set data ini ke dua bahagian, dan gunakan satu bahagian untuk memperbaiki peraturan kita dan yang lain untuk menguji prestasi sistem akhir kita. Kita dapat nilai F1 76.47% untuk pengesan dan 70.27% untuk resolusi NPE pada set ujian. Menurut pengetahuan kita, sistem kita adalah sistem pertama yang mengesan dan menyelesaikan NPE dalam bahasa Inggeris. The curated dataset used for this task, albeit small, covers a wide variety of NPE cases and will be made public for future work.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас Англи хэлний Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) шийдвэрлэх, автоматжуулах болон шийдвэрлэх шинэ, синтаксис суурилсан системийг тайлбарладаг. Энэ систем үнэгүй Англи хэлний бичсэн текст бий болгож, нэр дэвшүүлэгчдийн сайтыг олж мэднэ. Хэрвээ одоо байгаа бол, боломжтой төсөөлөгчдийг сонгож байна. Шулуун нь зуйвангийн тухай синтактик мэдээллийг ашиглаж, өмнөх теоретик хэлний зохиолын тухай ярилцсан хэлний уран зохиолын тухай ярилцлагатай байдаг. Мөн бид мэдэх, итгэлтэй эх үүсвэрээс 337 өгөгдлийн санг бэлдэж, NPE-ын эерэг болон сөрөг жишээг агуулдаг. Бид энэ өгөгдлийн санг хоёр хэсэгт хувааж, нэг хэсэг нь бидний хуулиудыг сайжруулахын тулд, нөгөө хэсэг нь бидний сүүлийн системийн үйл ажиллагааг шалгахын тулд ашиглаж байна. НПЭ шийдвэрлэлт дээр 70.27 хувийг олж мэдэхэд 76.47 хувийг олж авна. Хамгийн сайн мэдлэгтэй нь бидний анхны систем нь NPE-г Англи хэлний хэлний хэлний шийдвэрлэх, шийдвэрлэх. Энэ ажлын хувьд хэрэглэгдсэн мэдээллийн сангууд, жижиг ч, олон төрлийн NPE хэрэгслүүдийг нэмж ирээдүйн ажлын хувьд нийтлэг болно.', 'no': 'Denne papiret skildrar eit roman, syntaksbasert system for automatisk oppdaging og oppløysing av Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) på engelsk. Systemet tar i fri inndata engelsk tekst, oppdager nettstaden for nominale elisjon, og dersom det er i staden, vel potensielle antecedentkandidatar. Reglane blir bygde med syntaktiske informasjon om ellipser og antecedenten som er diskutert i tidlegare teoretiske lingviske litteratur på NPE. I tillegg beregne vi eit kursert datasett med 337 setningar frå godt kjente, betrekka kjelde, som inneheld positiv og negativ NPE-prøver. Vi deler datasettet til to deler, og bruker ein del for å refinera reglane våre og andre for å testa utviklinga av systemet våre siste. Vi får eit F1- poeng med 76,47% for oppdaging og 70,27% for NPE- oppløysing på testsettet. For det beste av våre kunnskap er våre første system som oppdager og løyser NPE på engelsk. Den korrigerte datasettet som brukar for denne oppgåva, selv om små, dekkar ein stor variasjon av NPE-tilfeller og vil bli offentlig for framtidige arbeid.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje roman, sintaksijski sistem za automatski otkrivanje i rezoluciju Noun Frase Ellipsis (NPE) na engleskom jeziku. Sistem uzima slobodan engleski tekst, otkriva lokaciju nominalne elizije, a ako je prisutno, odabere potencijalne kandidate za predsednike. Pravila su izgrađena koristeći sintaktičnu informaciju o elipsima i njegovoj predsednici koji su razgovarali u prethodnoj teorijskoj lingvističkoj literaturi o NPE-u. Osim toga, pripremamo zaključenu setu podataka od 337 rečenica iz poznatih, pouzdanih izvora, sadržavajući pozitivne i negativne uzorke NPE-a. Podijelili smo ovu setu podataka u dva dijela, i koristili jedan deo da bismo popravili naše pravila i drugo da bismo testirali učinkovitost našeg konačnog sistema. Dobili smo F1 rezultat 76,47% za otkrivanje i 70,27% za rezoluciju NPE na testu. Najbolji od naših znanja, naš je prvi sistem koji otkriva i reši NPE na engleskom jeziku. Prekršeni podaci koji se koriste za ovaj zadatak, iako mali, pokrivaju široke razne slučajeve NPE-a i biće objavljeni za budući rad.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nowatorski, oparty na składni system automatycznego wykrywania i rozdzielczości rzeczownika Ellipsis (NPE) w języku angielskim. System przyjmuje wolny tekst angielski, wykrywa miejsce nominalnej eliminacji, a jeśli obecny, wybiera potencjalnych poprzednich kandydatów. Zasady budowane są z wykorzystaniem informacji składniowych o elipsie i jej poprzednich przedmiotach omówionych w poprzedniej literaturze językoznawstwa teoretycznego dotyczącej NPE. Dodatkowo przygotowujemy zbiór danych 337 zdań ze znanych, wiarygodnych źródeł, zawierający pozytywne i negatywne próbki NPE. Podzielimy ten zestaw danych na dwie części i używamy jednej części do udoskonalenia naszych zasad, a drugiej do testowania wydajności naszego ostatecznego systemu. Otrzymujemy wynik F1 76,47% dla wykrycia i 70,27% dla rozdzielczości NPE na zestawie testowym. Według naszej najlepszej wiedzy, nasz system jest pierwszym systemem, który wykrywa i rozwiązuje NPE w języku angielskim. Wykorzystany do tego zadania zbiór danych, choć niewielki, obejmuje szeroką gamę przypadków NPE i zostanie podany do wiadomości publicznej w przyszłych pracach.', 'si': 'Name පද්ධතිය නිදහස් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි පාළුවෙන් ඇතුළත් ඇතුළත් පාළුවක් ඇතුළත් කරනවා, නාමිකල් ඇතුළත් පාළුවක් ස නීතිය නිර්මාණය නිර්මාණය නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ලිපිස්ස් ගැන සංකේතික තොරතුරු භාෂාවික භාෂාවික සං තවත්, අපි හොඳට දන්න පුළුවන්, විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්, NPE ගේ සාමාන්\u200dය සහ අනතුරු නිර්මාණයක් තියෙනවා. අපි මේ දත්ත සැට්ටුව අන්තිම පද්ධතියට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න පුළුවන් එක කොටසක් භාවිත කරන්න. අපිට පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා F1-ප්\u200dරමාණයක් 76.47% විතරයි පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා 70.27% විතරයි. අපේ දැනගන්න හොඳම දේවල්, අපේ පළමු පද්ධතිය තමයි ඉංග්\u200dරීසියෙන් NPE විශ්වාස කරපු පද්ධතිය. මේ වැඩ සඳහා භාවිත වෙන්න පුළුවන් තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධයක්, පුංචියක්, ප්\u200dරමාණ විවිධියක් NPE සැකසුම් කරනව', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie un nou sistem bazat pe sintaxă pentru detectarea și rezoluția automată a Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) în limba engleză. Sistemul preia textul în limba engleză de intrare liberă, detectează site-ul elisiunii nominale și, dacă este prezent, selectează potențialii candidați antecedenți. Regulile sunt construite folosind informațiile sintactice despre elipsis și antecedentele sale discutate în literatura lingvistică teoretică anterioară despre NPE. În plus, pregătim un set de date curatat de 337 de propoziții din surse bine cunoscute și fiabile, conținând mostre pozitive și negative de NPE. Împărțim acest set de date în două părți și folosim o parte pentru a rafina regulile noastre și cealaltă pentru a testa performanța sistemului nostru final. Avem un scor F1 de 76,47% pentru detectare și 70,27% pentru rezoluția NPE pe setul de testare. Din câte ştim, sistemul nostru este primul care detectează şi rezolvă NPE în limba engleză. Setul de date selectat utilizat pentru această sarcină, deși mic, acoperă o mare varietate de cazuri NPE și va fi făcut public pentru lucrări viitoare.', 'so': "Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka saxda, ee lagu saleeyay sawir-sawir, si ay u baaqato si automatic ah iyo go'aanka ku qoran afka Ingiriis (NPE). Isticmaalku wuxuu ku qoraa qoraalka afka Ingiriiska oo lacag la’aan ah, wuxuuna caddeyaa bogagga macluumaadka, haddii ay joogto, wuxuu doortaa kandidada dhakhtarka. Sharciyada waxaa lagu dhisaa isticmaalka macluumaadka la xiriira ellipsis iyo cilmigiisa afka hore ee cilmiga afka hore ee NPE. Additionally, we prepare a curated dataset of 337 sentences from well-known, reliable sources, containing positive and negative samples of NPE.  Waxaannu u kala qeybinnay macluumaadkaas laba qayb, waxaynu isticmaalaynaa qayb si aan u hagaajinno qaynuunnadayada iyo kan kale si aan u imtixaano sameynta nidaamka ugu dambeeya. Waxaynu helaynaa kooxda F1 oo ah 76.47 boqolkiiba kadibna 70.27 boqolkiiba qoraalka imtixaanka ee NPE. Tan ugu wanaagsan aqoonteenna, waxaynu nahay nidaamka ugu horeeya ee soo ogaada iyo go'aanta NPE afka Ingiriiska. Taariikhda macluumaadka qarsoon ee lagu isticmaalayo, inkastoo ay yartahay, wuxuu daboolaa xaaladaha NPE oo kala duduwan, waxaana lagu ogeysiinayaa shaqada mustaqbalka ah.", 'ta': '@ info @ info இந்த விதிகள் எலிப்ஸின் பற்றிய ஒத்திசைவு தகவல்கள் பயன்படுத்தி உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் அதன் அன்டெசெட்டின் முந்தைய தியூரி மேலும், நாம் 337 தெரியப்பட்ட, நம்பிக்கை மூலங்களிலிருந்து ஒரு துளைப்பு தகவல் அமைப்பை தயாரிக்கிறோம், NPE நேர்மறை மற்றும் எதிர் நாம் இந்த தரவு அமைப்பை இரண்டு பகுதிகளாக பிரித்து, ஒரு பகுதியை பயன்படுத்தி எங்கள் விதிகளை மற்றும் மற்றொரு பகுதியையும் நம நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்க 76.47% F1 புள்ளி கிடைக்கும் மற்றும் சோதனைக்கு NPE தெளிவுத்திறன் 70.27% கிடைக்கும். எங்கள் அறிவின் சிறந்த முறைமைக்கு, நம்முடைய முதல் அமைப்பு ஆங்கிலத்தில் NPE கண்டுபிடிக்கும் மற்றும் தீ சிறிய இருந்தாலும் இந்த செயலுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ள தகவல் அமைப்பு நிறைவேறு NPE நிகழ்வுகளை மறைக்கிறது மற்றும் எதிர்க', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver ett nytt, syntaxbaserat system för automatisk upptäckt och upplösning av Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) på engelska. Systemet tar in gratis inmatning engelsk text, upptäcker platsen för nominell elision, och om det finns, väljer potentiella tidigare kandidater. Reglerna bygger på syntaktisk information om ellipsis och dess företeelser som diskuterats i tidigare teoretisk lingvistisk litteratur om NPE. Dessutom förbereder vi en kuraterad dataset med 337 meningar från välkända, tillförlitliga källor, som innehåller positiva och negativa prover av NPE. Vi delar upp datauppsättningen i två delar, och använder en del för att förfina våra regler och den andra för att testa prestanda i vårt slutliga system. Vi får en F1-poäng på 76,47% för detektion och 70,27% för NPE-upplösning på testset. Så vitt vi vet är vårt första system som upptäcker och löser NPE på engelska. Den kuraterade datamängd som används för denna uppgift, om än liten, täcker en mängd olika NPE-fall och kommer att offentliggöras för framtida arbete.', 'ur': 'This paper describes a novel, syntax-based system for automatic detection and resolution of Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) in English. سیسٹم مفید انگلیسی پیغام میں لیتا ہے، نومیل الیزین کے سائٹ کو پتہ لیتا ہے، اور اگر موجود ہوتا ہے، امکانات آنٹیزینڈ انتخاب کرتا ہے. ان قوانین کو الیپیس کے بارے میں سینٹکتیک معلومات کے مطابق بنایا گیا ہے اور اس کی آنٹسڈینٹ کو NPE کے بارے میں بحث کیا گیا ہے۔ اور اضافہ، ہم نے NPE کے مثبت اور منفی نمونے میں سے 337 جماعتوں کی کورٹی ڈیٹ سٹ تیار کر رکھی ہے. ہم نے اس ڈیٹ سٹ کو دو قسمتوں میں تقسیم کیا ہے اور ایک قسمت کو ہمارے قوانین اور دوسرے کو ہمارے آخری سیستم کے کامیابی کا امتحان کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا ہے ہم نے آشنا کرنے کے لئے 76.47% کی F1-اسکور پایا ہے اور NPE روشنی کے لئے 70.27%. ہمارے سب سے بہترین علم کے لئے، ہماری پہلی سیستم ہے جو NPE کو انگلیسی میں آگاہ کرتا ہے اور حل کرتا ہے۔ اس کام کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، خواہ چھوٹا بھی، بہت سی مختلف NPE کیسوں کو پورا کرتا ہے اور آگے کے کام کے لئے ظاہر کیا جائے گا.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz inglizcha Inglizcha Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) uchun avtomatik aniqlash va aniqlash uchun novel, syntax asosi tizimini anglatadi. Name Bu qoidalar, ellipsis haqida syntactik maʼlumotidan foydalaniladi va uning antecedenti oldingi teoretikal linguistic litteratasida o'ylangan. Ko'pchilik, biz NPE'ning positive va negativ misollarida 337 ta ta'lim sonlarini yaratishimiz mumkin. Biz bu maʼlumotlar tarkibini ikki qismga tenglamiz va bir qismini qoidamizni tozalash va boshqa tizimning oxirigi bajarishni tekshirish uchun ishlatimiz. Biz aniqlash uchun 76.47% F1 scori topdik va sinov sohasida NPE o'zgarishga 70.27% keladi. Bizning eng eng yaxshi aniqligimiz uchun bizning ingliz tilida NPE ni aniqlash va aniqlash birinchi tizimimiz. @ info: whatsthis", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả một hệ thống mới, cú pháp để phát hiện và giải quyết tự động của Noun Phrasile Ellipsis (NPRE) trong tiếng Anh. Hệ thống nhập vào văn bản tiếng Anh miễn phí, phát hiện hiện vị trí bán hàng biểu tượng, và nếu có, chọn ứng cử viên tiềm năng trước. Các quy tắc được xây dựng dựa trên các thông tin cấu tạo về Ellipsis và trước đó được thảo luận trong văn học ngôn ngữ trước về NPR. Thêm nữa, chúng tôi chuẩn bị một tập tin dữ liệu được sửa chữa từ các nguồn tin đáng tin cậy nổi tiếng, có chứa các mẫu chính xác và âm tính của NPR. Chúng ta chia bộ dữ liệu này thành hai phần, và dùng một phần để tinh chỉnh các quy tắc của chúng ta và phần còn lại để kiểm tra hiệu quả của hệ thống cuối cùng. Chúng ta có một số F1-điểm của Thank.477 để phát hiện và 70.27=* cho giải pháp NPR trên các hạt thử nghiệm. Theo những gì chúng tôi biết, chúng tôi là hệ thống đầu tiên phát hiện và giải quyết NPRE trên tiếng Anh. Hệ thống dữ liệu được quản lí dùng cho nhiệm vụ này, dù nhỏ, bao gồm rất nhiều trường hợp NPR và sẽ được công bố trong tương lai.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нова, базирана на синтаксис система за автоматично откриване и разделяне на елипса на съществителната фраза (НПЕ) на английски език. Системата приема свободен входящ английски текст, открива мястото на номинално елизия и, ако присъства, избира потенциални предшестващи кандидати. Правилата са изградени с помощта на синтактичната информация за елипсата и нейните предшественици, обсъдени в предишна теоретична лингвистична литература за НПЕ. Освен това изготвяме подбран набор от данни от 337 изречения от добре познати, надеждни източници, съдържащи положителни и отрицателни проби от НПЕ. Разделяме този набор от данни на две части и използваме едната част, за да усъвършенстваме правилата си, а другата, за да тестваме ефективността на крайната ни система. Получаваме оценка от 76.47% за откриване и 70.27% за разделителна способност на тестовете. Доколкото знаем, нашата е първата система, която открива и решава НПЕ на английски език. Подготвеният набор от данни, използван за тази задача, макар и малък, обхваща голямо разнообразие от случаи на НПО и ще бъде оповестен за бъдеща работа.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft een nieuw, syntaxis-gebaseerd systeem voor automatische detectie en resolutie van Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) in het Engels. Het systeem neemt vrije invoer Engelse tekst in, detecteert de plaats van nominale eliminatie en selecteert indien aanwezig potentiële voorafgaande kandidaten. De regels zijn opgebouwd met behulp van de syntactische informatie over ellipsis en de voorouders die in eerdere theoretische linguïstische literatuur over NPE zijn besproken. Daarnaast maken we een samengestelde dataset van 337 zinnen uit bekende, betrouwbare bronnen, met positieve en negatieve monsters van NPE. We splitsen deze dataset in twee delen, en gebruiken het ene deel om onze regels te verfijnen en het andere om de prestaties van ons uiteindelijke systeem te testen. We krijgen een F1-score van 76.47% voor detectie en 70.27% voor NPE resolutie op de testset. Voor zover wij weten is ons systeem het eerste dat NPE detecteert en oplost in het Engels. De samengestelde dataset die voor deze taak wordt gebruikt, hoewel klein, bestrijkt een breed scala aan NPE-gevallen en zal openbaar worden gemaakt voor toekomstig werk.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver et nyt, syntaksbaseret system til automatisk detektion og opløsning af Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) på engelsk. Systemet indtager gratis input engelsk tekst, registrerer stedet for nominel elision, og hvis til stede, vælger potentielle tidligere kandidater. Reglerne er opbygget ved hjælp af syntaktiske oplysninger om ellipsis og dens forudgående diskuteret i tidligere teoretisk lingvistisk litteratur om NPE. Derudover udarbejder vi et kurateret datasæt af 337 sætninger fra velkendte, pålidelige kilder, der indeholder positive og negative prøver af NPE. Vi opdeler dette datasæt i to dele, og bruger den ene del til at forbedre vores regler og den anden til at teste ydeevnen af vores endelige system. Vi får en F1-score på 76,47% for detektion og 70,27% for NPE opløsning på testsættet. Så vidt vi ved, er vores det første system, der registrerer og løser NPE på engelsk. Det kuraterede datasæt, der anvendes til denne opgave, dækker en lang række NPE-tilfælde, og vil blive offentliggjort til fremtidigt arbejde.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt ein neuartiges, syntaxbasiertes System zur automatischen Erkennung und Auflösung von Nomen Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) in Englisch. Das System nimmt freien englischen Text ein, erkennt den Ort der nominalen Elision und wählt, falls vorhanden, potenzielle vorausgegangene Kandidaten aus. Die Regeln basieren auf den syntaktischen Informationen über Ellipsen und deren Vorgänger, die in früheren theoretischen linguistischen Literatur über NPE diskutiert wurden. Zusätzlich erstellen wir einen kuratierten Datensatz von 337 Sätzen aus bekannten, zuverlässigen Quellen, der positive und negative Proben von NPE enthält. Wir teilen diesen Datensatz in zwei Teile auf und verwenden einen Teil, um unsere Regeln zu verfeinern und den anderen, um die Leistung unseres endgültigen Systems zu testen. Wir erhalten einen F1-Score von 76,47% für die Erkennung und 70,27% für die NPE-Auflösung am Testset. Nach bestem Wissen ist unser System das erste, das NPE auf Englisch erkennt und auflöst. Der für diese Aufgabe verwendete kuratierte Datensatz, wenn auch klein, deckt eine Vielzahl von NPE-Fällen ab und wird für zukünftige Arbeiten veröffentlicht.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje roman, sintaksički sustav za automatski otkrivanje i rješenje Noun Frase Ellipsis (NPE) na engleskom jeziku. Sistem uzima slobodan engleski tekst, otkriva mjesto nominalne elizije, a ako je prisutno, odabere potencijalne kandidate predsjednika. Pravila se izgrađuju koristeći sintaktičke informacije o ellipsiji i njegovoj predsjednici raspravljenoj u prethodnoj teorijskoj lingvističkoj literaturi o NPE-u. Osim toga, pripremamo zaključenu skupu podataka od 337 rečenica iz poznatih, pouzdanih izvora, sadržavajući pozitivne i negativne uzorke NPE-a. Podijelili smo ovu setu podataka u dva dijela, i koristili jedan dio kako bi popravili naše pravila i drugo kako bi testirali učinkovitost našeg konačnog sustava. Dobili smo F1 rezultat 76,47% za otkrivanje i 70,27% za rezoluciju NPE na testu. Najbolje od naših znanja, naš je prvi sustav koji otkriva i rješava NPE na engleskom jeziku. Uskrsnut set podataka koji se koristi za ovaj zadatak, iako mali, pokriva široku razinu slučajeva NPE-a i biće objavljen za budući rad.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sebuah sistem berbasis sintaks untuk deteksi dan resolusi otomatis dari Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) dalam bahasa Inggris. Sistem mengambil teks Inggris input gratis, mendeteksi lokasi elisi nominal, dan jika ada, memilih kandidat potensial sebelumnya. Aturan ini dibangun dengan menggunakan informasi sintaktik tentang elipsis dan antecedente yang didiskusikan dalam literatur teori bahasa sebelumnya tentang NPE. Selain itu, kami menyiapkan set data kurasi dari 337 kalimat dari sumber terkenal, yang dapat dipercaya, yang mengandung sampel positif dan negatif NPE. Kita membagi dataset ini ke dua bagian, dan menggunakan satu bagian untuk memperbaiki aturan kita dan yang lain untuk menguji prestasi sistem akhir kita. Kami mendapatkan nilai F1 76,47% untuk deteksi dan 70,27% untuk resolusi NPE pada set tes. Untuk yang terbaik dari pengetahuan kita, kita adalah sistem pertama yang mendeteksi dan memecahkan NPE dalam bahasa Inggris. Set data kurasi yang digunakan untuk tugas ini, meskipun kecil, meliputi berbagai kasus NPE yang luas dan akan dibuat publik untuk pekerjaan masa depan.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک سیستم روزنامه، بنیاد syntax based for automatic detection and resolution of Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) را در انگلیسی توصیف می\u200cکند. سیستم با متن ورودی آزاد انگلیسی می\u200cگیرد، محل الیژن نامینی را شناسایی می\u200cکند، و اگر موجود باشد، کاندیده\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی potentiaل را انتخاب می\u200cکند. قوانين با استفاده از اطلاعات سنتاکتيکي در مورد اليپسيس و پيش\u200cاندازش در ادبيات نظريه\u200cي زبان\u200cشناسي قبل در مورد NPE بحث شده\u200cاند. به اضافه، ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای محکوم از 337 جمله از منابع شناخته شده، قابل اعتماد آماده می\u200cکنیم که با نمونه\u200cهای مثبت و منفی NPE وجود دارد. ما این مجموعه داده ها را به دو قسمت تقسیم کردیم، و از یک قسمت استفاده کردیم تا قوانین ما و دیگر را تغییر دهیم تا عملکرد سیستم نهایی ما را آزمایش کنیم. ما یک نمونه F1 از 76.47 درصد برای کشف و 70.27 درصد برای کشف NPE در مجموعه آزمایش می گیریم. برای بهترین دانش ما، اولین سیستم ما است که NPE را در انگلیسی شناسایی و حل می کند. مجموعه داده\u200cهای کوچک برای این کار، هر چند کوچک، مختلف پرونده\u200cهای NPE را پوشانده می\u200cشود و برای کار آینده عمومی می\u200cشود.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wa riwaya, unaohusika na kodi kwa ajili ya kutambua na suluhisho la Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) kwa Kiingereza. Mfumo huo unachukua ujumbe wa kuandika kwa Kiingereza bure, unagundua tovuti ya elimu ya utekelezaji, na kama sasa, anachagua wagombea wagombea wa tano. Sheria zinajengwa kwa kutumia taarifa za ushirikiano kuhusu upelelezi na matukio yake yaliyojadiliwa katika fasihi ya lugha zilizopita za kitaaluma kwenye mtandao wa NPE. Kwa nyongeza, tunaandaa seti ya taarifa zilizofungwa kwa hukumu 337 kutoka vyanzo vinavyofahamika vizuri, yenye sampuli chanya na hasi za NPE. Tumegawanya taarifa hii katika sehemu mbili, na tunatumia sehemu moja ya kutafuta sheria zetu na mwingine ili kujaribu utendaji wa mfumo wetu wa mwisho. Tunapata nafasi ya F1 ya asilimia 76.47 kwa ajili ya kutambua na asilimia 70.27 kwa ajili ya suluhisho la NPE kwenye seti hiyo. Kwa ufahamu mzuri zaidi, ni mfumo wa kwanza unaotambua na kutatua NPE kwa Kiingereza. Taarifa zilizofungiwa kwa ajili ya kazi hii, ingawa ndogo, zinazungumzia matukio mengi ya NPE na yatatangaza hadharani kwa ajili ya kazi za baadaye.', 'ko': '본고는 문법에 기반한 새로운 영어 명사 단어 생략 자동 검측과 해석 시스템을 묘사한다.이 시스템은 무료로 입력한 영문 텍스트를 받아 명사성 생략의 위치를 탐지하고 존재하면 잠재적인 선행 후보를 선택한다.이러한 규칙은 이전에 NPE에 관한 이론적 언어학 문헌에서 논의한 생략과 선행어의 문법 정보를 이용하여 세워진 것이다.또한 NPE의 양성과 음성 샘플이 포함된 337개의 믿을 만한 출처의 문장으로 구성된 기획 데이터 집합을 준비했다.우리는 이 데이터 집합을 두 부분으로 나누는데, 한 부분은 규칙을 보완하는 데 사용되고, 다른 한 부분은 최종 시스템의 성능을 테스트하는 데 사용된다.테스트 세트에서 우리의 F1 검사 점수는 76.47%, NPE 해상도는 70.27% 였다.우리가 알기로는 NPE를 영어로 감지하고 해결하는 첫 번째 시스템입니다.이 임무에 사용되는 기획 데이터 세트는 작지만 다양한 NPE 사례를 포괄해 향후 사업에서 공개할 예정이다.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz Ady Fraz Ellipsis (NPE) iňlisçe awtomatik a ňlamak we çözümlenmek üçin bir roman, syntaks tabanly sistemini tassyýar. Sistem boş gaýd edilen iňlisçe metini alan, adli elisiýanyň meýdançasyny tanaýar we eger bu ýerde bolsa, potansiyel terjimeçilikleri saýlar. Döwletler ellipsi barada syntaktik maglumatlary we onuň öňki teoriýa dil edebiýatynda gürrüň edilýän döwletleri ulanýar. Hemişe, bilinen, güýçli çeşmelerden 337 sany çözümleri bejerdik. NPE'yň pozitif we negatif nusgalary bardyr. Bu veri setini iki parçaya böldük ve kurallarımızı düzeltmek için bir parçayı kullandık ve diğerini son sistemimizin eserini test etmek için kullandık. F1 अंश 76.47% deňlenmek üçin we NPE çözümlenmesi üçin 70.27% deňlenýäris. Bilgimiziň iň gowy ýoly üçin, biziň ilkinji sistemimiz NPE'i iňlisçe tanap we çözjek sistemimizdir. Bu zadyň üçin ullanýan metin setirini, alba kiçi, NPE döwletlerini örän görnüşdirýär we gelejek işi üçin jemgyýetli halk edilýär.", 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe 'n roman, sintaks- gebaseerde stelsel vir outomatiese opdecking en resolusie van Noun Frase Ellipsis (NPE) in Engels. NAME OF TRANSLATORS Die stelsel neem in vry invoer Engels teks, beskry die tuiste van nominale elisie, en indien dit vandag, kies potensieele antecedente kandidate. Die reëls word gebou deur die sintaktieke inligting van ellipsies en sy antecedente wat in vorige teorieese lingwisiese literasie op NPE gespreek is. In addition, we prepare a curated dataset of 337 sentences from well known, reliable sources, containing positive and negative samples of NPE. Ons deel hierdie datastel in twee dele, en gebruik een deel om ons reëls en die ander te refineer om die prestasie van ons eindelike stelsel te probeer. Ons kry 'n F1- telling van 76. 47% vir opdekking en 70. 27% vir NPE-oplossing op die teststel. Op die beste van ons kennis is ons die eerste stelsel wat NPE in Engels ontdek en oplos. Die uitgevoerde datastel gebruik word vir hierdie taak, albeit klein, bedek 'n wyde verskillende NPE gevalle en sal openbaar word vir toekomstige werk.", 'sq': 'Ky artikull përshkruan një sistem të ri, të bazuar në sintaksi për zbulimin dhe zgjidhjen automatike të Numër Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) në anglisht. Sistemi merr tekstin anglez të hyrjes së lirë, zbulon vendin e eliksionit nominal dhe nëse është i pranishëm, zgjedh kandidatë të mundshëm të mëparshëm. Rregullat ndërtohen duke përdorur informacionin sintaktik mbi elipsin dhe antecedentet e tij diskutuar në literaturën e mëparshme teorike gjuhësore mbi NPE. Përveç kësaj, ne përgatisim një grup të dhënash të kuruara prej 337 fjalësh nga burime të njohura dhe të besueshme, që përmbajnë mostra pozitive dhe negative të NPE. Ne e ndajmë këtë grup të dhënash në dy pjesë, dhe përdorim një pjesë për të rafinuar rregullat tona dhe tjetrën për të testuar performancën e sistemit tonë përfundimtar. Kemi një rezultat F1 prej 76.47% për zbulim dhe 70.27% për rezolutë NPE në testset. Për më të mirën e njohurive tona, jona është sistemi i parë që zbulon dhe zgjidh NPE në anglisht. Të dhënat e kuruara të përdorura për këtë detyrë, edhe pse të vogla, mbulojnë një varietet të gjerë rastesh NPE dhe do të bëhen publike për punën e ardhshme.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም በንግግሊዝኛ የኖኖን ፊርስ Ellipsis (NPE) የራሱ ማግኘት እና ማስታወቂያውን የሲንካስብ ስርዓት ይናገራል፡፡ ሲስተምሩ ነፃ የኢንጂልኛ ጽሑፍ እንዲወስድ፣ የግልፅ መረጃውን ያስታውቃል፡፡ The rules are built using the syntactic information on ellipsis and its antecedent discussed in previous theoretical linguistics literature on NPE.  በተጨማሪም፣ የNPE ምሳሌዎች የሆኑና የተታመነ የ337 የዳታ ጽሑፎችን እናዘጋጅታለን፡፡ ይህንን ዳታሮችን በሁለት ክፍሎች እና አንዱን ክፍል ለሥርዓታችን እና ሁለተኛውን የፍጻሜውን ስርዓት ለመፈተን እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የ76.47 በመቶ የF1 ነጥብ አግኝተናል፡፡ በአውቀታችን ለመሻለል፣ የNPE በንግግሊዝኛ መፍታት እና የመጀመሪያ ስርዓት ነው፡፡ ለዚህ ስራ የሚጠቀሙት የዳታ setup፣ ትንሽ ቢሆንም፣ የNPE ጉዳዮች በተለየ ቁጥጥር ይሸፍናል እናም ለፊት ለፊት ሥራው የተገለጸ ይደረጋሉ፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է անգլերենով նոր, սինտաքսի հիմնված համակարգ, որը օգտագործում է Անգլերենով բացահայտելու և լուծելու համար: The system takes in free input English text, detects the site of nominal elision, and if present, selects potential antecedent candidates.  Կանոնները կառուցվում են օգտագործելով էլիպսիայի սինտակտիկ ինֆորմացիան և դրա նախկինում քննարկված նախորդ լեզվաբանական գրականության մեջ, որը վերաբերում է ՆԵՊ-ին: Additionally, we prepare a curated dataset of 337 sentences from well-known, reliable sources, containing positive and negative samples of NPE.  Մենք բաժանում ենք այս տվյալների համակարգը երկու մասի, և օգտագործում ենք մեկ մասը մեր կանոնները բարելավելու համար, իսկ մյուսը՝ մեր վերջնական համակարգի արդյունավետությունը ստուգելու համար: Մենք ստանում ենք F1-գնահատականը 76.47 տոկոսի դետեկտիվացիայի համար, իսկ 70.27 տոկոսի դեպքում՝ թեստային համակարգի համար: Մեր գիտելիքներից լավագույնն այն է, որ մեր առաջին համակարգը է, որը հայտնաբերում է և լուծում է ՆՊԵ-ը անգլերենում: Այս խնդրի համար օգտագործվող, չնայած փոքր, կորտերացված տվյալների համակարգը ներառում է բազմաթիվ ՆՊԵ-ի դեպքեր և հանրային կդարձնի ապագա աշխատանքի համար:', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সনাক্ত এবং সিন্যাক্স ভিত্তিক সিস্টেমের বর্ণনা করা হয়েছে ইংরেজি ভাষায় নুন ফ্রেস এলিপিস (N এই সিস্টেম মুক্ত ইনপুট ট ইংরেজী লেখায় নির্বাচন করে, নিয়মিত এলিশনের সাইট খুঁজে পাওয়া যায়, এবং যদি বর্তমানে থাকে, সম্ভাব্য প্রা এই নিয়ম নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে এলিপসিস এবং এর পূর্ববর্তী থিওরিকেল ভাষার সাহিত্যে আলোচনা করা হয়েছে। এছাড়াও আমরা ৩৩৭ টি বিশ্বস্ত সূত্র থেকে একটি সুরক্ষিত তথ্য সেট প্রস্তুত করি, যার মধ্যে এনপের ইতিবাচক এবং নেতিবাচক নমুনা রয়েছে। আমরা এই ডাটাসেটকে দুই অংশে ভাগ করে দিয়েছি, আর একটা অংশ ব্যবহার করি আমাদের শেষ ব্যবস্থার প্রভাব পরীক্ষা করার জন্য। আমাদের পরীক্ষার সিদ্ধান্তের জন্য ৭৬. ৪৭ শতাংশ এনপের সিদ্ধান্তের জন্য ৭৭. আমাদের জ্ঞানের সবচেয়ে ভালোর জন্য, আমাদের প্রথম সিস্টেম যা ইংরেজি ভাষায় এনপিকে সন্ধান করে এবং সমাধান করে। The curated dataset used for this task, albeit small, covers a wide variety of NPE cases and will be made public for future work.', 'az': "Bu kağıt, İngilizce dilində Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) təşkil etmək və çözünürlük üçün roman, sintaks tabanlı sistemi təsbir edir. Sistem sərbəst İngilizə metini alır, nominal elision in sitəsini tanıyır, və əgər orada olsa, potensial öndəlikli kandidələri seçir. Bu kurallar ellipsi haqqında sintaktik bilgi və NPE barəsində əvvəlki teoriki dil edebiyatından mübahisə edilən antezidentlərin vasitəsilə in şa edilir. Əksinə, NPE pozitif və negatif nümunələri barəsində bilinmiş, güvenilir kaynaqlardan 337 cümlələr təmizlənmiş verilən verilən qutusu hazırlamışıq. Biz bu verilən quruluğu iki parçaya bölüşdük, bir parçayı aramızı düzəltmək üçün və digərini son sistemimizin performansını sınamaq üçün istifadə edirik. İnşallah üçün 76,47%-li F1 dəyişdirilir və NPE çözünürlüyü üçün 70,27%-li NPE dəyişdirilir. Bizim elmimizin ən yaxşısına görə, NPE'yi İngilizce kimi tanıyan və çəkən ilk sistemimizdir. Bu işin üçün istifadə edilən müəyyən verilən qurğu, hətta kiçik olsa da, çoxlu NPE vəziyyətlərini örtür və gələcək işin halına çıxarılacaq.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje roman, sintaksički sistem za automatski otkrivanje i rješenje Noun Frase Ellipsis (NPE) na engleskom jeziku. Sistem uzima slobodan engleski tekst, otkriva mjesto nominalne elizije, a ako je prisutno, odabere potencijalne kandidate za predsjednik. Pravila se izgrađuju koristeći sintaktičke informacije o elipsima i njegovom predsjedniku koji su razgovarali u prethodnoj teorijskoj lingvističkoj literaturi o NPE-u. Osim toga, pripremili smo zaključanu setu podataka od 337 rečenica iz poznatih, pouzdanih izvora, sadržavajući pozitivne i negativne uzorke NPE-a. Podijelili smo ovu setu podataka u dva dijela, i koristili jedan dio kako bi popravili naše pravila i drugo kako bi testirali učinkovitost našeg konačnog sistema. Dobili smo F1 rezultat 76,47% za otkrivanje i 70,27% za rezoluciju NPE na testu. Najbolje od naših znanja, naš je prvi sistem koji otkriva i reši NPE na engleskom jeziku. Uskrsnut set podataka koji se koristi za ovaj zadatak, iako mali, pokriva široku razinu slučajeva NPE-a i biće objavljen za budući rad.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu un nou sistema basat en sintaxis per la detecció automàtica i resolució de Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE) en anglès. El sistema entra gratuïtament en text anglès, detecta el lloc de l'elisió nominal, i si és present, selecciona candidats potencials anteriors. Les regles es construeixen utilitzant la informació sinàctica sobre l'elipsi i el seu antecedent discutit en literatura teòrica lingüística anterior sobre NPE. A més, preparam un conjunt de dades curats de 337 frases de fonts conegudes i fiables, que contenen mostres positives i negatives de NPE. Dividim aquest conjunt de dades en dues parts, i utilitzem una part per refinar les nostres regles i l'altra per provar el rendiment del nostre sistema final. Tenim una puntuació F1 del 76,47% per a la detecció i del 70,27% per a la resolució NPE en el conjunt de tests. Per millor que sabem, el nostre és el primer sistema que detecta i resol NPE en anglès. El conjunt de dades curats utilitzat per aquesta tasca, encara que petit, cobreix una gran varietat de casos de NPE i serà publicat per a treballar futurament.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse uut süntaksipõhist süsteemi substantiivfraasi ellipsi (NPE) automaatseks tuvastamiseks ja eralduseks inglise keeles. Süsteem võtab sisse vaba ingliskeelse teksti, tuvastab nominaalse elisiooni koha ja valib olemasolu korral potentsiaalsed eelnevad kandidaadid. Reeglid on ehitatud kasutades ellipsi ja selle eelneva süntaktilist informatsiooni, mida on käsitletud eelmises teoreetilises keeleteaduslikus kirjanduses NPE kohta. Lisaks valmistame ette 337 lausest koosneva kureeritud andmekogumi tuntud, usaldusväärsetest allikatest, mis sisaldavad NPE positiivseid ja negatiivseid proove. Jagame selle andmekogumi kaheks osaks ja kasutame üht osa reeglite täpsustamiseks ja teist lõpliku süsteemi jõudluse testimiseks. Me saame F1-skoori 76,47% tuvastamise ja 70,27% NPE resolutsiooni testikomplekti. Meie teadmiste kohaselt on meie esimene süsteem, mis tuvastab ja lahendab NPE inglise keeles. Selleks ülesandeks kasutatav kureeritud andmekogum, ehkki väike, hõlmab mitmesuguseid mittetäiendavate haiguste juhtumeid ja avalikustatakse edaspidiseks tööks.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje nový systém založený na syntaxi pro automatickou detekci a rozlišení podstatné fráze Ellipsis (NPE) v angličtině. Systém přijímá volný vstup anglického textu, detekuje místo nominální eliminace a pokud je přítomen, vybere potenciální předchozí kandidáty. Pravidla jsou sestavena na základě syntaktických informací o elipsie a jejím předchůdci diskutovaných v předchozí teoretické lingvistické literatuře o NPE. Kromě toho připravujeme kurátorovaný datový soubor 337 vět ze známých, spolehlivých zdrojů, obsahující pozitivní i negativní vzorky NPE. Tento datový soubor rozdělíme na dvě části a používáme jednu část k upřesnění našich pravidel a druhou k testování výkonnosti našeho konečného systému. Získáme F1 skóre 76,47% pro detekci a 70,27% pro NPE rozlišení na testu. Podle našich nejlepších znalostí je náš první systém, který detekuje a řeší NPE v angličtině. Kurátovaný datový soubor použitý pro tento úkol, i když malý, pokrývá širokou škálu případů NPE a bude zveřejněn pro budoucí práci.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan uusi syntaksipohjainen järjestelmä substantiivinen lauseen ellipsin (NPE) automaattiseen havaitsemiseen ja resoluutioon englanniksi. Järjestelmä ottaa vastaan maksuttoman englanninkielisen tekstin, havaitsee nimelliseliision paikan ja valitsee mahdolliset edeltäjät. Säännöt on rakennettu käyttäen syntaktista tietoa ellipsistä ja sen edeltäjistä, joita on käsitelty aiemmassa teoreettisessa kielitieteellisessä kirjallisuudessa NPE:stä. Lisäksi laadimme 337 lauseen kuratoidun aineiston tunnetuista, luotettavista lähteistä, jotka sisältävät positiivisia ja negatiivisia näytteitä NPE:stä. Jaamme tämän aineiston kahteen osaan ja käytämme yhtä osaa sääntöjemme tarkentamiseen ja toista lopullisen järjestelmämme suorituskyvyn testaamiseen. F1-pisteet ovat 76,47% havaitsemisesta ja 70,27% NPE-resoluutiosta testisarjassa. Tietojemme mukaan meidän on ensimmäinen järjestelmä, joka havaitsee ja ratkaisee NPE:n englanniksi. Tässä tehtävässä käytetty koottu aineisto, vaikkakin pieni, kattaa laajan valikoiman NPE-tapauksia ja julkaistaan tulevaa työtä varten.', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah sing rambaran, sistem sing basa nang sampek tresno lan ditambah automatik sing nggambar Nyong Prase Alipse (NBE) lan nganggos Inggris. Sistem saiki ngeweh seneng pisar sing wis ana ing nggambar, akeh dolanan ping mbut sing apik, lan uga sapa nik saiki, wisata perangkat sabên pengguna sing apik. Golembak dituruti nggawe barang kelangan seneng pisan kelangan banjur sedhaya karo nggawe barang kelangan seneng pisan kelangan theoretik dhéwé kuwi NPA. Mungkin, awak dhéwé ngerasakno dadi supar biasa ProgressBarUpdates Awak dhéwé éntuk dataset iki banget kanggo sampek durung, lan gunakake sistem sing beraksi perusahaan kanggo nggawe barang iki banget kanggo bisa diantekak sistem tuku kanggo ngwala Awak dhéwé wis nambah F1-kaliwat kanggo 75.7% kebutuhan lan 75.7% kebutuhan NPA ditambah ujian. Awakdhéwé sing paling awak dhéwé, awak dhéwé kuwi sistem sing mbéwé kuwi nggawe lan kepengin NPI kanggo inggiles. Sampeyan dataset sing dipunanggé kanggo nggawe task iki, sampeyan kiye mpeg, akeh dumateng kapan mulalah sing kalah di NPI lan uga bakal ngetokake publik kanggo awak dhéwé.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר מערכת רומן, מבוססת על סינטקס לגילוי אוטומטי ולפתרון של אליפסיס פרזיה משפחתית (NPE) באנגלית. המערכת לוקחת טקסט אנגלי כניסה חינם, מגלה את אתר השליטה הנמיונית, ואם נמצאת, בוחרת מועמדים פוטנציאליים בעבר. החוקים נבנים באמצעות המידע הסינטקטי על אליפסיס והקודם שלה ששוחח בספרות שפתית תיאורטית קודמת על NPE. בנוסף, אנו מכינים קבוצת נתונים מטופלת של 337 משפטים ממקורים ידועים ומאמינים, שמכילים דגימות חיוביות ושליליות של NPE. אנחנו מחלקים את המידע הזה לשני חלקים, ולהשתמש בחלק אחד כדי לשפר את החוקים שלנו והשני כדי לבדוק את ההפעה של המערכת הסופית שלנו. אנחנו מקבלים נקודת F1 של 76.47% עבור זיהוי ו-70.27% עבור פיתרון NPE על המבחן. למיטב הידע שלנו, שלנו היא המערכת הראשונה שמגלה ופתור NPE באנגלית. קבוצת הנתונים המבוססת שמשתמשת למשימה הזאת, למרות קטנה, מכסה מגוון רחב של מקרים NPE ויוציא לציבור לעבודה עתידית.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje nov sistem, ki temelji na sintaksi za samodejno zaznavanje in ločljivost samostalne fraze elipsis (NPE) v angleščini. Sistem sprejme prosto vhodno angleško besedilo, zazna mesto nominalne elizije in, če je prisoten, izbere potencialne predhodne kandidate. Pravila so zgrajena s sintaktičnimi informacijami o elipsi in njenih predhodnikih, obravnavanimi v prejšnji teoretični jezikoslovni literaturi o NPE. Poleg tega smo pripravili kuriran nabor podatkov 337 stavkov iz znanih, zanesljivih virov, ki vsebujejo pozitivne in negativne vzorce NPE. Ta nabor podatkov razdelimo na dva dela in uporabljamo enega dela za izboljšanje naših pravil, drugega pa za testiranje učinkovitosti našega končnega sistema. Dobimo rezultat F1 76,47% za zaznavanje in 70,27% za ločljivost NPE na testnem kompletu. Po našem znanju je naš prvi sistem, ki zaznava in rešuje NPE v angleščini. Kurirani nabor podatkov, ki se uporablja za to nalogo, čeprav majhen, zajema široko paleto primerov NPE in bo javno objavljen za prihodnje delo.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na faɗa ɗa wani salon da aka ƙayyade na takardar kowace wa gano farat ɗaya da buƙata masu buƙata Nau'a Tebur Tebur (NPA) cikin Ingiriya. @ info: whatsthis An samar da sharĩ'a don a yi amfani da information na syntactic on eliptis da ake yi wa ajalinsa na zaman littãfin littafin da aka yi wa NPA. Da haka, za mu yi tattali da wani tsari na danne da 337 daga sourcen da ake sani, wanda yana da misãlai masu raɗa ɗi da negative na NPA. Mu raba wannan database-set cikin biyu, kuma Mu yi amfani da rabo guda dõmin ya gyãra kanmu da ɗayan, dõmin ya jarraba aikin tsarin na ƙarami. Tuna sami wata F1-nau'i na 76.47 matsayin ya gano kuma asilimi 70.27 za'a sami rayin NPA a kan jarraba. To the best of our knowledge, ours is the first system that detects and resolves NPE in English.  An kuranye tsarin da aka yi amfani da wa wannan aikin, kuma kõ da ƙarami, yana rufe wasu masu amfani da NPA masu yawa kuma za'a bayyana su ga aikin nan gaba.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྟོགས་བཤེར་དང་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་གཞི་བྱས་པའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་Noun Phrase Ellipsis (NPE)ཡི་གེ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་པ མ་ལག་གིས་རང་དབང་ཡིག་གི་ཚིག་ཡིག་ནང་དུ་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་བྱེད་པ་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཐོག་གནས་ཚུལ་རྟོགས་པ་དང་། The rules are built using the syntactic information on ellipsis and its antecedent discussed in previous theoretical linguistics literature on NPE. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་པའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་སྐྱོན་རུང་བའི་ཚིག་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་337་ཚིག་གི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་རྩ་སྒྲིག་གི་བྲིས ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འདི་ཆ་ཤས་གཉིས་བར་ཤས་བྱས། དེ་ལས་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་ཁྲིམས་སྲོལ་དང་གཞན་པོ་གཉིས་ལ་མ ང་ཚོས་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པའི་F1-ཚད་ལ་76.47% ཡིན་པས། དཔྱད་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་NPE་ཡི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ལ་70.27%. ང་ཚོའི་ཆ་ཤེས་ཚད་ལྡན་ཤེས་མཁན་པ་དེ་ལ། ང་ཚོ་ནི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་ནང་གི་NPE བྱ་འགུལ་འདིའི་དོན་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་འོད་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'Is Similarity Visually Grounded? Computational Model of Similarity for the Estonian language', 'ar': 'هل التشابه متأصل بصريًا؟ نموذج تشابه حسابي للغة الإستونية', 'pt': 'A semelhança é visualmente fundamentada? Modelo computacional de similaridade para a língua estoniana', 'es': '¿La similitud se basa visualmente? Modelo computacional de similitud para el idioma estonio', 'fr': 'La similitude est-elle visuellement fondée\xa0? Modèle informatique de similitude pour la langue estonienne', 'ja': '類似性は視覚的にグラウンディングされていますか？エストニア語の類似性の計算モデル', 'hi': 'क्या समानता नेत्रहीन आधार पर है? एस्टोनियाई भाषा के लिए समानता के कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडल', 'zh': '相似性视接地气乎? 爱沙尼亚语相似性之数也', 'ru': 'Является ли сходство визуально обоснованным? Вычислительная модель сходства для эстонского языка', 'ga': 'An bhfuil Cosúlacht Fréamhaithe ag Amharc? Samhail Ríomhaireachta Cosúlachta don teanga Eastóinis', 'el': 'Είναι η ομοιότητα οπτικά γειωμένη; Υπολογιστικό μοντέλο ομοιότητας για την εσθονική γλώσσα', 'hu': 'A hasonlóság vizuálisan megalapozott? Az észt nyelv hasonlóságának számítási modellje', 'ka': 'თჱდლვეარვლნჲჟრ ლთ ვ გთზნჲ ოჲფთნარა? Name', 'it': 'La somiglianza è a terra visiva? Modello computazionale di somiglianza per la lingua estone', 'kk': 'Оқиғалығы көрінетін түсіргені бе? Эстония тілінің ұқсастығының компьютерлік үлгісі', 'lt': 'Ar panašumas pagrįstas regėjimu? Estų kalbos panašumo skaičiavimo modelis', 'mk': 'Дали сличноста е визуелно основана? Компутационен модел на сличност за естонскиот јазик', 'ms': 'Is Similarity Visually Grounded?  Name', 'ml': 'ഇതുപോലെയാണോ കാഴ്ചപ്പെട്ടത്? എസ്റ്റോണിയന്\u200d ഭാഷയ്ക്കുള്ള സമമായതിന്റെ കണക്കൂട്ട് മോഡല്\u200d', 'mt': 'Is-Similarità hija Mibnija Viswalment? Computational Model of Similarity for the Estonian language', 'mn': 'Тэнцүү байдал харагдаж байдаг уу? Эстонийн хэл дээр төстэй тооны загвар', 'no': 'Er likninga visuelt grunnet? Computational Model of Similarity for the Estonian language', 'ro': 'Similaritatea este pedepsită vizual? Model computațional de similitudine pentru limba estonă', 'pl': 'Czy podobieństwo jest wizualnie uziemione? Model obliczeniowy podobieństwa dla języka estońskiego', 'sr': 'Da li je sliènost Visualno Grounded? Kompjuterski model sličnosti Estonskog jezika', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dයතාවය ප්\u200dරදේශ විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙනවද? Name', 'so': 'Ma isku mid baa aragnimada? Modeel of Similarity for the Estonian language', 'sv': 'Är likhet visuellt grundad? Beräkningsmodell för likhet för det estniska språket', 'ta': 'பார்வையில் போன்ற பார்வையாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளதா? Name', 'ur': 'کیا اِس طرح کی مثال آنکھوں سے بڑھی ہوئی ہے؟ اسٹونی زبان کے لئے برابری کی کمپیوٹریشن موڈل', 'uz': 'Name Name', 'vi': 'Không thấy tương đồng không? Tính cách tương đồng ngôn ngữ Estonia', 'bg': 'Приликите визуално основани ли са? Изчислителен модел на сходство за естонския език', 'da': 'Er lighed visuelt begrundet? Beregningsmodel for lighed for det estiske sprog', 'hr': 'Da li je sličnost vizualno ugrožena? Računalni model sličnosti Estonskog jezika', 'nl': 'Is gelijkenis visueel geaard? Computermodel van gelijkenis voor de Estse taal', 'fa': 'آيا شباهت به نظر ميرسه؟ Model computational of Similarity for the Estonian language', 'de': 'Ist Ähnlichkeit visuell geerdet? Computermodell der Ähnlichkeit für die estnische Sprache', 'sw': 'Je, Ukosefu umeangushwa kwa kuonekana? Modeli ya Hesabu kwa lugha ya Estonia', 'id': 'Apakah Similarity Visually Grounded? Model Komputasi Simulasi untuk bahasa Estonia', 'ko': '유사성은 시각적으로 근거가 있습니까?에스토니아어 유사성 계산 모델', 'af': 'Is Similarity Visuel Grounded? Computational Model of Similarity for the Estonian language', 'sq': 'A është ngjashmëria e themeluar në mënyrë vizuale? Modeli kompjuterik i ngjashmërisë për gjuhën estone', 'tr': 'Görünüşe göre meňzeşlik gabdalymy? Estoniýanyň dili üçin ýakynlaşyk modi', 'az': 'M톛g톛r b톛nz톛r g칬r칲n칲ml칲 b칬y칲kl칲k edir? Estonya dilinin b톛nz톛rinin computational Modeli', 'bn': 'একই রকম কি দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিত? এস্তোনিয়ান ভাষার সমতার মোডেল', 'bs': 'Da li je sličnost vizualno ugrožena? Računalni model sličnosti Estonskog jezika', 'am': 'ብጤ እየራቀ ነው? አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք նմանությունը տեսողական պատճառով է: Էստոնական լեզու նմանության համակարգչային մոդելը', 'ca': 'És la Similaritat Visual Grounded? Model computacional de Similarity for the Estonian language', 'fi': 'Onko samankaltaisuus visuaalisesti pohjautunut? Laskennallinen malli samankaltaisuudesta viron kielellä', 'cs': 'Je podobnost vizuálně uzemněna? Výpočetní model podobnosti pro estonský jazyk', 'et': 'Kas sarnasus on visuaalselt põhjendatud? Eesti keele sarnasuse arvutuslik mudel', 'jv': 'Opo sampeyan ngerti apa ora ? Sample Komputer Sampeyan kanggo langgar Esotono', 'sk': 'Je podobnost vizualno označena? Računalniški model podobnosti za estonski jezik', 'ha': 'Shin, akwai misãlin wanda yake gani? Computational Model of Similarity for the Estonian language', 'bo': 'དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་སྒྲིག་པ་ཡིན་ནམ། ཨིས་ཊོ་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལ་མཉམ་འབྱུང་བའི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་མ་དབྱིབས།', 'he': 'האם דמיון מבחינה חזותית? Computational Model of Similarity for the Estonian language'}
{'en': 'Researchers in Computational Linguistics build models of similarity and test them against human judgments. Although there are many empirical studies of the computational models of similarity for the English language, the similarity for other languages is less explored. In this study we are chiefly interested in two aspects. In the first place we want to know how much of the human similarity is grounded in the visual perception. To answer this question two neural computer vision models are used and their correlation with the human derived similarity scores is computed. In the second place we investigate if language influences the similarity computation. To this purpose diverse computational models trained on Estonian resources are evaluated against human judgments', 'ar': 'يبني الباحثون في علم اللغة الحاسوبي نماذج تشابه ويختبرونها ضد الأحكام البشرية. على الرغم من وجود العديد من الدراسات التجريبية للنماذج الحسابية للتشابه في اللغة الإنجليزية ، إلا أن التشابه بين اللغات الأخرى لم يتم استكشافه. في هذه الدراسة نحن مهتمون بشكل رئيسي في جانبين. في المقام الأول نريد أن نعرف مقدار التشابه البشري المتأصل في الإدراك البصري. للإجابة على هذا السؤال ، تم استخدام نموذجين للرؤية الحاسوبية العصبية وتم حساب علاقتهما بدرجات التشابه المشتقة من الإنسان. في المقام الثاني ، نتحرى ما إذا كانت اللغة تؤثر على حساب التشابه. لهذا الغرض ، يتم تقييم النماذج الحسابية المتنوعة المدربة على الموارد الإستونية مقابل الأحكام البشرية', 'pt': 'Pesquisadores em Linguística Computacional constroem modelos de similaridade e os testam contra julgamentos humanos. Embora existam muitos estudos empíricos dos modelos computacionais de similaridade para a língua inglesa, a similaridade para outras línguas é menos explorada. Neste estudo estamos interessados principalmente em dois aspectos. Em primeiro lugar, queremos saber quanto da semelhança humana se baseia na percepção visual. Para responder a esta pergunta, dois modelos de visão computacional neural são usados e sua correlação com as pontuações de similaridade derivadas de humanos é calculada. Em segundo lugar, investigamos se a linguagem influencia o cálculo de similaridade. Para este fim, diversos modelos computacionais treinados em recursos estonianos são avaliados contra julgamentos humanos', 'es': 'Los investigadores de Lingüística Computacional construyen modelos de similitud y los prueban con los juicios humanos. Aunque hay muchos estudios empíricos de los modelos computacionales de similitud para el idioma inglés, la similitud para otros idiomas está menos explorada. En este estudio nos interesan principalmente dos aspectos. En primer lugar, queremos saber qué parte de la similitud humana se basa en la percepción visual. Para responder a esta pregunta, se utilizan dos modelos de visión artificial neuronal y se calcula su correlación con las puntuaciones de similitud derivadas del ser humano. En segundo lugar, investigamos si el lenguaje influye en el cálculo de similitudes. Con este fin, se evalúan diversos modelos computacionales entrenados en recursos estonios comparándolos con los juicios humanos.', 'fr': "Les chercheurs en linguistique computationnelle élaborent des modèles de similitude et les testent par rapport aux jugements humains. Bien qu'il existe de nombreuses études empiriques sur les modèles informatiques de similitude pour la langue anglaise, la similitude pour d'autres langues est moins explorée. Dans cette étude, nous nous intéressons principalement à deux aspects. Tout d'abord, nous voulons savoir dans quelle mesure la similitude humaine est fondée sur la perception visuelle. Pour répondre à cette question, deux modèles de vision neuronale par ordinateur sont utilisés et leur corrélation avec les scores de similarité dérivés de l'homme est calculée. Ensuite, nous cherchons à savoir si la langue influence le calcul de similarité. À cette fin, divers modèles informatiques formés sur des ressources estoniennes sont évalués par rapport à des jugements humains.", 'ja': '計算言語学の研究者は、類似性のモデルを構築し、人間の判断と照らし合わせてテストします。英語についての類似性の計算モデルについては多くの実証的研究があるが、他の言語についての類似性はあまり探求されていない。この研究では、主に2つの側面に関心があります。まず、人間の類似性のどれだけが視覚的知覚に基づいているかを知りたいと思います。この質問に答えるために、２つのニューラルコンピュータビジョンモデルが使用され、ヒト由来の類似性スコアとの相関が計算される。2番目に、言語が計算の類似性に影響を与えるかどうかを調査します。この目的のために、エストニアの資源について訓練された多様な計算モデルは、人間の判断に照らし合わせて評価される。', 'zh': '计语言学者立相似性模形,以人伦为试。 虽英语相似性算多实,而言语相似性索少。 于此论之,大抵两感。 先知人之相似性多少,盖视感知也。 为之对,用二神经计算机之形,而计其人类衍生之相似性数之相关性。 其次,论言语相似性计。 是以因人而断爱沙尼亚之资,以数质之。', 'hi': 'कम्प्यूटेशनल भाषाविज्ञान में शोधकर्ता समानता के मॉडल का निर्माण करते हैं और उन्हें मानव निर्णयों के खिलाफ परीक्षण करते हैं। यद्यपि अंग्रेजी भाषा के लिए समानता के कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडल के कई अनुभवजन्य अध्ययन हैं, अन्य भाषाओं के लिए समानता का कम पता लगाया गया है। इस अध्ययन में हम मुख्य रूप से दो पहलुओं में रुचि रखते हैं। सबसे पहले हम यह जानना चाहते हैं कि मानव समानता का कितना हिस्सा दृश्य धारणा में आधारित है। इस प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए दो तंत्रिका कंप्यूटर दृष्टि मॉडल का उपयोग किया जाता है और मानव व्युत्पन्न समानता स्कोर के साथ उनके सहसंबंध की गणना की जाती है। दूसरे स्थान पर हम जांच करते हैं कि क्या भाषा समानता गणना को प्रभावित करती है। इस उद्देश्य के लिए एस्टोनियाई संसाधनों पर प्रशिक्षित विविध कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडल का मूल्यांकन मानव निर्णय के खिलाफ किया जाता है', 'ru': 'Исследователи в области вычислительной лингвистики строят модели сходства и проверяют их на соответствие человеческим суждениям. Хотя существует множество эмпирических исследований вычислительных моделей сходства для английского языка, сходство для других языков изучается реже. В этом исследовании нас интересуют в основном два аспекта. Прежде всего, мы хотим знать, в какой степени человеческое сходство основано на зрительном восприятии. Для ответа на этот вопрос используют две модели нейронного компьютерного зрения и вычисляют их корреляцию с полученными от человека баллами сходства. Во-вторых, мы исследуем, влияет ли язык на вычисление сходства. С этой целью проводится оценка различных вычислительных моделей, подготовленных на основе эстонских ресурсов, с учетом человеческих суждений', 'ga': 'Tógann taighdeoirí sa Teangeolaíocht Ríomhaireachtúil samhlacha cosúlachta agus déanann siad tástáil orthu in aghaidh breithiúnais dhaonna. Cé go bhfuil go leor staidéir eimpíreacha ar shamhlacha ríomhaireachtúla cosúlachta don Bhéarla, is lú a dhéantar iniúchadh ar chosúlacht na dteangacha eile. Sa staidéar seo is mó suim againn in dhá ghné. Ar an gcéad dul síos ba mhaith linn a fháil amach cé mhéad den chosúlacht dhaonna atá bunaithe ar an dearcadh amhairc. Chun an cheist seo a fhreagairt úsáidtear dhá mhúnla fís ríomhaireachta néaracha agus ríomhtar a gcomhghaol leis na scóir cosúlachta díorthaithe daonna. Ar an dara dul síos déanaimid imscrúdú an bhfuil tionchar ag teanga ar ríomhaireacht na cosúlachta. Chuige seo déantar samhlacha ríomhaireachtúla ilghnéitheacha a gcuirtear oiliúint orthu ar acmhainní na hEastóine a mheas i gcoinne breithiúnas daonna', 'ka': 'კომპიუტაციონალური ლინგურისტიკაში მსწავლობელი მოდელები დააყენებენ და მათ ადამიანის გადაწყვეტილებისთვის შეცვლებენ. თუმცა კომპუტაციალური მოდელების განსხვავება ინგლისური ენაზე, სხვა ენათების განსხვავება უფრო ცოტა. ამ კვლევაში ჩვენ უფრო დაინტერესებულიან ორი აპექტებზე. პირველი ადგილას ვიცით, რამდენი ადამიანის განსხვავება ვიზუალური აღმოჩენებაში. ამ კითხვის გასაღებისთვის ორი ნეიროლური კომპიუტერის ხედვის მოდელები გამოყენება და მათი კორელაცია ადამიანის განვითარებული სწორეობის მოდელებით გამოყენება მეორე ადგილში ჩვენ შევსწავლობთ თუ ენაზე იქნება განსხვავებულობის კომპუტაციაზე. ამ მიზეზისთვის განსხვავებული კომპუტაციალური მოდელები, რომლებიც ესტონიური რესურსების შესახებ განსხვავებულია ადამიანის შესახებ', 'el': "Οι ερευνητές στην Υπολογιστική Γλωσσολογία κατασκευάζουν μοντέλα ομοιότητας και τα δοκιμάζουν σε σχέση με τις ανθρώπινες κρίσεις. Αν και υπάρχουν πολλές εμπειρικές μελέτες των υπολογιστικών μοντέλων ομοιότητας για την αγγλική γλώσσα, η ομοιότητα για άλλες γλώσσες είναι λιγότερο διερευνημένη. Στην παρούσα μελέτη μας ενδιαφέρουν κυρίως δύο πτυχές. Πρώτα απ' όλα θέλουμε να μάθουμε πόσο από την ανθρώπινη ομοιότητα βασίζεται στην οπτική αντίληψη. Για να απαντήσουμε σε αυτό το ερώτημα χρησιμοποιούνται δύο μοντέλα νευρωνικής όρασης υπολογιστών και υπολογίζεται η συσχέτισή τους με τα αποτελέσματα ομοιότητας που προκύπτουν από τον άνθρωπο. Στο δεύτερο μέρος ερευνούμε αν η γλώσσα επηρεάζει τον υπολογισμό ομοιότητας. Για το σκοπό αυτό αξιολογούνται διάφορα υπολογιστικά μοντέλα εκπαιδευμένα σε εσθονικούς πόρους βάσει ανθρώπινων κρίσεων", 'hu': 'A számítástechnikai nyelvészet kutatói a hasonlóság modelljeit építik fel és tesztelik őket emberi ítéletekkel szemben. Bár sok empirikus tanulmány létezik az angol nyelv hasonlóságának számítási modelljeiről, a többi nyelv hasonlóságát kevésbé vizsgálják. Ebben a tanulmányban elsősorban két szempont érdekel bennünket. Először is azt szeretnénk tudni, hogy az emberi hasonlóság mennyire alapul a vizuális észlelésben. A kérdés megválaszolásához két neurális számítógépes látómodellt használunk, amelyek összefüggését az emberi eredetű hasonlósági pontszámokkal számítjuk ki. Másodszor azt vizsgáljuk, hogy a nyelv befolyásolja-e a hasonlóság számítását. Ennek érdekében az észt erőforrásokra vonatkozó különböző számítástechnikai modellek értékelése emberi ítéletek alapján történik', 'it': "I ricercatori in Linguistica Computazionale costruiscono modelli di somiglianza e li testano contro i giudizi umani. Sebbene ci siano molti studi empirici sui modelli computazionali di somiglianza per la lingua inglese, la somiglianza per altre lingue è meno esplorata. In questo studio ci interessa principalmente due aspetti. In primo luogo vogliamo sapere quanto della somiglianza umana sia radicata nella percezione visiva. Per rispondere a questa domanda vengono utilizzati due modelli di visione neurale computerizzata e viene calcolata la loro correlazione con i punteggi di somiglianza derivati dall'uomo. In secondo luogo indaghiamo se il linguaggio influenza il calcolo della somiglianza. A tal fine vengono valutati diversi modelli computazionali formati sulle risorse estoni rispetto ai giudizi umani", 'lt': 'Kompiuterinės kalbos mokslininkai rengia panašumo modelius ir bando juos pagal žmogaus sprendimus. Nors egzistuoja daug empirinių skaičiavimo modelių panašumo anglų kalboje tyrimų, panašumas kitoms kalboms mažiau tiriamas. In this study we are chiefly interested in two aspects.  Pirmiausia norime žinoti, kiek žmogaus panašumo grindžiama regėjimo suvokimu. Atsakymui į šį klausimą naudojami du nervinio kompiuterio regėjimo modeliai ir apskaičiuojama jų koreliacija su žmogaus gautais panašumo rezultatais. Antra, mes tiriame, ar kalba daro įtaką panašumo skaičiavimui. Šiuo tikslu Estijos ištekliais parengti įvairūs skaičiavimo modeliai vertinami pagal žmogiškuosius sprendimus.', 'mk': 'Истражувачите во Компутационална Лингвистика градат модели на сличност и ги тестираат против човечките пресуди. Иако постојат многу емпирички студии на компјутерските модели на сличност за англискиот јазик, сличноста за другите јазици е помалку истражена. Во оваа студија сме главно заинтересирани за два аспекти. На прво место сакаме да знаеме колку од човечката сличност е основана на визуелната перцепција. За да се одговори на ова прашање се користат два модели на нервна компјутерска визија и нивната корелација со резултатите на човечката сличност се пресметуваат. In the second place we investigate if language influences the similarity computation.  За оваа цел различни компјутерски модели обучени на естонските ресурси се проценуваат според човечките пресуди', 'kk': 'Компьютерлік лингвистикалық зерттеушілер ұқсас үлгілерін құрып, адамдардың шешімдеріне қарсы сынап көреді. Бірақ ағылшын тіліне ұқсастық есептеу үлгілерінің көп эмпирикалық зерттеулері бар, басқа тілдердің ұқсастығы кем-кем зерттеулері. Бұл зерттеулерде екі аспекте қызықтық. Біріншіден біз адамдардың ұқсастығын көрінетін түсініктерде қанша түсінікті білуімізді қалаймыз. Бұл сұрақты жауап беру үшін екі невралдық компьютердің көрініс моделі қолданылады және олардың адамдардың ұқсас нөмірлерімен байланысты есептеледі. Екіншіден біз тілді ұқсас есептеуіне нәрсе беретінін зерттейміз. Бұл мақсат үшін Эстония ресурстарында оқылған әртүрлі компьютерлік моделдері адамдардың тәртіптеріне қарсы оқылған.', 'ms': 'Penyelidik dalam Bahasa Komputasi membina model persamaan dan menguji mereka terhadap penilaian manusia. Walaupun terdapat banyak kajian empirik tentang model perhitungan persamaan untuk bahasa Inggeris, persamaan untuk bahasa lain kurang dikenaluri. Dalam kajian ini kita terutama tertarik pada dua aspek. Pertama, kita mahu tahu berapa banyak persamaan manusia didasarkan dalam percepsi visual. Untuk menjawab soalan ini dua model penglihatan komputer saraf digunakan dan korelasi mereka dengan skor persamaan berasal dari manusia dikira. Di tempat kedua kita menyelidiki jika bahasa mempengaruhi perhitungan persamaan. Untuk tujuan ini, pelbagai model perhitungan dilatih pada sumber Estonia diantara penilaian manusia.', 'mt': 'Ir-riċerkaturi fil-Lingwistika tal-Komputazzjoni jibnu mudelli ta’ similarità u jittestjawhom kontra sentenzi umani. Għalkemm hemm ħafna studji empiriċi tal-mudelli komputattivi ta’ similarità għall-lingwa Ingliża, is-similarità għal lingwi oħra hija inqas esplorata. F’dan l-istudju aħna prinċipalment interessati f’żewġ aspetti. L-ewwel nett irridu nkunu jafu kemm is-similarità umana hija bbażata fuq il-perċezzjoni viżwali. Biex twieġeb għal din il-mistoqsija jintużaw żewġ mudelli ta’ viżjoni tal-kompjuter newrali u tiġi kkalkulata l-korrelazzjoni tagħhom mal-punteġġi ta’ similarità derivati mill-bniedem. Fit-tieni post ninvestigaw jekk il-lingwa taffettwax il-komputazzjoni ta’ similarità. Għal dan il-għan, mudelli komputattivi varji mħarrġa fuq riżorsi Estonjani huma evalwati kontra sentenzi umani', 'ml': 'കമ്പ്യൂട്ടിഷന്\u200d ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്സിലെ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d ഒരുപോലെയുള്ള മോഡല്\u200d പണിയുകയും മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിധ ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഭാഷയ്ക്ക് ഒരുപോലുള്ള കണക്കിട്ട മോഡലുകളുടെ കൂടുതല്\u200d ശാസ്ത്രം ഉണ്ടെങ്കിലും മറ്റു ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള സമമാണ് അന ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d താല്\u200dപര്യമുണ്ട്. ആദ്യത്തെ സ്ഥലത്ത് നമുക്ക് അറിയണം മനുഷ്യരുടെ സാമാന്യത്തില്\u200d എത്രയാണെന്ന്. ഈ ചോദ്യത്തിന് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d രണ്ടു പ്രാന്ത്രികമായ കമ്പ്യൂട്ടര്\u200d ദര്\u200dശന മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അവയുടെ ബന്ധം മനുഷ്യര്\u200d  In the second place we investigate if language influences the similarity computation.  അതിനുവേണ്ടിയാണ് എസ്തോണിയന്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട വ്യത്യസ്ത കണക്കൂട്ടല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d മനുഷ്', 'no': 'Forskere i computational Linguistics bygger modeller av likhet og tester dei mot menneske sprøytebrukar. Selv om det finst mange empiriske studiar av datamaskinen av liknande modeller for engelsk språk, er det mindre utforska similaritet for andre språk. I denne studien er vi hovudsakelig interessert i to aspektar. I det første stedet vil vi vite kor mykje av menneskeligheten er basert på den visuelle oppfatninga. For å svara på dette spørsmålet, vert to neurale datamaskinevisingsmodeller brukt, og korrelasjonen sin med menneskelige liknande poeng vert rekna ut. I den andre plassen undersøker vi dersom språk påvirkar liknande rekninga. For denne måten er diverse datamaskinermodeller trengte på Estanske ressursar evaluert mot menneske sprøytebrukar', 'mn': 'Компьютерийн лингвистикийн судлаачид адилхан загварыг бүтээж, хүний шүүмжүүдийн эсрэг шалгаж үздэг. Хэдийгээр Англи хэл дээр ижил төстэй тооны загварын маш олон эмперикийн судалгаа байдаг ч бусад хэл дээр ижил төстэй адилхан судалгаа бага байдаг. Энэ судалгаанд бид хоёр талаар их сонирхолтой. Эхлээд бид хүн төрөлхтний тэнцүү байдлыг харах ойлголтын тухай мэдэхийг хүсч байна. Энэ асуултыг харуулахын тулд хоёр мэдрэлийн компьютерийн харагдах загвар хэрэглэгддэг бөгөөд тэдний холбоотой адилхан тоонуудыг тооцоолж байна. Хоёрдугаарт бид хэл нь тэнцүү тооны нөлөөлдөг эсэхийг судалж байна. Энэ зорилго дээр Эстонийн баялаг дээр сургалтын маш олон тооны загварууд хүн төрөлхтний шүүмжлээс эсрэг үнэлдэг.', 'pl': 'Naukowcy z językownicy komputerowej budują modele podobieństwa i testują je na tle osądów ludzkich. Chociaż istnieje wiele empirycznych badań obliczeniowych modeli podobieństwa dla języka angielskiego, podobieństwo dla innych języków jest mniej zbadane. W tym opracowaniu interesują nas głównie dwa aspekty. Przede wszystkim chcemy wiedzieć, jak duża część ludzkiego podobieństwa opiera się na percepcji wizualnej. Aby odpowiedzieć na to pytanie, wykorzystuje się dwa neuronowe modele komputerowego widzenia i oblicza się ich korelację z wynikami podobieństwa pochodzącymi z człowieka. W drugim miejscu badamy, czy język wpływa na obliczenia podobieństwa. W tym celu oceniane są różnorodne modele obliczeniowe przeszkolone na zasobach estońskich na podstawie osądów ludzkich', 'ro': 'Cercetătorii în lingvistică computațională construiesc modele de similitudine și le testează împotriva judecăților umane. Deși există multe studii empirice ale modelelor computaționale de similitudine pentru limba engleză, similaritatea pentru alte limbi este mai puțin explorată. În acest studiu suntem interesați în principal de două aspecte. În primul rând vrem să știm cât de mult din similaritatea umană se bazează pe percepția vizuală. Pentru a răspunde la această întrebare se utilizează două modele de viziune neurală computerizată și se calculează corelația lor cu scorurile de similitudine derivate de om. În al doilea rând investigăm dacă limba influențează calculul similarității. În acest scop sunt evaluate diferite modele computaționale instruite pe resursele estoniene în raport cu judecățile umane', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ලින්ගිස්ටික් වල පරීක්ෂකයෝ මිනිස්සු විරුද්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා. ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාව සඳහා සමාන විදියට ගොඩක් අධ්\u200dයානයක් තියෙනවා නමුත්, අනිත් භාෂාව සඳහා සමාන විදියට පරීක් මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ අපිට ප්\u200dරධාන දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. මුලින්ම තැනට අපිට දැනගන්න ඕනේ මිනිස්සු වගේ කොච්චර වර්ගයක් දැනගන්න පුළුවන් දැනගන්න. මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයට උත්තර දෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා ඒ වගේම මිනිස්සුන දෙවෙනි තැනට අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ භාෂාව සමාන ගණනාකරණයට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා නම්. මේ අදහසට විවිධ පරික්ෂණ මනුස්ත්\u200dරයෙන් ඉස්ටෝනියාන් මුළු විරුද්ධ විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙනවා', 'so': "Baaritaanka koontarooyinka Linguistics waxay dhisaan tusaalooyin siman oo ay ku tijaabiyaan xukummada dadka. Inta kastoo ay leeyihiin waxbarasho badan oo ku saabsan tusaalooyin xisaabta ah oo isku mid ah luqada Ingiriiska, tusaale ahaan luuqadaha kale lama baahan karo. Waxbarashadan waxaan ugu xiiseynayaa laba dhinac. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu rabnaa inaannu ogaanno inta uu isku mid yahay dadka aragga lagu aasaasay. Si uu ugu jawaabo su'aalahan waxaa loo isticmaalaa laba tusaale oo muuqashada koobiyuutarka neurada ah, xiriirkoodana waxaa lagu xisaabiyaa iskuullada isku mid ah ee dadka. Goobta labaad waxaynu baaraynaa in luuqadu saameyn ku yeelan karo xisaabinta siman. Taas darteed waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa tusaalooyin kala duduwan oo lagu baray hantida Estoniya oo ka gees ah xukunka dadka", 'sv': 'Forskare inom datorlingvistik bygger modeller av likhet och testar dem mot mänskliga bedömningar. Även om det finns många empiriska studier av beräkningsmodeller av likhet för det engelska språket, är likheten för andra språk mindre utforskad. I denna studie är vi främst intresserade av två aspekter. Först och främst vill vi veta hur mycket av den mänskliga likheten är grundad i den visuella uppfattningen. För att besvara denna fråga används två neurala datorseende modeller och deras korrelation med mänskliga härledda likhetspoäng beräknas. För det andra undersöker vi om språket påverkar likhetsberäkningen. För detta ändamål utvärderas olika beräkningsmodeller utbildade på estniska resurser mot mänskliga bedömningar', 'sr': 'Istraživači u kompjuterskoj lingwistiki izgradili su modele sličnosti i testirali ih protiv ljudskih sudova. Iako ima mnogo empiričkih studija računalnih modela sličnosti engleskom jeziku, sličnost drugih jezika je manje istražena. U ovoj studiji smo prvo zainteresovani za dva aspekta. Prvo želimo znati koliko je ljudske sličnosti temeljeno na vizualnom percepciji. Da bi odgovorili na to pitanje, koriste se dva modela neuralnog kompjuterskog vizije i njihova korelacija sa ljudskim rezultatima sličnosti se računa. Na drugom mestu istražujemo ako jezik utiče na računalo sličnosti. Za ovu svrhu procjenjuju se različiti kompjuterski modeli obučeni na Estonskim resursima protiv ljudskih osuđenja', 'ta': 'கணிப்பு லிங்கிஸ்டில் உள்ள ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்கள் ஒரே மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்கி மனித த தீர்ப்புகளை எதிராக சோதிக் ஆங்கிலம் மொழிக்கு ஒத்த மாதிரிகளின் கணக்கீட்டு மாதிரிகளின் பல முக்கியமான படிப்புகள் இருந்தாலும் மற்ற மொழிகளுக்கு ஒத் இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில் நாம் முக்கியமாக இரண்டு பக்கங்களில் ஆர்வமாக இருக்கிறோம். முதல் இடத்தில் நாம் தெரிந்து கொள்ள விரும்புகிறோம் மனிதன் ஒப்பு எத்தனை பார்வையில் காணப்படுகிறது. இந்த கேள்விக்கு பதில் அளிக்க இரண்டு புதிய கணினி பார்வை மாதிரிகள் பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய தொடர்பு மனித உருவ இரண்டாவது இடத்தில் மொழி சமமான கணக்கில் பாதிக்கும் என்றால் நாம் ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம். இக்காரணத்திற்கு எஸ்தோனிய மூலங்களில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட பல கணக்கீட்டு மாதிரிகள் மனித த தீர்ப்புகளு', 'ur': 'کمپیوٹریشن لینگیستیک میں پھیرنے والوں نے برابری کے نمونے بنائے اور ان کو انسان کے فیصلے کے خلاف آزمائش کرتے ہیں. اگرچہ انگلیسی زبان کے مطالعہ کی کمپیوٹریسی موڈل کی بہت سی مطالعہ ہیں، اور دوسری زبانوں کے مطالعہ کم تحقیق کی جاتی ہے. اس مطالعہ میں ہم سب سے بڑھ کر دو قسموں سے علاقہ رکھتے ہیں۔ پہلی بار ہم جاننا چاہتے ہیں کہ انسان کی نسبت کس قدر سیدھی نظر میں رکھی جاتی ہے۔ اس سؤال کی جواب دینے کے لئے دو نورول کمپیوٹر ویزی موڈل استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں اور ان کا ارتباط انسان کے پیدا ہوئے مثالی اسکور سے محاسبہ کیا جاتا ہے۔ دوسری جگہ میں ہم تحقیق کرتے ہیں اگر زبان برابری کمپیوٹر پر اثر دیتی ہے۔ اس کے مطابق انسان کے فیصلے کے خلاف تعلیم کی گئی مختلف کمپیوٹریشن موڈل', 'uz': "Kompyuterlar Lingvistika taʼminlovchilar bir xil modellarni yaratadi va ularni inson xukunalarni ko'rsatadi. Ingliz tilning bir xil bir xil o'quvvat modellari haqida o'rganish mavjud. Boshqa tillarning bir xil o'quvvati qidirilmaydi. Bu o'qituvda biz ko'p ikki aspektlarda qiziqaramiz. Birinchi paytda, biz insonlarning ko'pchiligini ko'rinishga qancha ko'rinishini bilaman. Bu savol javob berish uchun ikki neyron kompyuterning koʻrinishi modellari ishlatiladi va ularning o'zlari bir xil qoʻllanmalar bilan bogʻliq hisoblanadi. In the second place we investigate if language influences the similarity computation.  Bu uchun Estoniya Resilitlarida o'rganilgan har xil kompyuterlar modellari inson xukunalarni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Các nhà nghiên cứu ngôn ngữ học tính xây dựng các mô hình giống nhau và thử họ dựa trên phán xét người. Mặc dù có rất nhiều nghiên cứu kinh nghiệm về mô hình tính tương tự của ngôn ngữ Anh, nhưng khả năng chung kết với ngôn ngữ khác vẫn ít được khám phá hơn. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi chủ yếu quan tâm đến hai khía cạnh. Trước hết, chúng tôi muốn biết mức độ giống nhau của loài người được dựa trên sự nhận thức thị giác. Để trả lời câu hỏi này, sẽ được sử dụng hai mô hình thần kinh trong máy tính và tương quan của chúng với điểm tương tự của con người được tính toán. Ở vị trí thứ hai, chúng tôi điều tra nếu ngôn ngữ ảnh hưởng đến tính người khác. Với mục đích này, các mô hình tính toán khác nhau được đào tạo về nguồn tài nguyên Estonia được đánh giá dựa trên con người.', 'nl': 'Onderzoekers in Computational Linguistics bouwen modellen van gelijkenis en testen deze aan menselijke oordelen. Hoewel er veel empirische studies zijn van de computationele modellen van gelijkenis voor de Engelse taal, wordt de gelijkenis voor andere talen minder onderzocht. In deze studie zijn we vooral geïnteresseerd in twee aspecten. In de eerste plaats willen we weten hoeveel van de menselijke gelijkenis is gegrond in de visuele waarneming. Om deze vraag te beantwoorden worden twee neurale computer vision modellen gebruikt en hun correlatie met de menselijke afgeleide vergelijkingsscore wordt berekend. In de tweede plaats onderzoeken we of taal invloed heeft op de gelijkenisberekening. Hiertoe worden diverse rekenmodellen die zijn getraind op Estse bronnen geëvalueerd aan de hand van menselijke oordelen', 'da': 'Forskere i Computational Linguistik bygger modeller af lighed og tester dem mod menneskelige dømme. Selvom der er mange empiriske undersøgelser af beregningsmodellerne for lighed for det engelske sprog, er ligheden for andre sprog mindre udforsket. I denne undersøgelse er vi hovedsagelig interesseret i to aspekter. For det første ønsker vi at vide, hvor meget af den menneskelige lighed er baseret på den visuelle opfattelse. For at besvare dette spørgsmål anvendes to neurale computervisionsmodeller, og deres korrelation med de menneskelige afledte lighedsscorer beregnes. For det andet undersøger vi, om sproget påvirker lighedsberegningen. Til dette formål evalueres forskellige beregningsmodeller uddannet på estiske ressourcer mod menneskelige vurderinger', 'id': 'Peneliti dalam Bahasa Komputasi membangun model persamaan dan menguji mereka melawan penilaian manusia. Meskipun ada banyak studi empirik tentang model komputasi persamaan untuk bahasa Inggris, persamaan untuk bahasa lain kurang dikeksplorasi. Dalam studi ini kita tertarik pada dua aspek. Pertama-tama kita ingin tahu berapa banyak persamaan manusia didasarkan dalam persepsi visual. Untuk menjawab pertanyaan ini, dua model penglihatan komputer saraf digunakan dan korelasi mereka dengan skor perbedaan yang dibuat manusia dikira. Di tempat kedua kita menyelidiki apakah bahasa mempengaruhi komputasi persamaan. To this purpose diverse computational models trained on Estonian resources are evaluated against human judgments', 'bg': 'Изследователите в компютърната лингвистика изграждат модели на сходство и ги тестват срещу човешките преценки. Въпреки че има много емпирични изследвания на изчислителните модели на сходство за английския език, сходството с други езици е по-малко изследвано. В това изследване се интересуваме главно от два аспекта. На първо място искаме да знаем колко голяма част от човешкото сходство се основава на визуалното възприятие. За да отговорим на този въпрос се използват два модела на невронно компютърно зрение и се изчислява тяхната корелация с получените от човека резултати за сходство. На второ място изследваме дали езикът влияе върху изчисляването на сходството. За тази цел се оценяват различни изчислителни модели, обучени за естонските ресурси, спрямо човешките преценки.', 'hr': 'Istraživači u računalnoj lingwistiki izgradili su modele sličnosti i testirali ih protiv ljudskih sudova. Iako ima mnogo empiričkih ispitivanja računalnih modela sličnosti engleskom jeziku, sličnost drugih jezika je manje istražena. U ovoj studiji smo glavno zainteresovani za dva aspekta. Na prvom mjestu želimo znati koliko je ljudske sličnosti temeljeno na vizualnom percepciji. Da bi odgovorili na to pitanje, koriste se dva modela vizije neuralnog računala i njihova korelacija sa rezultatima sličnosti iz ljudskih proizvoda. Na drugom mjestu istražujemo ako jezik utječe na računalo sličnosti. Za ovu svrhu procjenjuju se različiti računalni modeli obučeni na Estonskim resursima protiv ljudskih osuđenja', 'sw': 'Watafiti wa lugha za kompyuta wanajenga mifano ya usawa na kuwajaribu dhidi ya hukumu za binadamu. Ingawa kuna tafiti nyingi za muhimu za mifano ya kompyuta ya usawa kwa lugha ya Kiingereza, tofauti kwa lugha nyingine hazijunguzwi. Katika utafiti huu tunavutiwa sana katika mambo mawili. Katika nafasi ya kwanza tunataka kujua jinsi gani usawa wa binadamu unavyojikita kwenye mtazamo wa kuona. Kujibu swali hili, mifano miwili ya maono ya kompyuta neurali inatumika na uhusiano wao na vipimo vya usawa vya binadamu unakadiriwa. Katika nafasi ya pili tunachunguza kama lugha inaathiri hisabati sawa. Kwa lengo hili, mifano mbalimbali ya hisabati zilizofundishwa kuhusu rasilimali za Estonia zinatatuliwa dhidi ya hukumu za binadamu', 'de': 'Forscher in der Computerlinguistik bauen Modelle der Ähnlichkeit und testen sie gegen menschliche Urteile. Obwohl es viele empirische Studien zu den computergestützten Ähnlichkeitsmodellen für die englische Sprache gibt, ist die Ähnlichkeit für andere Sprachen weniger erforscht. In dieser Studie interessieren uns vor allem zwei Aspekte. Zunächst einmal wollen wir wissen, wie viel von der menschlichen Ähnlichkeit in der visuellen Wahrnehmung begründet ist. Zur Beantwortung dieser Frage werden zwei neuronale Computer Vision Modelle verwendet und deren Korrelation mit den vom Menschen abgeleiteten Ähnlichkeitsscores berechnet. Zweitens untersuchen wir, ob Sprache die Ähnlichkeitsberechnung beeinflusst. Dazu werden verschiedene Rechenmodelle, die auf estnischen Ressourcen trainiert wurden, anhand menschlicher Urteile evaluiert.', 'tr': 'Bilgisayar Lingüstiklerinde gözüňlik nusgalaryny gurar we olaryň adamlaryň hökmülerine garşy barlaýarlar. Iňlis dilinde meňzeşlik sistemalaryň köp sany empirik öwrenmeleri bar bolsa hem başga dilleriň meňzeşlikleri az çözilýär. Bu öwrenmede biz esasy iki aspekt bilen gyzyklanýarys. Ilkinji gezek ynsan meňzeşlikleriniň görsel pikirlerinde näçe guralýandygyny bilmek isleýäris. Bu soraga iki näurul kompýuter görünüş modelleri ulanmak üçin we ynsan döredilen beýleki notlary bilen ylalaşyklaryny hesaplamak üçin ullanýar. Ikinji ýerde çykyş etýän bolsa, eger diller meňzeşlikli hesaplamada täsirleýär. Bu maksada Estoniýanyň çeşitli hasaplanja görä bilinmeli hasaplanja nusgalary adamlaryň häsiýetlerine garşy çykýar.', 'ko': '계산언어학의 연구원들은 유사성 모델을 구축하고 인간의 판단에 따라 테스트를 한다.영어 언어의 유사성 계산 모델에 대한 실증 연구는 많지만 다른 언어의 유사성에 대한 연구는 적다.이 연구에서 우리는 주로 두 방면에 대해 흥미를 느낀다.우선, 우리는 인류의 유사성이 얼마나 시각적 감지에 기초한 것인지 알고 싶다.이 질문에 대답하기 위해 우리는 두 개의 신경계산기 시각모델을 사용하고 인류가 얻은 유사성 점수와 관련성을 계산했다.그 다음으로 우리는 언어가 유사성 계산에 영향을 미치는지 연구한다.이를 위해 에스토니아 자원 교육에 대한 각종 계산 모델은 인류의 판단에 따라 평가된다', 'sq': "Kërkimtarët në gjuhën kompjuterike ndërtojnë modele të ngjashmërisë dhe i testojnë kundër gjykimeve njerëzore. Megjithëse ka shumë studime empirike të modeleve kompjuterike të ngjashmërisë për gjuhën angleze, ngjashmëria për gjuhët e tjera është më pak eksploruar. Në këtë studim ne jemi kryesisht të interesuar në dy aspekte. Në fillim ne duam të dimë se sa e ngjashmërisë njerëzore bazohet në perceptimin vizual. Për t'i përgjigjur kësaj pyetjeje përdoren dy modele vizioni neuronal kompjuterik dhe korrelacioni i tyre me rezultatet e ngjashmërisë së prodhuar nga njeriu është llogaritur. Në vendin e dytë ne hetojmë nëse gjuha ndikon në llogaritjen e ngjashmërisë. To this purpose diverse computational models trained on Estonian resources are evaluated against human judgments", 'af': 'Resekers in Computational Linguistics bou modele van gelykheid en probeer hulle teen menslike oordelings. Alhoewel daar is baie empiriese studie van die rekenaarske modele van gelykheid vir die Engelstaal, is die gelykenis vir ander tale minder uitgevoer. In hierdie studie is ons eerste geinteresseer in twee aspekte. In die eerste plek wil ons weet hoeveel van die menslike gelykenis in die visuele aandag gegrond is. Om hierdie vraag te antwoord, word twee neurale rekenaar gesigte modele gebruik en hulle korrelasie met die menslike afgeleide gelykheidstelling bereken word. In die tweede plek ondersoek ons as taal die gelykheidsrekening influens. Na hierdie doel is verskillende rekenaarske modele wat op Estoniese hulpbronne opgevoer is teen menslike oordelinge evalueer word', 'hy': 'Համակարգչային լեզվաբանության հետազոտողները կառուցում են նմանության մոդելներ և փորձում են դրանք մարդկային դատողությունների հետ: Չնայած շատ էմպրիկական ուսումնասիրություններ կան անգլերենի նմանության հաշվարկման մոդելների մասին, այլ լեզուների նմանությունը ավելի քիչ ուսումնասիրում է: In this study we are chiefly interested in two aspects.  Առաջին հերթին մենք ուզում ենք իմանալ, թե որքան է մարդկային նմանությունը հիմնված տեսողական ընկալության վրա: Այս հարցին պատասխանելու համար օգտագործվում են երկու նյարդային համակարգչային տեսողության մոդել, և նրանց կապը մարդկային նմանության արդյունքների հետ հաշվարկվում է: Երկրորդ տեղում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե արդյոք լեզուն ազդում է նմանության հաշվարկում: Այս նպատակով էստոնական ռեսուրսների վրա վարժեցված բազմաթիվ հաշվարկների մոդելները գնահատվում են մարդկային դատողությունների հետ կապված,', 'am': 'በአካባቢው ቋንቋዎች ያሉት ምርኪዎች ብጤዎችን ይሠራሉ እናም በሰው ፍርድ ላይ ይሞክራቸዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ለኢንልዝላዊ ቋንቋ ብዙዎች የቆጣጠር ምሳሌዎች ብጤዎች ቢገኙ ለሌሎች ቋንቋዎች ብጤያቸው አይመረመርም፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ አብዛኛውን ሁለት ጉዳይ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያው ስፍራ የሰው ምሳሌ እንዴት ያለ ራእይ መሠረት መሆኑን እናውቅ ዘንድ እንፈልጋለን፡፡ To answer this question two neural computer vision models are used and their correlation with the human derived similarity scores is computed.  በሁለተኛውም ስፍራ ቋንቋ ብጤው ቁጥጥር የሚያስፈልገውን እንመርምራለን፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት በኤስቶንያ ሀብት ላይ የተማሩት የቁጥጥር ዓይነቶች በሰው ፍርድ ላይ ይታያል፡፡', 'bn': 'কম্পিউটাশনেল লিঙ্গিস্টিক্সের গবেষক একই ধরনের মডেল তৈরি করে মানুষের বিচারের বিরুদ্ধে তাদের পরীক্ষা  যদিও ইংরেজি ভাষার সমতুল্য মডেলের অনেক সাধারণ গবেষণা রয়েছে, তবে অন্যান্য ভাষার সমতুল্য অনুসন্ধান কম। এই গবেষণায় আমরা প্রধান দুই বিষয়ে আগ্রহী। প্রথম স্থানে আমরা জানতে চাই যে মানুষের সমতার কতটা দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতে কাটিয়েছে। এই প্রশ্নের উত্তর দুটি নিউরেল কম্পিউটারের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি মডেল ব্যবহার করা হয় এবং মানুষের সাথে তাদের সম্পর্ক একই স্কোরের সা দ্বিতীয় স্থানে আমরা তদন্ত করি ভাষা একই ধরনের গণনা প্রভাব ফেলে কিনা। এই উদ্দেশ্যে ইস্তোনিয়ার সম্পদে প্রশিক্ষিত বিভিন্ন গণনাত্রিক মডেল মানুষের বিচারের বিরুদ্ধে মূল্', 'az': 'Computational Linguistics araştırmacıları bənzər modelləri in şa edir və onları insan hökmlərinə qarşı imtahana çəkir. İngilis dilinə bənzərinin hesaplama modellərinin çox empirik təhsil edilməsi olmasa da, başqa dillərə bənzəri daha az keşif edilir. Bu təhsil içində biz ilk dəfə iki aspektə maraqlıyıq. İlk dəfə biz insan bənzərinin nə qədər görünüş içində olduğunu bilmək istəyirik. Bu suala cavab vermək üçün iki nöral kompjuter görünüş modeli istifadə edilir və insanların istifadə edilən bənzər nöqtələri ilə onların bağlantısı hesablanır. İkincisi yerdə dil kimilik hesaplamasına müvəffəq edir. Bu məqsəd üçün Estonya resurslarında təhsil edilmiş müxtəlif hesablama modelləri insan hökmlərinə qarşı təhsil edilir.', 'bs': 'Istraživači u kompjuterskoj lingwistiki grade modele sličnosti i testiraju ih protiv ljudskih osuđenja. Iako ima mnogo empiričkih ispitivanja računalnih modela sličnosti engleskom jeziku, sličnost drugih jezika je manje istražena. U ovoj studiji smo glavno zainteresovani za dva aspekta. Na prvom mjestu želimo znati koliko je ljudske sličnosti temeljeno na vizualnom percepciji. Da bi odgovorili na to pitanje, koriste se dva modela neuronskog kompjuterskog vizije, a njihova korelacija sa ljudskim rezultatima sličnosti se računa. Na drugom mjestu istražujemo ako jezik utiče na računalo sličnosti. Za ovu svrhu procjenjuju se različiti računalni modeli obučeni na Estonskim resursima protiv ljudskih osuđenja', 'fa': 'تحقیقات کنندگان در لینگ\u200cشناسی کامپیوتری مدل\u200cهای شبیه ساخته می\u200cشوند و آنها را در مقابل قضاوت انسان آزمایش می\u200cکنند. اگرچه مطالعه های عمومی زیادی از مدل های کامپیوتری شبیه انگلیسی برای زبان انگلیسی وجود دارد، شبیه انگلیسی برای زبانهای دیگر کمتر تحقیق شده است. در این مطالعه، ما اصلاً به دو قسمت علاقه داریم. اول ما می خواهیم بدانیم که چقدر شبیه\u200cهای انسان در نظر بینایی بنیاد دارند. برای پاسخ دادن این سوال دو مدل دید کامپیوتر عصبی استفاده می\u200cشود و ارتباط آنها با امتیاز شبیه\u200cای انسان\u200cها به محاسبه می\u200cشود. در جای دوم تحقیق می کنیم که آیا زبان محاسبات شبیه تأثیر می کند. برای این هدف مدلهای کامپیوتری مختلف آموزش یافته در منابع استونی بر خلاف قانون انسان ارزیابی می شوند', 'cs': 'Výzkumníci výpočetní lingvistiky vytvářejí modely podobnosti a testují je proti lidským úsudkům. Ačkoli existuje mnoho empirických studií výpočetních modelů podobnosti pro anglický jazyk, podobnost pro ostatní jazyky je méně zkoumána. V této studii se zajímáme především o dva aspekty. V první řadě chceme vědět, jak velká část lidské podobnosti je založena na vizuálním vnímání. Pro odpověď na tuto otázku jsou použity dva neuronové počítačové modely vidění a je vypočítána jejich korelace s lidským odvozeným skórem podobnosti. Na druhém místě zkoumáme, zda jazyk ovlivňuje výpočet podobnosti. Za tímto účelem jsou hodnoceny různé výpočetní modely trénované na estonských zdrojích na základě lidských úsudků', 'et': 'Arvutuslingvistika teadlased ehitavad sarnasuse mudeleid ja testivad neid inimlike otsuste vastu. Kuigi inglise keele sarnasuse arvutusmudelite kohta on palju empiirilisi uuringuid, on sarnasust teiste keelte puhul vähem uuritud. Selles uuringus oleme peamiselt huvitatud kahest aspektist. Esiteks tahame teada, kui palju inimese sarnasust põhineb visuaalsel tajul. Sellele küsimusele vastamiseks kasutatakse kahte neuronägemismudelit ja arvutatakse nende korrelatsioon inimese tuletatud sarnasuse skooriga. Teiseks uurime, kas keel mõjutab sarnasuse arvutamist. Selleks hinnatakse erinevaid Eesti ressurssidel koolitatud arvutusmudeleid inimotsuste põhjal.', 'ca': "Researchers in Computational Linguistics build models of similarity and test them against human judgments.  Encara que hi ha molts estudis empírics sobre els models computacionals de similitud per a la llengua anglesa, la similitud per a altres llenguas és menys explorada. En aquest estudi estem principalment interessats en dos aspectes. En primer lloc volem saber quanta de la similitud humana està basada en la percepció visual. Per respondre a aquesta pregunta s'utilitzen dos models de visió informàtica neuronal i es calcula la seva correlació amb les puntuacions derivades de la similitud humana. En segon lloc investigam si la llengua influeix en el càlcul de la similitud. A aquest efecte, diversos models computacionals capacitats en recursos estònians s'evaluen en comparació amb els judicis humans", 'fi': 'Laskennallisen kielitieteen tutkijat rakentavat samankaltaisuuden malleja ja testaavat niitä ihmisten arvosteluita vastaan. Vaikka englannin kielen samankaltaisuuden laskennallisista malleista on olemassa monia empiirisiä tutkimuksia, samankaltaisuutta muiden kielten osalta on tutkittu vähemmän. Tässä tutkimuksessa meitä kiinnostaa pääasiassa kaksi näkökohtaa. Ensinnäkin haluamme tietää, kuinka paljon ihmisen samankaltaisuudesta perustuu visuaaliseen havaintoon. Vastauksena tähän kysymykseen käytetään kahta neurotietokonenäkömallia ja niiden korrelaatio ihmisen johdettujen samankaltaisuuspisteiden kanssa lasketaan. Toiseksi tutkimme, vaikuttaako kieli samankaltaisuuden laskentaan. Tätä tarkoitusta varten arvioidaan virolaisista resursseista koulutettuja erilaisia laskennallisia malleja inhimillisten arviointien perusteella.', 'he': 'מחקרים בלנגוסטיקה מחשבתית בונים דוגמנים של דמיון ומבחנים אותם נגד שיפוטים אנושיים. למרות שיש הרבה מחקרים אמפיריים של מודלים מחשבים של דומה לשפה האנגלית, הדמיון לשפות אחרות פחות נחקר. במחקר הזה אנחנו בעיקר מעוניינים בשני היבטים. מלכתחילה אנחנו רוצים לדעת כמה מהדמיון האנושי מקורקע בתפיסה הראייה. כדי לענות על השאלה הזאת שני דוגמני חזון מחשב עצבי משתמשים והקשר שלהם עם נקודות הדמיון הנוצאות האנושיות מחשבים. במקום השני אנו חוקרים אם השפה משפיעה על מחשב הדמיון. למטרה זו מודלים מחשבים רבים מאומנים על משאבים אסטוניים מוערכים בנוגע לשיפוטים אנושיים', 'ha': "Researchers in Computation Linguistics ke samar misãlai masu daidaita kuma ka jarraba su a kan hukuncin mutãne. Kuma kõ da da yawa aka sami karatun masu ƙidãya na misãlai na lissafa wa lugha Ingiriya, ba za'a ƙara yin kwamfyuta ba. A cikin wannan lafiya, munã son mafiya amfani da biyu. Ina so a farkon na so, ko da yawa misãlai ga mutum ke baka a cikin gani. Yana amfani da misãlai biyu na ganin kwamfyutan neural da ake amfani da su kuma ana lissafa su da mazaunin mutum wanda ke da daidai. Kuma a cikin na ƙara, Munã tambaye idan harshe na yi amfani da lissafan da ke daidaita. Ga wannan, ana ƙaddara misãlai masu lissafa wanda aka yi wa tunkuɗe wa masu tsari na masu taskõki a kan taskõki", 'jv': 'Nalikar sampeyan ing Linguistik Kompjuter Singa ana akeh kudu akeh pisan empire karo model sing sampeyan ingkang, sampeyan karo akeh luwih dumateng. Yèng granèh iki, awak dhéwé éntukaké supoyatan iki angka Nalika sing paling awak dhéwé ngerti piye cara sing mengkane kabèh dumadhi sak duluran ning ngerasara winih. Rasané sampek iki dadi, nik sampek perusahaan kelangan sampek durung. Nang liya segondi, kita ujarane sak bangsane luwih apik karo kaluwangan sampeyan. Rasané awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sampek karo perusahaan anyar sampek, sing nyimpen karo perusahaan winih', 'sk': 'Raziskovalci računalniškega jezikoslovja gradijo modele podobnosti in jih testirajo glede na človeške presoje. Čeprav obstaja veliko empiričnih študij računalniških modelov podobnosti za angleški jezik, je podobnost za druge jezike manj raziskana. V tej študiji nas zanimata predvsem dva vidika. Najprej želimo vedeti, koliko človeške podobnosti temelji na vizualni percepciji. Za odgovor na to vprašanje sta uporabljena dva modela nevronskega računalniškega vida in izračunana njihova korelacija s človeškimi podobnimi rezultati. Na drugem mestu raziskujemo, ali jezik vpliva na izračun podobnosti. V ta namen so ocenjeni različni računalniški modeli, usposobljeni za estonske vire, glede na človeške presoje', 'bo': 'རྩིས་འཁོར སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གཞན་ཞིག་ལ་མཐུན་རིམ་གྱི་རྩིས་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་མིག་དཔེ་ལ་མང་པོ་ཡིན་ནའང་། ལྟ་བ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གཉིས་ལས་དགའ་པོ་ཡོད། དང་པོའི་བཤད་པ་དེ་ང་ཚོས་མིའི་མི་རྣམས་ལ་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚོའི་ནང་གི་མཐོང་ཚུལ་གང་ཞིག་རེད། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་དྲི་ཚིག་དང་མིའི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་མཐོང་སྣང་གྲངས་གཉིས་མཐུན་སོང་ནི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ཡོད། དེ་ནས་དབུས་གཉིས་པ་དེ་ང་ཚོས་བརྟན་པར་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་ན། སྐད་ཡིག ཨིས་ཊོ་ནི་ཡིས་ཁོངས་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་དག་གི་མཐོང་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་'}
{'en': 'Language-Agnostic Twitter-Bot Detection', 'ar': 'اكتشاف روبوت تويتر الحيادي اللغة', 'pt': 'Detecção de Twitter-Bot independente de idioma', 'es': 'Detección de bots de Twitter independiente del idioma', 'fr': 'Détection des robots Twitter indépendants de la langue', 'ja': 'Twitter - BotŃü«µż£Õć║', 'zh': '语言无关 Twitter-Bot 检', 'ru': 'Язык - Недостоверный Twitter - Обнаружение ботов', 'hi': 'भाषा-अज्ञेयवादी चहचहाना-बॉट का पता लगाने', 'ga': 'Teanga-Agnostic Twitter-Bot Brath', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση γλωσσικού Twitter- Bot', 'hu': 'Nyelv- Agnostic Twitter- Bot felismerés', 'ka': 'Language-Agnostic Twitter-Bot Detection', 'it': 'Rilevamento linguistico-Agnostico Twitter-Bot', 'kk': 'Тіл- агностикалық Twitter- Bot анықтауы', 'lt': 'Language-Agnostic Twitter-Bot nustatymas', 'mk': 'Детектирање на Твитер- Ботот за јазик- агностика', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Bot-Twitter Agnostik-Bahasa', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ- അഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക്ക്- ടൂട്ടിക്- ബോട്ട് ഡിറ്ററിഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Sejbien ta’ Twitter-Bot Agnostiku-Lingwistiku', 'mn': 'Хол-Агностик Твиттер-Бот тогтоох', 'no': 'Språk- Agnostisk Twitter- bot- oppdaging', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie języka anginostycznego Twitter- Bota', 'ro': 'Detectarea lingvistică Twitter- Bot', 'sr': 'Detekcija jezika-Agnostika Twitter-bota', 'si': 'භාෂා', 'so': 'Gariirka luqada-Agnostic-Twitter Bot', 'sv': 'Language- Agnostic Twitter- Bot Detection', 'ta': 'மொழி- ஆங்னோஸ்டிக் Twitter- Bot கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'ur': 'Language-Agnostic Twitter-Bot Detection', 'uz': 'Tilni- Agnostic Twitter- Bot aniqlash', 'vi': 'Phát hiện Twitter-Bot', 'bg': 'Езиково агностично откриване на Twitter- Bot', 'da': 'Sprog- Agnostisk Twitter- Botdetektion', 'hr': 'Detekcija jezika-Agnostika Twitter-bota', 'nl': 'Taal-agnostische Twitter-Bot detectie', 'de': 'Sprach-Agnostic Twitter-Bot Detection', 'id': 'Deteksi Twitter-Bot Bahasa-Agnostik', 'tr': 'Diller', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Twita-Bot kwa lugha-Agnostic', 'ko': '언어와 무관한 트위터 로봇 검사', 'fa': 'شناسایی توئیتر-بوت زبان-اگناستیک', 'af': 'Language- Agnostic Twitter- Bot Detection', 'hy': 'Լեզու-ագնոստիկ Թվիթեր-Բոտի հայտնաբերումը', 'sq': 'Zbulimi i gjuhës-agnostike i Twitter-Botit', 'az': 'Dil-Agnostik Twitter-Bot Keşfeti', 'bn': 'ভাষা-আগনোস্টিক টুইটার- বোট সনাক্ত', 'bs': 'Detekcija jezika-Agnostika Twitter-bota', 'am': 'ቋንቋ-Agnostic Twitter-Bot Detection', 'cs': 'Jazykově-agnostická detekce Twitter- Bota', 'et': 'Keele- Agnostiline Twitter- Boti tuvastamine', 'fi': 'Kieliagnostinen Twitter- botin tunnistus', 'ca': 'Language-Agnostic Twitter-Bot Detection', 'sk': 'Jezikovno-Agnostično zaznavanje Twitter-Bot', 'jv': 'Jenengan-Awuntike Tutor-bot', 'he': 'גילוי טוויטר בוט שפה-אגנוסטי', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་དང་སྦྲེལ་བའི་ཌིས་ཌིར་རྟོགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'In this paper we address the problem of detecting Twitter bots. We analyze a dataset of 8385 Twitter accounts and their tweets consisting of both humans and different kinds of bots. We use this data to train machine learning classifiers that distinguish between real and bot accounts. We identify features that are easy to extract while still providing good results. We analyze different feature groups based on account specific, tweet specific and behavioral specific features and measure their performance compared to other state of the art bot detection methods. For easy future portability of our work we focus on language-agnostic features. With AdaBoost, the best performing classifier, we achieve an accuracy of 0.988 and an AUC of 0.995. As the creation of good training data in machine learning is often difficult-especially in the domain of Twitter bot detection-we additionally analyze to what extent smaller amounts of training data lead to useful results by reviewing cross-validated learning curves. Our results indicate that using few but expressive features already has a good practical benefit for bot detection, especially if only a small amount of training data is available.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة نتناول مشكلة الكشف عن روبوتات تويتر. نقوم بتحليل مجموعة بيانات مكونة من 8385 حسابًا على Twitter وتغريداتهم المكونة من بشر وأنواع مختلفة من الروبوتات. نستخدم هذه البيانات لتدريب مصنفات التعلم الآلي التي تميز بين الحسابات الحقيقية والحسابات الآلية. نحدد الميزات التي يسهل استخراجها مع استمرار تقديم نتائج جيدة. نقوم بتحليل مجموعات الميزات المختلفة بناءً على ميزات خاصة بالحساب وميزات محددة وسلوكية خاصة بالتغريد ونقيس أدائها مقارنةً بأحدث أساليب اكتشاف الروبوتات. لسهولة نقل عملنا في المستقبل ، نركز على الميزات الحيادية للغة. مع AdaBoost ، المصنف الأفضل أداءً ، نحقق دقة قدرها 0.988 و 0.995 AUC. نظرًا لأن إنشاء بيانات تدريب جيدة في التعلم الآلي غالبًا ما يكون صعبًا - لا سيما في مجال اكتشاف الروبوتات على Twitter - فإننا نحلل أيضًا إلى أي مدى تؤدي الكميات الصغيرة من بيانات التدريب إلى نتائج مفيدة من خلال مراجعة منحنيات التعلم التي تم التحقق من صحتها. تشير نتائجنا إلى أن استخدام عدد قليل من الميزات التعبيرية له بالفعل فائدة عملية جيدة لاكتشاف الروبوتات ، خاصةً إذا توفر قدر ضئيل من بيانات التدريب.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous abordons le problème de la détection des robots Twitter. Nous analysons un ensemble de données de 8385 comptes Twitter et leurs tweets composés à la fois d'humains et de différents types de robots. Nous utilisons ces données pour former des classificateurs d'apprentissage automatique qui distinguent les comptes réels des comptes de robots. Nous identifions les caractéristiques qui sont faciles à extraire tout en fournissant de bons résultats. Nous analysons différents groupes de fonctionnalités en fonction de caractéristiques spécifiques au compte, aux tweets et au comportement, et nous mesurons leurs performances par rapport à d'autres méthodes de détection de robots de pointe. Pour faciliter la portabilité future de notre travail, nous nous concentrons sur les fonctionnalités indépendantes de la langue. Avec AdaBoost, le classificateur le plus performant, nous atteignons une précision de 0,988 et une ASC de 0,995. Comme la création de bonnes données de formation dans le machine learning est souvent difficile, en particulier dans le domaine de la détection des robots Twitter, nous analysons également dans quelle mesure de plus petites quantités de données d'entraînement conduisent à des résultats utiles en examinant les courbes d'apprentissage validées croisées. Nos résultats indiquent que l'utilisation de fonctionnalités peu nombreuses mais expressives présente déjà un avantage pratique pour la détection des robots, en particulier si seule une petite quantité de données d'entraînement est disponible.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo abordamos o problema de detecção de bots do Twitter. Analisamos um conjunto de dados de 8.385 contas do Twitter e seus tweets consistindo de humanos e diferentes tipos de bots. Usamos esses dados para treinar classificadores de aprendizado de máquina que distinguem entre contas reais e bots. Identificamos recursos que são fáceis de extrair e ainda fornecem bons resultados. Analisamos diferentes grupos de recursos com base em recursos específicos de conta, específicos de tweet e específicos de comportamento e medimos seu desempenho em comparação com outros métodos de detecção de bot de última geração. Para facilitar a portabilidade futura de nosso trabalho, nos concentramos em recursos independentes de linguagem. Com o AdaBoost, o classificador de melhor desempenho, alcançamos uma precisão de 0,988 e uma AUC de 0,995. Como a criação de bons dados de treinamento em aprendizado de máquina geralmente é difícil - especialmente no domínio da detecção de bot do Twitter - também analisamos até que ponto quantidades menores de dados de treinamento levam a resultados úteis revisando curvas de aprendizado validadas cruzadas. Nossos resultados indicam que o uso de poucos, mas expressivos recursos, já traz um bom benefício prático para a detecção de bots, especialmente se apenas uma pequena quantidade de dados de treinamento estiver disponível.', 'es': 'En este artículo abordamos el problema de la detección de bots de Twitter. Analizamos un conjunto de datos de 8385 cuentas de Twitter y sus tuits que consisten tanto en humanos como en diferentes tipos de bots. Utilizamos estos datos para entrenar clasificadores de aprendizaje automático que distinguen entre cuentas reales y cuentas de bot. Identificamos las características que son fáciles de extraer y, al mismo tiempo, proporcionan buenos resultados. Analizamos diferentes grupos de funciones en función de las características específicas de la cuenta, del tweet y del comportamiento, y medimos su rendimiento en comparación con otros métodos de detección de bots de última generación. Para facilitar la portabilidad futura de nuestro trabajo, nos centramos en funciones independientes del idioma. Con AdaBoost, el clasificador con mejor rendimiento, logramos una precisión de 0,988 y un AUC de 0,995. Como la creación de buenos datos de entrenamiento en el aprendizaje automático suele ser difícil, especialmente en el ámbito de la detección de bots de Twitter, también analizamos hasta qué punto cantidades más pequeñas de datos de entrenamiento conducen a resultados útiles mediante la revisión de curvas de aprendizaje con validación cruzada. Nuestros resultados indican que el uso de pocas funciones pero expresivas ya tiene un buen beneficio práctico para la detección de bots, especialmente si solo se dispone de una pequeña cantidad de datos de entrenamiento.', 'ja': '本稿では、Twitterボットの検出問題について述べる。 私たちは、8385のTwitterアカウントと、人間とさまざまな種類のボットの両方からなるツイートのデータセットを分析します。 このデータを使用して、リアルアカウントとボットアカウントを区別する機械学習分類子をトレーニングします。 抽出が容易でありながら、良好な結果をもたらす機能を特定します。 アカウント固有の機能、ツイート固有の機能、行動固有の機能に基づいてさまざまな機能グループを分析し、他の最先端のボット検出方法と比較してそのパフォーマンスを測定します。 将来の作業の移植性を容易にするために、私たちは言語に依存しない機能に焦点を当てています。 最高のパフォーマンスの分類子であるAdaBoostを使用すると、0.988の精度と0.995のAUCを達成できます。 機械学習における優れたトレーニングデータの作成はしばしば困難であり、特にTwitterボット検出の領域では困難であるため、クロス検証された学習曲線を見直すことによって、少量のトレーニングデータがどの程度有用な結果につながるかを分析します。 私たちの結果は、ほとんどではないが表現的な機能を使用することは、特にわずかなトレーニングデータしか利用できない場合に、ボット検出にとってすでに良い実用的な利点があることを示しています。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम चहचहाना bots का पता लगाने की समस्या को संबोधित करते हैं. हम 8385 ट्विटर खातों के डेटासेट और उनके ट्वीट्स का विश्लेषण करते हैं जिसमें दोनों मनुष्य और विभिन्न प्रकार के बॉट शामिल हैं। हम इस डेटा का उपयोग मशीन लर्निंग क्लासिफायर्स को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए करते हैं जो वास्तविक और बॉट खातों के बीच अंतर करते हैं। हम उन विशेषताओं की पहचान करते हैं जिन्हें निकालना आसान है, जबकि अभी भी अच्छे परिणाम प्रदान करते हैं। हम खाते के आधार पर विभिन्न सुविधा समूहों का विश्लेषण करते हैं, विशिष्ट और व्यवहार विशिष्ट विशेषताओं को ट्वीट करते हैं और कला बॉट का पता लगाने के तरीकों के अन्य राज्य की तुलना में उनके प्रदर्शन को मापते हैं। हमारे काम की आसान भविष्य की पोर्टेबिलिटी के लिए हम भाषा-अज्ञेयवादी सुविधाओं पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। AdaBoost के साथ, सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन क्लासिफायर, हम 0.988 की सटीकता और 0.995 का AUC प्राप्त करते हैं। जैसा कि मशीन लर्निंग में अच्छे प्रशिक्षण डेटा का निर्माण अक्सर मुश्किल होता है - विशेष रूप से ट्विटर बॉट डिटेक्शन के डोमेन में - हम इसके अलावा विश्लेषण करते हैं कि किस हद तक प्रशिक्षण डेटा की छोटी मात्रा क्रॉस-मान्य सीखने के घटता की समीक्षा करके उपयोगी परिणामों का कारण बनती है। हमारे परिणामों से संकेत मिलता है कि कुछ लेकिन अभिव्यंजक सुविधाओं का उपयोग करने से पहले से ही बॉट का पता लगाने के लिए एक अच्छा व्यावहारिक लाभ है, खासकर अगर केवल थोड़ी मात्रा में प्रशिक्षण डेटा उपलब्ध है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы рассмотрим проблему обнаружения ботов Twitter. Мы анализируем набор данных из 8385 аккаунтов Twitter и их твитов, состоящих из людей и разных видов ботов. Мы используем эти данные для обучения классификаторов машинного обучения, которые различают реальные и бот-счета. Мы определяем функции, которые легко извлечь, но при этом обеспечиваем хорошие результаты. Мы анализируем различные группы признаков на основе специфических для аккаунта, твитов и поведенческих особенностей и измеряем их производительность по сравнению с другими современными методами обнаружения ботов. Для удобства переносимости нашей работы в будущем мы сосредоточимся на функциях языковой диагностики. С AdaBoost, наиболее эффективным классификатором, мы достигаем точности 0.988 и AUC 0.995. Поскольку создание хороших обучающих данных в машинном обучении часто затруднено - особенно в области обнаружения ботов Twitter - мы дополнительно анализируем, в какой степени меньшие объемы обучающих данных приводят к полезным результатам, пересматривая перекрестно проверенные кривые обучения. Наши результаты показывают, что использование нескольких, но экспрессивных функций уже имеет хорошее практическое преимущество для обнаружения ботов, особенно если имеется лишь небольшое количество обучающих данных.', 'zh': '于本文中,解检测Twitter机器人。 论8385Twitter帐户及推文之数,帐户人机器人也。 用此数者机器习分类器,以别真帐户机器人帐户。 吾定易取,兼资良果。 吾以特定于帐户、特定于推文行特定功能分别不同者,并比诸先进机器人检测之法,量其性能。 为便将来移植事,专于言语不关功。 借性至佳之器AdaBoost,吾精为0.988,AUC为0.995。 机器学之难 - 尤在Twitter机器人检 - 犹通过审查验之学习曲线,析小数于多大程度有用也。 吾之的结果表明,用少而富表现力者已机器人检有善实,尤在少练数可用。', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo tugaimid aghaidh ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le botaí Twitter a bhrath. Déanaimid anailís ar thacar sonraí de 8385 cuntas Twitter agus a gcuid tweets comhdhéanta de dhaoine agus de chineálacha éagsúla róbónna. Bainimid úsáid as na sonraí seo chun oiliúint a chur ar aicmitheoirí meaisínfhoghlama a dhéanann idirdhealú idir cuntais réadúla agus bot. Aithnímid gnéithe atá éasca a bhaint as agus fós ag soláthar torthaí maithe. Déanaimid anailís ar shainghrúpaí éagsúla bunaithe ar ghnéithe a bhaineann go sonrach le cuntais, ar thvuíteanna agus ar ghnéithe iompraíochta sonracha agus tomhaisimid a bhfeidhmíocht i gcomparáid le modhanna braite bot nua-aimseartha eile. Le gur féidir ár gcuid oibre a iompar go héasca sa todhchaí dírímid ar ghnéithe teanga-agnostic. Le AdaBoost, an t-aicmitheoir feidhmíochta is fearr, bainimid amach cruinneas 0.988 agus AUC 0.995. Toisc go mbíonn sé deacair go minic sonraí oiliúna maithe a chruthú sa mheaisínfhoghlaim - go háirithe i réimse braite bot Twitter - déanaimid anailís freisin ar a mhéid a eascraíonn torthaí úsáideacha as méideanna níos lú sonraí oiliúna trí athbhreithniú a dhéanamh ar chuair foghlama tras-bhailíochtaithe. Tugann ár dtorthaí le fios go bhfuil buntáiste praiticiúil ag baint úsáide as roinnt gnéithe sainráiteacha cheana féin maidir le bot a bhrath, go háirithe mura bhfuil ach méid beag sonraí oiliúna ar fáil.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban a Twitter botok felismerésének problémáját foglalkozunk. 8385 Twitter fiókból és tweetjeikből álló adatkészletet elemzünk, amelyek emberekből és különböző botokból állnak. Ezeket az adatokat arra használjuk, hogy olyan gépi tanulási osztályozókat képezzünk, amelyek megkülönböztetik a valós és a bot fiókok között. Azonosítjuk azokat a funkciókat, amelyek könnyen kibonthatók, miközben jó eredményeket nyújtanak. A különböző funkciócsoportokat fiókspecifikus, tweetspecifikus és viselkedésspecifikus funkciók alapján elemezzük, és mérjük teljesítményüket más korszerű robotészlelési módszerekkel összehasonlítva. Munkánk könnyű hordozhatósága érdekében a nyelv-agnosztikus funkciókra összpontosítunk. Az AdaBoost, a legjobb teljesítményű osztályozó segítségével 0,988 pontosságot és 0,995 AUC értéket érünk el. Mivel a jó edzési adatok létrehozása a gépi tanulás területén gyakran nehéz - különösen a Twitter bot detektálás területén -, továbbá elemezzük, hogy a kisebb edzési adatok milyen mértékben vezetnek hasznos eredményekhez a keresztvalidált tanulási görbék áttekintésével. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy kevés, de kifejező funkció használata már jó gyakorlati előnnyel jár a bot felismerésében, különösen, ha csak kis mennyiségű edzési adat áll rendelkezésre.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία εξετάζουμε το πρόβλημα της ανίχνευσης ρομπότ Twitter. Αναλύουμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων λογαριασμών 8385 και τα tweets τους που αποτελούνται τόσο από ανθρώπους όσο και από διαφορετικά είδη ρομπότ. Χρησιμοποιούμε αυτά τα δεδομένα για να εκπαιδεύσουμε ταξινομητές μηχανικής μάθησης που διακρίνουν μεταξύ πραγματικών λογαριασμών και λογαριασμών ρομπότ. Αναγνωρίζουμε χαρακτηριστικά που είναι εύκολο να εξαχθούν ενώ εξακολουθούν να παρέχουν καλά αποτελέσματα. Αναλύουμε διαφορετικές ομάδες χαρακτηριστικών με βάση συγκεκριμένα χαρακτηριστικά λογαριασμού, και συγκεκριμένα χαρακτηριστικά συμπεριφοράς και μετράμε την απόδοσή τους σε σύγκριση με άλλες μεθόδους ανίχνευσης ρομπότ τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Για εύκολη μελλοντική φορητότητα της εργασίας μας εστιάζουμε σε γλωσσικά αγνωστικά χαρακτηριστικά. Με τον ταξινομητή καλύτερης απόδοσης, επιτυγχάνουμε ακρίβεια 0.988 και AUC 0.995. Δεδομένου ότι η δημιουργία καλών δεδομένων κατάρτισης στη μηχανική μάθηση είναι συχνά δύσκολη, ειδικά στον τομέα της ανίχνευσης αναλύουμε επιπλέον σε ποιο βαθμό μικρότερες ποσότητες δεδομένων κατάρτισης οδηγούν σε χρήσιμα αποτελέσματα εξετάζοντας διασταυρούμενες καμπύλες μάθησης. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι η χρήση ελάχιστων αλλά εκφραστικών χαρακτηριστικών έχει ήδη ένα καλό πρακτικό όφελος για την ανίχνευση ειδικά εάν είναι διαθέσιμη μόνο μικρή ποσότητα δεδομένων κατάρτισης.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ გადავწყენებთ პრობლემა, რომელიც Twitter-ის პრობლემების განახსნა. ჩვენ მივაანალიზებთ 8385 Twitter წიგნის და მათი tweets, რომელიც ადამიანების და განსხვავებული პროტი პროტი პროტი პროტი პროტი. ჩვენ ამ მონაცემების გამოყენება მაქსინური სწავლების კლასიფიკაციებისთვის, რომლებიც რეალური და ბოტის წიგნის შორის განსხვავება. ჩვენ განვიცნობით ფუნქციები, რომლებიც მარტივია გამოყენება, როდესაც უკეთესი წარმოდგენება. ჩვენ განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული ჯგუფები განსხვავებული, განსხვავებული, განსხვავებული და ქცევის განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული პ ჩვენი სამუშაო სამუშაო მარტივი მომავალური პორტაციელობისთვის ჩვენ ვიყენებთ ენის-ადნოსტიკური განსაზღვრებისთვის. AdaBoost-ის საუკეთესო კლასიფიკაცია, ჩვენ 0,988 და 0,995-ის AUC მივიღეთ. როგორც მანქანის სწავლებაში კარგი მონაცემების შექმნა ძალიან ძალიან რთულის ბოტების მონაცემების დიომინში, ჩვენ დამატებით ანალიზებთ რამდენიმე პატარა მონაცემების მონაცემების მონაცემების განმავლობა ჩვენი წარმოდგენები გვაჩვენებს, რომ გამოყენება რამდენიმე, მაგრამ გამოყენება ექსპექტიური განსაზღვრებისთვის უკეთესი პრაქტიკური გამოსახულება, განსაკუთრებით', 'it': "In questo articolo affrontiamo il problema del rilevamento dei bot di Twitter. Analizziamo un set di dati di 8385 account Twitter e i loro tweet composti sia da esseri umani che da diversi tipi di bot. Utilizziamo questi dati per formare classificatori di machine learning che distinguono tra account reali e account bot. Identifichiamo caratteristiche che sono facili da estrarre pur fornendo buoni risultati. Analizziamo diversi gruppi di funzionalità in base a caratteristiche specifiche dell'account, tweet specifiche e comportamentali specifiche e misuriamo le loro prestazioni rispetto ad altri metodi di rilevamento bot all'avanguardia. Per una facile portabilità futura del nostro lavoro ci concentriamo sulle caratteristiche linguistiche-agnostiche. Con AdaBoost, il classificatore più performante, raggiungiamo una precisione di 0,988 e una AUC di 0,995. Poiché la creazione di buoni dati di formazione nell'apprendimento automatico è spesso difficile - soprattutto nel campo del rilevamento dei bot di Twitter - analizziamo inoltre in che misura quantità minori di dati di formazione portano a risultati utili rivedendo curve di apprendimento cross-validate. I nostri risultati indicano che l'utilizzo di poche ma espressive funzionalità ha già un buon vantaggio pratico per il rilevamento dei bot, soprattutto se è disponibile solo una piccola quantità di dati di allenamento.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда Твиттердің боттарын анықтау мәселесін шешуіміз керек. Біз 8385 Твиттер тіркелгілерін және оның tweets тіркелгілерін анализ, адамдар мен түрлі түрлі боттардан тұрады. Бұл деректерді машиналық оқыту классификаторларын оқыту үшін қолданып, шын және bot тіркелгілерінің арасында айыратын. Біз жақсы нәтижелерді жеткізу үшін оңай қасиеттерді анықтаймыз. Біз тіркелгісіне негізделген әртүрлі мүмкіндіктер топтарын анализ, нақты тіркелгілер мен әрекеттердің нақты мүмкіндіктерін жасап, олардың әрекеттерін өзгерту бот анықтау әді Жұмыс істеу үшін оңай болашақ көмектесу үшін тіл- агностикалық мүмкіндіктеріне көмектесеміз. Адабуст жұмыс істейтін классификаторымен 0,988 және 0,995 AUC деген дұрыс жеткіземіз. Компьютердің оқыту үшін жақсы оқыту деректерін құру көбірек - осымен қатар Твиттердің боттарды анықтау доменінде - біз көбірек оқыту деректерінің кіші деңгейіндегі шектерін қанша көбірек нәтижелерін тексеру арқы Біздің нәтижелеріміз бірнеше, бірақ өрнекті мүмкіндіктерді қолдану үшін ботты анықтау үшін жақсы практикалық пайдаланушы бар екенін көрсетеді, өйткені егер тек кішкентай оқыту', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente sprendžiame Twitter robotų aptikimo problem ą. Analizuojame 8385 Twitter sąskaitų ir jų tweetų rinkinį, sudarytą iš žmonių ir įvairių tipų robotų. Naudojame šiuos duomenis mašinų mokymosi klasifikatoriams, kurie skiriasi nuo tikrųjų ir robotų sąskaitų. Nustatome ypatumus, kuriuos lengva išgauti ir kurie vis dar duoda gerų rezultatų. We analyze different feature groups based on account specific, tweet specific and behavioral specific features and measure their performance compared to other state of the art bot detection methods.  For easy future portability of our work we focus on language-agnostic features.  AdaBoost, geriausiai veikiančio klasifikatoriaus, tikslumas yra 0,988 ir AUC yra 0,995. Kadangi gerų mokymo duomenų kūrimas mašin ų mokymosi srityje dažnai yra sudėtingas - ypač Twitter robotų aptikimo srityje - mes papildomai analizuojame, kiek mažesnis mokymo duomenų kiekis duoda naudingų rezultatų peržiūrint kryžminio mokymosi kreives. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad naudojant keletą, bet aiškių savybių, robotų aptikimui jau yra naudinga praktinė nauda, ypač jei turima tik nedidelių mokymo duomenų.', 'ms': 'In this paper we address the problem of detecting Twitter bots.  We analyze a dataset of 8385 Twitter accounts and their tweets consisting of both humans and different kinds of bots.  Kita gunakan data ini untuk melatih pembelajaran mesin yang membedakan antara akaun sebenar dan robot. Kami mengenalpasti ciri-ciri yang mudah untuk diekstrak sementara masih menyediakan keputusan yang baik. Kami menganalisis kumpulan ciri-ciri berbeza berdasarkan ciri-ciri spesifik akaun, tweet spesifik dan perilaku spesifik dan mengukur prestasi mereka dibandingkan dengan kaedah pengesan robot yang lain. Untuk kemudahan kerja kita di masa depan kita fokus pada ciri-ciri bahasa-agnostik. Dengan AdaBoost, pengklasifikasi yang terbaik, kita mencapai ketepatan 0.988 dan AUC 0.995. Sebagaimana penciptaan data latihan yang baik dalam pembelajaran mesin sering sukar - terutama dalam domain pengesan robot Twitter - kita secara tambahan menganalisis ke mana jumlah data latihan yang lebih kecil membawa kepada keputusan berguna dengan meninjau lengkung belajar yang disahkan salib. Hasil kita menunjukkan bahawa menggunakan beberapa ciri-ciri tetapi ekspresif sudah mempunyai keuntungan praktik yang baik untuk pengesan robot, terutama jika hanya sejumlah sedikit data latihan tersedia.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник го решаваме проблемот со детектирањето на роботите на Твитер. Ние анализираме податоци од 8385 Твитер сметки и нивните Твитер составени од луѓе и различни видови роботи. We use this data to train machine learning classifiers that distinguish between real and bot accounts.  Ние идентификуваме карактеристики кои се лесни да се извлечат, додека сé уште даваме добри резултати. Ние анализираме различни групи на карактеристики базирани на специфични, специфични и однесувачки специфични карактеристики и ги мериме нивните резултати во споредба со другите најдобри методи за детекција на роботи. For easy future portability of our work we focus on language-agnostic features.  Со AdaBoost, најдобриот класификатор, постигнуваме точност од 0,988 и AUC од 0,995. Бидејќи создавањето на добри податоци за обука во машинско учење честопати е тешко - особено во доменот на детекција на роботи на Твитер - додатно анализираме во каков степен помалите количини на податоци за обука водат до корисни резултати со преглед на крстовалидирани криви за Нашите резултати покажуваат дека употребата на неколку, но експресивни карактеристики веќе има добра практична корист за детекција на роботи, особено ако се достапни само мали податоци за обука.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ടൂട്ടര്\u200d ബോട്ടുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d 8385 ടൂട്ടര്\u200d അക്കൗണ്ടുകളില്\u200d ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. അവയുടെ ടൂട്ടികളും മനുഷ്യരും വ്യത്യസ്ത തരം ബ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ അക്കൌണ്ടുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്ന മെഷീന്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക നമുക്ക് പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d എളുപ്പമുള്ള പ്രതിഫലങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാം. നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ ഗ്രൂപ്പുകള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു, വിശിഷ്ടമായ, ടൂട്ടിയിട്ട് പ്രത്യേക പ്രത്യേക വിശേഷതകളും പ്രഭാവ നമ്മുടെ ജോലിയുടെ എളുപ്പമായ ഭാവിയ്ക്കുള്ള പോര്\u200dട്ടീവില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഭാഷ-അഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക്ക് ശ്രദ അഡാബൂസ്റ്റ് കൊണ്ട്, ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ക്ലാസ്റ്റിഫയര്\u200d, 0. 988 ന്റെയും 0. 995 ന്റെയും ഒരു AUC നേടുന്നു. മെഷീന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നല്ല പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നത് വളരെ പ്രയാസകരമാണ് - പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ടൂട്ടര്\u200d ബോട്ട് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ഡോമെയിനില്\u200d - കൂട നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കുറച്ച് പക്ഷെ പ്രത്യേക വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ബോട്ട് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന് ഒരു നല്ല പ്രാകൃതിക ഉപകാരമ', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument nindirizzaw il-problema li jinstabu robots fuq Twitter. Aħna nianalizzaw sett ta’ dejta ta’ 8385 kont Twitter u t-tweets tagħhom li jikkonsistu kemm mill-bnedmin kif ukoll minn tipi differenti ta’ robots. Aħna nużaw din id-dejta biex inħarrġu klassifikaturi tat-tagħlim bil-magni li jiddistingwu bejn kontijiet reali u dawk robotiċi. Aħna nidentifikaw karatteristiċi li jistgħu jiġu estratti faċilment filwaqt li għadna nagħtu riżultati tajbin. Aħna tanalizzaw gruppi differenti ta’ karatteristiċi bbażati fuq karatteristiċi speċifiċi, speċifiċi għat-tweet u speċifiċi għall-imġiba u tkejlu l-prestazzjoni tagħhom meta mqabbla ma’ metodi oħra ta’ detezzjoni tal-robots l-aktar avvanzati. Għal portabbiltà faċli fil-ġejjieni tax-xogħol tagħna niffokaw fuq karatteristiċi lingwistiċi-agnostiċi. B’AdaBoost, il-klassifikatur bl-aħjar prestazzjoni, inkisbu preċiżjoni ta’ 0.988 u AUC ta’ 0.995. Billi l-ħolqien ta’ dejta tajba ta’ taħriġ fit-tagħlim bil-magni ta’ spiss huwa diffiċli - speċjalment fil-qasam tad-detezzjoni tal-robots Twitter - aħna janalizzaw b’mod addizzjonali sa liema punt ammonti iżgħar ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ iwasslu għal riżultati utli billi nirrevedu kurvi ta’ tagħlim ivvalidati b’mod trasversali. Our results indicate that using few but expressive features already has a good practical benefit for bot detection, especially if only a small amount of training data is available.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule poruszamy problem wykrywania botów Twittera. Analizujemy zbiór danych kont Twittera 8385 i ich tweetów składających się zarówno z ludzi, jak i różnego rodzaju botów. Wykorzystujemy te dane do szkolenia klasyfikatorów uczenia maszynowego, które rozróżniają konta rzeczywiste i botowe. Identyfikujemy cechy, które są łatwe do wyodrębnienia, zapewniając jednocześnie dobre wyniki. Analizujemy różne grupy funkcji w oparciu o funkcje specyficzne dla konta, tweeta i behawioralne i mierzymy ich wydajność w porównaniu z innymi najnowocześniejszymi metodami wykrywania bot. Dla łatwego przenoszenia naszej pracy w przyszłości koncentrujemy się na funkcjach językowych. Dzięki AdaBoost, najlepiej wydajnemu klasyfikatorowi, osiągamy dokładność 0,988 i AUC 0,995. Ponieważ tworzenie dobrych danych treningowych w uczeniu maszynowym jest często trudne, zwłaszcza w dziedzinie wykrywania bot na Twitterze, analizujemy dodatkowo, w jakim stopniu mniejsze ilości danych szkoleniowych prowadzą do użytecznych wyników poprzez przegląd krzywych uczenia się krzywych. Nasze wyniki wskazują, że stosowanie kilku, ale wyrazistych funkcji już ma dobrą praktyczną korzyść w wykrywaniu botów, zwłaszcza jeśli dostępna jest tylko niewielka ilość danych treningowych.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид Твиттерийн боотуудыг олж мэдэх асуудлыг харуулж байна. Бид 8385 Твиттерийн тооны мэдээллийн хэлбэрийг шинжилгээ хийсэн бөгөөд тэдний tweets нь хоёр хүн болон өөр төрлийн ботоос бүрдсэн. Бид энэ мэдээллийг машины суралцах классификаторыг ашиглан бодит болон bot хувилбарын хоорондоо ялгаатай. Бид сайн үр дүнг гаргахад амархан хэмжээсүүдийг олж мэднэ. Бид өөр өөр төрлийн бүлгүүдийг тодорхойлолтой, тодорхойлолтой, үйл ажиллагааны тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтоор шинжилгээ хийж, урлаг бот тогтоох аргын бусад байдалтай харьцуулдаг. Ирээдүй ажлын хөдөлгөөнтэй тулд бид хэл-агностик чанар дээр анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Адабуст, хамгийн сайн ажиллаж буй ангийнхээ хувьд бид 0.988 болон 0.995-ын AUC зөв байдлыг олж чадна. Машин сургалтын сайн сургалтын өгөгдлийг бүтээх нь ихэвчлэн хэцүү, ялангуяа Твиттерийн бот тогтоох хэмжээнд бид бага сургалтын өгөгдлийн тоо хэмжээний бага хэмжээний талаар хэрэгжүүлэх үр дүнг хэрэгжүүлэхэд шийдвэрлэх нь Бидний үр дүнд хэд хэдэн гэхдээ илэрхийлдэг чадваруудыг ашиглаж байгааг харуулж байна. Ялангуяа жижиг хэмжээний сургалтын мэдээллийг ашиглах боломжтой болно.', 'no': 'I denne papiret adressere vi problemet med å finna Twitter-bots. Vi analyserer ein dataset med 8385 Twitter-kontoar og tweetene sine som inneheld både menneske og ulike typar botn. Vi bruker denne data for å trenja maskinelæringsklassifikatorar som skiljar mellom reale og botkontoar. Vi identifiserer funksjonar som er lett å pakka ut medan det fortsatt gjev gode resultat. Vi analyserer ulike funksjonsgrupper basert på kontoen spesifikke, tweet spesifikke og atferdsspesifikke funksjonar og målar utviklinga sine sammenlignet med andre tilstandar på kunstbot-oppdagingsmetodane. For enkle framtidige portabilitet av arbeidet vårt fokuserer vi på språk-agnostiske funksjonar. Med AdaBoost, den beste klassifiserende klassifiseren, oppnår vi eit nøyaktig 0,988 og ein AUC med 0,995. Som det ofte er vanskeleg å oppretta gode opplæringsdata i maskinelæring, særleg i domenet for oppdaging av Twitter-bot, er vi tillegg analysere kor mykje mindre mengda opplæringsdata fører til nyttige resultat ved å gjera gjennomgang av kryssverdierte læringskurver. Resultatet våre viser at bruk av få, men uttrykk funksjonar har allereie ein god praktisk nyttig for bot-oppdaging, spesielt dersom berre ei liten mengd treningsdata er tilgjengeleg.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare abordăm problema detectării roboților Twitter. Analizăm un set de date de 8385 de conturi Twitter și tweeturile acestora constând atât din oameni, cât și din diferite tipuri de roboți. Folosim aceste date pentru a instrui clasificatori de învățare automată care disting între conturile reale și conturile de bot. Identificăm caracteristici care sunt ușor de extras, oferind în același timp rezultate bune. Analizăm diferite grupuri de caracteristici bazate pe caracteristici specifice contului, tweet specifice și comportamentale specifice și măsurăm performanța acestora în comparație cu alte metode de detectare a roboților de ultimă generație. Pentru o portabilitate ușoară în viitor a activității noastre, ne concentrăm pe caracteristicile lingvistice. Cu AdaBoost, cel mai performant clasificator, obtinem o precizie de 0,988 si o ASC de 0,995. Deoarece crearea de date bune de instruire în învățarea automată este adesea dificilă - în special în domeniul detectării roboților Twitter - analizăm în plus în ce măsură cantități mai mici de date de instruire duc la rezultate utile prin revizuirea curbelor de învățare validate încrucișat. Rezultatele noastre indică faptul că utilizarea unor caracteristici puține, dar expresive, are deja un beneficiu practic bun pentru detectarea roboților, mai ales dacă sunt disponibile doar o cantitate mică de date de antrenament.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru rješavamo problem otkrivanja Twitter robota. Analiziramo seriju podataka od 8385 tviterskih računa i njihovih tweeta koji se sastoje od ljudi i različitih vrsta robota. Koristimo ove podatke da treniramo klasifikatore za učenje mašina koji razlikuju između pravih i robotskih računa. Identificiramo karakteristike koje su lako izvući dok još uvek pružamo dobre rezultate. Analiziramo različite grupe karakteristike na temelju specifičnih, specifičnih i ponašanja, i mjerimo njihove funkcije u usporedbi sa drugim stanjem detektivnih metoda umjetničkih robota. Za lako buduću prijenosnost našeg rada fokusiramo se na jezik-agnostičke karakteristike. Sa AdaBoostom, najboljim klasifikatorom, postižemo taènost od 0,988 i AUC od 0,995. Zato što je stvaranje dobrih podataka o obuci u učenju mašina često teško - posebno u domenu otkrivanja robota Twitter - dodatno analiziramo u kakvoj mjeri manje količine podataka obuke dovede do korisnih rezultata pregledanjem prekovjerenih kriva učenja. Naši rezultati ukazuju na to da korištenje nekoliko, ali ekspresivnih karakteristika već ima dobru praktičnu korist za otkrivanje robota, posebno ako je dostupno samo mala količina podataka o obuci.', 'so': "Warqadan waxaynu ka sheekeysanaynaa dhibaatada ogaashada bots-ka Twitterka. Analbaaraynaa kooban akawno 8385 ah iyo tweetiyadooda oo ka mid ah dad iyo bots kala duduwan. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa macluumaadkan si aan u tababarinno barashada mashiinka oo kala duduwan akawnada runta ah iyo takhasuska. Waxaynu garanaynaa tayooyin fudud in la soo bixiyo inta ay weli helaan resulto wanaagsan. We analyze different feature groups based on account specific, tweet specific and behavioral specific features and measure their performance compared to other state of the art bot detection methods.  Si fudud ugu filan awoodda mustaqbalka shaqadeeda, waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa aqoonta afka. AdaBoost, kooxaha ugu fiican ee sameynta, waxaan gaadhnaa saxda 0.988 iyo AUC 0.995. Sida darteed sameynta macluumaadka waxbarashada wanaagsan ee machineedku waa adag yahay, gaar ahaan meesha laga helo baaritaanka botka ee Twitterka- waxaynu kaloo ku sawirannaa qiyaastii ay ka yar tahay macluumaadka waxbarashada sababtoo faa'iido leh ka baaraandegista qalabka waxbarashada. Abaalkayaga waxaa loola jeedaa in isticmaalka faa'iido yar laakiin waxyaabo muuqda ah ay tayo leedahay faa'iido caadi ah oo aad u baahan karto bot, khusuusan haddii lagu helo macluumaad wax yar oo waxbarasho ah.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats tar vi upp problemet med att upptäcka Twitter bots. Vi analyserar en dataset med 8385 Twitter-konton och deras tweets bestående av både människor och olika typer av robotar. Vi använder dessa data för att utbilda maskininlärningsklassificerare som skiljer mellan riktiga konton och botkonton. Vi identifierar funktioner som är lätta att extrahera samtidigt som de ger bra resultat. Vi analyserar olika funktionsgrupper baserat på kontospecifika, tweetspecifika och beteendespecifika funktioner och mäter deras prestanda jämfört med andra toppmoderna botdetekteringsmetoder. För enkel framtida portabilitet av vårt arbete fokuserar vi på språkoberoende funktioner. Med AdaBoost, den bästa klassificeringen, uppnår vi en noggrannhet på 0,988 och en AUC på 0,995. Eftersom det ofta är svårt att skapa bra träningsdata inom maskininlärning – särskilt inom Twitter-robotdetektering – analyserar vi dessutom i vilken utsträckning mindre mängder träningsdata leder till användbara resultat genom att granska korsvaliderade inlärningskurvor. Våra resultat visar att användningen av få men uttrycksfulla funktioner redan har en bra praktisk fördel för botdetektering, särskilt om endast en liten mängd träningsdata finns tillgänglig.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ට්විටර් බොට්ස් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා. අපි 8385 ට්විටර් ගිණුම් සහ ඔවුන්ගේ ට්විට් එක්ක විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා මිනිස්සු සහ වෙනස් වර්ගයක් වගේ බොට්ස අපි මේ දත්ත පාවිච්චි කරන්නේ පණිවිඩය ඉගෙන ගණුදෙනු විශේෂකයන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න. ඇත්ත සහ බොට්  අපි හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර අපි වෙනස් විශේෂ කණ්ඩායම් විශේෂ කණ්ඩායම් විශේෂ කරනවා, විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශ අපේ වැඩේ සැලසුම් අනාගතයේ අනාගතය සඳහා අපි භාෂාව-අග්නෝස්ටික් වලට බලන්නේ. ඇඩාබූස්ට් එක්ක, හොඳම ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන්, අපි 0.988 වල සහ 0.995 වල AUC එකක් ලැබෙනවා. මැෂින් ඉගෙනීමේ හොඳ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දත්ත නිර්මාණය විදිහට අමාරුයි - විශේෂයෙන්ම ට්විටර් බොට් හොයාගනීමේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා - අප අපේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා නමුත් ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் Twitter பாட்டுகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பிரச்சனையை குறிக்கிறோம். 8385 தொடர்பு கணக்குகள் மற்றும் அவர்களின் tweets இருவரும் மனிதர்கள் மற்றும் வேறு வகையான பாட்டுகள் உள்ளன. நாம் இந்த தரவை பயன்படுத்தி உண்மையான மற்றும் போட் கணக்குகளுக்கிடையே பிரித்துக் கொள்ளும் வகுப்பாடுகளை பயி நாம் இன்னும் நல்ல முடிவுகளை கொடுக்கும் போது எளிதாக வெளியேற்றும் குணங்களை கண்டறியும். குறிப்பிட்ட, குறிப்பிட்ட மற்றும் நடத்தைக் குறிப்பிட்ட பண்புகளை அடிப்படையில் வேறு குழுக்களை ஆய்வு செய்து கலை பாட் கண்டறிதல்  எளிதான எதிர்காலத்திற்கு நம் வேலையின் ஒதுக்கீட்டுக்கு நாம் மொழியின் குணங்களை கவனம் செலுத்த AdaBoost உடன், சிறந்த செயல்படுத்தும் வகுப்பாளர், நாம் 0.988 மற்றும் 0.995-ன் AUC ஒரு சரியாக பெறுகிறோம். இயந்திரத்தில் நல்ல பயிற்சி தரவை உருவாக்குவது பெரும்பாலும் கடினமாக இருக்கிறது - குறிப்பாக தொடர் பாட் கண்டுபிடிப்பதின் களத்தில் - சிறிய பயிற்சி தரவுகள் எவ்வளவு அளவ எங்கள் முடிவுகள் சில ஆனால் காட்சி குணங்களை பயன்படுத்தி போட் கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு ஏற்கனவே ஒரு நல்ல செயல்பாடு பயன்பாடு உள்ளது, குறிப்', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں توئیٹر بوٹوں کا مشکل تلاش کریں گے۔ ہم نے 8385 ٹویٹر کی حساب اور ان کی ٹویٹوں میں سے ایک ڈیٹ سٹ کا تحلیل کیا ہے جو انسان اور مختلف طریقے روٹوں میں ہے۔ ہم اس ڈیٹا کا استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ماشین سیکھنے کے کلاسپیر کو ٹرین کریں جو حقیقی اور بوٹ اکانٹوں کے درمیان جدا کرتے ہیں. ہم پہچان رہے ہیں جو اٹھانے کے لئے آسان ہیں اور ابھی بھی اچھے نتیجے دیتے ہیں۔ ہم مختلف فرق گروہوں کو مشخص حساب پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں، ٹویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ویٹ ہمارے کام کے آسان مستقبل پورٹیبلیٹ کے لئے ہم زبان-agnostic فرصت پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں۔ AdaBoost کے ساتھ، سب سے بہترین کاربرد کلاسیر کے ساتھ، ہم 0.988 اور 0.995 کی AUC کا ایک دقیق پہنچ سکتے ہیں. جیسے ماشین تعلیم میں اچھی ترسین ڈیٹ کا پیدا کرنا بہت ہی مشکل ہے - مخصوصاً ٹویٹر بوٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ کے ڈیٹ میں - ہم اضافہ کریں کہ کس طرح چھوٹی ترسین ہمارے نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ تھوڑی لیکن مثبت کی استعمال سے پہلے بت شناساتے کے لئے بہترین فائدہ ہے، مخصوصا اگر صرف تھوڑی سی تعلیم دیٹے موجود ہیں۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda Twitterning botlarini aniqlash muammolarini boshqaramiz. Biz 8385 Twitterning haqida maʼlumotlar tarkibini analyzmaymiz va ularning tweetilari odamlar va har xil turli botlar kabi. Biz bu maʼlumotdan foydalanamiz, asosiy va bot hisoblari орасида ajratilgan kompyuterni o'rganish mumkin. Biz yaxshi natijalarni olib tashlash oson xususiyatlarni aniqlashimiz mumkin. Biz hisobot uchun foydalanuvchi boshqa xossa, xabar va xususiyatlarni bajaramiz va sanam bot qidirish usullarining boshqa holatiga qidirish imkoniyatlarini bajaramiz. Biz ishimizning eng fudud kelajakdagi vazifani o'zgartirish uchun biz tilning ganostik xususiyatlariga foydalanamiz. AdaBoost bilan eng yaxshi bajarish darajasi, biz 0.988 va 0.995'ning AUC haqida yetganmiz. Masofadagi o'rganish uchun yaxshi taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni yaratish juda qiyin edi - hususan Twitter bot qidirish davrida juda qisqa taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar qanday foydalanish natijalarini o'rganish mumkin. Bizning natijalarimiz esa bir necha lekin foydalanuvchi xususiyatlarni ishlatish uchun yaxshi foydalanishi mumkin, ammo faqat faqat taʼminlovchi qisqa maʼlumot mavjud boʻlsa.", 'vi': 'Trong bài báo này chúng tôi giải quyết vấn đề phát hiện bot trên Twitter. Chúng tôi phân tích dữ liệu của các tài khoản Twitter 8385 và những dòng tweet của họ gồm cả con người và các loại bot khác nhau. Chúng tôi dùng dữ liệu này để đào tạo các phân loại máy móc có phân biệt được các tài khoản thật và robot. Chúng tôi xác định các tính năng dễ khai thác trong khi vẫn cung cấp kết quả tốt. Chúng tôi phân tích các nhóm đặc trưng khác nhau dựa trên các tính năng đặc biệt và hành vi, và đo đạc khả năng của họ so với các phương pháp phát hiện robot nghệ thuật khác. Để dễ dàng mang thai trong tương lai chúng tôi tập trung vào các tính chất ngôn ngữ. Với Ada Boost, the best operating classificar, chúng ta có độ chính xác 0.988 và một AUC of 0.995. Vì việc tạo ra dữ liệu huấn luyện tốt trong việc học máy thường rất khó khăn- đặc biệt là trong lĩnh vực phát hiện ra robot Twitter- chúng tôi cũng phân tích thêm đến mức độ lượng ít dữ liệu về huấn luyện dẫn đến kết quả hữu ích bằng cách xem các đường cong học được đánh giá chéo. Kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy sử dụng vài tính năng biểu lộ đã có lợi ích thực tế tốt cho việc tìm ra robot, đặc biệt nếu chỉ có một lượng nhỏ dữ liệu về huấn luyện.', 'bg': 'В тази статия разглеждаме проблема с откриването на ботове в Туитър. Анализираме набор от данни от 8385 акаунта и техните туитове, състоящи се както от хора, така и от различни видове ботове. Използваме тези данни, за да обучаваме класификатори за машинно обучение, които разграничават реални и бот акаунти. Ние идентифицираме функции, които са лесни за извличане, като същевременно осигуряват добри резултати. Анализираме различни групи функции въз основа на специфични за акаунт, специфични за туит и поведенчески специфични характеристики и измерваме тяхната ефективност в сравнение с други съвременни методи за откриване на ботове. За лесна бъдеща преносимост на нашата работа ние се фокусираме върху езиково-агностичните функции. С най-добрия класификатор постигаме точност от 0.988 и AUC от 0.995. Тъй като създаването на добри данни за обучение в машинното обучение често е трудно - особено в областта на откриването на ботове в Допълнително анализираме до каква степен по-малки количества данни за обучение водят до полезни резултати чрез преглед на кръстосани криви на обучение. Нашите резултати показват, че използването на малко, но изразителни функции вече има добра практическа полза за откриването на ботове, особено ако има само малко количество данни за обучение.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru rješavamo problem otkrivanja Twitter robota. Analiziramo set podataka s 8385 tviterskih računa i njihovih tweets koji se sastoje od ljudi i različitih vrsta robota. Koristimo ove podatke za obuku klasifikatora za učenje strojeva koji razlikuju između pravih i robotskih računa. Identificiramo karakteristike koje su lako izvući dok još uvek pružamo dobre rezultate. Analiziramo različite skupine karakteristika na temelju specifičnih, specifičnih i ponašanja tviteta i mjerenja njihove učinkovitosti u usporedbi s drugim stanjem metoda otkrivanja umjetničkih robota. Za lako buduću prijenosnost našeg rada fokusiramo se na jezik-agnostičke karakteristike. Sa AdaBoost, najboljim klasifikatorom, postigli smo preciznost od 0,988 i AUC od 0,995. Pošto je stvaranje dobrih podataka o obuci u učenju strojeva često teško - posebno u domenu otkrivanja robota Twitter - dodatno analiziramo u kojoj mjeri manje količine podataka o obuci dovede do korisnih rezultata pregledanjem prekovjerenih krova učenja. Naši rezultati ukazuju na to da korištenje nekoliko ali izrazitih karakteristika već ima dobru praktičnu korist za otkrivanje robota, posebno ako je dostupno samo mala količina podataka o obuci.', 'da': 'I denne artikel behandler vi problemet med at detektere Twitter bots. Vi analyserer et datasæt af 8385 Twitter-konti og deres tweets bestående af både mennesker og forskellige slags bots. Vi bruger disse data til at træne maskinindlæringsklassificere, der skelner mellem rigtige konti og bot konti. Vi identificerer funktioner, der er nemme at udtrække og samtidig giver gode resultater. Vi analyserer forskellige funktionsgrupper baseret på kontospecifikke, tweetspecifikke og adfærdsspecifikke funktioner og måler deres ydeevne sammenlignet med andre state of te art botdetekteringsmetoder. For nem fremtidig portabilitet af vores arbejde fokuserer vi på sprog-agnostiske funktioner. Med AdaBoost, den bedste klassificering, opnår vi en nøjagtighed på 0,988 og en AUC på 0,995. Da det ofte er vanskeligt at skabe gode træningsdata inden for maskinlæring - især inden for Twitter bot detektion - analyserer vi desuden, i hvilket omfang mindre mængder træningsdata fører til nyttige resultater ved at gennemgå tværgvaliderede læringskurver. Vores resultater viser, at brugen af få, men udtryksfulde funktioner allerede har en god praktisk fordel for bot detektion, især hvis kun en lille mængde træningsdata er tilgængelige.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel behandelen we het probleem van het detecteren van Twitter bots. We analyseren een dataset van 8385 Twitter accounts en hun tweets bestaande uit zowel mensen als verschillende soorten bots. We gebruiken deze gegevens om machine learning classificatoren te trainen die onderscheid maken tussen echte en bot accounts. We identificeren kenmerken die gemakkelijk te extraheren zijn en toch goede resultaten bieden. We analyseren verschillende functiegroepen op basis van accountspecifieke, tweetspecifieke en gedragsspecifieke functies en meten hun prestaties in vergelijking met andere state-of-the-art botdetectiemethoden. Voor een gemakkelijke toekomstige portabiliteit van ons werk richten we ons op taalagnostische functies. Met AdaBoost, de best presterende classificator, bereiken we een nauwkeurigheid van 0.988 en een AUC van 0.995. Omdat het creëren van goede trainingsdata in machine learning vaak moeilijk is, vooral op het gebied van Twitter bot detectie, analyseren we bovendien in hoeverre kleinere hoeveelheden trainingsdata leiden tot nuttige resultaten door cross-gevalideerde leercurves te bekijken. Onze resultaten wijzen erop dat het gebruik van weinig maar expressieve functies al een goed praktisch voordeel heeft voor botdetectie, vooral als er slechts een kleine hoeveelheid trainingsgegevens beschikbaar is.', 'id': 'Dalam koran ini kita mengatasi masalah deteksi robot Twitter. Kami menganalisis dataset 8385 rekening Twitter dan tweet mereka yang terdiri dari manusia dan jenis robot yang berbeda. We use this data to train machine learning classifiers that distinguish between real and bot accounts.  Kami mengidentifikasi fitur yang mudah untuk diekstraksi sementara masih menyediakan hasil yang baik. Kami menganalisa kelompok karakteristik berbeda berdasarkan akaun spesifik, spesifik tweet dan perilaku spesifik karakteristik dan mengukur prestasi mereka dibandingkan dengan metode deteksi robot terbaik lainnya. Untuk kemampuan mudah di masa depan pekerjaan kita kita fokus pada karakteristik bahasa-agnostik. Dengan AdaBoost, klasifikasi yang terbaik, kita mencapai akurasi 0,988 dan AUC 0,995. Karena penciptaan data pelatihan yang baik dalam pembelajaran mesin sering sulit - terutama dalam domain deteksi robot Twitter - kita tambahan menganalisis ke mana jumlah data pelatihan yang lebih kecil mengarah ke hasil berguna dengan meninjau kurva pelatihan cross-validated. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa menggunakan beberapa karakteristik ekspresif sudah memiliki keuntungan praktis yang baik untuk deteksi robot, terutama jika hanya jumlah kecil data latihan tersedia.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما مشکل کشف ربات توئیتر را حل می کنیم. ما مجموعه داده\u200cهای 8385 حساب توئیتر و توئیت\u200cهایشان را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم که از انسان و نوع ربات مختلف است. ما از این اطلاعات استفاده می کنیم تا کلیسا یادگیری ماشین را آموزش دهیم که بین حساب واقعی و ربات جدا می کنند. ما ویژگی\u200cهایی را شناسایی می\u200cکنیم که در حالی که هنوز نتیجه\u200cهای خوبی را ارائه می\u200cدهیم آسان استخراج کنند. ما گروه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای مختلف را بر اساس حساب خاص، توئیت ویژه\u200cهای ویژه و رفتار خاص تحلیل می\u200cکنیم و عملکرد آنها را در مقایسه با وضعیت دیگر روش شناسایی bot\u200cهای هنر اندازه می\u200cدهیم. برای حمل آینده آسان کار ما روی ویژه\u200cهای زبان-agnostic تمرکز می\u200cکنیم. با آدابوست، بهترین سرپرست\u200cکننده\u200cای که انجام می\u200cدهد، دقیق 0.988 و AUC 0.995 را می\u200cرسانیم. در حالی که ایجاد داده های آموزش خوب در یادگیری ماشین اغلب سخت است - مخصوصا در دامنه شناسایی bot توئیتر - ما اضافه می کنیم تا چه اندازه کوچک از داده های آموزش به نتیجه های مفید با تحقیق کره های یادگیری متصل شده است. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای کمی ولی ویژه\u200cهای مثبت قبلاً سود کاری خوبی برای شناسایی ربات دارد، مخصوصا اگر فقط یک مقدار اندکی از داده\u200cهای آموزش موجود باشد.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag behandeln wir das Problem der Erkennung von Twitter Bots. Wir analysieren einen Datensatz von 8385 Twitter Accounts und deren Tweets, bestehend aus Menschen und verschiedenen Arten von Bots. Wir verwenden diese Daten, um Machine Learning Klassifikatoren zu trainieren, die zwischen Real- und Bot-Konten unterscheiden. Wir identifizieren Merkmale, die leicht zu extrahieren sind und dennoch gute Ergebnisse liefern. Wir analysieren verschiedene Funktionsgruppen basierend auf kontenspezifischen, tweetspezifischen und verhaltensspezifischen Features und messen deren Leistung im Vergleich zu anderen hochmodernen Bot-Erkennungsmethoden. Für eine einfache zukünftige Portabilität unserer Arbeit konzentrieren wir uns auf sprachunabhängige Funktionen. Mit AdaBoost, dem leistungsstärksten Klassifikator, erreichen wir eine Genauigkeit von 0,988 und eine AUC von 0,995. Da die Erstellung guter Trainingsdaten im maschinellen Lernen insbesondere im Bereich der Twitter-Bot-Erkennung oft schwierig ist, analysieren wir zusätzlich, inwieweit kleinere Mengen an Trainingsdaten zu nützlichen Ergebnissen führen, indem wir kreuzvalidierte Lernkurven überprüfen. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die Verwendung von wenigen, aber ausdrucksstarken Features bereits einen guten praktischen Nutzen für die Bot-Erkennung hat, insbesondere wenn nur wenige Trainingsdaten verfügbar sind.', 'ko': '이 글은 트위터 로봇을 검출하는 문제를 해결할 예정이다.우리는 8385개의 트위터 계정을 포함하는 데이터 집합과 인간과 다양한 종류의 로봇을 포함한 트윗을 분석했다.우리는 이 데이터를 사용하여 기계 학습 분류기를 훈련시키고 실제 계정과 로봇 계정을 구분한다.우리는 추출하기 쉬운 특징을 식별할 수 있을 뿐만 아니라, 좋은 결과를 제공할 수 있다.우리는 특정한 계정, 특정한 트위터와 특정한 행위의 특징에 따라 서로 다른 특징팀을 분석하고 다른 가장 선진적인 로봇 검측 방법에 비해 그들의 성능을 평가한다.미래의 이식에 편리하도록 우리는 언어의 알 수 없는 특성에 중점을 둘 것이다.가장 성능이 좋은 AdaBoost 분류기를 사용하여 0.988의 정확도와 0.995의 AUC를 실현하였습니다.기계학습에서 좋은 훈련 데이터를 만드는 것은 보통 어렵기 때문에 특히 트위터 로봇 검측 분야에서 교차 검증된 학습 곡선을 보면서 소량의 훈련 데이터가 어느 정도 유용한 결과를 낼 수 있는지 분석했다.우리의 결과에 따르면 소량이지만 표현력을 가진 특징을 사용하는 것은 로봇 검측에 좋은 실용 가치를 가진다. 특히 소량의 훈련 데이터만 사용할 수 있는 상황에서.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii tunajadili tatizo la kutambua boti za Twita. Tunafahamu takwimu za akaunti za Twita 8385 na twiti zao zinazojumuisha binadamu na namna mbalimbali za boti. We use this data to train machine learning classifiers that distinguish between real and bot accounts.  Tunatambua alama ambazo ni rahisi kupata wakati bado tunatoa matokeo mazuri. Tunafahamu makundi tofauti yanayohusiana na akaunti maalum, twiti maalum na tabia mahususi na kupima utendaji wao ukilinganisha na namna nyingine za kutambua bot za sanaa. Kwa uwezekano rahisi wa baadaye wa kazi zetu tunajikita kwenye vipengele vya lugha. Kwa AdaBoost, mfanyakazi bora wa kufanya kazi, tunapata uhakika wa 0.988 na AUC wa 0.995. Wakati kutengeneza taarifa nzuri za mafunzo katika kujifunza mashine mara nyingi ni ngumu - hasa katika maeneo ya kutambua bot za Twita - tunachambua kwa kiasi kidogo cha taarifa za mafunzo yanasababisha matokeo yanayofaa kwa kuangalia viungo vya kujifunza vinavyohitajika. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa kwa kutumia vipengele machache lakini vya kuonyesha tayari ina faida nzuri kwa ajili ya kutambua bot, hususani kama tu kiasi kidogo cha taarifa za mafunzo yanapatikana.', 'tr': 'Biz bu kagyzda Twitter botlaryny tapmakyň meselesini çözýäris. Biz 8385 Twitter hesaplarındaki veri setini analiz ediyoruz ve twetlerini hem insan hem farklı çeşitli botlardan oluşan. Biz bu maglumatlary hakyky we bot esaplaryň arasynda tapawutlyk bilen maşyny öwrenmek klasifikalaryny öwrenmek üçin ulanýarys. Biz heniz hem gowy netijeler bererken aňsat çykmak üçin aňsat özellikleri belirleýäris. Biz dürli özellikler toparlaryny belli hasapla, tweet edilen hasaplanja we hereketlere görä çözümlerini çözümleýäris we sungat bot deteksiyonyň başga durumlaryna görä çözümleýäris. Işlerimiziň aňsat gelejek taýýarlanmasy üçin dilleriň agnostik özelliklerine üns berýäris. AdaBoost bilen iň gowy synplançy bilen 0.988 we 0.995-yň bir AUC dykkalygyny ýetip barýarys. Maşynyň öwrenmesinde gowy okuw maglumatyny döretmäge köplenç kyndyr - özellikle Twitter bot dyşynyň esasynda - biz esasy çykyş maglumatyň azajyk toparynyň nähili kiçi maglumatyň üstüne geçirilýän netijesini çykaryp bardyryn. Biziň netijelerimiz birnäçe üýtgeşik ulanmak üçin eýýäm bot deteksiyonyna gowy praktik bir faydasy bar, ýöne-de eger diňe kiçi kiçi bir bilim maglumaty bar.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ የTwitter bots ማግኘት ጉዳይ ላይ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ 8385 የትዊተር አካባቢዎች እና በትዊተቶቻቸው ሰዎች እና ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ደረጃዎች የሚቆጠሩ ዳታተሮችን እናስተያይዛለን፡፡ We use this data to train machine learning classifiers that distinguish between real and bot accounts.  ጥሩ ፍሬዎችን ሲሰጥሩ ቀላል ማውጣትን እናውቃለን፡፡ አካባቢ፣ በትዊተር እና ሁኔታ የተለየ እና የሥርዓት ምርጫዎችን እናስተዋልታለን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ለቀላል የቀድሞው ስራታችን የቋንቋ-አቀማመጥ እውቀት ላይ እናቆማለን፡፡ ከአዳBoost ጋር የደረጃ ክፍለ አዳራቢ የ0.988 እና የ0.995 AUC አግኝተናል፡፡ በቴክኖስ ማስተማር ውስጥ ጥሩ የድምፅ መረጃዎች መፍጠር ብዙ ጊዜ አስቸጋሪ ነው - ይልቁንም በትዊተር ቦት ግንኙነት ውስጥ፣ የትምህርት ዳታዎች ምን ያህል ትንሽ ትምህርት የሚያስፈልገው ፍሬዎችን በመመለከት የሚጠቅመውን ፍሬዎችን እናሳያልን፡፡ ፍሬቶቻችን ጥቂት ነገር ግን የግልጽ ምርጫዎች በመጠቀም ለቦት ማግኘት መልካም ጥቅም አለበት፣ በተለየ ጥቂት ማህበረሰብ ዳታ ብቻ ቢገኝ ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'In this paper we address the problem of detecting Twitter bots.  Ne analizojmë një grup të dhënash me 8385 llogari Twitter dhe tweetet e tyre që përbëhen nga njerëzit dhe lloje të ndryshme robotësh. Ne përdorim këto të dhëna për të trajnuar klasifikuesit e mësimit të makinave që dallojnë midis llogarive reale dhe të robotëve. Ne identifikojmë karakteristika që janë të lehta për të nxjerrë ndërsa ende ofrojmë rezultate të mira. Ne analizojmë grupe të ndryshme karakteristike bazuar në llogari specifike, specifike të tweetit dhe specifike sjelljeje dhe matëm performancën e tyre krahasuar me metodat e tjera të gjendjes së robotëve. Për transferueshmërinë e ardhshme të lehtë të punës sonë ne përqëndrohemi në karakteristikat gjuhë-agnostike. Me AdaBoost, klasifikuesin më të mirë, arrijmë një saktësi 0.988 dhe një AUC 0.995. Ndërsa krijimi i të dhënave të mira të trajnimit në mësimin e makinave është shpesh i vështirë - veçanërisht në fushën e zbulimit të robotëve në Twitter - ne analizojmë në mënyrë shtesë sa sasi më të vogla të të dhënave të trajnimit çojnë në rezultate të dobishme duke shqyrtuar kurvat e mësimit të kryqëzuar të validuara. Rezultatet tona tregojnë se përdorimi i disa karakteristikave por shprehëse tashmë ka një përfitim të mirë praktik për zbulimin e robotëve, veçanërisht në qoftë se vetëm një sasi e vogël të dhënash treinimi është në dispozicion.', 'af': "In hierdie papier adres ons die probleem om Twitter-bots te ontdek. Ons analyseer 'n datastel van 8385 Twitter rekeninge en hulle tweets wat bestaan van beide mense en verskillende soorte bots. Ons gebruik hierdie data om masjien leer klassifiseerders te trein wat tussen reël en botrekeninge verskil. Ons identifiseer funksies wat maklik is om te uitpak terwyl nog goeie resultate verskaf word. Ons analiseer verskillende funksiegroepe gebaseer op rekening spesifieke, tweet spesifieke en gedragspesifieke funksies en maat hulle prestasie vergelyk met ander staat van die kuns bot-opdekking metodes. Vir maklike toekomstige draagbare van ons werk fokus ons op taal agnostiese funksies. Met AdaBoost, die beste uitvoerde klassifiseerder, het ons 'n presies van 0,988 en 'n AUC van 0,995 bereik. Omdat die skepping van goeie onderwerp data in masjien leer dikwels moeilik is - veral in die domein van Twitter bot-opdekking - ons bygelyks analiseer na wat uitbreiding kleiner hoeveelheid onderwerp data lei na gebruiklike resultate deur oorskou van kruisgevaliderde onderwerp kurves. Ons resultate wys dat die gebruik van paar maar uitdrukking funksies reeds 'n goeie praktiese voordeel vir bot-opdekking het, veral as slegs 'n klein hoeveelheid onderwerking data beskikbaar is.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք լուծում ենք Թվիթերի ռոբոտների հայտնաբերման խնդիրը: Մենք վերլուծում ենք 8385 թվիթերի հաշվի տվյալների համակարգը և նրանց թվիթերը, որոնք կազմված են մարդկանց և տարբեր տիպի ռոբոտների միջոցով: Մենք օգտագործում ենք այս տվյալները մեքենային ուսումնասիրության դասակարգերի ուսուցման համար, որոնք տարբերակում են իրական և ռոբոտ հաշիվները: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք առանձնահատկություններ, որոնք հեշտ է վերցնել, մինչդեռ լավ արդյունքներ են տալիս: Մենք վերլուծում ենք տարբեր հատկանիշների խմբեր, հիմնված հաշվի հատկանիշների, թվիթերի հատկանիշների և վարքագծային հատկանիշների վրա, և չափում ենք նրանց արտադրողությունը համեմատած այլ լավագույն ռոբոտների հայտնաբերման Մեր աշխատանքի հեշտ ապագայի տեղափոխելիության համար մենք կենտրոնանում ենք լեզվի ագնոստիկ հատկանիշների վրա: Ադաբուստի, լավագույն արդյունքում ունեցող դասակարգչի օգնությամբ մենք հասնում ենք 0.988 ճշգրտության և 0.995 ԱՍՔ: As the creation of good training data in machine learning is often difficult - especially in the domain of Twitter bot detection - we additionally analyze to what extent smaller amounts of training data lead to useful results by reviewing cross-validated learning curves.  Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ օգտագործելով մի քանի, բայց արտահայտող առանձնահատկություններ արդեն լավ պրակտիկ օգուտ ունի ռոբոտների հայտնաբերման համար, հատկապես եթե միայն մի փոքր քանակությամբ ուսուցման տվյալներ', 'az': 'Bu kağızda Twitter botlarını keşfetmək problemlərini çəkirik. Biz 8385 Twitter hesablarını və tweetlərini analiz edirik. Biz bu məlumatları gerçek və bot hesablarının arasında ayıran maşın öyrənməsi klasifikatorlarını təhsil etmək üçün istifadə edirik. Biz hələ də yaxşı sonuçlar verirkən çıxarmaq üçün asan olan xüsusiyyətləri tanıyırıq. Biz müxtəlif xüsusiyyətlər qruplarını müəyyən hesabda, tweet xüsusiyyətli və davranış xüsusiyyətlərə dayanan tərzlərini analiz edirik və onların performanslarını başqa şəkildə bot keşf metodlarına qarşılaşdırırıq. Bizim işimizin asanlıqla gələcək portabiliyyətimiz üçün dil-agnostik özelliklərinə odaqlanır. AdaBoost ilə ən yaxşı müəyyən sıralayıcı, biz 0,988 və 0,995 AUC ilə müəyyən edilmişik. Makinelərin öyrənməsində yaxşı təhsil verilən məlumatların yaratması çox çətindir - xüsusilə Twitter bot keşfinin domeində - biz həmçin in daha kiçik təhsil verilən məlumatların nə qədər kiçik dəyişiklik məlumatların faydalı sonuçlarına yol verəcəyini təhsil edirik ki, çox təhs Bizim sonuçlarımız indirir ki, az fakat ifadə edici xüsusiyyətlərin istifadəsi artıq bot deteksiyonu üçün yaxşı praktik faydası var, özellikle ki, yalnız kiçik dəyişik təhsil məlumatları faydalanırsa.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru riješimo problem otkrivanja Twitter robota. Analiziramo set podataka sa 8385 tviterskih računa i njihovih tweets koji se sastoje od ljudi i različitih vrsta robota. Koristimo ove podatke da treniramo klasifikatore za učenje strojeva koji razlikuju između pravih i robotskih računa. Identificiramo karakteristike koje su lako izvući dok još uvek pružamo dobre rezultate. Analiziramo različite grupe karakteristika na temelju specifičnih, specifičnih i ponašanja tviteta i mjerenja njihove funkcije u usporedbi s drugim stanjem metoda otkrivanja umjetničkih robota. Za lako buduću prijenosnost našeg rada fokusiramo se na jezik-agnostičke karakteristike. Sa AdaBoostom, najboljim klasifikatorom, postigli smo preciznost od 0,988 i AUC od 0,995. Zato što je stvaranje dobrih podataka o obuci u učenju strojeva često teško - posebno u domenu otkrivanja robota Twitter - dodatno analiziramo u kakvoj mjeri manje količine podataka o obuci dovede do korisnih rezultata pregledanjem prekovjerenih krova učenja. Naši rezultati ukazuju na to da korištenje nekoliko, ali izrazitih karakteristika već ima dobru praktičnu korist za otkrivanje robota, posebno ako je dostupno samo mala količina podataka o obuci.', 'ca': "En aquest article abordem el problema de detectar robots de Twitter. Analitzem un conjunt de dades de 8385 comptes de Twitter i els seus tweets, composts tant dels humans com de diferents tipus de robots. Utilitzem aquestes dades per formar classificadors d'aprenentatge màquinari que distingeixen entre comptes reals i robots. Identifiquem característiques que són fàcils d'extrair mentre proporcionem bons resultats. We analyze different feature groups based on account specific, tweet specific and behavioral specific features and measure their performance compared to other state of the art bot detection methods.  Per a la fàcil portabilitat futura de la nostra feina ens centrem en les característiques lingüístices. Amb AdaBoost, el classificador de millors resultats, obtenim una precisió de 0,988 i una AUC de 0,995. Com la creació de bones dades d'entrenament en l'aprenentatge automàtic sovint és difícil - especialment en el domini de la detecció de robots en Twitter - analitzem addicionalment en quin punt més petites quantitats de dades d'entrenament porten a resultats útils revisant corbes d'aprenentatge cruzades. Els nostres resultats indican que utilitzar poques característiques però expressives ja té un bon benefici pràctic per la detecció de robots, especialment si només hi ha una petita quantitat de dades d'entrenament disponibles.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা টুইটার বোট খুঁজে বের করার সমস্যা নিয়ে কথা বলি। আমরা ৮৩৫ টুইটার একাউন্টের ডাটাসেট বিশ্লেষণ করি এবং তাদের টুইটের মধ্যে মানুষ এবং বিভিন্ন ধরনের বক্ট রয়েছে। আমরা এই তথ্য ব্যবহার করি মেশিন শ্রেণীদের শিক্ষা শিক্ষা প্রশিক্ষণ করার জন্য যারা সত্যিকার এবং বট অ্যাকাউন্টের মধ আমরা চিহ্নিত বৈশিষ্ট্য চিহ্নিত করি যা এখনও ভাল ফলাফল প্রদান করার সময় সহজ। আমরা বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্য গ্রুপ বিশ্লেষণ করি একাউন্টের নির্দিষ্ট, টুইট এবং আচরণের বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং শিল্পের বোট সনাক্ত করার পদ্ধতির আমাদের কাজের সহজের ভবিষ্যতের প্রতিযোগিতার জন্য আমরা ভাষার প্রতি মনোযোগ প্রদান করি। With AdaBoost, the best performing classifier, we achieve an accuracy of 0.988 and an AUC of 0.995.  যেহেতু মেশিন শিক্ষা শিক্ষায় ভালো প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য সৃষ্টি করা প্রায়শ কঠিন - বিশেষ করে টুইটারের বোট সনাক্তির ডোমেইন- আমরা আরো বিশ্লেষণ করি যে পর্যায়ে কম প্রশিক্ষণের আমাদের ফলাফল নির্দেশ করছে যে কয়েকটি কিন্তু প্রকাশিত বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করা ইতোমধ্যে বট আবিষ্কারের জন্য একটি ভালো ব্যাক্তিগত উপকার', 'cs': 'V tomto článku se zabýváme problémem detekce botů Twitteru. Analyzujeme datovou sadu účtů 8385 Twitteru a jejich tweetů sestávající z lidí i různých druhů robotů. Tato data používáme k tréninku klasifikátorů strojového učení, které rozlišují mezi reálnými a botovými účty. Identifikujeme vlastnosti, které se snadno extrahují a přitom poskytují dobré výsledky. Analyzujeme různé skupiny funkcí na základě funkcí specifických pro účet, tweet specifických a behaviorální specifických a měříme jejich výkon ve srovnání s ostatními nejmodernějšími metodami detekce bot. Pro snadnou budoucí přenositelnost naší práce se zaměřujeme na jazykově-agnostické funkce. S AdaBoostem, nejlepším klasifikátorem, dosahujeme přesnosti 0,988 a AUC 0,995. Vzhledem k tomu, že tvorba dobrých tréninkových dat ve strojovém učení je často obtížná, zejména v oblasti detekce bot na Twitteru, dále analyzujeme, do jaké míry menší množství tréninkových dat vede k užitečným výsledkům prostřednictvím revize křížově validovaných učebních křivek. Naše výsledky ukazují, že použití několika, ale expresivních funkcí již má dobrý praktický přínos pro detekci bot, zejména pokud je k dispozici jen malé množství tréninkových dat.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis käsitleme probleemi tuvastada Twitter botid. Analüüsime 8385 Twitteri kontot ja nende säutseid, mis koosnevad nii inimestest kui ka erinevatest botidest. Kasutame neid andmeid masinõppe klassifitseerijate koolitamiseks, mis eristavad reaalseid ja botikontodeid. Me tuvastame funktsioone, mida on lihtne ekstraheerida, pakkudes samas häid tulemusi. Analüüsime erinevaid funktsioonirühmi kontospetsiifiliste, tweeti spetsiifiliste ja käitumise spetsiifiliste funktsioonide põhjal ning mõõdame nende jõudlust võrreldes teiste tipptasemel botide tuvastamise meetoditega. Meie töö hõlpsaks edasiseks ülekandmiseks keskendume keelega sõltumatutele funktsioonidele. Parima tulemusega klassifikaatoriga AdaBoost saavutame täpsuse 0,988 ja AUC 0,995. Kuna heade koolitusandmete loomine masinõppes on sageli keeruline - eriti Twitteri botide tuvastamise valdkonnas - analüüsime lisaks, millises ulatuses väiksemad koolitusandmed viivad kasulike tulemusteni, vaadates läbi ristvalideeritud õpikõverad. Meie tulemused näitavad, et väheste, kuid ekspressiivsete funktsioonide kasutamisel on botide tuvastamisel juba hea praktiline kasu, eriti kui saadaval on vaid väike hulk treeninguandmeid.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa käsittelemme ongelmaa tunnistaa Twitter botit. Analysoimme 8385 Twitter-tiliä ja niiden tweettejä, jotka koostuvat sekä ihmisistä että erilaisista boteista. Käytämme näitä tietoja kouluttaaksemme koneoppimisen luokittelijoita, jotka erottavat todelliset ja bottitilit toisistaan. Tunnistamme ominaisuuksia, jotka on helppo purkaa ja jotka tarjoavat silti hyviä tuloksia. Analysoimme eri ominaisuusryhmiä tilikohtaisten, twiittikohtaisten ja käyttäytymiskohtaisten ominaisuuksien perusteella ja mittaamme niiden suorituskykyä muihin huippuluokan bottien tunnistusmenetelmiin verrattuna. Työmme siirrettävyyden helpottamiseksi keskitymme kielistä riippumattomiin ominaisuuksiin. Parhaiten suoriutuvan luokittelijan AdaBoostin avulla saavutamme tarkkuuden 0,988 ja AUC-arvon 0,995. Koska hyvän koulutusdatan luominen koneoppimiseen on usein vaikeaa – erityisesti Twitterin bottien tunnistuksen alalla – analysoimme lisäksi, missä määrin pienemmät koulutusdatamäärät johtavat hyödyllisiin tuloksiin tarkastelemalla ristivalidoituja oppimiskäyriä. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että harvojen mutta ilmeikkäiden ominaisuuksien käyttäminen on jo hyvä käytännön hyöty bottien havaitsemisessa, varsinkin jos käytettävissä on vain pieni määrä harjoitusdataa.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan da Muke samu matsalar da za'a gane matofatin Twitter. Ana anayya kodi na akan 8385 na Twitter da watetersu suka haɗi mutane da wasu irin mutane. Munã amfani da wannan data dõmin mu tunkuɗe wa masu ƙidãya wa zane-zane da za'a rarraba tsakanin akan gaskiyar da akwatin aiki. Munã gane wasu misãlai da za'a iya iya sauƙi da su sami daidai. Tuna anarari jama'a masu amfani da jama'a dabam'a kan akan, ana bincike wasu masu ƙayyade, wato na haske da kuma ke cika aikin su sami da kuma da wasu hanyon canza za za'a gane na bot. For easy future portability of our work we focus on language-agnostic features.  Ga AdaBoost, da mafi kyaun mai fassara, za'a sami tsari na 0.988 da AUC na 0.995. Kama dai ƙiƙiro data masu amfani da amfani a cikin learning mashine ya zama mai tsanani - hususan a cikin gareshi na mutane na Twitter bot - tuna yana analyza a yanda ko ƙarami ko ƙaranci yawan data na amfani da matsalar za ta ƙara matsalar ta yi amfani da kurs-na-inganci. MatamayinMu na nuna cewa, a yi amfani da wasu na'ura masu iya bayyani sun riga yana da wani amfani mai kyau ga gandina bot, kuma hasa'a, idan ana iya amfani da ƙarami masu tsari.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנחנו מתמודדים עם הבעיה של גילוי בוטים טוויטר. אנו מנתחים קבוצת נתונים של 8385 חשבונות טוויטר והטוויטרים שלהם שמכילים גם בני אדם וגם סוגים שונים של רובוטים. אנחנו משתמשים במידע הזה כדי לאמן מסמכים ללמוד מכונות שמבדקים בין חשבונות אמיתיים לבין רובוטים. אנחנו מזהה תכונות קלות לחלץ בזמן שעדיין מספקים תוצאות טובות. אנו מנתחים קבוצות תכונות שונות מבוססות על חשבון ספציפי, טוויט ספציפי ומתכונות מתנהגות ספציפיות ומדידות את ביצועיהם בהשוואה לשיטות גילוי רובוטים מצוינות אחרות. For easy future portability of our work we focus on language-agnostic features.  עם AdaBoost, המקלסיסטר הכי מוצלח, אנחנו משיגים מדויקה של 0.988 ו AUC של 0.995. כיוון שהיצור של נתונים אימונים טובים בלמדת מכונות לעתים קרובות קשה - במיוחד בתחום של זיהוי בוטים טוויטר - אנו בניתוח נוסף לאיזה מידה כמויות קטנות יותר של נתונים אימונים מובילים לתוצאות שימושיות על ידי ביקורת קורבי לימוד מוצדקים. התוצאות שלנו מצביעות על השימוש במיוחד במידה קטנה של נתוני אימון כבר יש תועלת מעשית טובה לגילוי רובוטים.', 'sk': 'V tem članku obravnavamo problem odkrivanja Twitter botov. Analiziramo nabor podatkov 8385 Twitter računov in njihovih tweetov, ki so sestavljeni iz ljudi in različnih vrst botov. Te podatke uporabljamo za usposabljanje klasifikatorjev strojnega učenja, ki razlikujejo med resničnimi in botnimi računi. Identificiramo funkcije, ki jih je enostavno izvleči, hkrati pa zagotavljamo dobre rezultate. Analiziramo različne skupine funkcij na podlagi specifičnih značilnosti za račun, specifičnih za tweet in vedenjske specifične značilnosti ter merimo njihovo učinkovitost v primerjavi z drugimi najsodobnejšimi metodami zaznavanja botov. Za lažjo prenosljivost našega dela v prihodnosti se osredotočamo na jezikovno agnostične funkcije. Z AdaBoost, najboljšim klasifikatorjem, dosežemo natančnost 0,988 in AUC 0,995. Ker je ustvarjanje dobrih podatkov o usposabljanju na področju strojnega učenja pogosto težko – zlasti na področju zaznavanja botov Twitterja – analiziramo, v kolikšni meri manjše količine podatkov o usposabljanju vodijo do koristnih rezultatov s pregledom navzkrižno validiranih učnih krivulj. Naši rezultati kažejo, da ima uporaba malo, a izrazitih funkcij že dobro praktično korist za zaznavanje botov, še posebej, če je na voljo le majhna količina podatkov o usposabljanju.', 'jv': "Nang pepul iki, kita nganggep ngbot kanggo nambah bot Awak dhéwé énalik pernik dataset nang kontu polinik, nik nggambar obah-obah lan nganggo gambarang sampeyan karo bot Awak dhéwé nggambar data iki kanggo kelas telu alam tentang karo aku bot Awak dhéwé nambah perusahaan sing kalang-kalang nggampang We've been testing and testing disabled kanggo langgar sampeyan kanggo nggawe barang sampeyan kanggo kedhanan langkung-asno Gandhis adabuk, akeh luwih sing paling dhuwur, awak dhéwé iso diapakaké karo 0. Taning kelas kreversi perbudhakan data yang aswih akeh nggawe sistem yang segondi, dadi kaja cara nggawe winih dhéwé- kuwi domain karo bot detection Rejalaké awak dhéwé ngerti barang kelangan karo akeh apakno, dadi sing paling nggawe barang apik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé, ngono iso nggawe barang ketahan data sing beraksi.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཌིས་ཌིར་བློ་གཏོང་སའི་དཀའ་ངལ་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཌིས་ཌིར་ཌིར་ཚགས་མི་ 8385་ཡིག་གཟུགས ང་ཚོས་ལག་ལེན་པའི་མིག་ཆ་འདི་དག་གི་ལག་འཁྱེར་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་པའི་འཛིན་གྲྭར་གྱི་འཛིན་གྲྭར་བ ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྡན་ཞིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ན་སྟབས་བདེ་བོ་རེད། We analyze different feature groups based on account specific, tweet specific and behavioral specific features and measure their performance compared to other state of the art bot detection methods. ང་ཚོའི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་སྣ་ཚུལ་འཕགས་པ་ཞིག་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ལ་དམིགས་འདུག AdaBoost ཡིས་ཉར་མཁན་གྱི་དོན་དག་གཙོ་བོ་ཞིག་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་0.988 དང་AUC(0.995)ཡིས་བདེ་ཐམ་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། As the creation of good training data in machine learning is often difficult - especially in the domain of Twitter bot detection - we additionally analyze to what extent of training data lead to useful results by reviewing cross-validated learning curves. ང་ཚོའི་འབྲུག་བུ'}
{'en': 'Question Similarity in Community Question Answering : A Systematic Exploration of Preprocessing Methods and Models', 'ar': 'تشابه الأسئلة في الإجابة على أسئلة المجتمع: استكشاف منهجي لطرق ونماذج المعالجة المسبقة', 'es': 'Similitud de preguntas en la respuesta a preguntas de la comunidad: una exploración sistemática de métodos y modelos de preprocesamiento', 'pt': 'Semelhança de perguntas na resposta de perguntas da comunidade: uma exploração sistemática de métodos e modelos de pré-processamento', 'fr': 'Similarité des questions dans la réponse aux questions de la communauté\xa0: une exploration systématique des méthodes et des modèles de prétraitement', 'ja': 'コミュニティの質問回答における質問の類似性：前処理方法とモデルの体系的な探求', 'zh': '社区问答相似性:预处理法与模形相求', 'hi': 'प्रश्न समानता समुदाय प्रश्न उत्तर में: पूर्व-प्रसंस्करण विधियों और मॉडलों की एक व्यवस्थित खोज', 'ru': 'Сходство вопросов в ответах на вопросы сообщества: систематическое изучение методов и моделей предварительной обработки', 'ga': 'Cosúlacht na Ceiste sa Chomhphobal Freagra na gCeisteanna: Iniúchadh Córasach ar Mhodhanna agus ar Mhúnlaí Réamhphróiseála', 'ka': 'კითხვების განსხვავება საზოგადოებო კითხვების პასუხში: საზოგადოებო მეტოდის და მოდელების სისტემალური განსხვავება', 'el': 'Ομοιότητα ερωτήσεων στην απάντηση κοινοτικών ερωτήσεων: Μια συστηματική εξερεύνηση μεθόδων και μοντέλων προεπεξεργασίας', 'hu': 'Kérdések hasonlósága a közösségi kérdések megválaszolásában: Az előfeldolgozási módszerek és modellek rendszeres feltárása', 'kk': 'Жауап сұрақтардың ұқсастығы: Алдын- ала өңдеу әдістерін және үлгілердің систематикалық зерттеу', 'mk': 'Сличност на прашањата во одговорите на прашањата на заедницата: Систематска истрага на методите и моделите за преобработување', 'it': "Similitudine delle domande nella risposta comunitaria alle domande: un'esplorazione sistematica dei metodi e dei modelli di pre-elaborazione", 'lt': 'Bendrijos atsakymų į klausimus panašumas: sisteminis išankstinio apdorojimo metodų ir modelių tyrimas', 'ms': 'Persamaan Pertanyaan dalam Jawapan Pertanyaan Komuniti: Penjelasan Sistematik Kaedah dan Model Preproses', 'ml': 'സമൂഹത്തിലെ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യം: പ്രെസിസ്റ്ററിക്ക് മോഡോളുകളുടെ സിസ്റ്റിമാറ്റിക് എക്സ്പോര്\u200dഷന്\u200d ച', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн асуултуудын хариултын төстэй хариулт: Аль үйлдвэрлэлийн арга болон загварын систематикийн судалгаа', 'mt': 'Similarità ta’ Mistoqsijiet fit-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet tal-Komunità: Esplorazzjoni Sistematika tal-Metodi u l-Mudelli ta’ Prepproċessar', 'no': 'Svar på spørsmålmodus i fellesskapet: Eit systematisk utforsk av førehandsamingsmetodar og modeller', 'pl': 'Podobieństwo pytań w odpowiedzi na pytania społeczne: Systematyczne badanie metod i modeli przetwarzania wstępnego', 'sr': 'Sličnost pitanja u odgovoru na pitanja zajednice: sistematska istraživanja metoda i modela predobrazovanja', 'ro': 'Similaritatea întrebărilor în răspunsul la întrebări comunitare: O explorare sistematică a metodelor și modelelor de prelucrare prealabilă', 'so': 'Questions Sinnaanta in Community Questions: A Systematic Exploration of Preprocessing Methods and Models', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න සමාජ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්: ප්\u200dරශ්නය විද්\u200dයාවය සහ මොඩේල්ස් ව', 'sv': 'Frågalikhet i gemenskapsfrågesvar: En systematisk undersökning av förbehandlingsmetoder och modeller', 'ta': 'சமுதாயத்தில் கேள்வி ஒற்றுமை', 'ur': 'کمپنٹی سوال کی جواب دینے میں سوال برابری: ایک سیستماتیک تحقیق پیشپردازی طریقے اور موڈل کی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Câu hỏi tương đồng trong câu trả lời của tôi: A Systematic explain of Pretreatment Methods and Models', 'bg': 'Отговаряне на въпроси: Систематично проучване на методите и моделите на предварителната обработка', 'da': 'Spørgsmål Lighed i Fællesskabets spørgsmål Besvarelse: En systematisk undersøgelse af forbearbejdningsmetoder og modeller', 'nl': 'Vraag gelijkenis in het beantwoorden van communautaire vragen: Een systematische verkenning van preprocessing methodes en modellen', 'hr': 'Sličnost pitanja u odgovoru na pitanja zajednice: Sistemska istraživanja metoda i modela predobrazovanja', 'de': 'Ähnlichkeit bei der Beantwortung gemeinschaftlicher Fragen: Eine systematische Erforschung von Vorverarbeitungsmethoden und -modellen', 'ko': '지역사회 문답에서의 문제 유사성: 예처리 방법과 모델의 시스템 탐색', 'id': 'Persamaan Pertanyaan dalam Jawaban Pertanyaan Komunitas: Sebuah Penjelasan Sistematik Metode dan Model Preproses', 'fa': 'شبیه سوال در جواب سوال جامعه', 'sw': 'Swali sawa katika swali la Jamii: Utafiti wa Mfumo wa Utafiti na Utawala', 'tr': 'Cumhuriyet soraglary yanıtlamak: A systematic Exploration of Preprocessing Methods and Models', 'af': 'Vraog gelykbaarheid in die gemeenskap vraag antwoord: 芒聙聶n Sistemiese Verklaring van voorafwerking metodes en modele', 'am': 'ጥያቄ ብጤናዊ ውይይት መለስ', 'sq': 'Similariteti i pyetjeve në përgjigjet e pyetjeve të komunitetit: Një zbulim sistemik i metodave dhe modeleve të paraprocesimit', 'hy': 'Հարցը համայնքի հարցերի պատասխանի նմանությունն է. նախավերամշակման մեթոդների և մոդելների համակարգչային ուսումնասիրությունը', 'az': 'Toplumat suallar캼n캼n cavab캼: Preprocessing metodlar캼n v톛 modell톛rin sistematik istifad톛si', 'bn': 'সম্প্রদায়ের প্রশ্নের উত্তর: প্রক্রিয়ার পদ্ধতি ও মডেলের একটি সিস্টেমিক এক্সপ্লোরেশন', 'bs': 'Sličnost pitanja u odgovoru na pitanja zajednice: sistematska istraživanja metoda i modela predobrazovanja', 'ca': 'Similaritat de preguntes en la resposta a preguntes comunitaries: Una exploració sistemàtica de mètodes i models de pré-processament', 'cs': 'Podobnost otázek v odpovědi na otázky komunity: Systematický průzkum metod a modelů předzpracování', 'fi': 'Kysymysten samankaltaisuus yhteisössä Kysymysten vastaaminen: Esikäsittelymenetelmien ja mallien systemaattinen tutkiminen', 'et': 'Küsimuste sarnasus ühenduses Küsimustele vastamine: Eeltöötlusmeetodite ja mudelite süstemaatiline uurimine', 'jv': 'Gambar Kanal Sampeyan Jaringan Kumpulan Inggal komunitas: Rasasar sistem Dino Rasasar modus lan modus', 'he': 'דומה לשאלות בתשובה לשאלות הקהילתיות: חקירה מערכתית של שיטות ומודלים', 'sk': 'Podobnost vprašanj v Skupnosti Odgovarjanje na vprašanja: Sistematično raziskovanje metod in modelov predobdelave', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Community Question Answering: A systematic Exploration of Preprocessing Methods and Models'}
{'en': 'Community Question Answering forums are popular among Internet users, and a basic problem they encounter is trying to find out if their question has already been posed before. To address this issue, NLP researchers have developed methods to automatically detect question-similarity, which was one of the shared tasks in SemEval. The best performing systems for this task made use of Syntactic Tree Kernels or the SoftCosine metric. However, it remains unclear why these methods seem to work, whether their performance can be improved by better preprocessing methods and what kinds of errors they (and other methods) make. In this paper, we therefore systematically combine and compare these two approaches with the more traditional BM25 and translation-based models. Moreover, we analyze the impact of preprocessing steps (lowercasing, suppression of punctuation and stop words removal) and word meaning similarity based on different distributions (word translation probability, Word2Vec, fastText and ELMo) on the performance of the task. We conduct an error analysis to gain insight into the differences in performance between the system set-ups. The implementation is made publicly available from https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'ar': 'تحظى منتديات المجتمع للإجابة على أسئلة المجتمع بشعبية بين مستخدمي الإنترنت ، والمشكلة الأساسية التي يواجهونها هي محاولة معرفة ما إذا كان قد تم طرح سؤالهم من قبل. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، طور باحثو البرمجة اللغوية العصبية طرقًا لاكتشاف تشابه الأسئلة تلقائيًا ، والتي كانت إحدى المهام المشتركة في SemEval. استخدمت أفضل الأنظمة أداءً لهذه المهمة نواة شجرة نحوية أو مقياس SoftCosine. ومع ذلك ، لا يزال من غير الواضح سبب نجاح هذه الأساليب ، وما إذا كان يمكن تحسين أدائها من خلال أساليب أفضل للمعالجة المسبقة وما هي أنواع الأخطاء التي يرتكبونها (والطرق الأخرى). في هذه الورقة ، نقوم بدمج ومقارنة هذين النهجين بشكل منهجي مع النماذج التقليدية BM25 والنماذج القائمة على الترجمة. علاوة على ذلك ، نقوم بتحليل تأثير خطوات المعالجة المسبقة (تقليل الأحرف ، وإلغاء علامات الترقيم وإزالة كلمات التوقف) والتشابه في معنى الكلمة بناءً على التوزيعات المختلفة (احتمالية ترجمة الكلمات و Word2Vec و fastText و ELMo) على أداء المهمة. نجري تحليلاً للخطأ لاكتساب نظرة ثاقبة للاختلافات في الأداء بين إعدادات النظام. التنفيذ متاح للجمهور من https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'fr': "Les forums de réponse aux questions de la communauté sont populaires parmi les internautes, et un problème fondamental qu'ils rencontrent est d'essayer de savoir si leur question a déjà été posée auparavant. Pour résoudre ce problème, les chercheurs en PNL ont développé des méthodes pour détecter automatiquement la similitude des questions, ce qui était l'une des tâches partagées dans SemEval. Les systèmes les plus performants pour cette tâche utilisaient les noyaux de l'arbre syntaxique ou la métrique SoftCosine. Cependant, on ne sait toujours pas pourquoi ces méthodes semblent fonctionner, si leurs performances peuvent être améliorées par de meilleures méthodes de prétraitement et quels types d'erreurs elles (et d'autres méthodes) produisent. Dans cet article, nous combinons et comparons donc systématiquement ces deux approches avec les modèles BM25 et basés sur la traduction plus traditionnels. De plus, nous analysons l'impact des étapes de prétraitement (minuscules, suppression de la ponctuation et suppression des mots vides) et de la similitude de signification des mots en fonction de différentes distributions (probabilité de traduction des mots, Word2Vec, FastText et ElMo) sur l'exécution de la tâche. Nous effectuons une analyse des erreurs afin de mieux comprendre les différences de performance entre les configurations du système. L'implémentation est mise à la disposition du public à l'adresse https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.", 'pt': 'Fóruns de resposta a perguntas da comunidade são populares entre os usuários da Internet, e um problema básico que eles encontram é tentar descobrir se sua pergunta já foi feita antes. Para resolver esse problema, pesquisadores de PNL desenvolveram métodos para detectar automaticamente a similaridade de perguntas, que era uma das tarefas compartilhadas no SemEval. Os sistemas com melhor desempenho para esta tarefa utilizaram Syntactic Tree Kernels ou a métrica SoftCosine. No entanto, ainda não está claro por que esses métodos parecem funcionar, se seu desempenho pode ser melhorado por melhores métodos de pré-processamento e que tipos de erros eles (e outros métodos) cometem. Neste artigo, combinamos e comparamos sistematicamente essas duas abordagens com os modelos mais tradicionais do BM25 e baseados em tradução. Além disso, analisamos o impacto das etapas de pré-processamento (minúsculas, supressão de pontuação e remoção de palavras de parada) e similaridade de significado de palavras com base em diferentes distribuições (probabilidade de tradução de palavras, Word2Vec, fastText e ELMo) no desempenho da tarefa. Conduzimos uma análise de erros para obter informações sobre as diferenças de desempenho entre as configurações do sistema. A implementação é disponibilizada publicamente em https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'es': 'Los foros de respuesta a preguntas de la comunidad son populares entre los usuarios de Internet, y un problema básico que encuentran es tratar de averiguar si su pregunta ya se ha planteado anteriormente. Para abordar este problema, los investigadores de la PNL han desarrollado métodos para detectar automáticamente la similitud de preguntas, que era una de las tareas compartidas en SemEval. Los sistemas con mejor rendimiento para esta tarea utilizaron Syntactic Tree Kernels o la métrica de SoftCosine. Sin embargo, sigue sin estar claro por qué estos métodos parecen funcionar, si su rendimiento se puede mejorar con mejores métodos de preprocesamiento y qué tipos de errores cometen (y otros métodos). Por lo tanto, en este artículo, combinamos y comparamos sistemáticamente estos dos enfoques con los modelos más tradicionales de BM25 y basados en la traducción. Además, analizamos el impacto de los pasos de preprocesamiento (minúsculas, supresión de puntuación y eliminación de palabras vacías) y la similitud del significado de las palabras en función de diferentes distribuciones (probabilidad de traducción de palabras, Word2Vec, FastText y eLMO) en el desempeño de la tarea. Llevamos a cabo un análisis de errores para obtener información sobre las diferencias de rendimiento entre las configuraciones del sistema. La implementación se pone a disposición del público en https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'ja': 'コミュニティ質問の回答フォーラムはインターネットユーザーの間で人気があり、彼らが遭遇する基本的な問題は、質問が既に提示されているかどうかを調べることです。 この問題に対処するために、NLPの研究者は、SemEvalで共有されていたタスクの1つである質問の類似性を自動的に検出する方法を開発しました。 このタスクに最適なパフォーマンスのシステムは、Syntactic TreeカーネルまたはSoftCosineメトリックを使用しています。 しかしながら、これらの方法がなぜ機能しているように見えるのか、より良い前処理方法によってそれらのパフォーマンスを向上させることができるのか、およびそれらがどのような種類のエラー（および他の方法）を生じさせるのかはまだ不明である。 したがって、この論文では、これら2つのアプローチを、より伝統的なBM 25および翻訳ベースのモデルと体系的に組み合わせ、比較しています。 さらに、異なる分布（単語翻訳確率、Word 2 Vec、fastText、およびELMo ）に基づいて、前処理ステップ（小文字、句読点の抑制、および停止単語の削除）と単語の意味の類似性がタスクのパフォーマンスに与える影響を分析します。 システムセットアップ間のパフォーマンスの違いを把握するために、エラー分析を行います。 実装はhttps://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlpから公開されています。', 'hi': 'सामुदायिक प्रश्न उत्तर देने वाले मंच इंटरनेट उपयोगकर्ताओं के बीच लोकप्रिय हैं, और एक बुनियादी समस्या जो वे मुठभेड़ करते हैं, यह पता लगाने की कोशिश कर रहा है कि क्या उनका प्रश्न पहले से ही प्रस्तुत किया गया है। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए, एनएलपी शोधकर्ताओं ने स्वचालित रूप से प्रश्न-समानता का पता लगाने के लिए विधियां विकसित की हैं, जो सेमएवल में साझा कार्यों में से एक था। इस कार्य के लिए सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करने वाली प्रणालियों ने वाक्यात्मक ट्री कर्नेल या SoftCosine मीट्रिक का उपयोग किया। हालांकि, यह स्पष्ट नहीं है कि ये विधियां क्यों काम करती हैं, क्या उनके प्रदर्शन को बेहतर प्रीप्रोसेसिंग विधियों द्वारा बेहतर बनाया जा सकता है और वे (और अन्य तरीके) किस प्रकार की त्रुटियां करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम इसलिए व्यवस्थित रूप से इन दो दृष्टिकोणों को अधिक पारंपरिक BM25 और अनुवाद-आधारित मॉडल के साथ जोड़ते हैं और तुलना करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम कार्य के प्रदर्शन पर विभिन्न वितरणों (शब्द अनुवाद संभावना, Word2Vec, fastText और ELMo) के आधार पर प्रीप्रोसेसिंग चरणों (lowercasing, विराम चिह्न का दमन और शब्दों को हटाने से रोकने) और शब्द अर्थ समानता के प्रभाव का विश्लेषण करते हैं। हम सिस्टम सेट-अप के बीच प्रदर्शन में अंतर में अंतर्दृष्टि प्राप्त करने के लिए एक त्रुटि विश्लेषण करते हैं। कार्यान्वयन https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp से सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध कराया जाता है।', 'zh': '社区问论坛在互联网用户中甚受欢迎,其大略试出其问否。 为此者,NLP治人发自动检测相似性之道,此SemEval之共任也。 行之至统用语法树内核或 SoftCosine 指标。 然而未详其术似有效,其性可以善预处理改善,及其(与他法)生何误也。 是以系统地合其BM25,比之译形。 又析预处理步(小写,标点符号抑停词删),异布(单词译概率,Word2VecfastTextELMo)单词义相似性行事。 臣等谬论,以深知统设之性异。 当从 https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp 明。', 'ru': 'Форумы Community Question Answing популярны среди интернет-пользователей, и основная проблема, с которой они сталкиваются, заключается в том, чтобы выяснить, был ли их вопрос уже задан ранее. Для решения этой проблемы исследователи NLP разработали методы автоматического обнаружения вопросов-аналогов, что было одной из общих задач в SemEval. Наиболее эффективные системы для этой задачи использовали ядра синтаксического дерева или метрику SoftCosine. Однако остается неясным, почему эти методы, по-видимому, работают, можно ли улучшить их производительность за счет лучшей предварительной обработки и какие ошибки они (и другие методы) допускают. Поэтому в этой статье мы систематически объединяем и сравниваем эти два подхода с более традиционными моделями BM25 и переводческими моделями. Кроме того, мы анализируем влияние шагов предварительной обработки (строчные буквы, подавление пунктуации и удаление стоп-слов) и сходства смысла слова на основе различных распределений (вероятность перевода слова, Word2Vec, fastText и ELMo) на выполнение задачи. Мы проводим анализ ошибок, чтобы получить представление о различиях в производительности между настройками системы. Реализация опубликована по адресу https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'ga': 'Bíonn an-tóir ag úsáideoirí Idirlín ar fhóraim Freagraí Ceisteanna Pobail, agus fadhb bhunúsach a bhíonn acu ná a fháil amach an bhfuil a gceist curtha cheana féin. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo, tá modhanna forbartha ag taighdeoirí NLP chun cosúlachtaí ceiste a bhrath go huathoibríoch, a bhí ar cheann de na tascanna comhroinnte i SemEval. Bhain na córais is fearr feidhmíochta don tasc seo úsáid as Syntactic Tree Kernels nó an méadrach SoftCosine. Mar sin féin, níl sé soiléir cén fáth a ndealraíonn sé go n-oibríonn na modhanna seo, an féidir a bhfeidhmíocht a fheabhsú trí mhodhanna réamhphróiseála níos fearr agus cad iad na cineálacha earráidí a dhéanann siad (agus modhanna eile). Sa pháipéar seo, mar sin déanaimid an dá chur chuige seo a chomhcheangal agus a chur i gcomparáid go córasach leis na samhlacha BM25 níos traidisiúnta agus atá bunaithe ar an aistriúchán. Thairis sin, déanaimid anailís ar thionchar na gcéimeanna réamhphróiseála (ísliú, deireadh a chur le poncaíocht agus deireadh a chur le focail stoptha) agus cosúlacht brí focal bunaithe ar dháileacháin éagsúla (dóchúlacht aistriúcháin focal, Word2Vec, fastText agus ELMo) ar fheidhmíocht an taisc. Déanaimid anailís earráide chun léargas a fháil ar na difríochtaí feidhmíochta idir socruithe an chórais. Cuirtear an cur i bhfeidhm ar fáil go poiblí ó https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'el': 'Τα φόρουμ απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις της κοινότητας είναι δημοφιλή μεταξύ των χρηστών του διαδικτύου και ένα βασικό πρόβλημα που αντιμετωπίζουν είναι η προσπάθεια να μάθουν αν η ερώτησή τους έχει ήδη τεθεί στο παρελθόν. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, οι ερευνητές του NLP ανέπτυξαν μεθόδους αυτόματης ανίχνευσης της ομοιότητας ερωτήσεων, η οποία ήταν ένα από τα κοινά καθήκοντα στο SemEval. Τα συστήματα με τις καλύτερες επιδόσεις για αυτή την εργασία χρησιμοποίησαν τους πυρήνας Συντατικού Δέντρου ή τη μέτρηση SoftCosine. Ωστόσο, παραμένει ασαφές γιατί αυτές οι μέθοδοι φαίνεται να λειτουργούν, αν η απόδοσή τους μπορεί να βελτιωθεί με καλύτερες μεθόδους προεπεξεργασίας και τι είδους λάθη κάνουν (και άλλες μέθοδοι). Στην παρούσα εργασία, επομένως, συνδυάζουμε συστηματικά και συγκρίνουμε αυτές τις δύο προσεγγίσεις με τα πιο παραδοσιακά μοντέλα BM25 και μοντέλα βασισμένα στη μετάφραση. Επιπλέον, αναλύουμε την επίδραση των βημάτων προεπεξεργασίας (μείωση, καταστολή στίξης και αφαίρεση λέξεων παύσης) και της ομοιότητας λέξεων με βάση διαφορετικές διανομές (πιθανότητα μετάφρασης λέξεων, και στην εκτέλεση της εργασίας. Πραγματοποιούμε μια ανάλυση σφαλμάτων για να έχουμε εικόνα των διαφορών στην απόδοση μεταξύ των ρυθμίσεων του συστήματος. Η εφαρμογή διατίθεται στο κοινό από https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'hu': 'Közösségi kérdésekre válaszoló fórumok népszerűek az internetfelhasználók körében, és egy alapvető probléma, amivel szembesülnek azzal, hogy megpróbálják kideríteni, hogy kérdésüket már feltették-e korábban. A probléma megoldására az NLP kutatói olyan módszereket fejlesztettek ki, amelyek automatikusan felismerik a kérdés-hasonlóságot, ami a SemEval egyik megosztott feladata volt. Az ehhez a feladathoz legjobban teljesítő rendszerek a Syntactic Tree kernel-eket vagy a SoftCosine metrikát használták. Azonban továbbra sem világos, hogy ezek a módszerek miért működnek, hogy a teljesítményük javítható-e jobb előfeldolgozási módszerekkel, és milyen hibákat követnek el (és más módszerek). Ebben a tanulmányban ezt a két megközelítést szisztematikusan kombináljuk és összehasonlítjuk a hagyományosabb BM25 és fordításalapú modellekkel. Továbbá elemezzük az előfeldolgozási lépések (leeresztés, írásjelek eltávolítása és stop szavak eltávolítása) és a különböző eloszlások (szófordítás valószínűsége, Word2Vec, fastText és ELMo) hatását a feladat teljesítésére. Hibaelemzést végzünk, hogy betekintést nyerjünk a rendszer beállításai közötti teljesítménykülönbségekbe. A végrehajtás nyilvánosan hozzáférhető: https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'ka': 'საზოგადოებო კითხვების გასაღების ფორმები ინტერნეტის მომხმარებელების შორის პოლუფურია, და მათ შეხვედნენ ფონტური პრობლემა უნდა ვიცით თუ მათი კითხვა ამ პრობლემას გასაკეთებლად, NLP მსწავლობელი განვითარებულია პრობლემები, რომელიც SemEval-ში იყო ერთი საზოგადო დავალების განვითარება. ამ დავალებისთვის ყველაზე საუკეთესო გამოყენებული სინტექტიკური ხე კერნელის ან SoftCosine მეტრიკის გამოყენებული სინტექტიკური სინტექტიკური. მაგრამ ეს უცნობი იქნება, რატომ ამ მეტირები მუშაობს, თუ მათი მუშაობა უკეთესი პროცესი მეტირებით და როგორი შეცდომები ისინი (და სხვა მეტირებით) ვაკეთებთ. ამიტომ, ჩვენ სისტემატიკურად გამოყენებთ და შემდგომარებით ეს ორი დაეხმარება უფრო траდიციონალური BM25 და გადაწყენებული მოდელთან. დამატებით, ჩვენ გავაანალიზებთ წინაპროცესების შედეგი (გადაწყება, გადაწყება და გადაწყება სიტყვების გადაწყება) და სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების განსხვავება განსხვავებული გადაწყება (სიტყვების შესაძლებლობა, Word2Vec ჩვენ შეცდომის ანალიზაციას გავაკეთებთ, რომ სისტემის კონფიგურაციის განსხვავებაში გავაკეთებთ. ამომუშაცია ადამიანურად გახსნა https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'it': "I forum di risposta alle domande della comunità sono popolari tra gli utenti di Internet e un problema di base che incontrano è cercare di scoprire se la loro domanda è già stata posta prima. Per affrontare questo problema, i ricercatori NLP hanno sviluppato metodi per rilevare automaticamente la somiglianza delle domande, che era uno dei compiti condivisi in SemEval. I sistemi più performanti per questo compito hanno fatto uso di Kernels Syntactic Tree o della metrica SoftCosine. Tuttavia, non è chiaro perché questi metodi sembrano funzionare, se le loro prestazioni possono essere migliorate con metodi di preelaborazione migliori e quali tipi di errori (e altri metodi) commettono. In questo articolo, quindi, combiniamo e confrontiamo sistematicamente questi due approcci con i modelli BM25 più tradizionali e basati sulla traduzione. Inoltre, analizziamo l'impatto dei passaggi di pre-elaborazione (abbassamento, soppressione della punteggiatura e rimozione delle parole stop) e della somiglianza del significato delle parole basate su diverse distribuzioni (probabilità di traduzione delle parole, Word2Vec, fastText e ELMo) sullo svolgimento del compito. Conduciamo un'analisi degli errori per comprendere le differenze nelle prestazioni tra le configurazioni del sistema. L'attuazione è resa pubblica da: https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.", 'kk': 'Жалпы сұрақтар жауап беру форумдары Интернет пайдаланушылардың арасында маңызды, және олардың көмектесетін негізгі мәселесі, олардың сұрақтарын алдында таңдау керек пе. Бұл мәселені шешу үшін NLP зерттеушілері сұрақ- ұқсастығын автоматты түрде анықтауға арналған әдістерді жасады. Бұл HalfEval-де ортақ тапсырмалардың бірі. Бұл тапсырманың ең жақсы орындау жүйелері синтактикалық бұтақ деректерінен немесе SoftCosine метрикалық қолданылады. Бірақ бұл әдістер не үшін жұмыс істеуге болатынын білмейді, олардың істеу әдістерін жақсы өзгерту әдістері мен қандай қателер (және басқа әдістері) жасауға болады. Бұл қағазда жүйелік түрде бұл екі әдімгі BM25 және аудармаларды негіздеген үлгілерімен салыстырып салыстырық. Сонымен қатар, біз алдын- ала өңдеу қадамдарының нәтижесін анализиру (көшірмелеу, түйіру мен сөздерді алып тастау) және сөздерді айырмашылық дистрибуттарына негізделген сөздердің ұқсастығын (сөздердің аудару мүмкіндігі, Word2Vec, Fast Біз жүйе баптаулары арасындағы әрекеттердің айырмашылығын көру үшін қате анализиясын жасаймыз. Орындау жалғастырылған https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'lt': 'Bendrijos atsakymų į klausimus forumai yra populiarūs interneto vartotojams, o pagrindinproblema, su kuria jie susiduria, yra bandymas išsiaiškinti, ar jų klausimas jau buvo iškeltas anksčiau. Siekdami spręsti šį klausimą, NLP mokslininkai parengė metodus, kuriais automatiškai nustatomas klausimų panašumas, kuris buvo viena iš dalijamųjų SemEval užduočių. Šioje užduotyje geriausiai veikiančios sistemos naudojo sintaktinius medžio branduolius arba SoftCosine metriką. Tačiau vis dar neaišku, kodėl šie metodai veikia, ar jų veiksmingumas gali būti pagerintas geriau apdorojant metodus ir kokių klaidų jie daro (ir kitų metodų). Todėl šiame dokumente sistemingai deriname ir palyginame šiuos du metodus su tradiciniais BM25 ir vertimo modeliais. Be to, analizuojame išankstinio apdorojimo etapų (mažesnio skaičiaus mažinimo, taško slopinimo ir sustabdymo žodžių pašalinimo) ir žodžio reikšmės panašumo poveikį užduoties vykdymui remiantis skirtingais paskirstymais (žodžio vertimo tikimybė, Word2Vec, fastText ir ELMo). Atliekame klaidų analizę, kad suprastume sistemų struktūrų veiklos skirtumus. Įgyvendinimas skelbiamas viešai https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'mk': 'Форумите за одговори на прашањата на заедницата се популарни меѓу интернет корисниците, а основниот проблем со кој се соочуваат е обидот да дознаат дали нивното прашање веќе е поставено претходно. To address this issue, NLP researchers have developed methods to automatically detect question-similarity, which was one of the shared tasks in SemEval.  Најдобрите системи за оваа задача користеа Синтактички дрвени јадра или SoftCosine метрика. Сепак, останува нејасно зошто овие методи се чини дека функционираат, дали нивната перформанса може да се подобри со подобри методи за препроцес и какви грешки прават (и други методи). In this paper, we therefore systematically combine and compare these two approaches with the more traditional BM25 and translation-based models.  Покрај тоа, го анализираме влијанието на препроцесорските чекори (намалување, притисок на точката и спречување на отстранувањето на зборовите) и зборот значи сличност базирана на различни дистрибуции (веројатност на превод на зборови, Word2Vec, брз Текст и ELMo) на извршувањето на задачата. Правиме анализа на грешки за да добиеме сфаќање за разликите во перформансата помеѓу системските поставувања. Имплементацијата е јавно достапна од https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'ms': 'Forum Jawapan Pertanyaan Komuniti adalah terkenal di antara pengguna Internet, dan satu masalah asas yang mereka jumpa adalah cuba untuk mencari tahu jika soalan mereka telah ditanyakan sebelumnya. Untuk mengatasi isu ini, peneliti NLP telah mengembangkan kaedah untuk mengesan secara automatik persamaan soalan, yang merupakan salah satu tugas berkongsi dalam SemEval. Sistem prestasi terbaik untuk tugas ini digunakan Kernel Pohon Sintaktik atau metrik SoftCosine. Namun, masih tidak jelas mengapa kaedah ini kelihatan berfungsi, sama ada prestasi mereka boleh diperbaiki dengan kaedah pemprosesan yang lebih baik dan apa jenis ralat yang mereka buat (dan kaedah lain). Dalam kertas ini, kami secara sistematik menggabungkan dan membandingkan kedua-dua pendekatan ini dengan BM25 yang lebih tradisional dan model berdasarkan terjemahan. Moreover, we analyze the impact of preprocessing steps (lowercasing, suppression of punctuation and stop words removal) and word meaning similarity based on different distributions (word translation probability, Word2Vec, fastText and ELMo) on the performance of the task.  Kami melakukan analisis ralat untuk mendapatkan pengetahuan tentang perbezaan prestasi antara set-up sistem. Pelaksanaan dibuat tersedia secara umum dari https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'ml': 'സമൂഹത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഇന്റര്\u200dനെറ്റ് ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ ഇടയില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടവരാണ്. അവര്\u200d കണ്ടുമുട്ടുന്ന ഒരു അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d NLP പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d സെമ്എവാലില്\u200d പങ്കുള്ള ജോലികളില്\u200d ഒരാളായിരുന്നു ചോദ്യം സ ഈ ജോലിക്കുള്ള ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം സിന്റാക്റ്റിക്ക് വൃക്ഷത്തില്\u200d കെര്\u200dണല്\u200dസിന എന്നാലും ഈ രീതികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതെന്തിനാണെന്ന് തോന്നുന്നത് വ്യക്തമായിരിക്കുന്നു. അവരുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d നല്ല മുന്\u200dപ് പ്രോ In this paper, we therefore systematically combine and compare these two approaches with the more traditional BM25 and translation-based models.  പിന്നെയും വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി വാര്\u200dത്ത വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള പ്രോപ്രോസിക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്ന പ്രഭാവങ്ങളുടെ പ്രഭാവം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളില്\u200d വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് പ്രസ്താവികമായി ലഭ്യമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'no': 'Oppgåver av spørsmål på fellesskapet er populære blant internettbrukarar, og ein grunnleggjande problem dei måtte prøver å finna ut om spørsmålet deres er allereie plassert før. For å handtera dette problemet har NLP-forskere utvikla metoder for automatisk oppdaging av spørsmålskjenliknet, som var ein av dei delte oppgåva i semiEval. Den beste utføringssystemene for denne oppgåva som er brukt av syntaksiske trekjerner eller mørkeCosine-metrikken. Det er imidlertid uverksam hvorfor desse metodane ser ut til å fungera, om utviklinga sine kan forbedrast ved bedre forhandlingsmetoder og kva slags feil dei (og andre metodar) gjer. I denne papiret kombinerer vi derfor systematisk og samanliknar desse to tilnærmingane med dei fleire tradisjonelle BM25-baserte modelane og omsetjingsbaserte modelane. I tillegg analyserer vi effekten av førrehandsaming av trekk (små bokstavar, suppresjon av punkt og stopp ord fjerning) og ordbetyr liknande på forskjellige distribusjonar (sannsynlighet for ordomsetjing, Word2Vec, fastText og ELMo) på oppgåva. Vi gjer ein feilanalyse for å få innsyning i forskjellene i utviklinga mellom systemoppsettet. Implementasjonen er tilgjengeleg frå https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'pl': 'Forum odpowiedzi na pytania społecznościowe są popularne wśród użytkowników Internetu, a podstawowym problemem, z którym napotykają, jest próba dowiedzenia się, czy ich pytanie zostało już wcześniej postawione. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, naukowcy NLP opracowali metody automatycznego wykrywania podobieństwa pytań, co było jednym z wspólnych zadań w SemEval. Najlepiej wydajne systemy do tego zadania wykorzystały jądra Syntaktic Tree Kernels lub metrykę SoftCosine. Nie jest jednak jasne dlaczego te metody wydają się działać, czy ich wydajność można poprawić poprzez lepsze metody przetwarzania wstępnego oraz jakie rodzaje błędów popełniają (i inne metody). W niniejszym artykule systematycznie łączymy i porównujemy te dwa podejścia z bardziej tradycyjnymi modelami BM25 i opartymi na tłumaczeniach. Ponadto analizujemy wpływ etapów przetwarzania wstępnego (obniżenie, tłumienie interpunkcji i usuwanie słów stop) oraz podobieństwa znaczenia słowa w oparciu o różne rozkłady (prawdopodobieństwo tłumaczenia słów, Word2Vec, fastText i ELMo) na wykonanie zadania. Przeprowadzamy analizę błędów, aby uzyskać wgląd w różnice w wydajności między konfiguracjami systemu. Wdrożenie jest udostępniane publicznie pod adresem: https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн асуултуудын хариултын форумууд интернет хэрэглэгчдийн хоорондоо хүн төрөлхтөн байдаг. Тэдний харилцаж байгаа үндсэн асуудал нь өмнө нь асуулт орсон эсэхийг олж мэдэхийг хичээдэг. Энэ асуудлыг олохын тулд NLP судлаачид асуулт ижил төстэй байдлыг автоматаар олж мэдэх арга замыг хөгжүүлсэн. Энэ нь SemEval-д хуваалцагдсан ажил юм. Энэ ажлын хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагааны систем Синтактик мод Kernels эсвэл SoftCosine метрийн ашиглаж байна. Гэхдээ эдгээр аргыг яагаад ажиллаж байгааг ойлгохгүй байна, тэдний үйл ажиллагааг илүү сайн үйлдвэрлэх арга болон ямар алдаа хийдэг вэ? Энэ цаасан дээр бид систематик хоёр арга замыг илүү уламжлалтай BM25 болон хөрөнгө оруулсан загвартай харьцуулж байна. Мөн бид өмнө үйлдвэрлэх алхам нөлөөг (багасгаж, цэгцээг хадгалж, үгийг устгах зогсоох) болон өөр хэсэгт төстэй хэлбэрүүдийг судалж байна (Word2Vec, fastText болон ELMo) ажлын үйлдвэрлэлд төстэй хэлбэртэй гэсэн үг юм. Бид системийн байгууллагуудын ялгааг ойлгохын тулд алдаа шинжилгээ хийдэг. Үүнийг олон нийтэд ашиглаж чадна. https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'ro': 'Forumurile de răspuns la întrebări comunitare sunt populare printre utilizatorii de Internet, iar o problemă de bază pe care o întâlnesc este încercarea de a afla dacă întrebarea lor a fost deja pusă înainte. Pentru a aborda această problemă, cercetătorii PNL au dezvoltat metode de detectare automată a similitudinii întrebărilor, care a fost una dintre sarcinile partajate în SemEval. Cele mai bune sisteme de performanță pentru această sarcină au utilizat Kernels Syntactic Tree sau metrica SoftCosine. Cu toate acestea, rămâne neclar de ce aceste metode par să funcționeze, dacă performanța lor poate fi îmbunătățită prin metode mai bune de pre-procesare și ce tipuri de erori fac (și alte metode). Prin urmare, în această lucrare, combinăm sistematic și comparăm aceste două abordări cu modelele mai tradiționale BM25 și bazate pe traduceri. Mai mult decât atât, analizăm impactul etapelor de pre-procesare (coborârea, suprimarea punctuației și eliminarea cuvintelor oprite) și similarității semnificației cuvintelor bazate pe diferite distribuții (probabilitatea traducerii cuvintelor, Word2Vec, fastText și ELMo) asupra performanței sarcinii. Realizăm o analiză a erorilor pentru a obține o perspectivă asupra diferențelor de performanță dintre configurațiile sistemului. Punerea în aplicare este pusă la dispoziția publicului de la https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'sr': 'Forumi odgovora na pitanje zajednice su popularni među korisnicima interneta, a osnovni problem sa kojim se susreću pokušava saznati da li je njihovo pitanje već postavljeno. Da bi riješili ovaj problem, istraživači NLP razvili su metode da automatski otkriju sličnost pitanja, koji je bio jedan od zajedničkih zadataka u SemEvalu. Najbolji izvršni sistem za ovaj zadatak korišteni su od sintaktičnih kernela drveta ili metrika SoftCosine. Međutim, još uvek nije jasno zašto ove metode izgledaju da rade, da li se njihova učinka može poboljšati boljim metodama preobrađivanja i kakve greške oni (i druge metode) čine. U ovom papiru, stoga sistematski kombiniramo i uspoređujemo te dve pristupe sa tradicionalnijim modelima BM25 i prevodnim modelima. Osim toga, analiziramo uticaj koraka preobrađivanja (smanjenje, potisnutje tačke i uklanjanje riječi) i sličnost riječi koja znači na različitim distribucijama (verovatnost prevoda riječi, Word2Vec, fastText i ELMo) na provedbu zadatka. Provodimo analizu greške kako bi dobili uvid u razlike u provedbi između setova sistema. Provođenje je javno dostupno od https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'so': "Qorshaha su’aalaha bulshada waa kuwa ku maarmaan isticmaalayaasha internetka, dhibaatada aasaasiga ah oo ay la kulmaan ayaa isku dayaya in ay ogaadaan in su’aaladooda horay loo soo jeeday. Si ay u baaraandegaan arrintan, baaritaanka NLP ayaa horay u sameeyay qaabab ay si ay automatic u ogaadaan su'aalaha isku mid ah, taas oo ka mid ahaa shaqada la qaybsaday SemEval. Isticmaalka ugu wanaagsan ee shaqadan waxaa lagu isticmaalay geedka Syntactic Kernels ama metricka SoftCosin. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, ma ahan sababta ay u muuqato inay shaqeeyaan, in lagu hagaajin karo qaababka ka wanaagsan baaraandegista iyo qaababka kale oo ay sameeyaan qalabka (iyo qaababka kale). Sidaa darteed waxan warqaddan si rasmi ah ugu isku dari karnaa islamarkaasna waxaynu isbarbardhignaa labadan qaabilsan oo aad u caadi ah BM25 iyo muulooyinka turjumaadka. Sidoo kale, waxaynu kaloo analyeynaa saamaynta tallaabooyinka ka baaraandegista (hoos-dhigidda, suppressada punctuatka iyo joojinta hadalka) iyo hadalka micnaheedu waxay ku tahay isku mid ah qaybinta kala duduwan (word turjumista, Word2Vec, fast Text iyo ELMo) oo ku saabsan sameynta shaqada. Analyska qaladka waxaynu sameynaa si aan u helno waxyaabaha kala duwan ee sameynta kooxaha nidaamka. Adeegga waxaa si bayaan ah laga helaa https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.", 'si': 'සමාජ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉන්ටර්නේට් ප්\u200dරයෝජනකයෙන් අතර ප්\u200dරශ්න මේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට විශ්වාස කරන්න, NLP පරීක්ෂකයන්ට ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරශ්න-වර්ගය හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ව මේ වැඩේ හොඳම වැඩ කරන්න පද්ධතිය සින්ටැක්ටික් ට්\u200dරි කාර්නෙල් නැත්තම් SoftCosine මෙට්\u200dරික් වලින් භාවිත කරන්න ප නමුත්, ඒක නිසා පැහැදිලි වෙන්නේ ඇයි මේ විදිලි වැඩ කරන්නේ කියලා, ඔවුන්ගේ වැඩේ වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා හොඳ ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාස මේ පත්තරේ අපි පද්ධතියෙන් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ඒ වගේම මේ පද්ධතියෙන් පද්ධතිය BM25 සහ පද්ධතියෙන් පද්ධතියෙන් අනුව තවත්, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරපු පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා (අඩු පැත්තක්, අඩු පැත්තක් සහ නවත්තන්න වචන අඩු පැත්තක්) සහ වචන අදහස් වෙනස් විදියට අධිරූ අපි පද්ධති සැටස් අතර විවිධානයක් ගන්න පුළුවන් විවිධානයක් කරනවා. ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සාර්වාධිකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'sv': 'Forum för att besvara frågor är populära bland Internetanvändare, och ett grundläggande problem de stöter på är att försöka ta reda på om deras fråga redan har ställts tidigare. För att lösa problemet har NLP-forskare utvecklat metoder för att automatiskt upptäcka frågelikhet, vilket var en av de gemensamma uppgifterna i SemEval. De system som presterar bäst för den här uppgiften använde sig av Syntactic Tree Kernels eller SoftCosine-metrin. Det är dock oklart varför dessa metoder verkar fungera, om deras prestanda kan förbättras genom bättre förbehandlingsmetoder och vilka typer av fel de (och andra metoder) gör. I denna uppsats kombinerar och jämför vi därför systematiskt dessa två tillvägagångssätt med de mer traditionella BM25- och översättningsbaserade modellerna. Dessutom analyserar vi effekten av förbehandling av steg (sänkning, undertryckning av skiljetecken och stoppning av ord borttagning) och ordinnebördens likhet baserat på olika distributioner (ordöversättning sannolikhet, Word2Vec, fastText och ELMo) på uppgiftens utförande. Vi genomför en felanalys för att få insikt i skillnaderna i prestanda mellan systemkonfigurationerna. Genomförandet görs offentligt tillgängligt från https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'ta': 'சமுதாயத்தில் பதில் கேள்வி குறிப்புகள் இணைய பயனர்களுக்கிடையே மகிழ்ச்சியாக இருக்கின்றன, மற்றும் அவர்கள் சந்திக்கும் அடிப்படை பி இந்த விஷயத்தை முகவரிக்க NLP ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்கள் தானாகவே கேள்வி ஒத்திசையை கண்டறிய முறைகளை உருவாக்கி வைத்துள்ளார்கள், அது SemEv இந்த பணிக்கான சிறந்த இயக்க அமைப்பு ஆனால், இந்த முறைகள் ஏன் வேலை செய்ய தெரியும் என்பது தெளிவாக இருக்கிறது, அவர்களுடைய செயல்பாடு சிறந்த முன்செயல்படுத்தல் முறைமைகளால் மே இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இந்த இரண்டு வழிகளை அமைப்பில் ஒன்று சேர்த்து ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் மேலும் மரபார்ந்த BM25 மற்றும் மொழ மேலும், நாம் முன்செயல்படுத்தல் படிகளின் விளைவுகளை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம் (குறைந்து, பாக்குதல் மற்றும் நிறுத்தல் வார்த்தைகள் நீக்குதல்) மற்றும் வார்த்தை பொருத்தமானது, வேலை  நாம் ஒரு பிழை ஆய்வு செய்து கணினி அமைப்புகள் அமைப்புகளுக்கிடையில் உள்ள வேறுபாடுகளை பெறுவதற்காக பிழை அற செயல்பாடு பொதுவாக கிடைக்கப்பட்டது https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'mt': 'Il-fora Komunitarji għat-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet huma popolari fost l-utenti tal-Internet, u problem a bażika li jiltaqgħu magħha qed tipprova tara jekk il-mistoqsija tagħhom diġà ġietx imqajma qabel. To address this issue, NLP researchers have developed methods to automatically detect question-similarity, which was one of the shared tasks in SemEval.  Is-sistemi bl-aħjar prestazzjoni għal dan il-kompitu użaw il-Kernels tas-Siġar Sintattiku jew il-metrika SoftCosine. Madankollu, għadu mhux ċar għaliex dawn il-metodi jidhru li jaħdmu, jekk il-prestazzjoni tagħhom tistax tittejjeb permezz ta’ metodi ta’ pproċessar aħjar u x’tipi ta’ żbalji jagħmlu (u metodi oħra). F’dan id-dokument, għalhekk aħna sistematikament nikkombinaw u nqabblu dawn iż-żewġ approċċi mal-mudelli BM25 aktar tradizzjonali u bbażati fuq it-traduzzjoni. Barra minn hekk, nagħmlu analiżi tal-impatt tal-passi ta’ preproċessar (tnaqqis, soppressjoni tal-puntwazzjoni u tneħħija tal-kliem ta’ waqfien) u similarità tat-tifsira tal-kelma bbażata fuq distribuzzjonijiet differenti (probabbiltà tat-traduzzjoni tal-kelma, Word2Vec, fastText u ELMo) fuq it-twettiq tal-kompitu. We conduct an error analysis to gain insight into the differences in performance between the system set-ups.  L-implimentazzjoni ssir disponibbli pubblikament minn https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'ur': 'کمونٹی سؤال جواب دینے کے فرموم انٹرنیٹ کارساز کے درمیان مشهور ہیں، اور ان سے پہلے ان کی سؤال پوچھی گئی ہے کیا ان کی سؤال پوچھی گئی ہے؟ اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں NLP تحقیقات کرنے والوں نے سؤال-شبیه پیدا کرنے کے لئے طریقے پیش کئے ہیں، جو SemEval میں شریک کاموں میں سے ایک تھا. اس کام کے لئے بہترین عمل سیسٹم سینٹکتیک درخت کرنلز یا سوفٹ کاسین متریک سے استعمال کیا گیا ہے. However, it remains unclear why these methods seem to work, whether their performance can be improved by better preprocessing methods and what kinds of errors they (and other methods) do. تو ہم اس کاغذ میں سیستماتیک طور پر ان دو رستوں کو زیادہ سنتی BM25 اور ترجمہ بنیادی موڈل سے ترجمہ کرتے ہیں۔ اور ہم پہلے پردازش قدم کے تاثیر کو تحقیق کرتے ہیں (کم کم کرنا، پانچوٹ کرنا اور کلمات ہٹانے کو روکتے ہیں) اور کلمات کا مطلب مختلف تقسیم پر بنیاد ہے (کلمات کا احتمال، Word2Vec، fastText اور ELMo) اس کام پر۔ ہم نے سیسٹم سائٹ اپ کے درمیان تفاوتوں کے بارے میں نظر حاصل کرنے کے لئے ایک غلط تحلیل کیا ہے۔ عملکرد ظاہر سے موجود ہے https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis Ushbu vazifa uchun eng yaxshi bajarish tizimi, Sintactic Tree Kernels yoki SoftCosine metrikdan foydalanilgan. Lekin, bu usullar qanday ishlaydi deb tushunadi, ularning bajarish usuli yordamida yaxshi bajarishi mumkin va ular qanday xatolar (va boshqa usullar) bajarishi mumkin deb o'ylamaydi. Bu qogʻozda biz bu ikkita usullarni tizim bilan birlashtiramiz va bir qanday sodda BM25 va tarjima modellar bilan birlashtiramiz. Ko'rib, biz vazifani bajarish jarayonlarining tashkilotlarini o'zgartirish (soʻzlarni kamaytirish va toʻxtatish) va so'zning turli tarjimalarning asosida bir xil tarjima qilishi (soʻzning tarjimalari, Word2Vec, fastText va ELMo) bajarishi mumkin. Biz tizim tuzuvlarining o'rtasida o'zgarishga ega bo'lishga xato analyzerni bajaramiz. @ info https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.", 'vi': 'Các diễn đàn Trả lời câu hỏi của Cộng đồng được phổ biến giữa những người dùng Internet, và một vấn đề cơ bản mà họ gặp phải đang cố tìm hiểu xem câu hỏi của họ đã được đưa ra chưa. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, các nhà nghiên cứu Chọc gia lập trình tự động phát hiện nét giống nhau hỏi, một trong những nhiệm vụ chia sẻ ở SemEvol. Những hệ thống trình diễn tốt nhất cho nhiệm vụ này đã sử dụng lõi cây sơ chiến hay hàm mềm Cosine. Tuy nhiên, vẫn chưa rõ tại sao những phương pháp này lại có tác dụng, liệu khả năng hiệu quả của chúng có thể được cải thiện bằng phương pháp xử lý tốt hơn và những lỗi mà chúng gây ra (và các phương pháp khác). Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi kết hợp và so sánh hai phương pháp này với một mô hình BM25 truyền thống và các mô hình dịch. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi phân tích tác động của các bước dịch trước (Cúi thấp, gỡ bỏ các chữ chấm và gỡ bỏ các từ) và từ có nghĩa giống nhau dựa trên các phân phát khác nhau (khả năng dịch từ, Word2Vev, fast Text và ElMo) về hiệu quả của nhiệm vụ. Chúng tôi thực hiện một phân tích lỗi để hiểu được sự khác nhau trong khả năng của hệ thống. Việc thực thi được công bố công khai https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'bg': 'Форумите за отговор на въпроси на общността са популярни сред интернет потребителите и основен проблем, с който те се сблъскват, е да се опитат да разберат дали въпросът им вече е бил поставен преди. За да се справят с този проблем, изследователите на НЛП разработиха методи за автоматично откриване на сходство между въпроси, което беше една от споделените задачи в СемЕвал. Най-добре изпълняващите системи за тази задача са използвали синтактични дървесни ядра или метрика Софткосинус. Все пак остава неясно защо тези методи изглежда работят, дали ефективността им може да бъде подобрена чрез по-добри методи за предварителна обработка и какви грешки правят те (и други методи). Ето защо в настоящата статия систематично комбинираме и сравняваме тези два подхода с по-традиционните модели БМ25 и базирани на преводи. Освен това, анализираме въздействието на стъпките на предварителната обработка (понижаване, потискане на пунктуацията и премахване на спиращи думи) и сходството на значението на думата въз основа на различни разпределения (вероятност за превод на думи, Word2Vec, fastText и ELMo) върху изпълнението на задачата. Извършваме анализ на грешките, за да получим представа за разликите в ефективността между системните настройки. Изпълнението е публично достъпно от https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'da': 'Fællesskabsspørgsmål Besvarelsesfora er populære blandt internetbrugere, og et grundlæggende problem, de støder på, er at forsøge at finde ud af, om deres spørgsmål allerede er blevet stillet før. For at løse dette problem har NLP-forskere udviklet metoder til automatisk at registrere spørgsmål-lighed, hvilket var en af de delte opgaver i SemEval. De bedst ydende systemer til denne opgave gjorde brug af Syntactic Tree Kernels eller SoftCosine metric. Det er dog stadig uklart, hvorfor disse metoder synes at fungere, om deres ydeevne kan forbedres ved bedre forbearbejdningsmetoder, og hvilke slags fejl de (og andre metoder) laver. I denne artikel kombinerer og sammenligner vi derfor systematisk disse to tilgange med de mere traditionelle BM25- og oversættelsesbaserede modeller. Desuden analyserer vi effekten af forbehandling trin (sænkning, undertrykkelse af tegnsætning og stop ord fjernelse) og ordbetydning lighed baseret på forskellige fordelinger (ord oversættelse sandsynlighed, Word2Vec, fastText og ELMo) på udførelsen af opgaven. Vi gennemfører en fejlanalyse for at få indsigt i forskellene i ydeevne mellem systemets opsætninger. Gennemførelsen gøres offentligt tilgængelig på https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'nl': 'Community Vragen beantwoorden forums zijn populair onder internetgebruikers, en een fundamenteel probleem dat ze tegenkomen is proberen erachter te komen of hun vraag al eerder is gesteld. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, hebben NLP-onderzoekers methoden ontwikkeld om vraaggelijkenis automatisch te detecteren, een van de gedeelde taken in SemEval. De best presterende systemen voor deze taak gebruikten Syntactic Tree Kernels of de SoftCosine metric. Het blijft echter onduidelijk waarom deze methoden lijken te werken, of hun prestaties kunnen worden verbeterd door betere preprocessing methoden en welke soorten fouten ze (en andere methoden) maken. In deze paper combineren en vergelijken we deze twee benaderingen systematisch met de meer traditionele BM25- en vertaalmodellen. Daarnaast analyseren we de impact van voorbewerkingsstappen (verlaging, onderdrukking van interpunctie en verwijdering van stopwoorden) en woordbetekeningsgelijkenis op basis van verschillende distributies (woordvertaalwaarschijnlijkheid, Word2Vec, fastText en ELMo) op de uitvoering van de taak. We voeren een foutanalyse uit om inzicht te krijgen in de verschillen in prestaties tussen de systeemopstellingen. De tenuitvoerlegging wordt openbaar gemaakt via: https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'de': 'Community Fragebeantworter Foren sind beliebt bei Internetnutzern, und ein grundlegendes Problem, auf das sie stoßen, ist herauszufinden, ob ihre Frage bereits gestellt wurde. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, haben NLP-Forscher Methoden entwickelt, um automatisch Fragen-Ähnlichkeiten zu erkennen, was eine der gemeinsamen Aufgaben in SemEval war. Die leistungsstärksten Systeme für diese Aufgabe verwendeten Syntactic Tree Kernels oder die SoftCosine Metrik. Es bleibt jedoch unklar, warum diese Methoden zu funktionieren scheinen, ob ihre Leistung durch bessere Vorverarbeitungsmethoden verbessert werden kann und welche Art von Fehlern sie (und andere Methoden) machen. In diesem Beitrag kombinieren und vergleichen wir daher systematisch diese beiden Ansätze mit den traditionelleren BM25- und translationsbasierten Modellen. Darüber hinaus analysieren wir den Einfluss von Vorverarbeitungsschritten (Absenkung, Unterdrückung von Interpunktion und Stoppwortentfernung) und Wortbedeutungsähnlichkeit basierend auf verschiedenen Verteilungen (Wortübersetzungswahrscheinlichkeit, Word2Vec, fastText und ELMo) auf die Ausführung der Aufgabe. Wir führen eine Fehleranalyse durch, um Einblick in die Leistungsunterschiede zwischen den Systemaufbauten zu erhalten. Die Umsetzung wird öffentlich zugänglich gemacht unter https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'id': 'Forum Jawaban Pertanyaan Komunitas populer di antara pengguna Internet, dan masalah dasar yang mereka temui adalah mencoba untuk mencari tahu apakah pertanyaan mereka telah dibuat sebelumnya. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, peneliti NLP telah mengembangkan metode untuk secara otomatis mendeteksi pertanyaan-persamaan, yang merupakan salah satu tugas berbagi di SemEval. Sistem prestasi terbaik untuk tugas ini digunakan Kernel Pohon Sintaktik atau metrik SoftCosine. Namun, masih tidak jelas mengapa metode-metode ini tampaknya bekerja, apakah prestasi mereka dapat diperbaiki dengan metode pemroses yang lebih baik dan apa jenis kesalahan mereka (dan metode lain) membuat. Dalam kertas ini, kami secara sistematis menggabungkan dan membandingkan kedua pendekatan ini dengan BM25 tradisional dan model berdasarkan terjemahan. Moreover, we analyze the impact of preprocessing steps (lowercasing, suppression of punctuation and stop words removal) and word meaning similarity based on different distributions (word translation probability, Word2Vec, fastText and ELMo) on the performance of the task.  Kami melakukan analisis kesalahan untuk mendapatkan pengetahuan tentang perbedaan prestasi antara sistem set-up. Implementasi dibuat publik tersedia dari https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'ko': '커뮤니티 퀴즈 포럼은 인터넷 사용자들에게 인기가 많은데, 그들이 직면한 기본적인 문제는 그들의 문제가 이미 제기되었는지 찾아내려는 것이다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 NLP 연구진은 자동으로 문제의 유사성을 감지하는 방법을 개발했는데 이것은SemEval의 공유 임무 중의 하나이다.이 작업을 수행하는 가장 좋은 시스템은 문법 트리 핵이나 소프트 여현 도량을 사용합니다.그러나 왜 이런 방법들이 효과가 있는 것 같고, 그들의 성능이 더 좋은 예처리 방법을 통해 개선될 수 있는지, 그리고 그것들 (다른 방법) 이 어떤 오류를 일으킬지 아직은 알 수 없다.따라서 본고에서 우리는 이 두 가지 방법을 더욱 전통적인 BM25와 번역을 바탕으로 하는 모델을 체계적으로 결합시켜 비교한다.또한 사전 처리 절차(소문자, 문장부호 억제와 정지어 삭제)와 서로 다른 분포(단어 번역 확률,Word2Vec,fastText,ELMo)를 바탕으로 하는 의미 유사성이 임무 수행에 미치는 영향도 분석했다.우리는 시스템 설정 간의 성능 차이를 이해하기 위해 오류 분석을 했다.이 기능은 다음 사이트에서 공개적으로 얻을 수 있다.https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'sw': 'Jukwaa la swali la Jamii ni maarufu miongoni mwa watumiaji wa mtandao wa intaneti, na tatizo la msingi wanalokutana linajaribu kutambua kama swali lao limetokea kabla. Ili kushughulikia suala hili, watafiti wa NLP wametengeneza njia za kutambua maswali yanayofanana wenyewe, ambayo ni moja ya kazi zilizoshirikiana katika SemEval. Mfumo bora wa kufanya kazi hii ulitumika kwa mti wa Kernels au mtindo wa SoftCosine. However, it remains unclear why these methods seem to work, whether their performance can be improved by better preprocessing methods and what kinds of errors they (and other methods) make.  Katika karatasi hii, kwa hiyo tunaunganisha na kuunganisha mbili hizi mbili pamoja na mifano ya utamaduni zaidi ya BM25 na yenye utafsiri. Zaidi ya hayo, tunachambua athari ya hatua za upasuaji (kupunguza, kandamizi ya unyanyasaji na kusitisha maneno) na maana ya neno yanayofanana na usambazaji tofauti (uwezekano wa kutafsiri maneno, Word2Vec, fast Text na ELMo) juu ya utendaji wa kazi hiyo. Tunafanya uchambuzi wa makosa ili kupata uelewa wa tofauti katika utendaji kati ya mipango ya mfumo. Utawala unapatikana hadharani kutoka https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'tr': "Toplumaty soraglary jogap bermegi internetýän ullançylaryň arasynda meşhur, we olaryň bilen bolan esasy mesele öňünden soraglary çykarmak üçin synanyşýar. NLP araştyrmalaryň bu meselede çözmek üçin sorag-meňzeşlikini otomatik gözlemek üçin ýüze çykyp bardylar. Bu SemEval'da paylaşyk zadyň biri. Bu zadyň iň gowy edip biljek sistemleri Syntaktik agaç Kerneleri ýada SoftCosin metriklerinden ullanýar. Ýöne bu yönler näme üçin işleýän ýaly görünýän ýaly-da ýok. Ýöne olaryň janlaşlygyny gowy işleýän yönlerden we nähili hatalarynyň(we başga yönlerden) gowylaşdyrylmagy mümkin däldir. Bu kagyzda sistematik şeklinde bu iki golaýy BM25-iň däpli nusgalary we terjime edilen nusgalary bilen karşılaştyrýarys. Mundan soňra, biz öň işlemek adımlaryň täsirini çözümleýäris (kiçi möhüm, puçmak eliminasy we sözleri çykarmak üçin) we daýlamak sözleriň meňzeşliklerini (söz terjime mümkinçiligi, Word2Vec, fastMetin we ELMo) işiň netijesinde daýrylýar. Biz sistemiň düzümleriniň tapawutlaryny görüp bilmek üçin hata analyzasyny etdik. implementasiýasy publikak görkezilýändir https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.", 'fa': 'سوال اجتماعی جواب دادن فرموم\u200cهای اجتماعی در بین کاربران اینترنت مشهور هستند، و یک مشکل بنیادی که با آن روبرو می\u200cشوند سعی می\u200cکند بفهمند آیا سوال آنها قبلاً در مورد آن قرار شده است. برای حل این مسئله، تحقیقات NLP روش\u200cهایی را توسعه داده\u200cاند که به طور خودکار شبیه سوال\u200cها را شناسایی کنند، که یکی از مسئله\u200cهای مشترک در نیم\u200cEval بود. بهترین سیستم\u200cهای اجرای این کار از کرنل\u200cهای درخت سینتاکتیک یا متریک ساوتکاسین استفاده می\u200cشود. ولی این روش\u200cها به نظر نمی\u200cرسد که چرا این روش\u200cها کار می\u200cکنند، آیا عملکرد آنها با روش\u200cهای پیش\u200cپردازی بهتر و چه نوع اشتباهی (و روش\u200cهای دیگر) انجام می\u200cدهند، بهتر می\u200cشود. در این کاغذ، ما سیستم\u200cپذیر این دو روش را با مدل\u200cهای سنتی بیشتری BM25 و بر اساس ترجمه ترجمه می\u200cکنیم و مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. علاوه بر این، ما تاثیر قدم\u200cهای پیش\u200cپردازی را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم (کاهش، فشار نقطه\u200cها و جلوگیری کردن کلمات) و معنی شبیه\u200cانگیز کلمات بر پایه توزیع\u200cهای مختلف (احتمال ترجمه\u200cهای کلمات، Word2Vec، fastText و ELMo) بر انجام کار کار. ما یک تحلیل اشتباهی را انجام می دهیم تا به تفاوت بین تنظیم سیستم دریافت کنیم. عملیات عمومی از https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'af': "Kommunikasievraag Antwoord forums is populaar onder Internet gebruikers, en 'n basiese probleem wat hulle teentrek, probeer om uit te vind of hulle vraag alreeds voor geplaas is. Om hierdie probleem te adres, het NLP ondersoekers ontwikkel metodes om automaties vraag-gelykenis te ontdek, wat een van die gedeelde taak in SemEval was. Die beste uitvoerde stelsels vir hierdie taak gemaak het gebruik van Syntaktiese Boom Kernels of die SoftCosine metrie. Maar dit bly onbekende waarom hierdie metodes lyk om te werk, of hulle prestasie kan verbeter word deur beter voorspoedingsmetodes en wat soort foute hulle (en ander metodes) maak. In hierdie papier, ons het dan sistematies hierdie twee toegang gekombineer en vergelyk met die meer tradisionele BM25 en vertalingsgebaseerde modele. Ook, ons analyseer die effek van voorafverwerking stappe (kleinering, ondersteuning van puntuasie en stop woorde verwyder) en woord beteken gelykenis gebaseer op verskillende verspreidings (woord vertaling waarskynlik, Word2Vec, fastText en ELMo) op die prestasie van die taak. Ons doen 'n fout analiseer om insig te kry binne die verskille in prestasie tussen die stelsel opstellings. Die implementasie is openlik beskikbaar van https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.", 'hr': 'Forumi odgovora na pitanja zajednice su popularni među korisnicima interneta, a osnovni problem s kojim se susreću pokušava saznati je li njihovo pitanje već postavljeno. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, istraživači NLP razvili su metode automatskog otkrivanja sličnosti pitanja, koji je bio jedan od zajedničkih zadataka u semiEvalu. Najbolji izvodnji sustavi za ovaj zadatak koji su koristili sintaktične kružne drveta ili metriku SoftCosine. Međutim, još uvijek nije jasno zašto te metode čine da rade, da li se njihova učinka može poboljšati boljim metodama preobrađivanja i kakve greške čine (i druge metode). U ovom papiru, stoga sistematski kombiniramo i uspoređujemo te dvije pristupe sa tradicionalnijim modelima BM25-a i prevodnim modelima. Osim toga, analiziramo učinak koraka preobrađivanja (smanjenje, potisnutje točke i uklanjanje riječi) i sličnost riječi na temelju različitih distribucija (vjerojatnost prevoda riječi, Word2Vec, fastText i ELMo) na provedbu zadatka. Provodimo analizu greške kako bi dobili uvid u razlike u učinkovitosti između sustava. Provođenje je javno dostupno od https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'hy': 'Ինտերնետի օգտագործողների մոտ հայտնի են համայնքային հարցերի պատասխանատվությունների ֆորմերը, և նրանց հանդիպման հիմնական խնդիրն այն է, որ փորձում է պարզել, արդյոք նրանց հարցը արդեն առաջին անգամ առաջարկվել է: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար, ՆԼՊ հետազոտողները ստեղծել են մեթոդներ, որոնք ինքնաբերաբար հայտնաբերում են հարցերի նմանությունը, որը ՍեմԵվալի ընդհանուր խնդիրներից մեկն էր: Այս խնդրի լավագույն գործողությունները օգտագործեցին Սինտակտիկ ծառի միջուկները կամ soft COSIN մետրիկը: Այնուամենայնիվ, դեռևս անհասկանալի է, թե ինչու են այս մեթոդները աշխատում, արդյոք նրանց արտադրողությունը կարող է բարելավվել ավելի լավ նախամշակվող մեթոդների միջոցով և ինչ տեսակի սխալներ են նրանք անում (և այլ մեթոդներ): Այս թղթի մեջ մենք համապատասխանաբար համադրում ենք և համեմատում այս երկու մոտեցումները ավանդական BM25-ի և թարգմանման հիմնված մոդելների հետ: Ավելին, մենք վերլուծում ենք նախամշակման քայլերի ազդեցությունը (նվազեցնել, ճնշել կետիճանը և կանգնեցնել բառերի հեռացումը) և բառի նշանակության նմանությունը, հիմնված տարբեր տարածումների վրա (բառի թարգմանման հավանականությունը, Word2vec, արագText և ELMo) գործողության վրա: Մենք սխալների վերլուծություն ենք կատարում, որպեսզի հասկանանք համակարգի կազմակերպությունների արտադրողության տարբերությունները: Այս իրականացումը հասանելի է https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'sq': 'Forumit e përgjigjeve të pyetjeve të komunitetit janë popullorë midis përdoruesve të internetit dhe një problem themelor me të cilin ndeshen është përpjekja për të zbuluar nëse pyetja e tyre është bërë tashmë më parë. Për të trajtuar këtë çështje, kërkuesit e NLP kanë zhvilluar metoda për të zbuluar automatikisht pyetje-ngjashmërinë, e cila ishte një nga detyrat e përbashkëta në SemEval. Sistemet më të mirë të funksionueshme për këtë detyrë përdorën Kernelet e Pemës Sintaktike ose metrikën SoftCosine. Megjithatë, mbetet e paqartë se pse këto metoda duken të funksionojnë, nëse performanca e tyre mund të përmirësohet me metoda më të mira paraprocesuese dhe çfarë lloj gabimesh bëjnë (dhe metoda të tjera). Në këtë letër, ne kështu kombinojmë dhe krahasojmë sistematikisht këto dy qasje me modelet më tradicionale BM25 dhe të përkthimit. Përveç kësaj, ne analizojmë ndikimin e hapave të përprocesimit (shkurtimin, shtypjen e piktimit dhe ndalimin e heqjes së fjalëve) dhe ngjashmërinë e fjalës që do të thotë ngjashmëri bazuar në shpërndarjet e ndryshme (probabiliteti i përkthimit të fjalës, Word2Vec, FasText dhe ELMo) në kryerjen e detyrës. Ne kryejmë një analizë gabimesh për të fituar kuptim në dallimet në performancë midis sistemeve të konfiguruara. Zbatimi është bërë publikisht në dispozicion nga https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'am': 'የውይይት ጥያቄ መለስ ጦማሪያዎች በInternet ን ተጠቃሚዎች መካከል የሚቆጠሩ ናቸው፡፡ ወደዚህ ጉዳይ ለመግለጽ የNLP አስተማሪ የጥያቄ-ምሳሌን በራስነት ለማግኘት ሥርዓቶችን አግኝተዋል፤ ይህም በSemEval ውስጥ የተካፈለ ስራዎችን አንዱ ነው። ለዚህ ስራ የተሻለ የስርዓት ስርዓት የSyntactic Tree Kernels ወይም SoftCosine metric ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን እነዚህ ሥርዓቶች የሚሠሩ ስለምን አይገልጽም፣ የሥርዓታቸውን በመልካም ጥረት እና ምን ዓይነት ስህተት (እና ሌሎችም ዘዴዎች) እንዲያሳድጉ ይችላል፡፡ ስለዚህ በዚህ ገጽ፣ እነዚህን ሁለቱን የባሕላዊ BM25 እና ትርጓሜ የተደረገውን ምሳሌዎች እናሳያታለን፡፡ ደግሞም፣ የፕሮግራም ደረጃዎች (አነስተኛ፣ የግጭት እና ቃሎችን ማስወገድ እናስቀሳቅስ) እና ቃልን በተለየ ትርጓሜ (የቃላት ትርጓሜ ምናልባት፣ Word2Vec፣ ጾም ጽሑፍ እና ELMo) በሚደረገው ስርዓት ላይ የተመሳሳይ እናስተዋልታለን፡፡ የስሕተት አካባቢዎች መካከል በሥርዓት ግንኙነት መካከል ያለውን ልዩነት ለማግኘት የስህተትን አስተያየት እናደርጋለን፡፡ ቦታ https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'az': "Cumhuriyet soruŇüu cavab ver…ôn forumlar internet istifad…ô√ßil…ôri arasńĪnda m…ôŇühurdur, v…ô onlarńĪn qarŇüńĪlaŇüan …ôsas problemi …ôvv…ôlc…ô suallarńĪnńĪn soruŇüduńüunu √∂yr…ônm…ôy…ô √ßalńĪŇüńĪr. Bu m…ôs…ôl…ôd…ôn √ß…ôkinm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn NLP araŇütńĪrmacńĪlarńĪ SemEval'da paylaŇüńĪlmńĪŇü iŇül…ôrd…ôn biri sual-b…ônz…ôrini avtomatik tanńĪtmaq √ľ√ß√ľn metodlarńĪ t…ôhsil etdil…ôr. Bu iŇüin …ôn yaxŇüńĪ performans sisteml…ôri Sintaktik ańüac Kernell…ôrind…ôn v…ô ya SoftCosine metrikl…ôrind…ôn istifad…ô edilmiŇüdir. Ancaq bu metodlarńĪn n…ô √ľ√ß√ľn √ßalńĪŇümańüa b…ônz…ôyir, onlarńĪn performanslarńĪ daha yaxŇüńĪ iŇül…ôm…ô metodlarńĪ il…ô yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪlńĪr v…ô n…ô c√ľr hatalar (v…ô baŇüqa metodlar) edirl…ôr. Bu kańüńĪzda sistematik olaraq bu iki metodlarńĪ daha q√ľvv…ôtli BM25 v…ô √ßevirim modell…ôri il…ô qarŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪrńĪq. Daha sonra, biz …ôvv…ôlc…ô iŇül…ôm…ô adńĪmlarńĪnńĪn etkisini analiz edirik (azaltmaq, m…ôlumatlarńĪn …ôskilm…ôsini v…ô s√∂zl…ôrin silm…ôsini durdurmaq) v…ô s√∂zl…ôrin m√ľxt…ôlif dańüńĪtńĪmlarńĪn ( s√∂zl…ôrin qurńüulama m√ľmk√ľnl√ľy√ľ, Word2Vec, fastText v…ô ELMo) v…ôzif…ôsind…ô istifad…ô edirik. Biz sistem quruluŇülarńĪ arasńĪnda f…ôrqli f…ôrqli f…ôrql…ôr…ô baxmaq √ľ√ß√ľn x…ôta analizi idar…ô edirik. ńįŇül…ôm…ô a√ßńĪq-aŇükar faydalanńĪr https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.", 'bn': 'কমিউনিটি প্রশ্নের উত্তর ফোরাম ইন্টারনেট ব্যবহারকারীদের মধ্যে জনপ্রিয় এবং তাদের সাক্ষাৎ করা একটি মৌলিক সমস্যা হচ্ছে যে তারা জানতে চাচ্ছ To address this issue, NLP researchers have developed methods to automatically detect question-similarity, which was one of the shared tasks in SemEval.  এই কাজের জন্য সবচেয়ে ভালো প্রদর্শনী সিস্টেম সিন্টেক্টিক গাছ কেরেন্স বা সফটকোসিন মেট্রিক ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। তবে এটা এখনো পরিষ্কার যে কেন এই পদ্ধতিগুলো কাজ করতে পারে, তাদের প্রক্রিয়া ভালো প্রক্রিয়ার পদ্ধতি এবং তারা কি ধরনের ভুল তৈরি করে (আর অন্যান্ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সিস্টেমিকভাবে এই দুটি পদক্ষেপের সাথে একত্রিত করি আরো ঐতিহ্যবাহী বিএম২৫ এবং অনুবাদ ভিত্তিক মডেলে এছাড়াও, আমরা প্রোপ্রেসিং পদক্ষেপের প্রভাব বিশ্লেষণ করি (ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত, দমন এবং শব্দগুলো সরিয়ে দেওয়া এবং বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিত্তিতে শব আমরা একটি ভুল বিশ্লেষণ করি সিস্টেম সেট-আপের মধ্যে পার্থক্যের মধ্যে দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি পাওয়ার জন্য। এই বাস্তবতা প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'bs': 'Forumi odgovora na pitanje zajednice su popularni među korisnicima interneta, a osnovni problem s kojim se susreću pokušava saznati da li je njihovo pitanje već postavljeno. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, istraživači NLP razvili su metode da automatski otkriju sličnost pitanja, koji je bio jedan od zajedničkih zadataka u SemEvalu. Najbolji izvršni sistem za ovaj zadatak korišteni od sintaktičnih kernela drveta ili metrika SoftCosine. Međutim, još uvijek nije jasno zašto te metode čine da rade, da li se njihov učinkovit može poboljšati boljim metodama preobrađivanja i kakvim greškama oni (i drugim metodama) čine. U ovom papiru, stoga, sistematski kombiniramo i uspoređujemo te dve pristupe sa tradicionalnijim modelima BM25-a i premeštajnim modelima. Osim toga, analiziramo učinak koraka preobrađivanja (smanjenje, potisnutje točke i uklanjanje riječi) i sličnost riječi koja znači na različitim distribucijama (vjerojatnost prevoda riječi, Word2Vec, fastText i ELMo) na provedbu zadatka. Provodimo analizu greške kako bi dobili uvid u razlike u učinkovitosti između setova sustava. Provođenje je javno dostupno od https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'cs': 'Fóra pro odpovědi na otázky komunity jsou mezi uživateli internetu populární a základním problémem, se kterým se setkávají, je zjistit, zda již jejich otázka byla položena dříve. Pro řešení tohoto problému výzkumníci NLP vyvinuli metody automatického zjištění podobnosti otázek, což byl jeden ze sdílených úkolů v SemEvalu. Nejlépe výkonné systémy pro tento úkol využívaly jádra stromu Syntaktic nebo metriky SoftCosine. Zůstává však nejasné, proč tyto metody fungují, zda jejich výkon lze zlepšit lepšími metodami předzpracování a jaké druhy chyb dělají (a další metody). V tomto článku proto systematicky kombinujeme a porovnáváme tyto dva přístupy s tradičnějšími BM25 a překladovými modely. Dále analyzujeme vliv kroků předzpracování (snížení, potlačení interpunkce a odstranění stop slov) a podobnosti významů slov na základě různých distribucí (pravděpodobnost překladu slov, Word2Vec, fastText a ELMo) na plnění úlohy. Provádíme analýzu chyb, abychom získali přehled o rozdílech ve výkonu mezi nastavením systému. Provádění je zpřístupněno veřejně z: https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'et': 'Kogukonna küsimustele vastamise foorumid on internetikasutajate seas populaarsed ja põhiprobleem, millega nad kokku puutuvad, on püüda teada saada, kas nende küsimus on juba varem esitatud. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks on NLP teadlased välja töötanud meetodid küsimuste sarnasuse automaatseks tuvastamiseks, mis oli üks SemEvali jagatud ülesandeid. Kõige paremini toimivad süsteemid selle ülesande jaoks kasutasid süntaktilisi puutuumasid või SoftCosinuse meetrit. Siiski jääb ebaselgeks, miks need meetodid näivad toimivat, kas nende jõudlust saab parandada paremate eeltöötlusmeetoditega ja milliseid vigu nad (ja muud meetodid) teevad. Selles dokumendis kombineerime ja võrdleme neid kahte lähenemisviisi traditsioonilisemate BM25 ja tõlkepõhiste mudelitega. Lisaks analüüsime eeltöötluse etappide (vähendamine, vahemärkide mahasurumine ja peatamissõnade eemaldamine) ja sõna tähenduse sarnasust erinevate jaotuste põhjal (sõnatõlke tõenäosus, Word2Vec, fastText ja ELMo) mõju ülesande täitmisele. Teostame veaanalüüsi, et saada ülevaade erinevustest süsteemi seadistuste jõudluses. Rakendamine tehakse üldsusele kättesaadavaks aadressil: https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'ca': "Community Question Answering forums are popular among Internet users, and a basic problem they encounter is trying to find out if their question has already been posed before.  Per abordar aquesta qüestió, els investigadors del NLP han desenvolupat mètodes per detectar automàticament la similitud entre preguntes, una de les tasques compartides de SemEval. Els sistemes més eficaços d'aquesta tasca van fer servir els núcles d'arbre sintàctic o la mètrica SoftCosine. No obstant això, encara no és clar per què aquests mètodes semblen funcionar, si el seu rendiment pot millorar amb mètodes de preprocessió millors i quin tipus d'errors cometen (i altres mètodes). In this paper, we therefore systematically combine and compare these two approaches with the more traditional BM25 and translation-based models.  A més, analitzem l'impacte de les etapes de preprocessió (reducció, supresió de la puntuació i detenció de la eliminació de paraules) i la similitud de la paraula basada en diferents distribucions (probabilitat de traducció de paraules, Word2Vec, FasText i ELMo) en el desempeny de la tasca. Fem una an àlisi d'errors per aconseguir una idea de les diferències en el rendiment entre les configuracions del sistema. La implementació està publicament disponible https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.", 'fi': 'Community Question Answering -foorumit ovat suosittuja internetin käyttäjien keskuudessa, ja heidän kohtaamansa perusongelma on selvittää, onko heidän kysymyksensä jo esitetty aiemmin. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi NLP:n tutkijat ovat kehittäneet menetelmiä, joilla voidaan automaattisesti havaita kysymys-samankaltaisuus, mikä oli yksi SemEvalin yhteisistä tehtävistä. Parhaiten suoriutuvat järjestelmät tähän tehtävään ovat hyödyntäneet Syntactic Tree -ytimet tai SoftCosine-mittaria. On kuitenkin epäselvää, miksi nämä menetelmät näyttävät toimivan, voidaanko niiden suorituskykyä parantaa parempien esikäsittelymenetelmien avulla ja millaisia virheitä ne (ja muut menetelmät) tekevät. Tässä artikkelissa yhdistämme ja vertaamme systemaattisesti näitä kahta lähestymistapaa perinteisempiin BM25- ja käännösmalleihin. Lisäksi analysoimme esikäsittelyvaiheiden (lyhennys, välimerkkien poisto ja pysäytyssanojen poisto) ja sanojen merkityksen samankaltaisuuden vaikutusta eri jakaumiin (sanakäännöksen todennäköisyys, Word2Vec, fastText ja ELMo) tehtävän suorittamiseen. Teemme virheanalyysin saadaksemme käsityksen järjestelmien suorituseroista. Täytäntöönpano on julkisesti saatavilla seuraavasta osoitteesta: https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'he': 'פורמות תשובות לשאלות הקהילתיות פופולריות בין משתמשים באינטרנט, ובעיה בסיסית שהם פוגשים היא לנסות לגלות אם השאלה שלהם כבר הועמדה בעבר. כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, חוקרי NLP פיתחו שיטות כדי לגלות באופן אוטומטי שאלות-דומות, שהיא היתה אחת מהמשימות המשותפות בסימוול. The best performing systems for this task made use of Syntactic Tree Kernels or the SoftCosine metric.  בכל אופן, עדיין לא ברור מדוע השיטות האלה נראות עובדות, אם ההופעה שלהן יכולה להשתפר על ידי שיטות מוקדמות טובות יותר ואיזה סוג של טעויות הם (ושיטות אחרות) עושים. בעבודה הזו, אנו משלבים ושוואים באופן שיטתי את שתי הגישויות האלה עם BM25 המסורתיים והדוגמנים המבוססים בתרגום. בנוסף, אנו מנתחים את ההשפעה של צעדים מתקדמים (מיטות נמוכות, דחיסה של נקודה ומעצרת הסירה של מילים) והמילה משמעות דומה בהתבסס על פיצוצים שונים (סבירות התרגום מילים, Word2Vec, FasText ואל-מו) על ביצוע המשימה. אנו מבצעים ניתוח שגיאות כדי להשיג הבנה על ההבדלים ביציאות בין המערכות. ההפעלה הופכת לפומבי https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'ha': "Community Question Answering forums are popular among Internet users, and a basic problem they encounter is trying to find out if their question has already been posed before.  To, da za'a yi amfani da wannan masu husũma, watani na NLP sun buɗe hanyoyin su gane farat ɗaya masu daidaita-tambayi, wanda ya kasance wani daga aikin da aka raba su a cikin SemEl. @ info: whatsthis Amma, bã ta da gane kwanan waɗannan hanyõyin su ke aiki, ko da za'a samar da su da shiryoyin pre-kifi da wane irin ɓata (da wasu hanyõyi) su aikata. Daga wannan takardan, sai mu haɗa waɗannan hanyõyin biyu masu daidaita da shiryoyin ayukan BM25 da masu fassarawa. Kayya, muna anayyar da fassaran hanyõyi na pre-aiki (da aka ƙara, ƙaranci da kuma ana tsaye magana) da ma'anar magana yana daidaita a kan fassarar dabam-dabam (mai fassarar fassarar magana mai yiwuwa, word2Verc, Fast Text da ELMo) kan aikin aikin. Munã tafiyar wani anayyar ɓata dõmin ka sami fahimta a cikin wajen aiki da ke tsakanin tsari-na'ura. An bayyana shirin zartar da shi daga https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.", 'sk': 'Forum za odgovarjanje na vprašanja skupnosti so priljubljeni med uporabniki interneta, osnovna težava pa je, da ugotovijo, ali je bilo njihovo vprašanje že postavljeno. Za reševanje tega problema so raziskovalci NLP razvili metode za samodejno odkrivanje podobnosti vprašanj, kar je bila ena od skupnih nalog v SemEvalu. Najbolj učinkoviti sistemi za to nalogo so uporabljali sintatična drevesna jedra ali metriko SoftCosinus. Vendar ostaja nejasno, zakaj se zdi, da te metode delujejo, ali je mogoče njihovo učinkovitost izboljšati z boljšimi metodami predobdelave in kakšne napake naredijo (in druge metode). V tem prispevku sistematično združujemo in primerjamo ta dva pristopa z bolj tradicionalnimi modeli BM25 in prevajalskimi modeli. Poleg tega analiziramo vpliv korakov predobdelave (znižanje, zatiranje ločil in odstranitev zaustavljenih besed) in podobnosti besednega pomena na podlagi različnih distribucij (verjetnost prevajanja besed, Word2Vec, fastText in ELMo) na izvedbo naloge. Izvajamo analizo napak, da bi dobili vpogled v razlike v učinkovitosti med sistemskimi nastavitvami. Izvajanje je javno dostopno na: https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'jv': 'Gales Kapan Komunitas Ngubah nambah iki, sampeyan NLP luwih akeh sira nggawe maneh kanggo otomatik detect question-Simlarité, iki wis mungkin karo nambah operasi kanggo Kemerdekaan Laptop" and "Desktop Nanging, lah ora ngerasai perkarang-perusahaan nganggep sistem iki dadi bisa ngubah cara batasané supoyo nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe sistem sing luwih apik karo perusahaan cara sing diranggawe (lan teka-teka bener). Nang paper iki, kita sistematik beraksi lan nambah iki dadi sampek karo model sing beraksi dadi, lan basa tarjamahan sing bisa basa gambar nggambar. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé éntuk énalusi nung kelas kanggo nggawe barang-barang kanggo ngerasakno itéwé iki dadi sing paling nggawe sistem setup. Kowe wehken nggawe Publik https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.', 'bo': 'ཚོགས་སྡེའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་ལན་སྐོར་གྱི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ལ་དྲ་རྒྱའི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་དབར་གྱི་མི་མང་པོ་ཡིན། དོན་དག་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་བཤད་ན། NLP འཚོལ་ཞིབ་པས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དྲི་ཚིག་དང་འདྲ་བ་དེ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག The best performing system for this task made use of Syntactic Tree Kernels or the SoftCosine metric. ཡིན་ནའང་། ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་ཚོ་ལས་ཀ་སྒྲུབ་མི་འདུག་པས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་གྲུབ་སྐྱོང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་དང་ག་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་གཞན་ཞིག་བྱེད་ན་ཡར་ འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རིམ་ལུས་པ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡོམས་ནས་སྔོན་སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་གྱི་BM25 དང་གཞི་ར Moreover, we analyze the impact of preprocessing steps (lowercasing, suppression of punctuation and stop words removal) and word meaning similarity based on different distributions (word translation probability, Word2Vec, fastText and ELMo) on the performance of the task. ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་སྒྲིག་གི་དབར་གྱི་ཁྱད་པར་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་ལ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གཞུང་སྒྲིག་དེ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་སྤྱོད་མང་ཙམ་ཞིག་ནས་བཟོ་ཚར་བ https://github.com/fkunneman/DiscoSumo/tree/master/ranlp.'}
{'en': 'Resolving Pronouns for a Resource-Poor Language, Malayalam Using Resource-Rich Language, Tamil.', 'pt': 'Resolvendo pronomes para uma linguagem pobre em recursos, malaiala usando linguagem rica em recursos, tâmil.', 'fr': 'Résoudre les pronoms pour une langue pauvre en ressources, malayalam utilisant une langue riche en ressources, tamoul.', 'ar': 'حل الضمائر للغة فقيرة الموارد ، المالايالامية باستخدام لغة غنية بالموارد ، التاميل.', 'es': 'Resolución de pronombres para un idioma con pocos recursos, malayalam usando un lenguaje rico en recursos, tamil.', 'ja': 'リソースの乏しい言語の代名詞の解決、リソースの豊富な言語を使用したマラヤーラム語、タミル語。', 'zh': '解析资源贫乏语言之代词,用多言之马拉雅拉姆语,泰米尔语。', 'hi': 'संसाधन-गरीब भाषा के लिए सर्वनामों को हल करना, मलयालम संसाधन-समृद्ध भाषा का उपयोग करना, तमिल।', 'ru': 'Разрешение местоимений для малоресурсного языка, малаялам с использованием богатого ресурсами языка, тамильский.', 'ga': 'Forainmneacha a Réiteach do Theanga Acmhainne-Bocht, Mailéalaimis a Úsáid Teanga Saibhir Acmhainní, Tamailis.', 'el': 'Επίλυση προφορών για μια γλώσσα φτωχή σε πόρους, Μαλαγιάλαμ χρησιμοποιώντας γλώσσα πλούσια σε πόρους, Ταμίλ.', 'hu': 'Névmások megoldása egy erőforrás-szegény nyelvre, Malayalam használatával erőforrás-gazdag nyelv, tamil.', 'ka': 'რესურსი-ბედნიერი ენაზე, მალაიალამ გამოყენება რესურსი-ბედნიერი ენაზე, რამილში.', 'it': 'Risoluzione dei pronomi per una lingua povera di risorse, Malayalam utilizzando una lingua ricca di risorse, Tamil.', 'kk': 'Ресурс- қауіпсіз тіл үшін прогноздарды шешу, Малайям ресурс- бағасы тіл, Тамил.', 'lt': 'Pavadinimų, skirtų neturtingai kalbai, šalinimas, Malaizija, naudojanti išteklius turinčią kalbą, tamilai.', 'mk': 'Resolving Pronouns for a Resource-Poor Language, Malayalam Using Resource-Rich Language, Tamil.', 'ms': 'Resolving Pronouns for a Resource-Poor Language, Malayalam Using Resource-Rich Language, Tamil.', 'ml': 'ഒരു വിഭവഭാഷയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി പാവപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷയ്ക്കുള്ള പ്രോണോണുകള്\u200d പരിഹാരം ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'mt': 'Ir-Riżoluzzjoni tal-Pronomi għal Lingwa Fqara fir-Riżorsi, il-Malayalam bl-Użu ta’ Lingwa Rikjesta fir-Riżorsi, it-Tamil.', 'mn': 'Байгаль-ядуу хэл, Малайлам, Байгаль-Баян хэл, Тамил хэлний нэр тодорхойлолтуудыг шийдвэрлэх.', 'no': 'Løysing av progrunnslar for ein ressurs- dårlig språk, Malayalam som brukar ressurs- rykk språk, Tamil.', 'pl': 'Rozwiązywanie zaimków dla języka ubogiego w zasoby, malajalam używając języka bogatego w zasoby, tamilski.', 'ro': 'Rezolvarea pronumelor pentru o limbă lipsită de resurse, Malayalam folosind o limbă bogată în resurse, Tamil.', 'sr': 'Rešavanje prognoza za siromašan jezik resursa, Malayalam a korištenje jezika resursa-bogata, Tamila.', 'so': 'Macluumaadka ku saabsan luqada Resource-Faqiirka, Malayalam isticmaalka luqada Resource-Rich, Tamil.', 'sv': 'Lösa pronomen för ett resursfattigt språk, Malayalam med resursrikt språk, Tamil.', 'ta': 'மூலம்- ஏழைய மொழி, மலகாலாம் மூலத்தை பயன்படுத்தும் மொழி, டாமில் பயன்படுத்தும் பொருள்களை தீர்க்கும்.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂාවක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂාවක් විශ්වාස කරනවා, මලායාලාම් ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂාව භාෂා කරනවා.', 'ur': 'Resource-Poor Language کے لئے Pronouns Resolving, Malayalam Resource-Rich Language, Tamil.', 'uz': 'Malayalam Resource- Rich Tildan foydalanuvchi Manbanlar, Tamil tildan foydalanuvchi davom etilmoqda.', 'vi': 'Kiên danh từ cho ngôn ngữ nghèo nàn, Malayaham Dùng ngôn ngữ giàu tài nguyên, Tamil.', 'bg': 'Решаване на местоимения за беден с ресурси език, малаялам с използване на богат на ресурси език, тамилски.', 'hr': 'Riješavanje proizvoda za siromašni jezik resursa, Malayalam a korištenje jezika resursa-bogata, Tamila.', 'da': 'Løsning af udtaler for et ressourcefattigt sprog, Malayalam ved hjælp af ressourcerige sprog, Tamil.', 'nl': 'Het oplossen van voornaamwoorden voor een hulpbronnenarme taal, Maleyalam met behulp van hulpbronnenrijke taal, Tamil.', 'de': 'Das Auflösen von Pronomen für eine ressourcenarme Sprache, Malayalam mit ressourcenreicher Sprache, Tamil.', 'ko': '말레이시아어는 자원이 풍부한 테밀어를 사용하여 자원 부족 언어의 대명사 문제를 해결한다.', 'id': 'Menyelesaikan nama untuk bahasa yang miskin sumber daya, Malayalam menggunakan bahasa yang kaya sumber daya, Tamil.', 'fa': 'استفاده از زبان منابع-ثروت، تامیل، استفاده از منابع-ثروت.', 'sw': 'Kutumia Makubaliano kwa lugha yenye rasilimali masikini, Malayalam kutumia lugha yenye rasilimali yenye tajiri, Tamil.', 'sq': 'Duke zgjidhur emrat për një gjuhë të varfër me burime, Malayalam duke përdorur gjuhën e pasur me burime, Tamil.', 'af': "Oplos voorneme vir 'n Hulpbron- Poor Taal, Malayalam gebruik hulpbron- Rich Taal, Tamil.", 'tr': 'Ressourt-garyp dili üçin sanlary çözmek, Malayalam Ressourt-Rich Dili ullanýar, Tamil.', 'am': 'የድሀ-ድሀ ቋንቋ፣ ማላሊያም የመሬት-ሀብታም ቋንቋ፣ ትሚሊ በመጠቀም የሚቆጠሩ ፕሮጀኖችን በመጠቀም ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Resolving Pronouns for a Resource-Poor Language, Malayalam Using Resource-Rich Language, Tamil.', 'az': 'Resource-Poor Language, Malayalam Resource-Rich Language, Tamil dilini istifadə edir.', 'bn': 'মালায়ালাম সম্পদ-ধনী ভাষা ব্যবহার করছে, তামিল।', 'bs': 'Resolving Pronouns for a Resource-Poor Language, Malayalam using Resource-Rich Language, Tamil.', 'ca': 'Resolving Pronouns for a Resource-Poor Language, Malayalam Using Resource-Rich Language, Tamil.', 'cs': 'Řešení zájmen pro jazyk chudý na zdroje, malajalám používající jazyk bohatý na zdroje, tamilština.', 'et': 'Resource-vaese keele pronounide lahendamine, malayalam kasutades ressursirikkat keelt, tamil.', 'fi': 'Resource-Heikon kielen pronominien ratkaiseminen, Malayalam Resurssirikkaalla kielellä, Tamil.', 'jv': 'Ngubah Resolèh Pronung kanggo langgambar Resolèh-Pasing, malayam Ngawe Resolèh-Resolèh, Tamil.', 'sk': 'Razreševanje zaimkov za jezik, ki je slab z viri, malajalam z uporabo jezika, bogatega z viri, tamilščina.', 'ha': 'Restart Pronuns for a Resource-Pown language, Malayalam uses Resource-rich language, Tail.', 'he': 'לפתור שם לשפה מסכנה עם משאבים, מליאלאם משתמש בשפה עשירה עם משאבים, טמיל.', 'bo': 'རྒྱུ་ནོར་འབྱུང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་གཙང་དག་བཟོ་བྱེད་བཞིན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'In this paper we give in detail how a resource rich language can be used for resolving pronouns for a less resource language. The source language, which is resource rich language in this study, is Tamil and the resource poor language is Malayalam, both belonging to the same language family, Dravidian. The Pronominal resolution developed for Tamil uses CRFs. Our approach is to leverage the Tamil language model to test Malayalam data and the processing required for Malayalam data is detailed. The similarity at the syntactic level between the languages is exploited in identifying the features for developing the Tamil language model. The word form or the lexical item is not considered as a feature for training the CRFs. Evaluation on Malayalam Wikipedia data shows that our approach is correct and the results, though not as good as Tamil, but comparable.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة نقدم بالتفصيل كيف يمكن استخدام لغة غنية بالموارد لحل الضمائر للغة أقل موارد. لغة المصدر ، وهي لغة غنية بالموارد في هذه الدراسة ، هي التاميلية واللغة الفقيرة في الموارد هي المالايالامية ، وكلاهما ينتميان إلى نفس عائلة اللغة ، درافيدان. يستخدم القرار Pronominal المطور للتاميل CRFs. نهجنا هو الاستفادة من نموذج لغة التاميل لاختبار البيانات المالايالامية والمعالجة المطلوبة لبيانات المالايالامية مفصلة. يتم استغلال التشابه على المستوى النحوي بين اللغات في تحديد ميزات تطوير نموذج اللغة التاميلية. لا يعتبر شكل الكلمة أو العنصر المعجمي ميزة لتدريب نماذج الإبلاغ الموحد. يُظهر التقييم على بيانات Malayalam Wikipedia أن نهجنا صحيح وأن النتائج ، على الرغم من أنها ليست جيدة مثل التاميل ، ولكنها قابلة للمقارنة.', 'es': 'En este artículo explicamos en detalle cómo se puede usar un lenguaje rico en recursos para resolver pronombres para un idioma con menos recursos. El idioma de origen, que es un idioma rico en recursos en este estudio, es el tamil y el idioma de escasos recursos es el malayalam, ambos pertenecientes a la misma familia lingüística, el dravidiano. La resolución pronominal desarrollada para el tamil utiliza CRF. Nuestro enfoque es aprovechar el modelo del idioma tamil para probar los datos en malayalam y se detalla el procesamiento requerido para los datos en malayalam. La similitud a nivel sintáctico entre los idiomas se explota para identificar las características para desarrollar el modelo del idioma tamil. La forma verbal o el elemento léxico no se consideran una característica para el entrenamiento de los CRF. La evaluación de los datos de Wikipedia en malayalam muestra que nuestro enfoque es correcto y los resultados, aunque no tan buenos como los del tamil, son comparables.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous expliquons en détail comment une langue riche en ressources peut être utilisée pour résoudre les pronoms d'une langue moins riche en ressources. La langue source, qui est une langue riche en ressources dans cette étude, est le tamoul et la langue pauvre en ressources est le malayalam, toutes deux appartenant à la même famille linguistique, le dravidien. La résolution pronominal développée pour le tamoul utilise des CRF. Notre approche consiste à tirer parti du modèle de langue tamoule pour tester les données malayalam et le traitement requis pour les données malayalam est détaillé. La similitude au niveau syntaxique entre les langues est exploitée pour identifier les caractéristiques permettant de développer le modèle de langue tamoule. La forme du mot ou l'élément lexical n'est pas considéré comme une caractéristique pour la formation des CRF. L'évaluation des données Wikipédia en malayalam montre que notre approche est correcte et les résultats, bien qu'ils ne soient pas aussi bons que ceux du tamoul, mais comparables.", 'ja': 'この論文では、リソースの少ない言語の代名詞を解決するためにリソース豊富な言語をどのように使用できるかを詳細に説明します。この研究で資源豊富な言語である語源言語はタミル語であり、資源貧弱な言語はマラヤーラム語であり、どちらも同じ言語族であるドラヴィダ語に属する。タミル語のために開発された標準解像度はCRFを使用しています。私たちのアプローチは、タミル語モデルを活用してマラヤーラム語データをテストすることであり、マラヤーラム語データに必要な処理が詳細に説明されています。言語間の構文レベルでの類似性は、タミル語モデルを開発するための特徴を特定する際に利用されます。単語フォームまたは語彙項目は、CRFをトレーニングするための機能とは見なされません。マラヤーラム語Wikipediaデータの評価では、私たちのアプローチは正しく、結果はタミル語ほどではありませんが、同等です。', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, damos em detalhes como uma linguagem rica em recursos pode ser usada para resolver pronomes para uma linguagem com menos recursos. A língua fonte, que é uma língua rica em recursos neste estudo, é o Tamil e a língua pobre em recursos é Malayalam, ambas pertencentes à mesma família linguística, Dravidian. A resolução Pronominal desenvolvida para Tamil usa CRFs. Nossa abordagem é aproveitar o modelo de idioma tâmil para testar dados em malaiala e o processamento necessário para dados em malaiala é detalhado. A semelhança no nível sintático entre as línguas é explorada na identificação dos recursos para o desenvolvimento do modelo de linguagem tâmil. A forma da palavra ou o item lexical não são considerados como um recurso para o treinamento dos CRFs. A avaliação dos dados da Wikipedia malaiala mostra que nossa abordagem está correta e os resultados, embora não tão bons quanto o Tamil, mas comparáveis.', 'zh': '于本文中,备言所以资赡者解析资源少言之代词。 本研中资源富言语为泰米尔语,资源贫乏者为马拉雅拉姆语,二者皆同一语家,即达罗毗荼语也。 为泰米尔语定者代名词议用CRF。 吾法以泰米尔语试马拉雅拉姆语数,且详马拉雅拉姆语数。 开泰米尔语之法,因言句法之相似性。 单词文词汇目不以为练CRF,马拉雅拉姆语维基百科数之评,吾道是也,虽不如泰米尔语,而有可比性。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम विस्तार से देते हैं कि कैसे कम संसाधन भाषा के लिए सर्वनामों को हल करने के लिए एक संसाधन समृद्ध भाषा का उपयोग किया जा सकता है। स्रोत भाषा, जो इस अध्ययन में संसाधन समृद्ध भाषा है, तमिल है और संसाधन गरीब भाषा मलयालम है, दोनों एक ही भाषा परिवार, द्रविड़ से संबंधित हैं। तमिल के लिए विकसित प्रोनोमिनल रिज़ॉल्यूशन सीआरएफ का उपयोग करता है। हमारा दृष्टिकोण मलयालम डेटा का परीक्षण करने के लिए तमिल भाषा मॉडल का लाभ उठाना है और मलयालम डेटा के लिए आवश्यक प्रसंस्करण विस्तृत है। भाषाओं के बीच वाक्यात्मक स्तर पर समानता का तमिल भाषा मॉडल को विकसित करने के लिए विशेषताओं की पहचान करने में शोषण किया जाता है। शब्द रूप या लेक्सिकल आइटम को CRFs के प्रशिक्षण के लिए एक विशेषता के रूप में नहीं माना जाता है। मलयालम विकिपीडिया डेटा पर मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण सही है और परिणाम, हालांकि तमिल के रूप में अच्छे नहीं हैं, लेकिन तुलनीय हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы подробно расскажем о том, как богатый ресурсами язык может быть использован для разрешения местоимений для менее ресурсного языка. Исходным языком, который является богатым языком в этом исследовании, является тамильский, а бедным языком - малаялам, оба принадлежат к одной языковой семье, дравидийскому языку. В прономинальном разрешении, разработанном для тамильского языка, используются ИРК. Наш подход заключается в том, чтобы использовать модель тамильского языка для проверки данных малаялама, и подробно описана обработка, необходимая для данных малаялама. Сходство на синтаксическом уровне между языками используется при выявлении особенностей для разработки модели тамильского языка. Словоформа или лексический элемент не рассматриваются в качестве признака для обучения ИРК. Оценка данных малаяламской Википедии показывает, что наш подход верен и результаты, хотя и не так хороши, как тамильские, но сопоставимы.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo tugaimid go mion conas is féidir teanga shaibhir acmhainní a úsáid chun forainmneacha a réiteach do theanga is lú acmhainní. Is í an Tamailis an teanga fhoinseach, ar teanga shaibhir acmhainní í sa staidéar seo, agus is í Mailéalaimis an teanga bhocht acmhainne, an dá cheann acu leis an teaghlach céanna teanga, Dravidian. Úsáideann an réiteach Pronominal a forbraíodh do Tamil CRFanna. Is é an cur chuige atá againn ná an tsamhail Tamailis a ghiaráil chun sonraí Mailéalaimis a thástáil agus sonraítear an phróiseáil a theastaíonn do shonraí Mailéalaimis. Baintear leas as an gcosúlacht ag an leibhéal comhréire idir na teangacha chun gnéithe a aithint chun an tsamhail Tamailis a fhorbairt. Ní mheastar an fhoirm focal nó an mhír fhoclóra mar ghné chun na CRFanna a oiliúint. Léiríonn meastóireacht ar shonraí Vicipéid Mailéalaimis go bhfuil ár gcur chuige ceart agus na torthaí, cé nach bhfuil siad chomh maith le Tamailis, ach inchomparáide.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία δίνουμε λεπτομερώς πώς μια πλούσια σε πόρους γλώσσα μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί για την επίλυση αντωνυμίων για μια γλώσσα λιγότερων πόρων. Η αρχική γλώσσα, η οποία είναι πλούσια σε πόρους γλώσσα σε αυτή τη μελέτη, είναι τα Ταμίλ και η φτωχή γλώσσα είναι τα Μαλαγιάλαμ, και τα δύο ανήκουν στην ίδια γλωσσική οικογένεια, τα Δραβιδικά. Το ψήφισμα Pronominal που αναπτύχθηκε για τα Ταμίλ χρησιμοποιεί CRF. Η προσέγγισή μας είναι να αξιοποιήσουμε το μοντέλο της γλώσσας των Ταμίλ για να ελέγξουμε τα δεδομένα της Μαλαγιάλαμ και η επεξεργασία που απαιτείται για τα δεδομένα της Μαλαγιάλαμ είναι λεπτομερής. Η ομοιότητα σε συντακτικό επίπεδο μεταξύ των γλωσσών αξιοποιείται για τον προσδιορισμό των χαρακτηριστικών για την ανάπτυξη του μοντέλου της γλώσσας των Ταμίλ. Η μορφή λέξης ή το λεξικό στοιχείο δεν θεωρείται χαρακτηριστικό για την εκπαίδευση των ΚΕΠ. Η αξιολόγηση στα δεδομένα της Βικιπαίδειας δείχνει ότι η προσέγγισή μας είναι σωστή και τα αποτελέσματα, αν και όχι τόσο καλά όσο τα Ταμίλ, αλλά συγκρίσιμα.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ განახლებით როგორ რესურსის ბეჭდვი ენათი შეიძლება გამოიყენება საკუთარი რესურსის ენათის გარეშე. მხოლოდ სახელი, რომელიც რესურსის ბედნიერი ენაა ამ კვლევაში, არის რამილური და რესურსის ბედნიერი ენაა მალაიალური, ორივე იგივე ენათა ოჯახის, ეპავიდიანი. ტამილისთვის პრონომიალური რეზოციონია გამოყენება CRF. ჩვენი პროცემი არის ტამილური ენის მოდელის გამოყენება მალაიალური მონაცემებისთვის და მალაიალური მონაცემებისთვის გამოყენება. სინტექტიკური დონეში სინტექტიკური დონეში ენების შორის განსხვავებაში გამოვიყენება ტემილის ენის მოდელს განვითარებისთვის განსხვავებაში. სიტყვების ფორმა ან ლექსიკალური ელექტიკალური ელექტიკალური ელექტიკალური შესახებ არ იყოს CRF-ის განაკეთება. მალაილამ ვიკიპედიაში მონაცემების განსაზღვრება აჩვენებს, რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა სწორია და შედეგი, მაგრამ არა რამილის მსგავსი, მაგრამ შემდგენელი.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban részletesen bemutatjuk, hogyan lehet egy erőforrásokban gazdag nyelvet használni a névmások megoldására egy kevésbé erőforrásokban. A forrásnyelv, amely erőforrásokban gazdag nyelv ebben a tanulmányban, a tamil, a forrásszegény nyelv pedig a malayalam, mindkettő ugyanahhoz a nyelvcsaládhoz tartozik, a dravidiához. A tamil számára kifejlesztett Pronominális felbontás CRF-eket használ. Megközelítésünk, hogy a tamil nyelvi modellt kihasználjuk a malayalam adatok tesztelésére, és a malayalam adatokhoz szükséges feldolgozás részletes. A nyelvek szintaktikai szintű hasonlóságát a tamil nyelvmodell fejlesztésének tulajdonságainak azonosításához használjuk ki. A szóforma vagy a lexikális elem nem tekinthető a CRF-ek képzésének jellemzőjének. A Malayalam Wikipédia adatainak értékelése azt mutatja, hogy a megközelítésünk helyes és az eredmények, bár nem olyan jók, mint a tamil, de összehasonlíthatók.', 'it': "In questo articolo diamo in dettaglio come un linguaggio ricco di risorse può essere utilizzato per risolvere pronomi per un linguaggio meno risorse. La lingua di origine, che è una lingua ricca di risorse in questo studio, è il tamil e la lingua povera di risorse è il malayalam, entrambi appartenenti alla stessa famiglia linguistica, il dravidiano. La risoluzione Pronominale sviluppata per il Tamil utilizza CRF. Il nostro approccio è quello di sfruttare il modello di lingua tamil per testare i dati Malayalam e l'elaborazione richiesta per i dati Malayalam è dettagliata. La somiglianza a livello sintattico tra le lingue viene sfruttata per identificare le caratteristiche per lo sviluppo del modello linguistico tamil. La parola forma o l'elemento lessicale non è considerata una caratteristica per la formazione dei CRF. La valutazione dei dati di Malayalam Wikipedia mostra che il nostro approccio è corretto e i risultati, anche se non buoni come il Tamil, ma comparabili.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда ресурстардың баяны тілін қалай қолдануға болады деп егжей- тегжейлі береміз. Бұл зерттеулердің ресурстардың баяны тілі - Тамил, ресурстардың баяны тілі - Малайамлық, екеуі бір тіл үйлеріне қатынасыз, Дравидиялық. Тамил үшін прономиналдық айырмашылығы CRF қолданылады. Біздің тәсіліміміз Малайям деректерін тексеру үшін Тамил тіл үлгісін жасау және Малайям деректеріне қажетті процесслерді егжей- тегжейлі. Тілдер арасындағы синтактикалық деңгейіндегі ұқсастығы Тамил тіл үлгісін құру үшін қасиеттерді анықтау үшін қолданылады. Сөздің пішімі немесе лексикалық нысаны CRF бақылау үшін мүмкіндік емес. Малайям Википедия деректерінің оқиғасы біздің тәсіліміздің дұрыс және нәтижелеріміз дұрыс екенін көрсетеді, бірақ Тамил секілді жақсы емес, бірақ салыстырылатын', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami berikan secara terperinci bagaimana bahasa yang kaya sumber boleh digunakan untuk memecahkan nama untuk bahasa sumber yang kurang. Bahasa sumber, bahasa yang kaya sumber dalam kajian ini, adalah bahasa Tamil dan bahasa yang lemah sumber ialah bahasa Malayalam, kedua-duanya milik keluarga bahasa yang sama, Dravidian. Resolusi pronominal dikembangkan untuk Tamil menggunakan CRF. pendekatan kita adalah untuk menggunakan model bahasa Tamil untuk menguji data Malayalam dan proses yang diperlukan untuk data Malayalam adalah terperinci. Kesempatan pada aras sintaktik diantara bahasa dieksploitasi dalam mengenalpasti ciri-ciri untuk mengembangkan model bahasa Tamil. Bentuk perkataan atau item leksikal tidak dianggap sebagai ciri untuk melatih CRF. Penghargaan data Wikipedia Malayalam menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita betul dan keputusan, walaupun tidak sebaik Tamil, tetapi boleh dibandingkan.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു എങ്ങനെയാണ് ഒരു സമ്പന്നഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് എന്ന് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു വിഭ ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ സമ്പന്നഭാഷയാണ് സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഭാഷ, താമില്\u200d എന്നിട്ടും വിഭവഭാഷ പാവപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മലായലാമാണ്, രണ്ടുപേരും ഒരേ ഭാഷ ക ടാമിലിനുള്ള പ്രോമോനിയല്\u200d റിസെല്\u200dഷന്\u200d സിഎഫ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. മാലായിലാമിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മുടെ വഴിയില്\u200d നിന്നും മാലായലാമിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള പ ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള സിനിട്ടാക്കിക്ക് നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സമമാണു് താമില്\u200d ഭാഷയുടെ മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്ക CRFs പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വാക്കിന്റെ രൂപം അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d CRFകളെ പരിശീലനം ച മാലായലാമിന്റെ വിക്കിപ്പിഡിയയുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ സമ്പ്രദായം ശരിയാണെന്നും ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ശരിയാണെന്നും', 'mk': 'Во овој документ детализираме како може да се користи јазик богат на ресурси за решавање на изговорите за јазик помалку ресурси. Изворниот јазик, кој е јазик богат на ресурси во оваа студија, е тамилски и сиромашниот јазик на ресурсите е малајалски, двајцата припаѓаат на истиот јазик семејство, дравидиски. Прономиналната резолуција развиена за Тамил користи CRF. Нашиот пристап е да го искористиме моделот на тамилскиот јазик за тестирање на податоците од Малајалам и обработувањето потребно за податоците од Малајалам е детално. Сличноста на синтактичко ниво помеѓу јазиците се искористува за идентификување на карактеристиките за развојот на тамилскиот јазик модел. Словниот формулар или лексичкиот елемент не се смета за функционалност за обука на CRF. Evaluation on Malayalam Wikipedia data shows that our approach is correct and the results, although not as good as Tamil, but comparable.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente išsamiai nurodome, kaip išteklius turinti kalba gali būti naudojama sprendžiant mažiau išteklių turinčios kalbos išraiškas. Šaltinė kalba, kuri šiame tyrime yra daug išteklių turinti kalba, yra tamilų kalba, o išteklių prasta kalba yra malajų kalba, priklausanti tai pačiai dravidinės kalbos šeimai. Tamil ėms skirtoje pirminėje rezoliucijoje naudojami KRF. Mūsų požiūris yra panaudoti Tamil ų kalbos model į Malayalam duomenims išbandyti ir išsamiai apdoroti reikalingus Malayalam duomenis. Siekiant nustatyti Tamil ės kalbos modelio kūrimo ypatumus, naudojamas panašumas sintetiniu lygiu tarp kalbų. žodžio form a arba tekstinis elementas nelaikomas CRF mokymo savybėmis. Vertinant Malayalam Wikipedia duomenis matyti, kad mūsų požiūris teisingas ir rezultatai, nors ne taip geri kaip tamilai, bet palyginami.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument nagħtu fid-dettall kif lingwa rikka fir-riżorsi tista’ tintuża biex jiġu riżolti l-pronomi għal lingwa inqas rikka fir-riżorsi. Il-lingwa tas-sors, li hija lingwa rikka fir-riżorsi f’dan l-istudju, hija t-Tamil u l-lingwa fqira tar-riżorsi hija l-Malayalam, it-tnejn li huma jappartjenu għall-istess familja tal-lingwi, Dravidian. Ir-riżoluzzjoni pronominali żviluppata għal Tamil tuża CRFs. L-approċċ tagħna huwa li nimxprunaw il-mudell tal-lingwa Tamili biex jittestjaw id-dejta tal-Malayalam u l-ipproċessar meħtieġ għad-dejta tal-Malayalam huwa ddettaljat. Is-similarità fil-livell sintattiku bejn il-lingwi hija sfruttata fl-identifikazzjoni tal-karatteristiċi għall-iżvilupp tal-mudell tal-lingwa Tamili. Il-formola tal-kelma jew l-oġġett lexiku mhumiex ikkunsidrati bħala karatteristika għat-taħriġ tas-CRFs. L-evalwazzjoni tad-dejta tal-Wikipedia tal-Malasja turi li l-approċċ tagħna huwa korrett u r-riżultati, għalkemm mhux tajbin daqs it-Tamil, iżda komparabbli.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид баян баян хэл хэрхэн ашиглах вэ гэдгийг багасгаж эх үүсвэрийн хэл дээр шийдэхэд нарийвчлан тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ судалгаанд баялаг хэл гэдэг эх үүсвэрийн хэл нь Тамил ба баялаг хэл нь Малайлам. Хоёулаа нь ижил хэл гэр бүлийн Дравидиан. Тамиллийн хувьд прономинал шийдвэрлэл CRF хэрэглэдэг. Малайям өгөгдлийг шалгахын тулд Тамиль хэл загварын загварыг ашиглан, Малайям өгөгдлийн хувьд шаардлагатай үйлдэл нарийвчлалтай. Түүний хэл хоорондын синтактикийн түвшинд адилхан байдал нь Тамил хэл загварыг хөгжүүлэхэд хэрэглэгддэг. Үүний хэлбэр эсвэл лексикийн элемент нь CRF-г суралцах боломжтой гэж үздэггүй. Malayalam Wikipedia өгөгдлийн үнэлгээ нь бидний арга зам зөв болон үр дүнг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ Тамил шиг сайн биш, харьцуулагддаг.', 'no': 'I denne papiret gir vi detaljar korleis ein ressursryk språk kan brukast for å løysa uttaler for ei mindre ressursspråk. Kjeldsspråket, som er ressurs rike språk i denne studien, er Tamil, og den feil språket i ressursen er Malayalam, både tilhøyrer samme språksfamilien Dravidian. Pronomieloppløysinga utvikla for Tamil brukar CRF. Nærminga vårt er å levera tamilske språk-modellen for å testa Malayalamske data og prosesseringa som krevst for Malayalamske data er detaljert. Likheten på syntaksisk nivå mellom språka vert brukt i å identifisera funksjonane for å utvikla tamilspråk-modellen. Ordform eller tekstelementet vert ikkje kalla som ein funksjon for opplæring av CRF-ar. Evaluering av Malayalam Wikipedia-data viser at tilnærminga vårt er rett og resultatet, men ikkje så godt som Tamil, men sammenlignbar.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule podajemy szczegółowo, jak język bogaty w zasoby może być używany do rozdzielania zaimków dla mniej zasobów języka. Językiem źródłowym, który jest językiem bogatym w zasoby w tym badaniu, jest tamil, a językiem ubogim w zasoby jest malajalam, oba należące do tej samej rodziny językowej, drawidyjski. Rezolucja Pronominal opracowana dla Tamilów wykorzystuje CRF. Nasze podejście polega na wykorzystaniu modelu języka tamilskiego do testowania danych Malayalam, a przetwarzanie wymagane dla danych Malayalam jest szczegółowe. Podobieństwo na poziomie składni pomiędzy językami jest wykorzystywane do identyfikacji cech dla opracowywania modelu języka tamilskiego. Forma słowa lub pozycja leksykalna nie jest uważana za cechę szkolenia CRF. Ocena danych Wikipedii Malayalam pokazuje, że nasze podejście jest poprawne i wyniki, choć nie tak dobre jak tamilski, ale porównywalne.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare oferim în detaliu modul în care un limbaj bogat în resurse poate fi folosit pentru rezolvarea pronumelor pentru un limbaj mai puțin resurse. Limba sursă, care este o limbă bogată în resurse în acest studiu, este tamila, iar limba săracă în resurse este malayalam, ambele aparținând aceleiași familii de limbi, dravidiană. Rezoluția Pronominală dezvoltată pentru Tamil utilizează CRF-uri. Abordarea noastră este de a utiliza modelul de limbă tamilă pentru a testa datele Malayalam, iar procesarea necesară pentru datele Malayalam este detaliată. Similaritatea la nivel sintactic dintre limbi este exploatată pentru identificarea caracteristicilor dezvoltării modelului lingvistic tamil. Forma cuvântului sau elementul lexical nu este considerat o caracteristică pentru formarea CRF-urilor. Evaluarea datelor Malayalam Wikipedia arată că abordarea noastră este corectă și rezultatele, deși nu la fel de bune ca tamilul, ci comparabile.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි විස්තර දෙන්නේ කොහොමද ප්\u200dරශ්ණ භාෂයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. මුළු භාෂාව, මේ අධ්\u200dයානයේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ භාෂාවක් තියෙන්නේ තාමිල් වලින් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ භාෂාවක් මාලයාලාම් වලින Name අපේ පරීක්ෂණය තමයි ටැමිල් භාෂාව මදුල්යාලම් දත්ත පරීක්ෂණය සහ මලායාලාම් දත්ත සඳහා අවශ්\u200dය පරීක්ෂණය විස තාමිල් භාෂාව මඩෝල් විස්තර කරන්න සැකසුම් සංකේතික ස්ථානයේ සමාන්\u200dයතාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. වචන ප්\u200dරමාණය නැත්තම් ලෙක්සිකාල් අයිටිම් CRFs ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂතාවක් නෙවෙයි. මලායාලාම් විකිපිඩියා දත්තේ ගැන විශ්වාස කරන්න පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d', 'so': 'Kanu warqadan ayaannu ku qornaa sida luqada taajirka ah looga isticmaali karo in looga baaraandegayo luqada aad ka yar luqada. Luqada asalka ah ee ku qoran waxbarashadan waa Tamil iyo luqada asalka ah waa Malayalam, labadooda waxay ka tirsan yihiin qoyska isku afka, Dravidian. Xukummada hore ee Tamil wuxuu isticmaalaa CRFs. Dhaqdhaqaalkayagu waa in loo soo diro tilmaamaha afka Tamil si aan u imtixaano macluumaadka Malayalamka iyo baaritaanka looga baahan yahay macluumaadka malayalamka. The similarity at the syntactic level between the languages is exploited in identifying the features for developing the Tamil language model.  Foomka ereyga ama alaabta leksikarka looma tiriyo sida gaar loo baranayo CRFs. Qiimeynta macluumaadka Malayalam Wikipedia waxay muuqataa in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu ay saxdaan iyo resultiyada, in kastoo aysan u wanaagsanayn sida Tamil, laakiin ay u eg yihiin.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru dajemo detaljno kako se koristi bogat jezik resursa za rješavanje izraza za manji jezik resursa. Izvorni jezik, koji je bogat jezik resursa u ovoj studiji, je Tamil, a siromašan jezik resursa je Malayalam, oboje pripadajući istoj jezičkoj porodici, Dravidijanu. Pronominalna rezolucija razvijena za Tamil koristi CRF-e. Naš pristup je da utièemo na tamilski jezički model da testiramo Malayalamske podatke i obradimo potrebne za Malayalamske podatke je detaljno. Sličnost na sintaktičkom nivou između jezika se iskorištava u identifikaciji karakteristika za razvoj tamilskog jezika. Form reči ili leksički predmet se ne smatra karakteristikom za obuku CRF-a. Evaluacija na podacima Malayalama Vikipedije pokazuje da je naš pristup ispravan i rezultat, iako nije dobar kao Tamil, nego usporedno.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats ger vi i detalj hur ett resursrikt språk kan användas för att lösa pronomen för ett mindre resursspråk. Källspråket, som är resursrikt språk i denna studie, är tamil och det resursfattiga språket är malayalam, båda tillhör samma språkfamilj, dravidiska. Den uttalade upplösningen som utvecklats för tamil använder CRF. Vårt tillvägagångssätt är att utnyttja den tamilska språkmodellen för att testa Malayalam data och den behandling som krävs för Malayalam data är detaljerad. Likheten på syntaktisk nivå mellan språken utnyttjas för att identifiera egenskaperna för att utveckla den tamilska språkmodellen. Ordform eller lexikalt betraktas inte som en funktion för utbildning av CRF. Utvärdering av Malayalam Wikipedia data visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt är korrekt och resultaten, men inte lika bra som tamil, men jämförbara.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم تفصیل دیتے ہیں کہ کس طرح ایک سرمایہ دار زبان کم سرمایہ زبان کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے۔ اسورس زبان، جو اس مطالعہ میں ثروت والی زبان ہے، تامیل ہے اور کمزور زبان ملیالمی ہے، دونوں ایک زبان کے خاندان، ڈراویدین کے ملنے والے ہیں. تامیل کے لئے پرونومیل ریزوشن استعمال کیا گیا ہے. ہمارا طریقہ یہ ہے کہ مالایالمی ڈیٹا اور مالایالمی ڈیٹا کے لئے ضرورت کی پردازی کی تفصیل کرنے کے لئے تامیل زبانی موڈل کو استعمال کریں۔ زبانوں کے درمیان سینٹکتیک سطح کی برابری ٹامیل زبان موڈل کو توسعہ کرنے کے لئے ویژگی پہچان کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. کلمات فرم یا لکسیکل اٹیٹم کو CRFs کی آموزش کے لئے ویژہ سمجھا نہیں جاتا۔ مالایالام ویکیپیڈیا ڈیٹا کا ارزش دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری طریقہ درست ہے اور نتیجہ، اگرچہ تامیل کی طرح بہتر نہیں، بلکہ برابر ہے.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் விளக்கமாக கொடுக்கும் மூலத்திற்கு குறைவான மூலத்திற்கு எவ்வாறு உபயோகிக்கப்படும் மொ இந்த படிப்பில் மூலத்தின் வளர்ச்சியான மொழி, தாமில் மற்றும் மூலத்தின் ஏழை மொழி மலாலாம், இரண்டும் ஒரே மொழி குடும்பத்தில், ட்ராவிடி Name எங்கள் செயல்பாடு தாமில் மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரியை சோதிக்க முடியும் மாலாயிலாம் தகவல் தேவைப்படும் செயல்பாடு விவரம மொழிகளுக்கு இடையே ஒத்திசைவு மட்டத்தில் உள்ள ஒத்திசைவு நிலையில் பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது தாமில் மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி CRFs பயிற்சிக்கு வார்த்தை வடிவம் அல்லது லெக்சிக்சியல் உருப்படியாக கருதப்படாது. மலாய்லாம் விக்கிபிடியா தகவல்களின் மதிப்பீடு காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது எங்கள் வழிமுறை சரியானது மற்றும் முடிவுகள் சரியானது, ஆனால் த', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz manbaning qisqa manbaning tilini aniqlash учун манбаъ tillarini qanday foydalanish mumkin. Ushbu o'rganishda manba tili, Tamil va manbaning qisqa tili Malayalam, ikkita tilning bir xil oilida Dravidian tilidagi. Name Malayalamning maʼlumotni tekshirish uchun Tamil tili modelini yordam qilish va Malayalam maʼlumotlari uchun kerak narsalarni bajarish kerak bo'ladi. Tillar orasidagi syntactik darajada huddi Tamil tilning modelini aniqlash uchun foydalanadi. The word form or the lexical item is not considered as a feature for training the CRFs.  Name", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra chi tiết làm thế nào mà một ngôn ngữ giàu tài nguyên có có thể được dùng để giải quyết các đại từ cho ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên. Nguồn ngôn ngữ, mà là ngôn ngữ giàu tài nguyên trong nghiên cứu này, là Tamil và tài nguyên của ngôn ngữ tồi tệ là Malayaham, cả hai đều thuộc về cùng một gia đình ngôn ngữ, Dravidian. Giải quyết định biểu tượng được phát triển cho Tamir dùng CRF. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi là sử dụng mô hình ngôn ngữ Tamil để kiểm tra dữ liệu Malayala và việc xử lý cần thiết cho dữ liệu Malayaủng. Sự giống nhau ở tầng pháp thuật giữa các ngôn ngữ được khai thác trong việc xác định các tính năng phát triển mô hình ngôn ngữ Tamil. Từ điển hay từ ngữ không được xem là một yếu tố để huấn luyện CRF. Bài đánh giá trên Wikipedia đã cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi rất chính xác và kết quả, cho dù không tốt bằng Tamil, nhưng cũng tương đối.', 'bg': 'В тази статия подробно даваме как богат на ресурси език може да се използва за решаване на местоимения за по-малко ресурси език. Източният език, който е богат на ресурси език в това проучване, е тамилски, а слабият език е малаялам, и двамата принадлежат към едно и също езиково семейство, дравидски. Прономиналната резолюция, разработена за тамилски, използва CRF. Нашият подход е да използваме тамилския езиков модел за тестване на малаяламски данни и обработката, необходима за малаяламските данни, е подробна. Приликата на синтактично ниво между езиците е експлоатирана при идентифицирането на характеристиките за разработване на тамилския езиков модел. Думичната форма или лексикалната позиция не се разглеждат като характеристика за обучение на КРС. Оценката на данните от Уикипедия показва, че подходът ни е правилен и резултатите, макар и не толкова добри, колкото тамилските, но сравними.', 'da': "I denne artikel giver vi detaljeret information om, hvordan et ressourcerigt sprog kan bruges til at løse pronomen for et mindre ressourcesprog. Kildesproget, som er ressourcerigt sprog i denne undersøgelse, er tamil og ressourcefattigt sprog er Malayalam, begge tilhører samme sprogfamilie, dravidisk. Den Pronominal opløsning, der er udviklet til tamil, bruger CRF'er. Vores tilgang er at udnytte den tamilske sprogmodel til at teste Malayalam data, og den behandling, der kræves for Malayalam data, er detaljeret. Ligheden på syntaktisk niveau mellem sprogene udnyttes til at identificere træk for udviklingen af den tamilske sprogmodel. Ordets form eller det leksikalske element betragtes ikke som et element i uddannelsen af CRF'erne. Evaluering af Malayalam Wikipedia data viser, at vores tilgang er korrekt og resultaterne, men ikke lige så gode som tamil, men sammenlignelige.", 'nl': "In dit artikel geven we in detail hoe een bronrijke taal kan worden gebruikt voor het oplossen van voornaamwoorden voor een minder brontaal. De brontaal, die rijk is aan hulpbronnen in deze studie, is Tamil en de hulpbronarme taal is Malayalam, beide behoren tot dezelfde taalfamilie, Dravidiaans. De voor Tamil ontwikkelde Pronominale resolutie maakt gebruik van CRF's. Onze aanpak is om gebruik te maken van het Tamil taalmodel om Malayalam gegevens te testen en de verwerking die nodig is voor Malayalam gegevens is gedetailleerd. De gelijkenis op syntactisch niveau tussen de talen wordt benut bij het identificeren van de kenmerken voor de ontwikkeling van het Tamil taalmodel. De woordvorm of het lexicale item wordt niet beschouwd als een functie voor het trainen van de CRF's. Evaluatie op Malayalam Wikipedia data toont aan dat onze aanpak correct is en de resultaten, hoewel niet zo goed als Tamil, maar vergelijkbaar zijn.", 'hr': 'U ovom papiru dajemo detaljno kako se bogat jezik resursa može koristiti za rješavanje izraza za manji jezik resursa. Izvorski jezik, koji je bogat jezik resursa u ovoj studiji, je Tamil i siromašan jezik resursa Malayalam, oboje pripadajući istoj jezičkoj obitelji, Dravidian. Pronominalna rezolucija razvijena za Tamil koristi CRF-e. Naš pristup je utjecati na tamilski jezički model za testiranje podataka Malayalama i obradu potrebnog za Malayalamske podatke detaljno. Sličnost na sintaktičkoj razini između jezika iskorištava se u identifikaciji karakteristika za razvoj tamilskog jezika. Formula riječi ili leksički predmet ne smatra se karakteristikom za obuku CRF-a. Procjenjivanje podataka Malayalama Wikipedia pokazuje da je naš pristup ispravan i rezultat, iako nije dobar kao Tamil, već usporedno.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag zeigen wir im Detail, wie eine ressourcenreiche Sprache verwendet werden kann, um Pronomen für eine weniger ressourcenreiche Sprache aufzulösen. Die Ausgangssprache, die in dieser Studie ressourcenreiche Sprache ist, ist Tamil und die ressourcenarme Sprache ist Malayalam, beide gehören zur gleichen Sprachfamilie, Dravidisch. Die für Tamil entwickelte Pronominal Resolution verwendet CRFs. Unser Ansatz ist es, das tamilische Sprachmodell zu nutzen, um Malayalam-Daten zu testen und die Verarbeitung für Malayalam-Daten ist detailliert. Die syntaktische Ähnlichkeit zwischen den Sprachen wird ausgenutzt, um die Merkmale für die Entwicklung des tamilischen Sprachmodells zu identifizieren. Die Wortform oder das lexikalische Element wird nicht als Funktion für die Ausbildung der CRFs betrachtet. Die Auswertung auf Malayalam Wikipedia Daten zeigt, dass unser Ansatz korrekt ist und die Ergebnisse zwar nicht so gut wie tamilisch, aber vergleichbar sind.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami memberikan secara rinci bagaimana bahasa yang kaya sumber daya dapat digunakan untuk memecahkan nama untuk bahasa sumber daya yang kurang. Bahasa sumber, yang merupakan bahasa kaya sumber daya dalam penelitian ini, adalah bahasa Tamil dan bahasa miskin sumber daya adalah bahasa Malayalam, keduanya milik keluarga bahasa yang sama, Dravidian. Resolusi Pronominal yang dikembangkan untuk Tamil menggunakan CRF. pendekatan kita adalah untuk menggunakan model bahasa Tamil untuk menguji data Malayalam dan proses yang diperlukan untuk data Malayalam adalah rincian. Kesempatan di tingkat sintaksi antara bahasa dieksploitasi dalam mengidentifikasi fitur untuk mengembangkan model bahasa Tamil. Bentuk kata atau item lexik tidak dianggap sebagai fitur untuk melatih CRF. Evaluasi dari data Wikipedia Malayalam menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita benar dan hasilnya, meskipun tidak sebaik Tamil, tetapi dibandingkan.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 자원이 풍부한 언어를 어떻게 사용하여 자원이 비교적 적은 언어의 대명사를 해석하는지 상세하게 소개했다.본 연구에서 원어는 자원이 풍부한 언어이고 테밀어이며 자원이 부족한 언어는 말레이시아어로 둘 다 같은 어계인 델라위어에 속한다.타밀어로 개발된 대명사 해석을 위해 CRF를 사용합니다.우리의 방법은 테밀어 모형을 이용하여 말레이어 데이터를 테스트하고 말레이어 데이터에 필요한 처리를 상세하게 소개하는 것이다.두 언어의 문법적 유사성은 테미르 언어 모델의 특징을 식별하는 데 쓰인다.단어 형식 또는 용어 항목은 교육 CRF 기능으로 간주되지 않습니다.말레이시아 람위키백과 데이터에 대한 평가에 따르면 우리의 방법은 정확하고 결과는 테밀어보다 못하지만 비교가 가능하다.', 'sw': 'In this paper we give in detail how a resource rich language can be used for resolving pronouns for a less resource language.  Lugha ya chanzo, ambayo ni lugha yenye utajiri wa rasilimali katika utafiti huu, ni Tamil na lugha maskini ya rasilimali ni Malayalam, wote ni wa familia moja ya lugha hiyo, Dravidian. Uamuzi wa Tamil ulioandaliwa kwa ajili ya kutumia CRFs. Hatua yetu ni kutumia mtindo wa lugha ya Kitamil ili kujaribu takwimu za Malayalam na upasuaji unaohitaji kwa takwimu za Malayalam unaeleweka. Kufanana na kiwango cha ushirikiano kati ya lugha hutumiwa kwa kutambua vipengele vya lugha ya Tamil. Mfumo wa neno au bidhaa ya lexico hauchukuliwi kama alama ya mafunzo ya CRFs. Uthibitisho wa data za Malayalam Wikipedia unaonyesha kwamba hatua yetu ni sahihi na matokeo yake, ingawa si nzuri kama Tamil, lakini inafanana.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما به جزئیات می\u200cدهیم که چگونه یک زبان ثروتمند منبع برای حل کردن کلمه\u200cهای منبع کمتر استفاده می\u200cشود. زبان منبع، که زبان منابع ثروتمند در این مطالعه است، تامیل است و زبان فقیر منابع مالایالام است، هر دو از خانواده\u200cهای یک زبان، درویدیان است. راه حل مقامی برای تامیل از CRF استفاده می\u200cکند. دستور ما این است که مدل زبان تامیل را برای آزمایش داده های مالایالام تحت تأکید قرار دهیم و پردازش نیاز برای داده های مالایالام جزئیات داده شده است. شبیه سطح سنتاکتیک بین زبانها در شناسایی ویژه\u200cها برای توسعه مدل زبان تامیل استفاده می\u200cشود. فرم کلمه یا کلمه زبانی به عنوان ویژگی برای آموزش CRF به نظر نمی آید. ارزیابی داده های ویکیپیدیا مالایالام نشان می دهد که دستور ما درست است و نتیجه ما درست است، اگرچه نه به اندازه تامیل خوبی، بلکه قابل مقایسه.', 'af': "In hierdie papier gee ons in detail hoe 'n hulpbron ryk taal kan gebruik word vir die oplossing van voorskrifte vir 'n minder hulpbron taal. Die bron taal, wat hulpbron ryk taal is in hierdie studie, is Tamil en die hulpbron arme taal is Malayalam, albei wat aan dieselfde taal familie behoort, Dravidian. Die Pronominale Resolusie ontwikkel vir Tamil gebruik CRF. Ons toegang is om die Tamil taal model te verwyder om Malayalam data te toets en die verwerking wat nodig is vir Malayalam data te doen is gedetale. Die gelykheid by die sintaktees vlak tussen die taal word uitgebruik in die identifiseer van die funksies vir die ontwikkeling van die Tamil taal model. Die woord vorm of die leksiese item word nie aangesien as 'n funksie vir onderwerp van die CRF nie. Evaluering op Malayalam Wikipedia-data wys dat ons toegang korrek is en die resultate, alhoewel nie so goed as Tamil nie, maar vergelykbaar nie.", 'sq': 'In this paper we give in detail how a resource rich language can be used for resolving pronouns for a less resource language.  Gjuha e burimit, e cila është gjuha e pasur me burime në këtë studim, është Tamil dhe gjuha e varfër me burime është Malayalam, të dy i përkasin të njëjtit familje gjuhësh, Dravidian. Rezoluta paranominale e zhvilluar për Tamil përdor CRF. Përqasja jonë është të përdorim modelin e gjuhës tamile për të testuar të dhënat malayalam dhe përpunimi i kërkuar për të dhënat malayalam është i hollësishëm. The similarity at the syntactic level between the languages is exploited in identifying the features for developing the Tamil language model.  Forma e fjalës apo elementi lexik nuk konsiderohet si një funksion për trajnimin e CRF-ve. Vlerësimi i të dhënave të Wikipedias Malayalam tregon se qasja jonë është e saktë dhe rezultatet, megjithëse jo aq të mira sa Tamil, por të krahasueshme.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም የሀብት ቋንቋ እንዴት እንደሚጠቀም እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ይህ ትምህርት ውስጥ ባለጠጋ ቋንቋ የተባለው የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ትሚሊ ነው፤ የድሀ ቋንቋውም ድህነት ነው፤ ሁለቱም በአንድ ቋንቋ ወገን የሆኑ ድራዊያን ናቸው። ለታሚል የፕሮግራም ውጤት ከCRFs የተጠቀመ ነው፡፡ የጣማሊ ቋንቋ ምሳሌ ለመፈትነው እና ለመላልያም ዳታ የሚፈልገውን ሥርዓት የተዘረዘ ነው፡፡ በቋንቋዎች መካከል ባለው የስናታዊ ደረጃ ላይ የተደረገው የታሚል ቋንቋ ሞዴል ለማንበብ የፊደል ምርጫዎችን ለመግለጥ ይጠቀማል፡፡ . ማላይላም Wikipedia data ላይ የውጤት አካሄዳችን እውነተኛ ነው ፍሬዎቹም ትክክል ነው እንጂ እንደ ታሚል መልካም አይደለም፡፡', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda biz esasy baý dilini azajyk bir resurs dilinden çözmek üçin nähili ulanylýandygyny detaylar beririk. Bu öwrenmedeki çeşme dili, Tamiliň we çeşme dili Maliýalam, hem bir dil maşgalasynda bolan. Tamil çe CRF'ler üçin adalaty çözümlenme üçin gelişmiş. Biziň ýaryşymyz Malayalam maglumaty barlamak we Malayalam maglumaty üçin gerekli işlemek üçin tamil dil nusgasyny süýtgetmekdir. Diller arasyndaky syntaktik derejesinde meňzeşlikler Tamil dil nusgasyny bejermek üçin ullanýar. Sözler ýa-da lektik zady CRF'lere öwrenmek üçin hasaplamaýar. Malayalam Wikipediýanyň maglumatynyň deňlenmesi biziň yaklaşymyz dogry we netijelerimiz, Tamil ýaly gowy däldir, ýöne daýarlykly.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք մանրամասն ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես կարելի է օգտագործել ռեսուրսներ հարուստ լեզու ավելի քիչ ռեսուրսներ ունեցող լեզուների դինոնների լուծման համար: Այս ուսումնասիրության մեջ ռեսուրսների հարուստ լեզուն թամիլն է, իսկ ռեսուրսների աղքատ լեզուն մալայալամը, երկուսն էլ պատկանում են նույն լեզվի ընտանիքին՝ Դրավիդիային: Թամիլի համար զարգացած նախանամական լուծումն օգտագործում է ԿՌՖ-ներ: Մեր մոտեցումն այն է, որ օգտագործենք թամիլ լեզվի մոդելը մալալալամական տվյալների փորձարկելու համար, և մալալալամական տվյալների համար անհրաժեշտ վերլուծումը մանրամասն է: Սինտակտիկ մակարդակի նմանությունը լեզուների միջև օգտագործվում է թամիլ լեզվի մոդելի զարգացման առանձնահատկությունների հայտնաբերման համար: Բառի ձևը կամ լեքսիկական առարկանը չեն համարվում որպես հատկություն, որն օգտագործում է ԿՌՖ-ները: Մալայալամ Վիքիփեդիայի տվյալների գնահատումը ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը ճիշտ է և արդյունքները, չնայած դրանք ոչ այնքան լավ են, որքան Թամիլը, այլ համեմատուկ են:', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru dajemo detaljno kako se bogat jezik resursa može koristiti za rješavanje progovora za manji jezik resursa. Izvorski jezik, koji je bogat jezik resursa u ovoj studiji, je Tamil, a siromašan jezik resursa je Malayalam, oboje pripadajući istoj jezičkoj porodici Dravidijanu. Pronominalna rezolucija razvijena za Tamil koristi CRF-e. Naš pristup je da se utiče na tamilski jezički model za testiranje podataka Malayalama i obrade potrebne za Malayalamske podatke detaljno objašnjavaju. Sličnost na sintaktičkom nivou između jezika se iskorištava u identifikaciji karakteristika za razvoj tamilskog jezika. Formula riječi ili leksički predmet se ne smatra karakteristikom za obuku CRF-a. Procjenjivanje podataka Malayalama Wikipedia pokazuje da je naš pristup ispravan i rezultat, iako nije dobar kao Tamil, već usporedno.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিস্তারিত জানাচ্ছি কিভাবে সমৃদ্ধ ভাষা সমাধানের জন্য ব্যবহার করা যায়। সূত্র ভাষা, যা এই গবেষণায় সমৃদ্ধ ভাষা, তামিল এবং সম্পদ দরিদ্র ভাষা হচ্ছে মালয়ালাম, যারা একই ভাষার পরিবারের মালিক, ড্রাভিডিয়ান। তামিলের জন্য প্রোনোমিনাল রিসেশন CRFs ব্যবহার করে। মালায়ালামের তথ্য পরীক্ষা করার জন্য তামিল ভাষার মডেল প্রতিষ্ঠান এবং মালায়ালীম তথ্যের জন্য প্রক্রিয়া প্রয়োজনীয় ব তামিল ভাষার মডেল উন্নয়নের জন্য বৈশিষ্ট্য চিহ্নিত করার জন্য ভাষার মধ্যে সিন্ট্যাক্টিক স্তরে একই রকম ব্যবহার করা হয়। CRFs প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য শব্দ ফর্ম অথবা লেক্সিক্সিয়াল বস্তুটি বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্য হিসেবে বিবেচনা করা হয় না। মালায়ালাম উইকিপিডিয়ার তথ্যের প্রমাণ প্রদর্শন করছে যে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা সঠিক এবং ফলাফল সঠিক, যদিও তামিলের মত ভালো নয়, তবে তারা', 'ca': "In this paper we give in detail how a resource rich language can be used for resolving pronouns for a less resource language.  La llengua de font, que és una llengua rica en recursos en aquest estudi, és tamil i la llengua pobre en recursos és malàyal, ambdós pertencent a la mateixa família de llenguatges, dravídic. La resolució pronominal desenvolupada per a tamils utilitza CRF. El nostre enfocament és aprofitar el model de llenguatge tamíl per testar les dades malayalanes i el processament requerit per a les dades malayalanes és detallat. La similitud a nivell sinàctic entre les llengües s'explota per identificar les característiques del desenvolupament del model de llengües tamíliques. La form a de paraula o l'item lèxic no es considera una característica per a formar els CRF. L'avaluació de les dades de la Wikipedia malàyala mostra que el nostre enfocament és correcte i que els resultats, encara que no tan bons com els tamils, però comparables.", 'az': 'Bu kağızda çox qüvvətli dil çəkmək üçün növbəni istifadə edirik. Bu öyrənməkdə qaynaq dilində olan mənbə dili Tamil və çox zəif dili Malayalamdır, hər ikisi də eyni dil ailəsinin, Dravidiyandır. Tamil üçün Pronominal çözünürlük işlədi CRF kullanır. Bizim yaxınlığımız Malayalam məlumatlarını sınamaq üçün Tamil dil modelini təmizləmək və Malayalam məlumatları üçün ehtiyacı olan işləməkdir. Dillərin arasındakı sintaktik səviyyədə bənzəri Tamil dil modelini inkişaf etmək üçün özellikləri tanıtmaq üçün istifadə edilir. Sözlük formu ya da leksik elementi CRF təhsil etmək üçün təhsil edilməz. Malayalam Wikipedia verilənlərin değerlendirməsi bizim yaxınlığımız doğrudur və sonuçlarımız Tamil kimi yaxşı deyil, ancaq salınabilir.', 'et': 'Selles töös anname üksikasjalikult, kuidas ressursirikkat keelt saab kasutada vähem ressursside keele asenimede lahendamiseks. Lähtekeel, mis on käesolevas uuringus ressursirikkaks keeleks, on tamil ja ressursirikkaks keeleks malajalam, mõlemad kuuluvad samasse keeleperekonda draviidi keel. Tamili jaoks välja töötatud pronominaalne resolutsioon kasutab CRF-e. Meie lähenemisviis on kasutada tami keele mudelit malajalami andmete testimiseks ja malajalami andmete töötlemine on üksikasjalik. Keelte sarnasust süntaktilisel tasandil kasutatakse tamili keelemudeli väljatöötamise omaduste tuvastamisel. Sõnavormi või leksikaalset elementi ei peeta kapitalinõuete arvutipõhiste foorumite koolitamise tunnuseks. Malayalami Vikipeedia andmete hindamine näitab, et meie lähenemine on õige ja tulemused, kuigi mitte nii head kui tamil, kuid võrreldavad.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku podrobně uvádíme, jak lze použít jazyk bohatý na zdroje pro řešení zájmen pro jazyk s menším množstvím zdrojů. Zdrojovým jazykem, který je jazykem bohatým na zdroje v této studii, je tamilština a jazykem chudým na zdroje je malajálam, oba patří do stejné jazykové rodiny, dravidština. Pronominální rezoluce vyvinuté pro Tamil používá CRF. Naším přístupem je využít tamilský jazykový model k testování dat Malayalamu a zpracování potřebné pro data Malayalamu je detailní. Podobnost jazyků na syntaktické úrovni je využita při identifikaci rysů pro vývoj tamilského jazykového modelu. Slovní forma nebo lexikální položka není považována za funkci pro výcvik CRF. Hodnocení údajů z Malayalamu Wikipedie ukazuje, že náš přístup je správný a výsledky, i když ne tak dobré jako tamilština, ale srovnatelné.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kerromme yksityiskohtaisesti, miten resurssirikkautta kieltä voidaan käyttää pronominien ratkaisemiseen vähemmän resurssikielellä. Lähtökieli, joka on tässä tutkimuksessa resurssirikas kieli, on tamil ja resurssirikas kieli on malayalam, molemmat kuuluvat samaan kieliperheeseen dravidian. Tamilille kehitetty Pronominal resoluutio käyttää CRF:iä. Lähestymistapamme on hyödyntää tamil kielimallia malayalamin tietojen testaamiseen ja malayalamin tietojen käsittely on yksityiskohtaista. Kielten syntaktista samankaltaisuutta hyödynnetään tamil-kielimallin kehittämisen ominaisuuksien tunnistamisessa. Sanamuotoa tai sanastoa ei pidetä CRF:n koulutuksen ominaisuutena. Malayalamin Wikipedian tietojen arviointi osoittaa, että lähestymistapamme on oikea ja tulokset eivät ole yhtä hyviä kuin tamil, mutta vertailukelpoisia.', 'jv': 'Nang pepulan iki kita menehi nggawe ing nggawe kapan kelas supaya kang bebas nggawe ngubah gerakan kanggo ngubah pangunakan kanggo langa bantuan. Sumangkat pingga, sing akeh barêng langa kuwi ing kudu-barêng iki, lan sampeyan Tamil lan langa sing ngene kuwi malayam, sampeyan sampeyan sak kudu urip sing kudu, Dravideo. Name Ndoleh dhéwé kuwi ngéwangi tanggal modèl kanggo ujian urip Tamil kanggo ujian data malayan karo perusahaan sing takon kanggo dadi malayan. Sampeyan nganggo sampeyan anyar wigatik ing langga Laptop" and "Desktop Ngawe Perintah pancene kanggo awakdhéwé nang wiikipedia malayam kuwi, dadi sing paling apik dhéwé nggawe gerangé ora dadi Tamil, njuk dadi apik dhéwé.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã bayyana daki-daki yadda za'a iya amfani da wata lugha mai girma wa yin rabo da wa'ura wa zaman resource. Harshen source, which is resource rich language in this research, is Tazil and the language of the resource mistakardar is Malayalam, both belgin family of the same language, dra. @ item license (short name) Mataimakinmu ne zuwa ga kuɓutar da misalin harshen Tamilli dõmin a jarraba data na Malayalam da shirin da aka ƙayyade wa data na Malayalam. Tsarin da ke cikin daraja ta yi syntactic a tsakanin harshen, aka yi amfani da shi dõmin a gane wasu sifati wa'urar da za'a buɗe misãlin harshen Tamilli. Ba'a ƙaddara tsarin magana ko abun leksiya ba kamar wata tayari wa yin amfani da CRFs. Evaluation on Malayalam Wikipedia data shows that our approach is correct and the results, though not as good as Tamil, but comparable.", 'sk': 'V tem članku podrobno opisujemo, kako lahko jezik, bogat z viri, uporabimo za reševanje zaimkov za jezik manj virov. Izvorni jezik, ki je v tej študiji bogat z viri, je tamil in slab jezik je malajalam, oba pripadata isti jezikovni družini, dravidščini. Izgovorna ločljivost, razvita za Tamil, uporablja CRF. Naš pristop je izkoristiti tamilski jezikovni model za testiranje podatkov o malayalamu in podrobna je obdelava, potrebna za podatke o malayalamu. Podobnost na sintaktični ravni med jeziki je izkoriščena pri identifikaciji značilnosti za razvoj tamilskega jezikovnega modela. Besedna oblika ali leksikalna postavka se ne šteje za značilnost usposabljanja CRF. Ocenjevanje podatkov Wikipedije v Malayalamu kaže, da je naš pristop pravilen in rezultati, čeprav ne tako dobri kot tamilski, vendar primerljivi.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנו נותנים בפרטים איך לשפה עשירה במשאבים יכולה להשתמש בפתרון פרטים לשפה פחות משאבים. שפת המקור, שהיא שפת עשירה במקורים במחקר הזה, היא טמילית והשפת הענייה היא מליאלאם, שתיהן שייכות לאותה משפחת שפות, דראבידית. הפתרון הפרו-נומלי שפותח לטמיל משתמש ב CRF. הגישה שלנו היא להשתמש במדגם השפה הטמילית כדי לבדוק מידע מליאלאם והעיבוד הנדרש עבור מידע מליאלאם מופרט. הדמיון ברמה הסינטקטית בין השפות ניצל בכדי לזהות את המאפיינים לפיתוח מודל השפה הטמית. טופס המילה או פריט הלקסי לא נחשב כתכונה לאימון CRF. Evaluation on Malayalam Wikipedia data shows that our approach is correct and the results, though not as good as Tamil, but comparable.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིག་ཆ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱུ་དངོས་འབྲེལ་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཅིག་མིང་ཚུལ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག ཤེས་ཡིག Tamil ཡི་ལ་ཤེས་ཡོད་པའི་རྩ་མེད་གཞུང་གི་གདམ་བསལ་སྤྱོད་པ ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ནི་ཊ་མིལ་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆའི་མིང་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པར་ཨ་རིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡུལ་ཡུལ་ཆ་དང་ནང སྐད་རིགས་དབྱེ་བ་དང་དབྱེ་བ་ཀྱི་མཐུན་རིམ་པ་ལ་མཚུངས་ཡིན། The word form or the lexical item is not considered as a feature for training the CRFs. ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་འབྲས་འདི་དང་འབྲས་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མིན་ཐག་གཟུགས་རིས་འགྱུར་བ'}
{'en': 'Semantic Role Labeling with Pretrained Language Models for Known and Unknown Predicates', 'ar': 'وسم الأدوار الدلالية باستخدام نماذج اللغة المحددة مسبقًا للمفترضين المعروفين وغير المعروفين', 'fr': 'Étiquetage sémantique des rôles avec des modèles de langage préformés pour des prédicats connus et inconnus', 'es': 'Etiquetado semántico de roles con modelos de lenguaje preentrenados para predicados conocidos y desconocidos', 'pt': 'Rotulagem de papéis semânticos com modelos de linguagem pré-treinados para predicados conhecidos e desconhecidos', 'ja': '既知および未知の述語のための事前訓練された言語モデルを用いた意味論的ロールラベリング', 'zh': '用已知及未知谓词预习语言模样语义角色标记', 'ru': 'Маркировка семантических ролей с предварительно обученными языковыми моделями для известных и неизвестных предикатов', 'hi': 'ज्ञात और अज्ञात Predicates के लिए Pretrained भाषा मॉडल के साथ शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलिंग', 'ga': 'Lipéadú Róil Shéimeantach le Múnlaí Teanga Réamhthraenáilte le haghaidh Réamhfhocail Aitheanta agus Anaithnid', 'ka': 'Semantic Role Labeling with Pretrained Language Models for Known and Unknown Predites', 'el': 'Σημαντική επισήμανση ρόλων με προκαθορισμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα για γνωστούς και άγνωστους προκαθορισμένους', 'hu': 'Szemantikus szerepkörcímkézés előzetes nyelvi modellekkel ismert és ismeretlen előrejelzésekhez', 'kk': 'Беймәлім және беймәлім үлгілер үшін білім тіл үлгілерімен Semantic Role Labeling', 'lt': 'Semantinis vaidmens ženklinimas su išankstinio mokymo kalbos modeliais žinomiems ir nežinomiems predikatams', 'mk': 'Семантичко означување на улогата со претренирани јазички модели за познати и непознати предикати', 'ml': 'അറിയാത്ത ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കും അപരിചിതമായ പ്രെഡിക്റ്റുകള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Label Rol Semantik dengan Model Bahasa Terlatih untuk Predikat Diketahui dan Tidak Diketahui', 'it': 'Etichettatura semantica dei ruoli con modelli linguistici pretrained per Predicati conosciuti e sconosciuti', 'mt': 'Tikkettar tar-Rwol Semantiku b’Mudelli Lingwistiċi Mħarrġa minn Qabel għal Predikati Għrufa u Mhux magħrufa', 'mn': 'Зөвхөн мэдэгдэх, мэдэгдэхгүй хэл загваруудын Semantic Role Labeling', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Semantyczne etykietowanie ról ze wstępnie przeszkolonymi modelami językowymi dla znanych i nieznanych predykatów', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Semantic Role Labeling with Pretrained Language Models for Known and Unknown Predicates', 'ro': 'Etichetarea rolurilor semantice cu modele lingvistice pretrainate pentru predicate cunoscute si necunoscute', 'sr': 'Semantički etiketiranje uloga sa preliječenim jezičkim modelima za poznate i nepoznate predikate', 'ta': 'அறியப்படாத மற்றும் தெரியாத முன்னேற்றங்களுக்கு முன்னேற்றப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரி முறைமைகளுடன் செமான்ட', 'sv': 'Semantisk rollmärkning med förutbestämda språkmodeller för kända och okända företeelser', 'ur': 'علم اور ناپذیر پرڈیکٹز کے لئے سیمنٹی رول لابلینگ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thuật toán đồng hồ Rolex với Chế độ Ngôn ngữ sẵn sàng cho sinh sản đã biết và không rõ', 'hr': 'Semantička označavanja uloga s pretjeranim jezičkim modelima za poznate i nepoznate predikate', 'nl': 'Semantische rollabeling met vooraf getrainde taalmodellen voor bekende en onbekende predicaten', 'bg': 'Семантично етикетиране на роли с предварително обучени езикови модели за известни и непознати предшественици', 'de': 'Semantische Rollenbeschriftung mit vortrainierten Sprachmodellen für bekannte und unbekannte Prädikate', 'fa': 'برچسب نقشه\u200cهای سنتی با مدل\u200cهای زبانی که برای پیشدیکتهای دانسته و ناشناخته می\u200cشوند', 'da': 'Semantisk rollemærkning med forudgående sprogmodeller for kendte og ukendte forudsætninger', 'ko': '미리 훈련된 언어 모델을 바탕으로 알고 있는 것과 알 수 없는 술어의 의미 역할 표시', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Bilen we Namaýyş Taýdalyklar üçin Semantik Roler Etiketleme', 'id': 'Labeling Role Semantik dengan Model Bahasa Terlatih untuk Predikat yang Diketahui dan Tidak Diketahui', 'sq': 'Semantic Role Labeling with Pretrained Language Models for Known and Unknown Predicates', 'hy': 'Semantic Role Labeling with Pretrained Language Models for Known and Unknown Predicates', 'sw': 'Mchezo wa Semantic Role na Modeli za Lugha zilizojifunza kwa ajili ya Wagombea wasiofahamika', 'am': 'game speed', 'az': 'Bilin톛n v톛 bilinm톛d톛n Prediktatlar 칲칞칲n Semantik Rul Etilm톛si', 'cs': 'Sémantické označování rolí s předtrénovanými jazykovými modely pro známé a neznámé predikáty', 'et': 'Semantiline rolli märgistamine eelnevalt treenitud keelemudelitega tuntud ja tundmatute eelkäijate jaoks', 'fi': 'Semanttinen roolimerkintä ennalta koulutetuilla kielimalleilla tunnetuille ja tuntemattomille predikaaleille', 'bn': 'Semantic Role Labeling with Pretrained Language Models for Known and Unknown Predicates', 'ca': 'Etiquetar el paper Semàtic amb models de llenguatge pré-instruits per predicats coneguts i desconeguts', 'bs': 'Semantički etiketiranje uloga sa preliječenim jezičkim modelima za poznate i nepoznate predikate', 'jv': 'Label semanti structural navigation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Semantic Role Labeling with Pretrained Language Models for Known and Unknown Predicates', 'sk': 'Semantno označevanje vlog s predvadljenimi jezikovnimi modeli za znane in neznane prednike', 'he': 'תווית תפקיד סמנטית עם דוגמני שפה מתאמנים מראש למחזורים ידועים ולא ידועים'}
{'en': 'We build the first full pipeline for semantic role labelling of Russian texts. The pipeline implements predicate identification, argument extraction, argument classification (labeling), and global scoring via integer linear programming. We train supervised neural network models for argument classification using Russian semantically annotated corpus   FrameBank. However, we note that this resource provides annotations only to a very limited set of predicates. We combat the problem of annotation scarcity by introducing two models that rely on different sets of features : one for known predicates that are present in the training set and one for unknown predicates that are not. We show that the model for unknown predicates can alleviate the lack of annotation by using pretrained embeddings. We perform experiments with various types of embeddings including the ones generated by deep pretrained language models : word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, and show that embeddings generated by deep pretrained language models are superior to classical shallow embeddings for argument classification of both known and unknown predicates.', 'ar': 'نبني أول خط أنابيب كامل لوصف الأدوار الدلالية للنصوص الروسية. ينفذ خط الأنابيب تحديد المسند ، واستخراج الحجة ، وتصنيف الحجة (وضع العلامات) ، والتسجيل العالمي عبر البرمجة الخطية الصحيحة. نقوم بتدريب نماذج الشبكات العصبية الخاضعة للإشراف لتصنيف الحجج باستخدام مجموعة التعليقات التوضيحية اللغوية الروسية - FrameBank. ومع ذلك ، نلاحظ أن هذا المورد يوفر تعليقات توضيحية فقط لمجموعة محدودة جدًا من المسندات. نحن نكافح مشكلة ندرة التعليقات التوضيحية من خلال تقديم نموذجين يعتمدان على مجموعات مختلفة من الميزات: أحدهما للمسندات "المعروفة" الموجودة في مجموعة التدريب والآخر للمسندات "غير المعروفة" غير الموجودة. نظهر أن نموذج المسندات "غير المعروفة" يمكن أن يخفف من نقص التعليقات التوضيحية باستخدام حفلات الزفاف المخططة مسبقًا. نجري تجارب على أنواع مختلفة من الزخارف بما في ذلك تلك التي تم إنشاؤها بواسطة نماذج اللغة العميقة مسبقًا: word2vec ، و FastText ، و ELMo ، و BERT ، ونوضح أن عمليات التضمين التي تم إنشاؤها بواسطة نماذج لغوية سابقة التدريب تتفوق على عمليات التضمين الضحلة الكلاسيكية لتصنيف الحجج لكل من "المعروف" و المسندات "غير معروف".', 'fr': "Nous construisons le premier pipeline complet pour l'étiquetage sémantique des textes russes. Le pipeline implémente l'identification des prédicats, l'extraction d'arguments, la classification des arguments (étiquetage) et la notation globale via la programmation linéaire d'entiers. Nous entraînons des modèles de réseaux neuronaux supervisés pour la classification des arguments à l'aide du corpus annoté sémantiquement russe — FrameBank. Cependant, nous notons que cette ressource ne fournit des annotations que pour un ensemble très limité de prédicats. Nous luttons contre le problème de la rareté des annotations en introduisant deux modèles qui s'appuient sur des ensembles de caractéristiques différents\xa0: un pour les prédicats «\xa0connus\xa0» présents dans l'ensemble d'apprentissage et un pour les prédicats «\xa0inconnus\xa0» qui ne le sont pas. Nous montrons que le modèle pour les prédicats «\xa0inconnus\xa0» peut pallier le manque d'annotation en utilisant des intégrations préentraînées. Nous effectuons des expériences avec différents types d'intégrations, y compris celles générées par des modèles de langage pré-entraînés\xa0: word2vec, FastText, ElMo, BERT, et montrons que les intégrations générées par des modèles de langage pré-entraînés sont supérieures aux intégrations superficielles classiques pour la classification des arguments à la fois «\xa0connus\xa0» et des prédicats «\xa0inconnus\xa0».", 'pt': 'Construímos o primeiro pipeline completo para rotulagem de papéis semânticos de textos russos. O pipeline implementa identificação de predicados, extração de argumentos, classificação de argumentos (rotulagem) e pontuação global por meio de programação linear inteira. Treinamos modelos de redes neurais supervisionadas para classificação de argumentos usando corpus anotado semanticamente russo – FrameBank. No entanto, observamos que esse recurso fornece anotações apenas para um conjunto muito limitado de predicados. Combatemos o problema da escassez de anotação introduzindo dois modelos que dependem de diferentes conjuntos de recursos: um para predicados “conhecidos” que estão presentes no conjunto de treinamento e outro para predicados “desconhecidos” que não estão. Mostramos que o modelo para predicados “desconhecidos” pode aliviar a falta de anotação usando embeddings pré-treinados. Realizamos experimentos com vários tipos de embeddings, incluindo aqueles gerados por modelos de linguagem pré-treinados profundos: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, e mostramos que os embeddings gerados por modelos de linguagem pré-treinados profundos são superiores aos embeddings rasos clássicos para classificação de argumentos de ambos “conhecidos” e predicados “desconhecidos”.', 'es': 'Creamos el primer canal completo para el etiquetado semántico de roles de los textos rusos. La canalización implementa la identificación de predicados, la extracción de argumentos, la clasificación de argumentos (etiquetado) y la puntuación global a través de la programación lineal de enteros. Entrenamos modelos de redes neuronales supervisadas para la clasificación de argumentos utilizando el corpus ruso anotado semánticamente: FrameBank. Sin embargo, observamos que este recurso solo proporciona anotaciones a un conjunto muy limitado de predicados. Combatimos el problema de la escasez de anotaciones introduciendo dos modelos que se basan en diferentes conjuntos de características: uno para los predicados «conocidos» que están presentes en el conjunto de entrenamiento y otro para los predicados «desconocidos» que no lo están. Mostramos que el modelo para predicados «desconocidos» puede aliviar la falta de anotación mediante el uso de incrustaciones previamente entrenadas. Realizamos experimentos con varios tipos de incrustaciones, incluidas las generadas por modelos de lenguaje profundamente entrenados previamente: word2vec, FastText, eLMO, BERT, y mostramos que las incrustaciones generadas por modelos de lenguaje profundamente entrenados previamente son superiores a las incrustaciones superficiales clásicas para la clasificación de argumentos de ambos «conocidos» y predicados «desconocidos».', 'ja': 'ロシア語テキストの意味的役割ラベル付けのための最初の完全なパイプラインを構築します。 パイプラインは、整数線形プログラミングを介して、述語識別、引数抽出、引数分類（ラベル付け）、およびグローバルスコアリングを実装する。 私たちは、ロシア語の意味論的注釈付きコーパス– FrameBankを使用して、引数分類のための監視されたニューラルネットワークモデルをトレーニングしました。 ただし、このリソースは、非常に限られた述語のセットにのみ注釈を提供することに注意してください。 私たちは、異なる機能セットに依存する2つのモデルを導入することによって、注釈の希少性の問題に対処します。1つは、トレーニングセットに存在する「既知の」述語のためのものであり、もう1つは、存在しない「未知の」述語のためのものです。 「不明な」述語のモデルは、事前に訓練された埋め込みを使用することによって注釈の欠如を緩和できることを示しています。 私たちは、深層事前訓練された言語モデルによって生成された埋め込みを含む、さまざまなタイプの埋め込みの実験を行います。word 2 vec、FastText、ELMo、BERTは、深層事前訓練された言語モデルによって生成された埋め込みが、「既知」と「未知」の両方の述語の引数分類のための古典的な浅い埋め込みよりも優れていることを示しています。', 'zh': '一以俄语文本语义角色全管。 其管道以整数线性规成谓词标识、参数提取、参数分类(标识)、全局评分。 以俄语语义注语料库 (FrameBank) 练于参数类者监神经网络模形。 然吾辈注意,此资仅供注于一组甚有限者谓词。 注稀缺性:一以"已知"谓词,一以"未知"谓词。 吾言"未知"谓词模形可以预练者销注之阙。 以各种类型嵌实验,以深度预练语言为嵌:word2vec,FastText,ELMo,BERT,以深度预训语言成者嵌优于经浅层嵌之,以"已知"与"未知"谓词参数类。', 'ru': 'Мы строим первый полный конвейер для семантической ролевой разметки русских текстов. Конвейер реализует идентификацию предикатов, извлечение аргументов, классификацию аргументов (маркировку) и глобальную оценку с помощью целочисленного линейного программирования. Мы обучаем модели контролируемых нейронных сетей для классификации аргументов с использованием русского семантически аннотированного корпуса – FrameBank. Однако мы отмечаем, что этот ресурс предоставляет аннотации только к очень ограниченному набору предикатов. Мы боремся с проблемой нехватки аннотаций, внедряя две модели, которые опираются на разные наборы признаков: одну для «известных» предикатов, которые присутствуют в обучающем наборе, и одну для «неизвестных» предикатов, которые не присутствуют. Показано, что модель для «неизвестных» предикатов может облегчить отсутствие аннотации за счет использования предварительно обученных вложений. Мы проводим эксперименты с различными типами вложений, включая те, которые генерируются глубинными предварительно обученными языковыми моделями: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, и показываем, что вложения, генерируемые глубинными предварительно обученными языковыми моделями, превосходят классические неглубокие вложения для классификации аргументов как «известных», так и «неизвестных» предикатов.', 'hi': 'हम रूसी ग्रंथों की शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलिंग के लिए पहली पूर्ण पाइपलाइन का निर्माण करते हैं। पाइपलाइन पूर्णांक रैखिक प्रोग्रामिंग के माध्यम से विधेय पहचान, तर्क निष्कर्षण, तर्क वर्गीकरण (लेबलिंग), और वैश्विक स्कोरिंग को लागू करती है। हम रूसी शब्दार्थ रूप से एनोटेटेड कॉर्पस - फ्रेमबैंक का उपयोग करके तर्क वर्गीकरण के लिए पर्यवेक्षित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं। हालांकि, हम ध्यान दें कि यह संसाधन केवल विधेय के एक बहुत ही सीमित सेट के लिए एनोटेशन प्रदान करता है। हम दो मॉडलों को पेश करके एनोटेशन की कमी की समस्या का मुकाबला करते हैं जो सुविधाओं के विभिन्न सेटों पर भरोसा करते हैं: एक "ज्ञात" विधेय के लिए जो प्रशिक्षण सेट में मौजूद हैं और एक "अज्ञात" विधेय के लिए जो नहीं हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि "अज्ञात" predicates के लिए मॉडल pretrained embeddings का उपयोग करके एनोटेशन की कमी को कम कर सकते हैं। हम गहरे पूर्वप्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल द्वारा उत्पन्न लोगों सहित विभिन्न प्रकार के एम्बेडिंग के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, और दिखाते हैं कि गहरी पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल द्वारा उत्पन्न एम्बेडिंग "ज्ञात" और "अज्ञात" दोनों विधेय के तर्क वर्गीकरण के लिए शास्त्रीय उथले एम्बेडिंग से बेहतर हैं।', 'ga': 'Tógaimid an chéad phíblíne iomlán le haghaidh lipéadú róil shéimeantach ar théacsanna Rúisise. Cuireann an phíblíne sainaithint réamh-mheastacháin, eastóscadh argóintí, aicmiú argóintí (lipéadú), agus scóráil dhomhanda i bhfeidhm trí ríomhchlárú líneach slánuimhir. Cuirimid oiliúint ar mhúnlaí líonra néaracha maoirsithe le haghaidh aicmiú argóintí ag baint úsáide as corpas Rúisise anótáilte go séimeantach - FrameBank. Mar sin féin, tugaimid faoi deara nach soláthraíonn an acmhainn seo ach nótaí do shraith an-teoranta tuar. Déanaimid an fhadhb a bhaineann le ganntanas nótaí a chomhrac trí dhá mhúnla a thabhairt isteach a bhíonn ag brath ar thacair éagsúla gnéithe: ceann amháin le haghaidh réamhaithrisí “aitheanta” atá i láthair sa tacar oiliúna agus ceann le haghaidh réamhaithrisí “anaithnid” nach bhfuil. Léirímid gur féidir leis an tsamhail le haghaidh réamhaithrisí “anaithnid” an easpa nótaí a mhaolú trí úsáid a bhaint as leabaithe réamhoilte. Déanaimid turgnaimh le cineálacha éagsúla leabaithe lena n-áirítear na cinn a ghintear trí mhúnlaí doimhne teanga réamhoilte: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, agus taispeánann muid go bhfuil leabaithe a ghintear trí mhúnlaí domhain réamhthraenáilte teanga níos fearr ná leabaithe clasaiceacha éadomhain le haghaidh aicmiú argóinte den dá “aitheanta” agus tuar “anaithnid”.', 'el': 'Κατασκευάζουμε τον πρώτο πλήρη αγωγό για σημασιολογική σήμανση ρόλων ρωσικών κειμένων. Ο αγωγός εφαρμόζει τον προσδιορισμό προδιάθετων, την εξαγωγή ορίσματος, την ταξινόμηση ορίσματος (σήμανση) και την παγκόσμια βαθμολογία μέσω ακέραιου γραμμικού προγραμματισμού. Εκπαιδεύουμε μοντέλα εποπτευόμενων νευρωνικών δικτύων για ταξινόμηση ορίων χρησιμοποιώντας ρωσικά σημασιολογικά σχολιασμένα σώματα στο FrameBank. Ωστόσο, σημειώνουμε ότι αυτός ο πόρος παρέχει σχόλια μόνο σε ένα πολύ περιορισμένο σύνολο προκαθορισμένων. Αντιμετωπίζουμε το πρόβλημα της έλλειψης σχολίων εισάγοντας δύο μοντέλα που βασίζονται σε διαφορετικά σύνολα χαρακτηριστικών: ένα για "γνωστούς" predicates που υπάρχουν στο εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο και ένα για "άγνωστους" predicates που δεν υπάρχουν. Δείχνουμε ότι το μοντέλο των "άγνωστων" predicats μπορεί να ανακουφίσει την έλλειψη σχολιασμού χρησιμοποιώντας προκαθορισμένες ενσωματώσεις. Πραγματοποιούμε πειράματα με διάφορους τύπους ενσωμάτωσης συμπεριλαμβανομένων αυτών που παράγονται από βαθιά προκαθορισμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα: και δείχνουν ότι οι ενσωμάτωση που παράγονται από βαθιά προκαθορισμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα είναι ανώτερες από τις κλασικές ρηχές ενσωμάτωσης για την ταξινόμηση ορίων τόσο των "γνωστών" όσο και των "άγνωστων" predicats.', 'hu': 'Megépítjük az első teljes csővezetéket az orosz szövegek szemantikai szerepjelöléséhez. A csővezeték megvalósítja a predikátok azonosítását, az argumentumok kivonását, az argumentumok osztályozását (címkézést) és a globális pontozást egész lineáris programozással. Felügyelt neurális hálózati modelleket képzünk az érvek osztályozására orosz szemantikusan jegyzetelt korpusz - FrameBank használatával. Megjegyezzük azonban, hogy ez az erőforrás csak nagyon korlátozott prédikátumokhoz tartalmaz jegyzeteket. A megjegyzések hiányának problémájával küzdünk azzal, hogy két olyan modell bevezetésével, amelyek különböző jellemzőkre támaszkodnak: az egyik a képzési készletben jelen lévő "ismert" predikátumokra, a másik pedig az "ismeretlen" predikátumokra, amelyek nem. Megmutatjuk, hogy az "ismeretlen" prédikátumok modellje az előkészített beágyazások használatával enyhítheti a jegyzetek hiányát. Kísérleteket végzünk különböző típusú beágyazásokkal, beleértve a mélyen előkészített nyelvmodellek által generált beágyazásokat: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, és megmutatjuk, hogy a mélyen előkészített nyelvmodellek által generált beágyazások jobbak, mint a klasszikus sekély beágyazások az "ismert" és az "ismeretlen" predikátumok argumentumok osztályozásához.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი პირველი. პროგრამის განსაზღვრულება განსაზღვრულება, არგრამის ექსტრექცია, არგრამის კლასიფიკაცია (ლებლიკაცია) და გლობალური სკურაცია უფრო რინეულ პროგრამის ჩვენ შევარწმუნებით ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელები არგუმენტიკის კლასიფიკაციისთვის როგორც პროსია სემანტიკურად მონიტურებული კორპუს - FrameBank. მაგრამ ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ეს რესურსი განახლება მხოლოდ მნიშვნელოვანი პრედიკატებს. ჩვენ ამოცანების შესაძლებლობის პრობლემას გავუბრუნეთ, რომელიც ორი მოდელის გამოყენება, რომელიც განსხვავებული ფუნქციების ნაწილზე იქნება: ერთი "უცნობი" პრედიკატის გამოყენება, რომელიც არ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ მოდელი \'უცნობი\' პრედიკატებისთვის შეუძლია გამოყენებული წინაწერების გამოყენებით გამოიყენება. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთებთ განსხვავებული ტიპებით ინბიდნენციებით, რომელიც ძალიან წინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინა', 'it': "Costruiamo la prima pipeline completa per l'etichettatura semantica dei testi russi. La pipeline implementa l'identificazione dei predicati, l'estrazione degli argomenti, la classificazione degli argomenti (etichettatura) e il punteggio globale tramite programmazione lineare intera. Formiamo modelli di rete neurale supervisionati per la classificazione degli argomenti utilizzando il corpus semanticamente annotato russo - FrameBank. Tuttavia, notiamo che questa risorsa fornisce annotazioni solo ad un gruppo molto limitato di predicati. Combattiamo il problema della scarsità di annotazioni introducendo due modelli che si basano su diversi insiemi di caratteristiche: uno per i predicati 'noti' presenti nel set di allenamento e uno per i predicati 'sconosciuti' che non lo sono. Mostriamo che il modello per i predicati 'sconosciuti' può alleviare la mancanza di annotazione utilizzando incorporazioni pre-addestrate. Eseguiamo esperimenti con vari tipi di embedding, inclusi quelli generati da modelli di linguaggio pretrained profondo: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, e mostriamo che gli embedding generati da modelli di linguaggio pretrained profondo sono superiori ai classici embedding superficiali per la classificazione degli argomenti sia dei predicati 'noti' che 'sconosciuti'.", 'lt': 'Mes sukuriame pirmąjį visišką vamzdyną, skirtą semantiniam Rusijos tekstų ženklinimui. Vamzdynas įgyvendina tikslų identifikavimą, argument ų išgavimą, argumentų klasifikavimą (ženklinimą) ir visuotinį taškų nustatymą naudojant visą skaičių linijinį programavimą. Mes rengiame prižiūrimus nervinių tinklų modelius argumentams klasifikuoti naudojant Rusijos semantiškai anotuotą korpus - FrameBank. Tačiau pastebime, kad šis išteklius rodo tik labai nedideles pastabas. Kovojame su anotacijos trūkumo problema įvedant du modelius, kurie priklauso nuo skirtingų savybių rinkinių: vieną "žinomiems" predikatams, kurie yra mokymo rinkinyje, ir vieną "nežinomiems" predikatams, kurie nėra. Mes rodome, kad "nežinomų" predikatų modelis gali palengvinti anotacijos trūkumą naudojant iš anksto apmokytus įterpimus. Atliekame eksperimentus su įvairių tipų įterpimais, įskaitant tuos, kuriuos sukuria giliai išankstinio mokymo kalbos modeliai: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, ir rodome, kad įterpimai, kuriuos sukuria giliai išankstinio mokymo kalbos modeliai, yra geresni nei klasikiniai paviršiniai įterpimai argumentams klasifikuoti "žinomus" ir "nežinomus" predikatus.', 'kk': 'Біз Орус мәтіндерінің семантикалық рольді белгілеу үшін бірінші толық конеп сызығын құрамыз. Қызықтың алдыңғы идентификациясы, аргументті тарқату, аргументтің классификациясы (белгілеу) және бүтін сызықты бағдарламалар арқылы жұмыс белгілеу және әлемгі Біз Руссияның semantically annotated corpus - FrameBank аргумент классификациясының аргументтік үлгілерін басқару үшін невралдық желі моделдерін үйренеміз. Бірақ біз бұл ресурс тек өте шектелген предикат жиынына жазбаларды береді. Біз түрлі мүмкіндіктерге сенімді екі үлгілерді келтіріп, жазбалардың қажеттіліктерінің мәселесін салдамыз: бірінші "беймәлім" предикаттары, бірінші "беймәлім" предикаттары. Біз \'беймәлім\' предикаттарының үлгісі алдын- ала ендірілген ендірулерді қолдану арқылы белгіліктер жоқ дегенді көшірмеледі. Біз әртүрлі түрлі ендіру тәртібімен тәжірибелерді жасаймыз: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, және қалыпты тіл моделлері құрылған ендіру классикалық үлкен ендіру үшін "беймәлім" және "беймәлім" предикаттарының аргументтің классикалық үлкен ендіру', 'mk': "Го изградивме првиот целосен гасовод за семантично означување на руските тексти. Гасоводот имплементира предикатна идентификација, екстракција на аргументи, класификација на аргументи (етикетирање) и глобално оценување преку целосна линијарна програмирање. Тренираме надгледувани нервни мрежни модели за класификација на аргументи користејќи руски семантично анотиран корпус - Фрамебанк. Сепак, забележуваме дека овој ресурс обезбедува анотации само на многу ограничен сет предикати. Ние се бориме против проблемот на недостатокот на анотации со воведување на два модели кои се зависат од различни сетови на карактеристики: еден за „познати“ предикати кои се присутни во сетот на обука и еден за „непознати“ предикати кои не се. We show that the model for 'unknown' predicates can alleviate the lack of annotation by using pretrained embeddings.  Ние спроведуваме експерименти со различни видови на вградувања, вклучувајќи ги и оние генерирани од длабоко претренирани јазички модели: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, и покажуваме дека вградувањата генерирани од длабоко претренирани јазички модели се супериорни од класични плошки вградувања за класификација на аргументи", 'ms': "Kami membangun saluran paip penuh pertama untuk label peranan semantik teks Rusia. Saluran paip melaksanakan pengenalan predikat, ekstraksi argumen, klasifikasi argumen (label), dan skor global melalui program linear integer. Kami melatih model rangkaian saraf yang diawasi untuk klasifikasi argumen menggunakan korpus yang dicatat secara semantik Rusia - FrameBank. Namun, kami menyadari bahawa sumber ini menyediakan anotasi hanya kepada set yang sangat terbatas predikat. Kami melawan masalah kekurangan anotasi dengan memperkenalkan dua model yang bergantung pada set fitur yang berbeza: satu untuk predikat 'diketahui' yang ada dalam set latihan dan satu untuk predikat 'tidak diketahui' yang tidak. Kami menunjukkan bahawa model untuk predikat 'tidak diketahui' boleh mengurangi kekurangan anotasi dengan menggunakan penyambungan terlatih. Kami melakukan eksperimen dengan berbagai jenis penyembedding termasuk yang dijana oleh model bahasa yang dilatih dahulu dalam: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, dan menunjukkan bahawa penyembedding yang dijana oleh model bahasa yang dilatih dahulu dalam adalah lebih baik daripada penyembedding rendah klasik untuk klasifikasi argumen kedua-dua predikat 'diketahui' dan 'tidak diketahui'.", 'mn': 'Бид анхны бүрэн хоолойн шугам бүтээж, Оросын текстүүдийн semantic role labelling. Хөдөлгөөн шугам нь хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд хэд Бид Российн semantique annotated corpus - FrameBank-г ашиглан аргументын хуваалцах аргументын сэтгэл сүлжээний загваруудыг удирдаж суралцаж байна. Гэхдээ бид энэ баялаг нь зөвхөн хязгаарлагдсан хэсэгт илтгэл өгдөг. Бид хоёр загварыг өөр өөр хэлбэрээр үнэлдэг загваруудын асуудлыг өргөдөг. Нэг нь сургалтын сургуульд байгаа "мэддэг" хэлбэрээр, нөгөө нь "мэдэхгүй" хэлбэрээр биш. Бид "unknown" predicates-ын загвар нь анзаарлын алдагдлыг багасгаж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид олон төрлийн загвартай туршилт хийдэг. Гүн гүнзгий хэл загвараар бий болсон зүйлс: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, мөн гүнзгий гүнзгий хэл загвараар бий болсон загварууд нь "мэдэгдэх" болон "мэдэгдэхгүй" хэлбэрийн аргументын хуваалцааны аргументын хэлбэрээс илүү гүнзгий за', 'no': 'Vi bygger den første fullstendige røyr for semantiske rolletiketting av russiske tekstar. Roiplinja implementerer predikat identifikasjon, ekstraksjon av argumentet, klassifikasjon av argumentet (merkelapp) og globalt skoring gjennom heiltal lineær program. Vi treng oversikte neuralnettverksmodeller for argument- klassifikasjon med russisk semantisk annotatert korpus - FrameBank. Men vi merker på at denne ressursen gjev berre merknader til eit veldig begrenset set av predikatar. Vi kjemper med problemet på oppmerkingskyldigheten ved å introdusera to modeller som rely på ulike funksjonar: ein for « kjent » - predikatar som finst i opplæringssettet og ein for « ukjend » - predikatar som ikkje er. Vi viser at modellen for « ukjend » predikatar kan alleviare manglende notasjon ved å bruka innbyggingar som er pretraine. Vi utfører eksperimenter med ulike typar innbygging, inkludert dei som lagar av dype språk- modeller: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, og viser at innbygging laga av dype språk- modeller er større enn klassiske slag innbygging for argument- klassifikasjon av både « kjent » og « ukjend » predikatar.', 'pl': 'Budujemy pierwszy pełny rurociąg do semantycznego oznaczania roli tekstów rosyjskich. Pipeline implementuje identyfikację predykatów, ekstrakcję argumentów, klasyfikację argumentów (etykietowanie) i globalną ocenę za pomocą programowania liniowego całkowitego. Trenujemy nadzorowane modele sieci neuronowych do klasyfikacji argumentów przy użyciu rosyjskiego semantycznie adnotacji korpusu w ramach FrameBank. Zauważamy jednak, że ten zasób dostarcza adnotacji tylko do bardzo ograniczonego zestawu predykatów. Zwalczamy problem niedoboru adnotacji poprzez wprowadzenie dwóch modeli opartych na różnych zestawach cech: jednego dla "znanych" predykatów obecnych w zestawie treningowym i drugiego dla predykatów "nieznanych", które nie są. Pokazujemy, że model predykatów "nieznanych" może złagodzić brak adnotacji poprzez użycie wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń. Wykonujemy eksperymenty z różnymi rodzajami osadzeń, w tym z tymi generowanymi przez głębokie modele językowe: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, i pokazujemy, że osadzenia generowane przez głębokie modele językowe są lepsze od klasycznych płytkich osadzeń dla klasyfikacji argumentów zarówno predykatów "znanych" jak i "nieznanych".', 'ro': 'Construim prima conductă completă pentru etichetarea rolurilor semantice ale textelor rusești. Conducta implementează identificarea predicatelor, extragerea argumentelor, clasificarea argumentelor (etichetare) și scorarea globală prin programarea liniară întreagă. Instruim modele de rețele neuronale supravegheate pentru clasificarea argumentelor folosind corpus adnotat semantic rusesc - FrameBank. Cu toate acestea, observăm că această resursă oferă adnotări numai pentru un set foarte limitat de predicate. Combatem problema deficitului de adnotare prin introducerea a două modele care se bazează pe seturi diferite de caracteristici: unul pentru predicatele "cunoscute" care sunt prezente în setul de instruire și unul pentru predicatele "necunoscute" care nu sunt. Noi arătăm că modelul pentru predicatele "necunoscute" poate atenua lipsa adnotării prin utilizarea încorporărilor pre-instruite. Efectuăm experimente cu diferite tipuri de încorporări, inclusiv cele generate de modele de limbaj profund pre-instruite: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, și arătăm că încorporările generate de modele de limbaj profund pre-instruite sunt superioare încorporărilor clasice superficiale pentru clasificarea argumentelor atât a predicatelor \'cunoscute\' cât și \'necunoscute\'.', 'mt': "Aħna nibnu l-ewwel pipeline sħiħ għat-tikkettar tar-rwol semantiku tat-testi Russi. Il-pipeline jimplimenta identifikazzjoni predikata, estrazzjoni tal-argument, klassifikazzjoni tal-argument (tikkettar), u punteġġ globali permezz ta’ programmazzjoni lineari b’numru sħiħ. Aħna nħarrġu mudelli superviżi tan-netwerk newrali għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-argumenti bl-użu tal-korpus semantikament annotat Russu - FrameBank. Madankollu, ninnota li din ir-riżorsa tipprovdi annotazzjonijiet biss għal sett limitat ħafna ta’ predikati. We combat the problem of annotation scarcity by introducing two models that rely on different sets of features: one for 'known' predicates that are present in the training set and one for 'unknown' predicates that are not.  Aħna nuru li l-mudell għal predikati 'mhux magħrufa' jista' jtaffi n-nuqqas ta' annotazzjoni billi jużaw inkorporazzjonijiet imħarrġa minn qabel. Aħna nagħmlu esperimenti b’diversi tipi ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet inklużi dawk iġġenerati minn mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel fil-fond: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, u nuru li inkorporazzjonijiet iġġenerati minn mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel fil-fond huma superjuri għal inkorporazzjonijiet klassiċi baxxi għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-argumenti kemm ta’ predikati ‘magħrufa’ kif ukoll ‘mhux magħrufa’.", 'sr': 'Napravili smo prvu punu cijev za semantičku ulogu označavanja ruskih tekstova. Cevovovoda provede predikatnu identifikaciju, ekstrakciju argumenta, klasifikaciju argumenta (etiketiranje) i globalnu skretanje putem celog linearnog programiranja. Treniramo nadzorne modele neuralne mreže za klasifikaciju argumenta koristeći ruski semantički annotirani korpus - FrameBank. Međutim, primećujemo da ovaj resurs pruža annotacije samo vrlo ograničenoj skupini predikata. Borimo se protiv problema nedostatka annotacije uvođenjem dva modela koji se oslanjaju na različite sete karakteristika: jedan za \'poznate\' predikate koji su prisutni u setu obuke i jedan za \'nepoznate\' predikate koji nisu. Pokazujemo da model "nepoznatih" predikata može ublažiti nedostatak annotacije koristeći pretkišene ugrađenje. Izvodimo eksperimente sa različitim vrstama integracija, uključujući one koji su proizvedeni dubokim jezičkim modelima: reč 2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, i pokazujemo da su integracije proizvedene dubokim jezičkim modelima nadmažene klasičnim plitkom integracijama za klasifikaciju argumenta i "poznatih" i "nepoznatih" predikata.', 'ml': "We build the first full pipeline for semantic role labelling of Russian texts.  പൈപ്പെലൈന്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു നമ്മള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്നത് റുഷ്യന്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്കല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പാസിനെ ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വ എന്നാലും, ഈ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു കൂട്ടത്തിലേക്ക് മാത്രമേ വിഷമങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നുള്ളൂ. വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന രണ്ടു മോഡലുകളെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രശ്നം ചെയ്യുന്നു; ഒരാള്\u200d 'പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d ഉണ്ട്' എന് 'അപരിചിതമായ' പ്രതിഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള മാതൃകയാണെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിലുള്ള അകത്തേക്കുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ആഴത്തില്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. വാര്\u200dഡ്2വെക്ക്, ഫാസ്റ്റ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ്, എല്\u200dമ", 'so': "Waxaynu dhisaynaa heerka ugu horeeya ee buuxa si aan u qorno qoraalka Ruushka. Baabuurku wuxuu sameeyaa aqoonsi la yaqaan, soo bixinta wadajirka, fasaxa wadajirka (labeling) iyo koorasyada caalamiga ah oo lagu qorayo barnaamijka linear oo dhan. Tusaalada shabakadda neurada ee warqadda ku saabsan, waxaynu ku tababarinnaa isticmaalka shabakadda Ruushka oo semantically dhibaataysan, FrameBank. However, we note that this resource provides annotations only to a very limited set of predicates.  Dhibaatada dhibaatada cabsida ah ayaannu la dagaalamaynaa marka loo soo bandhigi karo laba tusaale oo isku xiran noocyo kala duduwan: mid wuxuu ka dhigaa `aqoonsan', mid waxay ku qoran yihiin kooxda tababarka waxbarashada, mid wuxuu ka dhigaa `aan aqoonin', Waxaynu tusnaynaa in tusaale ahaan loo soo jeedo 'aan aqoon' uu u fududeyn karo baahida xanaaqiga ee isticmaalka qalabka lagu soo bandhigay. Waxaan sameynaa imtixaamo noocyo kala duduwan oo ku qoran noocyada afka aad u dheer ee lagu soo dhashay: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, waxaana muujinnaa in kooxaha lagu soo dhashay noocyada afka aad u dheer, ay ka sarreeyaan qaybaha iskuulka ah oo ku saabsan fasaxyada labada'aan aqoon' iyo 'aan aqoonin'", 'sv': 'Vi bygger den första kompletta pipeline för semantisk rollmärkning av ryska texter. Pipeline implementerar predikatidentifiering, argumentextraktion, argumentklassificering (märkning) och global poäng via heltalslinjär programmering. Vi utbildar övervakade neurala nätverksmodeller för argumentklassificering med hjälp av ryska semantiskt kommenterade korpus - FrameBank. Vi noterar dock att denna resurs endast ger anteckningar till en mycket begränsad uppsättning predikater. Vi bekämpar problemet med brist på anteckningar genom att introducera två modeller som bygger på olika uppsättningar av funktioner: en för "kända" predikater som finns i träningsuppsättningen och en för "okända" predikater som inte är det. Vi visar att modellen för okända predikater kan lindra bristen på notering genom att använda förkränade inbäddningar. Vi utför experiment med olika typer av inbäddningar inklusive de som genereras av djupa förkränade språkmodeller: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, och visar att inbäddningar som genereras av djupa förkränade språkmodeller är överlägsna klassiska grunda inbäddningar för argumentklassificering av både kända och okända predikater.', 'si': "අපි මුලින්ම පුරුණු පායිප්ලින් නිර්මාණය කරනවා රුසියානු පාට්ස් ලේබල් කරනවා. Name අපි රුසියානු සිමාන්තික විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා නියරල් ජාලබෑන්ක් මොඩේල්ස් විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා. නමුත්, අපි දැනගන්නවා මේ සම්බන්ධයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විතරයි. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සටන් කරනවා, වෙනස් සැට් විශේෂතාවට විශ්වාස කරපු මොඩේල් දෙකක් සංඥානය කරනවා: එක 'දන්න' ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස අපි පෙන්වන්නේ නැති ප්\u200dරීඩිකේට්ස් වෙනුවෙන් මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරේන්ඩ් සංවේදනය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා විවිධ වර්ගයක් සමග ග ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු භාෂ මොඩේල් වලින් නිර්මාණය කරපු වර්ගය: word2Vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, සහ පෙන්වන්නේ බෙන්ඩින්ග් හොඳ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරප", 'ur': "ہم روسی ٹیکسٹوں کی سیمنٹی رول لیبلینگ کے لئے پہلی پول پیپ لین بناتے ہیں۔ پائپ لین پہلے پہچان کرتا ہے، اردوмент اضافہ کرتا ہے، اردوмент کلاسپیٹ کرتا ہے (لابلینگ) اور گلوب اسکورینگ، تمام عدد لینار پروگرامینگ کے ذریعہ۔ ہم نے روسی سیمنٹی طریقے کے ذریعے روسی سیمنٹی قارپوس (FrameBank) کے مطابق حکومت کے لئے نیورال نیٹ ورک موڈل کی تعلیم دی۔ لیکن ہم یاد کرتے ہیں کہ یہ سرمایہ صرف ایک بہت محدود مجموعے کے لئے اظہار دیتا ہے۔ ہم نے اظہار کی کمزوری کے مسئلہ سے جنگ کیا ہے کہ دو موڈل کو معلوم کریں جو مختلف موجودات پر بھروسہ رکھتے ہیں: ایک جانے والی موجودات کے لئے جو تعلیم مجموعہ میں موجود ہیں اور ایک غیر جانے والی موجودات کے لئے جو نہیں ہیں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ 'ناشناختہ' پیشیکٹوں کے لئے نمڈل کو آسان کر سکتا ہے کہ مضبوط ابڈینگ کے استعمال کے ذریعے مضبوطی کی ناکامی کو آسان کر سکتا ہے۔ ہم طرح طرح طرح کے مطابق انبودینگ کے مطابق آزمائش کرتے ہیں جن کے ساتھ عمیق ترین زبان موڈل کے مطابق پیدا ہوئے ہیں: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT، اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ عمیق ترین زبان موڈل سے پیدا ہوئے انبودینگ دونوں 'معلوم' اور 'نامعلوم' موڈل کے مطابق معلوم ہونے کے لئے کلاسیک گلے انبودینگ", 'ta': "நாங்கள் ருஷ்யன் உரைகளை குறிப்பிட முதல் முழு புள்ளியை உருவாக்குகிறோம். குறிப்புக்குறிப்பிட்ட அடையாளம், தருமதிப்பு வெளியீடு, தருமதிப்பு வகைப்பு (அடையாளம்) மற்றும் முழு நேர நிரல் முறைமையாக மு நாங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சி வகைப்பாட்டிற்கு பார்க்கப்பட்ட நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல் மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்கிறோம் ருஷ்யன்  ஆனால், இந்த மூலம் மிகவும் வரம்பு முன்னோட்டங்களுக்கு மட்டும் குறிப்பிடுகிறது என்பதை நாம் கவனிக்கிறோம். வேறு வகையான குணங்களை நம்புகிறார்கள் என்ற இரண்டு மாதிரிகளை நாம் போராடுகிறோம். ஒரு 'தெரியும்' பயிற்சி அமைப்பில் இருக்கிறது மற்றும் 'தெரியாத'  'தெரியாத' குறிப்பிட்ட மாதிரி காண்பிக்கிறது என்பதை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் முறைமையை பயன்படுத்தி குறிப்பிட் நாம் பல்வேறு வகையான உள்ளீடுகளுடன் செயல்படுத்துகிறோம் அதைச் சேர்க்கிறோம் ஆழமான மொழி மாதிரிகளால் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளோம்: Word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, மற்றும் ஆழமான மொழி மாதிரிகளால் உருவாக்கப்பட", 'uz': 'Biz Ruscha textlarning semantik roli lab chiqarish uchun birinchi butun pipelin yaramiz. Name Biz Ruscha semantik o\'zgaruvchi kopus - FrameBank bilan boshqarish uchun nazar tarmoq modellarini o\'rganamiz. Lekin, bu resource faqat cheksiz cheksiz tartiblar bilan taqdim qiladi. Biz tajriba kuchi muammolarni boshqa xil turlariga ishlatadigan ikkita modellarni ko\'rib chiqaramiz: biri "nomaʼlum" tizimda mavjud boʻlgan va birinchi "nomaʼlum" ma\'lumotga ega bo\'lgan namunalarni anglatadi. Biz "nomaʼlum" prefikrlarining modeli yordamida taqdimot yordamida qo\'yish mumkin. Biz har xil turlari bilan tajriba qilamiz. Ularning eng yuqori cheksiz til modellari bilan yaratilgan bir xil tizimlar bilan bajaramiz: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, va eng yuqori cheksiz tilning modellari bilan yaratilgan qismlarni "nomaʼlum" va "nomaʼlum" deb hisoblash uchun darajada yuqori chegara bo\'ladi.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi xây dựng đường ống đầu tiên đầy đủ cho việc mô tả các tác phẩm theo ngữ nghĩa. Các đường dẫn thực hiện khả năng nhận diện khó khăn, trích xuất tranh luận, phân loại tranh luận (nhãn) và ghi nhận toàn cầu qua chương trình ngay thẳng. Chúng tôi đào tạo các mô hình mạng lưới thần kinh giám sát để phân loại tranh luận bằng thứ tiếng Nga. Tuy nhiên, chúng tôi lưu ý rằng nguồn tài nguyên này chỉ cung cấp chú ý cho một số khó khăn rất hạn chế. Chúng ta chiến đấu với vấn đề thiếu chú ý bằng cách đưa ra hai mẫu dựa trên các đặc điểm khác nhau: một trong những khó khăn "đã biết" hiện diện trong bộ huấn luyện và một trong những khó khăn "chưa rõ" không tồn tại. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng mô hình cho tình trạng khó nhận dạng\'lạ\'có thể giảm bớt sự thiếu chú ý bằng cách sử dụng sự nhúng mũi. Chúng tôi thực hiện thí nghiệm với nhiều loại sự nhúng trong đó bao gồm những loại được tạo ra bởi các mô hình ngôn ngữ ngầm trước giá thấp: Từ 2Véc, Fast Text, ElMo, BERT, và cho thấy sự nhúng tay tạo ra từ các mô hình ngôn ngữ sâu được xem là tốt hơn so với những sự nhúng vào cổ điển ít để phân loại tranh luận của cả « known » và « unknown ».', 'nl': "We bouwen de eerste volledige pijplijn voor semantische rollabeling van Russische teksten. De pijplijn implementeert predicaat identificatie, argumentextractie, argumentclassificatie (labeling) en globale scoring via integer lineaire programmering. We trainen supervised neural network modellen voor argumentclassificatie met behulp van Russisch semantisch geannoteerd corpus in FrameBank. We merken echter op dat deze bron annotaties alleen biedt voor een zeer beperkte set predicaten. We bestrijden het probleem van annotatieschaarste door twee modellen te introduceren die afhankelijk zijn van verschillende sets van kenmerken: één voor 'bekende' predicaten die aanwezig zijn in de trainingsset en één voor 'onbekende' predicaten die niet aanwezig zijn. We laten zien dat het model voor 'onbekende' predicaten het gebrek aan annotatie kan verlichten door vooraf getrainde embeddings te gebruiken. We voeren experimenten uit met verschillende soorten embeddings, waaronder die gegenereerd door deep pretrained taalmodellen: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, en tonen aan dat embeddings gegenereerd door deep pretrained taalmodellen superieur zijn aan klassieke ondiepe embeddings voor argumentclassificatie van zowel 'bekende' als 'onbekende' predicaten.", 'hr': 'Napravili smo prvu punu cijev za semantičku ulogu označavanja ruskih tekstova. Cijev provodi predikatnu identifikaciju, izvlačenje argumenta, klasifikaciju argumenta (označavanje) i globalno izvlačenje putem cijelog linearnog programiranja. Vježbamo nadzorne modele neuralne mreže za klasifikaciju argumenta koristeći ruski semantički annotirani korpus - FrameBank. Međutim, primjećujemo da ovaj resurs pruža annotacije samo vrlo ograničenoj skupini predikata. Borimo se protiv problema nedostatka annotacije uvođenjem dva modela koji se oslanjaju na različite skupine karakteristika: jedan za \'poznate\' predikate koji su prisutni u setu obuke i jedan za \'nepoznate\' predikate koji nisu. Pokazujemo da model "nepoznatih" predikata može ublažiti nedostatak annotacije koristeći pretkišne ugrađenje. Izvodimo eksperimente s različitim vrstama ugrađenja uključujući one koji su proizvedeni dubokim jezičkim modelima: rečenica 2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, i pokazujemo da su ugrađenja proizvedena dubokim jezičkim modelima nadmažena klasičnim plitkom ugrađenja za klasifikaciju argumenta i "poznatih" i "nepoznatih" predikata.', 'da': "Vi bygger den første fulde pipeline til semantisk rollemærkning af russiske tekster. Pipeline implementerer prædikat identifikation, argumentekstraktion, argumentklassificering (mærkning) og global scoring via heltalslineær programmering. Vi træner overvågede neurale netværksmodeller til argumentklassificering ved hjælp af russisk semantisk annotated corpus - FrameBank. Vi bemærker dog, at denne ressource kun giver noteringer til et meget begrænset sæt prædikater. Vi bekæmper problemet med mangel på noteringer ved at indføre to modeller, der er afhængige af forskellige sæt funktioner: en for 'kendte' prædikater, der er til stede i træningssættet, og en for 'ukendte' prædikater, der ikke er til stede. Vi viser, at modellen for 'ukendte' prædikater kan lindre manglen på annotation ved at bruge forudtrænede indlejringer. Vi udfører eksperimenter med forskellige typer af indlejringer, herunder dem, der genereres af dybt foruddannede sprogmodeller: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, og viser, at indlejringer genereret af dybt foruddannede sprogmodeller er bedre end klassiske overfladiske indlejringer til argumentklassificering af både 'kendte' og 'ukendte' prædikater.", 'id': "We build the first full pipeline for semantic role labelling of Russian texts.  The pipeline implements predicate identification, argument extraction, argument classification (labeling), and global scoring via integer linear programming.  We train supervised neural network models for argument classification using Russian semantically annotated corpus - FrameBank.  Namun, kami menyadari bahwa sumber daya ini menyediakan anotasi hanya untuk set yang sangat terbatas predikat. We combat the problem of annotation scarcity by introducing two models that rely on different sets of features: one for 'known' predicates that are present in the training set and one for 'unknown' predicates that are not.  Kami menunjukkan bahwa model untuk predikat 'tidak diketahui' dapat mengurangi kekurangan anotasi dengan menggunakan embedding terlatih. Kami melakukan eksperimen dengan berbagai jenis penerbangan termasuk yang dihasilkan oleh model bahasa yang dilatih sebelumnya: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, dan menunjukkan bahwa penerbangan yang dihasilkan oleh model bahasa yang dilatih sebelumnya lebih tinggi dari penerbangan yang rendah klasik untuk klasifikasi argumen kedua predikat 'dikenal' dan 'tidak dikenal'.", 'de': 'Wir bauen die erste vollständige Pipeline für die semantische Rollenkennzeichnung russischer Texte. Die Pipeline implementiert Prädikatidentifikation, Argumentextraktion, Argumentklassifizierung (Beschriftung) und globale Scoring mittels ganzzahliger linearer Programmierung. Wir trainieren überwachte neuronale Netzwerkmodelle für die Argumentklassifikation mit Hilfe des russischen semantisch annotierten Korpuss in FrameBank. Wir stellen jedoch fest, dass diese Ressource Anmerkungen nur für eine sehr begrenzte Menge von Prädikaten bereitstellt. Wir bekämpfen das Problem der Annotationsknappheit, indem wir zwei Modelle einführen, die auf verschiedenen Merkmalen basieren: eines für "bekannte" Prädikate, die im Trainingsset vorhanden sind, und eines für "unbekannte" Prädikate, die es nicht gibt. Wir zeigen, dass das Modell für \'unbekannte\' Prädikate den Mangel an Annotation durch die Verwendung von vorgetrainierten Einbettungen lindern kann. Wir führen Experimente mit verschiedenen Arten von Einbettungen durch, einschließlich derer, die durch tief prätrainierte Sprachmodelle generiert werden: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, und zeigen, dass Einbettungen, die durch tief prätrainierte Sprachmodelle generiert werden, klassischen flachen Einbettungen für die Argumentklassifizierung sowohl von \'bekannten\' als auch von \'unbekannten\' Prädikaten überlegen sind.', 'ko': "우리는 첫 번째 완전한 러시아어 텍스트의 의미 역할 표시 파이프라인을 구축했다.이 파이프는 정수선형 계획을 통해 술어 식별, 파라미터 추출, 파라미터 분류(표기)와 전역 평점을 실현한다.우리는 러시아어 의미 표기 어료 라이브러리 프레임워크 라이브러리로 신경 네트워크 모델을 훈련하여 논점 분류를 한다.그러나, 우리는 이 자원이 매우 제한된 술어 그룹에 대한 주석만을 제공할 뿐이라는 것을 알아차렸다.우리는 서로 다른 특징집에 의존하는 두 가지 모델을 도입하여 주석이 희소한 문제를 해결한다. 하나는 집중적으로 존재하는'기지'술어를 훈련하는 데 사용되고, 다른 하나는 존재하지 않는'미지'술어를 사용하는 것이다.우리는 '미지의' 술어의 모형은 미리 훈련된 삽입을 사용하여 주석의 부족함을 완화시킬 수 있음을 나타낸다.우리는 각종 유형의 삽입에 대해 실험을 실시했는데 깊이예훈련 언어모델로 생성된 삽입:word2vec,FastText,ELMo,BERT를 포함한다. 그 결과'기지'와'미지'술어의 매개 변수 분류에 있어 깊이예훈련 언어모델로 생성된 삽입은 고전적인 얕은 삽입보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.", 'tr': "Biz Rus metinlerin semantik roli etiketlemek üçin ilkinji doly pipelini inşa etdik. pipeline öň bellenen kimligi, argüment gaýşartma, argüment klasifikasyny (etiketleme), we dünýädçe scoring hat çizgi programlamak vasitynda işleýär. Biz özümiz Russiýa semantik duýgaçylyk corpus - FrameBank ullanýan argüm klasifikasy üçin gözlenen neural şebeke modellerini öwredýäris. Ýöne biz bu çeşme diňe mahsus predikat täblisaňa duýdurýar. Biz nusgasyzlyk kynçylyklaryň meselesini çykyp, beýleki özelliklere ynanýan iki nusga çykaryp çykaryp çykýarys: biri bilinen predikat üçin okuwçylyk düzeninde bolan we biri bilinmeyen predikat üçin. Biz 'bilinmeyen' ön namaýyşlaryň nusgasyny pretrained girişmeleri ulanyp hasaplamagy üçin azaltyp bileris. Biz görnüş görnüş dili modelleri tarapyndan döredilen örnekler bilen üpjün edýäris. word2vec, FastText, ELMo", 'fa': 'ما اولین لوله کامل برای برچسب نقش semantic از متن روسیه ساختیم. خط لوله شناسایی پیش\u200cفرض، استخراج arguments, گروه\u200cبندی arguments (برچسب) و گروه\u200cبندی جهانی با طریق برنامه\u200cبندی خط\u200cبندی کل عملکرد می\u200cکند. ما مدل\u200cهای شبکه عصبی را تمرین می\u200cکنیم که با استفاده از شرکت\u200cهای سنتی\u200cشناسی روسیه\u200cایم، فرم بانک، مدل\u200cهای شبکه عصبی را بررسی می\u200cکنیم. ولی ما یاد می\u200cگیریم که این منابع فقط برای یک مجموعه بسیار محدود از پیشدیکات توضیح می\u200cدهد. ما با معرفی از دو مدل که بر مجموعه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای مختلف استفاده می\u200cکنند با مشکل کمی آگاهی مبارزه می\u200cکنیم: یکی برای مجموعه\u200cهای معرفی که در مجموعه آموزش هستند و یکی برای مجموعه\u200cهای معرفی نیستند. ما نشان می\u200cدهیم که مدل پیشگویان "ناشناخته" می\u200cتواند با استفاده از انجمن\u200cهای پیشگویان کمتر کند. ما آزمایش\u200cهایی را با نوع مختلف پیوند\u200cبندی انجام می\u200cدهیم، شامل آن\u200cها که توسط مدل\u200cهای زبان\u200cهای عمیق پیش\u200cبندی شده\u200cاند: word2vec، FastText, ELMo, BERT، و نشان می\u200cدهیم که پیوند\u200cبندی\u200cهایی که توسط مدل\u200cهای زبان\u200cهای عمیق پیش\u200cبندی\u200cشده\u200cاند بیشتر از پیوند\u200cبندی\u200cهای کوچک کلاسیک برای گروهی', 'af': "Ons bou die eerste volle pyplyn vir semantiese roletiketting van Russiese teks. Die pyplyn implementeer voordieke identifikasie, argument uitpakking, argument klasifikasie (etiket) en globale skaring deur heelgetal lineêre program. Ons tref superviseerde neuralnetwerk modele vir argument klasifikasie deur Russiese semantiese annotated corpus - FrameBank te gebruik. Maar ons nota dat hierdie hulpbron slegs aan 'n baie beperkte stel van predikate verskaf. Ons het die probleem van annotasie skande geveg deur twee modele te introduseer wat op verskillende stelle van funksies vertrou: een vir 'bekende' predikate wat in die onderwerp stel is, en een vir 'onbekende' predikate wat nie is nie. Ons wys dat die model vir 'onbekende' vooraflikte kan alleviaat die ontbreek van annotasie deur te gebruik vooraf inbêring. Ons uitvoer eksperimente met verskillende tipes inbêding insluitend die wat genereer word deur diep pretreënde taal modele: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, en wys dat inbêdinge genereer deur diep pretreënde taal modele is superior na klassieke slag inbêdinge vir argument klassifikasie van beide 'bekende' en 'onbekende' predikaate.", 'am': "የራስኛ ጽሑፎች ማሳየት የመጀመሪያውን ሙሉ ፖሊስ እናደርጋለን፡፡ አቀማመጥ We train supervised neural network models for argument classification using Russian semantically annotated corpus - FrameBank.  ነገር ግን ይህ ሰብዓት በተለጠፈ ጉዳይ ብቻ ነው ብለን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በሁለት ዓይነቶች ላይ የሚታመኑ ሁለት ዓይነቶችን በመፍጠር ላይ የሚታመኑ የድህነትን ጉዳይ እናስጨንቃለን፤ አንዱ ለትምህርት ግንኙነት የሚታወቀው እና አንዱን ለማይታወቅ ‘ያልታወቀ’ ለባይታወቀው ግንኙነት እና አንዱን ለማይታወቅ’ አካባቢ ነው፡፡ 'ያልታወቀ' አካባቢዎች የሞዴል አካባቢዎች በመጠቀም የሚጎድለውን አቃውሞ ማቅረብ እንዲችል እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች ውስጥ በተለየ ልዩ ልዩ ዓይነት የደረሰውን ፈተና እናደርጋለን፡፡ word2vec፣ FastText፣ ELMo፣ BERT እና በጥልቅ በተመሳሳይ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች ለሁለቱም ‘የታወቀ’ እና ‘ያልታወቀ’ በተለየ ግንኙነት ከክላሲካዊ ጥቁር አካባቢዎች የበለጠ መሆኑን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡", 'hy': 'We build the first full pipeline for semantic role labelling of Russian texts.  Կոռուցվածքը իրականացնում է նախագծված հայտնաբերությունը, բանավեճերի վերացումը, բանավեճերի դասակարգումը (պիտակում) և գլոբալ գնահատականը ողջ գծային ծրագրավորումների միջոցով: Մենք վարժեցնում ենք վերահսկված նյարդային ցանցի մոդելներ բանավեճերի դասակարգման համար, օգտագործելով Ռուսաստանի սեմանտիկապես նշումնավորված կորպուս՝ ՖրամեԲանկ: Այնուամենայնիվ, մենք նկատում ենք, որ այս ռեսուրսը նշումներ է տալիս միայն շատ սահմանափակ հատվածների համար: Մենք պայքարում ենք annoտացիայի բացակայության խնդիրը ներկայացնելով երկու մոդել, որոնք հիմնված են տարբեր հատկանիշների բազմաթիվ. մեկը "հայտնի" նախադասությունների համար, որոնք ներկա են մարզի համակարգում, իսկ մյուսը "անհայտ" նախադասությունների համար, որոնք չեն Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ "անհայտ" նախադասությունների մոդելը կարող է նվազեցնել նշումների բացակայությունը, օգտագործելով նախապատրաստված ներդրումներ: Մենք փորձեր ենք կատարում տարբեր տեսակի ներդրումների հետ, ներառյալ այն, որոնք ստեղծվել են խորը նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելների միջոցով. Word2vec, արագ տեքստ, ELMo, BER, և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ներդրումները, որոնք ստեղծվել են խորը նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելների միջոցով, գերազանցում են դասական մակերեսային ներդր', 'az': 'Biz Rus metinlərin semantik rolünü etiketləmək üçün ilk dolu pipeline inşa edirik. Pipçil öndəkili tanıdırma, argumenti çıxartma, argumenti klasifikasyonu (etiketləmə) və qlobal müəyyən edilmə müddəti linear programlama vasitəsilə istifadə edir. Biz Rus semantik məlumatlı korpus - FrameBank vasitəsilə arqvanlıq klasifikasyonu üçün nöral ağ modellərini təhsil edirik. Ancaq biz bu çox sınırlı bir dəstə predikatlara bildiririk. Biz müxtəlif mövqelərə təvəkkül edən iki modeli təşkil edirik: birinin "bilinmiş" predikatlarına və birinin "bilinmiş" predikatlarına və olmayan "bilinmədən" predikatlarına. Biz "bilinmədən" predikatların modelinin təkrarlanmasını istifadə edərək təkrarlanmasını asanlaşdıra bilər. Biz çeşitli məsələlər ilə müxtəlif inbing modelləri ilə təşviq edirik: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, və göstəririk ki, dərin önünlü dil modelləri təşviq edilmiş inbinglər hər ikisinin "bilinmiş" və "bilinmiş" predikatların arqüd klasik çəkilməsi üçün klasik çəkilmiş inbinglərdən daha üstün olduğunu göstərir.', 'bn': "আমরা রাশিয়ান টেক্সটের লেবেলিং এর জন্য প্রথম পাইপেলাইন তৈরি করি। পাইপেলাইন প্রোগ্রামের মাধ্যমে পূর্বপূর্ণ পরিচয়পত্র, যুক্তি বের করা, যুক্তি বিভাগ (লেবেলিং) এবং বিশ্ব স্কোরিং ব্যবহার রাশিয়ার সেম্বান্তিক ভাবে বিরক্তিকর কোর্পাস ব্যবহার করে আমরা নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ দেই। তবে আমরা লক্ষ্য করি যে এই সম্পদ শুধুমাত্র একটি সীমিত বিভিন্ন সংখ্যাগুলোর জন্য বিরক্তি প্রদান করে। বিভিন্ন ধরনের বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর নির্ভর করে আমরা দুটি মডেলের সাথে বিভিন্ন ধরনের বৈশিষ্ট্য নির্ভর করে বিভিন্ন সমস্যার সমস্যার বিরুদ্ধে যুদ্ধ করি: একট আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে 'অজানা' পূর্ববর্তীদের মডেল ব্যবহার করে অভাব হারিয়ে দিতে পারে। আমরা বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন ভাষার মডেল দিয়ে বিভিন্ন পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা করি যার মধ্যে রয়েছে গভীর ভাষার মডেল: ওয়ার্ড২ভেক, ফাস্ট ট টেক্সট, এলমো এবং বিএরটি। আর দেখাচ্ছি যে গভীর ভাষার মডেল দ্বারা তৈ", 'bs': 'Napravili smo prvu punu cijev za semantičku ulogu označavanja ruskih tekstova. Cijev provodi predikatnu identifikaciju, ekstrakciju argumenta, klasifikaciju argumenta (etiketiranje) i globalnu skretanje putem cijelog linearnog programiranja. Treniramo nadzorne modele neuralne mreže za klasifikaciju argumenta koristeći ruski semantički annotirani korpus - FrameBank. Međutim, primećujemo da ovaj resurs pruža annotacije samo vrlo ograničenoj skupini predikata. Borimo se protiv problema nedostatka annotacije uvođenjem dva modela koji se oslanjaju na različite sete karakteristika: jedan za \'poznate\' predikate koji su prisutni u setu obuke i jedan za \'nepoznate\' predikate koji nisu. Pokazujemo da model "nepoznatih" predikata može ublažiti nedostatak annotacije koristeći pretkišne ugrađenje. Izvodimo eksperimente sa različitim vrstama ugrađenja uključujući one koji su stvoreni dubokim jezičkim modelima: rečenica 2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, i pokazujemo da su ugrađenja proizvođena dubokim jezičkim modelima nadmažena klasičnim plitkom ugrađenja za klasifikaciju argumenta i "poznatih" i "nepoznatih" predikata.', 'bg': 'Изграждаме първия пълен канал за семантично етикетиране на ролята на руските текстове. Тръбопроводът внедрява идентификация на предикатите, извличане на аргументи, класификация на аргументите (етикетиране) и глобално оценяване чрез цялостно линейно програмиране. Обучаваме модели на невронни мрежи за класификация на аргументи, използвайки руски семантично анотиран корпус - РамБанк. Въпреки това, отбелязваме, че този ресурс предоставя анотации само на много ограничен набор от предикати. Борим се с проблема с недостига на анотация чрез въвеждане на два модела, които разчитат на различни набори от функции: един за "известни" предикати, които присъстват в тренировъчния набор и един за "неизвестни" предикати, които не са. Показваме, че моделът за "неизвестни" предикати може да облекчи липсата на анотация чрез използване на предварително тренирани вграждания. Извършваме експерименти с различни видове вграждания, включително тези, генерирани от дълбоко предварително тренирани езикови модели и показваме, че вгражданията, генерирани от дълбоко предварително тренирани езикови модели, са по-добри от класическите плитки вграждания за аргументна класификация както на "известни", така и на "неизвестни" предикати.', 'ca': 'Construim el primer tub complet per etiquetar el paper semàntic dels textos russos. El pipeline implementa identificació predicata, extracció d\'arguments, classificació d\'arguments i puntuació global a través de programació linear integer. Ensenyem models de xarxa neural supervisionats per a classificar arguments utilitzant el corpus senànticament anotat russo - FrameBank. Tot i així, observem que aquest recurso només proporciona anotacions a un conjunt molt limitat de predicats. We combat the problem of annotation scarcity by introducing two models that rely on different sets of features: one for \'known\' predicates that are present in the training set and one for \'unknown\' predicates that are not.  Mostrem que el model de predicats "desconeguts" pot aliviar la falta d\'anotació utilitzant embediments pré-entrenats. Fem experiments amb diversos tipus d\'incorporacions, incloent les generades per models de llenguatge profundament pré-entrenats: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, i demostram que les incorporacions generades per models de llenguatge profundament pré-entrenats són superiors a les incorporacions clàssiques baixes per classificar arguments tant de predicats \'coneguts\' com \'desconeguts\'.', 'cs': 'Vytváříme první plný potrubí pro sémantické označování rolí ruských textů. Pipeline implementuje identifikaci predikátů, extrakci argumentů, klasifikaci argumentů (značení) a globální skórování pomocí celočíselného lineárního programování. Trénujeme modely supervisovaných neuronových sítí pro klasifikaci argumentů pomocí ruského sémanticky anotovaného korpusu v FrameBank. Poznamenáváme však, že tento zdroj poskytuje anotace pouze pro velmi omezenou sadu predikátů. Problém nedostatku anotací bojujeme zavedením dvou modelů, které se opírají o různé sady funkcí: jeden pro "známé" predikáty, které jsou přítomny ve výcvikové sadě a jeden pro "neznámé" predikáty, které nejsou. Ukazujeme, že model "neznámých" predikátů může zmírnit nedostatek anotace pomocí předtrénovaných vložení. Provádíme experimenty s různými typy vložení, včetně těch generovaných hlubokými předtrénovanými jazykovými modely: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, a ukazujeme, že vložení generované hlubokými předtrénovanými jazykovými modely jsou lepší než klasické mělké vložení pro klasifikaci argumentů "známých" i "neznámých" predikátů.', 'sw': "Tunaweza kujenga mistari ya kwanza ya kimapenzi kwa ajili ya jukumu la kimapenzi kwa kutumia maarifa ya Kirusi. Utafiti huu unatekeleza utambulisho wa utambulisho, utoaji wa hoja, usambazaji wa mazungumzo (utambulisho wa mazungumzo), na uvumbuzi wa kimataifa kupitia programu ya msingi kamili. Tunafundisha mifano ya mitandao ya neurali kwa ajili ya kutangaza mazungumzo kwa kutumia makampuni ya Urusi yanayochanganyika kwa kiasi kikubwa - FrameBank. Hata hivyo, tunagundua kuwa rasilimali hii inatoa matatizo tu kwa matatizo madogo. Tunapigana na tatizo la kusikitishwa kwa kuanzisha mifano miwili inayotegemea aina tofauti: moja kwa utabiri wa 'anayejulikana' ambao upo kwenye seti ya mafunzo na moja kwa ajili ya 'isiyo yajua' ambalo halina. Tunaonyesha kuwa mtindo wa utabiri wa 'utambulisho' unaweza kupunguza ukosefu wa taarifa kwa kutumia vifaa vya kudharauliwa. Tunafanya majaribio yenye aina mbalimbali ya matumizi ya lugha ikiwa ni pamoja na zile zilizotengenezwa na mifano ya lugha yenye matumizi ya kina ya kirahisi: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, na tunaonyesha kwamba mapambano yaliyotengenezwa na mifano ya lugha yenye matumizi ya kina yanakuwa bora zaidi ya mapambano ya rangi ya kawaida kwa ajili ya kutangazwa kwa utabiri wa 'unaojulikana' na 'yasiyojulikana'.", 'et': 'Me ehitame esimese täieliku kanali venekeelsete tekstide semantilise rolli märgistamiseks. Torujuhe rakendab predikaatide identifitseerimist, argumentide ekstraheerimist, argumentide klassifitseerimist (märgistamist) ja globaalset skoorimist täisarvulise lineaarse programmeerimise kaudu. Harjutame järelevalvega neurovõrgu mudeleid argumentide klassifitseerimiseks vene semantiliselt annoteeritud korpusega FrameBank. Siiski märgime, et see ressurss pakub annoteeringuid ainult väga piiratud hulgale predikaate. Me võitleme annotatsioonipuuduse probleemiga, tuues kasutusele kaks mudelit, mis tuginevad erinevatele omadustele: üks "tuntud" predikaatidele, mis on olemas treeningkomplektis ja teine "tundmatutele" predikaatidele, mis ei ole. Näitame, et "tundmatute" predikaatide mudel võib leevendada märkuste puudumist, kasutades eeltreenitud manustamist. Me teeme eksperimente erinevat tüüpi manustamistega, sealhulgas sügavate eelkreenitud keelemudelitega: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, ning näitame, et sügavate eelkreenitud keelemudelitega genereeritud manustamised on paremad klassikalistest madalatest manustamistest nii "tuntud" kui ka "tundmatute" predikaatide argumentide klassifitseerimisel.', 'sq': "Ne ndërtojmë tubacionin e parë të plotë për etiketën semantike të teksteve ruse. Tubacioni zbaton identifikimin e predikuar, nxjerrjen e argumenteve, klasifikimin e argumenteve (etiketën) dhe pikëpamjen globale nëpërmjet programimit të plotë linear. Ne trajnojmë modele të mbikqyrur të rrjetit nervor për klasifikimin e argumenteve duke përdorur korpus të anotuar semantikisht Rus - FrameBank. However, we note that this resource provides annotations only to a very limited set of predicates.  Ne luftojmë problemen e mungesës së anotacionit duke paraqitur dy modele që mbështeten në grupe të ndryshme karakteristike: një për predikatat 'të njohura' që janë të pranishme në grupin e stërvitjeve dhe një për predikatat 'të panjohura' që nuk janë. Ne tregojmë se modeli për predikatat 'të panjohura' mund të lehtësojë mungesën e anotacionit duke përdorur përfshirje të parastërvitura. We perform experiments with various types of embeddings including the ones generated by deep pretrained language models: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, and show that embeddings generated by deep pretrained language models are superior to classical shallow embeddings for argument classification of both 'known' and 'unknown' predicates.", 'fi': 'Rakennamme ensimmäisen täyden putken venäläisten tekstien semanttiseen roolimerkintään. Putki toteuttaa predikaattien tunnistuksen, argumenttien uuttamisen, argumenttien luokittelun (merkinnät) ja globaalin pisteytyksen kokonaislukulineaarisen ohjelmoinnin avulla. Harjoittelemme valvottuja hermoverkkomalleja argumenttien luokitteluun käyttäen venäläistä semanttisesti annotoitua korpusta FrameBank. Huomaamme kuitenkin, että tämä resurssi tarjoaa huomautuksia vain hyvin rajalliseen predikaattien joukkoon. Taistelemme huomautusten niukkuuden ongelmaa esittelemällä kaksi mallia, jotka perustuvat erilaisiin ominaisuuksiin: yksi "tunnettuihin" predikaatteihin, jotka ovat läsnä harjoitussarjassa ja toinen "tuntemattomiin" predikaatteihin, jotka eivät ole. Osoitamme, että tuntemattomien predikaattien malli voi lievittää huomautusten puutetta käyttämällä esikoulutettuja upotuksia. Teemme kokeita erityyppisillä upotuksilla, mukaan lukien syvän esikoulutetun kielimallin luomat upotukset: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, ja osoitamme, että syvän esikoulutetun kielimallin luomat upotukset ovat parempia kuin klassiset matalat upotukset argumenttien luokittelussa sekä \'tiedossa\' että \'tuntemattomissa\' predikaateissa.', 'ha': "Tunã samar da farkon pipelin ta cikakka na rubutun rubutun rususi. Piflen na amfani da shiryoyin ayuka na gabatar da bayani, shirin argument, mai fassarar argument (mai lissafa), da shiryoyin kima cikin shirin shiryoyin linje na guda. Tuna kõre misãlai masu tsari na jerin neural wa fassarar argument, da kuma misalin rubutun-FrameBank. Kayya, Munã ganin cẽwa wannan resource yana samar da zargi kawai zuwa wasu mataimaka da aka ƙayyade. We combat the problem of annotation scarcity by introducing two models that rely on different sets of features: one for 'known' predicates that are present in the training set and one for 'unknown' predicates that are not.  Tuna nuna cewa, misalin wa'abun da ba'a sani ba yana iya sauƙaƙara ƙararra da ya yi amfani da bakin filinaiki. Kana tafiyar jarrabãwa da wasu irin da aka buɗe da su cikin misãlai na harshen kwance: word2vc, FastText, ELMo, BERT, kuma Muke nũna da shirin ayuka da aka ƙayyade bakin ayuka masu ƙari da suka fi ƙaranci da fili mai kifi ga fasalin 'da ba'a sani ba'a sani ba.", 'he': 'אנחנו בונים את צינור המלאה הראשון לטיוט תפקיד סמנטי של טקסטים רוסיים. The pipeline implements predicate identification, argument extraction, argument classification (labeling), and global scoring via integer linear programming.  אנחנו מאמנים דוגמנים רשת עצבית מפקחת לטענון ויכוחים באמצעות קורפוס רוסי שנכתב באופן סמנטי - FrameBank. בכל אופן, אנו מבחינים שהמשאב הזה מספק ציונים רק לקבוצה מאוד מוגבלת של קודמות. אנו נלחמים בבעיה של חסר ציונים על ידי להציג שני דוגמנים שמסומכים על קבוצות שונות של תכונות: אחת עבור "ידוע" קודמות הנוכחים בסט האימונים ואחת עבור "ידוע" קודמות שלא. אנו מראים שהמודל למחזורים "לא ידועים" יכול להקל על חוסר הערות על ידי השימוש באמצעות תוספות מלפני אימון. אנו מבצעים ניסויים עם סוגים שונים של תוכניות כולל אלה שנוצרו על ידי דוגמני שפת עמוקים מתאמנים מראש: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, ולהראות שהתוכניות שנוצרו על ידי דוגמני שפת עמוקים מתאמנים מראש הן עדיפות על תוכניות קלאסיות שטחיות להסבירת טיעונים של "ידועים" וגם "לא ידועים".', 'sk': 'Gradimo prvi celoten cevovod za semantično označevanje vlog ruskih besedil. Cevovod izvaja identifikacijo predikatov, ekstrakcijo argumentov, klasifikacijo argumentov (označevanje) in globalno ocenjevanje prek linearnega programiranja celih števil. Usposabljamo nadzorovane modele nevronskih omrežij za klasifikacijo argumentov z ruskim semantično označenim korpusom FrameBank. Vendar pa opozarjamo, da ta vir zagotavlja opombe le za zelo omejen nabor predikatov. Problem pomanjkanja označevanja se borimo z uvedbo dveh modelov, ki temeljita na različnih sklopih značilnosti: enega za "znane" predikate, ki so prisotni v naboru treningov, in enega za "neznane" predikate, ki niso. Pokazali smo, da lahko model za \'neznane\' predikate olajša pomanjkanje opombe z uporabo predtreniranih vdelav. Izvajamo poskuse z različnimi vrstami vdelav, vključno s tistimi, ki jih ustvarijo globoko predtrenirani jezikovni modeli: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, in pokažemo, da so vdelave, ki jih ustvarijo globoko predtrenirani jezikovni modeli, boljše od klasičnih plitvih vdelav za argumentno klasifikacijo tako znanih kot neznanih predikatov.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem perusahaan kanggo ngwala semanti kuwi nggawe Text Rusi. string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Awak dhéwé luwih akeh yösén-nyebuturan netwark model kanggo sawar kelas nggawe Rusi semanti cally anntating Body - frame Line. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé éntuk kesempalahan kanggo nggawe kesempalahan seneng nggawe model iki dadi sing bisa dumateng akeh dumadhi iki: wong dhéwé bakal kelompok \'dipunangé\' sing berarti ning aturan dipunangé awak dhéwé, iki dadi kebutuhan seneng alam sing gak dhéwé. Awak dhéwé ngomong nik \'unbeke\' tapi kelangan seneng gak dhéwé ngerasakno Anyone', 'bo': "ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་སྔོན་ཤོག་བྱང་ཆོས་ཐོག་མའི་རྒྱུད་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། The pipeline implements predicate identification, argument extraction, argument classification (labeling), and global scoring via integer linear programming. We train supervised neural network models for argument classification using Russian semantically annotated corpus - FrameBank. ཡིན་ནའང་། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་ཁུངས་འདིས་སྔོན་གྲངས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་སྟོན་གྱི་ཡོད། འུ་ཚོས་གཞུང་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཆེད་དུ་འཕགས་རིས་བྱུང་བའི་ཚོགས་ཁག་ཅིག We show that the model for 'unknown' predicates can alleviate the lack of annotation by using pretrained embeddings. We perform experiments with various types of embeddings including the ones generated by deep pretrained language models: word2vec, FastText, ELMo, BERT, and show that embeddings generated by deep pretrained language models are superior to classical shallow embeddings for argument classification of both 'known' and 'unknown' predicates."}
{'en': 'The Impact of Semantic Linguistic Features in Relation Extraction : A Logical Relational Learning Approach', 'pt': 'O Impacto dos Recursos Lingüísticos Semânticos na Extração de Relações: Uma Abordagem Lógica de Aprendizagem Relacional', 'es': 'El impacto de las características lingüísticas semánticas en la extracción de relaciones: un enfoque lógico de aprendizaje relacional', 'ar': 'تأثير السمات اللغوية الدلالية في استخراج العلاقة: منهج تعليمي منطقي علائقي', 'fr': "L'impact des caractéristiques linguistiques sémantiques dans l'extraction de relations\xa0: une approche d'apprentissage relationnel logique", 'hi': 'संबंध निष्कर्षण में शब्दार्थ भाषाई विशेषताओं का प्रभाव: एक तार्किक संबंधपरक सीखने का दृष्टिकोण', 'ja': '関係抽出におけるセマンティック言語学的特徴の影響：論理的関係学習アプローチ', 'zh': '语义言语特征,一逻辑关系学术', 'ru': 'Влияние семантических лингвистических особенностей в извлечении отношений: логический подход к реляционному обучению', 'ga': 'Tionchar Gnéithe Séimeantacha Teangeolaíocha in Eastóscadh Gaol: Cur Chuige Foghlama Coibhneasta Loighciúil', 'ka': 'ჟვმანრთფვჟკთ ლთნდგთჟრთფვჟკთ ტვკრსპაუთ ნა გპყჱკთ ჲრ გპყჱკთრვ: ლჲდთფვჟკთ გპყჱკთ ოპთჟლვე', 'hu': 'A szemantikus nyelvi jellemzők hatása a kapcsolatkivonásban: logikai relatív tanulási megközelítés', 'el': 'Η επίδραση των σημαντικών γλωσσικών χαρακτηριστικών στην εξαγωγή σχέσεων: Μια λογική προσέγγιση σχεσιακής μάθησης', 'it': "L'impatto delle caratteristiche linguistiche semantiche nell'estrazione delle relazioni: un approccio logico di apprendimento relazionale", 'kk': 'Қатыстарды тарқату үшін семантикалық лингвистикалық мүмкіндіктерінің нәтижесі: Логикалық қатынастық оқыту жағдайы', 'lt': 'Semantinių kalbinių savybių poveikis santykių ekstrahavimui: Loginis santykinio mokymosi metodas', 'mk': 'Влијанието на семантичките јазички карактеристики во екстракцијата на односите: логичен пристап до релативно учење', 'ms': 'Impak Ciri-ciri Bahasa Semantik dalam Ekstraksi Hubungan: pendekatan Belajar Hubungan Logik', 'ml': 'ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്ക് വിശേഷതകളുടെ പ്രഭാവം: ലോഗിക്കല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്', 'mt': 'L-Impatt tal-Karatteristiċi Lingwistiċi Semantiċi fl-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni: Approċċ Relattiv Loġiku', 'mn': 'Хувь холбоотой хамааралтын Semantic Linguistic Features in Relationship Extraction: A Logical Relational Learning Approach', 'no': 'Utviklet av semiantiske linguistiske funksjonar i utpakking av relasjonar: ein logisk relasjonslæringstilnærming', 'pl': 'Wpływ semantycznych cech językowych na ekstrakcję relacji: logiczne podejście do uczenia się relacji', 'sr': 'Učinak semantičkih lingvističkih karakteristika u izvlačenju odnosa: pristup logičkog odnosa učenja', 'ro': 'Impactul caracteristicilor lingvistice semantice în extracția relațiilor: o abordare logică de învățare relațională', 'si': 'The Impact of semantic Linguist Featuries in Reference Extraction: A Logic Referenceal Training approach', 'so': 'Effect of Semantic Linguistic Features in Relation Extraction: A Logical Relational Learning Approach', 'ta': 'தொடர்பு வெளியேறுதலில் செமாண்டிக் கோடுகளின் விளைவு', 'sv': 'Effekten av semantiska språkliga egenskaper i relationsextraktion: En logisk förhållningssätt', 'ur': 'The effect of Semantic Linguistic Features in Relational Extraction: A Logical Relational Learning Approach', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tác động của các đặc trưng ngôn ngữ kỳ lạ trong Lôi kéo tương quan: A-lô-gíc về tương quan học tiếp cận', 'da': 'Virkningen af semantiske sproglige egenskaber i relation ekstraktion: En logisk relationel læringsmetode', 'hr': 'Učinak semantičkih lingvističkih karakteristika u izvlačenju odnosa: pristup logičkog odnosa učenja', 'nl': 'Het effect van semantische taalkundige kenmerken op relatieontwikkeling: een logische relationele leerbenadering', 'bg': 'Влиянието на семантичните лингвистични характеристики в извличането на отношенията: логически подход за относително учене', 'de': 'Der Einfluss semantischer linguistischer Merkmale auf die Beziehungsextraktion: Ein logischer relationaler Lernansatz', 'id': 'Impak Features Semantik Linguistic in Relation Extraction: A Logical Relational Learning Approach', 'fa': 'تاثیر ویژه\u200cهای لینگ\u200cهای سیمانتیک در اخراج رابطه: یک نزدیک یادگیری ارتباط منطقی', 'sw': 'The Impact of Semantic Linguistic Features in Relation Extraction: A Logical Relational Learning Approach', 'ko': '어의 언어 특징이 관계 추출에 미치는 영향: 논리적 관계 학습 방법', 'tr': 'Semantik Dil Görniş Opşenleriniň Etkisi: A Logical Relational Learning Approach', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'The Impact of Semantic Linguistic Features in Relation Extraction: A Logical Relational Learning Approach', 'bn': 'সেম্যান্টিক লিঙ্গুইজিস্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর প্রভাব: একটি লোগিকাল সম্পর্কিত সম্পর্ক শিক্ষা যোগাযোগ', 'az': 'İlişkilərin əlaqəsində Semantik Linguistik Öyrənməsi təsiri: Lojik İlişkil Öyrənmə Yaxınlığı', 'bs': 'Učinak semantičkih lingvističkih karakteristika u izvlačenju odnosa: pristup logičkog odnosa učenja', 'ca': "L'impacte de les característiques lingüístiques semàntiques en l'extracció de relacions: un enfocament d'aprenentatge relacional lògic", 'cs': 'Vliv sémantických jazykových prvků na extrakci vztahů: logický přístup vztahového učení', 'et': 'Semantiliste keeleliste omaduste mõju suhete ekstraheerimisel: loogiline suhteline õppimine lähenemisviis', 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկությունների ազդեցությունը հարաբերությունների արտահանման մեջ.', 'fi': 'Semanttisten kielellisten ominaisuuksien vaikutus suhteenleikkaukseen: looginen suhteellinen oppimistapa', 'jv': 'Ipake Owe Linguistik Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan Relahan: A logical Relative Learning Method', 'sk': 'Vpliv semantičnih jezikovnih značilnosti pri izvlečevanju odnosov: logični relativni pristop učenja', 'ha': 'The Impact of Semantic Linguistic Features in Relation Extraction: A Logical Relational Learning Approach', 'he': 'השפעה של תכונות שפתיות סמנטיות בחזרת יחסים: גישה לוגית יחסית', 'bo': 'The Impact of Semantic Linguistic Features in Relation Extraction: A Logical Relational Learning Approach'}
{'en': 'Relation Extraction (RE) consists in detecting and classifying semantic relations between entities in a sentence. The vast majority of the state-of-the-art RE systems relies on morphosyntactic features and supervised machine learning algorithms. This paper tries to answer important questions concerning both the impact of semantic based features, and the integration of external linguistic knowledge resources on RE performance. For that, a RE system based on a logical and relational learning algorithm was used and evaluated on three reference datasets from two distinct domains. The yielded results confirm that the classifiers induced using the proposed richer feature set outperformed the classifiers built with morphosyntactic features in average 4 % (F1-measure).', 'ar': 'يتكون استخراج العلاقة (RE) من اكتشاف وتصنيف العلاقات الدلالية بين الكيانات في جملة. تعتمد الغالبية العظمى من أنظمة الطاقة المتجددة الحديثة على الميزات الشكلية وخوارزميات التعلم الآلي الخاضعة للإشراف. تحاول هذه الورقة الإجابة على الأسئلة المهمة المتعلقة بكل من تأثير السمات القائمة على الدلالات ، وتكامل مصادر المعرفة اللغوية الخارجية على أداء الطاقة المتجددة. لذلك ، تم استخدام نظام RE يعتمد على خوارزمية تعلم منطقية وعلائقية وتقييمه على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات مرجعية من مجالين مختلفين. تؤكد النتائج التي تم الحصول عليها أن المصنفات المستحثة باستخدام الميزة الأكثر ثراءً المقترحة قد تفوقت على المصنفات المبنية بميزات مورفوسينتيكتيك في متوسط 4٪ (مقياس F1).', 'fr': "L'extraction de relation (RE) consiste à détecter et à classer les relations sémantiques entre les entités d'une phrase. La grande majorité des systèmes RE de pointe reposent sur des fonctionnalités morphosyntaxiques et des algorithmes d'apprentissage automatique supervisés. Cet article tente de répondre à des questions importantes concernant à la fois l'impact des caractéristiques sémantiques et l'intégration de ressources de connaissances linguistiques externes sur la performance des RE. Pour cela, un système RE basé sur un algorithme d'apprentissage logique et relationnel a été utilisé et évalué sur trois ensembles de données de référence provenant de deux domaines distincts. Les résultats obtenus confirment que les classificateurs induits à l'aide de l'ensemble de caractéristiques plus riche proposé ont surperformé les classificateurs construits avec des caractéristiques morphosyntaxiques en moyenne de 4\xa0% (mesure F1).", 'es': 'La extracción de relaciones (RE) consiste en detectar y clasificar las relaciones semánticas entre entidades en una oración. La gran mayoría de los sistemas de RE de última generación se basan en características morfosintácticas y algoritmos de aprendizaje automático supervisados. Este artículo trata de responder a preguntas importantes sobre el impacto de las características basadas en la semántica y la integración de recursos de conocimiento lingüístico externo en el rendimiento de las ER. Para ello, se utilizó un sistema de RE basado en un algoritmo de aprendizaje lógico y relacional y se evaluó en tres conjuntos de datos de referencia de dos dominios distintos. Los resultados obtenidos confirman que los clasificadores inducidos utilizando el conjunto de características más rico propuesto superaron a los clasificadores construidos con características morfosintácticas en promedio un 4% (medida F1).', 'pt': 'A Extração de Relações (RE) consiste em detectar e classificar relações semânticas entre entidades em uma frase. A grande maioria dos sistemas de RE de última geração depende de recursos morfossintáticos e algoritmos de aprendizado de máquina supervisionados. Este artigo tenta responder questões importantes sobre o impacto de recursos baseados em semântica e a integração de recursos externos de conhecimento linguístico no desempenho de ER. Para isso, um sistema de ER baseado em um algoritmo de aprendizado lógico e relacional foi utilizado e avaliado em três conjuntos de dados de referência de dois domínios distintos. Os resultados obtidos confirmam que os classificadores induzidos usando o conjunto de características mais rico proposto superaram os classificadores construídos com características morfossintáticas em média 4% (medida F1).', 'zh': '取(RE)检类语义。 绝大多数最先进者RE皆依形句法特徵督机器学算法。 对曰:语义之所加,言语之所资整合RE性之要也。 用逻辑、算法RE统,并于两域三参数据集上评估。 所生实,用所出尤丰集诱导之类器于均4%(F1测)优于用形句法特徵构造之分类器。', 'ja': '関係抽出（ RE ）は、文のエンティティ間の意味関係を検出して分類することで構成されます。最先端のREシステムの大部分は、モルホシンタクティック機能と監視された機械学習アルゴリズムに依存しています。本稿では、意味ベースの特徴の影響と、REパフォーマンスに対する外部言語知識リソースの統合の両方に関する重要な質問に答えようとする。そのために、論理的および関係的学習アルゴリズムに基づくREシステムを使用し、2つの異なるドメインからの3つの参照データセットで評価した。得られた結果は、提案されたより豊富な特徴セットを使用して誘導された分類子が、平均４ ％ （ Ｆ １測定）で形態構築特徴で構築された分類子よりも優れていることを確認した。', 'hi': 'संबंध निष्कर्षण (आरई) में एक वाक्य में संस्थाओं के बीच शब्दार्थ संबंधों का पता लगाने और वर्गीकृत करने में शामिल है। अत्याधुनिक आरई प्रणालियों का विशाल बहुमत मोर्फोसिंटैक्टिक सुविधाओं और पर्यवेक्षित मशीन लर्निंग एल्गोरिदम पर निर्भर करता है। यह पेपर शब्दार्थ आधारित विशेषताओं के प्रभाव, और आरई प्रदर्शन पर बाहरी भाषाई ज्ञान संसाधनों के एकीकरण दोनों से संबंधित महत्वपूर्ण सवालों के जवाब देने की कोशिश करता है। इसके लिए, एक तार्किक और संबंधपरक सीखने के एल्गोरिथ्म पर आधारित एक आरई सिस्टम का उपयोग किया गया था और दो अलग-अलग डोमेन से तीन संदर्भ डेटासेट पर मूल्यांकन किया गया था। उपज परिणाम इस बात की पुष्टि करते हैं कि प्रस्तावित अमीर सुविधा सेट का उपयोग करके प्रेरित क्लासिफायरों ने औसत 4% (एफ 1-माप) में मोरफोसिंटैक्टिक सुविधाओं के साथ निर्मित क्लासिफायरों को पछाड़ दिया।', 'ru': 'Извлечение отношений (RE) заключается в обнаружении и классификации семантических отношений между сущностями в предложении. Подавляющее большинство современных РЭ систем опирается на морфосинтаксические особенности и контролируемые алгоритмы машинного обучения. В настоящем документе предпринята попытка ответить на важные вопросы, касающиеся как влияния семантических особенностей, так и интеграции внешних ресурсов лингвистических знаний на эффективность РЭ. Для этого использовали систему RE, основанную на логическом и реляционном алгоритме обучения, и оценивали на трех эталонных наборах данных из двух различных областей. Полученные результаты подтверждают, что классификаторы, индуцированные с использованием предлагаемого более богатого набора признаков, превосходили классификаторы, построенные с морфосинтаксическими признаками, в среднем на 4% (измерение F1).', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i Eastóscadh Caidrimh (RE) caidreamh séimeantach idir aonáin i bpianbhreith a bhrath agus a rangú. Braitheann formhór mór na gcóras RE nua-aimseartha ar ghnéithe morphosyntactic agus halgartaim meaisínfhoghlama maoirsithe. Déanann an páipéar seo iarracht ceisteanna tábhachtacha a fhreagairt maidir le tionchar gnéithe séimeantach-bhunaithe, agus comhtháthú acmhainní seachtracha eolais teanga ar fheidhmíocht RE. Chuige sin, úsáideadh córas RE bunaithe ar algartam foghlama loighciúil agus gaolmhar agus rinneadh é a mheas ar thrí thacar sonraí tagartha ó dhá fhearann ar leith. Deimhníonn na torthaí a fuarthas gur sháraigh na haicmitheoirí a tharlódh trí úsáid a bhaint as an ngné níos saibhre atá beartaithe ná na haicmitheoirí a tógadh le gnéithe morphosyntactic i meán 4% (tomhas F1).', 'ka': 'Relative Extraction (RE) consists in detecting and classifying semantic relations between entities in a sentence. მნიშვნელოვანი RE სისტემების უფრო დიდი მეტი მოპორფსინტაქტიური ფუნქციებზე და მაქინის სწავლების ალდორიტებზე დარწმუნდება. ეს დოკუმენტი მოცდილობს გასაგებოს მნიშვნელოვანი კითხვების შესახებ, რომლებიც შამანტიკური ფუნქციების შესახებ და გარეშე ენგურისტიკური ცნობიერების რესურ ამიტომ, RE სისტემა ლოგიკური და რედაციონალური სწავლების ალგორიტიმზე გამოყენებულია და გამოყენებულია სამი რედაციური მონაცემების შესახებ ორი განსხვავებული დიომენზე. მივიღებული წარმოდგენები დარწმუნდება, რომ კლასიფიკაციები გამოყენებული უფრო დიდი ფუნქციების გამოყენებას გავაკეთებენ კლასიფიკაციები, რომლებიც მოპროსინტაქტიური ფუნქციებით გან', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή σχέσεων συνίσταται στην ανίχνευση και ταξινόμηση σημασιολογικών σχέσεων μεταξύ οντοτήτων σε μια πρόταση. Η συντριπτική πλειοψηφία των υπερσύγχρονων συστημάτων βασίζεται σε μορφοσυντακτικά χαρακτηριστικά και εποπτευόμενους αλγόριθμους μηχανικής μάθησης. Η παρούσα εργασία επιχειρεί να απαντήσει σε σημαντικά ερωτήματα τόσο σχετικά με τον αντίκτυπο των σημασιολογικών χαρακτηριστικών όσο και με την ενσωμάτωση εξωτερικών γλωσσικών γνώσεων στην απόδοση ΑΠ. Για το σκοπό αυτό, χρησιμοποιήθηκε ένα σύστημα βασισμένο σε έναν αλγόριθμο λογικής και σχετικής μάθησης και αξιολογήθηκε σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς από δύο διαφορετικούς τομείς. Τα αποτελέσματα που προκύπτουν επιβεβαιώνουν ότι οι ταξινομητές που προκαλούνται με τη χρήση του προτεινόμενου πλουσιότερου συνόλου χαρακτηριστικών ξεπερνούν τους ταξινομητές που κατασκευάζονται με μορφοσυντακτικά χαρακτηριστικά σε μέσο όρο 4% (μέτρο F1).', 'hu': 'A Relation Extraction (RE) az entitások közötti szemantikai kapcsolatok felismerését és osztályozását jelenti egy mondatban. A korszerű RE rendszerek túlnyomó többsége morfoszintatikus funkciókra és felügyelt gépi tanulási algoritmusokra támaszkodik. A tanulmány fontos kérdésekre próbál válaszolni mind a szemantikai jellemzők hatására, mind a külső nyelvtudási erőforrások integrálására vonatkozóan. Ehhez egy logikai és relációs tanulási algoritmuson alapuló RE rendszert használtunk és értékeltük két különböző tartományból származó három referencia adatkészleten. A kapott eredmények megerősítik, hogy a javasolt gazdagabb tulajdonságkészlet alkalmazásával indukált osztályozók átlagosan 4%-ban túlléptek a morfoszintatikus tulajdonságokkal épített osztályozókat.', 'it': "Relation Extraction (RE) consiste nel rilevare e classificare le relazioni semantiche tra entità in una frase. La stragrande maggioranza dei sistemi RE all'avanguardia si basa su caratteristiche morfosintattiche e algoritmi di apprendimento automatico supervisionati. Questo articolo cerca di rispondere a domande importanti riguardanti sia l'impatto delle caratteristiche semantiche basate, sia l'integrazione di risorse linguistiche esterne sulle prestazioni RE. Per questo, un sistema RE basato su un algoritmo di apprendimento logico e relazionale è stato utilizzato e valutato su tre set di dati di riferimento provenienti da due domini distinti. I risultati ottenuti confermano che i classificatori indotti utilizzando il set di funzionalità più ricco proposto hanno superato in media i classificatori costruiti con caratteristiche morfosintattiche del 4% (misura F1).", 'kk': 'Қатынасын тарқату (RE) сұлбалар арасындағы семантикалық қатынасын табу мен классификациялау үшін тұрады. Көпшілігінің көпшілігі RE жүйелерінің морфосинтактикалық қасиеттеріне және машиналық оқыту алгоритмдеріне тәуелді. Бұл қағаз Семантикалық негіздеген мүмкіндіктердің әсерін және сыртқы лингвистикалық білім ресурстарының біріктіру үшін маңызды сұрақтарды жауап беруге әрекет береді. Бұл үшін логикалық және қатынастық оқыту алгоритміне негізделген RE жүйесі екі түрлі доменден үш сілтеме деректер қорларында қолданылады. Келтірілген нәтижелер таңдалған баяндау мүмкіндіктерінің орташа 4% (F1- өлшемі) үшін морфосинтактикалық мүмкіндіктермен құрылған классификацияларының орташа қасиеттеріне көмектесетін бол', 'ms': 'Ekstraksi Hubungan (RE) terdiri dalam mengesan dan mengklasifikasi hubungan semantik diantara entiti dalam kalimat. Kebanyakan sistem RE state-of-the-art bergantung pada ciri-ciri morfosintaktik dan algoritma pembelajaran mesin yang diawasi. Kertas ini cuba menjawab soalan penting yang berkaitan dengan kesan fitur berasaskan semantik, dan integrasi sumber pengetahuan bahasa luaran pada prestasi RE. Untuk itu, sistem RE berdasarkan algoritma pembelajaran logik dan hubungan digunakan dan diteliti pada tiga set data rujukan dari dua domain yang berbeza. Keputusan yang diberikan mengesahkan bahawa pengklasifikasi yang disebabkan menggunakan fitur yang lebih kaya yang diusulkan ditetapkan melebihi pengklasifikasi yang dibina dengan fitur morfosintaktik dalam rata-rata 4% (F1-measure).', 'ml': 'ഒരു വാക്കില്\u200d വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുകയും വ്യക്തമാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നതില്\u200d ബന്ധപ രാജ്യത്തിലെ ഏറ്റവും വിശാലമായ രാജ്യത്തിലെ RE സിസ്റ്റം മോര്\u200dഫോസിനിറ്റിക്ക് വിശേഷതകള്\u200dക്കും നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട യന്ത്രം പ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു, സെമാന്റിക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ പ്രഭാവങ്ങളുടെ പ്രഭാ അതിനാല്\u200d, ലോഗിക്കല്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു RE സിസ്റ്റം ഉപയോഗിച്ച് രണ്ടു വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഡൊമെനെന്\u200dസില്\u200d നിന പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സമ്പത്തിന്റെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ക്ലാസ്ഫോസിക്റ്റിക്ക് വിശേഷതകള്\u200d 4% (F1-മീറ്റില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ച ക്ലാസ്ഫ', 'mt': 'L-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet (RE) tikkonsisti fl-identifikazzjoni u l-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet semantiċi bejn l-entitajiet f’sentenza. Il-maġġoranza l-kbira tas-sistemi rinnovabbli l-aktar avvanzati jiddependu fuq karatteristiċi morfosintattiċi u algoritmi superviżi tat-tagħlim tal-magni. Dan id-dokument jipprova jwieġeb mistoqsijiet importanti li jikkonċernaw kemm l-impatt tal-karatteristiċi semantiċi, kif ukoll l-integrazzjoni tar-riżorsi esterni tal-għarfien lingwistiku fuq il-prestazzjoni tal-enerġija rinnovabbli. Għal dan, intużat u evalwat sistema ta’ RE bbażata fuq algoritmu ta’ tagħlim loġiku u relattiv fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza minn żewġ oqsma distinti. Ir-riżultati rriżultati jikkonfermaw li l-klassifikaturi indotti bl-użu tal-karatteristika aktar rikka proposta qabżu l-klassifikaturi mibnija b’karatteristiċi morfosintattiċi bħala medja ta’ 4% (kejl F1).', 'mn': 'Хариулт татах (RE) нь нэг зүйлийн хоорондын семантик харилцааныг өгүүлбэрт олж, ангид байдаг. Ихэнх урлагийн RE системийн ихэнх нь морфосинтактик болон машины суралцах алгоритмыг харуулдаг. Энэ цаас нь семантикийн суурь чанарын нөлөө болон RE үйлдвэрлэлийн талаар гадаад хэлний мэдлэг боловсруулалтын тухай чухал асуултуудыг хариулах гэж хичээдэг. Үүний тулд логик болон харилцааны суралцах алгоритмын үндсэн RE систем хоёр ялгаатай холбоотой гурван Reference Data sets дээр хэрэглэгдсэн. Үүний үр дүнд хэмжээний баян чанарыг ашиглаж буй классификацийн хувьд хэмжээний 4% (F1-хэмжээтэй) хэмжээтэй бүтээсэн классификацийн хувьд нэмэгдүүлсэн гэдгийг тодорхойлдог.', 'pl': 'Relacja Extraction (RE) polega na wykrywaniu i klasyfikowaniu relacji semantycznych między jednostkami w zdaniu. Zdecydowana większość najnowocześniejszych systemów RE opiera się na cechach morfosyntaktycznych i nadzorowanych algorytmach uczenia maszynowego. Niniejszy artykuł próbuje odpowiedzieć na ważne pytania dotyczące zarówno wpływu cech semantycznych, jak i integracji zewnętrznych zasobów wiedzy językowej na wydajność RE. W tym celu zastosowano system RE oparty na logicznym i relacyjnym algorytmie uczenia się i oceniono go na trzech zbiorach danych referencyjnych z dwóch różnych dziedzin. Uzyskane wyniki potwierdzają, że klasyfikatory indukowane przy użyciu proponowanego bogatszego zestawu cech przewyższają klasyfikatory zbudowane z cechami morfosyntaktycznymi średnio 4% (F1-miara).', 'lt': 'Santykių ekstrakcija (RE) apima subjektų semantinių santykių nustatymą ir klasifikavimą sakinyje. Didžioji dauguma moderniausių atsinaujinančių energijos išteklių sistemų priklauso nuo morfosintaktinių savybių ir prižiūrimų mašinų mokymosi algoritmų. This paper tries to answer important questions concerning both the impact of semantic based features, and the integration of external linguistic knowledge resources on RE performance.  Tuo tikslu buvo naudojama ir įvertinta RE sistema, pagrįsta logišku ir santykiniu mokymosi algoritmu, remiantis trimis atskaitos duomenų rinkiniais iš dviejų atskirų sričių. Išduoti rezultatai patvirtina, kad klasifikatoriai, indukuoti naudojant siūlomą turtingesnę savybę, viršijo klasifikatorius, pagamintus naudojant morfosintakcines savybes, vidutiniškai 4 % (F1 matavimas).', 'mk': 'Екстракција на односите (RE) се состои од детектирање и класификација на семантичните односи помеѓу ентитетите во реченица. Големото мнозинство од најсовремените системи на РЕ се потпираат на морфосинтактички карактеристики и надгледувани алгоритми за машинско учење. Овој документ се обидува да одговори на важни прашања во врска со влијанието на семантичките карактеристики, како и интеграцијата на надворешните јазични ресурси на знаење на резултатите на РЕ. For that, a RE system based on a logical and relational learning algorithm was used and evaluated on three reference datasets from two distinct domains.  Издадените резултати потврдуваат дека класификаторите индуцирани со користење на предложената побогата карактеристика ги надминаа класификаторите изградени со морфосинтактички карактеристики во просек 4 % (мерка F1).', 'no': 'Relation Extraction (RE) er i oppdaging og klassifisering av semantiske forhold mellom einingar i eit setning. Dei vaste fleste av kunstsystemet RE-systemet dependerer på morfosyntaktiske funksjonar og algoritme for å undersøkja maskinelæring. Denne papiret prøver å svara på viktige spørsmål om både effekten av semantiske baserte funksjonar og integreringa av eksterne lingviske kunnskap ressursar på RE-funksjonar. Dette er eit RE-systemet basert på ein logisk og relasjonell læringsalgoritme brukt og evaluert på tre referanse-datasett frå to ulike domene. Den følgjande resultatene stadfestar at klassifikatorane som induserte med den følgjande riktere funksjonen utførte klassifikatorane bygde med morfosyntaktiske funksjonar i gjennomsnittlig 4% (F1-mål).', 'ro': 'Extracția relației (RE) constă în detectarea și clasificarea relațiilor semantice dintre entități într-o propoziție. Marea majoritate a sistemelor RE de ultimă generație se bazează pe caracteristici morfosintactice și algoritmi de învățare automată supravegheați. Lucrarea încearcă să răspundă la întrebări importante referitoare atât la impactul caracteristicilor semantice, cât și la integrarea resurselor externe de cunoștințe lingvistice asupra performanței RE. Pentru aceasta, un sistem RE bazat pe un algoritm logic și relațional de învățare a fost utilizat și evaluat pe trei seturi de date de referință din două domenii distincte. Rezultatele obținute confirmă faptul că clasificatorii induși folosind setul de caracteristici mai bogate propus au depășit clasificatorii construiți cu caracteristici morfosintactice în medie cu 4% (măsură F1).', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija odnosa (RE) sastoji se u otkrivanju i klasifikaciji semantičkih odnosa između entitata u rečenici. Većina stanja umjetničkih RE sistema oslanja se na morfosintaktičke karakteristike i nadzorne algoritme za učenje mašine. Ovaj papir pokušava da odgovori na važna pitanja koja se tiče utjecaja semantičkih karakteristika i integracije vanjskih jezičkih znanja na izvođenje RE-a. Zbog toga je koristio i procjenjivao sistem RE na osnovu logičkog i odnosivnog algoritma učenja na tri referentnih seta podataka iz dva različita domena. Izdajeni rezultati potvrđuju da su klasifikatori indukovali koristeći predloženo bogatije karakteristike nadmašili klasifikatore izgrađene morfosintaktičnim karakteristikama u prosjeku 4% (mjera F1).', 'si': 'Name මොර්ෆෝසින්ටැක්ටික් අවස්ථාවක් සහ පරික්ෂා කරපු මැෂින් ඉගෙන ගන්න අල්ගෝරිතම් වලට විශාල වෙනවා. මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න උත්සහ කරනවා විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා සෙමාන්ටික් අධාරිත විශේෂතාවක්  ඒ විදියට, RE පද්ධතියක් ලෝජික සහ සම්බන්ධතාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න අල්ගෝරිතම් වල භාවිත කරලා විශේෂ දත්ත සැකස් තු පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත්තාවන් තහවුරු කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විශේෂය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත්තාවන් විශේෂකය', 'so': "Iska soo guurista (RE) waxaa ka mid ah aqoonsashada isku xiriirka semantika ee uu ku kala soocaynayo dhamaanka. Inta badan nidaamka RE waxay ku xiran yihiin tayada morphosyntika iyo qoraalka barashada mashiinka. Kanu wuxuu isku dayaa in uu ka jawaabo su'aalo muhiim ah oo ku saabsan saamaynta tababarka semantiga iyo la qabsashada macluumaadka aqoonta luuqadaha dibadda ee ku saabsan sameynta RE. Taas darteed waxaa lagu isticmaalay nidaam RE oo ku saleysan qoraalka waxbarashada xirfadda iyo xiriirka ah, waxaana lagu qiimeeyay saddex koox oo macluumaadka looga jeedo labada gooni oo kala duduwan. Midhaha la soo saaray waxay xaqiijiyaan in fasaxyada lagu soo bandhigay isticmaalka faa'iidada taajirka ah ee la soo jeeday ay ay sameeyeen fasaxyada lagu dhisay morphosyntactic qiyaastii qiyaastii 4% (F1-qiyaas).", 'sv': 'Relation Extraction (RE) består i att upptäcka och klassificera semantiska relationer mellan entiteter i en mening. De allra flesta av de senaste RE-systemen förlitar sig på morfosyntaktiska funktioner och övervakade maskininlärningsalgoritmer. Denna uppsats försöker besvara viktiga frågor om både semantiska egenskaper och integrering av externa språkliga kunskapsresurser på RE-prestanda. För detta användes ett RE-system baserat på en logisk och relationell inlärningsalgoritm och utvärderades på tre referensdatauppsättningar från två olika domäner. Resultaten bekräftar att de klassificerare som inducerats med hjälp av den föreslagna rikare funktionsuppsättningen presterade bättre än de klassificerare byggda med morfosyntaktiska egenskaper i genomsnitt 4% (F1-mått).', 'ta': 'வாக்கியத்தில் உள்ள பொருட்களுக்கிடையில் இருந்து பாதிப்பு இணைப்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கவும் வகைப்படுத்தலும் (RE) த பெரும்பாலான மாநிலையில் உள்ள RE அமைப்புகளில் உள்ள மாதிரி முறைமைகள் மாதிரி ஒத்திசைவு பண்புகளை மற்றும் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட இயந் இந்த காகிதத்திற்கு முக்கியமான கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் அளிக்க முயற்சிக்கிறது பெம்மென்டிக் சார்ந்த குணங்களுக்கும் பிரச்ச இதுக்காக, தொடர்பு மற்றும் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் கல்விப்பொருளை அடிப்படையில் RE அமைப்பு இரண்டு வித்தியாசமான களங்களிலிருந்து  கொடுக்கப்பட்ட முடிவுகள் சராசரியான 4% (F1- அளவு)', 'ur': 'Relative Extraction (RE) consists in detecting and classifying semantic relations between entities in a sentence. اکثر ایرٹ سیستموں کی زیادہ اکثریت مورپوسینٹاکٹیکوں اور ماشین یادگاری الگوریتم پر اعتماد ہے. اس کاغذ کی کوشش کرتی ہے کہ ان دونوں معلوم سوالوں کے بارے میں سوال کی جواب دیں جن کے بارے میں سیمنٹی بنیاد فرضیات کی تاثیر ہے اور ان دونوں بیرونی زبان شناسی علم رسورسوں کی ترکیب کی ہے جو ان کی عملکرد اس کے لئے، ایک RE سیستم جو منطقی اور رابطۂ تعلیم الگوریتم پر بنیاد رکھی گئی تھی اور دو مختلف ڈومین سے تین رابطہ ڈاٹ سٹ پر ارزش کیا گیا تھا. پیدا ہوئے نتیجے ثابت قدم رکھتے ہیں کہ پیدا ہوئے ثروت کے مطابق کلاسیفوں نے پیدا کیا تھا کہ متوسط 4% (F1-measure) کے ذریعے کلاسیفوں کے ساتھ بنائے ہوئے کلاسیفوں کو فائدہ پہنچا دیا تھا۔', 'vi': 'Việc hấp thụ (R) bao gồm việc phát hiện và phân loại các quan hệ theo ngữ pháp giữa các thực thể trong một câu. Hầu hết các hệ thống R-R hiện đại nhờ vào tính chất morphine và thuật toán học máy được giám sát. Tờ giấy này cố gắng trả lời những câu hỏi quan trọng liên quan đến cả ảnh hưởng của các tính năng ngữ pháp, lẫn sự hoà nhập của các nguồn kiến thức ngôn ngữ bên ngoài vào năng lượng R. Do đó, một hệ thống R dựa trên thuật toán học logic và liên quan được sử dụng và đánh giá trên ba bộ dữ liệu tham khảo từ hai miền khác nhau. Kết quả xác nhận rằng những người phân loại được tạo ra dựa trên khả năng giàu có đề xuất ra được thực hiện các phân loại có tính chất morphine trong trung bình 4= (F1-thước).', 'uz': "Relation Extraction (RE) consists in detecting and classifying semantic relations between entities in a sentence.  Ko'pchilik davlat RE tizimlarining ko'pchiligi morphosyntikk xususiyatlariga va taʼminlovchi mashina algoritlarga ishlatadi. Bu qogʻoz semantik asosiy xususiyatlarining hamma muhim savollariga javob berishini istayapti va tashqi tillarning qismi imkoniyatlarini RE bajarishda birlashtirish imkoniyatlarini birlashtirishni istaysiz. Bu uchun, logical va bog'liq o'rganish algorithiga bog'liq RE tizimi ikki boshqa domenadan uchta reference maʼlumotlar tarkibida ishlatilgan va qiymatdan foydalanadi. Natijalarning natijalarini bekor qiladi, taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi darajalar soni ishga tushirishi mumkin. Morphosyntactic xususiyatlari soni 4% (F1 taklif bilan yaratilgan darajalarni ishga tushirish mumkin.", 'bg': 'Екстракцията на отношенията (RE) се състои в откриване и класифициране на семантични отношения между единици в изречение. По-голямата част от най-съвременните системи разчитат на морфосинтактични характеристики и контролирани алгоритми за машинно обучение. Настоящата статия се опитва да отговори на важни въпроси, свързани както с въздействието на семантично базираните характеристики, така и с интегрирането на външни езикови ресурси върху ефективността на ВЕ. За целта е използвана система, базирана на логически и релационен алгоритъм за учене и оценена върху три референтни набора от данни от две различни области. Получените резултати потвърждават, че индуцираните класификатори, използващи предложената по-богата характеристика, са превъзхождали класификаторите, изградени с морфосинтактични характеристики средно 4% (мярка Ф1).', 'da': 'Relation Extraction (RE) består i at detektere og klassificere semantiske relationer mellem entiteter i en sætning. Langt de fleste af de avancerede RE-systemer er afhængige af morfosyntaktiske funktioner og overvågede maskinlæringsalgoritmer. Denne artikel forsøger at besvare vigtige spørgsmål vedrørende både effekten af semantiske baserede træk og integrationen af eksterne sproglige vidensressourcer på RE performance. Til dette blev et RE-system baseret på en logisk og relationel læringsalgoritme anvendt og evalueret på tre referencedatasæt fra to forskellige domæner. De opnåede resultater bekræfter, at de klassificeringer, der blev fremkaldt ved hjælp af det foreslåede rigere funktionssæt, var bedre end klassificeringerne bygget med morfosyntaktiske funktioner i gennemsnit 4% (F1-måling).', 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija odnosa (RE) sastoji se u otkrivanju i klasifikaciji semantičkih odnosa između subjekta u kazni. Većina stanja umjetničkih sustava RE oslanja se na morfosintaktičke funkcije i nadzorne algoritme učenja strojeva. Ovaj papir pokušava odgovoriti na važna pitanja o utjecaju semantičkih karakteristika i integraciji vanjskih jezičkih znanja na izvođenje RE-a. Zbog toga se koristio i procjenjivao sustav RE na temelju logičkog i odnosivnog algoritma učenja na tri referentnih podataka iz dva različita domena. Izdajeni rezultati potvrđuju da su klasifikatori inducirali koristeći predložene bogatije karakteristike nadmašili klasifikatore izgrađene morfosintaktičkim karakteristikama u prosjeku 4% (mjera F1).', 'nl': 'Relatie Extraction (RE) bestaat uit het detecteren en classificeren van semantische relaties tussen entiteiten in een zin. De overgrote meerderheid van de state-of-the-art RE-systemen is gebaseerd op morfosyntactische functies en begeleide machine learning algoritmes. Dit artikel probeert belangrijke vragen te beantwoorden over zowel de impact van semantische kenmerken als de integratie van externe linguïstische kennisbronnen op RE prestaties. Hiervoor werd een RE-systeem gebaseerd op een logisch en relationeel leeralgoritme gebruikt en geëvalueerd op drie referentiedatasets uit twee verschillende domeinen. De verkregen resultaten bevestigen dat de classificatoren geïnduceerd met behulp van de voorgestelde rijkere kenmerkenset beter presteerden dan de classificatoren gebouwd met morfosyntactische kenmerken in gemiddelde 4% (F1-maat).', 'de': 'Relation Extraction (RE) besteht darin, semantische Beziehungen zwischen Entitäten in einem Satz zu erkennen und zu klassifizieren. Die überwiegende Mehrheit der modernen RE-Systeme basiert auf morphosyntaktischen Funktionen und überwachten Algorithmen für maschinelles Lernen. Dieser Beitrag versucht, wichtige Fragen zu beantworten, die sowohl den Einfluss semantisch basierter Merkmale als auch die Integration externer linguistischer Wissensressourcen auf die RE-Leistung betreffen. Dazu wurde ein RE-System basierend auf einem logischen und relationalen Lernalgorithmus verwendet und auf drei Referenzdatensätzen aus zwei unterschiedlichen Domänen ausgewertet. Die Ergebnisse bestätigen, dass die mit dem vorgeschlagenen reicheren Feature-Set induzierten Klassifikatoren die mit morphosyntaktischen Merkmalen erstellten Klassifikatoren im Durchschnitt 4% (F1-Maß) übertrafen.', 'id': 'Hubungan Ekstraksi (RE) terdiri dalam mendeteksi dan klasifikasi hubungan semantis antara entitas dalam kalimat. Kebanyakan sistem RE terbaik bergantung pada ciri-ciri morfosintaksi dan algoritma pembelajaran mesin yang diawasi. Kertas ini mencoba menjawab pertanyaan penting mengenai dampak dari karakteristik berdasarkan semantis, dan integrasi sumber daya pengetahuan bahasa luar pada prestasi RE. For that, a RE system based on a logical and relational learning algorithm was used and evaluated on three reference datasets from two distinct domains.  Hasil yang diberikan mengkonfirmasi bahwa klasifikasi yang diinduksi menggunakan fitur yang lebih kaya yang diusulkan set melampaui klasifikasi yang dibuat dengan fitur morfosintaksi rata-rata 4% (F1-ukuran).', 'fa': 'اخراج رابطه (RE) در کشف و کلاس ارتباط semantic بین واحدها در یک جمله است. اکثریت سیستم\u200cهای مرکز هنر بر ویژه\u200cهای مورفوسینتیک و الگوریتم\u200cهای یادگیری ماشین\u200cهای کنترل بستگی دارد. این کاغذ سعی می\u200cکند به جواب سوالات مهم درباره\u200cی تاثیر ویژه\u200cهای بنیاد semantic و ترکیب منابع دانش\u200cهای بیرون زبان\u200cشناسی بر روی عملکرد RE جواب دهد. برای این، یک سیستم RE بر اساس یک الگوریتم یادگیری منطقی و ارتباطی استفاده شده و در سه مجموعه داده\u200cهای ارتباطی از دو دامنه متفاوت ارتباط داده شد. نتیجه\u200cهای ارائه داده شده تایید می\u200cکند که گروهی که با استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای ثروتمند پیشنهاد داده\u200cاند، با ویژه\u200cهای مورفوسینتیک در میانگین 4% (F1-measure) ساخته می\u200cشوند.', 'ko': '관계 추출(RE)에는 문장의 엔티티 간의 의미 관계를 감지하고 분류하는 작업이 포함됩니다.절대 다수의 가장 선진적인 RE 시스템은 형태 문법 특징과 감독이 있는 기계 학습 알고리즘에 의존한다.본고는 의미를 바탕으로 하는 특징의 영향과 외부 언어 지식 자원의 통합이 재표현에 대한 중요한 문제에 대답하고자 한다.이를 위해 논리와 관계 학습 알고리즘을 바탕으로 하는 RE시스템을 사용하고 두 분야의 세 가지 참고 데이터 집합에서 평가했다.그 결과 제시된 더욱 풍부한 특징집을 사용하여 생성된 분류기는 형태문법 특징으로 구축된 분류기보다 평균 성능이 4%(F1도량) 좋다는 것이 증명되었다.', 'tr': 'Referans Extraction (RE) Sanat RE sistemlerinin en büyük kısmı morfositik özelliklerine ve makine öğrenme algoritmalarına dayanır. Bu kagyz semantik möhüm soraglary barada hem täsirini, hem daşaryk dillerin bilim çeşmeleriniň RE eserleşmesi barada gatnaşmaga synanyşýar. Şol üçin, RE sistemi logik we relasiýa öwrenme algoritmä daýanýan we iki farklı alandan üç sany veri setirine deňlendirildi. Seçili netijeler tarafından klasifikatçylar teklif eden başka özelliklere göre morfosyntaktik özelliklere oranla 4% (F1-ölçüsi) geçirildiklerini kanıtlaýar.', 'sw': 'Kuondolewa kwa uhusiano (RE) ni katika kutambua na kutangaza mahusiano ya kimapenzi kati ya vitu katika hukumu. Wengi wa mfumo wa hali ya sanaa wa RE unategemea vipaumbele vya vifo vya kisiasa na utangalizwa kwa mashine ya kujifunza algorithi. This paper tries to answer important questions concerning both the impact of semantic based features, and the integration of external linguistic knowledge resources on RE performance.  Kwa hilo, mfumo wa RE uliotengenezwa na algorithi ya kujifunza za kimaadili na mahusiano ulitumika na kutathmini kwenye seti tatu za maoni kutoka katika maeneo mawili tofauti. Matokeo yaliyotolewa yanathibitisha kuwa wataalamu walianzishwa kwa kutumia utaalam wa utajiri wa pendekezo uliotengenezwa na wataalamu waliotengenezwa na vipengele vya morphosyntactic kwa wastani wa asilimia 4 (kipimo cha F1).', 'af': "Relasie uitpakking (RE) bestaan in die beskrywing en klassifisering van semantiese relasies tussen entiteite in 'n seting. Die groot meeste van die state-of-the-art RE stelsels aflyk op morfosyntaktike funksies en superviseerde masjien leer algoritme. Hierdie papier probeer om belangrike vrae te antwoord aangaande beide die effek van semantiese gebaseerde funksies en die integrasie van eksterne lingwisiese kennis hulpbronne op RE-prestasie. Daarom is 'n RE stelsel gebaseer op 'n logiese en relasionele leer algoritme gebruik en geevalueer op drie verwysing datastelle van twee verskillende domeine. Die uitgevoerde resultate bevestig dat die klassifiseerders gebruik het deur die voorgestelde ryker funksie uitgevoer het die klassifiseerders gebou met morfosyntaktike funksies in gemiddelde 4% (F1-maat).", 'az': 'İlişkil Çıqışma (RE) bir cümlədə məxluqat arasındakı semantik əlaqələri keşfetmək və dəyişdirmək barəsindədir. Artıq RE sistemlərinin çoxu morfosintaktik özelliklərinə və maşın öyrənməsi algoritminin üstündə təvəkkül edir. Bu kağıt hər ikisinin semantik təsirlərin təsirlərinin və RE performansının dış dilində bilim kaynaqlarının birləşdirilməsi haqqında möhkəm suallarına cavab verməyə çalışır. Buna görə, logik və əlaqəsiz öyrənmə algoritmi üzərində olan RE sistemi iki müxtəlif domena tərəfindən üç referans veri qurğularında istifadə edildi və değerlendirildi. Seçilmiş sonuçlar təsdiqləndirir ki, seçilmiş seçimlər təbliğ edilmiş daha çox mali xüsusiyyətlərlə birlikdə 4% (F1-ölçü) morfosintaktik xüsusiyyətlərlə in şa edilmiş seçimlərdən daha üstün oldular.', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች ከሀገሪቱ ሀገር ብዙዎቹ RE-ስርዓቶች በሞሮፎስsyntactic እውቀት ላይ እና በመጠበቂያ መሳሪያዎች ማምረሚያ አልgorithም ላይ ይጠብቃሉ፡፡ This paper tries to answer important questions concerning both the impact of semantic based features, and the integration of external linguistic knowledge resources on RE performance.  ስለዚህም፣ የግንኙነት እና የግንኙነት ትምህርት መምህርት የተደረገው RE ሲስተማርነት ከሁለት የተለየ ዶሜኖችን በሦስት የሥርዓት ዳታ ማተሚያ የተጠቀም እና የተመካነ ነው፡፡ ፍሬዎቹ በተዘጋጀው ባለጠጋ ምርጫዎች በመጠቀም የሞሮፎsyntactic ምርጫዎች የተደረጉትን ክፍተቶችን ያረጋግጣሉ፡፡', 'bn': 'বিষয়বস্তুর মধ্যে সেম্যান্টিক সম্পর্ক সন্ধান এবং বিভক্ত করার (RE) অন্তর্ভুক্ত। রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের বেশীরভাগ রাষ্ট্রের রাষ্ট্রীয় প্রতিষ্ঠানের উপর নির্ভর করে মর্ফোসিক্যাটিক বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং পর্যব This paper tries to answer important questions concerning both the impact of semantic based features, and the integration of external linguistic knowledge resources on RE performance.  এর জন্য, একটি লোজিক এবং সম্পর্কিত শিক্ষা অ্যালগরিদমের উপর ভিত্তিক RE সিস্টেম ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে এবং দুই বিভিন্ন ডোমেন থেকে তিনটি রে ফলাফল নিশ্চিত করেছে যে প্রস্তাবিত ধনী বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে শ্রেণীবিষয়গুলো গড়ে ৪% (এফ১-মেক্ট) নির্মাণিত শ্রেণীবিষয়কে বানিয়েছে।', 'ca': "L'Extracció de Relacions (RE) consisteix en detectar i classificar les relacions semàntiques entre entitats en una frase. La gran majoria dels sistemes renovables d'última generació depenen de característiques morfosíntactiques i algoritmes d'aprenentatge màquinari supervisats. Aquest paper intenta respondre a preguntes importants relacionades tant amb l'impacte de característiques semàntiques com amb l'integració de recursos externs de coneixement lingüístic en el rendiment de l'energia renovable. Per això, es va utilitzar un sistema de RE basat en un algoritme d'aprenentatge lògic i relacional i es va evaluar en tres conjunts de dades de referència de dos dominis distints. The yielded results confirm that the classifiers induced using the proposed richer feature set outperformed the classifiers built with morphosyntactic features in average 4% (F1-measure).", 'cs': 'Relace Extraction (RE) spočívá v detekci a klasifikaci sémantických vztahů mezi entitami ve větě. Drtivá většina nejmodernějších RE systémů je založena na morfosyntaktických funkcích a algoritmech strojového učení. Tento článek se snaží zodpovědět důležité otázky týkající se jak vlivu sémantických prvků, tak integrace externích jazykových znalostních zdrojů na výkonnost RE. K tomu byl použit RE systém založený na logickém a relačním učení algoritmu a vyhodnocen na třech referenčních datových sadách ze dvou odlišných domén. Získané výsledky potvrzují, že klasifikátory indukované pomocí navrhované bohatší sady vlastností předčily klasifikátory postavené s morfosyntaktickými vlastnostmi v průměru 4% (F1-míra).', 'et': 'Seose ekstraheerimine (RE) tähendab semantiliste suhete tuvastamist ja klassifitseerimist ühes lauses. Enamik kaasaegsetest taastuvenergia süsteemidest tugineb morfosüntaktilistele omadustele ja masinõppe algoritmidele. Käesolev töö püüab vastata olulistele küsimustele, mis puudutavad nii semantiliste funktsioonide mõju kui ka väliste keeleoskuste integreerimist taastuvenergia jõudlusele. Selleks kasutati loogilisel ja relatsioonilisel õppealgoritmil põhinevat RE-süsteemi, mida hinnati kolmel võrdlusandmekogumil kahest erinevast valdkonnast. Saadud tulemused kinnitavad, et kavandatud rikkalikumat funktsiooni kasutades indutseeritud klassifitseerijad ületasid morfosüntaktiliste funktsioonidega ehitatud klassifitseerijaid keskmiselt 4% (F1-mõõt).', 'sq': 'Relation Extraction (RE) consists in detecting and classifying semantic relations between entities in a sentence.  The vast majority of the state-of-the-art RE systems relies on morphosyntactic features and supervised machine learning algorithms.  This paper tries to answer important questions concerning both the impact of semantic based features, and the integration of external linguistic knowledge resources on RE performance.  Për këtë, një sistem RE bazuar në një algoritëm të mësimit logjik dhe marrëdhënies u përdorë dhe u vlerësua në tre grupe të dhënash referenciale nga dy fusha të ndryshme. Rezultatet e prodhuara konfirmojnë se klasifikuesit e induktuar duke përdorur karakteristikën më të pasur të propozuar i kaluan klasifikuesit e ndërtuar me karakteristikë morfosintaktike në mesatare 4% (masa F1).', 'fi': 'Relation Extraction (RE) koostuu entiteettien semanttisten suhteiden havaitsemisesta ja luokittelusta lauseessa. Suurin osa uusimmista RE-järjestelmistä perustuu morfosyntaktisiin ominaisuuksiin ja valvottuihin koneoppimisalgoritmeihin. Tämä artikkeli pyrkii vastaamaan tärkeisiin kysymyksiin sekä semanttisten ominaisuuksien vaikutuksesta että ulkoisten kielitietoresurssien integroinnista uusiutuvan energian suorituskykyyn. Tätä varten käytettiin loogiseen ja relaatiooppimiseen perustuvaa RE-järjestelmää, joka arvioitiin kolmella viiteaineistolla kahdesta eri alueesta. Tulokset vahvistavat, että ehdotetulla rikkaammilla ominaisuuksilla indusoidut luokitukset ylittivät morfosyntaktisilla ominaisuuksilla rakennetut luokitukset keskimäärin 4% (F1-mitta).', 'hy': 'Հաբերության արտահանումը (ՌԵ) կազմված է դասության մեջ գտնվող սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունների հայտնաբերման և դասակարգման մեջ: Ավելի լավագույն ռեսուրսների համակարգերի մեծ մասը հիմնված է մորֆոսինտակտիկ հատկությունների և վերահսկված մեքենային ուսումնասիրության ալգորիթմների վրա: This paper tries to answer important questions concerning both the impact of semantic based features, and the integration of external linguistic knowledge resources on RE performance.  Դրա համար օգտագործվեց և գնահատվեց երկու տարբեր ոլոգիական և հարաբերական ուսումնասիրության ալգորիթմի վրա հիմնված ՌԵ համակարգը: Հաջորդ արդյունքները հաստատում են, որ դասակարգիչները, օգտագործելով առաջարկված ավելի հարուստ հատկությունը, արեցին դասակարգիչները, որոնք կառուցվել են մորֆոսինտակտիկ հատկություններով, միջինում 4 տոկոսով (F1-չափով):', 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija odnosa (RE) sastoji se u otkrivanju i klasifikaciji semantičkih odnosa između subjekta u kazni. Većina stanja umjetničkih RE sustava oslanja se na morfosintaktičke karakteristike i nadzorne algoritme za učenje strojeva. Ovaj papir pokušava odgovoriti na važna pitanja o utjecaju semantičkih karakteristika i integraciji vanjskih jezičkih znanja na izvođenje RE-a. Zbog toga je koristio i procjenjivao sistem RE na osnovu logičkog i odnosivnog algoritma učenja na tri referentnih seta podataka iz dva različita domena. Izdajeni rezultati potvrđuju da su klasifikatori indukovali koristeći predloženo bogatije karakteristike nadmašili klasifikatore izgrađene morfosintaktičnim karakteristikama u prosjeku 4% (mjera F1).', 'jv': 'Relative extract (R) Banyak kudu piye soko hal-karbote AR sistem sing wis nguasai cara-karbote melopositik lan mulasai pengguna nggawe Algorithm. Perusahaan iki milih nggambar ujian sing dikarepaké awak dhéwé nggawe ngupakan semantar iki bakal terus nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas barang nggawe barang nggawe barang REE. Saiki, sistem RED sing basa saben kelas sistem logik lan babagan kelas karo perusahaan karo pak basa dataset sing dadi tanggal saben dumadhi sing dibutuhke Defs', 'sk': 'Izvleček relacij (RE) je sestavljen iz odkrivanja in razvrščanja semantičnih relacij med entitetami v stavku. Velika večina najsodobnejših sistemov za obnovljanje energije temelji na morfosintaktičnih značilnostih in nadzorovanih algoritmih strojnega učenja. Prispevek poskuša odgovoriti na pomembna vprašanja glede vpliva semantičnih značilnosti in integracije zunanjih virov jezikovnega znanja na delovanje obnovljivih virov. Za to smo uporabili sistem RE, ki temelji na logičnem in relacijskem algoritmu učenja in ocenili na treh referenčnih naborih podatkov iz dveh različnih domen. Dobljeni rezultati potrjujejo, da so klasifikatorji, inducirani z uporabo predlaganega nabora bogatejših značilnosti, v povprečju presegli klasifikatorje, zgrajene z morfosintaktičnimi značilnostmi (F1-meritev).', 'ha': "Ƙaraɗar da shirin haɗi (R) na ƙunsa cikin gane da rarrabe dangani na semantic tsakanin abun cikin birnin. Babbari masu yawa na halin-da-sanar-na-R, yana dõgara ga masu tsarin morfosyntactic da kuma an tsare algoritori masu karatun na mashine. Wannan takardan na jarraba ya karɓa wa tambayar muhimmi masu husũma ma'anar haske da kuma ta haɗa mataimaki na zaman harshen kungiyar ta bakwai a kan performance na R. A kan wannan, aka yi amfani da wani na'urar re a kan karatun algoritm na logical da masu husũma, kuma an ƙaddara a kan salon data masu karatun uku daga duk biyu daban-daban. Ana gaskata matsala ya gaskata cewa classifiers sun fara da amfani da buƙata mai amfani da aka buƙata, sun nuna fasalarar da aka samar da wasu fasalifi na morfosyntactic game da a kan jama'a 4% (F1-metode).", 'bo': 'འབྲེལ་བ་ཕྱིར་འདྲེན་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་ཚན་གཅིག་ནང་གི་སྐྱེས་པའི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་རྙེད་དང་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཡོད། སྣང་ཚུལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གྱི་མ་ལག This paper tries to answer important questions about the impact of semantic based features, and the integration of external linguistic knowledge resources on RE performance. འདིས་ལྟ་བུའི་རིམ་ལུགས་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་སློབ་རིམ་གྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས The yielded results confirm that the classifiers induced using the proposed richer feature set outperformed the classifiers built with morphosyntactic features in average 4% (F1-measure).', 'he': 'מחלקת מערכת יחסים (RE) מכילה בלגלות ולקלאס יחסים סמנטיים בין יחידות במשפט. רוב המערכות המאוחרות המאוחרות המאוחרות המוקדמות מסמכות על תכונות מורפוסינטקטיקות ואלגוריתמים של למידת מכונות. הנייר הזה מנסה לענות על שאלות חשובות בנוגע לשפעה של תכונות מבוססים סמנטיים, ולהאינטגרציה של משאבי ידע שפתיים חיצוניים על ביצועי RE. עבור זה, שימשה מערכת RE מבוססת על אלגוריתם לימוד הגיוני ומערך יחסי על שלושה קבוצות נתונים רמזים משני תחומות בודדים. התוצאות הנוצאות מאשרות שהקלאסיפורים התחילו בשימוש בתחום העשיר המוצע הצביע את הקלסיפורים שנבנו עם תכונות מורפוסינטקטיות בממוצע של 4% (F1-מדידה).'}
{'en': 'Detecting Anorexia in Spanish Tweets', 'ar': 'الكشف عن فقدان الشهية في التغريدات الإسبانية', 'fr': "Détecter l'anorexie dans les tweets en espagnol", 'pt': 'Detectando anorexia em tweets em espanhol', 'es': 'Detección de anorexia en tuits en español', 'zh': '检厌食症西班牙语推文', 'hi': 'स्पैनिश ट्वीट्स में एनोरेक्सिया का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'Обнаружение анорексии в испанских твитах', 'ja': 'スペイン語のツイートで拒食症を検出する', 'ga': 'Anorexia a bhrath i Tweets Spáinnis', 'hu': 'Anorexia felismerése spanyol tweetekben', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση ανορεξίας στα ισπανικά tweets', 'it': "Rilevare l'anoressia nei tweet spagnoli", 'kk': 'Испан tweets тізімінде анорексия анықтау', 'lt': 'Anoreksijos nustatymas Ispanijos Tweetuose', 'mk': 'Детектирање на анорексија на шпански твитови', 'ms': 'Mengesan Anorexia dalam Tweets Sepanyol', 'ml': 'സ്പാനിഷ് ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d അന്നോര്\u200dക്സിയയെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Detecting Anorexia in Spanish Tweets', 'mn': 'Анорексия-г Испан Tweets-д олж мэдсэн.', 'no': 'Finn Anorexia i spanske tweeter', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie anoreksji w hiszpańskich tweetach', 'ro': 'Detectarea anorexiei în tweeturile spaniole', 'so': 'Findinta Anorexia oo ku qoran Ispanish Tweets', 'sv': 'Att upptäcka anorexi i spanska tweets', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje Anoreksije na španjolskim tweetima', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'اسپانیایی ٹویٹ میں آنورکسیا پتہ لیا جاتا ہے', 'si': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát hiện Anoxia bằng tiếng Tây Ban Nha Tweet', 'bg': 'Откриване на анорексия в испански туитове', 'nl': 'Anorexie detecteren in Spaanse Tweets', 'da': 'Afsløring af anorexi i spanske tweets', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje Anoreksije na španjolskim tweetima', 'de': 'Erkennung von Anorexie in spanischen Tweets', 'ko': '스페인 추문 중의 거식증을 검출하다', 'id': 'Mengeteksi Anorexia dalam Tweets Spanyol', 'fa': 'شناسایی آنورکسیا در Tweets اسپانیایی', 'sw': 'Kugundua Anorexia katika twita za Kihispania', 'sq': 'Duke hetuar Anoreksinë në Tweets spanjolle', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'Anorexia በስፓኒሽ Tweets በማግኘት', 'az': 'İspanyol Tweets içində Anorexia keşif edilir', 'hy': 'Իսպանական թվիթերում Anorexia-ի հայտնաբերումը', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje Anoreksije na španjolskim tweetima', 'ca': 'Detecting Anorexia in Spanish Tweets', 'bn': 'স্প্যানিশ টুইটে অ্যানোরেক্সিয়া সনাক্ত করা হচ্ছে', 'et': 'Anoreksia tuvastamine hispaania tweetides', 'cs': 'Detekce anorexie ve španělských tweetech', 'fi': 'Anoreksian havaitseminen espanjankielisissä tweeteissä', 'tr': 'Anoreksiýany İspanýolça Tweetler Deteksi', 'jv': 'Weksi ???????????????????????????????????????????????????????????', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje anoreksije v španskih tweetih', 'he': 'מגלה אנורקסיה בטוויטים ספרדיים', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་གི་Tweets ནང་དུ་Anorexia་རྟོགས་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Mental health is one of the main concerns of today’s society. Early detection of symptoms can greatly help people with mental disorders. People are using social networks more and more to express emotions, sentiments and mental states. Thus, the treatment of this information using NLP technologies can be applied to the automatic detection of mental problems such as eating disorders. However, the first step to solving the problem should be to provide a corpus in order to evaluate our systems. In this paper, we specifically focus on detecting anorexia messages on Twitter. Firstly, we have generated a new corpus of tweets extracted from different accounts including anorexia and non-anorexia messages in Spanish. The corpus is called SAD : Spanish Anorexia Detection corpus. In order to validate the effectiveness of the SAD corpus, we also propose several machine learning approaches for automatically detecting anorexia symptoms in the corpus. The good results obtained show that the application of textual classification methods is a promising option for developing this kind of system demonstrating that these tools could be used by professionals to help in the early detection of mental problems.', 'ar': 'الصحة النفسية هي أحد الاهتمامات الرئيسية لمجتمع اليوم. يمكن أن يساعد الاكتشاف المبكر للأعراض الأشخاص الذين يعانون من اضطرابات نفسية بشكل كبير. يستخدم الناس الشبكات الاجتماعية أكثر فأكثر للتعبير عن المشاعر والمشاعر والحالات العقلية. وبالتالي ، يمكن تطبيق معالجة هذه المعلومات باستخدام تقنيات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية على الكشف التلقائي عن المشاكل العقلية مثل اضطرابات الأكل. ومع ذلك ، يجب أن تكون الخطوة الأولى لحل المشكلة هي توفير مجموعة من أجل تقييم أنظمتنا. في هذه الورقة ، نركز بشكل خاص على اكتشاف رسائل فقدان الشهية على تويتر. أولاً ، لقد أنشأنا مجموعة جديدة من التغريدات المستخرجة من حسابات مختلفة بما في ذلك رسائل فقدان الشهية ورسائل عدم فقدان الشهية باللغة الإسبانية. تسمى المجموعة SAD: جسم الكشف عن فقدان الشهية الإسباني. من أجل التحقق من فعالية مجموعة SAD ، نقترح أيضًا العديد من مناهج التعلم الآلي للكشف التلقائي عن أعراض فقدان الشهية في الجسم. تظهر النتائج الجيدة التي تم الحصول عليها أن تطبيق طرق التصنيف النصي هو خيار واعد لتطوير هذا النوع من النظام مما يدل على أن هذه الأدوات يمكن استخدامها من قبل المتخصصين للمساعدة في الكشف المبكر عن المشاكل العقلية.', 'fr': "La santé mentale est l'une des principales préoccupations de la société actuelle. La détection précoce des symptômes peut grandement aider les personnes souffrant de troubles mentaux. Les gens utilisent de plus en plus les réseaux sociaux pour exprimer leurs émotions, leurs sentiments et leurs états mentaux. Ainsi, le traitement de ces informations à l'aide des technologies de la PNL peut être appliqué à la détection automatique de problèmes mentaux tels que les troubles de l'alimentation. Cependant, la première étape pour résoudre le problème devrait être de fournir un corpus afin d'évaluer nos systèmes. Dans cet article, nous nous concentrons spécifiquement sur la détection des messages d'anorexie sur Twitter. Tout d'abord, nous avons généré un nouveau corpus de tweets extraits de différents comptes, y compris des messages d'anorexie et de non-anorexie en espagnol. Le corpus est appelé SAD\xa0: Spanish Anorexia Detection corpus. Afin de valider l'efficacité du corpus SAD, nous proposons également plusieurs approches d'apprentissage automatique pour détecter automatiquement les symptômes d'anorexie dans le corps. Les bons résultats obtenus montrent que l'application de méthodes de classification textuelle est une option prometteuse pour développer ce type de système, démontrant que ces outils pourraient être utilisés par des professionnels pour aider à la détection précoce des problèmes mentaux.", 'es': 'La salud mental es una de las principales preocupaciones de la sociedad actual. La detección temprana de los síntomas puede ayudar mucho a las personas con trastornos mentales. La gente usa cada vez más las redes sociales para expresar emociones, sentimientos y estados mentales. Por lo tanto, el tratamiento de esta información mediante tecnologías de PNL se puede aplicar a la detección automática de problemas mentales como los trastornos de la alimentación. Sin embargo, el primer paso para resolver el problema debe ser proporcionar un corpus para evaluar nuestros sistemas. En este artículo, nos centramos específicamente en detectar mensajes de anorexia en Twitter. En primer lugar, hemos generado un nuevo corpus de tuits extraídos de diferentes cuentas que incluyen mensajes de anorexia y no anorexia en español. El corpus se llama SAD: Spanish Anorexia Detection corpus. Para validar la eficacia del cuerpo de SAD, también proponemos varios enfoques de aprendizaje automático para detectar automáticamente los síntomas de anorexia en el cuerpo. Los buenos resultados obtenidos muestran que la aplicación de métodos de clasificación textual es una opción prometedora para desarrollar este tipo de sistema, lo que demuestra que estas herramientas podrían ser utilizadas por los profesionales para ayudar en la detección temprana de problemas mentales.', 'pt': 'A saúde mental é uma das principais preocupações da sociedade atual. A detecção precoce dos sintomas pode ajudar muito as pessoas com transtornos mentais. As pessoas estão usando cada vez mais as redes sociais para expressar emoções, sentimentos e estados mentais. Assim, o tratamento dessas informações usando tecnologias de PNL pode ser aplicado à detecção automática de problemas mentais, como transtornos alimentares. No entanto, o primeiro passo para resolver o problema deve ser fornecer um corpus para avaliar nossos sistemas. Neste artigo, focamos especificamente na detecção de mensagens de anorexia no Twitter. Em primeiro lugar, geramos um novo corpus de tweets extraídos de diferentes contas, incluindo mensagens de anorexia e não-anorexia em espanhol. O corpus é denominado SAD: Corpus de Detecção de Anorexia Espanhola. Para validar a eficácia do corpus SAD, também propomos várias abordagens de aprendizado de máquina para detectar automaticamente sintomas de anorexia no corpus. Os bons resultados obtidos mostram que a aplicação de métodos de classificação textual é uma opção promissora para o desenvolvimento desse tipo de sistema demonstrando que essas ferramentas podem ser utilizadas por profissionais para auxiliar na detecção precoce de problemas mentais.', 'ja': 'メンタルヘルスは、今日の社会の主な懸念の1つです。 症状を早期に発見することは、精神障害の人々を大いに助けることができます。 人々はますますソーシャルネットワークを使用して感情や精神状態を表現しています したがって、ＮＬＰ技術を用いたこの情報の扱いは、摂食障害等の精神障害の自動検出に適用することができる。 しかし、問題を解決するための最初のステップは、システムを評価するためのコーパスを提供することです。 本稿では、特にTwitterでの拒食症メッセージの検出に焦点を当てる。 まず、スペイン語の拒食症および非拒食症メッセージを含むさまざまなアカウントから抽出された新しいツイートのコーパスを生成しました。 その体はSAD ：スペイン語のAnorexia Detection corpusと呼ばれる。 SADコーパスの有効性を検証するために、コーパス内の拒食症状を自動的に検出するためのいくつかの機械学習アプローチも提案します。 得られた良好な結果は、テキスト分類法の適用がこの種のシステムを開発するための有望な選択肢であることを示しており、これらのツールが精神的問題の早期発見を支援するために専門家によって使用される可能性があることを示している。', 'zh': '心理健康者,当今之大关注点也。 早见大助精神障碍患者。 人益多用社交网络以达情,情与神俱。 故用NLP之术,可以自动检测饮食。 第一步当给一语料库来评估。 于本文中,特关Twitter上检测厌食症信息。 先我生一新推文语料库,推文从异帐户取,西班牙语厌食症非厌食症息。 其语料库曰SAD:西班牙厌食症检测语料库。 验SAD语料库之有效性,又立机器学数种自动检测语料库中厌食状。 得良结果表明,文本分类者,所以开其所欲也,明其可以助早见精神也。', 'ru': 'Психическое здоровье является одной из главных проблем современного общества. Раннее выявление симптомов может значительно помочь людям с психическими расстройствами. Люди все чаще используют социальные сети для выражения эмоций, чувств и психических состояний. Таким образом, обработка этой информации с использованием технологий NLP может быть применена для автоматического обнаружения психических расстройств, таких как расстройства питания. Однако первым шагом к решению этой проблемы должно стать создание корпуса для оценки наших систем. В этой статье мы уделяем особое внимание обнаружению сообщений об анорексии в Twitter. Во-первых, мы создали новый корпус твитов, извлеченных из различных аккаунтов, включая сообщения об анорексии и неанорексии на испанском языке. Тело называется SAD: испанское тело обнаружения анорексии. Для того, чтобы подтвердить эффективность SAD корпуса, мы также предлагаем несколько подходов машинного обучения для автоматического обнаружения симптомов анорексии в корпусе. Полученные хорошие результаты показывают, что применение текстовых методов классификации является многообещающим вариантом для разработки такого рода системы, демонстрирующей, что эти инструменты могут быть использованы профессионалами, чтобы помочь в раннем обнаружении психических проблем.', 'hi': 'मानसिक स्वास्थ्य आज के समाज की मुख्य चिंताओं में से एक है। लक्षणों का जल्दी पता लगाने से मानसिक विकारों वाले लोगों को बहुत मदद मिल सकती है। लोग भावनाओं, भावनाओं और मानसिक राज्यों को व्यक्त करने के लिए सामाजिक नेटवर्क का अधिक से अधिक उपयोग कर रहे हैं। इस प्रकार, एनएलपी प्रौद्योगिकियों का उपयोग करके इस जानकारी के उपचार को खाने के विकारों जैसी मानसिक समस्याओं का स्वचालित पता लगाने के लिए लागू किया जा सकता है। हालांकि, समस्या को हल करने के लिए पहला कदम हमारे सिस्टम का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए एक कॉर्पस प्रदान करना होना चाहिए। इस पेपर में, हम विशेष रूप से ट्विटर पर एनोरेक्सिया संदेशों का पता लगाने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। सबसे पहले, हमने स्पेनिश में एनोरेक्सिया और गैर-एनोरेक्सिया संदेशों सहित विभिन्न खातों से निकाले गए ट्वीट्स का एक नया कॉर्पस उत्पन्न किया है। कॉर्पस को एसएडी कहा जाता है: स्पेनिश एनोरेक्सिया डिटेक्शन कॉर्पस। एसएडी कॉर्पस की प्रभावशीलता को मान्य करने के लिए, हम कॉर्पस में एनोरेक्सिया लक्षणों का स्वचालित रूप से पता लगाने के लिए कई मशीन लर्निंग दृष्टिकोणों का भी प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्राप्त अच्छे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि पाठ्य वर्गीकरण विधियों का अनुप्रयोग इस तरह की प्रणाली को विकसित करने के लिए एक आशाजनक विकल्प है जो यह दर्शाता है कि इन उपकरणों का उपयोग पेशेवरों द्वारा मानसिक समस्याओं का शुरुआती पता लगाने में मदद करने के लिए किया जा सकता है।', 'ga': 'Tá meabhairshláinte ar cheann de na hábhair imní is mó i sochaí an lae inniu. Is féidir le comharthaí a bhrath go luath cuidiú go mór le daoine a bhfuil neamhoird mheabhrach orthu. Tá daoine ag baint úsáide as líonraí sóisialta níos mó agus níos mó chun mothúcháin, mothúcháin agus stáit mheabhrach a chur in iúl. Mar sin, is féidir cóireáil na faisnéise seo trí úsáid a bhaint as teicneolaíochtaí NLP a chur i bhfeidhm chun fadhbanna meabhrach mar neamhoird itheacháin a bhrath go huathoibríoch. Mar sin féin, ba cheart gurb é an chéad chéim chun an fhadhb a réiteach ná corpas a sholáthar chun ár gcórais a mheas. Sa pháipéar seo, dírímid go sonrach ar theachtaireachtaí anorexia a bhrath ar Twitter. Ar an gcéad dul síos, tá corpas nua tweets ginte againn a bhaintear as cuntais éagsúla lena n-áirítear anorexia agus teachtaireachtaí neamh-ainéaraicse i Spáinnis. Tugtar SAD ar an gcorpas: Spanish Anorexia Detection corpus. Chun éifeachtúlacht an chorpais SAD a bhailíochtú, molaimid freisin go leor cineálacha cur chuige meaisínfhoghlama chun comharthaí anorexia sa chorpas a bhrath go huathoibríoch. Léiríonn na torthaí maithe a fuarthas go bhfuil cur i bhfeidhm modhanna aicmithe téacsúla ina rogha tuar dóchais inti chun an cineál seo córais a fhorbairt, rud a thaispeánann go bhféadfadh gairmithe na huirlisí seo a úsáid chun cabhrú le fadhbanna meabhrach a bhrath go luath.', 'el': 'Η ψυχική υγεία είναι μια από τις κύριες ανησυχίες της σημερινής κοινωνίας. Η έγκαιρη ανίχνευση των συμπτωμάτων μπορεί να βοηθήσει σημαντικά άτομα με ψυχικές διαταραχές. Οι άνθρωποι χρησιμοποιούν τα κοινωνικά δίκτυα όλο και περισσότερο για να εκφράσουν συναισθήματα, συναισθήματα και ψυχικές καταστάσεις. Έτσι, η επεξεργασία αυτών των πληροφοριών με τη χρήση τεχνολογιών μπορεί να εφαρμοστεί στην αυτόματη ανίχνευση ψυχικών προβλημάτων όπως διατροφικές διαταραχές. Ωστόσο, το πρώτο βήμα για την επίλυση του προβλήματος θα πρέπει να είναι η παροχή ενός σώματος για την αξιολόγηση των συστημάτων μας. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εστιάζουμε συγκεκριμένα στην ανίχνευση μηνυμάτων ανορεξίας στο Twitter. Πρώτον, δημιουργήσαμε ένα νέο σώμα tweets που εξάγονται από διαφορετικούς λογαριασμούς, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των μηνυμάτων ανορεξία και μη ανορεξία στα ισπανικά. Το σώμα ονομάζεται ισπανικό σώμα ανίχνευσης ανορεξίας. Για την επικύρωση της αποτελεσματικότητας του σώματος προτείνουμε επίσης διάφορες προσεγγίσεις μηχανικής μάθησης για την αυτόματη ανίχνευση συμπτωμάτων ανορεξίας στο σώμα. Τα καλά αποτελέσματα που επιτεύχθηκαν δείχνουν ότι η εφαρμογή μεθόδων ταξινόμησης κειμένου αποτελεί μια ελπιδοφόρα επιλογή για την ανάπτυξη αυτού του είδους συστήματος αποδεικνύοντας ότι αυτά τα εργαλεία θα μπορούσαν να χρησιμοποιηθούν από επαγγελματίες για να βοηθήσουν στην έγκαιρη ανίχνευση ψυχικών προβλημάτων.', 'hu': 'A mentális egészség a mai társadalom egyik fő aggodalma. A tünetek korai felismerése nagymértékben segíthet a mentális rendellenességekben szenvedőknek. Az emberek egyre inkább használják a közösségi hálózatokat az érzelmek, érzelmek és mentális állapotok kifejezésére. Így ezen információk NLP technológiákkal történő kezelése alkalmazható mentális problémák, például étkezési zavarok automatikus felismerésére. A probléma megoldásának első lépése azonban a rendszereink értékeléséhez egy korpusz biztosítása. Ebben a tanulmányban kifejezetten az anorexia üzenetek felismerésére összpontosítunk a Twitteren. Először is létrehoztunk egy új tweeteket különböző fiókokból, beleértve az anorexia és a nem anorexia üzeneteket spanyolul. A korpusz neve SAD: Spanyol Anorexia Detection corpus. A SAD corpus hatékonyságának validálása érdekében több gépi tanulási megközelítést is javasolunk az anorexia tüneteinek automatikus felismerésére a corpusban. Az elért jó eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a szöveges osztályozási módszerek alkalmazása ígéretes lehetőség az ilyen rendszer kifejlesztésére, amely bizonyítja, hogy ezeket az eszközöket a szakemberek használhatják a mentális problémák korai felismerésében.', 'ka': 'მენტალური ჯანმრთელობა დღეს საზოგადოებაზე ერთი მნიშვნელოვანია. პირველი სიმპტომების განახლება შეიძლება ძალიან მხოლოდ ადამიანებს ფექციური განახლებებით. ადამიანები სოციალური ქსელები უფრო და უფრო მეტი გამოყენებენ ემოციები, სენტიმენტები და მეგონიალური ღირებები. ამიტომ, ეს ინფორმაციის გამოყენება NLP ტექნოლოგიების გამოყენებაში შეიძლება მომხმარებელია მექსიალური პრობლემების ავტომატურად განახსნა, როგორც საჭირო მაგრამ, პირველი ნაწილი პრობლემას გადაწყვება უნდა იყოს, რომ კოპუსს გაუმუშაოთ ჩვენი სისტემები. ჩვენ განსაკუთრებულად Twitter-ში ანორექსია შეტყობინებების განსაკუთრებისთვის გავაკეთებთ. პირველი, ჩვენ შევქმნით ახალი კორპუს ტივიტების განსხვავებული წიგნიდან გამოყენებული ანორექსია და ანორექსია შეტყობინებაში. კჲპოსჟ ჟვ ნაპთფა ჟაე: ჟოანჟკთ ანჲპვკჟთწ ევრვკუთჲნ კჲპოსჟ. SAD კორპუსის ეფექტიურობის გადაწყვეტილებისთვის, ჩვენ ასევე მრავალ მაქინის სწავლების მიღება კორპუსში ავტომატურად ანორექსია სიმპტომების განახსნა. მიიღებული კარგი შედეგი გამოიყენება, რომ ტექსტულ კლასიფიკაციის მეტოვების გამოყენება უნდა გავაკეთება ამ ტიპის სისტემის განვითარება, რომელიც გამოყენება რომ ეს ხელსაწყობილობა პროფეციალების', 'kk': 'Адамдық саулық - бүгінгі қоғамдық негізгі маңыздықтардың бірі. Симптомдардың алдындағы анықтауы психикалық өмірлерімен көмектесе алады. Адамдар әлеуметтік желілерді көп және көп емоцияларды, сезімдерді және психикалық күйлерді көрсету үшін қолданады. Бұл мәліметті NLP технологияларын қолдану үшін психикалық мәселелерді автоматты түрде анықтау үшін қолданылады. Бірақ мәселеді шешу үшін бірінші қадам - жүйелерді бағалау үшін корпус беру керек. Бұл қағазда, Твиттерде анорексия хаттарды табуға арналған. Біріншіден, біз басқа тіркелгілерден анорексия және анорексия емес хаттардың жаңа корпус жасадық. Корпус SAD деп аталады: Испан Анорексия анықтау корпус. АҚШ корпусының эффектілігін тексеру үшін қорпусындағы анорексия симптомаларын автоматты түрде анықтау үшін бірнеше машинаның оқыту арқылы қолданып тұрмыз. Табылған жақсы нәтижелер мәтіндік классификациялау әдістерінің қолданбаның бұл түрлі жүйені жасау үшін бұл құралдарды психикалық мәселелерді алдында анықтау үшін көмектесу үшін көмектес', 'it': "La salute mentale è una delle principali preoccupazioni della società odierna. La diagnosi precoce dei sintomi può aiutare notevolmente le persone con disturbi mentali. Le persone utilizzano sempre di più i social network per esprimere emozioni, sentimenti e stati mentali. Pertanto, il trattamento di queste informazioni utilizzando tecnologie NLP può essere applicato alla rilevazione automatica di problemi mentali come disturbi alimentari. Tuttavia, il primo passo per risolvere il problema dovrebbe essere quello di fornire un corpus per valutare i nostri sistemi. In questo articolo, ci concentriamo specificamente sul rilevamento di messaggi di anoressia su Twitter. In primo luogo, abbiamo generato un nuovo corpus di tweet estratti da diversi account tra cui messaggi di anoressia e non anoressia in spagnolo. Il corpo è chiamato SAD: corpo spagnolo di rilevazione dell'anoressia. Al fine di convalidare l'efficacia del corpo SAD, proponiamo anche diversi approcci di apprendimento automatico per rilevare automaticamente i sintomi dell'anoressia nel corpo. I buoni risultati ottenuti dimostrano che l'applicazione di metodi di classificazione testuale è un'opzione promettente per sviluppare questo tipo di sistema dimostrando che questi strumenti potrebbero essere utilizzati dai professionisti per aiutare nella diagnosi precoce di problemi mentali.", 'lt': 'Mentalinė sveikata yra vienas pagrindinių šiandienos visuomenės problemų. Ankstyvus simptomų nustatymas gali labai padėti žmonėms, sergantiems psichikos sutrikimais. Žmonės vis dažniau naudojasi socialiniais tinklais, kad išreikštų emocijas, jausmus ir psichikos būklę. Taigi šios informacijos apdorojimas naudojant NLP technologijas gali būti taikomas automatiniam psichikos problemų, pavyzdžiui, mitybos sutrikimų, nustatymui. Tačiau pirmasis žingsnis sprendžiant šią problem ą turėtų būti sukurti korpusą, kad būtų galima įvertinti mūsų sistemas. In this paper, we specifically focus on detecting anorexia messages on Twitter.  Pirma, sukūrėme naujus tweetus iš skirtingų sąskaitų, įskaitant pranešimus apie anoreksiją ir ne anoreksiją ispanų kalba. Korpus vadinamas SAD, Ispanijos Anoreksijos aptikimo korpusu. Siekiant patvirtinti SAD korpuso veiksmingumą, taip pat siūlome keletą mašin ų mokymosi metodų, skirtų automatiškai nustatyti anoreksijos simptomus korpuse. Iš gerų gautų rezultatų matyti, kad tekstinės klasifikacijos metodų taikymas yra perspektyvi galimybė sukurti tokią sistemą, įrodančią, kad šios priemonės galėtų būti naudojamos profesionalams siekiant padėti anksti nustatyti psichikos problemas.', 'ms': 'Kesehatan mental adalah salah satu kebimbangan utama masyarakat hari ini. Pengesanan awal simptom boleh sangat membantu orang dengan gangguan mental. Orang menggunakan rangkaian sosial semakin banyak untuk mengekspresikan emosi, perasaan dan keadaan mental. Thus, the treatment of this information using NLP technologies can be applied to the automatic detection of mental problems such as eating disorders.  Bagaimanapun, langkah pertama untuk memecahkan masalah seharusnya untuk menyediakan corpus untuk menilai sistem kita. Dalam kertas ini, kami fokus secara khusus pada mengesan mesej anoreksia di Twitter. Pertama-tama, kami telah menghasilkan sebuah korpus baru tweet yang dikeluarkan dari akaun yang berbeza termasuk mesej anoreksia dan bukan anoreksia dalam bahasa Sepanyol. Korpus dipanggil SAD, Korpus Pengesan Anoreksia Spanyol. In order to validate the effectiveness of the SAD corpus, we also propose several machine learning approaches for automatically detecting anorexia symptoms in the corpus.  Hasil yang baik yang diperoleh menunjukkan bahawa aplikasi kaedah klasifikasi teks adalah pilihan yang berjanji untuk mengembangkan sistem semacam ini menunjukkan bahawa alat-alat ini boleh digunakan oleh profesional untuk membantu dalam pengesan awal masalah mental.', 'mk': "Mental health is one of the main concerns of today's society. Раното детектирање на симптомите може да им помогне на луѓето со ментални проблеми. Луѓето постојано користат социјални мрежи за да изразат емоции, чувства и ментални состојби. Thus, the treatment of this information using NLP technologies can be applied to the automatic detection of mental problems such as eating disorders.  However, the first step to solving the problem should be to provide a corpus in order to evaluate our systems.  Во овој весник, специфично се фокусираме на детектирање на пораки од анорексија на Твитер. Прво, генериравме нов корпус твитови извадени од различни сметки, вклучувајќи анорексија и неанорексија пораки на шпански. Корпусот се вика Шпански Корпус за детективирање на анорексија. За да ја потврдиме ефикасноста на САД корпусот, ние исто така предложуваме неколку пристапи за машинско учење за автоматски детектирање на симптомите на анорексија во корпусот. Добрите добиени резултати покажуваат дека апликацијата на методите на текстуална класификација е ветувачка опција за развој на ваков вид систем кој демонстрира дека овие алатки може да бидат искористени од професионалците за помош во раното откривање на ментални проблеми.", 'ml': 'മാനസിക ആരോഗ്യം ഇന്നുള്ള സമൂഹത്തിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരാളാണ്. സംശയങ്ങളുടെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന് മാനസിക വിഷമങ്ങളുള്ള ആളുകളെ വളരെ സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും. People are using social networks more and more to express emotions, sentiments and mental states.  അതുകൊണ്ട്, NLP സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഈ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ നിയന്ത്രണം പ്രയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയോടെ മാനസിക പ്രശ് എന്നാലും, പ്രശ്നം തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ആദ്യത്തെ പടി നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുവാന്\u200d വേണ് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ടൂട്ടരില്\u200d അന്റേക്സിയ സന്ദേശങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നതിനെ ശ്രദ്ധിക്ക ആദ്യം, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത അക്കൌണ്ടുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുതിയ ടൂട്ടുകളുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അന്റെക്സിയ, സ്പാ ആ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെ സാഡി എന്നാണ് വിളിക്കുന്നത്. സാഡി കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്റെ പ്രകൃതി തെളിയിക്കുവാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിലെ ആനോരെക്സിയായ അടയാളങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പല നല്ല ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ഇത്തരം സിസ്റ്റത്തിനുള്ള പ്രയോഗത്തിനുള്ള പ്രത്യേകം പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാണ്. ഈ ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d മാനസിക പ്രശ', 'no': 'Mentalhelse er ein av dei viktigste bekymringane for samfunnet i dag. Tidlig oppdaging av simptomer kan hjelpa menneske med mentale forstyrrelsar. Folk brukar sosiale nettverk meir og meir for å uttrykke følelser, følelser og mentale tilstandar. Derfor kan behandlinga av denne informasjonen med NLP-teknologiar brukast til automatisk oppdaging av mentalproblemer, slik som oppdaging av forskjeller. Det første steget å løysa problemet må imidlertid vera å gi ei korpus for å evaluera systemet våre. I denne papiret fokuserer vi spesielt på oppdaging av anorexia-meldingar på Twitter. Først har vi laga ein ny korpus av tweeter utpakka frå ulike kontoar, inkludert anorexia og ikkje-anorexia-meldingar i spansk. Corpusen kalles SAD: Spansk Anorexia Detection corpus. For å validera effektiviteten av SAD-korpusen, foreslår vi også fleire tilnærmingar på maskinelæring for automatisk oppdaging av anorexia-simptomer i korpusen. Den gode resultatene som er oppretta viser at programmet med tekstklassifikasjonsmetoder er eit velkommande val for å utvikla denne typen systemet som viser at desse verktøya kan brukast av profesjonale for å hjelpa i tidlegare oppdaging av mentale problemer.', 'mt': 'Is-saħħa mentali hija waħda mit-tħassib prinċipali tas-soċjetà tal-lum. L-individwazzjoni bikrija tas-sintomi tista’ tgħin ħafna lin-nies b’disturbi mentali. In-nies qed jużaw netwerks soċjali dejjem aktar biex jesprimu emozzjonijiet, sentimenti u stati mentali. Thus, the treatment of this information using NLP technologies can be applied to the automatic detection of mental problems such as eating disorders.  Madankollu, l-ewwel pass għas-soluzzjoni tal-problem a għandu jkun li jiġi pprovdut korpus sabiex jiġu evalwati s-sistemi tagħna. F’dan id-dokument, niffokaw b’mod speċifiku fuq l-individwazzjoni ta’ messaġġi ta’ anoressija fuq Twitter. L-ewwel nett, iġġenerajna korpus ġdid ta’ tweets estratti minn kontijiet differenti inklużi messaġġi ta’ anoressija u mhux anoressija bl-Ispanjol. Il-korpus jissejjaħ SAD: Spanish Anorexia Detection corpus. Sabiex tivvalida l-effettività tal-korpus SAD, nipproponu wkoll diversi approċċi ta’ tagħlim bil-magni biex jiġu identifikati awtomatikament sintomi ta’ anoressija fil-korpus. Ir-riżultati tajbin miksuba juru li l-applikazzjoni ta’ metodi ta’ klassifikazzjoni testwali hija għa żla promettenti għall-iżvilupp ta’ din it-tip ta’ sistema li turi li dawn l-għodod jistgħu jintużaw mill-professjonisti biex jgħinu fid-detezzjoni bikrija ta’ problemi mentali.', 'pl': 'Zdrowie psychiczne jest jednym z głównych problemów dzisiejszego społeczeństwa. Wczesne wykrywanie objawów może znacznie pomóc osobom z zaburzeniami psychicznymi. Ludzie coraz częściej korzystają z sieci społecznościowych do wyrażania emocji, sentymentów i stanów psychicznych. W ten sposób traktowanie tych informacji za pomocą technologii NLP można zastosować do automatycznego wykrywania problemów psychicznych, takich jak zaburzenia odżywiania. Jednak pierwszym krokiem do rozwiązania tego problemu powinno być dostarczenie korpusu do oceny naszych systemów. W niniejszym artykule skupiamy się szczególnie na wykrywaniu wiadomości o anoreksji na Twitterze. Po pierwsze, stworzyliśmy nowy korpus tweetów wyciąganych z różnych kont, w tym wiadomości o anoreksji i non-anoreksji w języku hiszpańskim. Ciało nazywa się SAD: Spanish Anorexia Detection corpus. W celu zweryfikowania skuteczności korpusu SAD proponujemy również kilka metod uczenia maszynowego do automatycznego wykrywania objawów anoreksji w ciele. Uzyskane dobre wyniki pokazują, że zastosowanie metod klasyfikacji tekstowej jest obiecującą opcją rozwoju tego rodzaju systemu pokazującą, że narzędzia te mogą być wykorzystywane przez profesjonalistów do pomocy we wczesnym wykrywaniu problemów psychicznych.', 'sr': 'Mentalno zdravlje je jedna od glavnih briga današnjeg društva. Rano otkrivanje simptoma može mnogo pomoći ljudima sa mentalnim poremećajima. Ljudi koriste društvene mreže više i više da bi izrazili emocije, osjećaje i mentalne stanje. Dakle, liječenje ovih informacija koristeći NLP tehnologije može se primjenjivati na automatsko otkrivanje mentalnih problema poput poremećaja jela. Međutim, prvi korak u rješavanju problem a treba biti pružanje korpusa kako bi procenili naše sisteme. U ovom papiru, posebno se fokusiramo na otkrivanje anoreksije poruka na Twitter. Prvo smo stvorili novi korpus tweeta izvučen iz različitih računa uključujući anoreksiju i ne anoreksiju poruke na španjolskom jeziku. Korpus se zove SAD: španjolski detektivni korpus Anoreksije. Da bismo potvrdili učinkovitost korpusa SAD-a, predlažemo i nekoliko pristupa učenja strojeva za automatski otkrivanje simptoma anoreksije u korpusu. Dobri rezultati dobijenih pokazuju da je primjena tekstualnih metoda klasifikacije obećavajuća opcija za razvoj ovakvog sistema koji pokazuje da bi te alate mogle koristiti profesionalci da bi pomogli u ranom otkrivanju mentalnih problema.', 'ro': 'Sănătatea mintală este una dintre principalele preocupări ale societății de astăzi. Detectarea timpurie a simptomelor poate ajuta foarte mult persoanele cu tulburări mentale. Oamenii folosesc rețelele sociale din ce în ce mai mult pentru a exprima emoții, sentimente și stări mentale. Astfel, tratamentul acestor informații folosind tehnologii PNL poate fi aplicat pentru detectarea automată a problemelor mentale, cum ar fi tulburările alimentare. Cu toate acestea, primul pas spre rezolvarea problemei ar trebui să fie furnizarea unui corpus pentru a evalua sistemele noastre. În această lucrare, ne concentrăm în mod specific pe detectarea mesajelor anorexie pe Twitter. În primul rând, am generat un nou corpus de tweet extrase din diferite conturi, inclusiv mesaje de anorexie și non-anorexie în limba spaniolă. Corpul se numește SAD: corpul spaniol de detectare a anorexiei. Pentru a valida eficacitatea corpului SAD, propunem, de asemenea, mai multe abordări de machine learning pentru detectarea automată a simptomelor anorexiei în corp. Rezultatele bune obținute arată că aplicarea metodelor de clasificare textuală este o opțiune promițătoare pentru dezvoltarea acestui tip de sistem, demonstrând că aceste instrumente ar putea fi utilizate de profesioniști pentru a ajuta la detectarea timpurie a problemelor mentale.', 'mn': 'Өнөөдрийн сэтгэл санааны эрүүл мэндийн нэг нь өнөөдрийн нийгмийн хамгийн чухал асуудал юм. Эртний шинж тэмдэг сэтгэл зүйн өвчинтэй хүмүүст маш их туслах боломжтой. Хүмүүс сэтгэл хөдлөл, сэтгэл хөдлөл, сэтгэл санааны төвшин илэрхийлдэг нийгмийн сүлжээг ашиглаж байна. Иймээс NLP технологийг ашиглаж байгаа мэдээллийн эмгэгийг автоматжуулахад ашиглаж болно. Гэхдээ асуудлыг шийдэх анхны алхам бол системийг үнэлэх үед корпус хангах хэрэгтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Твиттерт анорексиа захиаг олохын тулд төвлөрөх болно. Эхлээд бид өөр олон тоонуудаас анорексиа болон анорексиа бус захиргааны шинэ tweets үүсгэсэн. Корпус нь САД гэж нэрлэдэг: Испан Анорексиа Detection corpus. АНУ-ын корпусын үр дүнг баталахын тулд бид корпусын анорексийн симптомуудыг автоматжуулахын тулд олон машин суралцах арга зам зааж өгдөг. Эдгээр сайн үр дүнүүд нь textual classification methodoудын хэрэглээ нь сэтгэл санааны асуудлыг эхлээд олж мэдэхэд эдгээр хэрэгслүүдийг мэргэжилтнүүд ашиглаж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'sv': 'Psykisk hälsa är en av de viktigaste frågorna i dagens samhälle. Tidig upptäckt av symtom kan i hög grad hjälpa människor med psykiska störningar. Människor använder sociala nätverk mer och mer för att uttrycka känslor, känslor och mentala tillstånd. Behandlingen av denna information med hjälp av NLP-teknik kan därför tillämpas för automatisk upptäckt av psykiska problem som ätstörningar. Det första steget mot att lösa problemet bör dock vara att tillhandahålla en korpus för att utvärdera våra system. I denna uppsats fokuserar vi specifikt på att upptäcka anorexi meddelanden på Twitter. För det första har vi genererat en ny samling tweets extraherade från olika konton inklusive anorexi och icke-anorexi meddelanden på spanska. Korpusen kallas SAD: Spanish Anorexia Detection corpus. För att validera SAD-korpusens effektivitet föreslår vi också flera maskininlärningsmetoder för att automatiskt upptäcka anorexiesymptom i korpusen. De goda resultat som erhållits visar att tillämpningen av textklassificeringsmetoder är ett lovande alternativ för att utveckla denna typ av system som visar att dessa verktyg kan användas av yrkesverksamma för att hjälpa till att tidigt upptäcka psykiska problem.', 'so': 'Caafimaadka dhimirku waa mid ka mid ah arimaha ugu weyn ee bulshada maanta. Markii hore la ogaado calaamadaha waxaa aad u caawinaya dadka qaba cudurada dhimirka. Dadku waxay isticmaalayaan shabakado bulshada oo ka badan si ay u muujiyaan fikrado, fekero iyo xaaladaha dhimirka. Sidaa darteed daryeelka macluumaadkaas oo isticmaalaya teknolojiyada NLP waxaa lagu codsan karaa caddeynta caafimaadka dhimirka sida cuntada cudurada dhimirka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee jardiinada ugu horeysa ee ay dhibaatada u xalaabto waa in la bixiyaa naafad si ay u qiimeyso nidaamka. Warqadan waxaynu si gaar ah ugu fiirsanaynaa in aan soo ogaano warqadaha anorexia ee Twitterka. Marka ugu horeysay, waxaynu soo saarnay warqad cusub oo twitter ah oo laga soo saaray xisaabo kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ah anorexia iyo farrixiyada Isbanish ee aan anorexia aheyn. Korpus waxaa loogu magacaabaa SAD: Isbanish Anorexia Korpus. In order to validate the effectiveness of the SAD corpus, we also propose several machine learning approaches for automatically detecting anorexia symptoms in the corpus.  Midhaha wanaagsan ee la helay waxay tustaa in codsashada qaababka kooxaha qoraalka ah waa doorasho wanaagsan oo horumarinta nidaamkan caynkan ah, waxayna caddaynaysaa in xirfadaha loo isticmaali karo si ay ugu caawiyaan baaritaanka dhibaatooyinka dhimirka.', 'si': 'අද සමාජයේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. ප්\u200dරාරම්භ සංඥාවක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් මානසික ව්\u200dයාපාර වලට මිනිස්සුන්ට ගොඩක් උදව් කරන මිනිස්සු සාමාජික ජාතික ජාතික වලට වඩා වැඩියි, හැඟීම, හැඟීම සහ මානසික ජාතික වලට ප්\u200dර එහෙනම්, NLP තාක්ෂණය භාවිතා කරන්න මේ තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාලික ඒත්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න පළමු පැත්තක් තමයි අපේ පද්ධතිය අවශ්\u200dයය කරන්න කොර්පස් එකක් දෙන්න ඕනි. මේ පත්තරේ අපි විශේෂයෙන් ට්විටර් වල අනොරෙක්සියා පණිවිඩය හොයාගන්න බලන්න. මුලින්ම, අපි වෙනස් ගිණුම් වලින් අනොරෙක්සියා සහ අනොරෙක්සියා පණිවිඩයක් ස්පැනිස් වලින් අලුත් ට්විට් වලි කොර්පුස් එක SAD කියලා: ස්පැනිස් ඇනොරෙක්සියා හොයාගන්න කොර්පුස්. SAD කොර්පුස්ගේ පරීක්ෂණත්වය සඳහා පරීක්ෂා කරන්න, අපි කොර්පුස් වලින් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවට අනොරෙක්සියා සංඥාවක් පරීක්ෂ හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පරික්ෂණ පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනය තමයි මේ වර්ගයේ පද්ධතිය විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේ', 'ta': 'மனநோய் ஆரோக்கம் இன்று சமூகத்தின் முக்கிய கவலைகளில் ஒன்று. குறியீடுகளின் முதல் கண்டுபிடிப்பு முக்கியமாக மனிதர்களுக்கு மிகவும் உதவ முடியும். மக்கள் சமூக வலைப்பின்னல்களை பயன்படுத்தி உணர்வுகள், உணர்வுகள் மற்றும் மனநிலைகளை வெளிப்படுத்த முடியும். அதனால், NLP தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பயன்படுத்தி இந்த தகவலின் சிகிச்சை தானாகவே கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும். எனினும், பிரச்சனையை தீர்க்க முதல் படி நமது கணினிகளை மதிப்பிடுவதற்காக ஒரு கோப்புஸ் வழங்க வேண்டும். இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் குறிப்பாக தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளோம் ஆனாரிக்சியா செய்திகளை தெரிந் முதலில், நாங்கள் வேறு கணக்கிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட ஒரு புதிய குறிப்பை உருவாக்கியுள்ளோம், ஆனாரெக்சியா மற்றும் ஸ்பான இந்த கார்புஸ் SAD என்று அழைக்கப்படுகிறது: ஸ்பானிஷ் அனோர்க்சியா கண்டுபிடிப்பு கார்புஸ். SAD கோர்ப்ஸின் விளைவை சரிபார்க்க, நாம் சில இயந்திரம் கற்றுக்கொள்ள முறைகளை தானாகவே கார்ப்ஸியா குறிப்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க நிறை நல்ல முடிவுகள் கிடைக்கப்பட்டது என்று காட்டுகிறது நிரல் வகைப்படுத்தல் முறைமைகளை பயன்படுத்தும் இது முறைமையை உருவாக்குவதற்கு ஒரு வாக்குறுதியான வ', 'ur': 'مذہب سلامتی آج کے اجتماعی میں سے ایک ہے۔ علائم کی پہلی تشخیص لوگوں کو روانی اختلاف کے ساتھ بہت زیادہ مدد کر سکتی ہے۔ لوگوں نے سوسیل نیٹورک اور زیادہ احساسات، احساسات اور روانی حالت کا استعمال کیا ہے۔ اسی طرح، NLP ٹیکنالوجیوں کے استعمال سے اس معلومات کا تحقیق اسے ذهنی مشکلات کی آگاہ کرنا کے لئے استعمال کر سکتا ہے جیسے کھانے کی بیماری۔ However, the first step to solve the problem should be to provide a corpus in order to evaluate our systems. اس کاغذ میں ہم مخصوص طور پر توئیٹر پر آنورکسی پیغام پہنچانے پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں۔ پہلی بار، ہم نے ایک نوی کورپوس پیدا کی ہے جو مختلف حساب سے نکالا گیا ہے اور اسپانیایی میں غیر آنورکسی پیغام کے ساتھ۔ کورپوس کا نام SAD ہے: اسپانیایی آنوراکسیا آشنائی کورپوس۔ اس لئے کہ SAD کورپوس کے فعالیت کی تصدیق کریں، ہم نے کرپوس میں بہت سی ماشین سکونت کی طریقے کی پیشنهاد کریں۔ اچھے نتیجے پائے گئے دکھائے گئے کہ textual classification methodologies کا کاروبار ایک وعدہ دینے والی اختیار ہے اس طرح کی سیستم کی تولید کرنے کے لئے جو دکھائے جاتے ہیں کہ یہ ابزار مسئلہ کی پہلے اگلوں میں مدد کرنے کے لئے استعمال کر سکتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Menyuk caafimaad bugun jamiyatning eng asosiy haqida biri. Belgilarni avval aniqlash qo'llanmalarning miya kasalliklari bilan juda yordam beradi. Odamlar jamiyat tarmoqlaridan foydalanadi va hissiyotni, hissiyotni va fikr holatlarni hisoblash uchun. Shunday qilib, bu maʼlumotni NLP teknologiya yordamida boshqarish mumkin, o'xshash kasalliklarni o'rganish uchun avtomatik aniqlash mumkin. Lekin, muammolarni o'zgartirish uchun birinchi qadam bu tizimmizni qiymatga qopyuz berish kerak. Bu hujjatda, biz Twitter'da anorexia xabarlarini aniqlashga foydalanamiz. Birinchi marta, biz Ispanchadan boshqa hisoblardan anireksi va anoreksiya xabarlarni yaratdik. Korpus SAD deb nomlanadi: Ispancha Anoreksa aniqlash korpusi. SAD corpusning effektini tekshirish uchun biz ko'p mashinalar o'rganish usullarini avtomatik anireksiya symptomlarini aniqlash uchun o'ylaymiz. Yaxshi natijalar ko'rsatadi, texnological classification usullarning dasturi bu tizimning turini yaratish uchun ishlatiladi. Bu asboblarni tajriba muammolarni o'rganish uchun ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Tâm thần khỏe là một trong những mối quan tâm chính của xã hội hôm nay. Việc phát hiện sớm các triệu chứng có thể giúp đỡ rất nhiều người bị rối loạn thần kinh. Người ta càng lúc càng dùng mạng xã hội để thể hiện cảm xúc, cảm xúc và trạng thái tinh thần. Việc điều trị thông tin này bằng công nghệ Njala có thể được áp dụng cho việc phát hiện tự động các vấn đề thần kinh như rối loạn ăn uống. Tuy nhiên, bước đầu tiên để giải quyết vấn đề nên là cung cấp một tập thể để đánh giá hệ thống của chúng ta. Trong tờ báo này, chúng tôi đặc biệt tập trung vào việc phát hiện tin nhắn biếng ăn trên Twitter. Đầu tiên, chúng tôi đã tạo ra tập hợp các dòng tweet mới được lấy từ các tài khoản khác nhau bao gồm ngôn ngữ biếng ăn và thông điệp không biếng ăn tại Tây Ban Nha. Cơ thể hiện có tên là SAD: giấu diếm tiếng Tây Ban Nha. Để xác minh hiệu quả của tập đoàn SAD, chúng tôi cũng đề xuất vài phương pháp học máy để tự động phát hiện triệu chứng biếng ăn trong tập thể. Những kết quả tốt cho thấy việc sử dụng các phương pháp phân hạng kết cấu là một lựa chọn hứa hẹn để phát triển loại hệ thống này cho thấy những công cụ này có thể được người chuyên nghiệp sử dụng để giúp đỡ khám phá các vấn đề tâm thần sớm.', 'bg': 'Психичното здраве е едно от основните притеснения на днешното общество. Ранното откриване на симптомите може значително да помогне на хората с психични разстройства. Хората използват социалните мрежи все повече и повече, за да изразят емоции, чувства и психически състояния. По този начин лечението на тази информация с помощта на НЛП технологии може да се приложи за автоматично откриване на психични проблеми като хранителни разстройства. Първата стъпка към решаването на проблема обаче трябва да бъде предоставянето на корпус за оценка на нашите системи. В тази статия ние специално се фокусираме върху откриването на анорексия съобщения в Туитър. Първо, създадохме нов корпус от туитове, извлечени от различни профили, включително анорексия и съобщения, които не са анорексия на испански език. Корпусът се нарича Испански корпус за откриване на анорексия. За да се валидира ефективността на корпуса, предлагаме и няколко подхода за машинно обучение за автоматично откриване на симптомите на анорексия в корпуса. Добрите резултати показват, че прилагането на текстови класификационни методи е обещаващ вариант за разработване на такъв вид система, демонстрирайки, че тези инструменти могат да бъдат използвани от професионалистите за ранно откриване на психични проблеми.', 'da': 'Mental sundhed er en af de vigtigste bekymringer i dagens samfund. Tidlig påvisning af symptomer kan i høj grad hjælpe mennesker med psykiske lidelser. Folk bruger sociale netværk mere og mere til at udtrykke følelser, følelser og mentale tilstande. Behandlingen af disse oplysninger ved hjælp af NLP-teknologier kan således anvendes til automatisk detektering af mentale problemer såsom spiseforstyrrelser. Men det første skridt til at løse problemet bør være at tilvejebringe et korpus for at evaluere vores systemer. I denne artikel fokuserer vi specifikt på at opdage anoreksi beskeder på Twitter. For det første har vi genereret et nyt korpus af tweets udvundet fra forskellige konti, herunder anoreksi og non-anoreksi beskeder på spansk. Korpusset kaldes SAD: Spansk Anorexia Detection corpus. For at validere effektiviteten af SAD corpus foreslår vi også flere maskinlæringsmetoder til automatisk detektering af anoreksi symptomer i corpus. De gode resultater viser, at anvendelsen af tekstklassifikationsmetoder er en lovende mulighed for at udvikle denne form for system, der viser, at disse værktøjer kan bruges af fagfolk til at hjælpe med tidlig opdagelse af psykiske problemer.', 'hr': 'Mentalno zdravlje je jedna od glavnih briga današnjeg društva. Rano otkrivanje simptoma može pomoći ljudima s mentalnim poremećajima. Ljudi koriste društvene mreže više i više kako bi izrazili emocije, osjećaje i mentalne stanje. Stoga se liječenje tih informacija koristeći NLP tehnologije može primjenjivati na automatsko otkrivanje mentalnih problema poput poremećaja jela. Međutim, prvi korak za rješavanje problem a treba biti pružanje korpusa kako bi procijenio naše sustave. U ovom papiru, posebno se fokusiramo na otkrivanje poruka anoreksije na Twitter-u. Prvo smo stvorili novi korpus tweeta izvučen iz različitih računa uključujući anoreksiju i ne anoreksiju poruke na španjolskom jeziku. Corpus se zove SAD: španjolski Anorexia Detection corpus. Da bismo potvrdili učinkovitost SAD korpusa, predlažemo i nekoliko pristupa učenja strojeva za automatski otkrivanje simptoma anoreksije u korpusu. Dobri dobiveni rezultati pokazuju da je primjena tekstualnih metoda klasifikacije obećavajuća opcija za razvoj ovakvog sustava pokazujući da bi te alate mogle koristiti profesionalci kako bi pomogli u ranom otkrivanju mentalnih problema.', 'de': 'Psychische Gesundheit ist eines der Hauptanliegen der heutigen Gesellschaft. Früherkennung von Symptomen kann Menschen mit psychischen Störungen sehr helfen. Menschen nutzen soziale Netzwerke mehr und mehr, um Emotionen, Gefühle und mentale Zustände auszudrücken. So kann die Behandlung dieser Informationen mittels NLP-Technologien auf die automatische Erkennung psychischer Probleme wie Essstörungen angewendet werden. Der erste Schritt zur Lösung des Problems sollte jedoch darin bestehen, ein Korpus zur Bewertung unserer Systeme bereitzustellen. In diesem Beitrag konzentrieren wir uns speziell auf die Erkennung von Anorexie-Nachrichten auf Twitter. Erstens haben wir einen neuen Korpus von Tweets generiert, die aus verschiedenen Konten extrahiert wurden, einschließlich Anorexie- und Nicht-Anorexie-Nachrichten auf Spanisch. Der Korpus wird SAD genannt: Spanish Anorexia Detection corpus. Um die Wirksamkeit des SAD-Korpus zu validieren, schlagen wir außerdem verschiedene maschinelle Lernansätze vor, um Anorexie-Symptome im Korpus automatisch zu erkennen. Die guten Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die Anwendung textueller Klassifikationsmethoden eine vielversprechende Option für die Entwicklung eines solchen Systems ist und zeigt, dass diese Werkzeuge von Fachleuten zur Früherkennung psychischer Probleme eingesetzt werden können.', 'id': 'Kesehatan mental adalah salah satu kepentingan utama masyarakat hari ini. Deteksi awal gejala bisa sangat membantu orang-orang dengan gangguan mental. Orang-orang menggunakan jaringan sosial semakin banyak untuk mengekspresikan emosi, perasaan dan kondisi mental. Jadi, pengobatan informasi ini menggunakan teknologi NLP dapat diaplikasikan untuk deteksi otomatis masalah mental seperti gangguan makan. Namun, langkah pertama untuk memecahkan masalah seharusnya untuk menyediakan corpus untuk mengevaluasi sistem kita. In this paper, we specifically focus on detecting anorexia messages on Twitter.  Pertama, kami telah menghasilkan sebuah tubuh baru tweet yang dikeluarkan dari rekening yang berbeda termasuk pesan anoreksia dan non-anoreksia dalam bahasa Spanyol. Korpus disebut SAD: Korpus Deteksi Anoreksia Spanyol. Untuk mengkvalifikasi efektivitas SAD corpus, kami juga menyarankan beberapa pendekatan pembelajaran mesin untuk mendeteksi otomatis gejala anoreksia di corpus. Hasil yang baik yang diperoleh menunjukkan bahwa aplikasi metode klasifikasi tekstual adalah pilihan yang berjanji untuk mengembangkan sistem semacam ini yang menunjukkan bahwa alat-alat ini dapat digunakan oleh profesional untuk membantu dalam deteksi awal masalah mental.', 'ko': '심리 건강은 현재 사회가 주목하는 주요 문제 중의 하나다.증상을 조기 발견하면 정신장애 환자를 크게 도울 수 있다.사람들은 점점 더 많은 소셜네트워크서비스를 이용하여 감정, 정서와 심리 상태를 표현한다.따라서 NLP 기술을 사용하여 이러한 정보를 처리하면 자동적으로 정신 문제, 예를 들어 음식 조절을 감지하는 데 응용할 수 있다.그러나 이 문제를 해결하는 첫 번째 단계는 우리의 시스템을 평가하기 위한 자료 라이브러리를 제공하는 것이다.이 글은 특히 트위터에서 거식증 정보를 검출하는 데 주목한다.우선 스페인어의 거식증과 비거식증 정보를 포함한 새로운 트위터 자료 라이브러리를 다른 계정에서 추출했다.이 자료고는 SAD: 스페인 거식증 검측 자료고라고 불린다.SAD 자료 라이브러리의 유효성을 검증하기 위해 우리는 몇 가지 기계 학습 방법을 제시하여 자료 라이브러리의 식욕 증세를 자동으로 측정한다.좋은 결과에 의하면 텍스트 분류 방법의 응용은 이런 시스템을 개발하는 데 매우 희망적인 선택이고 이런 도구는 전문가들이 심리적 문제를 조기 발견하는 데 도움을 줄 수 있음을 나타낸다.', 'fa': 'سلامتی ذهنی یکی از نگرانی اصلی جامعه امروز است. شناسايي اولين علائم ها ميتونه به مردم کمک کنه مردم از شبکه های اجتماعی بیشتر و بیشتر استفاده می کنند تا احساسات، احساسات و وضعیت روانی را بیان کند. بنابراین، درمان این اطلاعات با استفاده از تکنولوژی NLP می\u200cتواند به کشف خودکار مشکلات روانی مانند غذایی استفاده شود. ولی اولین قدم برای حل مشکل باید یک جسد را برای ارزیابی سیستم\u200cهای ما تحویل دهیم. در این کاغذ، ما مخصوصاً روی پیغام\u200cهای آنورکسی روی توئیتر تمرکز می\u200cکنیم. اول، ما یک کورپوس جدید از توئیت\u200cها از حساب\u200cهای مختلف بیرون آورده\u200cایم که شامل آنوراکسیا و پیغام\u200cهای غیر آنوراکسیا در اسپانیایی است. کورپوس به اسم SAD: کورپوس بازرسی آنورکسیا اسپانیایی است. برای تأثیر فعالیت کارپوس ایالات متحده آمریکا، ما همچنین چند دستور یادگیری ماشین را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که برای خودکار نشانه\u200cهای anorexia در کورپوس شناسایی کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای خوب که به دست آورده\u200cاند نشان می\u200cدهند که کاربرد روش\u200cهای مختصات متن یک گزینه\u200cی قول\u200cدهنده برای توسعه این نوع سیستم است که نشان می\u200cدهد که این ابزارها می\u200cتوانند توسط حرفه\u200cای استفاده کنند تا در آشنایی اولین مشکلات روانی کمک', 'sw': 'Afya ya akili ni moja ya hofu kubwa ya jamii ya leo. Ugunduzi wa awali wa dalili zinaweza kuwasaidia watu wenye ugonjwa wa akili. Watu wanatumia mitandao ya kijamii zaidi na zaidi ya kuonyesha hisia, hisia na matamko ya akili. Kwa hiyo, matibabu ya taarifa hizi kwa kutumia teknolojia ya NLP inaweza kutumika kwa ajili ya kutambua matatizo ya akili kama vile kula magonjwa. Hata hivyo, hatua ya kwanza ya kutatua tatizo lazima ni kutoa viungo ili kutathmini mifumo yetu. Katika karatasi hii, tunajikita kwa kutafuta ujumbe wa anorexia kwenye mtandao wa Twita. Kwanza, tumetengeneza makampuni mpya ya twiti zilizotolewa kutoka akaunti tofauti ikiwa ni pamoja na ujumbe wa anorexia na ujumbe usio wa-anorexia nchini Kihispania. Kampuni hiyo inaitwa SAD: Corpus ya Kuchunguza Anorexia ya Kihispania. Ili kuthibitisha ufanisi wa mashirika ya SAD, pia tunapendekeza mbinu kadhaa za kujifunza mashine kwa ajili ya kutambua alama za anorexia katika makampuni hayo. Matokeo mazuri yaliyopata yanaonyesha kuwa matumizi ya mbinu za usambazaji wa kimsingi ni chaguo la kuaminisha mfumo huu unaoonyesha kuwa zana hizi zinaweza kutumika na wataalam ili kusaidia kutambua matatizo ya akili mapema.', 'tr': 'Mensiýet saglygyny şu gün jemgyýetiň esasy aladalaryndan biri. Garyplaryň irräk tanyşy akylly näsazlyklary bilen adamlara kömek edip biler. Adamlar sosyal şebekeleri duýgular, duýgular we duýgular ýagdaýyny görkezmek üçin köpräk ulanýarlar. Şonuň üçin NLP tehnologiýalaryny ulanýan bu maglumatyň tedavisi özüni iýjek hasaplarynyň ýaly aýtsagy meselelerini otomatik aňlamaga uygulanabilir. Ýöne problemalary çözmek üçin birinji adım sistemimizi değerlendirmek üçin bir korpus sağlamak gerekli. Bu kagyzda, Twitter-iň üstünde laýyk mesajlary açmak üçin üns berýäris. Birinjisi, birnäçe esaplardan çykylýan täze tweet corpusu bejerdik. Korpusa SAD adlanýar: Ispanýolça Anorexia Detection corpus. SAD korpusynyň etkinliýetini barlamak üçin biz hem korpusda anoreksiýa işaretlerini otomatik aňlamak üçin birnäçe maşynyň öwrenmegi golaýyny maslahat berýäris. Gowy netijeler tapyldy çünki metin klasifikasyon yöntemleriniň uygulamasy çykarmak üçin bir söz wajypdyr. Bu ýaly sistemiň gelişmegi üçin bu enjamlaryň käreleriň ýüzüniň garşy meseleleriniň irräk a çmagynda kömek etmek üçin ullanýandygyny gö', 'sq': 'Shëndetja mentale është një nga shqetësimet kryesore të shoqërisë s ë sotme. Zbulimi i parakohshëm i simptomeve mund të ndihmojë shumë njerëzit me shqetësime mentale. Njerëzit po përdorin rrjetet shoqërore gjithnjë e më shumë për të shprehur emocione, ndjenja dhe gjendje mentale. Kështu, trajtimi i këtij informacioni duke përdorur teknologjitë NLP mund të aplikohet në zbulimin automatik të problemeve mendore të tilla si shqetësimet ushqimore. Megjithatë, hapi i parë për zgjidhjen e problemit duhet të jetë të ofrojmë një korpus me qëllim që të vlerësojmë sistemet tona. In this paper, we specifically focus on detecting anorexia messages on Twitter.  Së pari, kemi gjeneruar një korpus të ri tweets të nxjerrë nga llogaritë e ndryshme duke përfshirë mesazhe anoreksie dhe jo anoreksie në spanjoll. Korpus quhet SAD. Për të vlerësuar efektshmërinë e korpusit SAD, propozojmë gjithashtu disa metoda mësimi automatik për të zbuluar automatikisht simptomet e anoreksisë në korpus. Rezultatet e mira të fituara tregojnë se zbatimi i metodave të klasifikimit tekstual është një opsion premtues për zhvillimin e këtij lloji sistemi që demonstron se këto mjete mund të përdoren nga profesionistët për të ndihmuar në zbulimin e parakohshëm të problemeve mendore.', 'af': "Mental gesondheid is een van die hoofbelang van vandag se samelewing. Vroeg opdekking van simptome kan baie help mense met mense met menslike dissonderhede. Mense gebruik sosiale netwerke meer en meer om emosies, sentimente en menslike staatste te uitdruk. Daarom kan die behandeling van hierdie inligting met gebruik van NLP-teknologies aanwend word na die outomatiese opdecking van menslike probleme soos eet mislukke. Maar die eerste stap om die probleem te los moet wees om 'n korpus te verskaf om ons stelsels te evalueer. In hierdie papier, ons spesifieke fokus op anorexia boodskappe op Twitter. Eerste het ons 'n nuwe korpus van tweets genereer wat uit verskillende rekeninge uitgevoer het, insluitend anorexia en non-anorexia boodskappe in Spaanse. Die korpus word SAD genoem: Spaanse Anorexia Detection corpus. Om die effektiviteit van die SAD korpus te bevestig, voorstel ons ook verskeie masjien leer toegang vir outomaties anorexia simptome in die korpus te ontdek. Die goeie resultate wat ontvang het vertoon dat die aansoek van tekstuele klasifikasie metodes 'n beloftende opsie is vir die ontwikkeling van hierdie soort stelsel wat wys dat hierdie nutsprogramme deur profesionales gebruik kan word om hulp te help in die vroeg opslag van mentale probleme.", 'nl': 'Geestelijke gezondheid is een van de belangrijkste zorgen van de huidige samenleving. Vroegtijdige detectie van symptomen kan mensen met psychische stoornissen enorm helpen. Mensen gebruiken sociale netwerken steeds meer om emoties, gevoelens en mentale toestanden uit te drukken. Zo kan de behandeling van deze informatie met behulp van NLP-technologieën worden toegepast op de automatische detectie van psychische problemen zoals eetstoornissen. De eerste stap naar het oplossen van het probleem zou echter moeten zijn om een corpus te verstrekken om onze systemen te evalueren. In dit artikel richten we ons specifiek op het detecteren van anorexiaberichten op Twitter. Ten eerste hebben we een nieuw corpus tweets gegenereerd uit verschillende accounts, waaronder anorexia en non-anorexia berichten in het Spaans. Het corpus heet SAD: Spanish Anorexia Detection corpus. Om de effectiviteit van het SAD corpus te valideren, stellen we ook verschillende machine learning benaderingen voor voor het automatisch detecteren van anorexia symptomen in het corpus. De goede resultaten laten zien dat de toepassing van tekstuele classificatiemethoden een veelbelovende optie is voor de ontwikkeling van dit soort systemen, waaruit blijkt dat deze hulpmiddelen door professionals kunnen worden gebruikt om te helpen bij het vroegtijdig opsporen van psychische problemen.', 'am': 'የmental ጤና የዛሬ ማኅበረሰብ መጀመሪያ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ የመጀመሪያው ምልክቶች ማግኘት የmental በሽብር ውስጥ ሰዎችን እጅግ ይረዳል፡፡ ሰዎች ማኅበራዊ መረብ እውቀትን፣ ስሜቶችን እና አካባቢ ሀብትን ለመናገር ይጨምሩ፡፡ ስለዚህ የዚህ መረጃ ማቀናቀል NLP ቴክኖሎጂ በመጠቀም እንደምትበላው ድካም እንዳለ የmental ችግር መግለጫ በራሱ ላይ ለመጠየቅ ይችላል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የችግሩን መፍታት የመጀመሪያ እርምጃዎች ሲስተምር የቆርፓስ መስኮት ማድረግ ይገባዋል፡፡ በዚህ ጋዜጠኛ፣ በትዊተር ላይ የአንሬክሲን መልእክት ለማግኘት እናስከትናለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ፣ በተለያዩ አካባቢዎች ላይ እና በስፓኒሽ ሳይሆን የአንሬክሲያ መልዕክቶች እና የኢንተርክሲ ያልሆነውን አዲስ የTwitteets አወራጅተናል፡፡ የቆርፓስ ስፓኒሽ አናንሮክያ የቆርፓስ ቆርፓስ ነው። የSAD ኮርፓስ ጥቅም ለማረጋገጥ፣ በኮርፓስ ውስጥ የአንተርክሲ ምልክቶችን አውቶማቲ ለማግኘት ብዙዎችን የመረጃ ትምህርት መግለጫ እናዘጋጅታለን፡፡ የመልካም ፍሬዎች የተገኘው የጽሑፍ መክፈቻ ሥርዓት መግለጫ ይህ ዓይነት ሥርዓት ማሳሳየት የተስፋ ምርጫ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Հոգեկան առողջությունը այսօրվա հասարակության հիմնական խնդիրներից մեկն է: Անխտանիշների վաղ հայտնաբերումը կարող է շատ օգնել մտավոր խանգարումներով հիվանդներին: Մարդիկ ավելի ու ավելի են օգտագործում սոցիալական ցանցերը զգացմունքների, զգացմունքների և մտավոր վիճակների արտահայտության համար: Այսպիսով, այս ինֆորմացիայի բուժումը օգտագործելով ՆԼՊ տեխնոլոգիաներ կարող է կիրառվել մտավոր խնդիրների, ինչպիսիք են սննդի շեղումները, ավտոմատիկ հայտնաբերման համար: However, the first step to solving the problem should be to provide a corpus in order to evaluate our systems.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք հատկապես կենտրոնանում ենք անորեքսիայի հաղորդագրությունների հայտնաբերման վրա Թվիթերում: Առաջինը, մենք ստեղծել ենք նոր թվիթերի մարմին, որոնք ստացվել են տարբեր հաշվարկներից, ներառյալ անորեքսիայի և անորեքսիայի հաղորդագրությունները իսպաներեն: Կորպուսը կոչվում է ՍԱԴ. Իսպաներեն Անորեքսիայի հայտնաբերման կորպուս: ՍԱԴ կորպոսի արդյունավետության հավասարման համար մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք մի քանի մեքենային ուսումնասիրության մոտեցումներ, որոնք օգտագործում են մարմնի անորեքսիայի ախտանիշները ինքնաբերաբար հայտնաբերելու համար: Լավ արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ տեքստալ դասակարգման մեթոդների կիրառումը խոստացող տարբերակ է այս տեսակի համակարգի զարգացման համար, որը ցույց է տալիս, որ այս գործիքները կարող են օգտագործվել մասնագետների կողմից, որպեսզի օգնեն մտավոր խնդի', 'bn': 'মানসিক স্বাস্থ্য আজকের সমাজের প্রধান উদ্বেগ। প্রাথমিক সংক্রান্ত প্রতীক সনাক্ত করতে পারে মানসিক বিপর্যয়ের মাধ্যমে। মানুষ সামাজিক যোগাযোগ নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করছে অনুভূতি, আবেগ এবং মানসিক বিষয়টি প্রকাশের জন্য। এনএলপি প্রযুক্তি ব্যবহার করে এই তথ্যের চিকিৎসা প্রয়োগ করা যায় স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মানসিক সমস্যার সনাক্ত করা যেমন খাওয়ার বিপর তবে সমস্যার সমাধানের প্রথম পদক্ষেপ হচ্ছে আমাদের সিস্টেম মূল্যায়নের জন্য একটি কোর্পাস প্রদান করা। এই পত্রিকায় আমরা বিশেষ করে টুইটারে অ্যানোরেক্সিয়া বার্তা খুঁজে বের করার প্রতি মনোযোগ প্রদান করি। প্রথমত, আমরা বিভিন্ন একাউন্ট থেকে টুইটের একটি নতুন কোর্পাস তৈরি করেছি, যার মধ্যে অ্যানোরেক্সিয়া এবং স্প্যানিশ ভাষায় অন্যান্য কোর্পাসের নাম এসডি: স্প্যানিশ অ্যানোরেক্সিয়া ডিটেকটিশন কোর্পাস। এসএডি কোর্পাসের কার্যক্রম পরিষ্কার করার জন্য আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে অ্যানোরেক্সিয়ার প্রতিক্রিয়া সনাক্ত করতে বেশ কিছু মেশিন শিক্ষা  ভাল ফলাফল পাওয়া গেছে যে টেক্সুয়াল ক্লাস্ফিকেশন পদ্ধতির প্রয়োগ হচ্ছে এই ধরনের সিস্টেম উন্নয়নের জন্য একটি প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল অপশন যা প্রদর্শন করছে যে এই টুলগুলো', 'az': "Mensiyyət sağlığı günümüzün toplumların ən böyük məxluqatından biridir. Əvvəlki simptomların keşif edilməsi insana dərk edər. İnsanlar duyguları, hissləri və ruhsal vəziyyətləri ifadə etmək üçün sosyal şəbəkələri daha çox və daha çox istifadə edirlər. Beləliklə, NLP teknolojiləri ilə istifadə edən bu məlumatın təhsil edilməsi, yemək müsibətlərini bənzər psihiqli problemlərin otomatik keşfetməsi üçün istifadə edilə bilər. Lakin problemi çəkmək üçün ilk adım sistemlərimizi değerləşdirmək üçün corpus təmin etmək lazımdır. Bu kağızda, Twitter'da anoreksiya ismarışlarını keşfetməyə məqsədilə odaqlanırıq. Əvvəlcə, İspanyolca anoreksiya və anoreksiya olmayan mesajlar içərisində müxtəlif hesablardan çıxarılan tweet korpusu yaratdıq. Korpus SAD adlanır: İspanyolca Anorexia Detection corpus. SAD korpusunun etkinliğini təsdiqləmək üçün, biz də korpusda anoreksiyanın simptomlarını otomatik təsdiqləmək üçün bir neçə makina öyrənmə metodlarını təklif edirik. Yaxşı sonuçlar, textual klasifikasyon metodlarının uyğulaması bu cür sistemi təşkil etmək üçün vəd verici seçməkdir ki, bu vasitələrin mənfəaliyyətlərin mənfəaliyyətlərin əvvəlki problemlərin keçməsində yardım etmək üçün istifadə edilə bilər.", 'ca': "La salut mental és una de les principals preocupacions de la societat actual. La detecció precoce de símptomes pot ajudar molta gent amb trastorns mentals. La gent està utilitzant xarxes socials cada cop més per expressar emocions, sentiments i estats mentals. Així, el tractament d'aquesta informació fent servir tecnologies NLP pot ser aplicat a la detecció automàtica de problemes mentals com els trastorns alimentaris. Però el primer pas a resoldre el problema hauria de ser proporcionar un corpus per tal d'evaluar els nostres sistemes. En aquest article ens centrem específicament en detectar missatges d'anorexia a Twitter. En primer lloc, hem generat un nou cos de tweets extraïts de diferents comptes, incloent els missatges d'anorexia i no anorexia en espanyol. El cos es diu SAD: el cos espanyol de detecció de l'anòrexia. Per validar l'eficacia del corpus SAD, també proposem diversos enfocaments d'aprenentatge màquinari per detectar automàticament símptomes d'anorexia al corpus. Els bons resultats obtenits demostren que l'aplicació de mètodes de classificació textual és una opció prometedora per desenvolupar aquest tipus de sistema que demostre que aquestes eines podrien ser utilitzades per professionals per ajudar a detectar primer temps problemes mentals.", 'cs': 'Duševní zdraví je jedním z hlavních zájmů dnešní společnosti. Včasná detekce příznaků může výrazně pomoci lidem s duševními poruchami. Lidé používají sociální sítě stále více a více k vyjádření emocí, sentimentů a duševních stavů. Léčba těchto informací pomocí NLP technologií lze tak aplikovat na automatickou detekci duševních problémů, jako jsou poruchy potravy. Prvním krokem k řešení problému by však mělo být poskytnutí korpusu pro hodnocení našich systémů. V tomto článku se konkrétně zaměřujeme na detekci zpráv o anorexii na Twitteru. Za prvé, vytvořili jsme nový korpus tweetů extrahovaných z různých účtů, včetně anorexie a non-anorexie zpráv ve španělštině. Korpus se nazývá SAD: španělský korpus detekce anorexie. Pro ověření efektivity korpusu SAD navrhujeme také několik přístupů strojového učení pro automatickou detekci příznaků anorexie v korpusu. Dobré získané výsledky ukazují, že aplikace textových klasifikačních metod je slibnou možností pro vývoj tohoto typu systému, která dokazuje, že tyto nástroje by mohly být použity odborníky k pomoci při včasné detekci duševních problémů.', 'bs': 'Mentalno zdravlje je jedna od glavnih briga današnjeg društva. Rano otkrivanje simptoma može mnogo pomoći ljudima s mentalnim poremećajima. Ljudi koriste socijalne mreže više i više da bi izrazili emocije, osjećaje i mentalne stanje. Stoga se liječenje tih informacija koristeći NLP tehnologije može primjenjivati na automatsko otkrivanje mentalnih problema poput poremećaja jela. Međutim, prvi korak u rješavanju problem a bi trebalo biti pružati korpus kako bi procijenio naše sisteme. U ovom papiru, posebno se fokusiramo na otkrivanje anoreksije poruka na Twitter-u. Prvo smo stvorili novi korpus tweeta izvučen iz različitih računa, uključujući anoreksiju i ne anoreksiju poruke na španjolskom jeziku. Corpus se zove SAD: španjolski Anoreksija detektivni korpus. Da bismo potvrdili učinkovitost korpusa SAD-a, predlažemo i nekoliko pristupa učenja strojeva za automatski otkrivanje simptoma anoreksije u korpusu. Dobri dobiveni rezultati pokazuju da je primjena metoda tekstualne klasifikacije obećavajuća opcija za razvoj ovakvog sistema koji pokazuje da bi te alate mogle koristiti profesionalci da bi pomogli u ranom otkrivanju mentalnih problema.', 'et': 'Vaimne tervis on tänapäeva ühiskonna üks peamisi muresid. Sümptomite varajane avastamine võib oluliselt aidata vaimsete häiretega inimestel. Inimesed kasutavad üha enam sotsiaalvõrgustikke emotsioonide, tunnete ja vaimsete seisundite väljendamiseks. Seega saab selle teabe töötlemist NLP tehnoloogiate abil rakendada vaimsete probleemide, näiteks söömishäirete automaatseks tuvastamiseks. Esimene samm probleemi lahendamiseks peaks siiski olema korpuse loomine meie süsteemide hindamiseks. Käesolevas artiklis keskendume spetsiaalselt anoreksia sõnumite tuvastamisele Twitteris. Esiteks oleme loonud uue säutsude korpuse erinevatelt kontodelt, sealhulgas anoreksia ja mitte-anoreksia sõnumitelt hispaania keeles. Korpuse nimi on SAD: Hispaania Anoreksia Detection korpus. SAD korpuse efektiivsuse kinnitamiseks pakume välja ka mitmeid masinõppe lähenemisviise anoreksia sümptomite automaatseks tuvastamiseks korpuses. Saadud head tulemused näitavad, et tekstiklassifikatsiooni meetodite rakendamine on paljutõotav võimalus sellise süsteemi väljatöötamiseks, näidates, et neid vahendeid saaksid spetsialistid kasutada vaimsete probleemide varajaseks avastamiseks.', 'fi': 'Mielenterveys on yksi tämän päivän yhteiskunnan tärkeimmistä huolenaiheista. Oireiden varhainen havaitseminen voi suuresti auttaa ihmisiä, joilla on mielenterveyshäiriöitä. Ihmiset käyttävät sosiaalisia verkostoja yhä enemmän tunteiden, tunteiden ja henkisten tilojen ilmaisemiseen. Tämän tiedon käsittelyä NLP-teknologioilla voidaan siis soveltaa mielenterveysongelmien, kuten syömishäiriöiden automaattiseen havaitsemiseen. Ensimmäisenä askeleena ongelman ratkaisemisessa olisi kuitenkin oltava järjestelmän arviointiin tarvittava korpus. Tässä artikkelissa keskitytään erityisesti anoreksiaviestien havaitsemiseen Twitterissä. Ensinnäkin olemme luoneet uuden twiittikorpusen, joka on poimittu eri tileiltä, mukaan lukien anoreksia ja ei-anoreksia viestejä espanjaksi. Korpus on nimeltään SAD: Spanish Anorexia Detection corpus. SAD-korpusen tehokkuuden validoimiseksi ehdotamme myös useita koneoppimismenetelmiä anoreksiaoireiden automaattiseen havaitsemiseen korpusessa. Saadut hyvät tulokset osoittavat, että tekstiluokittelumenetelmien soveltaminen on lupaava vaihtoehto tällaisen järjestelmän kehittämiseksi osoittaen, että ammattilaiset voisivat käyttää näitä työkaluja mielenterveysongelmien varhaisessa havaitsemisessa.', 'jv': 'Mentalne sing gawe barang wong sing nganggo perkara-wong liya Awakdhéwé éntuké karo perangéntuan anyuran luwih ngéwangé karo pawulangan sing apik. Wong wong pengguna tambah sing luwih lan luwih dumadhi sak pisan-asah, luwih-asah lan alam kuwi soalé. Wonten, woh hal kudu nggawe informasi iki ning gambar kelangan tèknologi NLP iso nguasai supoyo kuwi perbudhakan sing otomatik kanggo nguasai perbudhakan sing ngilanggar. Nanging, tapi perusahaan tanggal nggawe perusahaan kanggo ngilangno sak ngerasakno banget kanggo nggawe sistem sing nyimpen. Nanging pebuk iki, kita ngomong dipontrol kanggo ngerasakno seneng pangan nang Google. Pirih, awak dhéwé mbukaké karo sistem sing gak nggambar tuwitan luwih akeh gambar gak bukane karo anaréksia lan warni ketahanan Kasal Kepripus punika dipun cadang nggambar USD: Spanish AnaReksia detection Body. Digawe wis angka nggunakake punika dipun-perusahaan ning cara-cara SUD, kita nguasai kanggo ngerasakno liyane karo ngono nggawe usul maneh dumadhi karo perusahaan Laptop" and "Desktop', 'ha': "Mental health is one of the main concerns of today's society.  Kayyar ganin ayukan ayuka, yana iya ƙara wa mutane da wata cuta na fikanci. Mutane sunã yin amfani da mitandaki masu ƙaranci zuwa ga su faɗi hisia, hisia da matsayi. Kamar haka, za'a iya amfani da wannan information da ake yi amfani da Technical na NLP, za'a iya amfani da wajen gane wa masu hanci na mataimaki kamar cũtarwa. A lokacin da ya farko ta sola matabbata, sai ya kamata in bãyar da wata nau'i dõmin ya ƙaddara masu tsari. Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙayyade masu gane wa'anar anereksi a kan Twitter. Na farkon, mun sami wani makampi na Twitter wanda aka samu daga akan daban-daban, kamar wasu manzanni na Anreksi da ba'a-Ankaraksiya. Ina sunan karatasi SAD: Corbas na Kispanish Anoreksa. Dõmin ka gaskata aikin na SAD, sai mu ƙayyade masu amfani da masu amfani da mashine masu kwamfyuta dõmin ka gano ayuka masu motsi farat ɗaya. Bayan matsalar da aka motsa, ya nuna cewa shirin ayuka na fasihi na rubutu, yana da wata cuta wa'anar wa'adin wa'adin wa'adin shiryuwar na'urar wannan na'ura, na nuna cewa za'a iya amfani da waɗannan zance daga mafaɗari don ya taimaki ta fara a gane wa mataimako na ƙari.", 'he': 'Mental health is one of the main concerns of today\'s society.  גילוי מוקדם של תסמינים יכול לעזור לאנשים עם הפרעות נפשיות. אנשים משתמשים ברשתות חברתיות יותר ויותר כדי להביע רגשות, רגשות ומצבים נפשיים. Thus, the treatment of this information using NLP technologies can be applied to the automatic detection of mental problems such as eating disorders.  עם זאת, הצעד הראשון לפתור את הבעיה צריך להיות לספק קורפוס כדי להעריך את המערכות שלנו. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתמקדים במיוחד בלגלות הודעות אורקסיה בטוויטר. ראשית, יצרנו גוף חדש של טוויטים שנוצאים מחשבונות שונים כולל הודעות אורקסיה ולא אורקסיה בספרדית. הקורפוס נקרא "סאד" כדי לאשר את היעילות של הקורפוס של SAD, אנחנו גם מציעים כמה גישות ללמוד מכונות לגלות אוטומטית תסמינים אורקסיה בקורפוס. התוצאות הטובות שנוצאות מראות שהשימוש בשיטות מסווג טקסטליים הוא אפשרות מבטיחה לפיתוח מערכת כזו שמוכיחת שהכלים האלה יכולים להשתמש על ידי מקצוענים כדי לעזור לגלות מוקדם בעיות נפשיות.', 'sk': 'Duševno zdravje je ena glavnih skrbi današnje družbe. Zgodnje odkrivanje simptomov lahko zelo pomaga ljudem z duševnimi motnjami. Ljudje vedno bolj uporabljajo socialna omrežja za izražanje čustev, čustva in duševnih stanj. Tako se lahko zdravljenje teh informacij z uporabo tehnologij NLP uporablja za samodejno odkrivanje duševnih težav, kot so motnje prehranjevanja. Vendar pa bi moral biti prvi korak k reševanju problema zagotoviti korpus za oceno naših sistemov. V tem članku se posebej osredotočamo na odkrivanje anoreksijskih sporočil na Twitterju. Prvič, ustvarili smo nov korpus tweetov iz različnih računov, vključno s sporočili anoreksije in ne anoreksije v španščini. Korpus se imenuje SAD: španski korpus za odkrivanje anoreksije. Za potrditev učinkovitosti korpusa SAD predlagamo tudi več pristopov strojnega učenja za samodejno odkrivanje simptomov anoreksije v korpusu. Dobri rezultati kažejo, da je uporaba besedilnih klasifikacijskih metod obetavna možnost za razvoj tovrstnega sistema, kar kaže, da bi lahko ta orodja uporabljali strokovnjaki za pomoč pri zgodnjem odkrivanju duševnih težav.', 'bo': 'དེའི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཞལ་འཛུགས་དེ་ནི་དེའི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་རྩ་བའི་གནད་དོན་ཅིག་རེད། སྒེར་གྱི་རྐྱེན་པས་རྐྱེན་པས་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མི་རྣམས་ནད་ཅིག་འགྱུར་བའི་སྒོ་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཏེ། མི་མང་གིས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་པ་དང་། སེམས་ཚོར་དང་། སེམས་ཚོར་སྣང་དང་། དེར་བརྟེན། NLP ལག་ལེན་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདིའི་གྲ་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་དགོས་པ་དེ་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་རྟོགས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཚོགས་དང་། དཔེར་ན་ར ཡིན་ནའང་དཀའ་ངལ་ལེན་ཐབས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ཐོག་དང་པོ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་རྩ་བའི་གྲངས་ཤིག་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་རིག་གི་ཚད་ལྟ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཌིས་ཌིར་ཐོག་ཏུ་འཕྲིན་དོན་གཞན་ཡང་རྙེད་སྐབས་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་པ དང་པོ་མཉམ་དུ། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་བཟོ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་མིང་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས་ཡོད། སྦུང་མིས་ལྟར་ཞེས་པ་ཞེས་ཀྱི་ཨེས་ཌི་(SAD)ཞེས་ཡོད། སེར་སི་ཡཱན་གྱི་Anorexia Detection corpus དབུས་གཞུང་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་ནུས་པ་གཙོ་བོ་ལ་ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མ་རྩིས་ཐོག་གི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གསལ་རྗེས་འཆར་བྱེད་ན། གྲུབ་འབྲས་ལེགས་ཉེར་བ་ཡིན་པས་ཡིག་གེ་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ནི་ཤེས་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་གདམ་ཁ་ཡུལ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་ད'}
{'en': 'v-trel : Vocabulary Trainer for Tracing Word Relations-An Implicit Crowdsourcing Approach', 'ar': 'v-trel: مدرب مفردات لتتبع العلاقات الكلامية - أسلوب ضمني في التعهيد الجماعي', 'es': 'v-trel: Entrenador de vocabulario para rastrear relaciones entre palabras: un enfoque de crowdsourcing implícito', 'pt': 'v-trel: Treinador de vocabulário para rastrear relações de palavras - uma abordagem de crowdsourcing implícita', 'fr': 'v-trel\xa0: Entraîneur de vocabulaire pour tracer les relations entre les mots - Une approche participative implicite', 'ja': 'v - trel ：単語関係を追跡するための語彙トレーナー-暗黙のクラウドソーシングアプローチ', 'zh': 'v-trel曰:单词词汇学习器 - 隐式众包法也', 'ru': 'v-trel: Тренер по лексике для отслеживания отношений слов - неявный подход к краудсорсингу', 'hi': 'v-trel: शब्द संबंधों का पता लगाने के लिए शब्दावली ट्रेनर - एक अंतर्निहित Crowdsourcing दृष्टिकोण', 'ga': 'v-trel: Traenálaí Stór Focal chun Gaol Focal a Rianú - Cur Chuige Sluaite intuigthe', 'ka': 'v- trel: სიტყვებულია შესწავლებელი სიტყვების შესახებისთვის - მუშაობელი კროსურსის შესახებ', 'hu': 'v-trel: Szókincsképző a szókapcsolatok nyomon követéséhez - Implicit Crowdsourcing megközelítés', 'el': 'Εκπαιδευτής λεξιλογίου για τον εντοπισμό σχέσεων λέξεων σε μια έμμεση προσέγγιση', 'it': 'v-trel: Formatore di vocabolario per tracciare le relazioni con le parole - un approccio implicito di crowdsourcing', 'kk': 'v- trel: Сөздер қатынасын қадағалау үшін сөздер оқытушы - Қатысушылық қатынасы', 'ms': 'v-trel: Pelatih Vocabular untuk Mengejar Hubungan Kata - Pendekatan Crowdsourcing Implicit', 'ml': 'v-trel: Vocabulary Trainer for Tracing Word Relations - An Implicit Crowdsourcing Approach', 'mt': 'v-trel: Taħriġer Vokabulari għat-Traċċar tar-Relazzjonijiet tal-Kliem - Approċċ impliċitu tal-Crowdsourcing', 'mn': 'v-trel: Үндсэн харилцааны дасгал хөгжүүлэгч - Үндсэн холбоотой ойлголт', 'no': 'v- trel: Ord- trener for sporing av ord- relasjonar – Eit implisitt tilnærming av krødverking', 'pl': 'v-trel: Trener słownictwa do śledzenia relacji słowowych w ramach implicyjnego podejścia crowdsourcingowego', 'ro': 'v-trel: Trainer vocabular pentru urmărirea relațiilor cu cuvintele - o abordare implicită de crowdsourcing', 'sr': 'v-trel: Vozač rečnika za praćenje rečnih odnosa - Implicitni pristup krvarenja', 'si': 'v- Trel: වචන සම්බන්ධයක් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා වචන සම්බන්ධයක් සඳහා වචන සම්බන්ධ ක්\u200dරෝඩ් සම්බන්ධ', 'so': 'v-trel: Vocabulary Trainer for Training Word Relations - An Implicit Crowdsourcing Approach', 'sv': 'v-trel: Vocabulary Trainer för att spåra Word Relations - En implicit Crowdsourcing Approach', 'ta': 'v- trel: பின்பற்ற வார்த்தை தொடர்புக்கான சொல்லாக்க பயிற்சி', 'ur': 'v-trel: کلمات رابطہ ترسینگ کے لئے ویکبولری ترنینر - ایک اثبات کروڈ سورینگ تقرب', 'lt': 'v-trel: žodynų mokymas žodžių ryšiams sekti – netiesioginis visuomenės išteklių naudojimo metodas', 'mk': 'v-trel: Тренер на зборови за следење на зборовите односи - имплицитен пристап до групното пристапување', 'uz': 'Sourceing Approach', 'vi': 'v-trel: Luyện tập từ Vocablariy for Traching Từ Relationships - A implict Name', 'nl': 'v-trel: Woordentrainer voor het traceren van woordrelaties met een impliciete crowdsourcing aanpak', 'bg': 'Трел: Речник треньор за проследяване на отношенията с думи - имплицитен подход за групово обучение', 'hr': 'v-trel: Vozač riječnika za praćenje riječnih odnosa - Implicitni pristup krvarenja', 'da': 'v-trel: Ordforråd træner til sporing af ord relationer - en implicit crowdsourcing tilgang', 'de': 'v-trel: Vokabeltrainer zur Rückverfolgung von Wortbeziehungen als impliziter Crowdsourcing Ansatz', 'fa': 'v-trel: آموزش کلمات برای ردیابی رابطه\u200cهای کلمات - یک نزدیک فعال\u200cکننده\u200cای', 'id': 'v-trel: Pelatih kata untuk melacak hubungan kata - Pendekatan Crowdsourcing Implicit', 'ko': 'v-trel: 단어 관계를 추적하는 어휘 트레이너 - 잠재적 패키지 방법', 'tr': 'v-trel', 'sw': 'v-trel: Mfunzi wa Lugha kwa ajili ya Kufuatilia Mawasiliano ya Neno - Mtazamo wa Kutokea', 'sq': 'v-trel: Trener fjalor për gjurmimin e marrëdhënieve me fjalë - Një metodë implikate e përdorimit të publikut', 'af': "v- trel: Woordeskat Ontwerper vir Voorskou Woord Relasies - ' n Implicite Crowdsourcing Approach", 'am': 'sourceing Approach', 'hy': 'v-Trel. Բառերի հարաբերությունների հետևման բառարանի վարժեցնող. Միմաստ ժողովրդավարման մոտեցում', 'az': 'v-trel: Sözlük İlişkiləri İzləmək üçün Sözlük Treneri - İlişkin Tərəfləmə Yaxınlığı', 'bn': 'ভি- ট্রেল: ট্রেনিং শব্দ সম্পর্কের জন্য শব্দভাণ্ডার প্রশিক্ষক', 'bs': 'v-trel: Vozač riječi za praćenje odnosa riječi - Implicitni pristup krvarenju', 'ca': 'v-trel: Entrenador de vocabulari per a seguir les relacions de paraules - Un enfocament implicit de crowdsourcing', 'cs': 'v-trel: Slovní zásobník pro sledování slovních vztahů s implicitním crowdsourcingovým přístupem', 'et': 'v-trel: Sõnavara koolitaja sõnasuhete jälgimiseks - kaudne ühiskursuse lähenemine', 'fi': 'v-trel: Sanaston kouluttaja sanasuhteiden jäljittämiseen - implisiittinen joukkosourcing lähestymistapa', 'jv': 'v', 'he': 'v-trel: מאמן מילים לאתר יחסי מילים - גישה משמעותית', 'sk': 'V-trel: Učitelj besedišča za sledenje besednih odnosov - Implicitni pristop množičnega izobraževanja', 'ha': 'Source', 'bo': 'v-trel: སྐད་ཡིག་གཏོང་གི་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་འབྲེལ་བ་ཚུ་དང་། གསལ་བཤད་པའི་Crowdsourcing Approach'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present our work on developing a vocabulary trainer that uses exercises generated from language resources such as ConceptNet and crowdsources the responses of the learners to enrich the language resource. We performed an empirical evaluation of our approach with 60 non-native speakers over two days, which shows that new entries to expand Concept-Net can efficiently be gathered through vocabulary exercises on word relations. We also report on the feedback gathered from the users and an expert from language teaching, and discuss the potential of the vocabulary trainer application from the user and language learner perspective. The feedback suggests that v-trel has educational potential, while in its current state some shortcomings could be identified.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم عملنا على تطوير مدرب مفردات يستخدم التدريبات المتولدة من مصادر اللغة مثل ConceptNet ويجمع استجابات المتعلمين لإثراء موارد اللغة. لقد أجرينا تقييمًا تجريبيًا لنهجنا مع 60 متحدثًا من غير الناطقين بها على مدار يومين ، مما يوضح أن الإدخالات الجديدة لتوسيع Concept-Net يمكن جمعها بكفاءة من خلال تمارين المفردات على العلاقات بين الكلمات. نقوم أيضًا بالإبلاغ عن التعليقات التي تم جمعها من المستخدمين وخبير من تدريس اللغة ، ونناقش إمكانات تطبيق مدرب المفردات من منظور المستخدم ومتعلم اللغة. تشير التعليقات إلى أن v-trel لديها إمكانات تعليمية ، بينما في وضعها الحالي يمكن تحديد بعض أوجه القصور.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos nuestro trabajo en el desarrollo de un entrenador de vocabulario que utilice ejercicios generados a partir de recursos lingüísticos como ConceptNet y que colabore las respuestas de los estudiantes para enriquecer el recurso lingüístico. Realizamos una evaluación empírica de nuestro enfoque con 60 hablantes no nativos durante dos días, lo que demuestra que las nuevas entradas para expandir Concept-Net se pueden recopilar de manera eficiente a través de ejercicios de vocabulario sobre relaciones entre palabras. También informamos sobre los comentarios recopilados de los usuarios y de un experto de la enseñanza de idiomas, y discutimos el potencial de la aplicación del entrenador de vocabulario desde la perspectiva del usuario y el estudiante de idiomas. Los comentarios sugieren que v-trel tiene potencial educativo, mientras que en su estado actual se pueden identificar algunas deficiencias.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos nosso trabalho no desenvolvimento de um treinador de vocabulário que usa exercícios gerados a partir de recursos linguísticos como ConceptNet e crowdsources as respostas dos alunos para enriquecer o recurso linguístico. Realizamos uma avaliação empírica de nossa abordagem com 60 falantes não nativos ao longo de dois dias, o que mostra que novas entradas para expandir o Concept-Net podem ser coletadas de forma eficiente por meio de exercícios de vocabulário sobre relações de palavras. Também relatamos o feedback coletado dos usuários e de um especialista do ensino de idiomas e discutimos o potencial do aplicativo de treinamento de vocabulário do ponto de vista do usuário e do aprendiz de idioma. O feedback sugere que o v-trel tem potencial educacional, enquanto em seu estado atual algumas deficiências podem ser identificadas.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons notre travail sur le développement d'un entraîneur de vocabulaire qui utilise des exercices générés à partir de ressources linguistiques telles que ConceptNet et qui recueille les réponses des apprenants pour enrichir la ressource linguistique. Nous avons effectué une évaluation empirique de notre approche auprès de 60 locuteurs non natifs pendant deux jours, ce qui montre que les nouvelles entrées pour développer Concept-Net peuvent être collectées efficacement grâce à des exercices de vocabulaire sur les relations entre les mots. Nous rendons également compte des commentaires recueillis auprès des utilisateurs et d'un expert de l'enseignement des langues, et discutons du potentiel de l'application de vocabulaire du point de vue de l'utilisateur et de l'apprenant en langue. Les commentaires suggèrent que v-trel a un potentiel éducatif, alors que dans son état actuel, certaines lacunes ont pu être identifiées.", 'ja': 'この論文では、ConceptNetなどの言語リソースから生成された演習を使用し、学習者の反応をクラウドソーシングして言語リソースを充実させる語彙トレーナーの開発に関する研究を紹介します。私たちは、2日間にわたって60人の非ネイティブスピーカーとアプローチの実証的評価を行い、概念ネットを拡張するための新しいエントリが、単語関係に関する語彙演習を通じて効率的に収集できることを示しました。また、ユーザーと言語教育の専門家から収集したフィードバックを報告し、ユーザーと言語学習者の視点から語彙トレーナーアプリケーションの可能性について話し合います。フィードバックは、v - trelには教育の可能性があることを示唆していますが、現在の状態ではいくつかの欠点を特定することができます。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम एक शब्दावली ट्रेनर विकसित करने पर अपना काम प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो भाषा संसाधनों से उत्पन्न अभ्यासों का उपयोग करता है जैसे कि कॉन्सेप्टनेट और क्राउडसोर्स भाषा संसाधन को समृद्ध करने के लिए शिक्षार्थियों की प्रतिक्रियाओं को बढ़ाता है। हमने दो दिनों में 60 गैर-देशी वक्ताओं के साथ अपने दृष्टिकोण का एक अनुभवजन्य मूल्यांकन किया, जो दिखाता है कि अवधारणा-नेट का विस्तार करने के लिए नई प्रविष्टियों को शब्द संबंधों पर शब्दावली अभ्यास के माध्यम से कुशलतापूर्वक एकत्र किया जा सकता है। हम उपयोगकर्ताओं और भाषा शिक्षण से एक विशेषज्ञ से एकत्र की गई प्रतिक्रिया पर भी रिपोर्ट करते हैं, और उपयोगकर्ता और भाषा शिक्षार्थी परिप्रेक्ष्य से शब्दावली ट्रेनर आवेदन की क्षमता पर चर्चा करते हैं। प्रतिक्रिया से पता चलता है कि वी-ट्रेल में शैक्षिक क्षमता है, जबकि इसकी वर्तमान स्थिति में कुछ कमियों की पहचान की जा सकती है।', 'zh': '本文,我们介绍了我们开发词汇学习器事,该词汇学习器用从ConceptNet等语言资源生成的习习,并众包学习的响应以富言语资源。 二日内实60名非母语人士,明可以单词词汇习收广Concept-Net之新条也。 告以用户、言、教之反馈,而论于用户、言者之词汇学习机应用程序。 反馈者,v-trel有教也,而有短也。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем нашу работу по разработке тренера по лексике, который использует упражнения, сгенерированные из языковых ресурсов, таких как ConceptNet и краудсорсинг ответов обучающихся, чтобы обогатить языковой ресурс. Мы провели эмпирическую оценку нашего подхода с 60 не носителями языка в течение двух дней, что показывает, что новые записи для расширения Concept-Net могут быть эффективно собраны с помощью лексических упражнений по словосочетаниям. Мы также сообщаем об отзывах, полученных от пользователей и эксперта по обучению языку, и обсуждаем потенциал приложения тренера по лексике с точки зрения пользователя и изучающего язык. Обратная связь предполагает, что v-trel имеет образовательный потенциал, в то время как в его текущем состоянии могут быть выявлены некоторые недостатки.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair ár gcuid oibre ar oiliúnóir foclóra a fhorbairt a úsáideann cleachtaí a ghintear ó acmhainní teanga ar nós ConceptNet agus sluafhoinsiú freagraí na bhfoghlaimeoirí chun an acmhainn teanga a shaibhriú. Rinneamar meastóireacht eimpíreach ar ár gcur chuige le 60 cainteoir neamhdhúchais thar dhá lá, rud a léiríonn gur féidir iontrálacha nua chun Concept-Net a leathnú a bhailiú go héifeachtach trí chleachtaí foclóra ar chaidreamh focal. Tuairiscímid freisin ar an aiseolas a bhailítear ó na húsáideoirí agus ó shaineolaí ó theagasc na teanga, agus pléimid féidearthacht an fheidhmchláir oiliúnóra foclóra ó thaobh an úsáideora agus an fhoghlaimeora teanga de. Tugann an t-aiseolas le fios go bhfuil poitéinseal oideachais ag v-trel, cé go bhféadfaí roinnt easnaimh a aithint sa staid reatha.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნეტში ჩვენ ჩვენი სამუშაო სიტყვებულის განვითარებაზე გამოყენება, რომელიც ენის რესურსიდან გამოვიყენება განვითარება, როგორც კონცექტენეტი და მუშაობის რესურსიდან გამოყენებ ჩვენ გავაკეთეთ ჩვენი პროგრამის ემპერიკალური გავამუშავება 60 არავებული მუშაობლებელი ორი დღეში, რომელიც გამოჩვენება, რომ ახალი მოწყობილობები, რომელიც კონცექტი-ნეტის გაფართვა, შე ჩვენ ასევე აღწერეთ მომხმარებელი და ენის სწავლების ექსპერტის შესახებ და გამოყენებელი და ენის სწავლებელი პროცექტის პროცექტის პროცექტის პროცექტის შესახებ. გადაწყვეტილების შესახებ, რომ v-trel აქვს განსწავლებელი პროცენტი, მაგრამ მისი მიმდინარე სტატში შეიძლება იცნოდეთ რამდენიმე განსხვავება.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε την εργασία μας για την ανάπτυξη ενός εκπαιδευτή λεξιλογίου που χρησιμοποιεί ασκήσεις που παράγονται από γλωσσικούς πόρους όπως και τις απαντήσεις των μαθητών για να εμπλουτίσει τον γλωσσικό πόρο. Πραγματοποιήσαμε μια εμπειρική αξιολόγηση της προσέγγισής μας με 60 μη φυσικούς ομιλητές μέσα σε δύο ημέρες, η οποία δείχνει ότι νέες καταχωρήσεις για την επέκταση του μπορούν να συγκεντρωθούν αποτελεσματικά μέσω ασκήσεων λεξιλογίου σχετικά με τις σχέσεις λέξεων. Επίσης, αναφέρουμε τα σχόλια που συγκεντρώθηκαν από τους χρήστες και έναν ειδικό από τη διδασκαλία γλωσσών, και συζητάμε τις δυνατότητες της εφαρμογής εκπαιδευτή λεξιλογίου από την οπτική γωνία του χρήστη και του εκπαιδευτή γλωσσών. Η ανατροφοδότηση υποδηλώνει ότι το έχει εκπαιδευτικό δυναμικό, ενώ στην τρέχουσα κατάστασή του θα μπορούσαν να εντοπιστούν κάποιες ελλείψεις.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk egy olyan szókincsképző fejlesztésével kapcsolatos munkánkat, amely a nyelvi erőforrásokból, mint a ConceptNet és a közösségi forrásokból generált gyakorlatokat használja fel a tanulók válaszait a nyelvi erőforrás gazdagítására. Két nap alatt 60 nem anyanyelvű beszélővel végeztünk empirikus értékelést, ami azt mutatja, hogy a Concept-Net bővítésére irányuló új bejegyzések hatékonyan gyűjthetők a szókapcsolatokra vonatkozó szókincsgyakorlatok segítségével. Beszámolunk továbbá a felhasználóktól és egy nyelvtanítási szakértőtől összegyűjtött visszajelzésekről, valamint megvitatjuk a szókincsképző alkalmazás lehetőségeit felhasználói és nyelvtanulói szempontból. A visszajelzések azt sugallják, hogy a v-trel oktatási potenciállal rendelkezik, míg jelenlegi állapotában néhány hiányosság azonosítható.', 'it': "In questo articolo, presentiamo il nostro lavoro sullo sviluppo di un formatore di vocaboli che utilizza esercizi generati da risorse linguistiche come ConceptNet e crowdsources le risposte degli studenti per arricchire la risorsa linguistica. Abbiamo effettuato una valutazione empirica del nostro approccio con 60 non madrelingua in due giorni, che dimostra che le nuove voci per espandere Concept-Net possono essere raccolte in modo efficiente attraverso esercizi di vocabolario sulle relazioni con le parole. Riportiamo anche sui feedback raccolti dagli utenti e da un esperto nell'insegnamento delle lingue e discutiamo il potenziale dell'applicazione di formazione del vocabolario dal punto di vista dell'utente e dell'utente. Il feedback suggerisce che v-trel ha un potenziale educativo, mentre nel suo stato attuale potrebbero essere individuate alcune carenze.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, концепсент және оқытушылардың жауаптарын тіл ресурстарын бағаттау үшін қолданатын тілдер ресурстарынан жасалған тәжірибелерді жасауға жұмыс істейміз. Екі күн бойынша 60 тілкелген сөйлейтіншілерді көтеріп жаңа жазулар Концепция-Нетті кеңейту үшін сөздердің сөздерінің қатынастарына көмектесетін жұмысының эмпирикалық оқиғасын жасадық. Сонымен қатар, пайдаланушылардан және тіл оқытуының экспертінің қайталануын және сөздер оқытушыларының қолданбаны пайдаланушылардан және тіл оқытушыларының перспективінен талқылаймыз. Бұл қайталау үшін v- trel бағдарламасының білім беру мүмкіндігі бар деп ойлайды, бірақ оның қазіргі күйінде кейбір жеткіліктерді анықтауға болады.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome savo darbą kuriant žodynų mokymo instruktorių, kuris naudoja pratybas, gautas iš kalbų išteklių, pavyzdžiui, ConceptNet, ir gauna mokytojų atsakymus, kad praturtintų kalbų išteklius. Per dvi dienas atlikome empirinį mūsų požiūrio vertinimą su 60 ne gimtųjų kalbėtojų, kuris rodo, kad nauji įrašai, skirti plėsti Concept-Net, gali būti veiksmingai surenkami per žodžių santykių žodyno pratybas. Mes taip pat pranešame apie naudotojų ir kalbų mokymo eksperto surinktą grįžtamąją informaciją ir aptariame žodynų mokymo programos potencialą iš naudotojo ir kalbų mokymosi perspektyvos. Atsakymai rodo, kad v-trel turi švietimo potencialą, o dabartinėje padėtyje gali būti nustatyti tam tikri trūkumai.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, ја претставуваме нашата работа за развој на тренер за речник кој користи вежби генерирани од јазичките ресурси како што е ConceptNet и crowdsource реакциите на учениците за богатство на јазичкиот ресурс. Ние спроведовме емпириска проценка на нашиот пристап со 60 неродни говорници во текот на два дена, што покажува дека новите записи за проширување на Concept-Net можат ефикасно да се соберат преку вежби за зборни односи. We also report on the feedback gathered from the users and an expert from language teaching, and discuss the potential of the vocabulary trainer application from the user and language learner perspective.  Реакцијата покажува дека v-trel има образовен потенцијал, додека во својата сегашна состојба може да се идентификуваат некои недостатоци.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan kerja kami untuk mengembangkan pelatih vokbulari yang menggunakan latihan yang dijana dari sumber bahasa seperti ConceptNet dan sumber ramai tanggapan pelajar untuk memperkaya sumber bahasa. Kami melakukan penilaian empirik pendekatan kami dengan 60 pembicara bukan-asli selama dua hari, yang menunjukkan bahawa masukan baru untuk mengembangkan Concept-Net boleh berkumpul secara efisien melalui latihan vokbulari mengenai hubungan perkataan. Kami juga melaporkan balas balik yang dikumpulkan dari pengguna dan pakar dari pengajar bahasa, dan membincangkan potensi aplikasi pelatih vokbulari dari perspektif pengguna dan pelajar bahasa. Balas balas menunjukkan bahawa v-trel mempunyai potensi pendidikan, sementara dalam keadaan semasa beberapa kekurangan boleh dikenalpasti.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw ix-xogħol tagħna dwar l-iżvilupp ta’ taħriġ vokabulari li juża eżerċizzji ġġenerati minn riżorsi lingwistiċi bħall-ConceptNet u crowdsource ir-reazzjonijiet tal-istudenti biex isaħħu r-riżorsi lingwistiċi. Sarna evalwazzjoni empirika tal-approċċ tagħna ma’ 60 kelliem mhux nattivi fuq perjodu ta’ jumejn, li turi li entrati ġodda biex jespandu l-Concept-Net jistgħu jinġabru b’mod effiċjenti permezz ta’ eżerċizzji vokabulari dwar ir-relazzjonijiet bil-kliem. Aħna nirrappurtaw ukoll dwar ir-reazzjonijiet miġbura mill-utenti u espert mit-tagħlim tal-lingwi, u niddiskutu l-potenzjal tal-applikazzjoni tat-taħriġ vokabulari mill-perspettiva tal-utent u tat-tagħlim tal-lingwi. Ir-reazzjonijiet jissuġġerixxu li v-trel għandu potenzjal edukattiv, filwaqt li fl-istat attwali tiegħu xi nuqqasijiet jistgħu jiġu identifikati.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ജോലി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത് ഭാഷ വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പദ്ധതിപ്പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പരിശീലിക്കാരനെപ രണ്ടു ദിവസം കൊണ്ട് നാട്ടില്ലാത്ത സംസാരികളോടൊപ്പം നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തുനില്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ശാസ്ത്രികമായ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിച് We also report on the feedback gathered from the users and an expert from language teaching, and discuss the potential of the vocabulary trainer application from the user and language learner perspective.  ഈ പ്രതികരണം വി- ട്രെയിലിന് വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ സാധ്യതയുണ്ടെന്ന് പറയുന്നു. ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d കുറച്ചു', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nasze prace nad opracowaniem trenera słownictwa, który wykorzystuje ćwiczenia generowane z zasobów językowych takich jak ConceptNet oraz crowdsources odpowiedzi uczniów w celu wzbogacenia zasobów językowych. W ciągu dwóch dni przeprowadziliśmy empiryczną ocenę naszego podejścia z 60-ma osobami nienative speakerów, która pokazuje, że nowe wpisy do rozszerzenia Concept-Net można skutecznie zebrać poprzez ćwiczenia słownictwa na temat relacji słowowych. Raportujemy również o opiniach zebranych od użytkowników i eksperta z nauczania języków oraz omawiamy potencjał aplikacji trener słownictwa z perspektywy użytkownika i uczącego się języka. Informacje zwrotne sugerują, że v-trel ma potencjał edukacyjny, natomiast w obecnym stanie można zidentyfikować pewne niedociągnięcia.', 'no': 'I denne papiret viser vi arbeidet vårt på å utvikla eit ordboktrening som brukar øvingar laga frå språkkressursar som ConceptNet og crowdsource svara på lærarane for å rykke språkkressursen. Vi utførte ein empirisk evaluering av tilnærminga vårt med 60 ikkje-native taler over to dagar, som viser at nye oppføringar for å utvida Concept-Net kan effektivt samla gjennom ordsamlingar på ordforhold. Vi rapporterer også om tilbakemeldinga samla frå brukarar og eksperten frå språk- læring, og diskuterer potensialen av programmet for ordbokelæring frå perspektivet for brukarar og språk- lærarar. Tilbakemeldinga tyder på at v-trel har utdanningsfunksjonsfunksjon, mens i den gjeldande tilstanden kunne identifiserast nokre kortingar.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm munca noastră privind dezvoltarea unui trainer vocabular care utilizează exerciții generate din resurse lingvistice precum ConceptNet și crowdsources răspunsurile cursanților pentru a îmbogăți resursa lingvistică. Am realizat o evaluare empirică a abordării noastre cu 60 de vorbitori non-nativi pe parcursul a două zile, ceea ce arată că noile intrări pentru extinderea Concept-Net pot fi colectate eficient prin exerciții de vocabular privind relațiile cuvintelor. De asemenea, raportăm cu privire la feedback-ul adunat de la utilizatori și de la un expert în predarea limbilor străine și discutăm potențialul aplicației de formare vocabular din perspectiva utilizatorului și a cursanților de limbi străine. Feedback-ul sugerează că v-trel are potențial educațional, în timp ce în starea sa actuală ar putea fi identificate unele deficiențe.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид өөрсдийгөө КонцептNet болон олон нийтийн сурагчийн хариултыг хэлний ресурсын баялаг боловсруулахын тулд дасгал хөгжүүлэхийн тулд ажиллаж байна. Бид хоёр өдрийн турш 60 биш орон нутгийн илтгэгчидтэй холбогдох арга барилгыг эзэмшигтэй үнэлгээ хийсэн. Энэ нь "Concept-Net"-г нэмэгдүүлэх шинэ нэвтрүүлэлт үгийн харилцааны дасгал хөдөлгөөнд эффективно цуглуул Бид мөн хэрэглэгчид болон хэл багшлах мэргэжилтэн дээр цуглуулсан хариултын тухай мэдээлэл өгч, хэрэглэгчид болон хэл сурагчийн хариултын талаар ярилцдаг. Үүний хариулт нь v-trel-д боловсролын потенциал байдаг гэсэн үг. Гэхдээ одоогийн байдалд зарим алдагдлыг тодорхойлж чадна.', 'so': 'Warqadan waxaynu ku qornaa shaqadeeda horumarinta tababar xirfadeed, kaas oo isticmaalaya tababar ka soo baxa raslimaha luqada sida ConceptNet iyo dadku waxay u jeedisaa jawaabaha waxbarashada si ay u hodaneeyaan resources luqada. We performed an empirical evaluation of our approach with 60 non-native speakers over two days, which shows that new entries to expand Concept-Net can efficiently be gathered through vocabulary exercises on word relations.  Waxaannu sidoo kale wargelinnaa jawaabta isticmaalayaasha iyo khabiir ka soo ururiyey waxbarashada luqada, waxaana kala sheekaynaynaa suurtagalka codsiga waxbarashada xirfadda ee bogga waxbarashada ee isticmaalaha iyo luqada. Jawaabtu waxay muuqanaysaa in v-trel ay leedahay awood waxbarasho, marka xaaladda la joogo lagu ogaan karo qaar gaaban.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš rad na razvoju rečnog trenera koji koristi vježbe proizvedene iz jezičkih resursa poput koncepteneta i publika izvore odgovore učenika da bi obogatili jezički resurs. Izvršili smo empiričku procenu našeg pristupa sa 60 neprijateljskih govornika tokom dva dana, što pokazuje da se novi ulazi u proširenje koncepcija-mreže mogu efikasno okupiti kroz rečne vježbe o odnosima riječi. Također izvještavamo i o povratku koji se okupljaju od korisnika i stručnjaka iz učenja jezika, i razgovaramo o potencijalu aplikacije trenera rečenika iz perspektive korisnika i jezika učenja. Odgovor ukazuje na to da v-trel ima obrazovni potencijal, dok u trenutnom stanju mogu identifikovati neke nedostatke.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi vårt arbete med att utveckla en vokabulärtränare som använder övningar genererade från språkresurser som ConceptNet och crowdsources svar från eleverna för att berika språkresursen. Vi genomförde en empirisk utvärdering av vårt tillvägagångssätt med 60 icke-infödda talare under två dagar, vilket visar att nya poster för att utöka Concept-Net effektivt kan samlas in genom ordförråd övningar om ordrelationer. Vi rapporterar också om återkopplingen från användarna och en expert från språkundervisning, och diskuterar potentialen i vokabulärtrainerapplikationen ur användar- och språkinlärningsperspektivet. Feedback tyder på att v-trel har utbildningspotential, medan vissa brister i sitt nuvarande tillstånd kan identifieras.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි අපේ වැඩය පෙන්වන්නේ භාෂාවල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා භාෂාවල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා වගේ සංව අපි දවස් දෙකකින් නැති ස්පීකර්ටර් 60 සමග අපේ විශේෂ විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙනවා, ඒක පෙන්වන්නේ අළුත් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පුළුවන්  අපි පරීක්ෂකයෝ වලින් සහ භාෂා උගන්නයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, සහ භාෂා උගන්නයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා වී-ට්\u200dරෙල්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා, ඒකේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර විදි', 'ta': 'இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஒரு சொல்ல பயிற்சியை உருவாக்குவதற்கான வேலையை காண்பிக்கிறோம். அது மொழி வளங்களிலிருந்து உருவாக்கிய பயிற்சி நாங்கள் இரண்டு நாட்களுக்கு மேல் 60 பேச்சாளர்களுடன் எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டின் ஒரு விருப்பமான மதிப்பீடு செய்தோம், அது புதிய உள்ளீடுகளை விரிவாக்குவதற்கு கான் We also report on the feedback gathered from the users and an expert from language teaching, and discuss the potential of the vocabulary trainer application from the user and language learner perspective.  இந்த பதில் வி- trel கல்வி சாத்தியம் இருக்கும் என்று பரிந்துரைக்கிறது, தற்போதைய நிலையில் சில குறைந்த குறைப்புகள் க', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم نے اپنے کام کو ایک لکھنے کی ترینیر کی تولید پر پیش کیا ہے جو زبان کے سرمایہ سے جوڑے ہوئے آزمائش استعمال کرتا ہے جیسے ConceptNet اور جماعت کے سرمایہ کے ساتھ استعمال کرنے والے زبان کے سرمایہ کو ثروت کرنے کے لئے جواب دیتے ہیں. ہم نے اپنے طریقے کی ایک مضبوط ارزیابی کرلیا تھا جو دو دن میں 60 غیر ملی صحبت کرنے والوں کے ساتھ تھا، جو دکھاتا ہے کہ نو مضبوط-نیٹ کے گھٹانے کے لئے مفید طور پر کلمات کے ارتباط کے ذریعے لکھنے کے ذریعے جمع کئے جاتے ہیں. ہم نے بھی استعمال کرنے والوں اور زبان تعلیم سے ایک متخصص کے بارے میں فیڈبک کے بارے میں راپورت کیا ہے اور استعمال کرنے والوں اور زبان تعلیم کرنے والوں کی آنکھوں سے استعمال کرنے والوں کے امکانات کے بارے میں صحبت کریں۔ فیڈبک کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ وی ترل کے پاس تحصیل امکانات ہے، حالانکہ اس کی موجود حالت میں بعض ناکام پہچان سکتے ہیں.', 'vi': 'Trong bài viết này, chúng tôi giới thiệu công việc phát triển một huấn luyện viên từ vựng mà sử dụng các bài tập từ các nguồn ngôn ngữ như ConcPTNet và crodsours các phản ứng của học giả để cải thiện tài nguyên ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi đã thực hiện một kinh nghiệm đánh giá phương pháp của chúng tôi với một số người nói không thổ dân hơn hai ngày, nó cho thấy các mục nhập mới mở rộng ConcPT-Net có thể được thu thập hiệu quả qua các bài tập về các từ ngữ liên lạc. Chúng tôi cũng báo cáo về phản hồi thu được từ người dùng và một chuyên gia từ việc dạy ngôn ngữ, và thảo luận về khả năng của chương trình huấn luyện từ người dùng và người học ngôn ngữ. Phản hồi cho thấy v-trel có tiềm năng học tập, trong khi tình trạng hiện tại có thể tìm ra những thiếu sót.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz tilning manbalardan foydalanadigan vosita taʼminlovchimizni tahrirlash uchun ishni hozir qilamiz. KonceptNet kabi o'rganishlarning javoblalarini o'rganishlar tilning манбаъlarini o'ylash uchun ishni o'rganishlar javob beradi. Biz 60 natijadagi gapiruvchimizni ikki kun ichida qiymatlashimizni bajardik. Ko'rsatish mumkin, Koncept-Netni oshirish uchun yangi yozuvlar foydalanishi mumkin. Biz foydalanuvchilar va tillar o'rganishdan bir ekspert haqida javob beramiz va foydalanuvchi va tillar o'rganish qoidadagi vosita taʼminlovchi qoidasini javob beramiz. @ info", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме нашата работа по разработването на лексичен треньор, който използва упражнения, генерирани от езикови ресурси като и crowdsources на отговорите на обучаемите, за да обогати езиковия ресурс. Извършихме емпирична оценка на подхода ни с 60 чуждоезикови в продължение на два дни, което показва, че нови записи за разширяване на концептуалната мрежа могат ефективно да бъдат събрани чрез лексични упражнения за отношенията с думи. Също така докладваме за обратната връзка, събрана от потребителите и експерт от езиковото обучение, както и обсъждаме потенциала на приложението за обучение на лексика от гледна точка на потребителя и обучаващия езици. Обратната връзка предполага, че има образователен потенциал, докато в сегашното си състояние могат да бъдат установени някои недостатъци.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we ons werk aan het ontwikkelen van een woordenschattrainer die oefeningen gebruikt die zijn gegenereerd uit taalbronnen zoals ConceptNet en crowdsources de reacties van de leerlingen om de taalbron te verrijken. We hebben gedurende twee dagen een empirische evaluatie uitgevoerd van onze aanpak met 60 niet-native speakers, waaruit blijkt dat nieuwe inzendingen om Concept-Net uit te breiden efficiënt verzameld kunnen worden door middel van woordenschat oefeningen over woordrelaties. We rapporteren ook over de feedback van de gebruikers en een expert uit het taalonderwijs, en bespreken het potentieel van de woordenschattrainer applicatie vanuit het perspectief van de gebruiker en taallerende. De feedback suggereert dat v-trel educatief potentieel heeft, terwijl in de huidige toestand enkele tekortkomingen kunnen worden geïdentificeerd.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi vores arbejde med at udvikle en ordforråd træner, der bruger øvelser genereret fra sprogressourcer som ConceptNet og crowdsources svar fra eleverne til at berige sprogressourcen. Vi har gennemført en empirisk evaluering af vores tilgang med 60 ikke-indfødte talere over to dage, hvilket viser, at nye indlæg til at udvide Concept-Net effektivt kan indsamles gennem ordforråd øvelser om ordrelationer. Vi rapporterer også om feedback indsamlet fra brugerne og en ekspert fra sprogundervisning, og diskuterer potentialet i ordforråd træner ansøgningen fra bruger og sproglærer perspektiv. Feedback tyder på, at v-trel har uddannelsespotentiale, mens der i sin nuværende tilstand kan identificeres nogle mangler.', 'id': 'Dalam koran ini, kami mempersembahkan pekerjaan kami untuk mengembangkan pelatih vokabular yang menggunakan latihan yang dihasilkan dari sumber daya bahasa seperti ConceptNet dan sumber ramai tanggapan para pelajar untuk memperkaya sumber daya bahasa. Kami melakukan evaluasi empirik pendekatan kami dengan 60 pembicara bukan asli selama dua hari, yang menunjukkan bahwa masukan baru untuk memperluas Concept-Net dapat berkumpul secara efisien melalui latihan vokabular tentang hubungan kata. Kami juga melaporkan tentang feedback yang dikumpulkan dari pengguna dan seorang ahli dari pengajaran bahasa, dan mendiskusikan potensi aplikasi pelatih vokal dari perspektif pengguna dan pelatih bahasa. Balas balik menunjukkan bahwa v-trel memiliki potensi pendidikan, sementara dalam keadaan saat ini beberapa kekurangan dapat dikenal.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 어휘 교육사를 개발하는 일을 소개했다. 이 교육사는 언어 자원(예를 들어 개념망)에서 생성된 연습을 사용하고 학습자의 반응을 청부 맡아 언어 자원을 풍부하게 한다.우리는 60명의 비모국어 인사를 대상으로 이틀간의 실증 평가를 실시한 결과 단어 관계의 어휘 연습을 통해 개념망을 확장하는 새로운 항목을 효과적으로 수집할 수 있었다.우리는 또한 사용자와 언어 교육 전문가로부터 수집한 피드백을 보고하고 사용자와 언어 학습자의 측면에서 어휘 교육사의 응용 잠재력을 토론했다.피드백에 의하면 v-trel은 교육 잠재력을 가지고 있지만 현재 상태에서 일부 단점을 발견할 수 있다.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš rad na razvoju riječnog trenera koji koristi vježbe proizvođene iz jezičkih resursa poput ConceptNet a i publikacije odgovore učenika za bogatstvo jezičkog resursa. Izvršili smo empiričku procjenu našeg pristupa sa 60 neprijateljskih govornika tijekom dva dana, što pokazuje da se nove ulaze za proširenje koncepcija-mreže učinkovito mogu okupiti kroz riječne vježbe o odnosima riječi. Također izvješćujemo i o povratku okupljenoj od korisnika i stručnjaka iz učenja jezika, i o potencijalu prijave o prijavi na proizvodnju učitelja riječnika iz perspektive korisnika i učitelja jezika. Vraćanje ukazuje na to da v-trel ima obrazovni potencijal, dok u sadašnjoj državi mogu identificirati neke nedostatke.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir unsere Arbeit an der Entwicklung eines Vokabeltrainers vor, der Übungen nutzt, die aus Sprachressourcen wie ConceptNet generiert wurden und die Antworten der Lernenden crowdsourcet, um die Sprachressourcen zu bereichern. Wir haben unseren Ansatz mit 60 Nicht-Muttersprachlern über zwei Tage empirisch evaluiert, was zeigt, dass neue Einträge zur Erweiterung von Concept-Net durch Vokabelübungen zu Wortbeziehungen effizient gesammelt werden können. Wir berichten auch über das Feedback der Nutzer und eines Experten aus dem Sprachunterricht und diskutieren das Potenzial der Vokabeltrainer-Anwendung aus der Sicht der Benutzer und Sprachlerner. Die Rückmeldungen deuten darauf hin, dass v-trel Bildungspotenzial besitzt, während im gegenwärtigen Zustand einige Mängel festgestellt werden konnten.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما کار خود را بر روی توسعه آموزش آموزش کلمات را پیشنهاد می کنیم که از تمرین های تولید شده از منابع زبان مثل ConceptNet و منابع جمعیت جواب های دانش آموزان را برای توانگری منابع زبان استفاده می کند. ما در طول دو روز یک ارزیابی امپراطوری از طریقمون با ۶۰ صحبت کننده غیر طبیعی انجام دادیم که نشان می دهد که ورودهای جدید برای گسترش تفسیر شبکه می توانند به طور موثر از طریق تمرین کلمات بر روی ارتباطات کلمات جمع شوند. ما همچنین در مورد پشتیبانی که از استفاده کنندگان و یک متخصص از آموزش زبان جمع شده\u200cاند گزارش می\u200cدهیم، و در مورد پشتیبانی کاربرد آموزش کننده\u200cی vocabulary از دیدگاه استفاده کننده و یادکننده زبان صحبت می\u200cکنیم. بازگشت پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که v-trel potentials آموزشی دارد، در حالی که در حالت فعلی آن، بعضی shortcomings می\u200cتوانند شناسایی شوند.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim punën tonë mbi zhvillimin e një trajneri fjalor që përdor stërvitje të gjeneruara nga burimet gjuhësore të tilla si ConceptNet dhe crowdsource përgjigjet e nxënësve për të pasuruar burimet gjuhësore. Ne kryem një vlerësim empirik të qasjes sonë me 60 fjalëtarë jo-vendas gjatë dy ditëve, që tregon se hyrjet e reja për të zgjeruar Concept-Net mund të mblidhen efektivisht nëpërmjet stërvitjeve të fjalëkalimit mbi marrëdhëniet me fjalë. Ne raportojmë gjithashtu mbi përgjigjet e mbledhura nga përdoruesit dhe një ekspert nga mësimi i gjuhës dhe diskutojmë potencialin e aplikimit të trajnerit të fjalorëve nga perspektiva e përdoruesit dhe mësuesit e gjuhës. Përkthimi sugjeron se v-trel ka potencial arsimor ndërsa në gjendjen aktuale mund të identifikohen disa mungesa.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili, tunaweka kazi zetu kuhusu kuandaa mafunzo ya lugha ambayo hutumia michezo yaliyozaliwa kutoka rasilimali za lugha kama vile ConceptNet na wanachama kujibu kwa ajili ya kutajiri rasilimali za lugha. Tulifanya tathmini ya msisitizo wetu na wazungumzaji 60 wasio na asili kwa zaidi ya siku mbili, ambayo inaonyesha kuwa matangazo mapya ya kupanua Concept-Net yanaweza kukusanywa kwa ufanisi kupitia mazoezi ya maneno yanayohusiana na maneno. Pia tunaripoti kuhusu maoni yaliyokusanyika kutoka kwa watumiaji na mtaalam wa kufundisha lugha, na kujadili uwezekano wa matumizi ya mafunzo ya lugha kutoka kwa mtumiaji na mtazamo wa kujifunza lugha. Mwitikio huo unapendekeza kuwa v-trel ana uwezekano wa elimu, wakati katika hali yake ya sasa baadhi ya upungufu unaweza kutambuliwa.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የቋንቋ ሀብት እንደምትሆን ከቋንቋ ሀብት የተለወጠውን ትምህርት እና የመማሪዎችን መልስ ለቋንቋ ክፍተት ለማስጠንቀቅ የሚደረገውን ሥራ እናስገራለን፡፡ ከሁለት ቀን በላይ ያሉ 60 የአገራጆች ንግግር ያሉትን አካባቢ ማስታወቂያውን አደረግን፤ ይህም የቃላት ግንኙነት አዲስ መግቢያ በቃላት ግንኙነት ለመስጠት አዲስ መግቢያ እንዲችል ያሳያል፡፡ ደግሞም ከቋንቋ ትምህርት የተሰበሰቡትን መልስ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የድምፅ ጥያቄው v-trel ትምህርት ኃይል እንዲኖር ይገልጻል፤ አሁንም በሁኔታ ጉዳዩ አንዳንድ ጉዳይ ሊታወቅ ይችላል።', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz öz işimizi KoneptNet we köp dilleriň resurslaryny baýlamak üçin bilim adamlaryň jogaplaryny ulanan sözleri eğitimäge görkezilýäris. Biz öz ýaryşymyzy 2 günden bäri 60 ýerli çykyşçylar bilen empirik çykyş etdik. Bu ýaryşyň täze girişi "Concept-Net" diýip kabul edilýän sözler barada ýerleşýän çykyşlary bilen üýtgedip biler. Biz hem ullançylaryň we dil öwrenmesinden uzmançy hasaplanýarys we kelläp okuwçylaryň guramlarynyň we dil öwrenmeýän perspektivden gürrüň berýäris. Atyrlamak üçin v-trelynyň bilim potensialyny bar diýip kabul edip bilýär, we häzirki durumda käbir ýerleri tanap biler.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, laat ons ons werk voorsien op die ontwikkeling van 'n woordeboek onderwyser wat gebruik oefeninge genereer van taal hulpbronne soos ConceptNet en skakel die antwoordes van die leerneers om die taal hulpbronne te ryk. Ons het 'n empiriese evaluering van ons toegang uitgevoer met 60 nie-natuurlike sprekkers oor twee dae, wat wys dat nuwe inskrywings om Concept-Net te uitbrei kan effektief deur woordeboek oefening op woordverhoudinge versamel word. Ons rapporteer ook oor die terugmelding versamel van die gebruikers en 'n eksperteer van taal onderrig en bespreek die potensiele van die woordeboek onderriender aansoek van die gebruiker en taal leerneerder perspektief. Die terugmelding stel voorstel dat v-trel opvoedkundige potensiale het, terwyl in sy huidige staat sommige kortpaaklikhede kan identifiseer word.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեր աշխատանքը բառարանի ուսուցիչների զարգացման վրա, որը օգտագործում է լեզվի ռեսուրսներից ստեղծված վարժություններ, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ Կոնցեպտենթ և խմբավորում ուսանողների արձագանքները լեզվի ռեսուր Մենք երկու օրվա ընթացքում մեր մոտեցումների էմպիրիկ գնահատումը կատարեցինք 60 ոչ բնիկ խոսնակների հետ, ինչը ցույց է տալիս, որ նոր մտքերը, որոնք ընդլայնելու համար կարող են արդյունավետ հավաքվել բառային հարաբերությունների մասին բառային արտահայտությունների միջոցով: Մենք նաև զեկուցում ենք օգտագործողների և լեզվի ուսուցման մասնագետի հավաքված արձագանքների մասին և քննարկում ենք բառարանի ուսուցչի ծրագրի պոտենցիալը օգտագործողի և լեզվի ուսուցչի տեսանկյունից: Հետադարձը ցույց է տալիս, որ v-Trel-ը ունի կրթական պոտենցիալ, մինչդեռ իր ներկայիս վիճակում որոշ թերություններ կարող են հայտնաբերվել:', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি শব্দভাণ্ডার ট্রেনিয়ার উন্নয়নের ব্যাপারে আমাদের কাজ উপস্থাপন করছি যা ভাষার সম্পদের জন্য ব্যবহার করে যেমন কনসেপ্টনেট এবং শিক্ষার্থীদে আমরা দুই দিনের মধ্যে ৬০ জন আদিবাসী ভাষাকারীদের সাথে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া সম্পর্কের এক উদ্দেশ্যের মূল্য প্রদর্শন করেছি, যা দেখাচ্ছে যে কনসেপ্ট-নেট বিস্তৃ আমরা ব্যবহারকারীদের এবং ভাষা শিক্ষার্থী থেকে একত্রিত এক বিশেষজ্ঞের প্রতিক্রিয়া সম্পর্কে রিপোর্ট করি এবং ব্যবহারকারী ও ভাষা শিক্ষার দৃষ্ এই প্রতিক্রিয়াটি পরামর্শ দেয় যে ভি-ট্রেলের শিক্ষাগত সম্ভাবনা আছে, যদিও বর্তমান অবস্থায় কিছু সংক্রান্ত সম্পর্কে চিহ্নি', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš rad na razvoju riječnog trenera koji koristi vježbe proizvođene iz jezičkih resursa poput koncepNeta i publikacije odgovore učenika da bi obogatili jezički resurs. Izvršili smo empiričku procjenu našeg pristupa sa 60 neprodičnih govornika tijekom dva dana, što pokazuje da se nove ulaze za proširenje koncepcija-mreže efikasno mogu okupiti kroz riječne vježbe o odnosima riječi. Također izvješćujemo i o povratku okupljenoj od korisnika i stručnjaka iz učenja jezika, i o potencijalu prijave o prijavi na proizvodnju učitelja riječnika iz perspektive korisnika i učitelja jezika. Odgovor ukazuje na to da v-trel ima obrazovni potencijal, dok u sadašnjoj državi mogu identificirati neke nedostatke.', 'az': "Bu kağızda, öyrənənənlərin cavabını dil resursu zenginləndirmək üçün təhsil edən bir sözlü təhsil təhsil etmək üçün çalışmalarımızı göstəririk. Biz iki gün içində 60 yerli danışanlarla birlikdə istifadə etdik ki, concept-Net'i genişləndirmək üçün yeni girişimlər sözlərin əlaqələri ilə faydalı olaraq toplanılabilir. Biz də istifadəçilərin və dil öyrənməsindən olan ekspertlər barəsində xəbər veririk və sözlərin təhsil uygulayıcısının və dil öyrənməyən perspektivlərinin potensialini mübahisə edirik. Bu tədbir, v-trel'in təhsil potensialı olduğunu iddia edir, halbuki həmin durumda bəzi zəiflər tanıyabilir.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme naši práci na vývoji trenéra slovní zásoby, který využívá cvičení generovaná z jazykových zdrojů, jako je ConceptNet, a crowdsources reakcí žáků k obohacení jazykového zdroje. V průběhu dvou dnů jsme provedli empirické vyhodnocení našeho přístupu se šedesáti nerodilými mluvčími, což ukazuje, že nové záznamy pro rozšíření Concept-Net lze efektivně shromažďovat prostřednictvím cvičení slovní zásoby o slovních vztazích. Dále podáváme zprávu o zpětné vazbě získané od uživatelů a odborníka z výuky jazyků a diskutujeme potenciál aplikace trenér slovní zásoby z pohledu uživatele a studenta jazyka. Zpětná vazba naznačuje, že v-trel má vzdělávací potenciál, zatímco v současném stavu lze identifikovat některé nedostatky.', 'ca': "En aquest article, presentem la nostra feina en desenvolupar un entrenador de vocabulari que utilitza exercicis generats a partir de recursos lingüístics com ConceptNet i crowdsource les respostes dels alumnes per enriquecer el recurso lingüístic. Vam fer una evaluació empírica del nostre enfocament amb 60 oradors no natius durant dos dies, que mostra que les noves entrades per expandir Concept-Net es poden reunir eficientment a través d'exercicis vocabularis sobre relacions de paraules. També informem sobre el feedback recollit dels usuaris i un expert de l'ensenyament de llenguatges, i discutem el potencial de l'aplicació d'entrenador de vocabulari des de la perspectiva d'usuari i aprenent de llenguatges. El feedback suggereix que v-trel té potencial educatiu, mentre que en el seu estat actual es poden identificar algunes deficiències.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame oma tööd sõnavara koolitaja väljatöötamisel, mis kasutab keeleressurssidest, nagu ConceptNet, loodud harjutusi ja õppijate reaktsioone, et rikastada keeleressurssi. Kahe päeva jooksul viisime läbi oma lähenemisviisi empiirilise hindamise 60 mitte-emakeelse kõnelejaga, mis näitab, et Concept-Neti laiendamiseks on võimalik uusi kandeid efektiivselt koguda sõnasuhete sõnavara harjutuste kaudu. Samuti anname aru kasutajatelt ja keeleõppe eksperdilt kogutud tagasisidest ning arutame sõnavara koolitaja rakenduse potentsiaali kasutaja ja keeleõppija vaatenurgast. Tagasiside näitab, et v-trel on hariduslik potentsiaal, samas kui selle praeguses olukorras võib tuvastada mõningaid puudusi.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme työtämme kehittää sanastovalmentaja, joka käyttää kieliresursseista, kuten ConceptNetistä syntyneitä harjoituksia ja joukkolähteitä oppijoiden vastauksia kieliresurssin rikastamiseksi. Tutkimme lähestymistapamme empiirisesti 60 vierasta puhujaa kahden päivän aikana, mikä osoittaa, että uusia Concept-Netin laajentamiseen liittyviä tekstejä voidaan tehokkaasti kerätä sanastoharjoituksilla sanasuhteista. Raportoimme myös käyttäjiltä ja kieltenopetuksen asiantuntijalta saadusta palautteesta sekä keskustelemme sanastovalmennussovelluksen mahdollisuuksista käyttäjän ja kieltenopettajan näkökulmasta. Palaute viittaa siihen, että v-trelillä on koulutuspotentiaalia, kun taas sen nykyisessä tilassa voitaisiin havaita joitakin puutteita.', 'jv': 'Nang kuwi iki, awak dhéwé nggawe lan mulai perbudhakan langgar sampek tentang karo ingkang supaya winih sing koyo nggawe geranggap bantuan ingkang kaya bantuan ingkang disepe, kaya sistem Koncepnet karo kalah-wong sing arep macem depgané awak dhèwèké nggawe barang langgar. Awak dhéwé éntuk éntukno empir sing rumpéné awak dhéwé karo 60 éwé-pernik sing gak omongaké iki dadi, winih dhéwé nggawe barang nggawe sistem sing gak nggawe "conc-net" sing bisa ngomong nik wektu nggawe nguasakno perusahaan langgar sampeyan winih. Awakdhéwé mangan langgar wigatining aké karo nggambar aturan karo perbudhakan kanggo langkung arah, lan ngakngakpö nggawe ngubah aplikasi kanggo kelas perangkat awak dhéwé karo nggambar aturan karo pawaran. Tenggarané sawetara karo "v-tral" supoyo kapan edukasi kapan edukasi, sampeyan ono ing kapan tanggal gawe barang nggawe barang.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo svoje delo na razvoju trenerja besedišča, ki uporablja vaje, ustvarjene iz jezikovnih virov, kot je ConceptNet, in množične vire odzivov učencev za obogatitev jezikovnega vira. V dveh dneh smo izvedli empirično oceno našega pristopa s 60 tujimi govorci, kar kaže, da je mogoče nove vnose za razširitev Concept-Net učinkovito zbrati z vajami besedišča o besednih relacijah. Poročamo tudi o povratnih informacijah uporabnikov in strokovnjakov iz poučevanja jezikov ter razpravljamo o potencialu aplikacije za usposabljanje besedišča z vidika uporabnika in učenca jezikov. Povratne informacije kažejo, da ima v-trel izobraževalni potencial, medtem ko je v sedanjem stanju mogoče ugotoviti nekatere pomanjkljivosti.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da aikinmu a kan kwaɗaitar da wani mai tsaro na maganar, wanda ke amfani da abinci wanda aka samar da shi daga manyan harshe kamar ConceptNet da kuma yana ƙarfafa masu sani dõmin su rikitar da fassarar harshen. Mun yi ƙidãya ga mataimakanmu da masu saurãre 60 a shekara biyu, wanda ke nũna mataimaki yanzu da za'a ƙãra Concept Net yana iya amfani da kamfani a kan dangantar maganar. Kayya, Munã buga wani matsalar da aka haɗa daga masu amfani da mai amfani da wani masu fitarwa daga masu baran harshe, kuma munã yi jayayya masu yiwuwa da zai iya amfani da shiryarwa na masu bara da harshen. Bayanin da ake amfani da shi yana da awon mai elimi na V-trl, kuma a lokacin da yake a yanzu, za'a gane wasu shortcuti.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים את עבודתנו על פיתוח מאמן מילון שמשתמש באימונים שנוצרים משאבי שפה כמו ConceptNet ומקורי קהל את התגובות של הלימדים כדי לעשיר את משאבי השפה. ביצענו עריכה אמפירית של הגישה שלנו עם 60 דוברים לא מקומיים במשך יומיים, מה שמראה שכתבות חדשות כדי להרחיב את רשת הקונפט יכולות להיאסף באופן יעיל באמצעות תרגילי מילים על יחסי מילים. אנחנו גם מדווחים על ההחזרה שנאספה מהמשתמשים ומומחה מלמדת שפות, ודיונים על הפוטנציאל של התוכנית של מאמן המילים מהמבט של המשתמש וללמד שפות. ההחזרה מרמזת שלV-trel יש פוטנציאל חינוך, בעוד במצבו הנוכחי כמה חסרות יכולים לזהות.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ལྟ་བུའི་སྐད་རིགས་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་གཏམ་སྒྲིག་པ་ཞིག་གིས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་འབད་ནི་དང་། སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་རྩོལ་བ་དག ང་ཚོས་ཉིན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་འདྲེན་པ་མིན་པའི་གཟུགས་རིས་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན་ན། ང་ཚོས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་དང་སྐད ལྟ་བུའི་འགྱུར་བརྗོད་འདིས་ v-trel ལ་ལ་ཤེས་ཡོན་སྐྱེས་རྒྱུ་དང་།ད་ལྟོའི་གནས་སྟངས་ནང་དུ་མཐའ་འབྱུང་ཁོངས་ལ་ཤས་ཞིག'}
{'en': 'Jointly Learning Author and Annotated Character N-gram Embeddings : A Case Study in Literary Text', 'pt': 'Embeddings de N-gram de Autor e Caractere Anotado em Aprendizagem Conjunta: Um Estudo de Caso em Texto Literário', 'fr': "Apprentissage conjoint des intégrations de n-grammes d'auteur et de caractères annotés\xa0: une étude de cas dans le texte littéraire", 'es': 'Aprendizaje conjunto de incrustaciones de N-gram de autor y personaje anotado: un estudio de caso en texto literario', 'ar': 'مؤلف التعلم المشترك و N-gram Embeddings: دراسة حالة في النص الأدبي', 'ja': '共同学習著者と注釈付き文字N - gram埋め込み：文献テキストのケーススタディ', 'zh': '共学作者及注字符N-gram嵌:文本中例究之', 'ru': 'Совместное обучение автора и аннотированного персонажа N-gram Embeddings: A Case Study in Literary Text', 'hi': 'संयुक्त रूप से सीखना लेखक और एनोटेट चरित्र एन-ग्राम एम्बेडिंग: साहित्यिक पाठ में एक केस स्टडी', 'ga': 'Leabú N-gram an Údair i gComhfhoghlaim agus an Carachtar Anótáilte: Cás-Staidéar sa Téacs Liteartha', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Κοινή εκμάθηση συγγραφέα και σχολιασμένων χαρακτήρων Ενσωματώσεις Ν-γραμμάτων: Μια μελέτη περίπτωσης στο Λογοτεχνικό Κείμενο', 'hu': 'Közös tanulás szerző és jegyzetelt karakter N-gram beágyazások: esettanulmány irodalmi szövegben', 'kk': 'Авторды біріктіру және белгіленген таңбаларды N- грамма ендіру: Literary мәтінде үлкен- кіші оқу', 'it': 'Incorporazioni di N-gram: un caso di studio nel testo letterario', 'lt': 'Bendras mokymasis autorius ir anotuotas simbolis', 'mk': 'Соединето учење на авторот и внесување на N-грам на анотиран знак: Студија на случаи во литературен текст', 'ml': 'പഠിക്കുന്ന രചയിതാവും അറിയിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട അക്ഷരര്\u200d N- ഗ്രാം എംബെഡിങ്ങുകളും: A Case Study in Literary Text', 'mn': 'Хамтдаа суралцах зохиолч болон анзаарсан харин N-граммын нэмж: Сургуулийн текст дээрх жишээ судалгаа', 'no': 'Innebygging av teikn N- gram som lærer saman med autor og markerte teikn: Eit små bokstavar- studering i literre tekst', 'ro': 'Autor de învățare comună și caracter adnotat N-gram Încorporări: un studiu de caz în text literar', 'pl': 'Wspólne uczenie się autora i komentowane osadzenia N-gramów znaków: studium przypadku tekstu literackiego', 'sr': 'Zajednički autor učenja i uključeni karakter N- gram: studija slučajeva u literarnom tekstu', 'ms': 'Jointly Learning Author and Annotated Character N-gram Embeddings: A Case Study in Literary Text', 'sv': 'Gemensamt lärande författare och kommenterade tecken N-gram Inbäddningar: En fallstudie i litterär text', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'எழுத்தாளர் மற்றும் அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட எழுத்து N- கிராம் உட்போது: A Case Study in Literary Text', 'so': 'Ururka waxbarashada', 'mt': 'L-Awtur ta’ Tagħlim Konġunt u l-Karakter Annotat Embeddings N-gram: Studju ta’ Każ fit-Test Litterarju', 'ur': 'لیٹر ٹیکسٹ میں ایک کیس تحصیل', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name Hình học tập tin/ ảnhName', 'bg': 'Съвместно учене на автор и анотиран символ N-грам вграждания: казус в литературния текст', 'da': 'Fælles læring Forfatter og Annotated Character N-gram Embeddings: A Case Study in Literary Text', 'nl': 'Samen leren Auteur en Annotated Character N-gram Embeddings: Een case study in Literaire Tekst', 'de': 'Gemeinsames Lernen von Autor und Annotation von Zeichen N-Gramm Einbettungen: Eine Fallstudie im literarischen Text', 'id': 'Penulis Bergabung Belajar dan Karakter Annotasi N-gram Embeddings: A Case Study in Literary Text', 'fa': 'نویسنده\u200cی یادگیری با همدیگر و اضافه\u200cی نویسندۀ نویسندۀ نویسندۀ N- گرم: یک مطالعه پرونده در متن نویسندۀ نویسندگی', 'hr': 'Učitelj zajedničkog učenja i uključeni znak N- grama: istraživanje slučajeva u literarnom tekstu', 'ko': '공동 학습 저자와 주석 문자 N-gram 삽입: 문학 텍스트의 사례 연구', 'sw': 'Ungana na mwandishi wa kujifunza na Mpango wa Tamko N-gram: Utafiti wa Case katika Maandishi ya Fasihi', 'af': "Soektog leer Outeur en Annotated Karakter N- gram Inbetering: ' n Kas Leer in Literary Teks", 'tr': 'Otomatik we A ňlanan Karakter N-gram Girişmeleri: A Case Study in Literary Text', 'am': 'ታሪክ', 'sq': 'Mësoni së bashku autorin dhe karakterin e anotuar N-gram Embeddings: A Case Study in Literary Text', 'hy': 'Միացյալ սովորելու հեղինակը և նշումնավոր հեղինակը', 'az': '쿮lav톛 Et', 'bn': 'শিক্ষা লেখক এবং ঘোষণা করা অক্ষর N-gram Embeddings: সাহিত্য লেখায় একটি কেস স্টিডি', 'bs': 'Učitelj zajedničkog učenja i uključeni znak N-grama: studija slučajeva u literarnom tekstu', 'ca': "Aprendre juntament l'autor i el caràcter anotat Embeddings N-gram: Un estudi de cas en text literari", 'cs': 'Společné učení autora a anotované vložení znaků N-gramu: případová studie v literárním textu', 'et': 'Ühiselt õppiv autor ja annoteeritud märk N-grammi manustamised: juhtumiuuring kirjandustekstis', 'fi': 'Yhdessä oppiva tekijä ja kirjain N-gram upotukset: tapaustutkimus kirjallisuuden tekstissä', 'jv': 'Joinly Learning Pending and Adverted character N-gram', 'sk': 'Skupno učenje avtorja in pripomb N-gram vdelave: študija primera v literarnem besedilu', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Join Learning Author and Annotated Character N-gram Embedding: A Case Study in Literary Text', 'he': 'תוכניות N-גרם ללמוד ביחד'}
{'en': 'An author’s way of presenting a story through his / her writing style has a great impact on whether the story will be liked by readers or not. In this paper, we learn representations for authors of literary texts together with representations for character n-grams annotated with their functional roles. We train a neural character n-gram based language model using an external corpus of literary texts and transfer learned representations for use in downstream tasks. We show that augmenting the knowledge from external works of authors produces results competitive with other style-based methods for book likability prediction, genre classification, and authorship attribution.', 'ar': 'إن طريقة المؤلف في تقديم قصة من خلال أسلوبه في الكتابة لها تأثير كبير على ما إذا كانت القصة ستحظى بإعجاب القراء أم لا. في هذه الورقة ، نتعلم تمثيلات لمؤلفي النصوص الأدبية جنبًا إلى جنب مع تمثيلات الحرف n-grams مع شرح أدوارهم الوظيفية. نقوم بتدريب نموذج لغة قائم على الحرف العصبي n-gram باستخدام مجموعة خارجية من النصوص الأدبية ونقل التمثيلات المكتسبة لاستخدامها في مهام المصب. لقد أظهرنا أن زيادة المعرفة من الأعمال الخارجية للمؤلفين تؤدي إلى نتائج تنافسية مع الأساليب الأخرى القائمة على الأسلوب للتنبؤ بإمكانية الإعجاب بالكتب ، وتصنيف النوع ، وإسناد التأليف.', 'es': 'La forma en que un autor presenta una historia a través de su estilo de escritura tiene un gran impacto en si la historia gustará o no a los lectores. En este artículo, aprendemos representaciones para autores de textos literarios junto con representaciones de n-gramas de caracteres anotados con sus roles funcionales. Entrenamos un modelo de lenguaje basado en n-gramas de caracteres neuronales utilizando un corpus externo de textos literarios y transferimos representaciones aprendidas para su uso en tareas posteriores. Demostramos que aumentar el conocimiento de las obras externas de los autores produce resultados competitivos con otros métodos basados en el estilo para la predicción de la simpatía de los libros, la clasificación del género y la atribución de autoría.', 'fr': "La façon dont un auteur présente une histoire à travers son style d'écriture a une grande influence sur le fait que l'histoire sera appréciée ou non par les lecteurs. Dans cet article, nous étudions les représentations pour les auteurs de textes littéraires ainsi que les représentations de n-grammes de caractères annotés avec leurs rôles fonctionnels. Nous entraînons un modèle de langage basé sur un n-gramme de caractères neuronaux à l'aide d'un corpus externe de textes littéraires et transférons des représentations apprises pour les utiliser dans des tâches Nous montrons que l'augmentation des connaissances provenant d'œuvres externes d'auteurs produit des résultats compétitifs par rapport à d'autres méthodes basées sur le style pour la prédiction de la ressemblance d'un livre, la classification par genre et l'attribution de la paternité.", 'pt': 'A maneira de um autor apresentar uma história através de seu estilo de escrita tem um grande impacto sobre se a história será ou não apreciada pelos leitores. Neste artigo, aprendemos representações para autores de textos literários juntamente com representações para n-gramas de personagens anotados com seus papéis funcionais. Treinamos um modelo de linguagem baseado em n-gram de caracteres neurais usando um corpus externo de textos literários e transferimos representações aprendidas para uso em tarefas posteriores. Mostramos que aumentar o conhecimento de obras externas de autores produz resultados competitivos com outros métodos baseados em estilo para previsão de gosto de livros, classificação de gênero e atribuição de autoria.', 'ja': '作者の書き方を通じて物語を提示する方法は、その物語が読者に好まれるかどうかに大きな影響を与えます。この論文では、文学的テキストの著者のための表現と、その機能的役割を注釈した文字n - gramのための表現を学ぶ。私たちは、文献テキストの外部コーパスを使用してニューラルキャラクタn - gramベースの言語モデルをトレーニングし、下流タスクで使用するために学習された表現を転送します。著者の外部作品からの知識を増強することで、本の好感度予測、ジャンル分類、および著者の帰属に関する他のスタイルベースの手法と競合する結果を生み出すことが示されている。', 'hi': 'एक लेखक द्वारा अपनी लेखन शैली के माध्यम से एक कहानी को प्रस्तुत करने के तरीके का इस बात पर बहुत प्रभाव पड़ता है कि कहानी पाठकों को पसंद आएगी या नहीं। इस पेपर में, हम साहित्यिक ग्रंथों के लेखकों के लिए प्रतिनिधित्व सीखते हैं, साथ ही साथ चरित्र एन-ग्राम के लिए प्रतिनिधित्व करते हैं जो उनकी कार्यात्मक भूमिकाओं के साथ एनोटेट किए जाते हैं। हम साहित्यिक ग्रंथों के बाहरी कॉर्पस का उपयोग करके एक तंत्रिका चरित्र एन-ग्राम आधारित भाषा मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं और डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों में उपयोग के लिए सीखे गए अभ्यावेदन को स्थानांतरित करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि लेखकों के बाहरी कार्यों से ज्ञान को बढ़ाने से पुस्तक पसंद की भविष्यवाणी, शैली वर्गीकरण और लेखकत्व एट्रिब्यूशन के लिए अन्य शैली-आधारित तरीकों के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम उत्पन्न होते हैं।', 'zh': '作者因之/其风格而见故事,读者悦之。 于本文中,学文学文本作者及用其功能角色注字符n-gram。 吾用外文本语料库练于神经字符n-gram言语形势,而移学于下流。 吾明增益外知,与风术好感度占,流类归竞争力。', 'ru': 'То, как автор представляет историю через свой стиль письма, оказывает большое влияние на то, понравится ли рассказ читателям или нет. В данной работе мы изучаем представления для авторов литературных текстов вместе с представлениями для n-грамм персонажей, аннотированных с их функциональными ролями. Мы обучаем языковую модель на основе n-грамм нейронных символов, используя внешний корпус литературных текстов, и передаем полученные представления для использования в последующих задачах. Показано, что расширение знаний из внешних произведений авторов дает результаты, конкурентоспособные с другими стилистически ориентированными методами прогнозирования подобия книги, жанровой классификации и авторской атрибуции.', 'ga': 'Bíonn tionchar mór ag bealach an údair chun scéal a chur i láthair trína stíl scríbhneoireachta ar cé acu an dtaitneoidh nó nach dtaitneoidh an scéal le léitheoirí. Sa pháipéar seo, foghlaimímid uiríll d’údair téacsanna liteartha mar aon le huiríll ar charachtair n-gram atá anótáilte lena róil fheidhmiúla. Cuirimid oiliúint ar mhúnla teanga n-ghram atá bunaithe ar charachtair néaracha agus úsáid á baint as corpas seachtrach de théacsanna liteartha agus aistrímid léirithe foghlamtha le húsáid i dtascanna iartheachtacha. Léirímid go mbíonn torthaí iomaíocha le modhanna eile bunaithe ar stíl le haghaidh dhealraitheacht leabhar a thuar, aicmiú seánra agus sannadh údair, de bharr cur leis an eolas ó shaothair sheachtracha údair.', 'ka': 'ავტორის გამოსახულება ისტორია მისი/მისი წერის სტილისთვის უფრო დიდი შემთხვევაში იქნება თუ ისტორია კითხველებისთვის მინდა ან არა. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ვისწავლით ლიტრატური ტექსტის ავტორებისთვის გამოსახულებები და n-გრამებისთვის გამოსახულებები, რომლებიც ისინი ფუნქციური პროლისთვის მონა ჩვენ ნეიროლური სიმბოლოების n-გრამის მუშაობა ენის მოდელის გამოყენება ლიტრატური ტექსტის გარეშე და გარეშე სწავლილი გამოყენებების გამოყენებაში. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ავტორების გარეშე კონფიგურაციის მეცნიერების აზრუქება შემდეგ კონფიგურაცია სხვა სტილური მეცნიერებით წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების, გენერის კლასიფიკა', 'el': 'Ο τρόπος παρουσίασης μιας ιστορίας μέσω του στυλ γραφής του έχει μεγάλο αντίκτυπο στο αν η ιστορία θα αρέσει στους αναγνώστες ή όχι. Στην παρούσα εργασία, μαθαίνουμε αναπαραστάσεις για συγγραφείς λογοτεχνικών κειμένων μαζί με αναπαραστάσεις για γραμμάτια χαρακτήρων σχολιασμένες με τους λειτουργικούς τους ρόλους. Εκπαιδεύουμε ένα γλωσσικό μοντέλο νευρωνικού χαρακτήρα βασισμένο σε γραμμάριο χρησιμοποιώντας ένα εξωτερικό σώμα λογοτεχνικών κειμένων και μεταφέρουμε διδαγμένες αναπαραστάσεις για χρήση σε μεταγενέστερες εργασίες. Δείχνουμε ότι η αύξηση της γνώσης από εξωτερικά έργα συγγραφέων παράγει αποτελέσματα ανταγωνιστικά με άλλες μεθόδους για την πρόβλεψη της αρεσκείας του βιβλίου, την ταξινόμηση του είδους και την απόδοση του συγγραφέα.', 'hu': 'A szerző írási stílusával való bemutatásának módja nagy hatással van arra, hogy az olvasók kedvelik-e a történetet. Ebben a tanulmányban irodalmi szövegek szerzőinek reprezentációit és funkcionális szerepükkel megjegyzett karakterek n-gramjainak reprezentációit tanuljuk meg. Egy neurális karakter n-gram alapú nyelvi modellt képezünk irodalmi szövegek külső korpuszával, és átadjuk a tanult reprezentációkat downstream feladatokban. Megmutatjuk, hogy a szerzők külső alkotásaiból származó ismereteinek bővítése versenyképes eredményeket eredményez a könyv szerethetőségének előrejelzésére, műfaji osztályozására és szerzői tulajdonításra vonatkozó egyéb stílusalapú módszerekkel.', 'it': "Il modo in cui un autore presenta una storia attraverso il suo stile di scrittura ha un grande impatto sul fatto che la storia sarà apprezzata dai lettori o meno. In questo articolo apprendiamo rappresentazioni per autori di testi letterari insieme a rappresentazioni per caratteri n-grammi annotati con i loro ruoli funzionali. Formiamo un modello linguistico basato su n-gram basato su caratteri neurali utilizzando un corpus esterno di testi letterari e trasferiamo rappresentazioni apprese per l'uso in attività a valle. Mostriamo che l'aumento della conoscenza da opere esterne di autori produce risultati competitivi con altri metodi basati sullo stile per la previsione della simpatia dei libri, la classificazione di genere e l'attribuzione dell'autore.", 'mk': 'Начинот на авторот да ја претстави приказната преку неговиот стил на пишување има големо влијание врз тоа дали приказната ќе биде сакана од читателите или не. Во овој весник, научиме претставувања за авторите на литературните тексти заедно со претставувања за знак n-грами анотирани со нивните функционални улоги. Тренираме јазички модел на нервен карактер базиран на n-грам користејќи надворешен корпус литературни тексти и трансферираме научени претставувања за употреба во понатамошните задачи. Покажуваме дека зголемувањето на знаењето од надворешните дела на авторите произведува резултати конкурентни со други стилски методи за предвидување на љубопитноста на книгите, класификација на генерот и атрибутирање на авторството.', 'lt': 'Autoriaus būdas pristatyti istoriją savo rašymo stiliu turi didelę įtaką tai, ar istorija bus patinka skaitytojams, ar ne. Šiame dokumente mes mokome literatūros tekstų autorių atstovavimus kartu su n-gramų ženklų atstovavimais, pažymėtais jų funkciniais vaidmenimis. We train a neural character n-gram based language model using an external corpus of literary texts and transfer learned representations for use in downstream tasks.  Mes rodome, kad išorinių autorių kūrinių žinių didinimas sukuria rezultatus, kurie yra konkurencingi su kitais stiliu pagrįstais metodais knygų patikimumo prognozavimui, genro klasifikacijai ir autorių priskyrimui.', 'kk': 'Авторының оқиғаны оқиғалар жақсы көрсету үшін оқиғаны оқиғалар жақсы көрсету үшін көп нәрсе бар. Бұл қағазда, әріпті мәтін авторларының n- граммалардың белгілерін біріктіріп, олардың функциялық рольдеріне белгіленген n- граммалардың белгілерін үйренеміз. Біз n- граммды негіздеген невраллық таңбалар үлгісін түсіндіреміз, әріпті мәтіндердің сыртқы корпусын қолданатын және төменгі тапсырмаларда қолдану үшін үйренген та Біз авторлардың сыртқы жұмыстарының білімдерін күшейтуді басқа стильді негіздеген әдістерімен, жанр классификациясын және автордардың қатынасын бақылау әдістерін жасайды.', 'ms': "An author's way of presenting a story through his/her writing style has a great impact on whether the story will be liked by readers or not.  Dalam kertas ini, kita belajar perwakilan untuk penulis teks literari bersama dengan perwakilan untuk aksara n-gram yang ditandakan dengan peranan fungsi mereka. Kami melatih model bahasa berasaskan n-gram aksara saraf menggunakan korpus luar teks literari dan pemindahan perwakilan belajar untuk digunakan dalam tugas turun. Kami menunjukkan bahawa menambah pengetahuan dari kerja luar penulis menghasilkan keputusan kompetitif dengan kaedah lain berdasarkan gaya untuk ramalan kesenangan buku, klasifikasi genre, dan atribut penulisan.", 'ml': 'അദ്ദേഹത്തിന്\u200dറെ എഴുത്തിട്ടുള്ള രീതിയിലൂടെ ഒരു രചയിതാവിന്\u200dറെ രീതിയില്\u200d കഥ വായിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് ഇഷ്ടമാണോ അല്ലെങ് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സാഹിത്ര ര രേഖകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. അവയുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് പ്രതിനിധികളായ n-ഗ്രാമു ന്യൂറല്\u200d അക്ഷരം n-ഗ്രാമിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു പുറത്തുള്ള സാഹിത്രികങ്ങളുടെ കോര്\u200dപ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നു പുറത്തുള്ള പ്രവൃത്തികളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള അറിവ് വളര്\u200dത്തുന്നത്, പുസ്തകത്തിന്റെ പ്രവചനത്തിനും ജനം ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷ', 'mt': 'Il-mod kif awtur jippreżenta storja permezz tal-istil tal-kitba tiegħu/tagħha għandu impatt kbir fuq jekk l-istorja tixtieqx mill-qarrejja jew le. F’dan id-dokument, nitgħallmu rappreżentazzjonijiet għall-awturi ta’ testi letterarji flimkien ma’ rappreżentazzjonijiet għall-karattru n-grammi annotati bir-rwoli funzjonali tagħhom. Aħn a n ħarrġu mudell lingwistiku b’karattru newrali bbażat fuq n-gramma bl-użu ta’ korpus estern ta’ testi letterarji u nittrasferixxu rappreżentazzjonijiet miksuba għall-użu f’kompiti downstream. Aħna nuru li ż-żieda fl-għarfien minn xogħlijiet esterni tal-awturi tipproduċi riżultati kompetittivi ma’ metodi oħra bbażati fuq l-istil għat-tbassir tal-likwidità tal-kotba, il-klassifikazzjoni tal-ġeneru, u l-attribuzzjoni tal-awtur.', 'pl': 'Sposób prezentowania opowieści przez autora poprzez swój styl pisania ma ogromny wpływ na to, czy opowieść spodoba się czytelnikom czy nie. W artykule uczymy się reprezentacji dla autorów tekstów literackich wraz z reprezentacjami znaków n-gramów z adnotacją ich funkcjonalną rolą. Trenujemy neuronowy model językowy oparty na n-gramie z wykorzystaniem zewnętrznego korpusu tekstów literackich i przekazujemy nauczone reprezentacje do wykorzystania w dalszych zadaniach. Pokazujemy, że poszerzanie wiedzy z zewnętrznych prac autorów daje wyniki konkurencyjne z innymi stylowymi metodami przewidywania sympatii książek, klasyfikacji gatunkowej i atrybucji autorstwa.', 'ro': 'Modul autorului de a prezenta o poveste prin stilul său de scriere are un mare impact asupra faptului că povestea va fi plăcută sau nu de cititori. În această lucrare, învățăm reprezentări pentru autorii textelor literare împreună cu reprezentări pentru caractere n-grame adnotate cu rolurile lor funcționale. Antrenăm un model lingvistic bazat pe n-gram bazat pe caracter neural folosind un corpus extern de texte literare și transferăm reprezentări învățate pentru a fi utilizate în sarcini în aval. Arătăm că sporirea cunoștințelor din lucrările externe ale autorilor produce rezultate competitive cu alte metode bazate pe stil pentru predicția plăcerii cărților, clasificarea genurilor și atribuirea autorului.', 'mn': 'Түүнийг уншигчид дуртай эсвэл дуртай эсэхийг зохиолчдын түүхийг түүний бичсэн хэлбэрээр илтгэх арга нь гайхалтай нөлөөтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид бичил үсэг бичил баримтуудын зохиолчдын илэрхийллийг суралцдаг. n-граммын илэрхийллийг нь тэдний функцын үүрэгтэй тэмдэглэгдсэн. Бид n грамм суурь мэдрэлийн дүрс загварын загварыг бичиг бичиг бичиг бичиг баримтуудын гадна корпус ашиглаж, доорх үйл ажиллагаанд хэрэглэх боломжтой зүйлсийг шилжүүлж сурсан. Бид зохиолчдын гадаад ажлын мэдлэгийг нэмэгдүүлэх нь өөр хэлбэрээр зохион байгуулсан арга замыг номын таамаглалын таамаглах, жанр хэлбэрээр, зөвхөн зохион байгуулах төлөвлөгөөтэй өрсөлдөг.', 'no': 'Eit forfattar måte å visa ei historie gjennom skriftsstilen hans/hennes har stor effekt på om historien vil likerast av lesarar eller ikkje. I denne papiret lærer vi representasjonar for utviklaren av bokstavar tekstar saman med representasjonar for n-gramar med funksjonelle rolar. Vi treng eit n-gram-basert språk-modell med ein ekstern korpus av bokstavar tekstar og overføring lærte representasjonar for bruk i nedstrekkoppgåver. Vi viser at økning av kunnskapen frå eksterne arbeid av forfattarar produserer resultat konkurentær med andre stilbaserte metoder for å foregå boklikvaliteten, klassifisere gener og autorisasjon.', 'si': 'ලේඛකයාගේ විදියට කතාවක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදියට එයාගේ/එයාගේ ලේඛනයේ විදියට ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියල මේ පත්තරේ අපි ඉගෙන ගන්නවා ලියාත්\u200dරික පත්තරේ ලේඛකයන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සමග අක්ෂර n-ග්\u200dරෑම් වල ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් ඔවුන අපි න්\u200dයූරාල් අක්ෂර n- ග්\u200dරාම් අධාරිත භාෂා මොඩේල් එකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ලියාත්\u200dරික පාළුවක් සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ස අපි පෙන්වන්නේ විශේෂ ව්\u200dයාපාරයේ ප්\u200dරධාන විද්\u200dයාපාරයෙන් විශේෂ විද්\u200dයාපාරයෙන් පුළුවන් විද්\u200dයාපාරයෙන් පුළුවන් ව', 'sr': 'Način autora da predstavi priču kroz svoj stil pisanja ima veliki uticaj na to da li će se priču svidjeti čitači ili ne. U ovom papiru naučimo predstave za autore književnih tekstova zajedno sa predstavljanjem karaktera n grama annotiranim njihovim funkcionalnim ulogama. Vježbamo neuralni model jezika n a gramu koristeći vanjski korpus književnih tekstova i prenošenje naučenih predstavljanja za upotrebu u nizovim zadacima. Pokazujemo da povećanje znanja od vanjskih radova autora proizvodi konkurentne rezultate sa drugim metodama na stilu za predviđanje knjige likviditete, klasifikaciju genra i privlačenje autora.', 'so': 'Waddada uu warqad u soo bandhigi karo qoraalkiisa ayaa saameyn weyn ku leh in sheekadu ay u jeclaan karto ama in kale. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku barnaa noocyo-muuqashada qoraalka akhriska ah, islamarkaasna waxaynu ku qornaa noocyo-grams oo ay ku qoran yihiin qaybaha shaqada. Tusaale ku qoran afka n-gram, waxaynu ku tababarinnaa qoraalka dibadda ah ee qoraalka akhriska ah iyo u beddelinaynaa noocyada lagu barto isticmaalka shaqada hoose. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in horumarinta aqoonta laga kordhiyo shuqullada dibadda ee ay qoraal-qoraalka ka soo baxaan uu soo saaraa matooyin kale oo ku saabsan qaabab kale oo ku saabsan aqoonta la dhiganayo kitaabka, fasixinta jinsiga iyo qaybsiga rasmiga.', 'sv': 'Författarens sätt att presentera en berättelse genom sin skrivstil har stor betydelse för om berättelsen kommer att gillas av läsarna eller inte. I denna uppsats lär vi oss representationer för författare av litterära texter tillsammans med representationer för tecken n-gram kommenterade med deras funktionella roller. Vi tränar en neural karaktär n-gram baserad språkmodell med hjälp av en extern korpus av litterära texter och överför lärda representationer för användning i nedströms uppgifter. Vi visar att öka kunskapen från externa författares verk ger resultat som är konkurrenskraftiga med andra stilbaserade metoder för prediktion av bokens likbarhet, genreklassificering och författarskap.', 'ur': 'ایک لکھنے والے کا طریقہ اس کے/اس کے لکھنے کے طریقے سے ایک کہانی پیش کرنا بہت اثر دیتا ہے کہ یہ کہانی پڑھنے والوں سے پسند کیا جائے یا نہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم لکھنے کے لکھنے والوں کے لئے نمایش یاد کرتے ہیں اور ان کے کامل رول کے ذریعے ان کے n گرم کے نمایش کے ساتھ نمایش یاد کرتے ہیں. ہم ایک نئورل شخص n-گرم بنیاد زبان کی موڈل کی استعمال کر رہے ہیں لکھائی ٹیکسٹوں کی بیرونی کورپوس اور ترنسیٹر کی استعمال کے لئے سیکھا ہوا نمونات. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ لکھنے والوں کے خارج کاروں سے علم کی زیادتی کا نتیجہ اضافہ کرتا ہے کہ کتاب کی محبت کی پیش بینی، جنر کی کلاسیفوں اور اختیار کی تعریف کے لئے دوسرے طریقے کی بنیاد داری طریقے سے مہربانی کرتا ہے.', 'ta': "An author's way of presenting a story through his/her writing style has a great impact on whether the story will be liked by readers or not.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் எழுத்தாளர்களுக்கு பிரதிநிதிகளை கற்று கொடுக்கிறோம் மற்றும் எழுத்து n- கிராம் அவர்கள் செயல்பாடு பங நாம் ஒரு புதிய எழுத்து n- கிராம் அடிப்படையிலுள்ள மொழி மாதிரி பயிற்சி ஒரு வெளி நாட்டு உரைகளை பயன்படுத்தி குறிப்புகளை மாற்றி கீழ ஆசிரியர்களின் வெளி செயல்களிலிருந்து அறிவை அதிகரிப்பது மற்ற புத்தகப் புத்தகத்தின் ஒத்திப்புரிமை முறையான முறைகளுடன் போராட்டும் முடிவ", 'uz': "Muallifning tarixini o'rganish usuli, o'z yozuvchi uslubini o'rganish uchun, hikoyani o'qituvchilar orqali o'xshasha bo'lishi mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, biz litteratur textlar mualliflari uchun taʼminlovchilarni o'rganamiz va ularning funksiyatlari bilan xususiyatlarni o'rganamiz. We train a neural character n-gram based language model using an external corpus of literary texts and transfer learned representations for use in downstream tasks.  Biz mualliflarning tashqi ishlaridan bilimni oshirish natijalarini ko'rsatamiz bu kitobni tahrirlash, geni classification va mualliflarni tahrirlash uchun boshqa uslub-asosida rivojlanish natijalarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Một cách tác giả trình bày một câu chuyện qua phong cách viết của mình có tác động lớn đến việc độc giả có thích hay không. Trong bài viết n ày, chúng tôi học các diễn văn văn văn văn văn học cùng với các biểu tượng về nhân vật n-grams được ghi chú với vai trò hoạt động của chúng. Chúng tôi đào tạo một mô hình ngôn ngữ dựa trên nhân vật thần kinh n-gram bằng một tập thể văn học bên ngoài và chuyển các biểu đồ học theo dòng chảy. Chúng tôi cho thấy việc tăng cường kiến thức từ các tác giả bên ngoài sẽ tạo ra kết quả cạnh tranh với các phương pháp dựa trên phong cách khác để dự đoán kinh doanh sách, phân loại thể loại và tác quyền.', 'bg': 'Начинът на автора да представи история чрез неговия стил на писане има голямо влияние върху това дали историята ще бъде харесана от читателите или не. В настоящата статия научаваме представяне на автори на литературни текстове заедно с представяне на символи н-грами, анотирани с техните функционални роли. Обучаваме езиков модел на невронен характер, базиран на n-грама, използвайки външен корпус от литературни текстове и прехвърляме научени изображения за използване в задачи надолу по веригата. Показваме, че увеличаването на знанията от външни творби на авторите дава резултати, конкурентни с други стилово базирани методи за предсказване на харесваемостта на книгите, жанрова класификация и авторско приписване.', 'da': 'En forfatters måde at præsentere en historie gennem hans / hendes skrivestil har en stor indflydelse på, om historien vil blive lide af læserne eller ej. I denne artikel lærer vi repræsentationer for forfattere af litterære tekster sammen med repræsentationer for karakter n-grams kommenteret med deres funktionelle roller. Vi træner en neural karakter n-gram baseret sprogmodel ved hjælp af et eksternt korpus af litterære tekster og overfører lærte repræsentationer til brug i downstream opgaver. Vi viser, at forøgelse af viden fra eksterne værker af forfattere giver resultater, der er konkurrencedygtige med andre stilbaserede metoder til forudsigelse af bogslikbarhed, genreklassificering og forfatterskabstilskrivning.', 'id': 'Cara seorang penulis untuk memperkenalkan sebuah cerita melalui gaya menulis nya memiliki dampak besar pada apakah cerita akan disukai oleh pembaca atau tidak. Dalam kertas ini, kami belajar persembahan untuk penulis teks sastra bersama dengan persembahan untuk karakter n-gram yang dicatat dengan peran fungsional mereka. Kami melatih model bahasa berbasis n-gram karakter saraf menggunakan korpus eksternal teks sastra dan transfer representation belajar untuk digunakan dalam tugas downstream. Kami menunjukkan bahwa meningkatkan pengetahuan dari karya luar penulis menghasilkan hasil kompetitif dengan metode berbasis gaya lain untuk prediksi kesenangan buku, klasifikasi genre, dan atribut pengarang.', 'de': 'Die Art und Weise eines Autors, eine Geschichte durch seinen Schreibstil zu präsentieren, hat einen großen Einfluss darauf, ob die Geschichte von den Lesern gefallen wird oder nicht. In dieser Arbeit lernen wir Repräsentationen für Autoren literarischer Texte zusammen mit Repräsentationen für Zeichen n-Gramm mit ihren funktionalen Rollen kennen. Wir trainieren ein neuronales Zeichen n-Gramm basiertes Sprachmodell mit einem externen Korpus literarischer Texte und transferieren erlernte Repräsentationen für nachgelagerte Aufgaben. Wir zeigen, dass die Erweiterung des Wissens aus externen Werken von Autoren zu Ergebnissen führt, die mit anderen stilbasierten Methoden zur Vorhersage der Vorliebe für Bücher, Genreklassifikation und Autorenschaftszuweisung konkurrieren.', 'fa': 'راهی نویسنده ای که یک داستان را از طریق نوشتن او نشان دهد، تاثیر بزرگی بر این است که آیا داستان توسط خواننده ها دوست دارد یا نه. در این کاغذ، ما نمایش\u200cهایی برای نویسندگان متن\u200cنویسی با نمایش\u200cهایی برای نویسندگان n گرم\u200cها را یاد می\u200cگیریم که با نقش\u200cهای عملی\u200cشان مشخص شده\u200cاند. ما یک مدل زبان بوسیله n گرم عصبی را با استفاده از یک کورپوس خارجی از متن\u200cهای نوشته آموزش می\u200cدهیم و انتقال نمایش\u200cهای یاد گرفته برای استفاده در کار\u200cهای پایین\u200cترین استفاده می\u200cکنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که افزایش دانش از کارهای خارجی نویسندگان نتیجه\u200cهای مسابقه با روش\u200cهای دیگر بر اساس طریق\u200cها برای پیش\u200cبینی پیش\u200cبینی قابلیت کتاب، کلیسازی ژنتر و تعریف اجازه\u200cدهندگان را تولید می\u200cکند.', 'nl': 'De manier waarop een auteur een verhaal presenteert via zijn/haar schrijfstijl heeft een grote invloed op of het verhaal wel of niet leuk zal zijn bij lezers. In dit artikel leren we representaties voor auteurs van literaire teksten samen met representaties voor tekens n-grammen geannoteerd met hun functionele rollen. We trainen een neuraal karakter n-gram gebaseerd taalmodel met behulp van een extern corpus van literaire teksten en brengen geleerde representaties over voor gebruik in downstream taken. We laten zien dat het vergroten van de kennis van externe werken van auteurs resultaten oplevert die concurreren met andere stijlgebaseerde methoden voor voorspelling van de sympathie van boeken, genreclassificatie en auteurschapsattributie.', 'hr': 'Autorov način predstavljanja priče kroz njegov/njen stil pisanja ima veliki utjecaj na to da li će se priča svidjeti čitači ili ne. U ovom papiru naučimo predstave za autore književnih tekstova zajedno sa predstavljanjem karaktera n grama annotiranim njihovim funkcionalnim ulogama. Vježbamo model jezika n a n-gramu na neuralnom karakteru koristeći vanjski korpus literarnih tekstova i prenošenje učenih predstavljanja za upotrebu u donjim zadatkima. Pokazujemo da povećanje znanja od vanjskih radova autora proizvodi konkurentne rezultate s drugim metodama na stilu za predviđanje rezultata o likviditeti knjiga, klasifikaciju genre i privlačenje autora.', 'sw': 'Namna ya mwandishi wa kutoa hadithi kupitia mtindo wake wa kuandika una athari kubwa juu ya kama habari itafanikiwa na wasomaji au la. Katika karatasi hii, tunajifunza wakilishi kwa waandishi wa maandishi ya fasihi pamoja na wawakilishi kwa wahusika n-gram waliodhihirishwa na jukumu lao. Tunawafunza muundo wa lugha inayomilikiwa n a ubongo kwa kutumia viungo vya nje vya maandishi ya fasihi na kuhamisha wakilishi waliojifunza kwa kutumia katika kazi za mito ya chini. Tunaonyesha kwamba kuongeza maarifa kutoka kwa kazi za nje za waandishi hutoa matokeo yanayojitihada na njia nyingine za mitindo kwa kutabiri usawa wa kitabu, usambazaji wa kimapenzi, na kutolewa kwa mamlaka.', 'tr': 'Bir awtoryň öz ýazma stili bilen hekaýanyň halamasynyň ýöne bir täsiri bar. Bu kağıt içinde, resmi metinlerin awtorilerini ve n-gramlar karakterlerinin rollerine ifade edilen ifadeleri öğrendik. Biz n ärol karakterlerden n-gram tabanly dil modelini edebiýarly metinlerin daşarydaky korpusyny ulanýarys we a şaky işlerinde ulanmak üçin öwrendirilen temsilleri taýýarlaýarys. Biz awtorlaryň daşaryk işlerinden bilimi artmak üçin kitap howpsuzlyklary öňünden, jenar klasifikasy we awtomatik taýýarlanmasy üçin netijeleri başga tarzda döwletlere mejbur edýändigini görkeýäris.', 'af': "'n Outeur se manier om 'n storie deur sy/haar skryfstyl te voorsien het 'n groot invloek op of die storie deur lesers gelyk word of nie. In hierdie papier leer ons voorstellings vir outeurs van literarie teks saam met voorstellings vir karakter n-grame wat met hul funksionele roles aangeteken is. Ons tref 'n neurale karakter n-gram gebaseerde taal model met gebruik van 'n eksterne korpus van literarie teks en oordrag leer voorstellings vir gebruik in onderstreem taak. Ons wys dat die uitbreiding van die kennis van eksterne werke van outeure produseer resultate kompetief met ander stylbaseerde metodes vir boeklikbaarheidsversoeking, genre klassifikasie en autorisasie-toetrekking.", 'sq': 'Mënyra e një autori për të paraqitur një histori nëpërmjet stilit të shkrimit të tij/saj ka një ndikim të madh në nëse historia do të pëlqehet nga lexuesit apo jo. Në këtë letër, ne mësojmë përfaqësime për autorët e teksteve letrare së bashku me përfaqësime për karakterin n-gram të anotuar me rolin funksional të tyre. Ne trajnojmë një model gjuhësh me bazë n ë n-gram duke përdorur një korpus të jashtëm tekstesh letrare dhe duke transferuar përfaqësime të mësuara për përdorim në detyra poshtë. Ne tregojmë se rritja e njohurive nga veprat e jashtme të autorëve prodhon rezultate konkurruese me metoda të tjera të bazuara në stil për parashikimin e pëlqyeshmërisë së librit, klasifikimin e xhenerit dhe atribucionin e autorisë.', 'ko': '작가가 작문 풍격을 통해 이야기를 표현하는 방식은 독자가 이 이야기를 좋아하는지 아닌지에 큰 영향을 미친다.이 글에서 우리는 문학 텍스트 작가의 표현과 기능적 역할로 주석된 문자 n-gram의 표현을 배운다.우리는 문학 텍스트의 외부 어료 라이브러리를 사용하여 신경 문자 n-gram을 기반으로 한 언어 모델을 훈련시키고 학습한 표징을 하위 임무로 옮긴다.우리의 연구에 의하면 작가의 외부 작품에서 지식을 늘리면 다른 풍격을 바탕으로 하는 방법과 비견되는 결과를 얻을 수 있다. 이런 방법은 책의 친화력, 유형 분류와 작가의 귀속을 예측할 수 있다.', 'am': 'የጸሐፊው ታሪክ በጽሕፈቱ ዘይት ላይ ታሪክ የሚያሳውቀው የታሪክ ታሪክ በአናባቢው ቢመስል ወይም ባይኖር ታላቅ ጉዳይ አለበት፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም የሐሳብተር ጽሑፎችን ለጸሐፊዎች መልዕክቶችን እናስተማራለን፡፡ የናውሬው የ-ግራም የቋንቋ ሞዴል የውጭ የጽሑፎችን የኮርፓስ እና ለታችኛው ስራ ለመጠቀም ተማርነው እናሳውቃለን፡፡ We show that augmenting the knowledge from external works of authors produces results competitive with other style-based methods for book likability prediction, genre classification, and authorship attribution.', 'hy': 'Ավելի շատ ազդեցություն ունի հեղինակի պատմության ներկայացման մեթոդը իր գրողական ոճի միջոցով, թե արդյոք պատմությունը կսիրեն ընթերցողները, թե ոչ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք սովորում ենք գրական տեքստների հեղինակների ներկայացումներ, միասին n-գրամի ներկայացումներ, որոնք նշում են իրենց ֆունկցիոնալ դերերով: Մենք վարժեցնում ենք n-գրամ հիմնված նյարդային հիերոգլիֆի լեզվի մոդել օգտագործելով գրական տեքստերի արտաքին մարմին և փոխանցելով սովոր ներկայացումներ, որոնք օգտագործվում են հետագա աշխատանքներում: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ հեղինակների արտաքին գործերից արտադրված գիտելիքների աճը հանգեցնում է արդյունքներ, որոնք մրցակցում են գրքի սիրալիության կանխատեսման այլ ոճով հիմնված մեթոդների հետ, գենրի դասակարգման և հեղինակության առանձնահատ', 'az': 'Bir yazıcının hekayətini oxuyanların xoşuna gələcəyini və ya yoxdur. Bu kağızda, yazılı mətnlərin yazıcıları və funkcional rolləri ilə ifadə edilən n-gramlar karakterlərinin ifadə edilməsini öyrənirik. Biz n öral karakteri n-gram tabanlı dil modelini yazıcı mətnlərin dış korpusu ilə təhsil edirik və a şağıdaki işlərdə istifadə etmək üçün öyrəndiyimiz təhsil göstəriciləri təhsil edirik. Biz göstəririk ki, yazıcıların dış işlərindən bilikləri artırmaq, kitab istəməzliklərinin öngörünürləri, genr klasifikasyonu və yazıcılığı təsirlərinin başqa stillərlə müqayisədə müqayisədə olar.', 'cs': 'Autorův způsob prezentace příběhu prostřednictvím svého stylu psaní má velký vliv na to, zda se čtenáři budou líbit nebo ne. V tomto článku se naučíme reprezentace pro autory literárních textů společně s reprezentacemi znaků n-gramů anotovanými jejich funkčními rolemi. Na základě externího korpusu literárních textů trénujeme neuronový jazykový model založený na n-gramech a přenášíme naučené reprezentace pro použití v následných úkolech. Ukazujeme, že rozšíření znalostí z externích děl autorů přináší výsledky konkurenční s jinými stylově založenými metodami predikce sympatibility knih, žánrové klasifikace a atribuce autorství.', 'et': 'Autori viis esitada lugu läbi oma kirjutamisstiili avaldab suurt mõju sellele, kas lugu meeldib lugejatele või mitte. Käesolevas töös õpime kirjandustekstide autoritele esitusi koos nende funktsionaalsete rollidega märgistatud n-grammide esitustega. Koolitame neuromärgi n-grammipõhist keelemudelit, kasutades välist kirjandustekstide korpust ja edastame õppinud esindusi järgnevates ülesannetes kasutamiseks. Näitame, et autorite välistest teostest saadud teadmiste suurendamine annab tulemusi, mis konkureerivad teiste stiilipõhiste meetoditega raamatumeeldivuse prognoosimiseks, žanri klassifitseerimiseks ja autorsuse omistamiseks.', 'fi': 'Kirjailijan tapa esittää tarina kirjoitustyylinsä kautta vaikuttaa suuresti siihen, pitäisivätkö lukijat tarinasta vai eivät. Tässä artikkelissa opimme kirjallisten tekstien kirjoittajien esittämiä esityksiä yhdessä hahmon n-grammien esittämien esitysten kanssa, jotka on merkitty funktionaalisiin rooleihin. Koulutamme neurohahmon n-grammiin perustuvaa kielimallia käyttäen ulkoista kirjallisten tekstien korpusta ja siirrämme opittuja representaatioita myöhempiin tehtäviin. Osoitamme, että tiedon lisääminen ulkoisista teoksista tuottaa tuloksia, jotka kilpailevat muiden tyylipohjaisten menetelmien kanssa kirjojen miellyttävyyden ennustamiseen, lajityypin luokitteluun ja tekijän nimeämiseen.', 'bn': 'একজন লেখকের ভাবে তার লেখার স্টাইলের মাধ্যমে একটি গল্প উপস্থাপন করার উপায় রয়েছে এই গল্প পাঠকদের পছন্দ করা হবে কিনা অথবা না। এই পত্রিকায় আমরা সাহিত্যের লেখকদের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখি এবং তাদের কার্যক্রমের ভূমিকা নিয়ে অক্ষর এন-গ্রামের প্রতিনিধিত্ব We train a neural character n-gram based language model using an external corpus of literary texts and transfer learned representations for use in downstream tasks.  আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে লেখকদের বাইরের কাজ থেকে জ্ঞান বৃদ্ধি করার ফলাফল তৈরি করে বইয়ের সমান ভবিষ্যত, গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিভিন্ন ধরনের প্রতিযোগিতা এবং লেখ', 'bs': 'Način autora da predstavi priču kroz svoj stil pisanja ima veliki uticaj na to da li će se priča svidjeti čitači ili ne. U ovom papiru naučimo predstave za autore književnih tekstova zajedno sa predstavljanjem karaktera n-grama annotiranim njihovim funkcionalnim ulogama. Vježbamo neuralni model jezika n a gramu koristeći vanjski korpus književnih tekstova i prenošenje naučenih predstavljanja za upotrebu u donjim zadacima. Pokazujemo da povećanje znanja od vanjskih radova autora proizvodi konkurentne rezultate sa drugim metodama na stilu za predviđanje rezultata o likviditeti knjiga, klasifikaciju genre i privlačenje autora.', 'ca': "La manera d'un autor de presentar una història a través del seu estil d'escriptura té un gran impacte en si la història serà agradable pels lectors o no. En aquest article aprenem representacions per als autors de textos literaris juntament amb representacions per als n-grams de caràcter anotats amb els seus rols funcionals. Ensenyem un model de llenguatge basat en n-gram amb un cos extern de textos literaris i transferim representacions aprengutes per utilitzar en tasques avall. Mostrem que augmentar el coneixement de les obres externes dels autors produeix resultats competitius amb altres mètodes basats en estil per predir l'agradabilitat del llibre, classificar el gènere i atribuir l'autoriat.", 'jv': 'Ndoleh penalah sing nyupir nggawe kuwi nggawe barang seneng pisan sedhaya sak cara sing apik dadi, or a dadi seneng pisan. Nang pempel iki, kita mulai representasiya kanggo oleh-akeh liyane karo cara n-gram sing dadi nyimpen karo rol funksiyonal. Awak dhéwé luwih bantungkur maneh n-gram sing basa gambar nggambar kelangan butungkur Awak dhéwé éntuk nggawe ngerti tindang nggawe barang nggambar barang manut karo akeh barang-manut sing paling nggambar kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngerayakno urip, kalih-urip lan basa sing paling dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Avtorjev način predstavitve zgodbe skozi svoj slog pisanja ima velik vpliv na to, ali bo zgodba bralcem všeč ali ne. V prispevku se učimo reprezentacij za avtorje literarnih besedil skupaj s reprezentacijami znakov n-gramov, označenimi z njihovimi funkcionalnimi vlogami. Z uporabo zunanjega korpusa literarnih besedil usposabljamo neuralni lik n-gramski jezikovni model in prenašamo učene reprezentacije za uporabo v nadaljnjih nalogah. Pokazali smo, da povečanje znanja iz zunanjih del avtorjev prinaša rezultate, ki so konkurenčni z drugimi slogovnimi metodami za napovedovanje všečnosti knjig, klasifikacijo žanrov in pripisovanje avtorstva.', 'ha': 'Hanyar wani marubuci ya bãyar da wani lãbãri a bayan misalinsa da rubũtunsa, yana da matsayi mai girma a kan ka yi kama da karatun karatun nan ko ba. Ga wannan takarda, Munã sanar masu karatun masu rubutun littãfi da sami masu karatun wa karatun n-gram da aka yi matarwa da aikin su. Tuna kõre wani misali n a karatun na-gram da ke rubutun littafan na ƙarƙashin littãfi da ke amfani da shi a cikin aikin na ƙarƙashe. Tuna nũna cewa, in ƙãra ilimi daga aikin marubuci na ƙarani, yana fitar da matsayi ta yi ƙidãya da wasu hanyoyin littafin da ke daidaita littafin, fassarar gensi da fassarar mutane.', 'he': "דרכו של סופר להציג סיפור דרך סגנון הכתיבה שלו יש השפעה גדולה על אם הסיפור יהיה אוהב על ידי קוראים או לא. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו לומדים מייצגים עבור סופרים של טקסטים ספרתיים יחד עם מייצגים עבור דמות n-גרם מועטפים עם תפקידיהם המפעילים. אנו מאמן דגם שפה מבוסס על n-גרם אופי עצבי באמצעות גופוס חיצוני של טקסטים ספרתיים ומעבר מייצגים למדורים להשתמש במשימות מתחתיות. אנחנו מראים שגיבוי הידע מהעבודות החיצוניות של הסופרים יוצר תוצאות תחרותיות עם שיטות אחרות מבוססות בסגנון לחזוי אהובת ספרים, קליזציה של ג'נר, ותיקום הסופרות.", 'bo': 'རྩོམ་པ་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནས་ཁོང་གི་བྲིས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཞིག་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་བ་ཞིག་ལ་གཏོང་དགོས་མིན འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྩོམ་པ་པོ་ཚོའི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མངོན་འཆར་སྐབས་ཤོག་གི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་དང་། སྟོན་བཤད We train a neural character n-gram based language model using an external corpus of literary texts and transfer learned representations for use in downstream tasks. We show that augmenting the knowledge from external works of authors produces results competitive with other style-based methods for book likability prediction, genre classification, and authorship attribution.'}
{'en': 'Generating Challenge Datasets for Task-Oriented Conversational Agents through Self-Play', 'ar': 'إنشاء مجموعات بيانات التحدي لوكلاء المحادثة الموجهين نحو المهام من خلال اللعب الذاتي', 'ja': 'セルフプレイを通じて、タスク指向の会話エージェントのためのチャレンジデータセットを生成する', 'es': 'Generación de conjuntos de datos de desafíos para agentes conversacionales orientados a tareas mediante el juego automático', 'fr': "Génération d'ensembles de données de défis pour les agents conversationnels orientés tâches via Self-Play", 'pt': 'Gerando conjuntos de dados de desafio para agentes de conversação orientados a tarefas por meio da reprodução automática', 'hi': 'स्व-प्ले के माध्यम से कार्य-उन्मुख संवादी एजेंटों के लिए चुनौती डेटासेट उत्पन्न करना', 'ru': 'Создание наборов данных задач для ориентированных на задачи разговорных агентов с помощью самовоспроизведения', 'zh': '因自玩为向任者摄生质数据集', 'ga': 'Tacair Sonraí Dúshláin a Ghiniúint do Ghníomhairí Comhráite atá Dírithe ar Thasc trí Fhéin-imirt', 'ka': 'სამუშაო დამუშაო პარამეტრების კონტაქციო ადვნენტებისთვის განახლება', 'el': 'Δημιουργία συνόλων δεδομένων πρόκλησης για πράκτορες συνομιλίας προσανατολισμένους στην εργασία μέσω του αυτοπαιχνιδιού', 'it': 'Generare i dataset delle sfide per gli agenti di conversazione orientati alle attività attraverso il self-play', 'lt': 'Iššūkių duomenų rinkinių kūrimas į užduotis orientuotiems konversacijos agentams savarankiškai', 'kk': 'Тапсырма- бағытталған қатынау агенттерінің өзіңіз ойнау арқылы шақыру деректер деректерін құру', 'ms': 'Menjana set data cabaran untuk Agen Perbualan Berorientasi-Tugas melalui Main-Sendiri', 'mk': 'Генерирање на датотеки за предизвици за конверзационални агенти ориентирани на задачите преку самоиграње', 'hu': 'Kihívásadatok generálása feladatorientált beszélgetési ügynökök számára önjáték segítségével', 'mn': 'Өөрийн тоглоомын аргаар зориулалт өгөгдлийн санг бүтээж байна.', 'mt': 'Il-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Settijiet ta’ Dejta ta’ Sfidi għall-Aġenti Konversazzjonali orjentati lejn ix-Xogħol permezz ta’ Logħob Indipendenti', 'ml': 'പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ആഭ്യസംഘങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ ഡേറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d സ്വയം', 'no': 'Lagar utfordringsdatabaser for oppgåveorienterte samtaleagentar gjennom sjølvspeling', 'pl': 'Generowanie zestawów danych wyzwań dla agentów konwersacyjnych zorientowanych na zadania poprzez samodzielne odtwarzanie', 'ro': 'Generarea seturilor de date ale provocărilor pentru agenții conversaționali orientați spre sarcini prin auto-play', 'sv': 'Skapa utmaningsdataset för uppgiftsorienterade konversationsagenter genom självspel', 'sr': 'Generiranje datoteka izazova za razgovorne agente iz zadataka kroz samostalnu igranju', 'so': 'Generating Challenge Datasets for Task-oriented Talobixinta Agents through Self-Play', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් මධ්\u200dයමයෙන් වාර්තාව සම්බන්ධ කතාවක් නියෝජිත වෙනුවෙන් චාලන්ජ් දත්ත ස', 'ta': 'சொந்த விளையாட்டு மூலம் பணியில் தேர்ந்தெடு', 'ur': 'Task-Oriented Conversational Agents کے لئے چالینگ ڈاٹেس پیدا کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tạo ra các tập ảnh thách đấu cho các đặc vụ điều khiển qua tự chơi', 'bg': 'Генериране на набори от данни за предизвикателства за ориентирани към задачите разговорни агенти чрез самоигра', 'nl': 'Uitdagingsgegevens genereren voor taakgerichte gespreksagenten via Self-Play', 'da': 'Generering af udfordringsdatasæt til opgaveorienterede samtaleagenter gennem selvspil', 'hr': 'Generiranje datoteka izazova za razgovorne agente orijentirane na zadatku kroz samostalnu igranju', 'id': 'Menjana Set Data tantangan untuk Agen Berbicara Berorientasi Tugas melalui Permainan Sendiri', 'ko': '자가 게임을 통해 임무를 위한 세션 에이전트를 위한 도전 데이터 집합 생성', 'fa': 'ایجاد داده\u200cهای چالش برای ماموران مکالمه\u200cهای اصلی\u200cشده از طریق خودبازی', 'tr': 'Görev-Taýýarlanmasyzlyk Maglumaty Arşiwleri Öz-Oýun bilen Çykyş Maglumaty Bejer', 'de': 'Generierung von Challenge-Datensätzen für aufgabenorientierte Gesprächspartner durch Self-Play', 'af': 'Genereer Challenge Databases vir Opdrag-Oriënteerde Gespraak Agente deur Self-Speel', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Դրա միջոցով ստեղծելով մարտահրավերի տվյալների համակարգեր', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza seti za Data za Challenge kwa ajili ya Mashirika ya mazungumzo ya Kazi kwa kupitia Play', 'bn': 'Generating Challenge Datasets for Task-Oriented Conversational Agents through Self-Play', 'bs': 'Generiranje datoteka izazova za razgovorne agente orijentirane na zadatku kroz samostalnu igru', 'sq': 'Duke krijuar baza të dhënash të sfidave për agjentët konversacional të orientuar në punë nëpërmjet vetë-luajtjes', 'az': 'Öz-Oyun Aracılığı ilə Task-Orientli Konuşuşuş Aģentləri üçün Challenge Verici Qurulması', 'ca': 'Generating Challenge Datasets for Task-Oriented Conversational Agents through Self-Play', 'cs': 'Generování datových sad výzvy pro konverzační agenty orientované na úkoly prostřednictvím Self-Play', 'et': 'Probleemide andmekogumite loomine ülesannetele orienteeritud vestlusagentidele isemängu kaudu', 'fi': 'Haasteaineistojen luominen tehtäväorientoituneille keskustelutoimijoille itsepelaamisen avulla', 'jv': 'Jejaring', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje naborov podatkov o izzivih za naloge usmerjene pogovorne agente s samoigro', 'he': 'יצירת קבוצות נתונים של אתגרים עבור סוכנים שיחה ממוקדים למשימות דרך משחק עצמי', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ལས་ཀ་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་གཏམ་གླེང་སྡེར་མང་ཙམ་ལ་གདོང་ལེན་གནད་སྡུད་མཇུག་བསྐྲུན་འབད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'End-to-end neural approaches are becoming increasingly common in conversational scenarios due to their promising performances when provided with sufficient amount of data. In this paper, we present a novel methodology to address the interpretability of neural approaches in such scenarios by creating challenge datasets using dialogue self-play over multiple tasks / intents. Dialogue self-play allows generating large amount of synthetic data ; by taking advantage of the complete control over the generation process, we show how neural approaches can be evaluated in terms of unseen dialogue patterns. We propose several out-of-pattern test cases each of which introduces a natural and unexpected user utterance phenomenon. As a proof of concept, we built a single and a multiple memory network, and show that these two architectures have diverse performances depending on the peculiar dialogue patterns.', 'fr': "Les approches neuronales de bout en bout sont de plus en plus courantes dans les scénarios conversationnels en raison de leurs performances prometteuses lorsqu'elles sont fournies avec une quantité suffisante de données. Dans cet article, nous présentons une nouvelle méthodologie pour aborder l'interprétabilité des approches neuronales dans de tels scénarios en créant des ensembles de données de défis utilisant le jeu automatique de dialogue sur plusieurs tâches/intentions. L'auto-jeu de dialogue permet de générer une grande quantité de données synthétiques\xa0; en tirant parti du contrôle total sur le processus de génération, nous montrons comment les approches neuronales peuvent être évaluées en termes de modèles de dialogue invisibles. Nous proposons plusieurs cas de test hors modèle, chacun introduisant un phénomène naturel et inattendu d'énonciation de l'utilisateur. Comme preuve de concept, nous avons construit un réseau de mémoire unique et un réseau de mémoire multiple, et nous avons montré que ces deux architectures ont des performances différentes en fonction des modèles de dialogue particuliers.", 'ar': 'أصبحت الأساليب العصبية الشاملة شائعة بشكل متزايد في سيناريوهات المحادثة نظرًا لأدائها الواعد عند تزويدها بكمية كافية من البيانات. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم منهجية جديدة لمعالجة قابلية تفسير الأساليب العصبية في مثل هذه السيناريوهات من خلال إنشاء مجموعات بيانات التحدي باستخدام اللعب الذاتي للحوار على مهام / نوايا متعددة. يسمح اللعب الذاتي للحوار بتوليد كمية كبيرة من البيانات التركيبية ؛ من خلال الاستفادة من التحكم الكامل في عملية التوليد ، نظهر كيف يمكن تقييم الأساليب العصبية من حيث أنماط الحوار غير المرئية. نقترح عدة حالات اختبار غير متطابقة تقدم كل منها ظاهرة نطق طبيعية وغير متوقعة للمستخدم. كدليل على المفهوم ، قمنا ببناء شبكة ذاكرة واحدة ومتعددة ، وأظهرنا أن هاتين البنيتين لهما أداء متنوع اعتمادًا على أنماط الحوار الغريبة.', 'pt': 'As abordagens neurais de ponta a ponta estão se tornando cada vez mais comuns em cenários de conversação devido a seus desempenhos promissores quando fornecidos com uma quantidade suficiente de dados. Neste artigo, apresentamos uma nova metodologia para abordar a interpretabilidade de abordagens neurais em tais cenários, criando conjuntos de dados de desafio usando o diálogo self-play em várias tarefas/intenções. A reprodução automática do diálogo permite gerar grande quantidade de dados sintéticos; aproveitando o controle completo sobre o processo de geração, mostramos como as abordagens neurais podem ser avaliadas em termos de padrões de diálogo invisíveis. Propomos vários casos de teste fora do padrão, cada um dos quais introduz um fenômeno natural e inesperado de enunciado do usuário. Como prova de conceito, construímos uma rede de memória única e múltipla, e mostramos que essas duas arquiteturas possuem desempenhos diversos dependendo dos padrões de diálogo peculiares.', 'ja': 'エンドツーエンドのニューラルアプローチは、十分な量のデータを提供された場合の有望なパフォーマンスのため、会話シナリオでますます一般的になりつつある。本稿では、複数のタスク/インテントにわたる対話自己再生を使用してチャレンジデータセットを作成することによって、そのようなシナリオにおけるニューラルアプローチの解釈可能性に対処するための新たな方法論を提示する。対話セルフプレイは、大量の合成データを生成することを可能にします。生成プロセスの完全な制御を利用することで、私たちは、見えない対話パターンの観点からニューラルアプローチを評価することができる方法を示します。パターン外のテストケースをいくつか提案し、それぞれが自然で予期しないユーザー発言現象を導入しています。コンセプトの証明として、単一のメモリネットワークと複数のメモリネットワークを構築し、これら2つのアーキテクチャが特有の対話パターンに応じて多様なパフォーマンスを持つことを示しました。', 'es': 'Los enfoques neuronales de extremo a extremo son cada vez más comunes en los escenarios conversacionales debido a sus prometedores rendimientos cuando se les proporciona una cantidad suficiente de datos. En este artículo, presentamos una metodología novedosa para abordar la interpretabilidad de los enfoques neuronales en tales escenarios mediante la creación de conjuntos de datos de desafíos utilizando el juego automático del diálogo en múltiples tareas/intenciones. El juego personal del diálogo permite generar una gran cantidad de datos sintéticos; al aprovechar el control total sobre el proceso de generación, mostramos cómo los enfoques neuronales se pueden evaluar en términos de patrones de diálogo invisibles. Proponemos varios casos de prueba fuera del patrón, cada uno de los cuales introduce un fenómeno de expresión natural e inesperado del usuario. Como prueba de concepto, construimos una red de memoria única y una red de memoria múltiple, y demostramos que estas dos arquitecturas tienen diferentes rendimientos según los patrones de diálogo peculiares.', 'zh': '端到端神经法转遍,以其足数有善性也。 于本文中,设一新法,因用对话对多务/意对自戏以创挑战数据集,以决此场神经法之可解释性。 言自玩许成大数。 利用全制,示以不见之对,以论神经法。 试用例数式,用例引自然,不意用户语。 曰:二者内存内存网络,二者架构异能也。', 'hi': 'एंड-टू-एंड तंत्रिका दृष्टिकोण उनके आशाजनक प्रदर्शन के कारण संवादी परिदृश्यों में तेजी से आम होते जा रहे हैं जब पर्याप्त मात्रा में डेटा प्रदान किया जाता है। इस पेपर में, हम कई कार्यों / इरादों पर संवाद स्व-प्ले का उपयोग करके चुनौती डेटासेट बनाकर ऐसे परिदृश्यों में तंत्रिका दृष्टिकोण की व्याख्या को संबोधित करने के लिए एक उपन्यास पद्धति प्रस्तुत करते हैं। संवाद स्व-खेल सिंथेटिक डेटा की बड़ी मात्रा उत्पन्न करने की अनुमति देता है; पीढ़ी की प्रक्रिया पर पूर्ण नियंत्रण का लाभ उठाकर, हम दिखाते हैं कि अनदेखी संवाद पैटर्न के संदर्भ में तंत्रिका दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन कैसे किया जा सकता है। हम कई आउट-ऑफ-पैटर्न परीक्षण मामलों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिनमें से प्रत्येक एक प्राकृतिक और अप्रत्याशित उपयोगकर्ता उच्चारण घटना का परिचय देता है। अवधारणा के सबूत के रूप में, हमने एक एकल और एक से अधिक मेमोरी नेटवर्क का निर्माण किया, और दिखाया कि इन दो आर्किटेक्चर में अजीब संवाद पैटर्न के आधार पर विविध प्रदर्शन हैं।', 'ru': 'Сквозные нейронные подходы становятся все более распространенными в разговорных сценариях из-за их многообещающих характеристик, когда им предоставляется достаточный объем данных. В этой статье мы представляем новую методологию для рассмотрения интерпретируемости нейронных подходов в таких сценариях путем создания наборов данных вызовов с использованием диалога самовоспроизведения над несколькими задачами/намерениями. Диалог самовоспроизведения позволяет генерировать большой объем синтетических данных; используя полный контроль над процессом генерации, мы показываем, как нейронные подходы могут быть оценены с точки зрения невидимых диалоговых паттернов. Мы предлагаем несколько внешаблонных тестовых примеров, каждый из которых вводит естественный и неожиданный феномен высказываний пользователя. В качестве доказательства концепции мы построили единую и множественную сеть памяти и показали, что эти две архитектуры имеют различные производительности в зависимости от специфических шаблонов диалога.', 'ga': 'Tá cineálacha cur chuige néaracha ceann go ceann ag éirí níos coitianta i gcásanna comhrá mar gheall ar a gcuid feidhmíochtaí geallta nuair a chuirtear go leor sonraí ar fáil dóibh. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid modheolaíocht nua i láthair chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar inléirmhíniú cur chuige néarúil i gcásanna den sórt sin trí thacair shonraí dhúshláin a chruthú ag baint úsáide as féin-imirt idirphlé thar tascanna/intinn iolracha. Ceadaíonn féin-imirt idirphlé méid mór sonraí sintéiseacha a ghiniúint; Trí leas a bhaint as an smacht iomlán ar an bpróiseas giniúna, léirímid conas is féidir cineálacha cur chuige néaracha a mheas i dtéarmaí patrúin idirphlé neamhfheicthe. Molaimid go leor cásanna tástála lasmuigh de phatrúin agus tugann gach ceann acu feiniméan cainte úsáideora nádúrtha gan choinne isteach. Mar chruthúnas ar choincheap, thógamar líonra cuimhne aonair agus iolrach, agus taispeánann muid go bhfuil léirithe ilghnéitheacha ag an dá ailtireacht seo ag brath ar na patrúin dialóige uathúla.', 'hu': 'Az end-to-end neurális megközelítések egyre gyakoribbak a beszélgetési forgatókönyvekben, mivel ígéretes teljesítményük van, ha elegendő mennyiségű adatot biztosítanak. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy új módszertant, amelynek segítségével a neurális megközelítések értelmezhetőségét vizsgáljuk ilyen forgatókönyvekben kihívási adatok létrehozásával, párbeszéd önjáték segítségével, több feladaton/szándékon keresztül. A dialógus önjáték nagy mennyiségű szintetikus adat generálását teszi lehetővé; A generációs folyamat teljes irányításának kihasználásával megmutatjuk, hogy az idegi megközelítések miként értékelhetők a láthatatlan párbeszédminták szempontjából. Több mintán kívüli tesztesetet javasolunk, amelyek mindegyike természetes és váratlan felhasználói kimondási jelenséget vezet be. A koncepció bizonyítékaként egyetlen és több memória hálózatot építettünk, és megmutattuk, hogy ez a két architektúra különböző teljesítményekkel rendelkezik a sajátos párbeszédmintáktól függően.', 'ka': 'ბოლოდან დასრულებული ნეიროლური დახმარება უფრო მეტი ხდება კონტრაციოლური სინარიოში, როდესაც საკუთარი დასაწყვებული მონაცემებების შესახებ, როდესაც საკუთარ მნიშ ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ახლა პრომენტური მეტოლოგია, რომელიც ამისთვის ნეიროლური დახმარების ინტერფექციის შესაძლებლობას გავაკეთებთ განსაზღვრებული მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას, რომელიც გან დიალოგის თავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთავისთან უფრო დიდი სინტეტიკური მონაცემების შექმნა; დავიყენოთ დასრულებული კონტროლის პროცესის შესახებ, ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, როგორ ნეიროლური მიღებების შესაძლებლობა შეიძლება გაუმუშაოთ არაჩვენებული დი ჩვენ გვეძლევა რამდენიმე არსებული ტესტის შემთხვევაში, რომლებიც ყოველ მომხმარებელი და არასწორი მომხმარებელი გამოსახულებელი ფენომენს ჩვენებს. როგორც კონცექტის წარმოდგენა, ჩვენ ერთი და მრავალე მეხსიერების ქსელის შექმნა და ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენებთ, რომ ეს ორი აქტიქტიქტიკური', 'el': 'Οι ολοκληρωμένες νευρωνικές προσεγγίσεις γίνονται όλο και πιο συχνές σε σενάρια συνομιλίας λόγω των υποσχόμενων επιδόσεων τους όταν παρέχονται με επαρκή ποσότητα δεδομένων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα μεθοδολογία για την αντιμετώπιση της ερμηνείας των νευρωνικών προσεγγίσεων σε τέτοια σενάρια δημιουργώντας σύνολα δεδομένων προκλήσεων χρησιμοποιώντας αυτοπαιχνίδι διαλόγου πάνω από πολλαπλές εργασίες/προθέσεις. Το αυτοπαιχνίδι διαλόγου επιτρέπει τη δημιουργία μεγάλου ποσού συνθετικών δεδομένων. Αξιοποιώντας τον πλήρη έλεγχο της διαδικασίας παραγωγής, δείχνουμε πώς οι νευρωνικές προσεγγίσεις μπορούν να αξιολογηθούν από την άποψη των αόρατων προτύπων διαλόγου. Προτείνουμε αρκετές περιπτώσεις δοκιμών εκτός προτύπου, καθεμία από τις οποίες εισάγει ένα φυσικό και απρόσμενο φαινόμενο εκφρασμού χρηστών. Ως απόδειξη της έννοιας, δημιουργήσαμε ένα ενιαίο και ένα πολλαπλό δίκτυο μνήμης, και δείξαμε ότι αυτές οι δύο αρχιτεκτονικές έχουν διαφορετικές επιδόσεις ανάλογα με τα ιδιαίτερα μοτίβα διαλόγου.', 'it': "Gli approcci neurali end-to-end stanno diventando sempre più comuni negli scenari conversazionali a causa delle loro prestazioni promettenti quando forniti con quantità sufficiente di dati. In questo articolo, presentiamo una nuova metodologia per affrontare l'interpretabilità degli approcci neurali in tali scenari creando set di dati di sfida utilizzando il dialogo self-play su più compiti/intenti. Dialogo self-play permette di generare grandi quantità di dati sintetici; Sfruttando il controllo completo sul processo di generazione, mostriamo come gli approcci neurali possono essere valutati in termini di modelli di dialogo invisibili. Proponiamo diversi casi di test out-of-pattern ognuno dei quali introduce un fenomeno naturale e inaspettato di pronuncia dell'utente. Come prova del concetto, abbiamo costruito una rete di memoria singola e multipla, e abbiamo dimostrato che queste due architetture hanno prestazioni diverse a seconda dei particolari schemi di dialogo.", 'kk': 'Невралдың соңындағы жағдайлары қатынау сценарияларында қатынау сценарияларында көбірек болып жатқан болады. Бірақ мәліметтердің жеткілікті мәліметтері келтірілген кезде, олард Бұл қағазда, біз бұл сценарияда невралдық түрлендіру мүмкіндігін түсіндіру үшін, бірнеше тапсырмалар мен мақсаттары бойынша диалогты өзгертіп, өзгерту деректер қорларын құрып, романдық мет Диалог өзіңіз ойнау үлкен синтетикалық деректерді құруға мүмкіндік береді. Жасау процесінің толық басқаруының артықшылығын қолдануға артықшылық береді, біз белгілмеген диалог үлгілерінің қалай невралдық жағдайларын бағалауға болады. Біз бірнеше үлгілерден тыс сынақтарды таңдаймыз. Бұлардың әрбірі табиғи және күтпеген пайдаланушылардың сөйлесу пайдаланушысы. Концепцияны тексеру үшін бір жады және бірнеше жады желіне құрып, осы екі архитектуралардың өзгертілген диалог үлгілеріне тәуелді әртүрлі жұмыс істеуі болады.', 'lt': 'Naudojant pokalbio scenarijus, dėl jų pažadusių rezultatų nerviniai metodai tampa vis dažnesni, kai jie gauna pakankamai duomenų. Šiame dokumente pristatome naują metodiką, skirtą sprendžiant neurologinių metodų aiškinamumą tokiuose scenarijuose, sukuriant iššūkių duomenų rinkinius, naudojant dialogą dėl kelių užduočių ir (arba) ketinimų. Dialogo savarankiškas žaidimas leidžia generuoti daug sintetinių duomenų; pasinaudodami visapusiška gamybos proceso kontrole, parodysime, kaip galima įvertinti nervinius požiūrius, atsižvelgiant į nematomus dialogo modelius. We propose several out-of-pattern test cases each of which introduces a natural and unexpected user utterance phenomenon.  Kaip koncepcijos įrodymą sukūrėme vieną ir kelis atminties tinklus ir parodėme, kad šios dvi architektūros turi įvairių rezultatų, priklausomai nuo ypatingų dialogo modelių.', 'mk': 'Нервските пристапи од крај до крај стануваат сé почесни во разговарачките сценарија поради нивните ветувачки изведувања кога се обезбедени со доволна количина податоци. Во овој документ, претставуваме нова методологија за решавање на интерпретабилноста на нервните пристапи во вакви сценарија со создавање на податоци за предизвик со користење на дијалогот за самостојна игра во врска со повеќе задачи/намери. Самоиграта на дијалогот овозможува генерирање голема количина синтетички податоци; NAME OF TRANSLATORS со искористување на целосната контрола над процесот на генерација, покажуваме како неуралните пристапи можат да се проценат во однос на невидливи дијалошки шеми. We propose several out-of-pattern test cases each of which introduces a natural and unexpected user utterance phenomenon.  Како доказ на концептот, изградивме една и повеќе мемориски мрежи, и покажуваме дека овие две архитектури имаат различни изведувања во зависност од странските дијалошки шеми.', 'ml': 'അവസാനത്തേക്കുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d നടപടികള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധാരണമായിരിക്കുന്നു. അവരുടെ വാഗ്ദാന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകിയി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, ഇതുപോലുള്ള സ്വഭാവകാശങ്ങളുടെ വ്യാഖ്യാന്തം വിവരിക്കുന്നതിനായി ന്യൂറല്\u200d സാധ് സ്വയം കളിയ്ക്കുന്ന ഡയലോഗ് വലിയ സിനിറ്റിക് ഡേറ്റാ ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിന് അനുവദിക്കുന്നു; തലമുറയുടെ പ്രക്രിയയുടെ മുഴുവന്\u200d നിയന്ത്രണത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഉപയോഗം ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണ് ന്യൂറല്\u200d നട ഒരുപാട് ടെസ്റ്റ് കേസുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്ത് പോകാത്ത കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ഓരോരുത്തരും  ആശയത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഒരു തെളിവായിക്കൊണ്ട്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു മെമ്മറിയുടെ നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്ക് നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചു. ഈ രണ്ട് ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറുകള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പ്', 'ms': 'Pendekatan saraf akhir-akhir semakin umum dalam skenario perbualan kerana prestasi yang berjanji mereka apabila diberikan dengan jumlah data yang cukup. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan metodologi baru untuk mengatasi kemudahan interpretasi pendekatan saraf dalam skenario seperti ini dengan mencipta set data cabaran menggunakan dialog bermain sendiri atas tugas/tujuan berbilang. Permainan-sendiri dialog membolehkan menghasilkan jumlah besar data sintetik; dengan mengambil keuntungan dari kawalan lengkap terhadap proses generasi, kita menunjukkan bagaimana pendekatan saraf boleh diukur dalam terma corak dialog yang tidak terlihat. Kami cadangkan beberapa kes ujian luar corak masing-masing memperkenalkan fenomena pengguna biasa dan tidak dijangka. Sebagai bukti konsep, kami membina rangkaian memori tunggal dan berbilang, dan menunjukkan bahawa kedua-dua arsitektur ini mempunyai prestasi berbeza bergantung pada corak dialog yang pelik.', 'no': 'Nøyraltilnærmingar for slutt til slutt blir større vanlege i samtalescenarioar på grunn av dei foreslåande utviklingane når det er tilgjengeleg nok data. I denne papiret presenterer vi ein roman metodologi for å handtera uttolkinga av neiralnæringstilnærmingar i slike scenarioar ved å laga utfordringsdatasett ved å bruka dialogvindauget sjølvspela over fleire oppgåver/hendingar. Dialogvindauget sjølvspeling tillet å laga stor mengd syntetiske data. ved å bruka fordel av fullstendig kontroll over genereringsprosessen, viser vi korleis nøyralnærmingar kan evaluerast i uttrykket av ukjende dialogmønsterelement. Vi foreslår fleire testtilfeller uten mønster, kvar av dei introduserer ein naturleg og uventa feilfenomen for brukaren. Som prøv av konsept, bygge vi eit enkelt og fleire minnetverk, og viser at desse to arkitekturane har ulike utviklingar avhengig av den spesielle dialogmønstrene.', 'mt': 'Approċċi newrali minn tmiem sa tmiem qed isiru dejjem aktar komuni fix-xenarji ta’ konverżjoni minħabba l-prestazzjonijiet promettenti tagħhom meta pprovduti b’ammont suffiċjenti ta’ dejta. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw metodoloġija ġdida biex nindirizzaw l-interpretabbiltà ta’ approċċi newrali f’xenarji bħal dawn billi nħolqu settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ sfida bl-użu ta’ djalogu awtonomu fuq diversi kompiti/intenzjonijiet. Id-djalogu awto-play jippermetti l-ġenerazzjoni ta’ ammont kbir ta’ dejta sintetika; billi nużaw il-kontroll sħiħ fuq il-proċess ta’ ġenerazzjoni, nuru kif l-approċċi newrali jistgħu jiġu evalwati f’termini ta’ mudelli ta’ djalogu mhux osservati. Aħna nipproponu diversi każijiet ta’ testijiet barra mill-mudell li kull wieħed minnhom jintroduċi fenomenu naturali u mhux mistenni ta’ espressjoni tal-utent. As a proof of concept, we built a single and a multiple memory network, and show that these two architectures have diverse performances depending on the peculiar dialogue patterns.', 'mn': 'Эцэст нь эцэст нь мэдрэлийн ойлголт хангалттай хэмжээний өгөгдлийг хангах үед амлалттай үйл ажиллагааны шалтгааныг харилцааны хувилбар дээр ихэвчлэн ихэвчлэн байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид тархины ойлголтын тухай ойлгох шинэ методологийг олон үйл ажиллагаа/зорилго дээр диалог өөрийгөө тоглох боломжтой болгон сорилт өгөгдлийн сангуудыг бий болгодог. Диалог өөртөө тоглох нь маш их хэмжээний синтетик өгөгдлийг бий болгодог. Бүтээлтийн процессийн бүрэн удирдлагын ашиг ашиглан бид мэдрэлийн ойлголтыг харуулж чадахгүй диалог хэлбэрээр хэрхэн үнэлгээгдэхийг харуулж байна. Бид хэд хэдэн шинжлэх ухааны шалгалтуудыг санал дэвшүүлдэг. Энэ бүх нь байгалийн болон хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдөггүй хэрэглэгчийн хэлэх явдал юм. Яг л ойлголтын баталгаа болгон, бид нэг, олон санамжийн сүлжээг бүтээсэн. Энэ хоёр архитектуруудын ялгаатай диалог хэлбэрээс хамааралтай олон үйл ажиллагаатай гэдгийг харуулсан.', 'pl': 'Kompleksowe podejścia neuronowe stają się coraz bardziej powszechne w scenariuszach konwersacyjnych ze względu na ich obiecujące osiągnięcia, gdy dostarczone są wystarczająco dużo danych. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nowatorską metodologię uwzględniającą interpretowalność podejść neuronowych w takich scenariuszach poprzez tworzenie zestawów danych wyzwań wykorzystujących samodzielną grę dialogową nad wieloma zadaniami/intencjami. Dialog samodzielna gra umożliwia generowanie dużej ilości danych syntetycznych; Wykorzystując pełną kontrolę nad procesem generowania, pokazujemy, jak można ocenić podejścia neuronowe pod kątem niewidzialnych wzorców dialogu. Proponujemy kilka nietypowych przypadków testowych, z których każdy wprowadza naturalne i nieoczekiwane zjawisko wypowiedzi użytkownika. Jako dowód koncepcji zbudowaliśmy pojedynczą i wielokrotną sieć pamięci i pokazaliśmy, że te dwie architektury mają różne wykonania w zależności od specyficznych wzorców dialogu.', 'ro': 'Abordările neurale end-to-end devin din ce în ce mai frecvente în scenariile conversaționale datorită performanțelor promițătoare atunci când sunt furnizate cu cantitate suficientă de date. În această lucrare, prezentăm o metodologie nouă pentru a aborda interpretabilitatea abordărilor neurale în astfel de scenarii prin crearea seturilor de date provocatoare folosind dialogul auto-play pe mai multe sarcini/intenții. Dialogul auto-play permite generarea unor cantități mari de date sintetice; Profitând de controlul complet asupra procesului de generare, arătăm cum abordările neuronale pot fi evaluate în termeni de modele de dialog nevăzute. Propunem mai multe cazuri de testare în afara modelului, fiecare dintre care introduce un fenomen natural și neașteptat de pronunțare a utilizatorului. Ca dovadă a conceptului, am construit o rețea de memorie unică și multiplă, arătând că aceste două arhitecturi au performanțe diferite în funcție de tiparele specifice de dialog.', 'so': 'Dhaqdhaqaaqyada neurada ee ugu dambaysta ah waxay si caadi ah ugu noqdaan xaaladaha hadalka, sababtoo ah samooyinkoodii loo ballanqaaday marka lagu siiyo tiro badan oo macluumaad ku filan. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaa qaabab warqad ah si aan u kala hadlno turjumaadda qaababka dabeecada ee noocyada ah, taas oo lagu sameynayo sawirada tacliinta, si loo isticmaalo dialog-ku-ciyaaro shaqooyin/qasabooyin kala duduwan. Isboortiga iskaa-ciyaaro wuxuu sameyn karaa macluumaad badan oo la xiriira si aan ugu isticmaalno maamulka dhamaanka ee koritaanka qarniga, waxaynu tusnaa sida loo qiimeyn karo dhaqdhaqaalaha caqliga ah sida qaababka dialogka ee qarsoon. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa xaaladaha imtixaanka ee aan sameyn, mid kastaaba wuxuu soo bandhigaa hadal caafimaad ah oo aan filanayn. Waxaan dhisnay shabakad xusuus ah oo keliya iyo hal badan, waxaana tusnay in labadaas dhismaha ay leeyihiin samooyin kala duduwan, iyadoo ku xiran qaababka dialogka ee gaarka ah.', 'sv': 'End-to-end neurala tillvägagångssätt blir allt vanligare i konversationsscenarier på grund av deras lovande prestanda när de förses med tillräcklig mängd data. I denna uppsats presenterar vi en ny metod för att ta itu med tolkningen av neurala tillvägagångssätt i sådana scenarier genom att skapa utmaningsdata med hjälp av dialog självspel över flera uppgifter/intentioner. Dialog självspel gör det möjligt att generera stora mängder syntetiska data; Genom att utnyttja fullständig kontroll över genereringsprocessen visar vi hur neurala angreppssätt kan utvärderas utifrån osedda dialogmönster. Vi föreslår flera out-of-pattern testfall som var och en introducerar ett naturligt och oväntat användaruttryck fenomen. Som ett bevis på konceptet byggde vi ett enda och flera minnesnätverk, och visar att dessa två arkitekturer har olika prestanda beroende på de speciella dialogmönstren.', 'ta': 'முடிவில் இருந்து முடிவில் புதிய அணுகுகள் தேவையான தரவு கொடுத்த போது பேசும் காட்சிகளில் அதிகமாக பொதுவாக இருக்கும். இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய முறைமையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் அது போன்ற புதிய அணுகுகளின் விளக்கம் முடியும் புதிய முறைமையை விளக்க உரையாடல் தானாகவே வாசிக்க அனுமதிக்கிறது அதிகமான தொடர்புடைய தகவலை உருவாக்க அனுமதிக்கிறது; உருவாக்கும் செயல்பாட்டில் முழுமையான கட்டுப்பாட்டை பயன்படுத்தி நாம் எவ்வாறு பாதுகாப்பான முறைமைகளை பார்க்கு நாம் பல வெளியே பாதையிலிருந்து சோதனையின் விஷயங்களை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். ஒவ்வொரு பயனருக்கும் இயற்கையான மற்றும் எத As a proof of concept, we built a single and a multiple memory network, and show that these two architectures have diverse performances depending on the peculiar dialogue patterns.', 'ur': 'جب ان کے وعدہ کرانے کے سبب کافی اندازے کے ذریعہ دکھائے جاتے ہیں، مکالمانی سناریوں میں اضافہ ہوتے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ایک نور طریقہ پیش کیا ہے کہ اس طرح کی سینارییوں میں نئورل طریقے کی تعبیر کے قابل تعبیر کرنے کے لئے ایک نور طریقہ پیش کریں، اس طرح طریقے سے چالیس ڈیٹ سٹ بنا کر بہت سی کاموں/ارادوں کے ذریعہ سے ڈی Dialog self-play allows generating large amounts of synthetic data; ہم نے نسل پرسس پر کامل کنٹرول کے مطابق فائدہ اٹھایا ہے، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ نئورل کے تقرب کیسے غیب کی ڈالیلوگ پٹرنوں کے مطابق ارزش کر سکتے ہیں۔ ہم نے چند بغیر پٹرنے کی آزمائش کیسیں پیش کریں جن میں سے ہر ایک نے ایک طبیعی اور غیرمنتظر کارساز کی بات پڑھی ہے۔ ہم نے ایک اور بہت سی مہمانی نیٹ ورک بنایا اور دکھائے کہ یہ دو معماری مختلف نمونے ہیں جو مختلف طریقے سے مختلف طریقے ہیں۔', 'si': 'අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් න්\u200dයූරාල් විදිහට සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට වැඩි වෙනවා ඔවුන්ගේ පොරොන්දු විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාර දත්ත ප්\u200dරත මේ පත්තරයේ අපි නියම විද්\u200dයාවයක් පෙන්වන්නේ නියම විද්\u200dයාවයක් සඳහා අභ්\u200dයාසය දත්ත සැකසුම් නිර්මාණය කරන්න සංවාදය ස්වාභ විද්\u200dය සංවාදය ස්වායං සෙල්ලම් කරන්න පුළුවන් විශාල දත්ත නිර්මාණය කරන්න; ප්\u200dරභාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන සම්පූර්ණ පාලනය කරන්න, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ නිර්මාණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කොහොමද අනතුරු සංවාද අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ අනතුරු ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පෙන්වන්න. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට සාක්ෂියක් විදිහට, එක්කෙන් මතක ජාලයක් හදලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේම මේ ස්තූතිපත්ති දෙන්නා ව', 'sr': 'Neuralni pristupi do kraja postaju sve češći u razgovornim scenarijama zbog obećavajućih izvora kada su pruženi dovoljno količine podataka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu metodologiju za rješavanje interpretabilnosti neuroloških pristupa u takvim scenarijama stvaranjem izazovnih seta podataka korištenjem samog dijaloga na više zadataka/namjera. Самоиграње диалога позволява да генерира велику количество синтетичnih данаја; koristeći potpunu kontrolu nad procesom generacije, pokazujemo kako se neuralni pristupi mogu procijeniti u smislu nevidljivih obrazaca dijaloga. Predlažemo nekoliko slučajeva ispitivanja bez šablona, svaki od kojih predstavlja prirodni i neočekivan fenomen govora korisnika. Kao dokaz koncepta, izgradili smo jednu i višestruku mrežu pamćenja i pokazali da ove dve arhitekture imaju različite izvode ovisno o neobičnim obrascima dijaloga.', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda biz bunday tashkilotlar/qatlamlar bilan muloqat muloqat vazifalar/qatlamlar bilan muloqat muloqat oynasida o'zimni o'zgartirish uchun neyrol tilidagi tarjimalarning tafsilotlarini boshqarish uchun novel metodini hozir qilamiz. Dialogga oʻynash imkoniyatini oʻzgartirish imkoniyatini beradi. Name Biz bir necha ko'pchilik tizimdan tasavvur qilamiz. Ularning har biri tabiiy va kutilmagan foydalanuvchi gapiruvchi holatni anglatadi. As a proof of concept, we built a single and a multiple memory network, and show that these two architectures have diverse performances depending on the peculiar dialogue patterns.", 'vi': 'Kết thúc tiếp cận thần kinh đang ngày càng phổ biến trong các viễn cảnh đối thoại do khả năng triển vọng của họ khi cung cấp đủ lượng dữ liệu. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp mới để giải thích sự hiểu biết của các phương pháp thần kinh trong các viễn cảnh như thế bằng cách tạo ra các bộ dữ liệu thách thức bằng cách tự chơi đối thoại hơn nhiều công việc/mục. Tự chơi thoại cho phép tạo ra một lượng lớn dữ liệu nhân tạo. Bằng cách sử dụng quyền điều khiển hoàn toàn trên tiến trình tạo hóa, chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp thần kinh có thể được đánh giá theo dạng mô hình cuộc đối thoại vô hình. Chúng tôi đề xuất một số trường hợp thử nghiệm vượt lề mang đến hiện tượng người dùng bất ngờ và tự nhiên. Như một bằng chứng về khái niệm, chúng tôi xây dựng một mạng bộ nhớ đơn lẻ và đa dạng, và cho thấy hai kiến trúc này có các trình độ khác nhau tùy thuộc vào những mô hình cuộc đối thoại kỳ lạ.', 'hr': 'Neuralni pristupi do kraja postaju sve češće u razgovornim scenarijama zbog obećavajućih učinka kada su pruženi dovoljno količine podataka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu metodologiju za rješavanje interpretabilnosti neuroloških pristupa u takvim scenarijama stvaranjem izazovnih podataka koristeći samoporučje dijaloga za višestruke zadatke/namjere. Samodigranje dijaloga omogućava stvaranje velike količine sintetičkih podataka; koristeći potpunu kontrolu nad procesom generacije, pokazujemo kako se neuralni pristupi mogu procijeniti u smislu nevidljivih obrazaca dijaloga. Predlažemo nekoliko slučajeva ispitivanja bez uzorka, svaki od kojih predstavlja prirodan i neočekivan fenomen izražavanja korisnika. Kao dokaz koncepta, izgradili smo jednu i višestruku mrežu sjećanja i pokazali da ove dvije arhitekture imaju različite učinke ovisno o neobičnim obrascima dijaloga.', 'bg': 'Неврологичните подходи от край до край стават все по-често срещани в разговорните сценарии поради обещаващите им резултати, когато се предоставят достатъчно данни. В настоящата статия представяме нова методология за разглеждане на интерпретацията на невронните подходи в такива сценарии чрез създаване на набори от данни с предизвикателства, използващи диалогова самоигра над множество задачи/намерения. Диалоговата самоигра позволява генериране на голямо количество синтетични данни; като се възползваме от пълния контрол върху процеса на генериране, показваме как невронните подходи могат да бъдат оценени от гледна точка на невидимите диалогови модели. Предлагаме няколко случая на тестване, всеки от които въвежда естествено и неочаквано явление на потребителското изказване. Като доказателство за концепцията изградихме една и многократна памет мрежа и показахме, че тези две архитектури имат разнообразни изпълнения в зависимост от особените диалогови модели.', 'nl': "End-to-end neurale benaderingen worden steeds vaker gebruikt in conversatiescenario's vanwege hun veelbelovende prestaties wanneer ze worden voorzien van voldoende hoeveelheid gegevens. In dit artikel presenteren we een nieuwe methodologie om de interpreteerbaarheid van neurale benaderingen in dergelijke scenario's aan te pakken door challenge datasets te creëren met behulp van dialoog self-play over meerdere taken/intenties. Dialoog self-play maakt het mogelijk om grote hoeveelheden synthetische gegevens te genereren; Door gebruik te maken van de volledige controle over het generatieproces, laten we zien hoe neurale benaderingen kunnen worden geëvalueerd in termen van onzichtbare dialoogpatronen. We stellen verschillende out-of-pattern testcases voor die elk een natuurlijk en onverwacht verschijnsel introduceren. Als proof of concept bouwden we een enkel en een meervoudig geheugennetwerk, en laten we zien dat deze twee architecturen verschillende prestaties hebben afhankelijk van de eigenaardige dialoogpatronen.", 'da': 'End-to-end neurale tilgange bliver stadig mere almindelige i samtalescenarier på grund af deres lovende præstationer, når de leveres med tilstrækkelig mængde data. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en ny metode til at adressere fortolkningen af neurale tilgange i sådanne scenarier ved at skabe udfordringsdatasæt ved hjælp af dialog selvspil over flere opgaver/intentioner. Dialog selvspil giver mulighed for at generere store mængder syntetiske data; Ved at udnytte den fulde kontrol over genereringsprocessen viser vi, hvordan neurale tilgange kan evalueres i form af usynlige dialogmønstre. Vi foreslår flere out-of-pattern testcases, som hver især introducerer et naturligt og uventet brugerytringsfænomen. Som bevis på konceptet byggede vi et enkelt og flerhukommelsesnetværk, og viser, at disse to arkitekturer har forskellige præstationer afhængigt af de særlige dialogmønstre.', 'de': 'End-to-End neuronale Ansätze werden in Gesprächsszenarien aufgrund ihrer vielversprechenden Leistungen bei ausreichender Datenmenge immer häufiger. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine neuartige Methodik vor, die die Interpretierbarkeit neuronaler Ansätze in solchen Szenarien durch die Erstellung von Challenge-Datensätzen unter Verwendung von Dialogselbstspielen über mehrere Aufgaben/Intents adressiert. Dialog Self-Play ermöglicht die Erzeugung einer großen Menge synthetischer Daten; Indem wir die vollständige Kontrolle über den Erzeugungsprozess nutzen, zeigen wir, wie neuronale Ansätze in unsichtbaren Dialogmustern bewertet werden können. Wir schlagen mehrere Out-of-Pattern Testfälle vor, von denen jeder ein natürliches und unerwartetes Phänomen der Benutzeräußerung einführt. Als Proof of Concept haben wir ein einzelnes und ein multiples Speichernetzwerk aufgebaut und zeigen, dass diese beiden Architekturen je nach eigenartigen Dialogmustern unterschiedliche Performances aufweisen.', 'id': 'Pendekatan saraf akhir-akhir semakin umum dalam skenario konversasi karena prestasi yang berjanji mereka ketika disediakan dengan jumlah data yang cukup. In this paper, we present a novel methodology to address the interpretability of neural approaches in such scenarios by creating challenge datasets using dialogue self-play over multiple tasks/intents.  Permainan dialog sendiri memungkinkan menghasilkan jumlah besar data sintetis; dengan mengambil keuntungan dari kontrol lengkap terhadap proses generasi, kita menunjukkan bagaimana pendekatan saraf dapat diuji dalam terma pola dialog yang tidak terlihat. Kami mengusulkan beberapa kasus tes luar pola masing-masing yang memperkenalkan fenomena pengguna yang alami dan tidak terduga. Sebagai bukti konsep, kami membangun jaringan memori tunggal dan berbilang, dan menunjukkan bahwa kedua arsitektur ini memiliki prestasi berbeda tergantung pada pola dialog yang aneh.', 'fa': 'روش\u200cهای عصبی به پایان پایان\u200cها در صحنه\u200cهای مکالمه\u200cها بیشتر مشترک می\u200cشوند، به دلیل اجرای قول\u200cدهنده\u200cشان، وقتی با مقدار داده\u200cهای کافی داده می\u200cشود. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش نویسی را برای تفسیر قابلیت ترجمه\u200cای از نزدیک\u200cهای عصبی در این سیناریو با تولید مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای چالش با استفاده از خودبازی\u200cکردن محاورۀ خودبازی بر روی کار/هدف\u200cهای متعدد پیش می\u200cدهیم. اجرای خودبازی محاورۀ محاورۀ خود اجازه می\u200cدهد که مقدار زیادی داده\u200cهای سینتیک را تولید کند. با استفاده از کنترل کامل بر فرایند نسل، نشان می دهیم که چگونه نزدیک\u200cهای عصبی می\u200cتوانند به عنوان الگوهای بینایی ارزیابی شود. ما چند پرونده آزمایش خارجی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که هر کدام یک نمایش گفتن کاربر طبیعی و غیرمنتظره را معرفی می\u200cکند. به عنوان مدرک مفهوم، یک شبکه خاطرات تک و چندین ساختیم، و نشان دهیم که این دو معمار اجرای مختلف بستگی به الگوهای مشخصی دارند.', 'tr': 'Näyral ýagdaýlar soňunda, söhbet senaryýalarynda ýeterlik bir mahal berýän wagtlary üçin söz berýän täsirleriň sebäbi köpräk üýtgeýärler. Bu kagyzda, biz näyral ýagdaýlaryň terjimelerini bejermek üçin bir roman metodologiýany birnäçe işi/maksadlaryň üstünde çykyş dataýetlerini öz-oýnamak üçin çykarýarys. Dialog öz-oýnunyň uly sanat maglumaty bejermekde mümkin edýär; Nejer işlerini tamamlamak üçin önümden geçirip, nähili nähili neurol yaklaşyklary görkezip bileris. Biz birnäçe daşary çykmadyk testi döwürlerini teklip edip görýäris. Bulardan her biri tebigat we garaşylmadyk ulanylar sözlerini görkez. Bir düşünjük derejesi bolsa, biz ýekeje we birnäçe hatlar a ňlasyny gurdyk we bu iki arhitekturyň aýratyn dýaloga baglanýan şeklinde düzümler bar.', 'ko': '단말기부터 단말기까지 신경 네트워크 방법은 세션 장면에서 점점 흔해진다. 왜냐하면 충분한 데이터를 제공할 때 좋은 성능을 가지기 때문이다.본고에서 우리는 여러 가지 임무/의도에서 대화 자기 게임을 이용하여 도전 데이터 집합을 만들어 이런 장면에서 신경 방법의 해석성을 해결하는 새로운 방법을 제시했다.대화 자동 재생은 대량의 합성 데이터를 생성할 수 있습니다.생성 과정에 대한 완전한 통제를 이용하여 우리는 보이지 않는 대화 모델에 따라 신경 방법을 평가하는 방법을 보여 주었다.우리는 몇 가지 모델 밖의 테스트 용례를 제시했는데 모든 용례는 자연스럽고 예상치 못한 사용자 언어 현상을 도입할 것이다.개념적 증명으로 우리는 하나의 단일 메모리 네트워크와 하나의 다중 메모리 네트워크를 구축했고 이 두 가지 구조는 특수한 대화 모델에 따라 서로 다른 성능을 가진다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'sw': 'Matokeo ya neura ya mwisho yanaendelea kuwa ya kawaida katika mazungumzo ya mazungumzo kutokana na matukio yao yanayoahidiwa pale yanapotoa kiasi cha takwimu za kutosha. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mbinu za kitabu ili kutafsiri tafsiri ya mbinu za ubongo katika hali kama hizi kwa kutengeneza seti za changamoto za data kwa kutumia mazungumzo ya kujicheza kwa majukumu kadhaa/nia. Dialogu yenyewe inaruhusu kutengeneza kiasi kikubwa cha data za pamoja; kwa kutumia utawala kamili wa mchakato wa kizazi, tunaonyesha namna mbinu za kisasa zinavyoweza kuchunguzwa kwa namna ya miundo ya mazungumzo yasiyojulikana. Tunazipendekeza kesi kadhaa isiyo na mifano ya kujaribu ambazo kila mmoja inaleta mazungumzo ya mtumiaji asilia na isiyotarajiwa. Kama ushahidi wa dhana, tulijenga mtandao mmoja na zaidi wa kumbukumbu, na kuonyesha kwamba majengo haya mawili yanakuwa na maoni tofauti yanategemea mifano ya mazungumzo ya ajabu.', 'am': 'የመጨረሻው የደዌብ ግንኙነት በተስፋ የዳታ ክፍል በተሰጠ ጊዜ በተስፋ የድረአምባዎች ስርዓቶች ሲሆን በአካባቢው ስርዓት ውስጥ የሚቆሙ ሆኖአል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የነዌብ ደረጃዎችን በተለያዩ ስራ/ዓይነቶች በማድረግ የዳታተር ማተርጉም ማቀናቀል እናቀርባታለን፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር የትውልድ ፕሮጀክት ላይ ሙሉ ሥልጣን በመጠቀም፣ የደኅንነት ሥርዓት እንዴት እንደምታረጋገጥ የውጤት አካባቢ አካባቢ መሆኑን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ ብዙዎች የመፈተና ጥያቄዎችን እናስገልጻለን፡፡ ምሳሌ እንደሚሆን አንዲት እና በብዛት ማስታወሻ መረብ ሠራን፣ እነዚህም ሁለቱ መሠረቶች በተለየ ባሕላዊ dialog ምሳሌዎች ላይ የሚታመኑ የልዩ የልዩ አካሄድ አለባቸው፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջ-վերջ նյարդային մոտեցումները դառնում են ավելի հաճախ հաղորդակցման սցենարներում իրենց խոստացող արտադրությունների պատճառով, երբ բավարար քանակությամբ տվյալներ են տրամադրվում: Այս աշխատանքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր մեթոդոլոգիա, որպեսզի լուծենք նյարդային մոտեցումների մեկնաբանելիությունը այսպիսի սցենարներում՝ ստեղծելով մարտահրավերների տվյալների համակարգեր՝ օգտագործելով ինքնախաղը բազմաթիվ խնդիրների Ինքխաղի պատուհանը թույլ է տալիս ստեղծել մեծ քանակությամբ սինթետիկ տվյալներ, օգտագործելով սերնդի գործընթացի վերահսկողությունը, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես կարող ենք գնահատել նյարդային մոտեցումները անտեսանելի երկխոսության կաղապարների տեսքով: Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի քանի անկախ փորձարկումների դեպքեր, որոնցից յուրաքանչյուրը ներկայացնում է բնական և անսպասելի օգտագործողի արտահայտության երևույթ: Որպես գաղափարի ապացույց, մենք կառուցեցինք մեկ և բազմաթիվ հիշողության ցանց, և ցույց տվեցինք, որ այս երկու ճարտարապետությունները տարբեր արտադրություններ ունեն, կախված տարօրինակ հաղորդակցման ձևերից:', 'af': "Einde-tot-einde neurale toegange word vermeerder gemeenskap in gesprekslyn scenarios vanweë hulle belofte uitgange wanneer met genoeg hoeveelheid data verskaf word. In hierdie papier is ons 'n nuwe metodologie voorsien om die uitleggbare verklaring van neurale toegang in sodanige scenarios te adres deur uitdagingsdatastelle te skep deur dialoog self-speel oor veelvuldige taak/doels te gebruik. Dialoog self- speel toelaat om groot hoeveelheid sintetiese data te genereer; deur voordeel van die volledige beheer oor die generasie proses te neem, wys ons hoe neurale toekoms kan evalueer word in terms van onverskyn dialoog patrone. Ons voorstel verskeie uit patroon toets gevalle elkeen van wat 'n natuurlike en onverwagte gebruiker uitspraak fenomen voorsien. As 'n bevestig van konsept, het ons 'n enkel en 'n veelvuldige geheue netwerk gebou, en wys dat hierdie twee arkitektuure verskeie uitvoegings het afhanklik van die eienskaplike dialoog patrone.", 'sq': 'Përqasjet nervore nga fundi në fund po bëhen gjithnjë e më të zakonshme në skenarët e bisedës për shkak të performancave të tyre premtuese kur janë furnizuar me sasi të mjaftueshme të dhënash. In this paper, we present a novel methodology to address the interpretability of neural approaches in such scenarios by creating challenge datasets using dialogue self-play over multiple tasks/intents.  Dialogu vetë-lojë lejon krijimin e sasisë së madhe të të dhënave sintetike; duke përfituar nga kontrolli i plotë mbi procesin e gjeneratës, ne tregojmë se si mund të vlerësohen qasjet nervore në termat e modeleve të dialogut të padukshëm. Ne propozojmë disa raste testesh jashtë modelit secila prej të cilave paraqet një fenomen natyror dhe të papritur të shprehjes së përdoruesit. Si një provë e konceptit, ndërtuam një rrjet të vetëm dhe një rrjet të shumëfishtë kujtese dhe treguam se këto dy arkitektura kanë shfaqje të ndryshme në varësi të modeleve të çuditshme të dialogut.', 'az': 'Əvvəlki məlumatları verilən vaxt və ’ d etdikləri performansların səbəbi nəyral tərzlərinin müzakirə scenariyalarında daha çox ortaya çıxarılır. Bu kağızda, çoxlu işlər/niyyətlər üzərində müəllif verilən məlumatlar yaratmaq üçün yeni bir metodoloji göstəririk. Dialog öz-oynaması böyük sintetik məlumatları yaratmağa imkan verir; nəsil prosesinin tamamlanmış kontrolünü istifadə edərək, görünmədiyimiz диалог modellərinə görə nöral yaxınlıqlarının necə değerlənəcəyini göstəririk. Biz hər biri təbiətli və gözləməz istifadəçi sözləri göstərir. Koneptin bir kanıtı olaraq, biz tək və çox yaddaş a ğını inşa etdik və bu iki arhitektür müxtəlif danışma örtüklərinə bağlı olan müxtəlif performans olduğunu göstərdik.', 'bn': 'তাদের প্রতিশ্রুতি প্রদর্শনের কারণে তাদের প্রতিশ্রুতি প্রদান করা পরিমাণ তথ্য প্রদান করার কারণে শেষ পর্যন্ত নিউরেল কার্যক্রম বেশি স এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নভেল পদ্ধতিতে উপস্থাপন করি যাতে এই ধরনের দৃশ্যে নিউরেল প্রতিযোগিতার ব্যাখ্যাতির ব্যাখ্যা তৈরি করে বেশ কিছু কাজ/উদ্দ ডায়ালগ নিজেকে খেলার অনুমতি দিয়েছে বিশাল পরিমাণ সিন্টেটিক ডাটা তৈরি করার; প্রজন্মের প্রক্রিয়ার সম্পূর্ণ নিয়ন্ত্রণ ব্যবহারের মাধ্যমে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি কিভাবে অদৃশ্য আলোচনার প্রান্তের মাধ্যমে নি আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি বেশ কয়েকটি প্রাকৃতিক এবং অপ্রত্যাশিত ব্যবহারকারীর বক্তব্যের বিষয়। ধারণার প্রমাণ হিসেবে আমরা একটি একক এবং এক বেশ কিছু মেমরি নেটওয়ার্ক তৈরি করেছি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে এই দুই স্থাপত্যের প্রতি বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন প্রদর্শন রয়েছে', 'cs': 'End-to-end neuronové přístupy jsou stále běžnější v konverzačních scénářích kvůli jejich slibným výkonům, když jsou poskytnuty dostatečné množství dat. V tomto článku představujeme novou metodiku pro řešení interpretovatelnosti neuronových přístupů v takových scénářích vytvořením souborů výzvy pomocí dialogové sebeprávy nad více úkoly/záměry. Dialog self-play umožňuje generovat velké množství syntetických dat; Využitím kompletní kontroly nad procesem generace ukazujeme, jak lze neuronové přístupy hodnotit z hlediska neviditelných dialogových vzorů. Navrhujeme několik mimo vzor testovacích případů, z nichž každý představuje přirozený a neočekávaný fenomén uživatelské výslovnosti. Jako důkaz konceptu jsme vybudovali jednu a více paměťovou síť a ukázali, že tyto dvě architektury mají různé výkony v závislosti na zvláštních dialogových vzorcích.', 'bs': 'Neuralni pristupi do kraja postaju sve češći u razgovornim scenarijama zbog obećavajućih učinka kada su pruženi dovoljno količine podataka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu metodologiju za rješavanje interpretabilnosti neuroloških pristupa u takvim scenarijama stvaranjem izazovnih podataka korištenjem samog dijaloga o višestrukim zadacima/namjerama. Samodigranje dijaloga omogućava stvaranje velike količine sintetičkih podataka; koristeći potpunu kontrolu nad procesom generacije, pokazujemo kako se neuralni pristupi mogu procijeniti u smislu nevidljivih obrazaca dijaloga. Predlažemo nekoliko slučajeva ispitivanja bez obrazaca, svaki od kojih predstavlja prirodni i neočekivan fenomen izražavanja korisnika. Kao dokaz koncepta, izgradili smo jednu i višestruku mrežu sjećanja i pokazali da ova dva arhitektura imaju različite učinke ovisno o neobičnim obrascima dijaloga.', 'ca': "Els enfocaments neurals de finals a finals s'estan tornant cada cop més comuns en escenaris de conversació degut a les seves performances prometedores quan es proporcionen suficients quantitats de dades. En aquest paper, presentem una nova metodologia per abordar l'interpretabilitat dels enfocaments neuronals en aquests escenaris creant conjunts de dades de desafiament fent servir diàleg propi sobre múltiples tasques/intencions. L'autojoc del diàleg permet generar gran quantitat de dades sintètiques; aprofitant el control complet del procés de generació, demostram com es poden evaluar els enfocaments neuronals en termes de patrons de diàleg invisibles. Proposem diversos casos de prova fora del patró, cada un dels quals introdueix un fenomen natural i inesperat d'expressió de l'usuari. Com a prova del concepte, vam construir una única i múltiple xarxa de memòria, i demostrar que aquestes dues arquitectures tenen performances diverses segons els patrons de diàleg peculiars.", 'fi': 'End-to-end neurolähestymistavat ovat yleistymässä keskusteluskenaarioissa lupaavien suoritustensa vuoksi, kun niitä tarjotaan riittävästi dataa. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme uudenlaisen menetelmän, jolla pyritään käsittelemään neurologisten lähestymistapojen tulkittavuutta tällaisissa skenaarioissa luomalla haasteaineistoja käyttämällä dialogia itsepelaamista useiden tehtävien/aikomusten yli. Vuoropuhelun itsepelaaminen mahdollistaa suuren määrän synteettistä dataa; Hyödyntämällä generaatioprosessin täydellistä hallintaa näytämme, miten neurolähestymistapoja voidaan arvioida näkymättömien dialogimallien näkökulmasta. Ehdotamme useita poikkeavia testitapauksia, joista jokainen esittelee luonnollisen ja odottamattoman käyttäjän ilmaisuilmiön. Konseptin osoituksena rakensimme yhden ja useamman muistiverkon ja osoitimme, että näillä kahdella arkkitehtuurilla on erilaisia performansseja riippuen erityisistä dialogimalleista.', 'et': 'Lõpp-otsa närvilähenemisviisid muutuvad vestlusstsenaariumides üha levinumaks tänu nende paljulubavatele tulemustele, kui neile antakse piisavalt andmeid. Käesolevas töös tutvustame uudset metoodikat neuraalsete lähenemisviiside tõlgendatavuse käsitlemiseks sellistes stsenaariumides, luues väljakutsete andmekogumeid, kasutades dialoogi isemängu mitme ülesande/kavatsuse üle. Dialoogi isemäng võimaldab luua suure hulga sünteetilisi andmeid; kasutades ära täielikku kontrolli generatsiooniprotsessi üle, näitame, kuidas närvilikke lähenemisviise saab hinnata nähtamatute dialoogimustrite järgi. Pakume välja mitmeid mustriväliseid katsejuhtumeid, millest igaüks tutvustab loomulikku ja ootamatut kasutaja väljendusnähtust. Kontseptsiooni tõestuseks ehitasime ühe ja mitme mäluvõrgu ning näitasime, et need kaks arhitektuuri on erinevad, sõltuvalt omapärastest dialoogimustritest.', 'jv': 'Asmaci penting-terapun punika sing paling kelas akeh operasi ingkang dipun ajeng-ajeng langgar Nang pentungé iki, kita sadurungé téholoje kanggo nganggep nglanggar aturan karo hal-hal dadi sing nyelarane ning acara batar dadi sing nggawe dataset kuwi nggawe dialog auto-play susu task/s. Dialog auto-play maneh ngucap Awak dhéwé ngerasai gambar pernik apakno sing gak tentang karo kesempatan Taning kelengatus aku, kita sampeyan nggawe sistem sing sampeyan lan tambahan sing nyeangno karo sistem sing duwé', 'sk': 'Nevronski pristopi od konca do konca postajajo vse pogostejši v pogovornih scenarijih zaradi njihovih obetavnih uspešnosti, kadar imajo zadostno količino podatkov. V prispevku predstavljamo novo metodologijo za obravnavo interpretabilnosti nevronskih pristopov v takih scenarijih z ustvarjanjem naborov podatkov o izzivih z uporabo dialogske samoigre nad več nalogami/nameni. Dialog samoigra omogoča ustvarjanje velike količine sintetičnih podatkov; Z izkoriščanjem popolnega nadzora nad generacijskim procesom pokažemo, kako je mogoče nevronske pristope oceniti v smislu nevidnih dialogskih vzorcev. Predlagamo več izven vzorca preskusnih primerov, od katerih vsak uvaja naravni in nepričakovan pojav izgovora uporabnikov. Kot dokaz koncepta smo zgradili eno in večkratno pomnilniško omrežje in pokazali, da imata ti dve arhitekturi različne nastope glede na posebne dialogne vzorce.', 'he': 'גישות עצביות סוף-סוף הופכות יותר ויותר נפוצות בתרחישות שיחה בגלל ההופעות המבטיחות שלהם כאשר מספקות מספיק נתונים. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים מטודולוגיה חדשה כדי להתמודד עם אפשרות הפרשנות של גישות עצביות בתרחישים כאלה על ידי ליצור קבוצות מידע אתגרים באמצעות דיאלוג משחק עצמי על משימות/כוונות רבות. Dialogue self-play allows generating large amount of synthetic data;  על ידי ניצל את השליטה המושלמת על תהליך הדור, אנחנו מראים איך גישות עצביות יכולות להעריך במונחים של דפוסי דיאלוג בלתי נראים. אנחנו מציעים מספר מקרים מבחנים מחוץ לדפוס שכל אחד מהם מציג תופעה טבעית ובלתי צפויה של משתמש. כהוכחה של מושג, בנינו רשת זכרון אחת ורובה, ולהראות ששני הארכיטקטורות האלה יש ביצועים מגוונים תלויים בדפוסי הדיולוג המיוחדים.', 'ha': "Tsarin neural na ƙari ya ci ci ƙara mai yawan su cikin fassarar mazaɓa sabõda cikakken su da ake yi musu wa'adi idan da aka bã da gwargwadon data. Daga wannan takardan, muna halatar da wata hanyoyi na noveli dõmin mu tunkuɗe fassarar shiryoyin hanyõyin neural a cikin wannan zanaris da za'a ƙiƙiro danana-zane-zane da za'a yi amfani da zauren akwatin bayani masu yawa. Diyalogi na yarda da farat-play da za'a ƙiƙira lokaci mai girma na haɗi; game da amfani da cikakken Control a kan jarrabar zauren, za mu nũna yadda za'a iya ƙayyade hanyoyin neura a cikin zauren zauren akwatin bayani na asĩri. Tuna goyyar da wasu jarrabo masu amfani da baka da ba'a so ba, ko dukansu, za'a ƙudura magana na mai amfani da ba. Kama shawarar zato, mun gina wani jerin hukuru guda da guda masu yawa, kuma muka nũna cewa, waɗannan bakwai biyu sunã da rundunõni daban-dabam, sunã kamfata da misãlai na zauren zauren akwatin bayani na dabam.", 'bo': 'མི་ཤེས་མཇུག་བསྡུ་ཡོད་པའི་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱི་ཚད་ཆེ་རུ་ཡོད་པའི་སྐབས་སུ་གཏམ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ནང་གི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མང་ཆེ་ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གསར་བ་གླེང་སྒྲུམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གནང་བ་འདི་དག་གི་སྐྱེས་པའི་མཐུན་སྣང་དང་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ལས་གནད་དོན་ཆ་འཕྲི Dialog self-play སྔོན་ལྟ་བུའི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡོངས་སུ་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཞིག་ལས་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་བསྡུར་ན་ངེད་ཚོའི་མཐུན་སྣང་མེད་པའི་ཌའི་ལོག་གླེང ང་ཚོས་རེ་རེའི་ནང་དུ་མི་མཐུན་པའི་དཔྱད་རིས་གཞན་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་བ་དང་རེ་འདུན་མེད་པའི་སྤྱོད As a proof of concept, we built a single and a multiple memory network, and show that these two architectures have various performances depending on the peculiar dialog patterns.'}
{'en': 'Unsupervised Data Augmentation for Less-Resourced Languages with no Standardized Spelling', 'ar': 'زيادة البيانات غير الخاضعة للإشراف للغات قليلة الموارد بدون تدقيق إملائي موحد', 'pt': 'Aumento de dados não supervisionado para idiomas com menos recursos sem ortografia padronizada', 'fr': 'Augmentation non supervisée des données pour les langues moins riches sans orthographe normalisée', 'es': 'Aumento de datos no supervisado para idiomas con menos recursos sin ortografía estandarizada', 'ja': '標準化されたスペルを使用しない、リソースの少ない言語のための監督されていないデータ拡張', 'hi': 'बिना मानकीकृत वर्तनी के साथ कम-संसाधन वाली भाषाओं के लिए असुरक्षित डेटा वृद्धि', 'zh': '无监督数据增强,适用于资源较少且无标准化拼写语', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемое расширение данных для языков с меньшим объемом ресурсов без стандартизированного правописания', 'ga': 'Méadú ar Shonraí Neamhmhaoirsithe do Theangacha Neamhfhorleathana gan aon Litriú Caighdeánaithe', 'el': 'Αύξηση δεδομένων χωρίς επιτήρηση για γλώσσες με λιγότερους πόρους χωρίς τυποποιημένη ορθογραφία', 'hu': 'Felügyelet nélküli adatbővítés kevésbé erőforrású nyelvekhez szabványosított helyesírás nélkül', 'ka': 'უფრო მცირე რესურსისტირებული ენებისთვის მონაცემების აგგენტირება', 'it': 'Aumento dei dati non monitorato per lingue meno risorse senza ortografia standardizzata', 'lt': 'Neprižiūrimas mažiau išteklių turinčių kalbų duomenų didinimas be standartizuoto ortografo', 'kk': 'Стандартты емлесіз тілдер үшін қолданылмаған деректерді көшірмелеу', 'mk': 'Ненадгледувана Агментација на податоците за јазици со помалку ресурси без стандардизирано правопис', 'ms': 'Tambahan Data Tidak Dipengawasi untuk Bahasa Kurang Sumber tanpa Ejaan Piawai', 'mn': 'Бага боловсруулагдсан хэл дээр бага өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлт Standardized Spelling байхгүй', 'ml': 'സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഡേറ്റാഡിസ് അക്ഷരസഞ്ചയം ഇല്ലാത്ത ചെറിയ വാചകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഡേറ്റാ ഓഗ്മെന്റേഷന്\u200dറ്', 'mt': 'Żieda fid-Dejta Mhux Sorveljata għal Lingwi Inqas Riżorsi mingħajr Spelling Standardizzat', 'ro': 'Augmentarea datelor nesupravegheate pentru limbi cu resurse mai puține fără ortografie standardizată', 'no': 'Ikkje oppretta dataaugmentasjon for mindre ressurserte språk utan standardiserte staving', 'sr': 'Neodređeno povećanje podataka za manje resursnog jezika bez standardnog pisma', 'pl': 'Niekontrolowane rozszerzenie danych dla języków mniej zasobów bez standardowej pisowni', 'sv': 'Icke övervakad dataökning för mindre resurser språk utan standardiserad stavning', 'si': 'ස්ථානයිත වාර්තාවක් නැති භාෂාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නැති තොරතුරු විශාලනය', 'so': "Horumarinta macluumaadka ee aan la ilaalinayn luqadaha ugu yaraan ee aan la'aanin", 'ta': 'நிலையான எழுத்துரு இல்லாத குறைந்தபட்ச மொழிகளுக்கான தரவு ஒப்புக்கொள்ளப்படாத மொழிகள்', 'ur': 'Less- Resourced Languages for Unupervised Data Augmentation with no Standardized Spelling', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Không giám sát dữ liệu gia tăng cho Ngôn ngữ ít khai thác không có từ ngữ chuẩn', 'bg': 'Неконтролирано увеличаване на данните за езици с по-малко ресурси без стандартизиран правопис', 'da': 'Ikke-overvåget dataudvidelse for mindre ressourcer sprog uden standardiseret stavning', 'hr': 'Neodređeno povećanje podataka za manje resursnog jezika bez standardnog pisanja', 'nl': 'Niet-beheerde gegevensuitbreiding voor talen met minder middelen zonder gestandaardiseerde spelling', 'de': 'Unbeaufsichtigte Datenerweiterung für Sprachen mit weniger Ressourcen ohne standardisierte Rechtschreibung', 'ko': '자원이 적고 표준 맞춤법이 없는 언어에 대한 무감독 데이터 확장', 'id': 'Augmentasi Data Tidak Tersupervisi untuk Bahasa Kurang Sumber Tanpa Spelling Standardisasi', 'sw': 'Toleo la Takwimu zisizothibitishwa kwa lugha zisizo na rasilimali zisizo na maandishi ya Standard', 'tr': 'Daha az Ressourt Diller üçin Mazmunlar Maglumaty Aýgymlandyrma', 'af': 'Onondersteunde data Augmentasie vir minder- hulpbron tale met geen standaard Spelling', 'sq': 'Rritja e të dhënave pa mbikqyrje për gjuhët me më pak burime pa ortografi të standartizuar', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ', 'hy': 'Փոքր ռեսուրսներ ունեցող լեզուների առանց ստանդարտիզացված ուղղագրության տվյալների աճը', 'fa': 'افزایش داده\u200cهای غیرقابل حفاظت برای زبانهای کمتر منبع بدون نوشتن استاندارد', 'az': 'Standardlı İmləri olmayan Qısqa-Ressourced Dillər üçün Qeyd edilməmiş Veri Əlavə Et', 'bn': 'স্ট্যান্ডার্ডিয়াল বানানোর ব্যাপার না থাকা ভাষার জন্য অনলাইন করা ডাটা অংগেমেন্ট', 'bs': 'Neodređeno povećanje podataka za manje resursnog jezika bez standardnog pisma', 'cs': 'Rozšíření dat bez kontroly pro jazyky s menšími zdroji bez standardizovaného pravopisu', 'ca': 'Unsupervised Data Augmentation for Less-Resourced Languages with no Standardized Spelling', 'fi': 'Tarkkailematon tietojen lisääminen vähemmän resursseilla varustetuille kielille ilman standardisoitua oikeinkirjoitusta', 'et': 'Järelevalveta andmete suurendamine vähem ressurssidega keelte puhul ilma standarditud õigekirjadeta', 'jv': 'marker', 'sk': 'Nenadzorovana povečava podatkov za jezike z manj viri brez standardiziranega črkovanja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'גידול נתונים ללא שליטה לשפות פחות משאבים ללא מילוי סטנדרטיזם', 'bo': 'རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་ཉར་གསོ་མེད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་བསྐྱེད་ཚད'}
{'en': 'Building representative linguistic resources and NLP tools for non-standardized languages is challenging : when spelling is not determined by a norm, multiple written forms can be encountered for a given word, inducing a large proportion of out-of-vocabulary words. To embrace this diversity, we propose a methodology based on crowdsourced alternative spellings we use to extract rules applied to match OOV words with one of their spelling variants. This virtuous process enables the unsupervised augmentation of multi-variant lexicons without expert rule definition. We apply this multilingual methodology on Alsatian, a French regional language and provide an intrinsic evaluation of the correctness of the variants pairs, and an extrinsic evaluation on a downstream task. We show that in a low-resource scenario, 145 inital pairs can lead to the generation of 876 additional variant pairs, and a diminution of OOV words improving the part-of-speech tagging performance by 1 to 4 %.', 'ar': 'يعد بناء الموارد اللغوية التمثيلية وأدوات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية للغات غير المعيارية أمرًا صعبًا: عندما لا يتم تحديد التهجئة من خلال معيار ، يمكن مواجهة أشكال مكتوبة متعددة لكلمة معينة ، مما يؤدي إلى تحفيز نسبة كبيرة من الكلمات خارج المفردات. لاحتضان هذا التنوع ، نقترح منهجية تستند إلى هجاء بديل جماعي نستخدمه لاستخراج القواعد المطبقة لمطابقة كلمات OOV بأحد متغيرات التهجئة الخاصة بها. تتيح هذه العملية الفاضلة زيادة غير خاضعة للرقابة لقواميس متعددة المتغيرات بدون تعريف قاعدة خبير. نطبق هذه المنهجية متعددة اللغات على الألزاسي ، وهي لغة فرنسية إقليمية ونقدم تقييمًا جوهريًا لصحة أزواج المتغيرات ، وتقييمًا خارجيًا لمهمة المصب. نوضح أنه في سيناريو الموارد المنخفضة ، يمكن أن يؤدي 145 زوجًا أوليًا إلى توليد 876 زوجًا متغيرًا إضافيًا ، وتقليل كلمات OOV مما يؤدي إلى تحسين أداء وضع علامات على جزء من الكلام بنسبة 1 إلى 4٪.', 'fr': "Construire des ressources linguistiques représentatives et des outils de PNL pour des langues non normalisées est un défi\xa0: lorsque l'orthographe n'est pas déterminée par une norme, plusieurs formes écrites peuvent être rencontrées pour un mot donné, induisant une forte proportion de mots hors vocabulaire. Pour tenir compte de cette diversité, nous proposons une méthodologie basée sur des orthographes alternatives issues du crowdsourcing que nous utilisons pour extraire les règles appliquées pour faire correspondre les mots OOV avec l'une de leurs variantes orthographiques. Ce processus vertueux permet l'augmentation non supervisée de lexiques à variantes multiples sans définition de règles expertes. Nous appliquons cette méthodologie multilingue sur l'alsacien, une langue régionale française et fournissons une évaluation intrinsèque de l'exactitude des paires de variantes, ainsi qu'une évaluation extrinsèque sur une tâche en aval. Nous montrons que dans un scénario à faibles ressources, 145 paires initiales peuvent entraîner la génération de 876 paires de variantes supplémentaires, et une diminution des mots OOV améliorant les performances de marquage de parties du discours de 1 à 4\xa0%.", 'pt': 'Construir recursos linguísticos representativos e ferramentas de PNL para idiomas não padronizados é um desafio: quando a ortografia não é determinada por uma norma, várias formas escritas podem ser encontradas para uma determinada palavra, induzindo uma grande proporção de palavras fora do vocabulário. Para abraçar essa diversidade, propomos uma metodologia baseada em grafias alternativas de crowdsourcing que usamos para extrair regras aplicadas para combinar palavras OOV com uma de suas variantes de grafia. Esse processo virtuoso permite o aumento não supervisionado de léxicos multivariantes sem definição de regras especializadas. Aplicamos esta metodologia multilíngue em alsaciano, uma língua regional francesa e fornecemos uma avaliação intrínseca da correção dos pares de variantes e uma avaliação extrínseca em uma tarefa a jusante. Mostramos que em um cenário de poucos recursos, 145 pares iniciais podem levar à geração de 876 pares de variantes adicionais e uma diminuição de palavras OOV melhorando o desempenho da marcação de parte da fala em 1 a 4%.', 'es': 'Crear recursos lingüísticos representativos y herramientas de PNL para idiomas no estandarizados es un desafío: cuando la ortografía no está determinada por una norma, se pueden encontrar múltiples formas escritas para una palabra determinada, lo que induce una gran proporción de palabras fuera del vocabulario. Para adoptar esta diversidad, proponemos una metodología basada en la ortografía alternativa colaborativa que utilizamos para extraer las reglas aplicadas para hacer coincidir las palabras OOV con una de sus variantes ortográficas. Este proceso virtuoso permite el aumento sin supervisión de léxicos multivariantes sin una definición de reglas por parte de expertos. Aplicamos esta metodología multilingüe en alsaciano, una lengua regional francesa, y proporcionamos una evaluación intrínseca de la corrección de los pares de variantes, y una evaluación extrínseca en una tarea posterior. Demostramos que en un escenario de bajos recursos, 145 pares iniciales pueden conducir a la generación de 876 pares de variantes adicionales y a una disminución de las palabras OOV que mejoran el rendimiento del etiquetado de parte del discurso entre un 1 y un 4%.', 'ja': '非標準化言語のために代表的な言語リソースとNLPツールを構築することは困難です。スペルが規範によって決定されていない場合、特定の単語について複数の書かれた形式に遭遇する可能性があり、語彙外の単語の大きな割合を誘発します。この多様性を受け入れるために、私たちはOOV単語とそのスペルバリアントの1つを一致させるために適用されるルールを抽出するために使用するクラウドソーシングされた代替スペルに基づいた方法論を提案します。この優れたプロセスにより、専門家のルール定義なしで多変量の辞書を監督なしで拡張することができます。私たちは、この多言語の方法論をフランス語の地域言語であるアルザス語に適用し、バリアントペアの正しさの本質的評価と、下流のタスクの本質的評価を提供します。低リソースシナリオでは、１ ４ ５個のインニタルペアが、８ ７ ６個の追加のバリアントペアの生成につながり、ＯＯＶ単語の減少が、話す部分のタグ性能を１ ～ ４ ％向上させることができることを示す。', 'hi': 'गैर-मानकीकृत भाषाओं के लिए प्रतिनिधि भाषाई संसाधनों और एनएलपी उपकरणों का निर्माण चुनौतीपूर्ण है: जब वर्तनी एक आदर्श द्वारा निर्धारित नहीं की जाती है, तो किसी दिए गए शब्द के लिए कई लिखित रूपों का सामना किया जा सकता है, जो आउट-ऑफ-शब्दावली शब्दों के एक बड़े अनुपात को प्रेरित करता है। इस विविधता को गले लगाने के लिए, हम crowdsourced वैकल्पिक वर्तनी के आधार पर एक पद्धति का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसका उपयोग हम अपने वर्तनी संस्करणों में से एक के साथ ओओवी शब्दों से मेल खाने के लिए लागू नियमों को निकालने के लिए करते हैं। यह पुण्य प्रक्रिया विशेषज्ञ नियम परिभाषा के बिना बहु-संस्करण शब्दकोशों की असुरक्षित वृद्धि को सक्षम बनाती है। हम एक फ्रांसीसी क्षेत्रीय भाषा, Alsatian पर इस बहुभाषी पद्धति को लागू करते हैं और वेरिएंट जोड़े की शुद्धता का एक आंतरिक मूल्यांकन प्रदान करते हैं, और एक डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्य पर एक बाहरी मूल्यांकन प्रदान करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि कम-संसाधन परिदृश्य में, 145 प्रारंभिक जोड़े 876 अतिरिक्त संस्करण जोड़े की पीढ़ी का कारण बन सकते हैं, और ओओवी शब्दों की कमी 1 से 4% तक भाग-के-भाषण टैगिंग प्रदर्शन में सुधार कर सकती है।', 'ru': 'Построение репрезентативных лингвистических ресурсов и инструментов NLP для нестандартизированных языков является сложной задачей: когда орфография не определяется нормой, для данного слова можно встретить несколько письменных форм, вызывающих большую долю внесловных слов. Чтобы охватить это разнообразие, мы предлагаем методологию, основанную на краудсорсинговых альтернативных написаниях, которые мы используем для извлечения правил, применяемых для сопоставления слов OOV с одним из их вариантов написания. Этот добродетельный процесс позволяет неконтролируемое увеличение многовариантных лексиконов без определения экспертных правил. Мы применяем эту многоязычную методологию к эльзасскому языку, французскому региональному языку, и предоставляем внутреннюю оценку правильности пар вариантов, а также внешнюю оценку по задаче ниже по потоку. Мы показываем, что в сценарии с низким объемом ресурсов 145 начальных пар могут привести к генерации 876 дополнительных пар вариантов и уменьшению слов OOV, улучшая производительность тегирования части речи на 1-4%.', 'zh': '非标准化言语构代表性语言资用NLP具有挑战性:当拼写非规模之时,于给定之单词或多书面形式,诱发比例之词汇外单词。 为此多样性者,建众包代拼写之法,以取用于将OOV单词与拼写变体之匹则。 此良性可以无专家定义者,无监广变体词典。 宜用于法语区域语言Alsatian,而内评于变体之正确性,而外估于下流。 明于资源匮乏,145 始可以成 876 额外之变体,而 OOV 单词之损可以增词性 1% 于 4%。', 'ga': 'Is dúshlánach é acmhainní ionadaíocha teangeolaíochta agus uirlisí NLP a fhorbairt do theangacha neamhchaighdeánaithe: nuair nach gcinntear an litriú de réir gnáis, is féidir teacht ar iolracha i bhfoirm scríofa d’fhocal ar leith, rud a fhágann go mbíonn cuid mhór de na focail as-focal. Chun glacadh leis an éagsúlacht seo, molaimid modheolaíocht a bheidh bunaithe ar litriú malartach sluafhoinsithe a úsáidimid chun rialacha a bhaint amach a chuirtear i bhfeidhm chun focail OOV a mheaitseáil le ceann dá leagan litrithe. Cumasaíonn an próiseas éirimiúil seo breisiú gan mhaoirseacht ar fhoclóirí ilathraitheacha gan sainmhíniú ar riail shaineolach. Cuirimid an mhodheolaíocht ilteangach seo i bhfeidhm ar Alsatian, teanga réigiúnach na Fraince, agus cuirimid luacháil intreach ar chruinneas na mbeirteanna malairtí, agus meastóireacht eistreach ar thasc iartheachtacha. Léirímid, i gcás acmhainní íseal, go bhféadfadh 145 péire tosaigh a bheith mar thoradh ar ghiniúint 876 péire malairtí breise, agus laghdú ar fhocail OOV ag feabhsú feidhmíochta clibeála cuid cainte 1 go 4%.', 'hu': 'A nem szabványosított nyelvek reprezentatív nyelvi erőforrásainak és NLP eszközeinek kiépítése kihívást jelent: ha a helyesírást nem egy normál határozza meg, akkor egy adott szóhoz több írásos formával találkozhatunk, ami a szókincsen kívüli szavak nagy részét idézi elő. Ennek a sokszínűségnek a felhasználása érdekében olyan módszertant javasolunk, amely a közösségi forrásból származó alternatív helyesírásokon alapul, amelyeket használunk arra, hogy kivonjuk az OOV szavakat az egyik helyesírási variánsukkal. Ez az erényes folyamat lehetővé teszi a többváltozatos lexikonok felügyelet nélküli kiterjesztését szakértői szabályok definíciója nélkül. Ezt a többnyelvű módszertant az elzáziai, francia regionális nyelven alkalmazzuk, és a változatpárok helyességének belső értékelését, valamint egy downstream feladat külső értékelését biztosítjuk. Megmutatjuk, hogy egy alacsony erőforrású forgatókönyv esetén 145 initális pár 876 további változatpár generálásához és az OOV szavak csökkenéséhez vezethet, ami 1-4%-kal javítja a beszédrész címkézési teljesítményét.', 'el': 'Η δημιουργία αντιπροσωπευτικών γλωσσικών πόρων και εργαλείων για μη τυποποιημένες γλώσσες είναι πρόκληση: όταν η ορθογραφία δεν καθορίζεται από έναν κανόνα, μπορούν να συναντηθούν πολλαπλές γραπτές μορφές για μια δεδομένη λέξη, προκαλώντας μεγάλο ποσοστό λέξεων εκτός λεξιλογίου. Για να ενστερνιστεί αυτή η ποικιλομορφία, προτείνουμε μια μεθοδολογία βασισμένη σε εναλλακτικές ορθογραφίες που χρησιμοποιούμε για να εξάγουμε κανόνες που εφαρμόζονται για να αντιστοιχίσουμε λέξεις OOV με μια από τις παραλλαγές ορθογραφίας τους. Αυτή η ενάρετη διαδικασία επιτρέπει την απρόβλεπτη αύξηση των πολυ-παραλλαγών λεξικών χωρίς τον ορισμό κανόνων από εμπειρογνώμονες. Εφαρμόζουμε αυτή την πολύγλωσση μεθοδολογία στα αλσατικά, μια γαλλική περιφερειακή γλώσσα και παρέχουμε μια εγγενή αξιολόγηση της ορθότητας των ζευγαριών παραλλαγών, και μια εξωτερική αξιολόγηση σε μια μεταγενέστερη εργασία. Δείχνουμε ότι σε ένα σενάριο χαμηλών πόρων, τα αρχικά ζεύγη 145 μπορούν να οδηγήσουν στη δημιουργία 876 επιπλέον ζεύγη παραλλαγών και στη μείωση των λέξεων που βελτιώνουν την απόδοση της σήμανσης μέρους ομιλίας κατά 1 έως 4%.', 'ka': 'გამოსახულებელი ენდოლისტიკური რესურსები და NLP ხელსაწყობილობის შექმნა უფრო შესაძლებელია: როდესაც სიტყვა ნორმაზე არ განსახულებულია, რამდენიმე წერილი ფორმები შეიძლება შეიძლება შეიძლება შეიძლება განახულებული სი ამ განსხვავებას მივიღებთ, ჩვენ მივიღებთ მეტიოლოგია, რომელიც მუშაობით ალტენტიგური წერტილების დაბაზეულია, რომელიც ჩვენ გამოყენებთ სტრაქტირებისთვის წესების გამოყენება, რო ეს მნიშვნელოვანი პროცესი შესაძლებელია მრავალიტური ლექსიკონის უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი აზექტიკაციას, რომელიც ექსპერტის წესების განსაზღვრება ჩვენ ამ მრავალენგური მეტოლოგიას ალჟატიანის, ფრანგური რეგიონალური ენაზე გამოყენებთ და გარიანტების მწორეობის ინტერნექტური განსაზღვრება და გარეშე განსაზღვრებას და გარეშე განსაზღვრებაზე. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ცოტა რესურსის სენარიოში 145 ინტიმალური ზოგები შეგვიძლია წარმოიდგინოთ 876 დამატებული გარიანტიურ ზოგების შემდეგ და OOV სიტყვების შემცირება, რომელიც 1-4% დამატებული სიტყვე', 'it': "Costruire risorse linguistiche rappresentative e strumenti PNL per lingue non standardizzate è difficile: quando l'ortografia non è determinata da una norma, si possono incontrare più forme scritte per una data parola, inducendo una grande percentuale di parole fuori dal vocabolario. Per abbracciare questa diversità, proponiamo una metodologia basata su ortografie alternative crowdsourcing che usiamo per estrarre le regole applicate per abbinare parole OOV con una delle loro varianti ortografiche. Questo processo virtuoso consente l'aumento non supervisionato di lessici multi-variante senza definizione di regole esperte. Applichiamo questa metodologia multilingue sull'alsaziano, una lingua regionale francese e forniamo una valutazione intrinseca della correttezza delle coppie di varianti, e una valutazione estrinseca su un compito a valle. Mostriamo che in uno scenario a basso consumo di risorse, 145 coppie iniziali possono portare alla generazione di 876 coppie di varianti aggiuntive e una diminuzione delle parole OOV migliorando le prestazioni di tag part-of-speech dell'1-4%.", 'lt': 'Esama sunku kurti reprezentatyvius kalbinius išteklius ir NLP priemones nestandardizuotoms kalboms: kai rašymas nenustatomas pagal norm ą, galima rasti daugybę rašytinių formų tam tikram žodžiui, sukeliant didelę dalį žodžių, kurie nėra žodžiai. To embrace this diversity, we propose a methodology based on crowdsourced alternative spellings we use to extract rules applied to match OOV words with one of their spelling variants.  Šis naudingas procesas leidžia nepastebimai padidinti daugialypius leksikonus be ekspertų taisyklės apibrėžimo. Mes taikome šią daugiakalbę metodiką Alsatiečių kalbai, prancūzų regioninei kalbai ir pateikiame išsamų variantų poros teisingumo vertinimą ir išorinį vertinimą tolesnės veiklos metu. We show that in a low-resource scenario, 145 inital pairs can lead to the generation of 876 additional variant pairs, and a diminution of OOV words improving the part-of-speech tagging performance by 1 to 4%.', 'mk': 'Изградбата на претставници на лингвистичките ресурси и алатки на НЛП за нестандардизирани јазици е предизвикувачка: кога правописот не е одреден со норма, може да се најдат многуте пишани форми за одреден збор, индукционирајќи голем процент на зборови надвор од зборовите. За да ја прифатиме оваа разновидност, предложуваме методологија базирана на публички алтернативни правописи кои ги користиме за да ги извадиме правилата применети за да се совпаѓаат OOV зборовите со еден од нивните варијанти на правопис. Овој благословен процес овозможува ненадгледувано зголемување на мултиваријантните лексикони без дефиниција на експертски правила. Ја применуваме оваа мултијазична методологија на алсатичкиот јазик, францускиот регионален јазик и обезбедуваме внатрешна оценка на коректноста на паровите на варијантите, и екстринзичка оценка на понатамошната задача. Ние покажуваме дека во сценарио со ниски ресурси, 145 инитални парови може да доведат до генерација на 876 дополнителни варијантни парови, и намалување на OOV зборовите подобрување на резултатот на делот од говорот со означување за 1 до 4 отсто.', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രതിനിധിയിലെ ഭാഷ വിഭവങ്ങളും NLP ഉപകരണങ്ങളും നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത് വിലപാടാണ്: അക്ഷരസഞ്ചരിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു സാധാരണ വാക്കുകളാല്\u200d പല എഴു ഈ വ്യത്യസ്ത്രീകരണത്തെ അഭിപ്രായപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു മെഡിടോട്ടോളജി ആവശ്യപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അവരുടെ അക്ഷരസഞ്ചരിത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു വ്യത്യ ഈ നല്ല പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d പ്രത്യേക വിശേഷ നിയമവിശദീകരണവുമില്ലാത്ത പല- വേറിയന്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കങ്ങളുടെ കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല ഒരു ഫ്രെഞ്ച് പ്രദേശത്തിന്റെ ഭാഷയില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ പല ഭാഷകളുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ ശരിയ്ക്കുള്ള വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ ഉള്ളില്\u200d വിലാസ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു, ഒരു കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d 145 ഇണിറ്റല്\u200d ജോട്ടികള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. 876 കൂടുതല്\u200d വേറിയന്ത്രിക ജോടികളുടെ തലമുറയ', 'mt': 'Il-bini ta’ riżorsi lingwistiċi rappreżentattivi u għodod NLP għal lingwi mhux standardizzati huwa sfida: meta l-ortografija ma tkunx determinata minn norm a, jistgħu jinstabu forom bil-miktub multipli għal kelma partikolari, li jinduċu proporzjon kbir ta’ kliem barra mill-vokabulari. Biex nindirizzaw din id-diversità, nipproponu metodoloġija bbażata fuq ortografiji alternattivi crowdsourced li nużaw biex nieġbdu r-regoli applikati biex jaqblu mal-kliem OOV ma’ wieħed mill-varjanti tagħhom tal-ortografija. Dan il-proċess virtwuż jippermetti żieda mhux sorveljata ta’ lexicons multivarjanti mingħajr definizzjoni tar-regoli esperti. Aħna napplikaw din il-metodoloġija multilingwi fuq l-Alsatjan, lingwa reġjonali Franċiża u nipprovdu evalwazzjoni intrinsika tal-korrettezza tal-pari varjanti, u evalwazzjoni esterna fuq kompitu downstream. Aħna nuru li f’xenarju ta’ riżorsi baxxi, 145 par inizjali jistgħu jwasslu għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ 876 par varjanti addizzjonali, u tnaqqis fil-kliem OOV li jtejjeb il-prestazzjoni tat-tikkettar tal-parti tad-diskors b’1 sa 4 %.', 'kk': 'Стандартталмаған тілдер үшін reprezentative лингвистикалық ресурстар және NLP құрылғыларын құру қиындығы көмектеседі: мәлімет нормасы анықталмағанда, бірнеше жазылған пішімдері келтірілген сөз үшін табылады, сөздердің көп бөлігін к Бұл әртүрлі мәліметті қабылдау үшін біз көпшілікті альтернативті мәліметтерге негізделген методологияны келтіреміз, ООВ сөздерінің бірінің мәліметтерінен сәйкес келетін ережелерд Бұл жақсы процес эксперттік ережелердің анықтамасыз көп вариантты лексикандық көптегендіруді мүмкіндік береді. Біз алсатиян, француз тілінде бірнеше тілді методологияны қолдануға болады. Бұл параметрлердің дұрыстығын және төменгі тапсырманың сыртқы оқиғасын ішкі дұрыстығын көрсетеді. Біз төмен ресурстар сценариясында 145 инициализациялық екі 876 қосымша айнымалы екептерді құруға болады және OOV сөздері сөздерінің бөлігін 1-4% деп жақсартуға болады.', 'mn': 'Стандартгүй хэл дээр илэрхийлэгч хэлний нөөц болон NLP хэрэгслүүдийг бүтээх нь хэцүү байдаг. Хэрвээ бичлэгийг нормоор тодорхойлж чадахгүй бол олон бичил хэлбэрүүд өгөгдсөн үг дээр тооцож болно. Энэ олон янз бүрийг хүлээн зөвшөөрөхийн тулд бид олон нийтийн өөр өөр хэлбэрээр суурилсан арга загварыг OOV үгсийн нэг хэлбэртэй холбогдохын тулд хэрэглэгддэг дүрэм гаргахад санал өгдөг. Энэ сайн үйл явц мэргэжлийн дүрмийн тодорхойлолтгүй олон төрлийн лексиконуудыг дэвшүүлж чадна. Бид энэ олон хэлний методологийг алсатиан, Француз хэл дээр ашиглаж, өөр өөр хэлбэрүүдийн зөв байдлыг, доорх ажил дээр гадна дүгнэлт хийдэг. Бид маш бага нөөцийн хувилбарт 145 эхлэл хоёр нь 876 нэмэлт төрлийн хоёр хүртэл хүргэж чадна. Мөн ОOV үгнүүдийн хэсгийг 1-4 хувилбараар сайжруулж чадна.', 'no': 'Bygging av reprezentativ lingviske ressursar og NLP- verktøy for ikkje- standardiserte språk er vanskeleg. Når stavinga ikkje er bestemt av eit norm, kan fleire skrivne skjemar finna for eit gitt ord, som fører til ein stor andel av ikkje- ordbokstavar. For å bruka denne mangfolden, foreslår vi ein metodologi basert på crowdsourced alternative stavingar vi brukar for å pakka ut reglar som er brukte for å passa med OOV- ord med ein av stavingsvariantane sine. Denne virtuelle prosessen slår på at det ikkje er oppretta økning av fleire variant- leksikon utan ekspertregel- definisjon. Vi bruker denne fleirspråksmetodologien på alsatisk, ein fransk regional språk og gir ein intern evaluering av korrektet av variantparene, og ein ekstrinsk evaluering på ein nedstrekkoppgåve. Vi viser at i ei låg ressursscenario kan 145 initære par føre til generering av 876 ekstra variantpar, og ein minning av OOV-ord som forbetrar den delen av talemerkinga med 1 til 4%.', 'ms': 'Bina sumber bahasa mewakili dan alat NLP untuk bahasa tidak-standardisasi adalah menantang: apabila ejaan tidak ditentukan oleh norm, bentuk tulis berbilang boleh ditemui untuk perkataan yang diberi, menyebabkan proporsi besar perkataan luar-dari-vocabulari. Untuk memeluk kebanyakan ini, kami cadangkan metodologi berdasarkan ejaan alternatif crowdsourced yang kami gunakan untuk mengekstrak peraturan yang dilaksanakan untuk sepadan perkataan OOV dengan salah satu varian ejaan mereka. Proses baik ini membolehkan peningkatan leksikon berbilang-varian tanpa definisi peraturan pakar yang tidak diawasi. Kami melaksanakan metodologi berbilang bahasa ini pada bahasa Alsatian, bahasa kawasan Perancis dan menyediakan penilaian intrinsik tentang kebijaksanaan pasangan varian, dan penilaian extrinsic pada tugas turun. Kami menunjukkan bahawa dalam skenario sumber rendah, 145 pasangan inital boleh membawa kepada generasi 876 pasangan varian tambahan, dan penurunan perkataan OOV memperbaiki prestasi tag bahagian-ucapan dengan 1 hingga 4%.', 'pl': 'Budowanie reprezentatywnych zasobów językowych i narzędzi NLP dla języków niestandaryzowanych jest wyzwaniem: gdy pisownia nie jest określona przez normę, można spotkać wiele form pisemnych dla danego słowa, powodując dużą część słów poza słownictwem. Aby uwzględnić tę różnorodność, proponujemy metodologię opartą na alternatywnych pisowniach crowdsourcingowych, których używamy do wyodrębniania reguł stosowanych w celu dopasowania słów OOV do jednego z ich wariantów pisowni. Ten cnotliwy proces umożliwia bez nadzoru powiększanie wielowymiarowych leksykonów bez specjalistycznego definiowania reguł. Stosujemy tę wielojęzyczną metodologię na języku alsackim, francuskim języku regionalnym i zapewniamy wewnętrzną ocenę poprawności par wariantów, a także zewnętrzną ocenę dalszego zadania. Pokazujemy, że w scenariuszu niskiego zasobu pary początkowe 145 mogą prowadzić do generowania dodatkowych par wariantów 876 i zmniejszenia ilości słów OOV poprawiających wydajność tagowania części mowy o 1 do 4%.', 'ro': 'Construirea de resurse lingvistice reprezentative și instrumente PNL pentru limbi nestandardizate este o provocare: atunci când ortografia nu este determinată de o normă, se pot întâlni mai multe forme scrise pentru un anumit cuvânt, inducerea unei proporții mari de cuvinte care nu sunt din vocabular. Pentru a îmbrățișa această diversitate, propunem o metodologie bazată pe ortografii alternative crowdsourcing pe care o folosim pentru a extrage reguli aplicate pentru a potrivi cuvintele OOV cu una dintre variantele lor de ortografie. Acest proces virtuos permite mărirea nesupravegheată a lexicoanelor multi-variante fără definirea regulilor experților. Aplicăm această metodologie multilingvă pe Alsația, o limbă regională franceză și oferim o evaluare intrinsecă a corectitudinii perechilor de variante și o evaluare extrinsă pe o sarcină din aval. Aratăm că într-un scenariu cu resurse scăzute, 145 de perechi inițiale pot duce la generarea de 876 perechi de variante suplimentare și o diminuare a cuvintelor OOV îmbunătățind performanța etichetării părții de vorbire cu 1 până la 4%.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂාවික භාෂාව සහ NLP උපකරණය නොස්ටැන්ඩාර්ඩිස් භාෂාව සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනවා: සාමාන්\u200dය නිර්දේශයෙන් විශ්නයක් න අපි මේ විවිධානයක් අල්ලගන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න කරන්නේ වෙනස් විවිධානයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්න කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ ඔවුව් වචන වර්තනයක Name අපි අල්සාටියාන් වලින් භාෂාවික භාෂාව, ෆ්\u200dරැන්සියාන් භාෂාවක් වලින් අවශ්\u200dය විදියට අවශ්\u200dය විදියට අවශ්\u200dය විදියට පරීක්ෂ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ නිම්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින්, 145 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් 876 වලින් වෙනස් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ වචන', 'so': 'Bulshada macluumaadka luuqadaha ku qoran iyo qalabka NLP ee luuqadaha aan la standardisey waa dhibaatooyin: marka aan ku qornayn qorniinka waxaa loola kulmi karaa noocyo badan oo qoraal ah oo eray la qoray, wuxuuna soo bandhigi karaa qayb badan oo aan qoraal ahayn. Si aan u qabsado noocyo kala duduwan, waxaynu soo jeedinnaa qaabab ku saleysan hadallo kala duwan oo aan u isticmaalno si aan u soo bixino sharciyada loo codsado si ay ugu matchaan hadallada OOV oo mid ka mid ah bedelka ku qoran. Shaqooyinkan wanaagsanu waxay awoodaa in la kordhiyo lexicada kala duwan oo aan la aqoonsan sharci gaar ah. Dhakhtarkaas luuqadaha kala duduwan ayaannu ku isticmaalnaa Alsatian, luuqada faransiiska ah, waxaana lagu siinaynaa qiimeyn hoos u ah saxda labada noocyo oo kala duwan, iyo qiimeynta dibadda ah oo ku qoran shaqada hoose. Waxaynu muujinaynaa in 145 labo inital ah ay ku hoggaami karaan abuuridda 876 labo oo kala duwan oo kala duduwan, iyo hoos u dhigid hadalka OV oo kordhinaya qayb ka mid ah hadal tagging waxay ku socon karaan 1-4 boqolkiiba.', 'sr': 'Izgradavanje reprezentativnih jezičkih resursa i NLP alata za ne standardizovane jezike je izazovno: kada se pismo ne određuje norm a, mogu se susresti sa višestrukim napisanim oblicima za određenu reč, što dovodi do velike proporcije nečije reči. Da bi prihvatili ovu raznolikost, predlažemo metodologiju baziranu na društvenim alternativnim pravljenjima koje koristimo da izvučemo pravila primjenjene za odgovarajuće riječima OOV sa jednim od njihovih varijanata pisanja. Ovaj plemeniti proces omogućava nepotrebnu povećanju multivariantnih leksiona bez definicije stručnih pravila. Mi primjenjujemo ovu multijezičku metodologiju na Alsatijanskom, francuskom regionalnom jeziku i pružamo unutrašnju procjenu ispravnosti parova varijanta i ekstrinske procjene na sledećem zadatku. Pokazujemo da u scenariju niskog resursa 145 inicijalnih parova mogu dovesti do generacije 876 dodatnih parova varijanta, i smanjenje riječi OOV-a koji poboljšavaju učinkovitost označavanja govora za 1 do 4%.', 'sv': 'Att bygga representativa språkresurser och NLP-verktyg för icke-standardiserade språk är en utmaning: när stavning inte bestäms av en norm kan flera skriftliga former hittas för ett givet ord, vilket framkallar en stor andel ord som inte är ordförråd. För att omfamna denna mångfald föreslår vi en metod baserad på crowdsourcing alternativa stavningar som vi använder för att extrahera regler som tillämpas för att matcha OOV ord med en av deras stavningsvarianter. Denna goda process möjliggör oövervakad ökning av flervariantlexikon utan expertregeldefinition. Vi tillämpar denna flerspråkiga metodik på Alsacia, ett franskt regionalt språk och ger en inneboende utvärdering av variationsparens korrekthet, och en extern utvärdering av en nedströmsuppgift. Vi visar att i ett lågresursscenario kan 145 initala par leda till att 876 ytterligare variantpar skapas, och en minskning av OOV-ord förbättrar prestandan för att tagga del av tal med 1 till 4%.', 'ta': 'நிலையான மொழிகளுக்கான பிரதிநிதியாளர் மொழிகளை உருவாக்குதல் மற்றும் NLP கருவிகள் சவால் செய்கிறது: சொல்லை வழக்கமாக தீர்மானிக்கப்படாத போது, பல எழுத்துரு வடிவங்கள் க இந்த பல்வேறு வித்தியாசத்தை ஏற்றுக்கொள்வதற்கு, நாம் ஒரு முறைமையை மக்கள் மூலம் மூலம் மாற்று சொற்களை அடிப்படையில் உபயோகிக்கிறோம் விதிகள இந்த நல்ல பணி நாம் இந்த பல மொழி முறைமையை அல்சாசியன் மீது, ஒரு பிரெஞ்சு வட்டார மொழியில் பயன்படுத்தி மாறி ஜோடிகளின் சரியான மதிப்பினை கொடுக்கிறோம், மற்றும் கீழ நாம் குறைந்த மூலத்தின் காட்சியில், 145 துவக்க ஜோடி 876 கூடுதல் ஜோடி உருவாக்கத்தை காண்பிக்க முடியும், மற்றும் OV வார்த்தைகளின் குறைவு, பேச்சு ஒட்ட', 'ur': 'غیر استاندارڈیز زبانوں کے لئے نمائندس زبان کے رسولوں اور NLP ابزار بنانے کا مشکل ہے: جب اسپڑھنے کو ایک عام سے مقرر نہیں کیا جاتا تو بہت سی لکھی فرموں کو ایک لکھی لکھی ہوئی لکھی بات کے لئے مل سکتے ہیں اور بہت بڑی مقدار لکھی ہوئی لکھی باتوں کی۔ ہم اس مختلف طریقہ کو قبول کرنے کے لئے ایک طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو جماعت کی مختلف طریقوں پر بنیاد ہے کہ ہم ان کے ایک طریقہ پر استعمال کرتے ہیں جو OOV کلمات کے مطابق استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں۔ یہ اچھی پروسس مختلف متفاوت لکسونز کی غیر قانون کی تعریف کے بغیر قانون کے متفاوت کی افزایش کو امکان دیتا ہے. ہم آلسایٹی پر ایک فرانسوی منطقی زبان کے بارے میں یہ بہت سی زبان کی روش لازم کرتے ہیں اور مختلف جوڑوں کی سیدھی ارزیابی کے بارے میں ایک خارجی ارزیابی ادا کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ایک کم منبع سناریو میں، 145 پیدائش جوڑے 876 اضافہ متفاوت جوڑوں کی نسل کو پہنچا سکتے ہیں، اور OOV کلمات کی کمی کی بات ٹیگ کے ایک حصہ سے 1-4%.', 'uz': "Name Bu tarqatishni qabul qilish uchun, biz jamoatlar uchun boshqa imkoniyatlar asosida qoidalarni chiqarish uchun qoidalar qoidadan qoʻllaniladi va ularning imkoniyatlaridan biri oʻzgarishga qoʻllaniladi. @ info Biz bu bir necha tillar metodini Alsatiyaga qo'llayapmiz, Fransuz regional tillariga qo'llamiz va varianlarning toʻgʻri haqida qiymatga ega qilamiz, va cheksiz vazifani o'qiymatimiz. We show that in a low-resource scenario, 145 inital pairs can lead to the generation of 876 additional variant pairs, and a diminution of OOV words improving the part-of-speech tagging performance by 1 to 4%.", 'vi': 'Việc xây dựng các nguồn ngôn ngữ đại diện và công cụ ngôn ngữ không chuẩn bị là một thử thách: khi đánh vần không được xác định bởi quy tắc, có thể tìm thấy nhiều chữ viết trong một từ, dẫn đến một phần lớn từ ngoài ngôn từ. Để áp dụng sự khác biệt này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp dựa trên những phát âm xoay xở bằng cách trích xuất các quy tắc được áp dụng để khớp với các từ OOOV với các biến thể phát âm của chúng. Phương pháp tiết thiện này cho phép tăng trưởng chưa được giám sát các ngôn ngữ đa biến thể mà không có định nghĩa luật chuyên gia. Chúng tôi áp dụng phương pháp đa dạng này trên vùng Alsatian, một ngôn ngữ thuộc địa Pháp và cung cấp một bài đánh giá tự nhiên về sự hiệu quả của các biến thể, và một bài đánh giá tứ chi về một nhiệm vụ xuôi dòng. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng trong một kịch bản ít tài nguyên, cặp đất nhỏ 145 có thể dẫn đến sản xuất ra các cặp thể loại 8Thank thêm, và một sự giảm bớt các từ OOOV cải thiện hiệu ứng cách nói bằng cách 1-4 Name', 'da': 'Det er en udfordring at opbygge repræsentative sproglige ressourcer og NLP-værktøjer til ikke-standardiserede sprog: Når stavning ikke bestemmes af en norm, kan der stødes på flere skriftlige former for et givet ord, hvilket fremkalder en stor del af ord, der ikke er ordforråd. For at omfavne denne mangfoldighed foreslår vi en metode baseret på crowdsourcerede alternative stavemåder, som vi bruger til at udtrække regler, der anvendes til at matche OOV ord med en af deres stavemådevarianter. Denne dydige proces muliggør ikke-overvåget udvidelse af multi-variant leksikoner uden ekspert regeldefinition. Vi anvender denne flersprogede metode på Alsace, et fransk regionalsprog og giver en iboende evaluering af korrektheden af varianterne par, og en ekstern evaluering af en downstream opgave. Vi viser, at 145 initale par i et scenario med lav ressource kan føre til generering af 876 ekstra variantpar og en reduktion af OOV ord, der forbedrer dele af tale tagging ydeevne med 1 til 4%.', 'bg': 'Изграждането на представителни езикови ресурси и инструменти за НЛП за нестандартни езици е предизвикателство: когато правописът не се определя от норма, за дадена дума могат да се срещнат множество писмени форми, предизвиквайки голяма част от думи извън речника. За да приемем това разнообразие, предлагаме методология, базирана на алтернативни правописи, които използваме за извличане на правила, прилагани за съвпадение на думи с един от техните правописни варианти. Този добродетелен процес позволява неконтролирано увеличаване на многовариантни лексикони без експертно определение на правилото. Ние прилагаме тази многоезична методология на алсатийски, френски регионален език и предоставяме вътрешна оценка на коректността на двойките варианти и външна оценка на задача надолу по веригата. Показваме, че при сценарий с нисък ресурс 145 инитални двойки могат да доведат до генериране на 876 допълнителни вариантни двойки и намаляване на думите, подобряващи ефективността на маркирането на част от речта с 1 до 4%.', 'nl': 'Het bouwen van representatieve taalbronnen en NLP-tools voor niet-gestandaardiseerde talen is een uitdaging: wanneer spelling niet wordt bepaald door een norm, kunnen meerdere geschreven vormen voor een bepaald woord worden tegengekomen, waardoor een groot deel van woorden buiten de woordenschat wordt veroorzaakt. Om deze diversiteit te omarmen, stellen we een methodologie voor die gebaseerd is op crowdsourcing alternatieve spellingen die we gebruiken om regels te extraheren die worden toegepast om OOV-woorden te matchen met een van hun spellingsvarianten. Dit deugdelijke proces maakt het mogelijk om zonder toezicht multi-variant lexicons uit te breiden zonder expert rule definition. We passen deze meertalige methodologie toe op het Elzasser, een Franse regionale taal en bieden een intrinsieke evaluatie van de juistheid van de varianten paren, en een extrinsieke evaluatie op een downstream taak. We tonen aan dat in een scenario met weinig resources 145 initiale paren kunnen leiden tot het genereren van 876 extra variantparen, en een verkleining van OOV-woorden die de prestaties van het taggen van delen van spraak met 1 tot 4%.', 'hr': 'Izgradavanje reprezentativnih jezičkih resursa i NLP alata za ne standardizirane jezike je izazovno: kada se pismo ne određuje norm a, mogu se susresti s višestrukim napisanim oblicima za određenu riječ, što dovodi do velike dijelove izvan riječi. Da bi prihvatili ovu raznolikost, predlažemo metodologiju na temelju crowdsourced alternativnih pravljenja koje koristimo za izvlačenje pravila primjenjene za odgovaranje riječi OOV-a s jednim od njihovih varianta pisanja. Ovaj vrhunski proces omogućava nepotrebnu povećanju multivariantnih leksiona bez definicije stručnih pravila. Mi primjenjujemo ovu multijezičku metodologiju na Alsatijanskom, francuskom regionalnom jeziku i pružamo unutrašnju procjenu ispravnosti parova varijanta i ekstriničke procjene na potpunom zadatku. Pokazujemo da u scenariju niskog resursa 145 inicijalnih parova mogu dovesti do generacije 876 dodatnih parova varijanta, i smanjenje riječi OOV-a koji poboljšavaju učinkovitost označavanja govora za 1 do 4%.', 'de': 'Der Aufbau repräsentativer linguistischer Ressourcen und NLP-Tools für nicht standardisierte Sprachen ist eine Herausforderung: Wenn die Rechtschreibung nicht durch eine Norm bestimmt wird, können mehrere Schriftformen für ein bestimmtes Wort gefunden werden, was einen großen Anteil an Wörtern hervorruft, die außerhalb des Wortschatzes liegen. Um diese Vielfalt zu berücksichtigen, schlagen wir eine Methodik vor, die auf alternativen Crowdsourcing-Schreibweisen basiert, die wir verwenden, um Regeln zu extrahieren, die angewendet werden, um OOV-Wörter mit einer ihrer Schreibvarianten abzugleichen. Dieser tugendhafte Prozess ermöglicht die unbeaufsichtigte Erweiterung von Mehrvarianten-Lexikonen ohne fachkundige Regeldefinition. Wir wenden diese mehrsprachige Methodik auf Elsässisch an, eine französische Regionalsprache und liefern eine intrinsische Bewertung der Korrektheit der Variantenpaare sowie eine extrinsische Bewertung auf eine nachgelagerte Aufgabe. Wir zeigen, dass in einem ressourcenarmen Szenario 145-Initialpaare zur Generierung zusätzlicher 876-Variantenpaare und zu einer Verringerung der OOV-Wörter führen können, die die Sprachteiltagging-Leistung um 1 bis 4%.', 'ko': '비표준화된 언어를 위해 대표적인 언어 자원과 NLP 도구를 구축하는 것은 도전이다. 맞춤법이 규범에 의해 결정되지 않을 때 주어진 단어는 여러 가지 서면 형식을 만나 대량의 어휘표 밖의 단어를 만날 수 있다.이러한 다양성을 포옹하기 위해 우리는 맞춤법 대신 패키지를 기반으로 하는 방법을 제시했다. 우리는 이를 이용하여 규칙을 추출하여 OOV 단어와 맞춤법 변체 중 하나를 일치시킨다.이런 양성 과정은 전문가의 규칙 정의 없이 다변체 어휘를 감독 없이 확충할 수 있다.우리는 이러한 다언어 방법을 프랑스어 지역 언어인 알사스어에 응용하고 변체의 정확성에 대해 내재적인 평가를 하고 하류 임무에 대해 외재적인 평가를 할 것이다.우리는 저자원 상황에서 145개의 초기 쌍은 876개의 추가 변체 쌍을 생성할 수 있고 OOV 단어를 줄여 어성 표기 성능을 1%에서 4%로 높일 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.', 'fa': 'ساختن منابع زبان\u200cشناسی و ابزارهای NLP برای زبان\u200cهای غیر استاندارد مشکل است: زمانی که نوشتن توسط یک نورمی مقرر نمی\u200cشود، فرم\u200cهای نوشته\u200cای برای یک کلمه معلوم می\u200cشود، با وجود اندازه\u200cای بزرگ از کلمات غیر از کلمات\u200cشناسی مشکل می\u200cشود. برای تحمل این مختلفی، ما یک روش پیشنهاد می کنیم که بر اساس طلسم های مختلفی از جمعیت استفاده می کنیم تا قانون استفاده کنیم که به کلمات OOV با یکی از متغیرات نوشتن آنها برخورد کنند. این فرایند شایسته را بدون تعریف قانون متخصص به افزایش قانون چندین متفاوت اجازه می دهد. ما این روش\u200cشناسی چندین زبان را روی آلساتین، یک زبان منطقه فرانسوی استفاده می\u200cکنیم و یک ارزیابی داخلی از درستی جفت\u200cهای متفاوت و یک ارزیابی خارجی روی یک کار پایین پایین می\u200cدهیم. ما نشان می دهیم که در یک سناریو کم منابع، 145 جفت ابتدایی می توانند به نسل 876 جفت متفاوت اضافه و کاهش کلمات OOV که پاره\u200cای از نشان\u200cدهندگان سخنرانی را با 1 تا 4 درصد بهتر می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Kujenga rasilimali za lugha na zana za NLP kwa lugha zisizo za kawaida zinachangamoto: wakati uandishi hautawaliwa na utamaduni, aina mbalimbali za kuandikwa zinaweza kukutana kwa neno fulani, na kusababisha idadi kubwa ya maneno yasiyo ya lugha. Ili kukubaliana na tofauti hii, tunapendekeza mbinu zinazotumiwa na maneno mbadala yanayotumiwa ili kutengeneza sheria zinazotumika kupambana na maneno ya OOV kwa moja ya mabadiliko yao ya kusoma. Mchakato huu mzuri unawezesha kuongezeka kwa lexico mbalimbali bila utawala wa wataalam. Tunatumia mbinu hii ya lugha mbalimbali kwenye lugha ya Alsatia, lugha ya Kifaransa ya maeneo na kutoa tathmini ya kina ya uhakika wa wanandoa tofauti, na tathmini za nje kwenye kazi ya mto. Tunaonyesha kwamba katika kipindi cha rasilimali chini, wanandoa 145 wanaweza kusababisha uzalishaji wa wanandoa tofauti wa 876, na kupungua kwa maneno ya OOV yanayoweza kuboresha sehemu ya utendaji wa mazungumzo kwa asilimia 1 hadi 4.', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk başarmayan diller üçin reprezentan dil çeşmeleri we NLP aletleri bejermek kynçylyk däldir: eger imläge norm tarapyndan karar edilmedi bolsa, birnäçe ýazylan biçimler berilen söz üçin görülebilir, sözlerden daşary bir bölüme üýtget edip biler. Bu näçeşitligini kabul etmek üçin, köpüräk seçenekli sözlerine daýanýan bir metodologiýa OOV sözlerini a ýlamak üçin ullanýarys. Bu beýik proses ukyply kural definisyonsyz multi-wariant leksiýasyny gaýd edip bilýär. Biz bu multi dil metodologiýany alsatçy, fransuz dilinde we çeşitli çiftleriň dogrylygyny we a şak täzelikde bir çözüm bar. Biz esasy küçük resurslar senarynda, 145 iniş çift sanynyň 876 sany goşly wariant çift döredigini görkezip biler we OOV sözleriniň azalyşyny 1 we 4%.', 'am': 'የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች መብት እና የNLP ቋንቋዎች መሣሪያዎች መቀናቀል ነው፤ የቃላት መጻሕፍት በተወሰነ ጊዜ፣ በተለየ ቃል በብዙ ጽሑፎች ፎርማቶች ለመገናኘት ይችላል፡፡ ይህንን ልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት ለመቀበል፣ በጉዳዩ ቋንቋዎች ላይ በተለየ የOV ቃላት በማንኛውም የቃላት መለያየት ለመቀበል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ይህ መልካም ፕሮጀክት በብዙ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ሊክሲኮኖችን በሙሉ ውይይት በማይጠበቅ ማደጋገሚያ ይችላል፡፡ ይህ በብዙ ቋንቋ ማድረግ በአልዜዛዊ፣ ፈረንሳይኛ አካባቢ ቋንቋ እና የልዩ ዓይነቶችን አስተካክል እና በአውራው ስራ ላይ የውጭ ማረጋገጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ We show that in a low-resource scenario, 145 inital pairs can lead to the generation of 876 additional variant pairs, and a diminution of OOV words improving the part-of-speech tagging performance by 1 to 4%.', 'hy': 'Խնդիչ է ստեղծել ոչ ստանդարտիզացված լեզուների ներկայացուցիչ լեզվական ռեսուրսներ և ՆԼՊ գործիքներ: Երբ գրավորումը նորմայով չի որոշվում, կարող է բառի համար բազմաթիվ գրավոր ձևեր հայտնվել, որոնք առաջացնում են բառերից դուրս բառերի մեծ մասը: To embrace this diversity, we propose a methodology based on crowdsourced alternative spellings we use to extract rules applied to match OOV words with one of their spelling variants.  Այս բարի գործընթացը հնարավորություն է տալիս բազմատարբեր լեքսիկոնների անվերահսկված աճը առանց մասնագետ կանոնների սահմանման: Մենք կիրառում ենք այս բազմալեզու մեթոդոլոգիան ալսատիացի, ֆրանսիացի ռեզոնալ լեզվի վրա և տրամադրում ենք բազմալեզուների ճշգրիտության ներքին գնահատականը և արտաքին գնահատականը հետագա խնդրի վրա: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ցածր ռեսուրսներ ունեցող սցենարիայում 145 սկզբնական զույգ կարող է հանգեցնել ավելացած 87-6 տարբերակային զույգերի սերունդ, և OOO բառերի նվազում՝ բարելավելով խոսքի մասի նշանակությունը 1-4 տոկոսով:', 'af': "Bou reprezentante lingwisiese hulpbronne en NLP-nutsprogramme vir nie-standardiseerde tale is uitgelê: wanneer speletjie nie deur 'n norm bepaal word nie, veelvuldige skryfe vorms kan ontmoet word vir 'n gegewe woord, wat 'n groot proporsie van uitwoorde woorde verkondig. Om hierdie verskeidigheid te aangryp, voorstel ons 'n metodologie gebaseer op verskeidige alternatiewe speletjies wat ons gebruik word om reëls uitpak te maak om OOV woorde te ooreenstem met een van hulle speletjie variante. Hierdie vreugde proses aktiveer die ongeondersteunde boonstelling van multivariante leksikone sonder ekspertiese reël definisie. Ons wend hierdie multilinglike metodologie op Alsatian, 'n Frans regionale taal en verskaf 'n intrinsiese evaluering van die korrekheid van die variante paar, en 'n ekstrinsiese evaluering op 'n onderstreem taak. Ons wys dat in 'n lae hulpbron scenario, 145 aanvanklike paar kan lei na die generasie van 876 addisionele variante paar, en 'n verkleining van OOV woorde wat die deel van spraak-etiketting-prestasie by 1 tot 4%.", 'sq': 'Ndërtimi i burimeve gjuhësore përfaqësuese dhe mjeteve NLP për gjuhët jo të standartizuara është sfidues: kur ortografia nuk përcaktohet nga një norm ë, mund të gjenden formë të shumta të shkruara për një fjalë të caktuar, duke induktuar një pjesë të madhe të fjalëve jashtë fjalorëve. Për të përqafuar këtë diversitet, ne propozojmë një metodologji bazuar në ortografi të përdorura me shumicë alternative që përdorim për të nxjerrë rregullat e aplikuara për të përputhur fjalët OOV me një nga variantet e tyre të ortografisë. Ky proces virtuoz mundëson rritjen e pa mbikqyrur e lexikoneve shumëvariante pa përcaktimin e rregullave eksperte. We apply this multilingual methodology on Alsatian, a French regional language and provide an intrinsic evaluation of the correctness of the variants pairs, and an extrinsic evaluation on a downstream task.  Ne tregojmë se në një skenar me burime të ulëta, 145 çifte fillestare mund të çojnë në gjeneratën e 876 çifteve të tjera variante dhe një zvogëlim të fjalëve OOV duke përmirësuar paraqitjen e shënimit të pjesës së fjalës me 1 deri 4%.', 'id': 'Building representative linguistic resources and NLP tools for non-standardized languages is challenging: when spelling is not determined by a norm, multiple written forms can be encountered for a given word, inducing a large proportion of out-of-vocabulary words.  Untuk menerima keagamaan ini, kami mengusulkan metodologi berdasarkan mantra alternatif crowdsourced yang kami gunakan untuk mengekstrak aturan yang dilaksanakan untuk cocok kata OOV dengan salah satu varian mantra mereka. This virtuous process enables the unsupervised augmentation of multi-variant lexicons without expert rule definition.  Kami menerapkan metodologi berbilang bahasa ini pada bahasa Alsatian, bahasa daerah Perancis dan menyediakan evaluasi intrinsik tentang kebenaran pasangan varian, dan evaluasi ekstrinsik pada tugas turun. Kami menunjukkan bahwa dalam skenario sumber daya rendah, 145 pasangan inital dapat menyebabkan generasi 876 pasangan varian tambahan, dan penurunan kata-kata OOV memperbaiki prestasi tagging bagian dari pidato dengan 1 sampai 4%.', 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক ভাষার প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধি ভাষার সম্পদ নির্মাণ করা এবং এনএলপি টুল বিষয়টি চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে: যখন বানানোর স্বাক্ষর নির্ধারিত না হয়, তখন একটি নির্দিষ্ট শ এই বৈচিত্র্যের বৈচিত্র্য বানানোর ভিত্তিক একটি পদ্ধতিতে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি যা আমরা ব্যবহার করি তাদের বানানোর বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন বি এই ভালো প্রক্রিয়া বিশেষজ্ঞ নিয়ম নির্ধারণ ছাড়াই বহুভিন্ন লেক্সিকোন লেক্সিকোর সংরক্ষিত বৃদ্ধি প্রক্রিয়া  We apply this multilingual methodology on Alsatian, a French regional language and provide an intrinsic evaluation of the correctness of the variants pairs, and an extrinsic evaluation on a downstream task.  আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে একটি কম সম্পদের দৃশ্যে ১৪৫ সামান্য জোড়া তৈরি করতে পারে যে ৮৭৬ সালের আরো বিভিন্ন জোড়া তৈরি করতে পারে, আর ওভি শব্দের কমিয়ে দিতে পারে যে ভাষণের অং', 'az': 'Standardılı dili olmayan dillər üçün müəyyən dil kaynaqlarını və NLP vasitələrini inşa etmək çətindir: imzalamaq norm ilə təyin edilmədiyi zaman, çoxlu yazılı formlar belə bir söz üçün qarşılaşa bilər, böyük sözlərin çoxluğunu təşkil edə bilər. Bu cürbəcür müxtəlif sözləri qəbul etmək üçün, çoxlu alternatif sözlərə dayanan bir metodoloji təklif edirik ki, OOV sözlərinin bir dəyişikliklərinə uyğun qaydalarını çıxartmaq üçün istifadə edirik. Bu yaxşı işlər müxtəlif qayda tərzi olmadan çoxlu variasiyonların çoxluğunu artırmağa qadir edir. Biz bu çoxlu dil metodolojisini Alsatiyalı, Fransız bölgesi dildə istifadə edirik və varislərin çiftlərin doğruluğunu və a şağı bir işdə ekstrinsici değerlendirməyi təmin edirik. Biz göstəririk ki, düşük kaynaqlar scenariosində 145 başlanğıç çift 876 artıq variant çift nəsilə yol a çar və OOV sözlərinin bir parçasını 1-4 ilə yaxşılaşdırar.', 'bs': 'Izgradavanje reprezentativnih jezičkih resursa i NLP alata za ne standardizovane jezike je izazovno: kada se pismo ne određuje norm a, mogu se susresti sa višestrukim napisanim oblicima za određenu riječ, izrađujući veliku proporciju riječi bez riječi. Da bi prihvatili ovu raznolikost, predlažemo metodologiju baziranu na crowdsourced alternative spellings koje koristimo da izvučemo pravila primjenjene za odgovaranje OOV riječi sa jednim od njihovih varijanata pisanja. Ovaj pristojan proces omogućava nepotrebnu povećanju multivariantnih leksiona bez definicije stručnih pravila. Mi primjenjujemo ovu multijezičku metodologiju na Alsatijanskom, francuskom regionalnom jeziku i pružamo unutrašnju procjenu ispravnosti parova varijanta i ekstriničke procjene na sledećem zadatku. Pokazujemo da u scenariju niskog resursa 145 inicijalnih parova mogu dovesti do generacije 876 dodatnih parova varijanta, i smanjenje riječi OOV-a koji poboljšavaju učinkovitost označavanja govora za 1 do 4%.', 'et': 'Representatiivsete keeleliste ressursside ja NLP vahendite loomine mittestandardsetele keeltele on keeruline: kui õigekirja ei määra norm, võib konkreetse sõna puhul leida mitu kirjalikku vormi, mis tekitab suure osa sõnavara väljaspool olevatest sõnadest. Selle mitmekesisuse omaks võtmiseks pakume välja metoodika, mis põhineb ühisõnalistel alternatiivsetel õigekirjadel, mida kasutame reeglite väljavõtmiseks, mida rakendatakse OOV sõnade sobitamiseks ühe nende õigekirjavariandiga. See vooruslik protsess võimaldab mitmevariantsete leksikonide järelevalveta suurendada ilma ekspertreeglite määratlemiseta. Me rakendame seda mitmekeelset metoodikat prantsuse piirkondlikus keeles Alsatia keeles ja anname sisulise hinnangu variantide paaride õigsusele ja välishinnangu järgmise etapi ülesandele. Näitame, et vähese ressursiga stsenaariumi korral võib 145 algpaari põhjustada 876 täiendava variandipaari loomist ja OOV sõnade vähenemist, parandades kõneosa sildistamise jõudlust 1–4%.', 'fi': 'Edustavien kieliresurssien ja NLP-työkalujen rakentaminen ei-standardoiduille kielille on haastavaa: kun oikeinkirjoitusta ei määritetä normin mukaan, tietylle sanalle voidaan löytää useita kirjallisia muotoja, mikä aiheuttaa suuren osan sanaston ulkopuolisista sanoista. Tämän monimuotoisuuden huomioon ottamiseksi ehdotamme menetelmää, joka perustuu joukkoihin perustuviin vaihtoehtoisiin oikeinkirjoituksiin, joiden avulla poimimme sääntöjä, joilla OOV-sanat sovitetaan yhteen niiden oikeinkirjoitusvarianteista. Tämä virtuaalinen prosessi mahdollistaa monimuotoisten sanastojen valvomattoman lisäämisen ilman asiantuntijasääntöjen määrittelyä. Sovellamme tätä monikielistä metodologiaa ranskan aluekieleen Alsatiaan ja annamme luontaisen arvion varianttiparien oikeellisuudesta sekä ulkoisen arvioinnin jatkovaiheen tehtävästä. Osoitamme, että vähävaraisessa skenaariossa 145 alkuparia voi johtaa 876 muunnosparin syntymiseen ja OOV-sanojen vähenemiseen, mikä parantaa puheen osan taggingin suorituskykyä 1–4%.', 'cs': 'Vytváření reprezentativních jazykových zdrojů a nástrojů NLP pro nestandardizované jazyky je náročné: pokud není pravopis určen normou, lze se setkat s více písemnými formami pro dané slovo, což vyvolá velký podíl slov mimo slovní zásobu. Abychom tuto rozmanitost využili, navrhujeme metodiku založenou na crowdsourcingových alternativních pravopisech, které používáme k extrakci pravidel použitých pro porovnání OOV slov s jednou z jejich variant pravopisu. Tento praktický proces umožňuje bez dohledu rozšíření vícevariantních slovníků bez odborné definice pravidel. Tuto vícejazyčnou metodiku aplikujeme na Alsaštinu, francouzský regionální jazyk a poskytujeme vnitřní hodnocení správnosti párů variant a extrinzické hodnocení na následný úkol. Ukázali jsme, že ve scénáři s nízkými zdroji mohou 145 initální páry vést k generování 876 dalších variantních párů a snížení OOV slov zlepšení výkonu tagování části řeči o 1 až 4%.', 'ca': "Construir recursos lingüístics representatius i eines NLP per llengües no estandaritzats és difícil: quan l'ortografia no està determinada per una norm a, es poden trobar múltiples formes escrites per una paraula dada, induint una gran proporció de paraules fora de vocabulari. Per tal d'acceptar aquesta diversitat, proposem una metodologia basada en ortografies alternatives crowdsourced que utilitzem per extrair les regles aplicades per combinar les paraules OOV amb una de les seves variants ortografies. Aquest procés virtuós permet l'augmentació sense supervisió de lexicòns multivariants sense definició de normes expertes. We apply this multilingual methodology on Alsatian, a French regional language and provide an intrinsic evaluation of the correctness of the variants pairs, and an extrinsic evaluation on a downstream task.  Mostrem que en un escenari de baix recursos, 145 parells initals poden portar a la generació de 876 parells de variants adicionals, i una disminució de paraules OOV millorant el rendiment de la part de la xerrada d'etiquetes d'un 1 al 4%.", 'ha': "An ƙiƙiro masu tsarin manyan harshenka da zanen NLP wa lugha waɗand a ba'a daidaita su ba yana mai zartar da: Idan ba a ƙayyade fassarar magana ba na da tsarin rubutu, za'a haɗa wasu former masu rubutu wa maganar da aka ba'a wani, kuma yana ƙara rabo mai girma na magana wanda ba'a yi wa-magana ba. To, dõmin a karɓi wannan bakwai, Munã buɗa wata metode a kan salon da aka danne wasu fassarar masu da aka rufe wa umarni, da kuma za mu yi amfani da su dõmin ka fitar masu buƙatan da za'a yi amfani da su sami maganar OOV da ɗayan variants na fassararsu. This virtuous process enables the unsupervised augmentation of multi-variant lexicons without expert rule definition.  Kana amfani da wannan hanyoyin mulki-lingui a kan Alsasiya, harshen faransa na faransa kuma ana samar da rabon gaske ga mutane da suka mutane, da wata ƙaddara na ƙaranci a kan wani aikin na ƙarami. Tuna nũna cewa, a cikin wani wuri-resource, 145 nau'i biyu masu iya ƙaranci kan zaɓen nau'in 876 dabam-dabam, da ƙaramin saurin OOV, yana ƙaranci ga rabon-magana tagtaging game da 1-4%.", 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness kanggo mbewat kanggo ngilanggar urip iki, kita supoyo sistem sing basa perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo ingkang supoyo urip bantuan kanggo nggawe barang OOOOOOOji karo perusahaan langgar sampeyan urip. section Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sistem multilanggar kanggo Alsatên, kaya nguasar Perancis kuwi nggawe tarjamahan kanggo kalagayut nggawe barang langgar sampeyan karo perusahaan sampeyan, lan nggawe barang langgar sampeyan kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan. Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan kelompok ing perusahaan, kawula-perusahaan tanggal kuwi kawit karo perusahaan tanggal wajilah', 'he': 'בניית משאבים שפותיים מייצגים וכלי NLP לשפות לא סטנדרטיזציות זה מאתגר: כאשר האיתוי לא נקבע על ידי נורמה, אפשר להיפגש בצורות כתבות רבות למילה מסוימת, בעורר נתיב גדול של מילים מחוץ לאומיות. כדי לאמץ את המגווון הזה, אנו מציעים מטדולוגיה מבוססת על איפוסים אלטרנטיביים מקורשים קהל שאנחנו משתמשים כדי לחלץ חוקים שמשתמשים כדי להתאים מילים OOV לאחד מהשונים של איפוסים שלהם. התהליך הטוב הזה מאפשר הגדלה ללא השגחה של לקסיקונים רבים שונים ללא הגדרת חוקים מומחים. אנו משתמשים במטדולוגיה רבת-שפותית זו על אלסאטית, שפה אזורית צרפתית ומספקים עריכה פנימית של תקינות הזוגים של השינויים, והעריכה חיצונית על משימה למטה. אנחנו מראים שבתרחיש של משאבים נמוכים, 145 זוגות אינטליות יכולות להוביל לדור של 876 זוגות שונים נוספים, ופחות של מילים OOV משתפרות את ההפעה של החלק של הדיבורים בתגים על ידי 1-4%.', 'sk': 'Izgradnja reprezentativnih jezikovnih virov in orodij NLP za nestandardizirane jezike je zahtevna: kadar črkovanja ne določa norma, se za določeno besedo lahko naleti na več pisnih oblik, kar povzroči velik delež besed, ki niso besedišča. Da bi sprejeli to raznolikost, predlagamo metodologijo, ki temelji na množičnih alternativnih črkovanjih, s katerimi izvlečemo pravila, ki se uporabljajo za ujemanje OOV besed z eno od njihovih črkovalnih različic. Ta kreten proces omogoča nenadzorovano povečanje večvariantnih leksikonov brez strokovne opredelitve pravil. To večjezično metodologijo uporabljamo na alzacijskem, francoskem regionalnem jeziku in zagotavljamo notranjo vrednotenje pravilnosti parov variant ter zunanjo vrednotenje nadaljnje naloge. Pokazali smo, da lahko v scenariju z nizkimi viri 145 začetnih parov povzroči ustvarjanje 876 dodatnih parov različic, zmanjšanje besed OOV pa izboljša učinkovitost označevanja dela govora za 1 do 4%.', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་འདི་ལ་མཚོན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་NLP ལག་ཆ་དག་གི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེ་བ་རེད། འུ་ཅག་གི་སྣ་ཚོགས་འདི་ལ་རྗེས་སུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་གཅིག་གནང་བ་ཡོད་པའི་གཞན་རྗེས་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱས་ཏེ། This virtuous process enables the unsupervised augmentation of multi-variant lexicons without expert rule definition. ང་ཚོས་ཨཱལ་སྐད་ཡིག་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་དག་གླེང་སྐད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དུས་རྐྱེན་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གི་མིང་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་145 རིམ་གྱི་སྐྱེས་ཆེན་ཉུང་ཡིན་པ་ཚོ་ཡང་876 རིགས་གཟུགས་རྗེས་སུ་འབྱུང་བ་ཡིན། OOV ཡི་གཟུགས་ཚི'}
{'en': 'Neural Feature Extraction for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'ar': 'استخراج الميزة العصبية للكشف عن المشاعر السياقية', 'pt': 'Extração de recursos neurais para detecção de emoções contextuais', 'fr': "Extraction de caractéristiques neuronales pour la détection d'émotions contextu", 'es': 'Extracción de características neuronales para la detección de emociones', 'ja': 'コンテキスト感情検出のためのニューラルフィーチャー抽出', 'hi': 'प्रासंगिक भावना का पता लगाने के लिए तंत्रिका सुविधा निष्कर्षण', 'ru': 'Извлечение нейронных функций для контекстного обнаружения эмоций', 'zh': '情境情检者神经特征提取', 'ga': 'Eastóscadh Gné Néarach chun Mothúchán Comhthéacsúil a Bhrath', 'hu': 'Neural Feature Extraction for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'kk': 'Контексті көңіл көңіл анықтау үшін нейралық қасиеттерді тарқату', 'lt': 'Neural Feature Extraction for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'mk': 'Neural Feature Extraction for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'ms': 'Neural Feature Extraction for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'el': 'Εκχύλισμα νευρωνικών χαρακτηριστικών για την ανίχνευση συγκλονιστικών συναισθημάτων', 'it': 'Estrazione delle caratteristiche neurali per il rilevamento delle emozioni contestuali', 'ml': 'എക്സ്റ്റററല്\u200d എംഗ്യൂഷന്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d ഫീറ്റേറ്റ് എക്സ്ട്രാക്ട', 'mt': 'Neural Feature Extraction for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja cech neuronowych do kontekstowego wykrywania emocji', 'ro': 'Extragerea caracteristicilor neurale pentru detectarea emoțiilor contextuale', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija neuroloških funkcija za konstrukciju kontekstualnih emocija', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ භාවිතාව හොයාගන්න සඳහා න්\u200dයූරාලික භාවිතාව නිර්මාණය', 'so': 'Ka soo saarista safarka', 'sv': 'Extraktion av neurala funktioner för kontextuell känslodetektering', 'ta': 'சூழல் உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான புதிய குணங்கள் வெளியேறுதல்', 'mn': 'Сөвхөн сэтгэл хөдлөл ойлголтын сэтгэл хөдлөл татах', 'no': 'Ekstraksjon av nøyrale funksjonar for kontekstutfinning av emosjonar', 'ka': 'Name', 'ur': 'کنٹکسٹیول ایموٹیون شناسایی کے لئے نیورال فکتور اخراج', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Rút động thái thần kinh để phát hiện cảm xúc', 'da': 'Neural Feature Extraction for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'de': 'Extraktion von neuronalen Merkmalen zur kontextuellen Emotionserkennung', 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija neuroloških funkcija za konstrukciju kontekstnih emocija', 'bg': 'Извличане на неврална характеристика за откриване на контекстуални емоции', 'nl': 'Extractie van neurale eigenschappen voor contextuele emotie detectie', 'sw': 'Tamko la Tamko la Nchini kwa Kugundua Tatizo la Kuhusu', 'id': 'Ekstraksi Feature Neural untuk Deteksi Emosi Konteksual', 'ko': '상하문 감정 검측에 사용되는 신경 특징 추출', 'fa': 'اخراج ویژه عصبی برای شناسایی احساسات محیط', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'tr': 'Kontekst Emotika Aňlamak üçin näsaz Mazmuny Açmak', 'sq': 'Neural Feature Extraction for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'bn': 'বৈদ্যমান অনুসন্ধানের জন্য নিউরেল বৈশিষ্ট্য এক্সট্র্যাকশন', 'hy': 'Նյարդային հատկությունների արտադրումը կոնտեքստալ զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման համար', 'az': 'Kontekst Emotiyon İşləməsi üçün Nöral Feature Extraction for Context Emotion Detection', 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija neuroloških funkcija za konstrukciju kontekstualnih emocija', 'ca': "Extracció de característiques neuronalsper la detecció d'emocions contextuals", 'cs': 'Extrakce neuronových vlastností pro detekci kontextových emocí', 'et': 'Närvifunktsioonide väljavõtmine kontekstuaalsete emotsioonide tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'Hermosominaisuuksien poisto kontekstuaalisen tunteen havaitsemista varten', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'יציאת תכונות נוירות לגילוי רגשות קונטקסטיים', 'ha': 'Extracti na Feature na Kwamfyutan Tafiyar da Ƙara', 'sk': 'Izločanje živčnih funkcij za zaznavanje kontekstualnih čustev', 'bo': 'Contextual Emotion Detection for Neural Feature Extraction'}
{'en': 'This paper describes a new approach for the task of contextual emotion detection. The approach is based on a neural feature extractor, composed of a recurrent neural network with an attention mechanism, followed by a classifier, that can be neural or SVM-based. We evaluated the model with the dataset of the task 3 of SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), which includes short 3-turn conversations, tagged with 4 emotion classes. The best performing setup was achieved using ELMo word embeddings and POS tags as input, bidirectional GRU as hidden units, and an SVM as the final classifier. This configuration reached 69.93 % in terms of micro-average F1 score on the main 3 emotion classes, a score that outperformed the baseline system by 11.25 %.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve uma nova abordagem para a tarefa de detecção contextual de emoções. A abordagem é baseada em um extrator de características neurais, composto por uma rede neural recorrente com mecanismo de atenção, seguida por um classificador, que pode ser neural ou baseado em SVM. Avaliamos o modelo com o conjunto de dados da tarefa 3 do SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), que inclui conversas curtas de 3 turnos, marcadas com 4 classes de emoção. A configuração de melhor desempenho foi alcançada usando embeddings de palavras ELMo e tags POS como entrada, GRU bidirecional como unidades ocultas e um SVM como classificador final. Essa configuração atingiu 69,93% em termos de pontuação F1 micromédia nas 3 principais classes de emoção, uma pontuação que superou o sistema de linha de base em 11,25%.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة مقاربة جديدة لمهمة الكشف عن المشاعر السياقية. يعتمد النهج على مستخرج السمات العصبية ، ويتألف من شبكة عصبية متكررة مع آلية انتباه ، متبوعة بمصنف يمكن أن يكون عصبيًا أو قائمًا على SVM. قمنا بتقييم النموذج بمجموعة البيانات الخاصة بالمهمة 3 من SemEval 2019 (EmoContext) ، والتي تتضمن محادثات قصيرة مكونة من 3 أدوار ، وموسومة بـ 4 فئات عواطف. تم تحقيق الإعداد الأفضل أداءً باستخدام تضمين ELMo word وعلامات POS كمدخلات ، و GRU ثنائي الاتجاه كوحدات مخفية ، و SVM كمصنف نهائي. وصل هذا التكوين إلى 69.93٪ من حيث متوسط درجة F1 الصغيرة في فئات المشاعر الثلاثة الرئيسية ، وهي درجة تفوقت على نظام الأساس بنسبة 11.25٪.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe un nuevo enfoque para la tarea de detección de emociones contextuales. El enfoque se basa en un extractor de características neuronales, compuesto por una red neuronal recurrente con un mecanismo de atención, seguido de un clasificador, que puede ser neuronal o basado en SVM. Evaluamos el modelo con el conjunto de datos de la tarea 3 de SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), que incluye conversaciones cortas de 3 turnos, etiquetadas con 4 clases de emociones. La configuración de mejor rendimiento se logró utilizando incrustaciones de palabras eLMO y etiquetas POS como entrada, GRU bidireccional como unidades ocultas y un SVM como clasificador final. Esta configuración alcanzó el 69,93% en términos de puntaje F1 micropromedio en las 3 clases principales de emociones, un puntaje que superó al sistema de referencia en un 11,25%.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit une nouvelle approche pour la détection contextuelle des émotions. L'approche est basée sur un extracteur de caractéristiques neuronales, composé d'un réseau neuronal récurrent avec un mécanisme d'attention, suivi d'un classificateur, qui peut être neuronal ou basé sur la SVM. Nous avons évalué le modèle avec l'ensemble de données de la tâche 3 de SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), qui comprend de courtes conversations à trois tours, marquées avec 4 classes d'émotions. La configuration la plus performante a été obtenue en utilisant des intégrations de mots ElMo et des balises POS comme entrée, un GRU bidirectionnel comme unités cachées et une SVM comme classificateur final. Cette configuration a atteint 69,93\xa0% en termes de micro-moyenne F1 sur les 3 principales classes d'émotions, un score qui a surpassé le système de base de 11,25\xa0%.", 'ja': 'この論文では、文脈的感情検出のタスクのための新しいアプローチについて説明します。このアプローチは、ニューラルまたはＳＶＭベースであり得る、注意メカニズムを有する再帰的ニューラルネットワーク、続いて分類子から構成されるニューラルフィーチャー抽出器に基づいている。私たちは、4つの感情クラスでタグ付けされた短い3ターンの会話を含む、SemEval 2019 （ EmoContext ）のタスク3のデータセットでモデルを評価しました。最高のパフォーマンスのセットアップは、入力としてELMoワード埋め込みとPOSタグ、隠しユニットとして双方向GRU、および最終的な分類子としてSVMを使用して達成されました。この構成は、主な3つの感情クラスのマイクロ平均F 1スコアに関して69.93 ％に達し、ベースラインシステムを11.25 ％上回るスコアでした。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर प्रासंगिक भावना का पता लगाने के कार्य के लिए एक नए दृष्टिकोण का वर्णन करता है। दृष्टिकोण एक तंत्रिका सुविधा चिमटा पर आधारित है, जो एक ध्यान तंत्र के साथ एक आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क से बना है, इसके बाद एक क्लासिफायर, जो तंत्रिका या एसवीएम-आधारित हो सकता है। हमने SemEval 2019 (EmoContext) के कार्य 3 के डेटासेट के साथ मॉडल का मूल्यांकन किया, जिसमें 4 भावना वर्गों के साथ टैग की गई छोटी 3-टर्न वार्तालाप शामिल हैं। सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन सेटअप इनपुट के रूप में ELMo शब्द एम्बेडिंग और POS टैग, छिपी हुई इकाइयों के रूप में द्विदिश GRU, और अंतिम क्लासिफायर के रूप में एक SVM का उपयोग करके प्राप्त किया गया था। यह कॉन्फ़िगरेशन मुख्य 3 भावना वर्गों पर माइक्रो-औसत एफ 1 स्कोर के मामले में 69.93% तक पहुंच गया, एक स्कोर जिसने बेसलाइन सिस्टम को 11.25% से बेहतर प्रदर्शन किया।', 'zh': '本文述了一种事情检测的新法。 其法本于神经提取器,提取器意机之递归神经网络成,后与一分类器,其器可以为神经,亦可以为SVM。 吾以SemEval 2019(EmoContext)任3之数集估其形势,其简短者3轮对之,标有4情之类。 以ELMo词嵌POS标签为输,双向GRU为隐单元,SVM为终器,成性最佳者置之。 大抵3情类微观均F1分数而言,至于69.93%,分数比基线统出11.25%。', 'ru': 'В данной статье описан новый подход к задаче контекстного обнаружения эмоций. Подход основан на извлекателе нейронных признаков, состоящем из рекуррентной нейронной сети с механизмом внимания, за которым следует классификатор, который может быть нейронным или на основе виртуальной машины защиты. Мы оценили модель с набором данных задачи 3 SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), который включает короткие 3-х витковые разговоры, помеченные 4 классами эмоций. Наилучшая производительность была достигнута с использованием вложений слов ELMo и POS-метки в качестве входных данных, двунаправленного GRU в качестве скрытых единиц и виртуальной машины защиты в качестве конечного классификатора. Эта конфигурация достигла 69,93% с точки зрения микросреднего балла F1 на основных 3 классах эмоций, балл, который превысил базовую систему на 11,25%.', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar chur chuige nua chun mothúcháin comhthéacsúla a bhrath. Tá an cur chuige bunaithe ar eastóscadh gné néarúil, atá comhdhéanta de líonra néarach athfhillteach le meicníocht aird, agus aicmitheoir ina dhiaidh sin, ar féidir leis a bheith néaránach nó bunaithe ar SMV. Rinneamar measúnú ar an tsamhail leis an tacar sonraí de thasc 3 de SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), lena n-áirítear comhráite gearra 3-cas, clibáilte le 4 rang mothúcháin. Baineadh an socrú feidhmíochta is fearr amach trí úsáid a bhaint as leabaithe focal ELMo agus clibeanna POS mar ionchur, GRU déthreo mar aonaid fholaithe, agus SVM mar an t-aicmitheoir deiridh. Shroich an chumraíocht seo 69.93% i dtéarmaí micrea-mheánscóir F1 ar na 3 phríomh-ranganna mothúcháin, scór a d'fheidhmigh níos fearr ná an córas bunlíne 11.25%.", 'it': "Questo articolo descrive un nuovo approccio per il compito di rilevazione contestuale delle emozioni. L'approccio si basa su un estrattore di funzionalità neurali, composto da una rete neurale ricorrente con un meccanismo di attenzione, seguito da un classificatore, che può essere neurale o basato su SVM. Abbiamo valutato il modello con il dataset del task 3 di SemEval 2019 (EmoContent), che include brevi conversazioni a 3 turni, taggate con 4 classi di emozioni. La configurazione più performante è stata ottenuta utilizzando le incorporazioni di parole ELMo e i tag POS come input, GRU bidirezionale come unità nascoste e un SVM come classificatore finale. Questa configurazione ha raggiunto il 69,93% in termini di punteggio F1 micro-medio sulle 3 principali classi emotive, un punteggio che ha superato il sistema di base dell'11,25%.", 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy új megközelítést ír le a kontextuális érzelmek felismerésére. A megközelítés egy neurális jellemző extraktoron alapul, amely egy visszatérő neurális hálózatból áll, figyelemmechanizmussal, majd egy osztályozó, amely lehet neurális vagy SVM alapú. A modellt a SemEval 2019 (EmoContent) 3. feladatának adatkészletével értékeltük, amely rövid 3 fordulós beszélgetéseket tartalmaz, 4 érzelmi osztállyal címkézve. A legjobb teljesítményű beállítást ELMo szóbeágyazások és POS címkék használták bemenetként, kétirányú GRU rejtett egységként és SVM mint végső osztályozó használatával érték el. Ez a konfiguráció 69,93%-ot ért el a mikroátlagos F1 pontszám tekintetében a három fő érzelmi osztályban, ami 11,25%-kal felülmúlta a kiindulási rendszert.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз контекстік емоцияларды анықтау тапсырмасының жаңа әдісін анықтайды. Бұл әдістері невралдық қасиеттерді тарқатушыға негізделген, қайталанатын невралдық желінен құрылған, қайталанатын невралдық желінің механизмімен, келесі классификациясы, невралдық немесе SVM негізінде бол Біз үлгісін 2019 жылдың 3- шегінің (EmoContext) тапсырмасының (3- шегінің) деректер жиынына бағаладық. Бұл үлгісін 4 эмоциялық класса белгілеген қысқа 3- шегінің сұрақтарымен қо Ең жақсы орнатылған параметрлері ELMo сөздерді ендіру және POS тегтерін келтіру, жасырын бірліктер ретінде, және соңғы классификатор ретінде SVM деп қолданылады. Бұл баптау үшін негізгі 3 эмоциялық классындағы микро орташа F1 нүктесінің 69, 93% дегенге жетті, негізгі жол жүйесіне 11, 25% деген нүктесі болды.', 'mk': 'This paper describes a new approach for the task of contextual emotion detection.  Пристапот се базира на екстрактор на нервни карактеристики, составен од рецидентна нервна мрежа со механизам на внимание, следен од класификатор, кој може да биде базиран на нервни или SVM. Го проценивме моделот со податоците од задачата 3 на SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), која вклучува кратки 3-свртени разговори, означени со 4 класи на емоции. Најдоброто поставување беше постигнато со употреба на вградувања на зборови на ELMo и POS ознаки како внесување, двојно GRU како скриени единици и SVM како финален класификатор. Оваа конфигурација достигна 69,93 отсто во однос на микро-просечната оценка Ф1 на главните 3 класи на емоции, оценка која го надмина основниот систем за 11,25 отсто.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomas naujas požiūris į kontekstinės emocijos aptikimo užduotį. Metodas grindžiamas neurologinių savybių ekstraktoriumi, sudarytu iš pasikartojančio neurologinio tinklo su dėmesio mechanizmu ir po to klasifikuotoju, kuris gali būti pagrįstas neurologiniu arba SVM. Mes įvertinome model į naudojant 2019 m. SemEval 3 užduoties (EmoContext) duomenų rinkinį, kuriame dalyvauja trumpi 3 posūkio pokalbiai, paženklinti 4 emocijų klasėmis. Geriausias rezultatas buvo pasiektas naudojant ELMo žodžių įdėjimus ir POS ženklus kaip įvestį, dvikrypčius GRU kaip paslėptus vienetus ir SVM kaip galutinį klasifikatorių. This configuration reached 69.93% in terms of micro-average F1 score on the main 3 emotion classes, a score that outperformed the baseline system by 11.25%.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει μια νέα προσέγγιση για το έργο της περιεκτικής ανίχνευσης συναισθημάτων. Η προσέγγιση βασίζεται σε έναν εξαγωγέα νευρωνικών χαρακτηριστικών, που αποτελείται από ένα επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρωνικό δίκτυο με μηχανισμό προσοχής, ακολουθούμενο από έναν ταξινομητή, ο οποίος μπορεί να είναι νευρωνικό ή βασισμένο σε SVM. Αξιολογήσαμε το μοντέλο με το σύνολο δεδομένων της εργασίας 3 του το οποίο περιλαμβάνει σύντομες 3-στροφές συνομιλίες, επισημασμένες με 4-τάξεις συναισθημάτων. Η καλύτερη ρύθμιση επιτεύχθηκε χρησιμοποιώντας ενσωμάτωση λέξεων και ετικέτες ως εισαγωγή, αμφίδρομη GRU ως κρυφές μονάδες και ένα SVM ως τελικό ταξινομητή. Αυτή η διαμόρφωση έφτασε σε 69,93% όσον αφορά τη μικρομέση βαθμολογία F1 στις κύριες 3 κατηγορίες συναισθημάτων, μια βαθμολογία που ξεπερνούσε το σύστημα βάσης κατά 11,25%.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi approċċ ġdid għall-kompitu tad-detezzjoni tal-emozzjonijiet kuntestwali. L-approċċ huwa bbażat fuq estrattur ta’ karatteristiċi newrali, magħmul minn netwerk newrali rikorrenti b’mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni, segwit minn klassifikatur, li jista’ jkun ibbażat fuq newrali jew SVM. We evaluated the model with the dataset of the task 3 of SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), which includes short 3-turn conversations, tagged with 4 emotion classes.  L-aħjar struttura ta’ prestazzjoni nkisbet bl-użu ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kelma ELMo u tikketti POS bħala input, GRU bidirezzjonali bħala unitajiet moħbija, u SVM bħala l-klassifikatur finali. Din il-konfigurazzjoni laħqet 69.93% f’termini ta’ punteġġ F1 mikromedja fuq it-3 klassijiet ewlenin ta’ emozzjonijiet, punteġġ li qabeż is-sistema bażi b’11.25%.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു പുതിയ വഴിയെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന് ഇതിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണു് ന്യൂറല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പ്രോഗ്രേറ്റര്\u200d, ആവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചുകൊണ്ടുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 (എമോക്സെക്സ്റ്റ്) മൂന്ന് തിരിച്ചുമാറുന്ന സെമ്മോവിലെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് മോഡലിനെ  ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ELMo വാക്കുകള്\u200d എംപോഡിങ്ങുകളും പോസ് ടാഗുകളും ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട്, ബിഡിറ്റര്\u200dക്ഷന്\u200d ഗ്രൂ ഒളിഞ്ഞ This configuration reached 69.93% in terms of micro-average F1 score on the main 3 emotion classes, a score that outperformed the baseline system by 11.25%.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan pendekatan baru untuk tugas pengesan emosi kontekstual. The approach is based on a neural feature extractor, composed of a recurrent neural network with an attention mechanism, followed by a classifier, that can be neural or SVM-based.  Kami menilai model dengan set data tugas 3 SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), yang termasuk perbualan pendek 3 pusingan, ditanda dengan 4 kelas emosi. Seting prestasi terbaik telah dicapai menggunakan pelengkapan perkataan ELMo dan tag POS sebagai input, GRU bidireksi sebagai unit tersembunyi, dan SVM sebagai pengklasifikasi akhir. This configuration reached 69.93% in terms of micro-average F1 score on the main 3 emotion classes, a score that outperformed the baseline system by 11.25%.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნტის ახალი პროგრამის აღწერა კონტექსტურალური ემოციონის განახსნა. პროგრამა ნეიროლური ფუნქციების ექსტრექტორის ბაზია, რომელიც რეკურენტური ნეიროლური ქსელის შექმნილი აღმოჩენის მექანიზმისთვის, რომელიც კლასიფიკაციის შემდეგ, რომელიც ჩვენ მოდელის შესაბამისი მონაცემები 2019 წლის SemEval 3-ის (EmoContext) მონაცემების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი, რომელიც 4 ემოციონის კლასებით დავწერა ყველაზე საუკეთესო შესაძლებელი შესაძლებლობა იყო ELMo სიტყვების შესაძლებლობა და POS ტეგექტების გამოყენებით, როგორც შესაძლებელია შესაძლებელია შესაძლებელია შესაძლებელია შესაძლებელ ეს კონფიგურაცია 69.93% მიკრო-საშუალო F1 წერტილის შესახებ სამი ემოციონის კლასში, წერტილის შესახებ, რომელიც 11.25%.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano nowe podejście do zadania kontekstowego wykrywania emocji. Podejście opiera się na ekstraktorze cech neuronowych, składającym się z nawracającej sieci neuronowej z mechanizmem uwagi, po którym następuje klasyfikator, który może być oparty na neuronie lub SVM. Oceniliśmy model z zestawem danych zadania 3 SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), który obejmuje krótkie rozmowy 3-turnowe, oznaczone 4-klasami emocji. Najlepiej wydajną konfigurację uzyskano za pomocą osadzeń słów ELMo i tagów POS jako wejścia, dwukierunkowych GRU jako ukrytych jednostek i SVM jako ostatecznego klasyfikatora. Konfiguracja ta osiągnęła 69,93% pod względem mikrośredniego wyniku F1 w głównych trzech klasach emocji, wynik, który przewyższył system bazowy o 11,25%.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver ein ny tilnærming for oppgåva av kontekstære emosjonsoppdaging. Tilnærminga er basert på ein neuralfunksjonsekstraktor, lagt av eit rekurserande neuralnettverk med ein oppmerksmekanisme, etterfulgt av ein klassifiserer, som kan vera neuralt eller SVM-basert. Vi evaluerte modellen med datasettet til oppgåva 3 av semiEval 2019 (EmoContext), som inneheld kort 3 omvendte samtaler, merket med 4 emosjonsklassar. Den beste innstillinga som utfører vart oppnådd ved å bruka ELMo- ordinnbygging og POS- taggar som inndata, bidireksjonal GRU som gøymde einingar, og SVM som det siste klassifiserer. Denne oppsettet fikk 69,93% ved høve til mikro-gjennomsnittlig F1- poeng på de hovudde 3 emosjonsklassene, eit poeng som utførte baselinjesystemet med 11,25%.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie o nouă abordare pentru sarcina detectării emoțiilor contextuale. Abordarea se bazează pe un extractor de caracteristici neurale, compus dintr-o rețea neurală recurentă cu un mecanism de atenție, urmat de un clasificator, care poate fi neural sau SVM. Am evaluat modelul cu setul de date al sarcinii 3 SemEval 2019 (EmoContent), care include conversații scurte în 3 rânduri, etichetate cu 4 clase emoționale. Cea mai bună configurare a fost realizată folosind încorporări de cuvinte ELMo și etichete POS ca intrare, GRU bidirecțional ca unități ascunse și un SVM ca clasificator final. Această configurație a atins 69,93% în ceea ce privește scorul F1 micro-mediu pe principalele 3 clase emoționale, un scor care a depășit sistemul de bază cu 11,25%.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaa looga sheegaa qaab cusub oo ku saabsan shaqo la ogaado fikradda joogtada ah. Dhaqsadu waxay ku saleysan tahay xarunta neurada, kaas oo ku jira shabakadda neurada ee soo socda, waxayna leedahay meymisyo daryeel ah, kaas oo ku saleyn kara neural ama SVM. Tusaalada waxaan ku qiimeynay sawirada shaqada 3 ee SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), kaas oo ku qoran hadal gaaban oo 3 jeer ah, oo lagu bandhigay 4 fasalka emotion. Soo sameynta ugu wanaagsan waxaa la gaadhay isticmaalka ELMo word embeddings and POS tags as input, bideer GRU as units qarsoon, and SVM as the final classifier. Tilmaamahan waxay gaadhay 69.93 boqolkiiba qiimaha iskuulka F1 ee ugu horeeya fasalka 3 xisaabta, taas oo ka soo baxay nidaamka hoose waxay ku socotay 11.25 boqolkiiba.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver ett nytt tillvägagångssätt för uppgiften att kontextuell känslodetektering. Metoden bygger på en neural funktionsextraktor, bestående av ett återkommande neuralt nätverk med en uppmärksamhetsmekanism, följt av en klassificerare, som kan vara neural eller SVM-baserad. Vi utvärderade modellen med datauppsättningen för uppgiften 3 i SemEval 2019 (EmoContent), som innehåller korta 3-svängssamtal, taggade med 4 känsloklasser. Den bästa inställningen uppnåddes med hjälp av ELMo-ordinbäddningar och POS-taggar som inmatning, tvåriktad GRU som dolda enheter och en SVM som slutklassificerare. Denna konfiguration nådde 69,93% i termer av mikrogenomsnittlig F1 poäng på de tre viktigaste känsloklasserna, en poäng som överträffade baslinjen med 11,25%.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் தற்போதைய உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான ஒரு புதிய செயலை விவரிக்கிறது. இந்த செயல்பாடு ஒரு புதிய குணங்கள் வெளியீட்டாளரின் அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது, நிகழ்ந்துகொண்ட புதிய வலைப்பின்னலில் ஒன்று சேர்க்கப்பட்டது, பின்னர் வக We evaluated the model with the dataset of the task 3 of SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), which includes short 3-turn conversations, tagged with 4 emotion classes.  சிறந்த செயல்படுத்தல் அமைப்பு ELMo வார்த்தை உள்ளீடு, போஸ் ஒட்டுகள் மற்றும் மறைந்துள்ள அலகுகளாக, மற்றும் SVM கடைசி வகைப்பாடாக பயன்படுத்தி அடைந இந்த வடிவமைப்பு முக்கிய 3 உணர்வு வகுப்பில் மைக்ரோ சராசரி F1 புள்ளியை விட 69. 93% அடைந்தது, அடிப்படை வரிசையின் முறைமையை 11. 25%ஆல் முடிந', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдрэмжийн ажлын шинэ арга замыг тайлбарладаг. Энэ арга нь сэтгэл санааны механизмтай дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний газрын шинж тэмдэглэгч дээр суурилсан. Энэ нь мэдрэлийн эсвэл SVM-ын үндсэн мэдрэлийн сүлжээ юм. Бид 2019 оны SemEval 2019 (EmoContext) 3 даалгаварын өгөгдлийн сангийн загварыг дүгнэсэн. Энэ нь богино 3 даалгавартай ярилцлага, 4 сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хичээлд тэмдэглэгдсэн. Хамгийн сайн үйлдвэрлэлтийн setup нь ELMo үгний интербинг, POS тегтэй ашиглаж, нуугдсан нэгжүүд болон SVM хамгийн сүүлийн ангилагч болсон. Энэ загвар нь үндсэн 3 сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хичээлд жижиг дундаж F1 оноо 69.93% хүртэл хүрсэн. Газрын системээс 11.25% багасгасан тоо.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ایک نئی طریقہ کی توصیف کرتا ہے کہ متوسط احساسات شناسایی کے کام کے لئے۔ یہ طریقہ ایک نئورل فائدہ اضافہ کرنے والے پر بنیاد ہے، جو ایک دوبارہ نئورل نیٹورل نیٹورک کے ذریعہ ایک متوجہ مکانیزی کے ساتھ پیدا ہوا ہے، جس کے بعد ایک کلاسیر کی پیروی کرتی ہے، جو نئورل یا SVM کی بنیاد ہو سکتی ہے. ہم نے مدل کو سم ایویل 2019 (EmoContext) کے 3 دنیا کی ڈیٹ سٹ کے ساتھ مطالعہ کیا ہے جس میں چھوٹی 3 تبر کی باتیں شامل ہوتی ہیں، چر احساسات کلاس کے ساتھ ٹاگ کی جاتی ہیں. The best performing setup was achieved using ELMo word embeddings and POS tags as input, bidirectional GRU as hidden units, and an SVM as the final classifier. This configuration reached 69.93% in terms of micro-average F1 score on the main 3 emotion classes, a score that outperformed the baseline system by 11.25%.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje novi pristup zadatku kontekstualnog otkrivanja emocija. Pristup je baziran na ekstraktoru neuralnih funkcija, sastavljenom od rekonstruirane neuralne mreže sa pažnjom mehanizam, koji prati klasifikator, koji može biti neuralna ili SVM-bazirana. Procjenjivali smo model sa setom podataka zadatka 3 od semiEvala 2019. godine (EmoContext), koja uključuje kratke razgovore o 3 okretanja, označene sa 4 klase emocija. Najbolji nastup za izvršenje postignut je korištenjem ELMo rečenica i oznake POS kao ulaz, dvodirektivni GRU kao skrivene jedinice, i SVM kao konačni klasifikator. Ova konfiguracija je postigala 69,93% u smislu mikro-prosječnog rezultata F1 na glavnim 3 klasama emocija, rezultat koji je nadmašio početni sistem za 11,25%.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ සංවේදනය හොයාගන්න වැඩේ අළුත් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් විස්තර කරනවා. The approach is based on a neural character extractor, composed of a recurrent neural network with a look at a machine, after a classifier, that can be neural or SVM-based. අපි ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා සේම්වේල් 2019 (EmoContexts) වැඩේ 3 ගැන තොරතුරු සෙට් එක්ක පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරමාණය 3-වාර්තාවක්  ELMo වචනය සහ POS ටැග් භාවිතා කරන්න හොඳම සැකසුම් ලැබුනා ඇතුළුම, බිඩිරෙක්ෂන් GRU වලින් හැංගුණු යුනිත් වලින් සහ SVM වලින් අ මේ සංවිධානය 69.93% ප්\u200dරධානය මයික්රෝ-සාමාන්\u200dය F1 ස්කෝර් වලින් ප්\u200dරධානය 3 වලින්, ප්\u200dරධානය 3 වලින් ස්කෝර් වලින් ප්\u200d', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz davomida hissiyotni aniqlash vazifasi yangi usulni anglatadi. Name Biz esa SemEval 2019 (EmoContext) vazifa 3 (EmoContext) maʼlumotlar tarkibini qiymatdik. Bu bir qisqa 3-tur talab qiladi, 4 hissiyotning sinflari bilan bog'liq. Name Name", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả một phương pháp mới cho nhiệm vụ khám phá cảm xúc ngữ cảnh. Cách tiếp cận dựa trên một bộ khuếch đại tính năng thần kinh, bao gồm một mạng thần kinh liên tục với một bộ phận chú ý, theo sau là một người phân loại có thể là dựa trên thần kinh hoặc SVM. Chúng tôi đánh giá mô hình với tập tin trong nhiệm vụ 3 của SemEvol dùm mặc định, gồm các cuộc nói chuyện ngắn 3-Turn, gắn vào bốn lớp cảm xúc. Thiết lập trình diễn tốt nhất đã được thực hiện sử dụng những dòng chữ nhúng và thẻ bài vị trí có thể được nhập, và GRU hình trực tiếp như các đơn vị ẩn, và SVM là tiêu đề cuối cùng. Cấu hình này đã đạt đến 69.93. Với tỉ số F1 vi trung bình trên các lớp cảm xúc chính, một số lượng đã vượt qua hệ thống cơ bản là 11.25. Name', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва нов подход към задачата за откриване на контекстуални емоции. Подходът се основава на невронен екстрактор, съставен от повтаряща се невронна мрежа с механизъм на внимание, последван от класификатор, който може да бъде невронен или базиран на СВМ. Оценихме модела с набора от данни от задача 3 на която са включени кратки разговори от 3 завоя, маркирани с 4 емоционални класа. Най-добре функциониращата настройка беше постигната с помощта на вграждания на думи и ПОС тагове като вход, двупосочен GRU като скрити единици и SVM като окончателен класификатор. Тази конфигурация достига 69,93% по отношение на микро-средния резултат в основните 3 емоционални класа, резултат, който надминава базовата система с 11,25%.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver en ny tilgang til opgaven med kontekstuel følelsesdetektion. Tilgangen er baseret på en neural feature extractor, der består af et tilbagevendende neuralt netværk med en opmærksomhedsmekanisme efterfulgt af en klassifikation, der kan være neural eller SVM-baseret. Vi evaluerede modellen med datasættet fra opgaven 3 af SemEval 2019 (EmoContent), som omfatter korte 3-turns samtaler, mærket med 4 følelsesklasser. Den bedst ydende opsætning blev opnået ved hjælp af ELMo ordindlejringer og POS tags som input, tovejet GRU som skjulte enheder og en SVM som den endelige klassificering. Denne konfiguration nåede 69,93% i form af mikrogennemsnitlig F1 score på de 3 vigtigste følelsesklasser, en score, der overgik baseline systemet med 11,25%.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft een nieuwe aanpak voor de taak van contextuele emotie detectie. De aanpak is gebaseerd op een neurale feature extractor, bestaande uit een terugkerend neuraal netwerk met een aandachtsmechanisme, gevolgd door een classificator, die neuraal of SVM-gebaseerd kan zijn. We hebben het model geëvalueerd met de dataset van de taak 3 van SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), die korte 3-turn conversaties omvat, getaggd met vier emotieklassen. De best presterende setup werd bereikt met ELMo woord embeddings en POS tags als invoer, bidirectionele GRU als verborgen eenheden en een SVM als uiteindelijke classificator. Deze configuratie bereikte 69,93% in termen van micro-gemiddelde F1 score op de belangrijkste 3-emotieklassen, een score die het basissysteem met 11,25%.overtrof', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje novi pristup zadatku kontekstualnog otkrivanja emocija. Pristup se temelji na ekstraktoru neuralnih funkcija, sastavljenom od rekonstruirane neuralne mreže s pažnjom mehanizam, nakon čega je klasifikator, koji može biti na osnovu neuralne ili SVM-a. Procjenjivali smo model sa setom podataka zadatka 3. poluvječne 2019. godine (EmoContext), koja uključuje kratke razgovore o 3 okretanju, označene sa 4 klase emocija. Najbolji nastup za izvršenje postignut je koristeći uključenje riječi ELMo i oznake POS kao ulaz, bidirektivni GRU kao skrivene jedinice i SVM kao konačni klasifikator. Ova konfiguracija postigla je 69,93% u smislu mikroprosječnog rezultata F1 na glavnim 3 klasama emocija, rezultat koji je nadmašio početni sustav za 11,25%.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt einen neuen Ansatz für die Aufgabe der kontextuellen Emotionserkennung. Der Ansatz basiert auf einem neuronalen Feature Extractor, bestehend aus einem wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzwerk mit Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, gefolgt von einem Klassifikator, der neuronal oder SVM-basiert sein kann. Wir evaluierten das Modell mit dem Datensatz der Aufgabe 3 von SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), der kurze 3-Turn-Gespräche beinhaltet, die mit vier Emotionsklassen getaggt sind. Das beste Setup wurde erreicht, indem ELMo-Worteinbettungen und POS-Tags als Eingabe, bidirektionale GRU als versteckte Einheiten und ein SVM als endgültiger Klassifikator verwendet wurden. Diese Konfiguration erreichte 69,93% in Bezug auf den mikrodurchschnittlichen F1-Score in den wichtigsten 3-Emotionsklassen, ein Score, der das Basissystem um 11,25% übertraf.', 'ko': '본고는 새로운 상하문 감정 검측 방법을 묘사하였다.이 방법은 하나의 신경 특징 추출기를 바탕으로 주의 메커니즘을 가진 귀속 신경 네트워크로 구성된 다음에 신경을 바탕으로 하거나 벡터기를 지원하는 분류기이다.우리는 SemEval 2019(EmoContext) 임무 3의 데이터 세트를 사용하여 이 모델을 평가했는데 이 데이터 세트는 간단한 3라운드 대화를 포함하고 4개의 정서 클래스를 표시했다.ELMo 단어 삽입과 POS 태그를 입력으로 사용하고, 양방향 GRU를 숨김 단위로 사용하며, SVM을 최종 분류기로 사용해 성능 최상의 설정을 구현했다.이 구성은 주요 3개 정서류의 F1 미평균 점수에서 69.93%로 베이스라인 시스템의 점수보다 11.25% 높았다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mbinu mpya ya kazi ya kutambua hisia za wakati. Mfumo huu unajikita na mtangazaji wa ubongo, ulioandaliwa na mtandao wa neurali unaoendelea na mfumo wa kutoa hisia, ukifuatiwa na mfanyakazi, ambao unaweza kuwa na uraia au SVM. Tulifuatilia mtindo huo na seti ya taarifa ya kazi 3 ya SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), ambayo inajumuisha mazungumzo machache machache ya mara 3, iliyoandikwa na darasa nne za hisia. Mpango bora wa kufanya kazi ulifanikiwa kwa kutumia maneno ya ELMo yaliyoandikwa na viungo vya POS kama input, vifaa vya GRU vilivyofichikwa, na SVM kama mwandishi wa mwisho. Mpango huu ulifikia asilimia 69.93 kwa kiwango cha wastani kidogo cha F1 kwenye darasa kuu la hisia 3, score lililoendesha mfumo wa msingi kwa asilimia 11.25.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan pendekatan baru untuk tugas deteksi emosi kontekstual. pendekatan ini berdasarkan ekstraktor fitur saraf, terdiri dari jaringan saraf yang berkurang dengan mekanisme perhatian, diikuti oleh klasifikasi, yang dapat berdasarkan saraf atau SVM. Kami mengevaluasi model dengan set data dari tugas 3 SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), yang termasuk percakapan pendek 3 putaran, ditanda dengan 4 kelas emosi. Seting yang paling berhasil dicapai dengan menggunakan embedding kata ELMo dan tag POS sebagai input, GRU bidireksi sebagai unit tersembunyi, dan SVM sebagai klasifikasi akhir. Konfigurasi ini mencapai 69,93% dalam terma skor F1 mikro-rata-rata pada 3 kelas emosi utama, skor yang melebihi sistem dasar dengan 11,25%.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz duýgyny tanyşdyrmak üçin täze bir ýazşy tassyklaýar. Bu approach neural özelliklerine daýan ýar, täsirli näral a ňla ilginç mekanizma bilen oluşulan, näral ýa-da SVM tabanly döredilen nural çykyşlygyna dayanan bir nural çykyşlygyna dayanan. Biz bu nusgany SemEval 2019 (EmoContext) tarapyndan çykyş edip, 4 duýgyş klaslary bilen etiketlenen çykyş şeklinde çykypdyk. EliMo söz düzümlerini we POS täglerini giriş hökmünde, ikinji ýerleşdirmek üçin ýeňildi, we soňky klasifikatçy hökmünde SVM tapyldy. Bu düzümler mikro-ortalama F1 nokatlaryna görä 69.93% duýgym synplaryna ýetdi. Bu nokat 11.25% diýipdir.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک روش جدید برای کشف احساسات محیط توصیف می\u200cکند. این دستور بر اساس یک خارج کننده ویژه عصبی است که از شبکه عصبی بازگشت با یک مکانیسم توجه است، و از طریق یک فرشته\u200cکننده، که می\u200cتواند بر اساس عصبی یا SVM باشد. ما مدل را با مجموعه داده\u200cهای کار ۳ از نیمه\u200cای ۲۰۱۹ (EmoContext) ارزیابی کردیم که شامل گفتگوهای کوتاه\u200cای با ۴ کلاس احساسات است. بهترین تنظیم عملکرد با استفاده از جمع کلمه ELMo و نقاشی POS به عنوان ورودی، GRU دومین مسیر به عنوان واحدهای مخفی و SVM به عنوان آخرین گروه\u200cکننده رسیده شد. این پیکربندی 69.93 درصد به عنوان امتیاز میکرومتوسط F1 در کلاس های اصلی ۳ احساسات رسید، امتیاز که سیستم پایین به ۱۱.۲۵ درصد بیشتر از سیستم پایین را انجام داد.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf 'n nuwe toegang vir die taak van contextual emosie opdekking. Die toegang is gebaseer op 'n neurale funksie uitpaker, gemaak van' n herhaalde neuralnetwerk met' n aandag mekanisme, gevolg deur' n klassifiseerder, wat kan neurale of SVM- gebaseer wees. Ons evalueer die model met die datastel van die taak 3 van SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), wat inkluit kort 3-draai gesprekke, merk met 4 emosie klasse. Die beste uitvoerende opstelling is bereik met gebruik van ELMo woord inbettings en POS etikette as invoer, bidireksjonale GRU as verborge eenhede, en 'n SVM as die eindelike klassifiseerder. Hierdie konfigurasie het 69.93% bereik in terms van mikro- gemiddelde F1 telling op die hoofde 3 emosie klasse, 'n telling wat die basisline stelsel by 11.25% uitgevoer het.", 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը նկարագրում է նոր մոտեցում կոնտեքստալ զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման խնդրի համար: The approach is based on a neural feature extractor, composed of a recurrent neural network with an attention mechanism, followed by a classifier, that can be neural or SVM-based.  Մենք գնահատեցինք մոդելը 2019 թվականի "Սեմո-կոնտեքստ" 3 խնդրի տվյալների համակարգի օգնությամբ, որը ներառում է կարճ 3-անգամ զրույցներ, որոնք նշված են 4 զգացմունքների դասերով: Ամենալավ արդյունավետ կառուցվածքը ստացվեց օգտագործելով ELMo բառերի ներդրումներ և POS նշաններ որպես ներդրումներ, երկու ուղղությամբ GRU որպես թաքնված միավորներ, և որպես վերջնական դասակարգիչ՝ սվիՄ: Այս կառուցվածքը հասավ 69.93 տոկոսի՝ միկրոմիջին F1-ի գնահատականի տեսքով հիմնական 3 զգացմունքների դասերի վրա, մի գնահատականի, որը 11.25 տոկոսով գերազանցեց հիմնական համակարգը:', 'sq': 'Kjo letër përshkruan një qasje të re për detyrën e zbulimit të emocioneve kontekstuale. Përqasja bazohet në një nxjerrës nervor, i përbërë nga një rrjet neural të përsëritur me një mekanizëm vëmendjeje, pasuar nga një klasifikues, i cili mund të jetë i bazuar në nerva apo SVM. Kemi vlerësuar modelin me grupin e të dhënave të detyrës 3 të SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), që përfshin bisedime të shkurtra 3-kthese, të shënuara me 4 klasa emocionesh. Konfigurimi më i mirë që bënte rezultate u arrit duke përdorur integrimet e fjalëve ELMo dhe etiketat POS si input, GRU dy-drejtuese si njësi të fshehura dhe një SVM si klasifikues përfundimtar. Kjo konfigurim arriti 69.93% në lidhje me pikën mikromesatare F1 në 3 klasat kryesore të emocioneve, një pikë që kaloi sistemin bazë me 11.25%.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የአሁኑን ስብሰባ ማግኘት አዲስ መንገድ ይናገራል፡፡ ይሄ ግንኙነት በቁጥጥር ላይ የሚቆጠሩ የኔural መረብ አካባቢ የተደረገ ነው፤ በኋላም በክላፊተር፣ ደዌብ ወይም SVM በመሠረት ይችላል፡፡ የሳምEval 2019 (EmoContext) ሥርዓት 3 የስራ ዳታ setን (EmoContext) የተመሳሳይ ሞዴል ነው፡፡ የተሻለ አካባቢ ግንኙነት የELMo ቃላት አቀማመጥ እና POS tags እንደ input, የግል GRU እንደ ተሸሸገው ክፍሎች እና SVM እንደ መጨረሻ ክፍል ሆኖ ደረሰ፡፡ ይህ ምርጫዎች በዋናው 3 እውቀት ክፍለ ክፍል ላይ አካል 69.93 በመቶው ይደርስበታል፡፡', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje novi pristup zadatku kontekstualnog otkrivanja emocija. Pristup se temelji na ekstraktoru neuralnih karakteristika, sastavljenom od rekonstruirane neuralne mreže sa mehanizam pažnje, nakon čega je klasifikator, koji može biti neuralna ili SVM-bazirana. Procjenjivali smo model sa setom podataka zadatka 3 od semiEvala 2019. godine (EmoContext), koja uključuje kratke razgovore o 3 okretanja, označene sa 4 klase emocija. Najbolji nastup za izvršenje postignut je korištenjem ELMo riječi ugrađenja i oznake POS kao ulaz, dvodirektivni GRU kao skrivene jedinice, i SVM kao konačni klasifikator. Ova konfiguracija je postigala 69,93% u smislu mikroprosječnog F1 rezultata na glavnim 3 klasama emocija, rezultat koji je nadmašio početni sistem za 11,25%.', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধে একটি নতুন উপায় বর্ণনা করা হয়েছে যেখানে অনুভূতি সনাক্ত করার জন্য। এই প্রযুক্তিটি নিউরেল বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিনিময়ে ভিত্তিক, যা পুনরাবার নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে একটি মনোযোগ মেকেন্দ্রের মাধ্যমে তৈরি করা হয়, তা আমরা সেমইভাল ২০১৯ (ইমোকন্টেস্ট) কাজের ৩ টি ডাটাসেটের মাধ্যমে মডেলের মূল্যায়ন করেছি, যার মধ্যে সংক্ষিপ্ত ত তিন পর্যায়ের কথোপকথন রয়ে ইনপুট, বিদ্যমান GRU হিসেবে গোপন ইউনিট হিসেবে ইএলমো শব্দ এবং পোস ট্যাগ ব্যবহার করে সবচেয়ে ভালো কর্মসূচি প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে এবং এসভিএম শেষ বিভাগ হ এই কনফিগারেশন প্রধান তিন আবেগ ক্লাসের মাইক্রো গড়ে F1 স্কোরের মাধ্যমে ৬৯. ৯৩% পৌঁছেছে, যা বেসাইলাইন সিস্টেমের বেস্ট্রোলাইনের ব', 'az': 'Bu kağıt müxtəlif duyguların keşfetməsi üçün yeni bir tərzini təsbiq edir. Bu tərzim nöral özellikləri ekstraktörə dayanan, nöral və SVM tabanlı bir nöral a ğdan oluşan nöral ağ tərzinə tərəf çevrilir. Biz modeli 2019-in SemEval 2019-nin (EmoContext) 3-in verilən qurğulu ilə değerləşdirdik. Bu qurğu 3-cür müzakirə ilə 4 hissi sınıfları ilə etiketləndirildi. Ən yaxşı performans qurğulaması ELMo sözləri və POS etiketlərini giriş kimi istifadə etdi, ikinci GRU gizli birikləri kimi və SVM son klasifikatçısı kimi istifadə edildi. Bu qurğulama əsas 3 hiss sınıflarında mikro ortalama F1 nöqtəsi ilə 69,93%-ə çatdı. Bu nöqtəsi, səviyyə sistemini 11,25%-ə qədər üstün etdi.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu un nou enfocament per a la tasca de detectar emocions contextuals. L'enfocament està basat en un extractor de característiques neurals, compost d'una xarxa neural recurrent amb un mecanisme d'atenció, seguit d'un classificador, que pot ser basat en neurones o SVM. Vam evaluar el model amb el conjunt de dades de la tasca 3 de SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), que inclou converses curtes de tres girs, etiquetades amb quatre classes emocionals. La millor configuració va ser aconseguida fent servir embeddings de paraules ELMo i etiquetes POS com entrada, GRU bidireccional com unitats amagades, i un SVM com el classificador final. Aquesta configuració va arribar al 69,93% en termes de puntuació F1 micromitjana en les tres principals classes emocionals, una puntuació que superava el sistema basal en 11,25%.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje nový přístup k úkolu kontextové detekce emocí. Tento přístup je založen na extraktoru neuronových funkcí, složeném z recidivující neuronové sítě s mechanismem pozornosti, následujícím klasifikátorem, který může být založen na neuronové nebo SVM. Model jsme vyhodnotili pomocí datové sady úlohy 3 SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), která zahrnuje krátké tříotočné konverzace označené čtyřmi emočními třídami. Nejlepšího výkonu nastavení bylo dosaženo pomocí vložení slov ELMo a POS tagů jako vstupu, obousměrné GRU jako skryté jednotky a SVM jako konečný klasifikátor. Tato konfigurace dosáhla 69,93% z hlediska mikroprůměrného skóre F1 na hlavních třídách emocí, skóre předčilo základní systém o 11,25%.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan uusi lähestymistapa kontekstuaalisen tunteentunnistuksen tehtävään. Lähestymistapa perustuu hermoominaisuuksien poistoon, joka koostuu toistuvasta hermoverkosta, jossa on huomiomekanismi ja jota seuraa luokittelija, joka voi olla neuro- tai SVM-pohjainen. Arvioimme mallia SemEval 2019:n (EmoContext) tehtävän 3 aineistolla, joka sisältää lyhyitä 3-vuoroisia keskusteluja, jotka on merkitty neljään tunneluokkaan. Parhaiten suorituskykyinen kokoonpano saavutettiin käyttämällä ELMo-sanaupotuksia ja POS-tunnisteita syötteenä, kaksisuuntaista GRU:ta piilotettuina yksiköinä ja SVM:ää lopullisena luokittelijana. Tämä kokoonpano saavutti 69,93%:n mikrokeskiarvon F1-pisteen kolmessa tärkeimmässä tunneluokassa, mikä ylitti lähtötilanteen 11,25%:lla.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse uut lähenemisviisi konteksti emotsioonide tuvastamise ülesandeks. Lähenemine põhineb neurofunktsioonide ekstraktoril, mis koosneb korduvast neurovõrgust tähelepanumehhanismiga, millele järgneb klassifitseerija, mis võib olla neuraalne või SVM-põhine. Hindasime mudelit SemEval 2019 ülesande 3 (EmoContext) andmekogumiga, mis sisaldab lühikesi 3-kordseid vestlusi, mis on märgistatud 4 emotsiooniklassiga. Parima tulemusega seadistus saavutati ELMo sõna manustamise ja POS siltide abil sisendina, kahesuunalise GRU-ga peidetud ühikutena ja SVM-iga lõpliku klassifitseerijana. See konfiguratsioon jõudis 69,93%-ni mikrokeskmise F1 skoori osas kolmes peamises emotsiooniklassis, mis ületas algsüsteemi 11,25%.', 'jv': 'Gambar iki rambarang panjenengan langkung saé nggawe ngupakan langkung apakno sing diranggunaké contextual. Genjer Awak dhéwé éntuk model karo dataset ing nggawe task 3 karo semiinval 2011 (EMOcontext), sing katêpakan karo pok 3-conversations, taggede karo 4 empresa. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Ngubah punika punika sing wis ana gambar 9.9% sing dirampakan, dadi F1 sing mengko kelas 3 empresan, sing kotak sing wis ngerasakno sistem sing basa sabanjuré 11.5%.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan nov pristop k nalogi kontekstualnega zaznavanja čustev. Pristop temelji na nevronskem ekstraktorju značilnosti, sestavljenem iz ponavljajoče se nevronske mreže z mehanizmom pozornosti, ki mu sledi klasifikator, ki je lahko nevronsko ali SVM temelji. Model smo ocenili s podatkovnim naborom naloge 3 SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), ki vključuje kratke 3-obratne pogovore, označene s 4 čustvenimi razredi. Najbolj učinkovita nastavitev je bila dosežena z uporabo ELMo besednih vdelav in POS oznak kot vhod, dvosmernega GRU kot skritih enot in SVM kot končnega klasifikatorja. Ta konfiguracija je dosegla 69,93% v smislu mikropovprečnega rezultata F1 v glavnih treh čustvenih razredih, rezultat, ki je presegel osnovni sistem za 11,25%.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר גישה חדשה למשימה של זיהוי רגשות קונטקסטיים. הגישה מבוססת על מחלץ תכונות עצביות, מורכבת מרשת עצבית חוזרת עם מנגנון תשומת לב, לאחר מכן על ידי מסווג, שיכול להיות מבוסס על עצבים או SVM. הערכנו את המודל עם קבוצת הנתונים של המשימה 3 של SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), אשר כולל שיחות קצרות בשלוש פנים, עם תווים עם 4 שיעורי רגשות. הגדרה הטובה ביותר הושגה בשימוש במילים ELMo תוספות ותגיות POS ככניסה, GRU bidirectional כיחידות חבויות, ו SVM כקליסר סופי. הגדרה הזאת הגיעה ל-69.93% במונחים של נקודת F1 מיקרומוצעית בשלוש שיעורי רגשות העיקריים, נקודה שעליה את מערכת הבסיס ב-11.25%.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana wata hanyoyi wa aikin na gane hisãbi wanda ke cikin a ƙunsa. Tsarin ya ƙayyade wani mai amfani da neural, wanda aka haɗa shi na wata shirin neural wanda ke daɗi da, yana da wani matsayin muhalli, kuma yana da wani mai fassarar, kan ta zama neural ko SvM-asanin. Mun ƙaddara shirin da aka canza tsarin aikin 3 na Semeval 2019 (EmoContContent), wanda ke ƙunsa da magana masu kasa da 3-turu, aka yi tagon da darafõfi 4. An sami tsarin da mafi kyaun yin aiki da aka amfani da maganar ELMo da tagogi masu fitarwa da PoS kamar shirin shiga, kuma sabo da shirin GRU kamar sunaye da aka ɓõye, kuma an sami SvM kamar fassarar ta ƙarami. Wannan tsarin ya isa ga 69.93% da aka ƙayyade micro-faɗi-f1 score kan darafõfin hisãbi 3 na farko, wani score wanda ya fizge na'urar fanel da 11.25%.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གནས་སྟངས་བཤད་ཀྱི་དོན་ལ་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་ཞིག་འགྲེལ་བཤད་པ་རེད། The approach is based on a neural feature extractor, composed of a recurrent neural network with an attention mechanism, followed by a classifier, that can be neural or SVM-based. We evaluated the model with the data set of the task 3 of SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), which includes short 3-turn conversations, tagged with 4 emotion classes. The best performing setup was achieved using ELMo word embeddings and POS tags as input, bidirectional GRU as hidden units, and an SVM as the final classifier. སྒྲིག་སྟངས་འདིས་རྩ་བའི་སྒེར་གྱི་མཐོང་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ནི་69.93%'}
{'en': 'A Fast and Accurate Partially Deterministic Morphological Analysis', 'ar': 'تحليل صرفي محدد جزئيًا سريع ودقيق', 'pt': 'Uma Análise Morfológica Parcialmente Determinística Rápida e Precisa', 'es': 'Un análisis morfológico parcialmente determinista rápido y preciso', 'fr': 'Une analyse morphologique partiellement déterministe rapide et précise', 'ja': '高速かつ正確な部分的決定論的形態学的分析', 'zh': '疾速确定性分', 'hi': 'एक तेज और सटीक आंशिक रूप से नियतात्मक रूपात्मक विश्लेषण', 'ru': 'Быстрый и точный частично детерминированный морфологический анализ', 'ga': 'Anailís Mhirfeolaíoch Pháirtchinntitheach Thapa agus Chruinn', 'ka': 'ბყპჱჲ თ ოპაგთლნჲ ევრვპმთნთჟრთფნჲ მჲპტჲლჲდთფნჲ ანალთჱთფვ.', 'el': 'Μια γρήγορη και ακριβής μερικώς Deterministische Μορφολογική Ανάλυση', 'hu': 'Gyors és pontos részlegesen determinisztikus morfológiai elemzés', 'it': "Un'analisi morfologica parziale deterministica veloce e accurata", 'lt': 'A Fast and Accurate Partially Deterministic Morphological Analysis', 'kk': 'Тез және дұрыс деңгейіндегі морфологикалық анализ', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'വേഗത്തിലും കണക്കിലും പാര്\u200dട്ടിക് തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Analiżi Morfoloġika Deterministika Parzjalment Imħaffa u Accurata', 'mn': 'Хурдан, тодорхой хэсэгт тодорхойлсон морфологик шинжилгээ', 'pl': 'Szybka i dokładna częściowo deterministyczna analiza morfologiczna', 'ro': 'O analiză morfologică parțial deterministă rapidă și precisă', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Brzi i precizni delimièno odreðeni morfološki analiz', 'so': 'Fast and Accurat partially Deterministic Morphological Analyse', 'si': 'ඉක්මනින් හා හරියට තියෙන්නේ අංශික විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය', 'sv': 'En snabb och exakt delvis deterministisk morfologisk analys', 'ta': 'ஒரு வேகம் மற்றும் கணக்கீடு பாகமாக தீர்மானிப்பு', 'ur': 'ایک سرعت اور دقیق قسم کے ذریعہ مقرر کردہ مورفولوژیک تحلیل', 'uz': 'Tez va hisoblash qismini aniqlashministic Morphological Analysis', 'vi': 'A Fast and Chính phu Partially deterministic Morphological Analysis', 'bg': 'Бърз и точен частично детерминистичен морфологичен анализ', 'nl': 'Een snelle en nauwkeurige gedeeltelijk deterministische morfologische analyse', 'hr': 'Brza i precizna djelomično određena morfološka analiza', 'da': 'En hurtig og præcis delvist deterministisk morfologisk analyse', 'de': 'Eine schnelle und genaue partiell deterministische morphologische Analyse', 'fa': 'یک تحلیل مورفولوژیک سریع و دقیق قسمتی', 'id': 'Analisi Morfologi Secara Secara Cepat dan Tepat', 'ko': '신속하고 정확한 부분 확정적 형태 분석', 'sw': 'A Fast and Accurate Partially Deterministic Morphological Analysis', 'tr': 'Häzir we Dyggat Marfolojik Analizi', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një analizë morfologjike e shpejtë dhe e saktë pjesërisht deterministe', 'am': 'ministry Morphological Analysis', 'hy': 'արագ և ճշգրիտ մասամբ որոշող մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծություն', 'az': 'Hızlı və Tam Bölümcül Marfolojik Analizi', 'bn': 'দ্রুত এবং গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিশ্লেষণ', 'bs': 'Brza i precizna djelomično određena morfološka analiza', 'cs': 'Rychlá a přesná částečně deterministická morfologická analýza', 'ca': 'Una anàlisi morfològica parcialment determinista ràpida i exacta', 'et': 'Kiire ja täpne osaliselt deterministlik morfoloogiline analüüs', 'fi': 'Nopea ja tarkka osittain deterministinen morfologinen analyysi', 'jv': 'Rasane karo akeh-akeh saiki diketeksi mroleksi', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Hitra in natančna delno deterministična morfološka analiza', 'he': 'ניתוח מורפולוגי מהיר ומדויק חלקי', 'bo': 'མགྱོག་དང་ཚད་རྩ་བ་ཅན་གྱིས་ཟེར་བ་སྤྱོད་མིན་ཐག་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'This paper proposes a partially deterministic morphological analysis method for improved processing speed. Maximum matching is a fast deterministic method for morphological analysis. However, the method tends to decrease performance due to lack of consideration of contextual information. In order to use maximum matching safely, we propose the use of Context Independent Strings (CISs), which are strings that do not have ambiguity in terms of morphological analysis. Our method first identifies CISs in a sentence using maximum matching without contextual information, then analyzes the unprocessed part of the sentence using a bi-gram-based morphological analysis model. We evaluate the method on a Japanese morphological analysis task. The experimental results show a 30 % reduction of running time while maintaining improved accuracy.', 'ar': 'تقترح هذه الورقة طريقة التحليل الصرفي القطعية جزئياً لتحسين سرعة المعالجة. المطابقة القصوى هي طريقة حتمية سريعة للتحليل الصرفي. ومع ذلك ، تميل الطريقة إلى انخفاض الأداء بسبب عدم مراعاة المعلومات السياقية. من أجل استخدام أقصى قدر من المطابقة بأمان ، نقترح استخدام السلاسل المستقلة للسياق (CIS) ، وهي سلاسل ليس بها غموض من حيث التحليل الصرفي. تحدد طريقتنا أولاً CISs في جملة باستخدام أقصى مطابقة بدون معلومات سياقية ، ثم تحلل الجزء غير المعالج من الجملة باستخدام نموذج التحليل الصرفي القائم على Bi-gram. نقوم بتقييم الطريقة على مهمة التحليل الصرفي اليابانية. تظهر النتائج التجريبية انخفاضًا بنسبة 30٪ في وقت التشغيل مع الحفاظ على الدقة المحسنة.', 'fr': "Cet article propose une méthode d'analyse morphologique partiellement déterministe pour améliorer la vitesse de traitement. L'appariement maximal est une méthode déterministe rapide pour l'analyse morphologique. Cependant, la méthode tend à diminuer les performances en raison du manque de prise en compte des informations contextuelles. Afin d'utiliser la correspondance maximale en toute sécurité, nous proposons l'utilisation de chaînes indépendantes du contexte (CIS), qui sont des chaînes qui ne présentent aucune ambiguïté en termes d'analyse morphologique. Notre méthode identifie d'abord les SIC dans une phrase en utilisant une correspondance maximale sans information contextuelle, puis analyse la partie non traitée de la phrase à l'aide d'un modèle d'analyse morphologique basé sur un bigramme. Nous évaluons la méthode sur une tâche d'analyse morphologique japonaise. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent une réduction de 30\xa0% du temps de fonctionnement tout en maintenant une précision améliorée.", 'es': 'Este artículo propone un método de análisis morfológico parcialmente determinista para mejorar la velocidad de procesamiento. El emparejamiento máximo es un método determinista rápido para el análisis morfológico. Sin embargo, el método tiende a disminuir el rendimiento debido a la falta de consideración de la información contextual. Para utilizar la máxima coincidencia de forma segura, proponemos el uso de cadenas independientes del contexto (CIS), que son cadenas que no tienen ambigüedad en términos de análisis morfológico. Nuestro método primero identifica los CIS en una oración utilizando la máxima coincidencia sin información contextual, luego analiza la parte no procesada de la oración utilizando un modelo de análisis morfológico basado en bigramas. Evaluamos el método en una tarea de análisis morfológico japonés. Los resultados experimentales muestran una reducción del 30% del tiempo de funcionamiento al tiempo que se mantiene una precisión mejorada.', 'pt': 'Este artigo propõe um método de análise morfológica parcialmente determinístico para melhorar a velocidade de processamento. O emparelhamento máximo é um método determinístico rápido para análise morfológica. No entanto, o método tende a diminuir o desempenho devido à falta de consideração das informações contextuais. Para usar o emparelhamento máximo com segurança, propomos o uso de Context Independent Strings (CISs), que são strings que não apresentam ambiguidade em termos de análise morfológica. Nosso método primeiro identifica CISs em uma frase usando correspondência máxima sem informações contextuais, depois analisa a parte não processada da frase usando um modelo de análise morfológica baseado em bigramas. Avaliamos o método em uma tarefa de análise morfológica japonesa. Os resultados experimentais mostram uma redução de 30% no tempo de execução, mantendo a precisão aprimorada.', 'ja': '処理速度向上のための部分決定論的な形態解析手法を提案した。最大マッチングは、形態分析のための迅速な決定論的方法である。しかしながら、この方法は、文脈情報の考慮不足のためにパフォーマンスが低下する傾向がある。最大限のマッチングを安全に使用するために、形態分析の観点で曖昧さを持たない文字列であるコンテキスト独立文字列（ CIS ）の使用を提案します。私たちの方法は、まず文中のCISをコンテキスト情報なしで最大マッチングを使用して識別し、次にバイグラムベースの形態解析モデルを使用して文の未処理部分を解析します。我々は、日本の形態解析タスクに基づいて方法を評価します。実験結果は、精度の向上を維持しながら、走行時間を３ ０ ％短縮することを示している。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर बेहतर प्रसंस्करण गति के लिए एक आंशिक रूप से नियतात्मक रूपात्मक विश्लेषण विधि का प्रस्ताव करता है। अधिकतम मिलान रूपात्मक विश्लेषण के लिए एक तेज नियतात्मक विधि है। हालांकि, विधि प्रासंगिक जानकारी के विचार की कमी के कारण प्रदर्शन को कम करने के लिए जाता है। अधिकतम मिलान को सुरक्षित रूप से उपयोग करने के लिए, हम संदर्भ स्वतंत्र स्ट्रिंग्स (सीआईएस) के उपयोग का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो स्ट्रिंग हैं जो रूपात्मक विश्लेषण के संदर्भ में अस्पष्टता नहीं रखते हैं। हमारी विधि पहले प्रासंगिक जानकारी के बिना अधिकतम मिलान का उपयोग करके एक वाक्य में सीआईएस की पहचान करती है, फिर द्वि-ग्राम-आधारित रूपात्मक विश्लेषण मॉडल का उपयोग करके वाक्य के असंसाधित हिस्से का विश्लेषण करती है। हम एक जापानी रूपात्मक विश्लेषण कार्य पर विधि का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बेहतर सटीकता बनाए रखते हुए चलने के समय की 30% की कमी दिखाते हैं।', 'zh': '立增益之分确定性形分析方法。 大匹者,形之速确定性也。 然无上下文信之虑,其法往往降性能。 为安用大匹,议用上下文无关字符串(CISs),此字符串形析无歧义。 吾法先以大匹识句之CIS,而无上下文信,然后以双克之形分析模型析句之未处理。 以日本形势论之。 实验结果表明者,所以重精也,所以缩短30%也。', 'ru': 'Предложен частично детерминированный метод морфологического анализа для повышения скорости обработки. Максимальное совпадение - это быстрый детерминированный метод морфологического анализа. Тем не менее, метод имеет тенденцию к снижению производительности из-за отсутствия рассмотрения контекстуальной информации. Для безопасного использования максимального совпадения мы предлагаем использовать контекстно-независимые строки (КИС), которые являются строками, не имеющими двусмысленности с точки зрения морфологического анализа. Наш метод сначала идентифицирует СНГ в предложении, используя максимальное соответствие без контекстной информации, затем анализирует необработанную часть предложения, используя модель морфологического анализа на основе биграмм. Мы оцениваем метод по задаче японского морфологического анализа. Экспериментальные результаты показывают сокращение времени работы на 30% при сохранении повышенной точности.', 'ga': "Molann an páipéar seo modh anailíse moirfeolaíoch atá páirteach i gcinntitheach le haghaidh luas próiseála feabhsaithe. Is modh mear cinntitheach é an mheaitseáil uasta le haghaidh anailíse moirfeolaíoch. Mar sin féin, is gnách go laghdóidh an modh feidhmíochta mar gheall ar easpa machnaimh ar fhaisnéis chomhthéacsúil. D'fhonn an mheaitseáil uasta a úsáid go sábháilte, molaimid úsáid a bhaint as Teaghráin Neamhspleácha Comhthéacs (CISanna), ar teaghráin iad nach bhfuil débhríocht acu i dtéarmaí anailíse moirfeolaíocha. Aithníonn ár modh SFSanna ar dtús in abairt ag baint úsáide as an meaitseáil uasta gan faisnéis chomhthéacsúil, ansin déanann sé anailís ar an gcuid neamhphróiseáilte den abairt ag baint úsáide as samhail anailíse moirfeolaíoch déghram-bhunaithe. Déanaimid measúnú ar an modh ar thasc anailíse moirfeolaíoch Seapánach. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha laghdú 30% ar an am reatha agus cruinneas feabhsaithe á chothabháil.", 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი განსაზღვრებულია პროცესის სიჩქარე განსაზღვრებულია მორპოლოგიური ანალიზის მეტი. მაქსიმალური შესაბამისება არის მორპოლოგიური ანალიზაციისთვის სწრაფად განსაბამისებული მეტი. მაგრამ მეტი უფრო ცნობიერებულ ინფორმაციის არსებობის გამოყენება შემდეგ გამოყენება. მაქსიმალური შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი გამოყენება, ჩვენ შევძლოთ კონტექსტური შესაბამისი სიტყვების გამოყენება, რომლებიც მორპოლოგიური ანალიზაციის შესახებ არ არ ჩვენი მეთოდი პირველი განსაზღვრდება CIS- ს წესში, რომელიც შემდეგ კონტექსტური ინფორმაციის მაქსიმალური შემდეგ გამოყენებული მაქსიმალური შემდეგების გამოყენება, და შემდეგ წესების ჩვენ ჯაპონეთის მოპოროლოგიური ანალიზის რაოდენობაზე გავამუშავებთ. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენება 30% გამრავლებული წარმოდგენების შემდეგ უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენება.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει μια μερικώς ντετερμινιστική μέθοδο μορφολογικής ανάλυσης για βελτιωμένη ταχύτητα επεξεργασίας. Η μέγιστη αντιστοίχιση είναι μια γρήγορη ντετερμινιστική μέθοδος μορφολογικής ανάλυσης. Ωστόσο, η μέθοδος τείνει να μειώσει την απόδοση λόγω έλλειψης προσοχής των σχετικών πληροφοριών. Προκειμένου να χρησιμοποιηθεί η μέγιστη δυνατή αντιστοίχιση με ασφάλεια, προτείνουμε τη χρήση ανεξάρτητων συμβολοσειρών περιβάλλοντος (που είναι συμβολοσειρές που δεν έχουν ασάφεια όσον αφορά τη μορφολογική ανάλυση. Η μέθοδος μας προσδιορίζει πρώτα το CIS σε μια πρόταση χρησιμοποιώντας τη μέγιστη αντιστοίχιση χωρίς πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος και στη συνέχεια αναλύει το μη επεξεργασμένο μέρος της πρότασης χρησιμοποιώντας ένα μοντέλο μορφολογικής ανάλυσης βασισμένο σε δύο γραμμάτια. Αξιολογούμε τη μέθοδο σε μια εργασία ιαπωνικής μορφολογικής ανάλυσης. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν 30% μείωση του χρόνου λειτουργίας διατηρώντας τη βελτιωμένη ακρίβεια.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány egy részben determinisztikus morfológiai elemzési módszert javasol a jobb feldolgozási sebesség érdekében. A maximális megfelelés egy gyors determinisztikus módszer a morfológiai elemzéshez. A módszer azonban hajlamos csökkenteni a teljesítményt a kontextuális információk figyelembevételének hiánya miatt. A maximális összehangolás biztonságos használata érdekében a kontextusfüggetlen karakterláncok (CIS) használatát javasoljuk, amelyek morfológiai elemzés szempontjából nem kétértelműek. Módszerünk először egy mondatban azonosítja a CIS-eket a kontextuális információk nélküli maximális megfeleléssel, majd a mondat feldolgozatlan részét egy bi-gramm alapú morfológiai elemzési modell segítségével elemzi. A módszert japán morfológiai elemzési feladat keretében értékeljük. A kísérleti eredmények a működési idő 30%-os csökkenését mutatják, miközben megőrzik a jobb pontosságot.', 'it': "Questo articolo propone un metodo di analisi morfologica parzialmente deterministica per migliorare la velocità di elaborazione. La corrispondenza massima è un metodo deterministico rapido per l'analisi morfologica. Tuttavia, il metodo tende a diminuire le prestazioni a causa della mancanza di considerazione delle informazioni contestuali. Al fine di utilizzare la massima corrispondenza in modo sicuro, proponiamo l'uso di Context Independent Strings (CIS), stringhe che non hanno ambiguità in termini di analisi morfologica. Il nostro metodo identifica i CIS in una frase utilizzando il matching massimo senza informazioni contestuali, quindi analizza la parte non elaborata della frase utilizzando un modello di analisi morfologica basato su bi-grammi. Valutiamo il metodo su un compito di analisi morfologica giapponese. I risultati sperimentali mostrano una riduzione del 30% del tempo di funzionamento mantenendo una maggiore precisione.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlomas iš dalies determinacinis morfologinės analizės metodas, skirtas pagerinti apdorojimo greitį. Didžiausias atitikimas yra greitas morfologinės analizės nustatymo metodas. Tačiau metodas paprastai mažina veiklos rezultatus, nes neatsižvelgiama į kontekstinę informaciją. Siekiant saugiai naudoti didžiausią atitiktį siūlome naudoti konteksto nepriklausomas juostas (CIS), kurios nėra dviprasmiškos morfologinės analizės požiūriu. Mūsų metodas pirmiausia nustato CIS sakinyje, naudojant didžiausią atitiktį be kontekstinės informacijos, tada analizuoja neapdorotą sakinio dalį naudojant dvigramais pagrįstą morfologinės analizės model į. Vertiname Japonijos morfologinės analizės metodą. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad 30 proc. sumažėja eksploatavimo trukmė, kartu išlaikant geresnį tikslumą.', 'mk': 'Овој документ предлага делумно дефинистички морфолошки метод за подобрување на брзината на процес. Максималното одговарање е брз децентристички метод за морфолошка анализа. Сепак, методот има тенденција да ја намали перформансата поради недостатокот на разгледување на контекстуалните информации. За безбедно да се користи максималното совпаѓање, предложуваме употреба на контекстни независни линии (CIS), кои се линии кои немаат двосмисленост во поглед на морфолошка анализа. Our method first identifies CISs in a sentence using maximum matching without contextual information, then analyzes the unprocessed part of the sentence using a bi-gram-based morphological analysis model.  Го проценуваме методот на јапонската морфолошка анализа. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат 30 отсто намалување на работното време, при што се одржува подобрена точност.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз өзгерту жылдамдығын жақсарту үшін бөлек анықтайтын морфологиялық анализ әдісін ұсынады. Максималды сәйкестік - морфологиялық анализ үшін жылдам дефицистикалық әдіс. Бірақ бұл әдіс тәртіпсіздік мәліметті қарастырылмаған себебі әрекетті азайтады. Максимумыз сәйкестікті қолдану үшін, морфологиялық анализ сәйкестігін қолдану үшін, контекстік Тәуелсіз жолдарды (CIS) қолдануға ұсынамыз. Біздің тәсіліміз бірінші сәйкестік мәліметі жоқ болмаса, көп грамм негіздеген морфологиялық анализ үлгісін қолдану үшін Сәйкестік бөлігін анықтайды. Жапон морфологиялық анализ тапсырмасының әдісін бағалаймыз. Тәжірибелі нәтижелер жақсы дұрыстығын сақтау үшін орындалған уақыттың 30% азайтуын көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mencadangkan kaedah analisis morfologik sebahagian menentukan untuk kelajuan pemprosesan yang lebih baik. Perpadanan maksimum adalah kaedah penentuan pantas untuk analisis morfologik. However, the method tends to decrease performance due to lack of consideration of contextual information.  Untuk menggunakan persamaan maksimum dengan selamat, kami cadangkan menggunakan String Independent Konteks (CIS), yang merupakan string yang tidak mempunyai ambiguity dalam terma analisis morfologik. Kaedah kami pertama mengenalpasti CIS dalam kalimat menggunakan persamaan maksimum tanpa maklumat kontekstual, kemudian menganalisis bahagian tidak diproses kalimat menggunakan model analisis morfologik berdasarkan bi-gram. Kami menilai kaedah pada tugas analisis morfologik Jepun. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan 30% pengurangan masa berjalan semasa mengekalkan ketepatan yang lebih baik.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വേഗത്തില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു ഭാഗം മോര്\u200dഫോള ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d പൊരുത്തുന്നത് മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d അന്യായം വേഗത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന രീതിയാണ്. എന്നാലും നിലവിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിഗണിക്കാതിരിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഈ രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രകടനം കുറവാണ്. കൂടുതല്\u200d സുരക്ഷിതമായ പൊരുത്തുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി, ഉള്ളിലുള്ള സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യ സ്ട്രൈങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d അന്യായം കാണിക്ക നമ്മുടെ രീതി ഒരു ജാപ്പനീസ് മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d അന്വേഷണ ജോലിയുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിലയിക്കുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടി നിര്\u200dവഹിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന സമയത്തിന്റെ 30% കുറവ് കാണിക്കു', 'mt': 'This paper proposes a partially deterministic morphological analysis method for improved processing speed.  Maximum matching is a fast deterministic method for morphological analysis.  Madankollu, il-metodu għandu t-tendenza li jnaqqas il-prestazzjoni minħabba nuqqas ta’ konsiderazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni kuntestwali. Sabiex jintuża l-qbil massimu b’mod sikur, nipproponu l-użu ta’ Strings Indipendenti tal-Kuntest (CISs), li huma strings li m’għandhomx ambigwità f’termini ta’ analiżi morfoloġika. Il-metodu tagħna l-ewwel jidentifika s-CISs f’sentenza bl-użu ta’ tqabbil massimu mingħajr informazzjoni kuntestwali, imbagħad janalizza l-parti mhux ipproċessata tas-sentenza bl-użu ta’ mudell ta’ analiżi morfoloġika bbażat fuq żewġ grammi. Nivvalutaw il-metodu fuq kompitu ta’ analiżi morfoloġika Ġappuniża. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru tnaqqis ta’ 30 % fil-ħin ta’ tħaddim filwaqt li tinżamm preċiżjoni mtejba.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас үйлдвэрлэлийн хурдыг сайжруулахын тулд хэсэг хэсэг тодорхойлсон морфологик шинжилгээний аргыг сануулдаг. Максимум холбоотой нь морфологик шинжилгээний хурдан тодорхойлолтын арга юм. Гэвч энэ арга нь орчин үеийн мэдээллийг санаагүй байдлаар үйл ажиллагааг багасгадаг. Хамгийн их тогтмол аюулгүй байдлыг ашиглахын тулд бид Контекст Независимын Стрингуудыг ашиглах боломжтой болно. Энэ нь морфологик шинжилгээний тухай хэмжээсгүй мөртгийг ашиглах боломжтой. Бидний арга хэмжээнд анх CIS-г тодорхойлж байдлын мэдээлэл байхгүй хамгийн их тогтмол ашиглаж, дараа нь хоёр грамм суурилсан морфологик шинжилгээний загварыг ашиглаж үзүүлдэггүй хэсгийг шинжилдэг. Бид япон морфологик шинжилгээний ажлын аргыг үнэлдэг. Ингээд туршилтын үр дүнд дамжуулах цаг хугацааны багасгалыг 30% харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret foreslår ein delvis deterministisk morfologisk analysmetode for forbetra handlingsfart. Høgste treff er ein rask deterministisk metode for morfologisk analyse. Metoden har imidlertid tendens til å redusera utviklinga på grunn av manglende forståking av kontekstinformasjon. For å bruka maksimum tredje tredje samsvar, foreslår vi bruk av kontekst uavhengige strengar (CIS), som er strengar som ikkje har uavhengighet i forhold til morfologisk analyse. Metoden vårt først identifiserer CIS i eit setning med maksimum samsvar utan kontekstinformasjon, og så analyserer den ugjennomsiktige delen av setninga med ein bisgrambasert morfologisk analyseringsmodell. Vi evaluerer metoden på eit japansk morfologisk analysesoppgåve. Eksperimentale resultatet viser ein 30% reduksjon av køyrende tid mens det gjer betre nøyaktighet.', 'pl': 'W artykule zaproponowano częściowo deterministyczną metodę analizy morfologicznej dla poprawy szybkości przetwarzania. Maksymalne dopasowanie jest szybką metodą deterministyczną analizy morfologicznej. Jednak metoda ta ma tendencję do zmniejszenia wydajności z powodu braku uwzględnienia informacji kontekstowych. W celu bezpiecznego wykorzystania maksymalnego dopasowania proponujemy zastosowanie Context Independent Strings (CIS), czyli ciągów, które nie mają dwujednoznaczności pod względem analizy morfologicznej. Nasza metoda najpierw identyfikuje CIS w zdaniu przy użyciu maksymalnego dopasowania bez informacji kontekstowych, a następnie analizuje nieprzetworzoną część zdania za pomocą bi-gramowego modelu analizy morfologicznej. Oceniamy metodę na japońskim zadaniu analizy morfologicznej. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują 30% skrócenie czasu pracy przy zachowaniu lepszej dokładności.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea propune o metodă de analiză morfologică parțial deterministă pentru îmbunătățirea vitezei de procesare. Potrivirea maximă este o metodă deterministă rapidă pentru analiza morfologică. Cu toate acestea, metoda tinde să scadă performanța din cauza lipsei de luare în considerare a informațiilor contextuale. Pentru a utiliza corespondența maximă în siguranță, propunem utilizarea șirurilor independente de context (CIS), care sunt șiruri care nu au ambiguitate în ceea ce privește analiza morfologică. Metoda noastră identifică mai întâi CIS-urile într-o propoziție folosind potrivirea maximă fără informații contextuale, apoi analizează partea neprocesată a propoziției folosind un model de analiză morfologică bazat pe bi-gram. Evaluăm metoda pe o sarcină de analiză morfologică japoneză. Rezultatele experimentale arată o reducere cu 30% a timpului de funcționare, menținând în același timp o precizie îmbunătățită.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže delimično određenu metodu morfološke analize za poboljšanu brzinu obrade. Maksimalno odgovaranje je brza deterministička metoda morfološke analize. Međutim, metoda se tendencija smanjiti učinkovitost zbog nedostatka razmatranja kontekstualnih informacija. Da bismo sigurno iskoristili maksimalni odgovarajući odgovarajući, predlažemo korištenje kontekstskih nezavisnih strijeva (CIS), koje su strijevi koje nemaju ambiguitet u smislu morfološke analize. Naša metoda prvo identifikuje CIS u rečenici koristeći maksimalno odgovaranje bez kontekstualnih informacija, a onda analizira neprocijeđeni deo rečenice koristeći model morfološke analize na dvogramu. Procjenjujemo metodu japanske morfološke analize. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju smanjenje trčanja 30% dok održava poboljšanu tačnost.', 'so': 'Warqaddaas wuxuu qeyb ahaan u soo jeedaa qaabab baaritaanka morphologiga ah oo loo beddelayo dhaqdhaqaaqa baaritaanka. Tilmaanshada ugu badnaan waa qaab dhaqso ah oo ku qoran baaritaanka morphologiga. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, qaabku waa inuu hoos u qaadaa sameynta sababtoo ah baahida ka fiirsashada macluumaadka soo socda. Si aan ugu badnaan u isticmaalno si ammaan ah, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa isticmaalka isticmaalka xadhka xornimada ah ee gudaha (CISs), taas oo ah xadhigyo aan qallafsanaanayn wax ku saabsan baaritaanka morphologiga ah. Metalkeena marka ugu horeysa wuxuu CISs ugu muuqanayaa hadal ku habboon si ugu badnaan macluumaad la’aan ah, markaasna wuxuu u baaritaa qayb ka mid ah ereyga aan la baaraandegayn, wuxuuna ku baaritaa model baaritaanka morphological ah oo bi-gram-based ah. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa qaababka ku saabsan shaqada baaritaanka morphologiga ee Japanese. Abaalka imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda 30% reduserka waqtiga socda, marka la sii soconayo saxda horumarinta.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats föreslår en delvis deterministisk morfologisk analysmetod för förbättrad bearbetningshastighet. Maximal matchning är en snabb deterministisk metod för morfologisk analys. Metoden tenderar dock att minska prestanda på grund av brist på hänsyn till kontextuell information. För att använda maximal matchning på ett säkert sätt föreslår vi användning av Context Independent Strings (CISs), som är strängar som inte har tvetydighet när det gäller morfologisk analys. Vår metod identifierar först CISs i en mening med maximal matchning utan kontextuell information och analyserar sedan den obearbetade delen av meningen med hjälp av en bi-grambaserad morfologisk analysmodell. Vi utvärderar metoden på en japansk morfologisk analysuppgift. De experimentella resultaten visar en 30-procentig minskning av körtiden samtidigt som noggrannheten bibehålls.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරවේගයක් වැඩි වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේගයක් විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ විශේෂණ විධානයක විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා වේගයෙන් නිර්දේශ විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයක් වෙනුවෙන්. නමුත් විදියට පරීක්ෂණය අඩුවෙන්න පුළුවන් විදියට පරීක්ෂණය අඩුවෙන්න පුළුවන්. සම්පූර්ණය නිදහස් ස්ට්\u200dරින්ස් (CIS) භාවිතා කරන්න, අපි සංවේදනය නිදහස් ස්ට්\u200dරින්ස් භාවිතා කරන්න පුළුවන්, මේ ස්ට්\u200dරින්ස අපේ විධානය පළමු වාර්තාවය CISs වාක්ෂාවක් වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු නැති විසින් සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණයක් භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200d අපි ජාපානි විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ කාර්යාවක් ගැන විධානය අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් 30% කාලයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වැඩිය', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் ஒரு பாகமாக தீர்மானிக்கப்பட்ட morphological analysis method for improved processing speed. அதிகபட்ச பொருத்தம் ஒரு வேகமான தீர்மானிப்பு முறை ஆனாலும், தற்காலிக தகவலை பார்க்காமல் செயல்பாட்டை குறைக்கும் முறையாகும். அதிகபட்ச பாதுகாப்பாக பொருத்துவதை பயன்படுத்த, நாம் உள்ளடக்க சுதந்திரமான சரங்களை பயன்படுத்துவதை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இது மோர்போலிகல் ஆய்வு ப எங்கள் முறைமையில் முதலில் CISகளை ஒரு வாக்கில் அதிகபட்ச பொருந்தும் பொருத்தம் இல்லாமல் கண்டுபிடிக்கும், பின்னர் செயல்படாத வாக்கின் பகுதியை பிக We evaluate the method on a Japanese morphological analysis task.  சோதனை முடிவு', 'ur': 'This paper proposes a partially deterministic morphological analysis method for improved processing speed. سب سے زیادہ مطابق ایک سریع تعریف طریقہ ہے مورفولوژیکی تحلیل کے لئے۔ لیکن، اس طریقہ کی عملکرد کمزور ہوتی ہے، اس طریقہ کی وجہ سے متوسط معلومات کی کمزوری کی وجہ سے۔ مہربانی مطابق مطابق مطابق استعمال کرنے کے لئے، ہم متوسط بے نیاز استرینگ (CIS) کے استعمال کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جو استرینگ ہیں جن کی مدرفلوژیکی تحلیل کے مطابق غلطی نہیں ہے. ہمارا طریقہ پہلے ایک جماعت میں CISs کو معلوم کرتا ہے کہ مہربانی معلومات کے بغیر مہربانی کے مطابق مہربانی کے مطابق مہربانی کے مطابق مہربانی کرتا ہے، پھر ایک دوگرم بنیادی مورفولوژیک تحلیل موڈل کے مطابق بغ ہم ایک ژاپنی مورفولوژیک تحلیل کے کام پر طریقہ کا ارزش کرتے ہیں۔ آزمائش نتیجے 30% کم ہونے کے وقت کو دکھاتے ہیں جب کہ وہ بہترین دقیق حفاظت کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Ushbu qog\xa0Ľoz qo\xa0Ľllanmalarning tezligini oshirish uchun qiymatik morfologik analytik usulini tahrirlaydi. Name Lekin, bu usul ta\xa0ľminlovchi ma\xa0ľlumotni tasdiqlash sababini bajaradi. Ko'pchilik soni ishlatish uchun biz murojaat qilamiz, murfologik analytiki davomida murakkab bo\xa0Ľlmaydi. Bizning birinchi usuli CISlarni birinchi so'z bilan bir xil ma\xa0ľlumot yo\xa0Ľq qo'l bilan bir gram asosida o'xshash bo\xa0Ľlmagan so\xa0Ľzning qismini analyzer. Biz Japoniya morfologik analytik vazifasini qiymatimiz. Name", 'vi': 'Đề tài này đề xuất một phương pháp phân tích theo kiểu quyết định cố định, giúp cải thiện tốc độ xử lý. Sự khớp tối đa là một phương pháp quyết định nhanh chóng cho phân tích morphology. Tuy nhiên, phương pháp có xu hướng giảm hiệu suất do thiếu cân nhắc các thông tin ngữ cảnh. Để sử dụng độ khớp tối đa một cách an to àn, chúng tôi đề nghị sử dụng các dây thừng độc lập tương ứng (CIS), những sợi dây không có sự mơ hồ về phân tích lịch sử. Cách của chúng ta đầu tiên xác định các CIS trong một câu, dùng cách khớp tối đa không có các nội dung thông tin, sau đó phân tích phần không được xử lý của câu, bằng cách sử dụng một mô hình phân tích lịch từ lưỡng gram. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp phân tích lịch sử của Nhật. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy sự giảm độ chính xác cao của thời gian chạy.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия предлага частично детерминистичен морфологичен анализ за подобряване на скоростта на обработка. Максималното съвпадение е бърз детерминистичен метод за морфологичен анализ. Методът обаче има тенденция да намалява ефективността поради липса на разглеждане на контекстуалната информация. За да се използва максимално съвпадение безопасно, предлагаме използването на Контекст независими низове (които са низове, които нямат двусмисленост по отношение на морфологичния анализ. Нашият метод първо идентифицира CIS в изречение, използвайки максимално съвпадение без контекстуална информация, след което анализира необработената част от изречението, използвайки модел на морфологичен анализ на базата на биграма. Оценяваме метода по задача за японски морфологичен анализ. Експерименталните резултати показват 30% намаляване на времето за работа, като същевременно се поддържа подобрена точност.', 'da': 'Denne artikel foreslår en delvist deterministisk morfologisk analysemetode til forbedret bearbejdningshastighed. Maksimal matching er en hurtig deterministisk metode til morfologisk analyse. Metoden har imidlertid tendens til at mindske ydeevnen på grund af manglende overvejelse af kontekstuel information. For at bruge maksimal matching sikkert, foreslår vi brug af Context Independent Strings (CISs), som er strenge, der ikke har tvetydighed med hensyn til morfologisk analyse. Vores metode identificerer først CISs i en sætning ved hjælp af maksimal matching uden kontekstuel information, og analyserer derefter den uforarbejdede del af sætningen ved hjælp af en bi-gram baseret morfologisk analysemodel. Vi evaluerer metoden på en japansk morfologisk analyseopgave. De eksperimentelle resultater viser en 30% reduktion af køretiden samtidig med at den forbedrede nøjagtighed opretholdes.', 'nl': 'Dit document stelt een gedeeltelijk deterministische morfologische analysemethode voor voor een verbeterde verwerkingssnelheid. Maximum matching is een snelle deterministische methode voor morfologische analyse. De methode heeft echter de neiging om prestaties te verminderen door gebrek aan aandacht voor contextuele informatie. Om maximale matching veilig te kunnen gebruiken, stellen we het gebruik van Context Independent Strings (CIS) voor, dit zijn strings die geen dubbelzinnigheid hebben in termen van morfologische analyse. Onze methode identificeert eerst CIS in een zin met behulp van maximale matching zonder contextuele informatie, vervolgens analyseert het onbewerkte deel van de zin met behulp van een bi-gram-gebaseerd morfologisch analysemodel. We evalueren de methode op een Japanse morfologische analysetaak. De experimentele resultaten tonen een 30% vermindering van de looptijd met behoud van verbeterde nauwkeurigheid.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže djelimično određenu metodu morfološke analize za poboljšanu brzinu obrade. Maksimalno odgovaranje je brzi deterministički metod morfološke analize. Međutim, metoda se čini smanjiti učinkovitost zbog nedostatka razmatranja kontekstualnih informacija. Da bismo sigurno koristili maksimalnu odgovarajuću odgovarajuću odgovarajuću odgovarajuću odgovarajuću odgovarajuću odgovarajuću odgovornost, predlažemo korištenje neovisnih žica konteksta (CIS), koje su žice koje nemaju ambiguitet u smislu morfološke analize. Naša metoda prvo identificira CIS u rečenici koristeći maksimalno odgovaranje bez kontekstualnih informacija, a zatim analizira neprocijeđeni dio rečenice koristeći model morfološke analize na dvogramu. Procjenjujemo metodu japanske morfološke analize. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju smanjenje trčanja vrijeme od 30% dok održava poboljšanu preciznost.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit schlägt eine teilweise deterministische morphologische Analysemethode zur Verbesserung der Verarbeitungsgeschwindigkeit vor. Maximum Matching ist eine schnelle deterministische Methode zur morphologischen Analyse. Allerdings neigt die Methode dazu, die Leistung aufgrund fehlender Berücksichtigung von Kontextinformationen zu verringern. Um maximale Übereinstimmung sicher zu nutzen, schlagen wir die Verwendung von Context Independent Strings (CIS) vor, die Strings sind, die keine Ambiguität hinsichtlich der morphologischen Analyse aufweisen. Unsere Methode identifiziert zunächst CIS in einem Satz mit maximalem Matching ohne Kontextinformationen und analysiert dann den unverarbeiteten Teil des Satzes mithilfe eines bi-grammbasierten morphologischen Analysemodells. Wir evaluieren die Methode anhand einer japanischen morphologischen Analyseaufgabe. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen eine 30% Reduzierung der Laufzeit bei gleichzeitiger Aufrechterhaltung einer verbesserten Genauigkeit.', 'ko': '처리 속도를 높이기 위해 본고는 일부 확정적인 형태 분석 방법을 제시했다.최대 일치는 신속하게 확정된 형태 분석 방법이다.그러나 상하문 정보에 대한 고려가 부족하기 때문에 이런 방법은 종종 성능을 떨어뜨린다.가장 큰 일치를 안전하게 사용하기 위해서, 우리는 상하문 무관 문자열 (CIS) 을 사용하는 것을 권장합니다. 이것은 형태 분석에 있어서 다른 뜻이 없는 문자열입니다.우리의 방법은 먼저 상하문 정보가 없는 상황에서 가장 큰 일치 식별 문장 중의CIS를 사용한 다음에 쌍그림을 바탕으로 하는 형태학 분석 모델을 이용하여 문장에서 처리되지 않은 부분을 분석한다.우리는 일본 형태학 분석 임무의 방법을 평가했다.실험 결과 높은 정밀도를 유지하는 동시에 운행 시간이 30% 감소한 것으로 나타났다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک روش تحلیل مورفولوژیک قسمتی تعریف می\u200cکند برای سرعت تحلیل بهبود. Maximum matching is a fast deterministic method for morphological analysis. ولی این روش به دلیل ناتوانی از توجه به اطلاعات موضوع کمتر عمل می شود. برای استفاده از مهمترین مسابقه با امن، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از مسابقه مستقل (CIS) که استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از روش ما اول CIS را در یک جمله با استفاده از مطالعه بیشترین مسابقه بدون اطلاعات موضوع شناسایی می کند، سپس بخشی از جمله بی\u200cپرداخت را با استفاده از یک مدل تحلیل morfolوژیکی بر بنیاد دو گرم تحلیل می کند. ما روش را بر روی یک کار تحلیل مورفولوژیک ژاپنی ارزیابی می کنیم. نتیجه آزمایشی 30 درصد کاهش زمان اجرا در حالی که دقیقات بهتر را نگه می دارد نشان می دهد.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengusulkan metode analisis morfologis parsial determinis untuk memperbaiki kecepatan proses. Percocokan maksimum adalah metode deterministik cepat untuk analisis morfologi. Namun, metode cenderung untuk mengurangi prestasi karena kurang mempertimbangkan informasi kontekstual. Untuk menggunakan persamaan maksimum dengan aman, kami mengusulkan menggunakan Context Independent Strings (CIS), yang adalah string yang tidak memiliki ambiguity dalam terma analisis morfologis. Metode kita pertama mengidentifikasi CIS dalam kalimat menggunakan persamaan maksimum tanpa informasi kontekstual, kemudian menganalisis bagian yang belum diproses kalimat menggunakan model analisis morfologis berdasarkan bi-gram. Kami mengevaluasi metode pada tugas analisis morfologis Jepang. Hasil percobaan menunjukkan 30% pengurangan waktu berjalan sementara mempertahankan ketepatan yang lebih baik.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linapendekeza njia ya uchambuzi wa kimaadili kwa kiasi kikubwa ya upasuaji wa haraka. Kupambana na kiwango kikubwa ni mbinu za uhakika kwa uchambuzi wa kimaadilojia. Hata hivyo, mbinu hiyo huenda kupunguza ufanisi wa kutekeleza kwa sababu ya kutokuwepo kwa kutafakari taarifa za kisasa. Ili kutumia matumizi yanayofanana kwa usalama zaidi, tunapendekeza matumizi ya mistari ya Uhuru wa Mazingira (CISs), ambayo ni viungo ambavyo havina ufahamu kwa ajili ya uchambuzi wa kimaadilojia. Utawala wetu wa kwanza unaonyesha CIS katika hukumu hiyo kwa kutumia ushirikiano wa kiasi kikubwa bila taarifa za kimataifa, kisha anachambua sehemu ya hukumu ambayo haijadhibiti kwa kutumia mifano ya uchambuzi wa kimaadilojia kwa kutumia mifano ya kibiashara. Tunatathmini njia ya uchambuzi wa kimaadili wa Japani. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kupunguza kwa asilimia 30 ya muda unaoendelea wakati wa kuendelea kuendelea sahihi.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz i힊le첵채n 첵체ze geli힊mek 체챌in par챌a deterministik morfolojik analizi t채ze teklip ed첵채r. 횦체klemek 체챌in i흫 kop g철rkezili힊i morfolojik anal첵zy 체챌in tiz deterministik bir d채ldir. 횦철ne 힊u 첵agda첵 챌yky힊y흫y g철rkezilmesi 체챌in 첵ok bol첵ar. G체venlik gabdalygy ullanmak 체챌in Kontekst Senesasy Strigi (CIS) ullany힊yny teklip etmek 체챌in, bu morfolojik analizi 첵aly 첵ok strigi d채ldir. Bizi흫 t채zimimiz ilkinji gezek senedi흫 CIS'i du힊u힊yga g철r채 tekst maglumaty bolmasa ullan첵an, so흫ra 챌i-gram da첵an첵an morfolojik anal첵zy흫 modelini ullan첵ar. 횦aponi첵a morfolojik 챌철z체mleme t채blisasynda 챌yk첵arys. Deneymeli netijeler dogry 첵agda첵y goramak wagtyny 30% azalt첵ar.", 'af': "Hierdie papier voorstel 'n deel bepaalde morfologiese analisie metode vir verbeterde proses spoed. Maksimum ooreenstemming is 'n vinnige deterministiese metode vir morfologiese analisie. Maar die metode verklein die prestasie vanweë die ontdekking van kontekslike inligting. Om maksimum ooreenstemmende seker te gebruik, voorstel ons die gebruik van Konteks Onfhanklike Strings (CIS), wat is strings wat nie beperk het in terms van morfologiese analisie nie. Ons metode eerste identifiseer CIS in 'n seting met maksimum ooreenstemming sonder kontekslike inligting, dan analyseer die onverwerkte deel van die seting deur gebruik van 'n bi-gram-gebaseerde morfologiese analisie model. Ons evalueer die metode op 'n Japanse morfologiese analisie taak. Die eksperimentale resultate vertoon 'n 30% reduksie van looptyd terwyl die verbeterde presisie onderhou.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument propozon një metodë pjesërisht përcaktuese të analizës morfologjike për shpejtësinë e përmirësimit të procesit. Maximum matching is a fast deterministic method for morphological analysis.  Megjithatë, metoda ka tendencë të zvogëlojë performancën për shkak të mungesës së konsideratës së informacionit kontekstual. Me qëllim që të përdorim përshtatjen maksimale me siguri, propozojmë përdorimin e Strings të Pavarur të Kontekstit (CIS), të cilat janë stringa që nuk kanë dyshimi në lidhje me analizën morfologjike. Metoda jonë identifikon së pari CIS në një frazë duke përdorur përputhje maksimale pa informacion kontekstual, pastaj analizon pjesën e paprocesuar të frazës duke përdorur një model analize morfologjike bazuar në dy gram. Ne vlerësojmë metodën në një detyrë analize morfologjike japoneze. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë një reduktim 30% të kohës së funksionimit ndërsa mbajnë saktësinë e përmirësuar.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም በክፍል የሞሮፎሎጂ አካላቢ የፍጥረት ፈጥኖ ለማሻሻል ሥርዓት ያሳያል፡፡ መተላለፊያ ለሞሮፎሎጂ ትምህርት የሚደረግ ፈጥኖ እውቀት ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የሁለተኛውን መረጃ በማስተዋል ምክንያት የድምፅ ውጤት ማሳሰቢያውን ያጎድላል፡፡ በጸጥታ ለመጠቀም፣ የውስጥ ነፃነት ግንኙነት (CIS) መጠቀሚያ ለመጠቀም እናስጀክራለን፡፡ ቀድሞ የፊደል ሥርዓታችን ሲሲሲን በቁጥጥር በተቃውሞ መረጃ ሳይኖር በማስተካከል በሚያሳየው ውይይት እና በቢ-gram-based morphological analysis model በመጠቀም የፍርዱን ክፍል ያሳያል፡፡ የጃፓን የሞሮፎሎጂ ትምህርት ስራትን እናስተምር:: የፈተናው ውጤቶች ትክክለኛነትን በመጠበቅ ጊዜ የሚሮጥ ዘመን 30 በመቶ የሚያጎድል ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը առաջարկում է մասամբ որոշող մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծության մեթոդ բարելավելու արագության համար: Մաքսիմալ համապատասխանությունը մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծության արագ որոշող մեթոդ է: Այնուամենայնիվ, մեթոդը հակված է նվազեցնել արտադրողականությունը կոնտեքստալ ինֆորմացիայի բացակայության պատճառով: Ամենավտանգ համապատասխանման օգտագործման համար մենք առաջարկում ենք օգտագործել Կոնտեքստի անկախ լարեր (CIS), որոնք լարեր են, որոնք մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծության առումով անկախ են: Մեր մեթոդը նախ հայտնաբերում է CIS-ները նախադասության մեջ, օգտագործելով մեծագույն համապատասխանությունը առանց կոնտեքստային ինֆորմացիայի, հետո վերլուծում է նախադասության անմշակված մասը, օգտագործելով երկագրամանով հիմնված մոդել: Մենք գնահատում ենք ճապոնական մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծության մեթոդը: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ աշխատանքի ժամանակը 30 տոկոսով նվազեցվում է, մինչդեռ պահպանվում է բարելավված ճշգրտությունը:', 'az': "Bu kağıt işləmə sürətini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün parçacıq deterministik morfolojik analizi metodlarını təklif edir. Maksimum eşitmə morfolojik analizi üçün hızlı deterministik bir yoldur. Lakin metod müxtəlif məlumatların ehtiyacı yoxdur. Maksimum təhlükəsizlik istifadə etmək üçün, Morfolojik analizi ilə müəyyən edilməyən səhifələrdir, Kontekst bağımsız səhifələri (CIS) istifadəsini təklif edirik. Bizim metodumuz ilk cümlədə müxtəlif məlumatı olmadan maksimum uyğunlama işlədən CIS'ləri tanıyır, sonra cümlənin birgram-tabanlı morfolojik analizi modeli ilə işlədilməmiş parçasını analizir. Biz Japon morfolojik analizi işində metodları değerləşdiririk. Müxtəlif sonuçlar, daha doğruluğu qorumaq üçün çalışma vaxtının 30% azaltmasını göstərir.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি প্রক্রিয়ার গতি উন্নত করার জন্য একটি অংশিকভাবে নির্ধারিত মরোফোলগিক বিশ্লেষণ পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করে। সর্বোচ্চ মিল্যাট হচ্ছে মরোফোলিক্যাল বিশ্লেষণের জন্য একটি দ্রুত নির্ধারিত পদ্ধতি। কিন্তু প্রাক্তন তথ্যের বিবেচনার অভাবের কারণে এই পদ্ধতি কমে যায়। সর্বোচ্চ মিলিয়ে নিরাপদে ব্যবহার করার জন্য আমরা বিভিন্ন স্বাধীন স্ট্রিং ব্যবহারের প্রস্তাব প্রদান করি, যেগুলো মোরফোলিক্যাল বিশ্লেষণের মাধ আমাদের পদ্ধতি প্রথমে সিআইএসকে একটি বাক্যে সর্বোচ্চ মিলিয়ে দেয়া হয়েছে যাতে প্রাক্তন তথ্য ছাড়া ব্যবহার করে, তারপর বিগ্রাম ভিত্তিক মরোফোলিক্যাল বিশ আমরা জাপানের মরোফোলিকাল বিশ্লেষণ কাজের মাধ্যমে এই পদ্ধতিকে মূল্যায়ন করি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল ৩০% চালানোর সময় কমিয়ে দেখাচ্ছে আরো সঠিক অবস্থায় থাকার সময়ে।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predlaže djelimično određenu metodu morfološke analize za poboljšanu brzinu obrade. Maksimalno odgovaranje je brza deterministička metoda morfološke analize. Međutim, metod se čini smanjiti učinkovitost zbog nedostatka razmatranja kontekstualnih informacija. Da bismo sigurno koristili maksimalnu odgovarajuću odgovarajuću odgovarajuću, predlažemo korištenje kontekstskih nezavisnih strijeva (CIS), koje su strijevi koje nemaju ambiguitet u smislu morfološke analize. Naša metoda prvo identificira CIS u rečenici koristeći maksimalno odgovaranje bez kontekstualnih informacija, a onda analizira neprocijeđeni dio rečenice koristeći model morfološke analize na dvogramu. Procjenjujemo metodu japanske morfološke analize. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju smanjenje trčanja 30% dok održava poboljšanu preciznost.', 'ca': "Aquest paper propon un mètode d'anàlisi morfològic parcialment determinant per a millorar la velocitat de processament. La combinació màxima és un mètode determinista ràpid per a l'anàlisi morfològic. Però el mètode tendeix a disminuir el rendiment degut a la falta de consideració de la informació contextual. Per tal d'utilitzar la combinació màxima de manera segura, proposem l'ús de Cadenes Independents del Context (CIS), que són cadenes que no tenen ambigüitat en termes d'anàlisi morfològic. El nostre mètode identifica primer els SIC en una frase utilitzant la combinació màxima sense informació contextual, després analitza la part no processada de la frase utilitzant un model d'anàlisi morfològic basat en dos grames. Evaluam el mètode d'una tasca d'anàlisi morfològica japonesa. Els resultats experimentals mostren una reducció del 30% del temps d'execució mantenint una millor precisió.", 'cs': 'Tento článek navrhuje částečně deterministickou morfologickou analýzu pro zlepšení rychlosti zpracování. Maximální shoda je rychlá deterministická metoda morfologické analýzy. Metoda však má tendenci snižovat výkon kvůli nedostatečnému zohlednění kontextových informací. Pro bezpečné využití maximálního shodování navrhujeme použití Context Independent Strings (CIS), což jsou řetězce, které nemají nejednoznačnou morfologickou analýzu. Naše metoda nejprve identifikuje CIS ve větě pomocí maximálního shodování bez kontextových informací, následně analyzuje nezpracovanou část věty pomocí bi-gramového morfologického analýzního modelu. Metodu hodnotíme na japonské morfologické analýze. Experimentální výsledky ukazují 30% snížení provozní doby při zachování vyšší přesnosti.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö pakub välja osaliselt deterministliku morfoloogilise analüüsi meetodi töötlemiskiiruse parandamiseks. Maksimaalne sobitamine on kiire deterministlik morfoloogilise analüüsi meetod. Kuid meetod kipub vähendama tulemuslikkust kontekstiteabe puudumise tõttu. Maksimaalse sobitamise ohutuks kasutamiseks pakume välja kontekstist sõltumatute stringide (CIS) kasutamine, mis on stringid, millel ei ole morfoloogilise analüüsi mõttes ebaselgust. Meie meetod tuvastab kõigepealt CIS lauses maksimaalse sobivuse ilma kontekstiteabeta, seejärel analüüsib lause töötlemata osa, kasutades bi-grammipõhist morfoloogilist analüüsi mudelit. Hindame meetodit Jaapani morfoloogilise analüüsi ülesandel. Katsetulemused näitavad tööaja 30% vähenemist, säilitades samas parema täpsuse.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotetaan osittain determinististä morfologista analyysimenetelmää prosessinopeuden parantamiseksi. Maximum matching on nopea deterministinen menetelmä morfologiseen analyysiin. Menetelmällä on kuitenkin taipumus heikentää suorituskykyä kontekstitietojen puutteen vuoksi. Jotta maksimaalista yhteensopivuutta voitaisiin käyttää turvallisesti, ehdotamme Context Independent Strings (CIS) -merkkijonojen käyttöä, jotka ovat merkkijonoja, joilla ei ole epäselvyyttä morfologisen analyysin suhteen. Menetelmämme tunnistaa ensin CIS:n lauseessa käyttämällä maksimaalista vastaavuutta ilman kontekstitietoja, minkä jälkeen analysoimme käsittelemättömän osan lauseesta käyttäen bi-grammapohjaista morfologista analyysimallia. Menetelmää arvioidaan japanilaisessa morfologisessa analyysitehtävässä. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että käyttöaika lyhenee 30% ja tarkkuus paranee.', 'ha': "Wannan takardar da ke buƙata wani rabo na ƙayyade fassarar morfologi mai fassarawa. @ info: whatsthis A lokacin da, metoden ya kamata yin sauri ga aikin, kuma bã ya kasancẽwa ga haƙƙatan lãbãri na guda. Dõmin a yi amfani da shi ga iyakar faɗi wanda ya yi daidai da aminci, sai mu buƙata amfani da amfani da jumfaƙo na Maintainer Content (CISs), wanda ke samu'in da ba'a ƙunci ba da cikin fassarar mutane. Tsarin mu na farko na gane CISs a cikin birnin da ya yi amfani da kima mai daidai idan ba da wani ilmi na haɗi ba, sa'an nan kuma ya yi anaƙayyade rabon maganar da ba'a zartar da shi ba, da wani misali mai Analojiya na bi-gram. Tuna ƙaddara metoden a kan wani aikin mutafaloci na Japane. Matarin da aka jarraba yana ƙara 30% wa lokacin da za'a yi amfani da shi a lokacin da ya gyara tsari.", 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציעה שיטת ניתוח מורפולוגית חלקית למהירות עיבודה משתפרת. התאמה מקסימלית היא שיטה קבענית מהירה לניתוח מורפולוגי. עם זאת, השיטה נוטה להפחית ביצועים בגלל חוסר השקול של מידע קונטוקטואלי. כדי להשתמש בהתאמה מקסימלית בבטחה, אנו מציעים השימוש בשורות עצמאות הקונקסט (Context Independent Strings, CISs), אשר הם חוטים שאין ספריות במונחים של ניתוח מורפולוגי. השיטה שלנו מזהה קודם את CIS במשפט באמצעות התאמה מקסימלית ללא מידע קונטקסטי, ואז מנתח את החלק הלא מושלם של המשפט באמצעות מודל ניתוח מורפולוגי מבוסס על ביגרם. אנחנו מעריכים את השיטה על משימה ניתוח מורפולוגי יפני. התוצאות הניסיוניים מראות 30% פחית זמן הריצה בזמן שמירה מדויקת משתפרת.', 'jv': 'Bu leter tekombe sistem partial sistem sistemi sistem tarjamahan modrolojek nggawe Jejaring batasan ujian. NAME OF TRANSLATORS Ngayon-ngopo, perambut kuwi nglilakake iso nglilakake tarjamahan seneng Informasi contextual. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awakdhéwé ngéndigo pertualangan nambah CIS nang watilih We assess the method on a japanese transformative test task. Laptop" and "Desktop', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predlagana delno deterministična metoda morfološke analize za izboljšanje hitrosti obdelave. Maksimalno ujemanje je hitra deterministična metoda za morfološko analizo. Vendar pa metoda zmanjšuje učinkovitost zaradi pomanjkanja upoštevanja kontekstualnih informacij. Za varno uporabo maksimalnega ujemanja predlagamo uporabo Context Independent Strings (CIS), ki so nizi, ki nimajo dvoumnosti glede morfološke analize. Naša metoda najprej identificira CIS v stavku z uporabo maksimalnega ujemanja brez kontekstualnih informacij, nato analizira nepredelani del stavka z uporabo modela morfološke analize na podlagi dvogramov. Metodo ocenimo na japonski morfološki analizi. Poskusni rezultati kažejo 30% skrajšanje časa delovanja ob ohranjanju izboljšane natančnosti.', 'bo': 'ཤོག ཆེ་ཤོས་མཐུན་ནི་མགྱོག་མྱུར་ཚད་ལུགས་སྟངས་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་རེད འོན་ཀྱང་། ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་གནས་ཚུལ་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆེད་དུ་རྐྱེན་ཚད་དཀོན་ཡོད། In order to use maximum matching safely, we propose the use of Context Independent Strings (CISs), which are strings that do not have ambiguity in terms of morphological analysis. In order to use maximum matching safely, we propose the use of Context Independent Strings (CISs), which are strings that do not have ambiguity in terms of morphological analysis. ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་པོ་དེ་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་ཡིག འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཐབས་ལམ་ཇུས་པོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གྲུབ་ཕྱོགས་གནད་སྡུད་དག་བདེན་པར་ཡར་རྒྱས་བཞིན་པའི་དུས་ཚོད་རྒལ་དུས་ཡར་ཚད་ལྡན་སྐྱོན་རུང་'}
{'en': 'incom.py-A Toolbox for Calculating Linguistic Distances and Asymmetries between Related Languages', 'ar': 'incom.py - صندوق أدوات لحساب المسافات والتفاوتات اللغوية بين اللغات ذات الصلة', 'fr': 'incom.py - Une boîte à outils pour calculer les distances linguistiques et les asymétries entre des langues apparentées', 'es': 'incom.py: una caja de herramientas para calcular las distancias y asimetrías lingüísticas entre idiomas relacionados', 'pt': 'incom.py - Uma caixa de ferramentas para calcular distâncias linguísticas e assimetrias entre idiomas relacionados', 'ja': 'incom ─ ─関連言語間の言語距離と非対称性を計算するためのツールボックス', 'hi': 'incom.py - संबंधित भाषाओं के बीच भाषाई दूरी और विषमताओं की गणना के लिए एक टूलबॉक्स', 'zh': 'incom.py - 以计语言之工具箱', 'ru': 'incom.py - Панель инструментов для вычисления лингвистических расстояний и асимметрий между родственными языками', 'ga': 'incom.py - Bosca Uirlisí chun Fad Teangeolaíoch agus Neamhshiméadrachtaí idir Teangacha Gaolmhara a Ríomh', 'ka': 'მოსახლეები. py - ლინგისტიკური განსხვავებების და აჟიმეტრიების კალკულაციისთვის ხელსაწყო', 'hu': 'jövedelem. py - Eszköztár a nyelvi távolságok és aszimmetriák kiszámítására a kapcsolódó nyelvek között', 'el': 'Εισόδημα. Πλαίσιο εργαλείων για τον υπολογισμό γλωσσικών αποστάσεων και ασυμετριών μεταξύ σχετικών γλωσσών', 'it': 'incom. py - Una cassetta degli strumenti per il calcolo delle distanze linguistiche e delle asimmetrie tra lingue correlate', 'lt': 'pajamos. py - Kalbų atstumų ir asimetrijų tarp susijusių kalbų apskaičiavimo įrankių langelis', 'mk': 'Приход. py - Папка со алатки за пресметување на јазичните оддалечености и асиметрии помеѓу поврзаните јазици', 'ms': 'Masuk. py - A Toolbox for Calculating Language Distances and Asymmetries between Related Languages', 'kk': 'келесі. py - Тілдер арасындағы лингвистикалық қашықтар мен асиметрлерді есептеу үшін құрал панелі', 'ml': 'incom. പി - ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്ക് ദുരിതങ്ങളും അസിമീറ്ററികളും കണക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു ടൂള്\u200dബോക്സ്', 'mt': 'dħul. py - A Toolbox for Calculating Linguistic Distances and Asymmetries between Related Languages', 'mn': 'орлого. py - Холбооны хоорондох хэлний хоорондох хэлбэрийн хоорондох хэлбэрүүдийг тооцоолох хэрэгсэл', 'no': 'innteken. py – Eit verktøykasse for å rekna ut lingsavstandar og aksimetrir mellom tilhøyrande språk', 'pl': 'wpływ. py.Zestaw narzędzi do obliczania odległości językowych i asymetrii między językami pokrewnymi', 'ro': 'venit. py - O cutie de instrumente pentru calcularea distanțelor lingvistice și asimetriilor între limbi conexe', 'so': 'dakhli. py - A Toolbox for xisaabinta cudurada Linguistic and Asymmetries between relevant luqadaha', 'sv': 'inkomst. py - En verktygslåda för att beräkna språkliga avstånd och asymmetrier mellan relaterade språk', 'si': 'ඉන්න. py - සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවක් අතර සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවක් අතර සඳහා භාෂාවක් ගණනය කරන්න උපකරණ බොක්ස්', 'sr': 'Prihod. py - Kutija alata za raèunanje lingvistièkih udaljenosti i asimetrija izmeðu povezanih jezika', 'ta': 'நுழை. பி - தொடர்புடைய மொழிகளுக்கும் இடையே உள்ள வரிசை தொலைவுகளுக்கும் கணக்கிடும் கருவிப்பெட்டி', 'ur': 'income. py - ایک ٹولبوکس لینگیسٹی فاصلہ اور مرتبہ زبانوں کے درمیان آسیمیٹر کا شمار کرنے کے لئے', 'uz': 'incom. Name', 'vi': 'Không. Chỉ mục A Dành cho Tính cách ngôn ngữ và giới hạn giữa ngôn ngữ liên quan', 'bg': 'Incom. Инструменти за изчисляване на езикови разстояния и асиметрии между сродните езици', 'da': 'indkomst. py - En værktøjskasse til beregning af sproglige afstande og asymmetrier mellem beslægtede sprog', 'nl': 'inkomens. py.Een Toolbox voor het berekenen van taalkundige afstanden en asymmetrieën tussen verwante talen', 'hr': 'Prihod. py - Kutija alata za računanje lingviskih udaljenosti i asimetrija između povezanih jezika', 'de': 'Einkommen. py.Eine Toolbox zur Berechnung sprachlicher Entfernungen und Asymmetrien zwischen verwandten Sprachen', 'id': 'masuk. py - A Toolbox for Calculating Linguistic Distances and Asymmetries between Related Languages', 'ko': 'incom。py - 관련 언어 간의 언어 거리와 비대칭성을 계산하는 도구 상자', 'fa': 'درآمد. py - یک جعبه ابزار برای محاسبه فاصله\u200cهای لینگیستیک و آسیمتری بین زبانهای ارتباط', 'sw': 'income. py - Boko la Kifaa kwa Kuhisi Magonjwa ya Kilinguistic na Asymmetri kati ya lugha zinazohusiana', 'sq': 'Të ardhurat. py - A Toolbox for Calculating Linguistic Distances and Asymmetries between Related Languages', 'tr': 'Gelir. py - Diller arasyndaky çyzgytlyk we görkezilmeler arasynda hesaplamak üçin bir Esbap Zolaky', 'af': "inkom. py - ' n Nutsbalk vir bereken Linguistiese Afstand en Asymmetries tussen Verwante Taal", 'am': 'ኢ py - A Toolbox for calculating Linguistic Distances and Asymmetries between Related Languages', 'hy': 'incom. py - Լեզվային հեռավորությունների և հարաբերված լեզուների միջև հաշվարկման գործիքների արկղ', 'az': 'g톛lir. py - Linguistik m톛saf톛l톛ri v톛 dill톛r aras캼ndak캼 asimetri hesablamaq 칲칞칲n bir alet qutusu', 'bn': 'আয়। পি- সম্পর্কিত ভাষার মধ্যে লিঙ্গিস্টিক দূর্ঘটনা এবং প্রজাতন্ত্র গণনা করার জন্য একটি টুলবাক্স', 'et': 'sissetulek. py - Tööriistakast keeleliste kauguste ja asümmeetriate arvutamiseks seotud keelte vahel', 'cs': 'příchod. py.Toolbox pro výpočet jazykových vzdáleností a asymetrie mezi souvisejícími jazyky', 'bs': 'Prihod. py - Kutija alata za računanje lingviskih udaljenosti i asimetrija između povezanih jezika', 'ca': "ingressos. py - Una caixa d'eines per calcular les distàncies lingüístiques i asimetries entre les llengües relacionades", 'fi': 'tulo. py - Työkalulaatikko kielisten etäisyyksien ja epäsymmetrioiden laskemiseen sukulaisten kielten välillä', 'jv': 'echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world pi - Una Ark kanggo Kemerdekaan Distance Linguistik lan As2013 terusan langgambar', 'sk': 'dohodek. py - Orodja za izračun jezikovnih razdalj in asimetrij med sorodnimi jeziki', 'he': 'הכנסה. Name', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu Babu - Wata Box na Kayyar da Akwai Mai Gabatar da Distance na Linguistic and Asymmetries between Linguistics', 'bo': 'ཚུར་འབྱོར། py - སྐད་རིགས་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་དབར་ཚད་རྩིས་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ལག་ཆ་སྒྲོམ་ཅིག་'}
{'en': 'Languages may be differently distant from each other and their mutual intelligibility may be asymmetric. In this paper we introduce incom.py, a toolbox for calculating linguistic distances and asymmetries between related languages. incom.py allows linguist experts to quickly and easily perform statistical analyses and compare those with experimental results. We demonstrate the efficacy of incom.py in an incomprehension experiment on two Slavic languages : Bulgarian and Russian. Using incom.py we were able to validate three methods to measure linguistic distances and asymmetries : Levenshtein distance, word adaptation surprisal, and conditional entropy as predictors of success in a reading intercomprehension experiment.', 'es': 'Los idiomas pueden estar distantes entre sí de manera diferente y su inteligibilidad mutua puede ser asimétrica. En este artículo presentamos incom.py, una caja de herramientas para calcular las distancias y asimetrías lingüísticas entre idiomas relacionados. incom.py permite a los expertos lingüistas realizar análisis estadísticos de forma rápida y sencilla y compararlos con los resultados experimentales. Demostramos la eficacia de incom.py en un experimento de incomprensión en dos idiomas eslavos: búlgaro y ruso. Con incom.py pudimos validar tres métodos para medir las distancias y asimetrías lingüísticas: la distancia de Levenshtein, la sorpresa de adaptación de palabras y la entropía condicional como predictores del éxito en un experimento de intercomprensión lectora.', 'fr': "Les langues peuvent être différentes les unes des autres et leur intelligibilité mutuelle peut être asymétrique. Dans cet article, nous présentons incom.py, une boîte à outils permettant de calculer les distances linguistiques et les asymétries entre les langues apparentées. incom.py permet aux experts en linguistique d'effectuer rapidement et facilement des analyses statistiques et de les comparer avec des résultats expérimentaux. Nous démontrons l'efficacité de incom.py dans une expérience d'incompréhension sur deux langues slaves\xa0: le bulgare et le russe. À l'aide de incom.py, nous avons pu valider trois méthodes pour mesurer les distances et les asymétries linguistiques\xa0: la distance de Levenshtein, l'adaptation de mots surprise et l'entropie conditionnelle comme prédicteurs de succès dans une expérience d'intercompréhension en lecture.", 'pt': 'As línguas podem estar diferentemente distantes umas das outras e sua inteligibilidade mútua pode ser assimétrica. Neste artigo apresentamos o incom.py, uma caixa de ferramentas para calcular distâncias linguísticas e assimetrias entre idiomas relacionados. O incom.py permite que especialistas em linguística realizem análises estatísticas com rapidez e facilidade e comparem-nas com resultados experimentais. Demonstramos a eficácia do incom.py em um experimento de incompreensão em duas línguas eslavas: búlgaro e russo. Usando o incom.py, conseguimos validar três métodos para medir distâncias e assimetrias linguísticas: distância de Levenshtein, surpresa de adaptação de palavras e entropia condicional como preditores de sucesso em um experimento de intercompreensão de leitura.', 'ar': 'قد تكون اللغات بعيدة عن بعضها البعض وقد يكون مفهومها المتبادل غير متماثل. في هذا البحث نقدم incom.py ، وهو صندوق أدوات لحساب المسافات اللغوية وعدم التناسق بين اللغات ذات الصلة. يسمح incom.py للخبراء اللغويين بإجراء التحليلات الإحصائية بسرعة وسهولة ومقارنة النتائج التجريبية. نوضح فاعلية incom.py في تجربة عدم فهم لغتين سلافيتين: البلغارية والروسية. باستخدام incom.py ، تمكنا من التحقق من صحة ثلاث طرق لقياس المسافات والتفاوتات اللغوية: مسافة Levenshtein ، ومفاجأة تكيف الكلمات ، والنتروبيا الشرطية كمتنبئين للنجاح في تجربة فهم القراءة.', 'ja': '言語は互いに異なって遠く離れていてもよく、互いの明瞭性は非対称であってもよい。この論文では、関連する言語間の言語距離と非対称性を計算するためのツールボックスであるincom ─を紹介します。incom ─を使用すると、言語学の専門家は統計分析を迅速かつ簡単に実行し、それらを実験結果と比較することができます。私たちは、ブルガリア語とロシア語の2つのスラブ語の理解不能実験で、incom ─の有効性を実証しました。言語間距離と非対称性を測定するための3つの方法を検証することができました。レーベンシュタイン距離、単語適応の驚き、および条件付きエントロピーは、読解相互理解実験の成功の予測因子です。', 'zh': '言语之间或不同,而其解性或非。 本文,我们将介绍 incom.py,这是一个用算相关言语的语言距与不对的工具箱。 incom.py 使言者得疾轻行统计分析,比之实验。 二斯拉夫之言(保加利亚语与俄语)之不解实验验 incom.py 之有效性。 用 incom.py 验三术以测言不对称性:Levenshtein相去,单词应超验熵为读相解实验成功之占也。', 'ru': 'Языки могут быть по-разному удалены друг от друга, и их взаимная разборчивость может быть асимметричной. В этой статье мы вводим incom.py, набор инструментов для расчета лингвистических расстояний и асимметрий между родственными языками. incom.py позволяет лингвистам быстро и легко выполнять статистические анализы и сравнивать их с экспериментальными результатами. Эффективность incom.py мы демонстрируем в эксперименте непонимания двух славянских языков: болгарского и русского. Используя incom.py, мы смогли подтвердить три метода измерения лингвистических расстояний и асимметрий: расстояние Левенштейна, сюрпризная адаптация слов и условная энтропия в качестве предсказателей успеха в эксперименте по межпониманию чтения.', 'hi': 'भाषाएं एक-दूसरे से अलग-अलग दूर हो सकती हैं और उनकी पारस्परिक समझदारी असममित हो सकती है। इस पेपर में हम incom.py पेश करते हैं, संबंधित भाषाओं के बीच भाषाई दूरी और विषमताओं की गणना के लिए एक टूलबॉक्स। incom.py भाषाविद विशेषज्ञों को जल्दी और आसानी से सांख्यिकीय विश्लेषण करने और प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों के साथ उन लोगों की तुलना करने की अनुमति देता है। हम दो स्लाव भाषाओं पर एक समझ से बाहर प्रयोग में incom.py की प्रभावकारिता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं: बल्गेरियाई और रूसी। incom.py का उपयोग करके हम भाषाई दूरी और विषमताओं को मापने के लिए तीन तरीकों को मान्य करने में सक्षम थे: Levenshtein दूरी, शब्द अनुकूलन surprisal, और सशर्त एन्ट्रॉपी एक पढ़ने intercomprehension प्रयोग में सफलता के भविष्यवाणियों के रूप में।', 'ga': 'D’fhéadfadh teangacha a bheith difriúil óna chéile agus d’fhéadfadh go mbeadh a gcomhthuiscint neamhshiméadrach. Sa pháipéar seo tugaimid isteach incom.py, bosca uirlisí chun faid agus neamhshiméadrachtaí teanga idir teangacha gaolmhara a ríomh. Ligeann incom.py do shaineolaithe teangeolaíochta anailísí staitistiúla a dhéanamh go tapa agus go héasca agus iad siúd a bhfuil torthaí turgnamhacha acu a chur i gcomparáid lena chéile. Léirímid éifeachtúlacht incom.py i dturgnamh tuisceana ar dhá theanga Shlavacha: an Bhulgáiris agus an Rúisis. Trí úsáid a bhaint as incom.py bhíomar in ann trí mhodh a bhailíochtú chun faid agus neamhshiméadrachtaí teanga a thomhas: fad Levenshtein, ionadh oiriúnú focal, agus eantrópacht choinníollach mar thuar ratha i dturgnamh léamhthuisceana.', 'hu': 'A nyelvek eltérőek lehetnek egymástól, és kölcsönös érthetőségük aszimmetrikus lehet. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a jövedelmet. py, egy eszköztár a kapcsolódó nyelvek közötti nyelvi távolságok és aszimmetriák kiszámítására. jövedelem. A py lehetővé teszi a nyelvészek számára, hogy gyorsan és egyszerűen végezzenek statisztikai elemzéseket, és összehasonlítsák azokat a kísérleti eredményekkel. Bemutatjuk a jövedelem hatékonyságát. Két szláv nyelven: a bolgár és az orosz nyelven végzett értelmetlen kísérletben. Használja a bevételt. A nyelvi távolságok és aszimmetriák mérésére három módszert sikerült validálnunk: Levenshtein távolság, szóadaptáció meglepő és feltételes entrópia, mint a siker előrejelzői egy olvasásközi kísérletben.', 'el': 'Οι γλώσσες μπορεί να είναι διαφορετικά μακρινές μεταξύ τους και η αμοιβαία κατανόησή τους μπορεί να είναι ασύμμετρη. Στην παρούσα εργασία εισάγουμε το εισόδημα. py, μια εργαλειοθήκη για τον υπολογισμό γλωσσικών αποστάσεων και ασυμμετριών μεταξύ σχετικών γλωσσών. Εισόδημα. Το επιτρέπει στους γλωσσολόγους να εκτελούν γρήγορα και εύκολα στατιστικές αναλύσεις και να συγκρίνουν αυτές με πειραματικά αποτελέσματα. Αποδεικνύουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα του εισοδήματος. Σε ένα πείραμα ασάφειας σε δύο σλαβικές γλώσσες: τη βουλγαρική και τη ρωσική. Χρησιμοποίησε το εισόδημα. Καταφέραμε να επικυρώσουμε τρεις μεθόδους μέτρησης γλωσσικών αποστάσεων και ασυμμετριών: απόσταση Λέβενστιν, αναπάντεχο προσαρμογής λέξεων, και υπό όρους εντροπία ως προβλέψεις επιτυχίας σε ένα πείραμα ανάγνωσης.', 'ka': 'ენები შეიძლება განსხვავებული განსხვავებული იყოს ერთმანეთიდან, და ისინი ერთმანეთის ინტელეგილიგიტებით შეიძლება არიმეტრიული იყოს. გჲ ჲგჲ£ გვჟრვპ \x8dვ ოპვეოჲჱნავმვ ეჲჟრა. py, ინგლინგისტიკური განტოლებების და ასიმეტრიების განსაზღვრებისთვის ხელსაწყობილობა. მოსახლეები. py უნდა ლინგურისტის ექსპერტებს ძალიან და ადვილად სტატისტიკური ანალიზების გავაკეთოთ და ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგებით შემდგენოთ. ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ინფორმაციის ეფექტიურობა. py - ბულდარიური და პროსიური ექსპერიმენტი. თჱოჲლჱგამვ ეჲჟრა. py ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ სამი მეტოვები, რომელიც სიტყვების განმავლობაში და ასიმეტრიების განმავლობაში: Levenshtein განმავლობაში, სიტყვების ადაპრატიკაციის განმავლობაში, და შემდეგ ენტროპია როგორც წარმატების წ', 'kk': 'Тілдер бір-бірінен айырмашылық болуы мүмкін, бір-бірінен айырмашылық болуы мүмкін. Бұл қағаздың артықшылығын таңдаймыз. py, тілдер арасындағы лингвистикалық қашықтар мен асимметрияларды есептеу үшін құрал панелі. келесі. py лингвистикалық эксперттердің статистикалық анализацияларды тез және оңай жасауға мүмкіндік береді және оны эксперименталдық нәтижелерімен салыстырып салыстыру Келдердің эффектілігін көрсетедік. py - Болгария және Руссия тілдерінің екі слав тілдерінде түсінбеген экспериментінде. Кіріс қолданылады. py біз лингвистикалық қашықтарды мен асимметрияларды өлшеу үшін үш әдістерді тексеруге мүмкін болдық: Левенштейн қашықтығы, сөздердің адаптациясы әдімгі және шарт ентропиясы оқу тәжірибесінде сәттілікті', 'it': "Le lingue possono essere diverse l'una dall'altra e la loro mutua intelligibilità può essere asimmetrica. In questo articolo introduciamo il reddito. py, una cassetta di strumenti per il calcolo delle distanze linguistiche e delle asimmetrie tra lingue correlate. incom. py consente agli esperti linguisti di eseguire rapidamente e facilmente analisi statistiche e confrontare quelle con risultati sperimentali. Dimostriamo l'efficacia del reddito. In un esperimento di incomprensione su due lingue slave: bulgaro e russo. Usando il reddito. Con py siamo stati in grado di validare tre metodi per misurare le distanze linguistiche e le asimmetrie: distanza Levenshtein, adattamento delle parole surprisale e entropia condizionale come predittori di successo in un esperimento di intercomprensione di lettura.", 'lt': 'Kalbos gali būti skirtingai atokios viena nuo kitos, o abipusis jų supratimas gali būti asimetriškas. Šiame dokumente pristatome pajamas. py – įrankių rinkinys, skirtas apskaičiuoti kalbinius atstumus ir asimetrijas tarp susijusių kalbų. pajamos. py leidžia kalbos ekspertams greitai ir lengvai atlikti statistines analizes ir palyginti jas su eksperimentiniais rezultatais. Mes parodome pajamų veiksmingumą. per nesuprantamą eksperimentą dviem slavų kalbomis: bulgarų ir rusų kalbomis. Naudojant pajamas. py mes sugebėjome patvirtinti tris metodus kalbiniams atstumams ir asimetrijoms matuoti: Levenshtein atstumas, žodžio pritaikymas stebuklingas, ir sąlyginė entropija kaip sėkmės prognozuotojai skaitymo tarpusavio supratimo eksperimente.', 'mk': 'Јазиците можат да бидат различно далеку еден од друг и нивната взаемна разбирливост може да биде асиметрична. Во овој весник го претставуваме приходот. py, кутија со алатки за пресметка на јазичните растојанија и асиметрија помеѓу поврзаните јазици. Приход. py овозможува јазичните експерти брзо и лесно да извршат статистички анализи и да ги споредат со експерименталните резултати. Демонстрираме ефикасност на приходот. Пи во неразбирачки експеримент на два словачки јазици: бугарски и руски. Користам приход. py успеавме да потврдиме три методи за мерење на јазичните оддалечености и асиметрии: оддалеченост на Levenshtein, изненадувачки адаптација на зборовите, и условна ентропија како предвидувачи на успех во прочитањето меѓуразбирачки експеримент.', 'ms': 'Bahasa mungkin berbeza jauh dari satu sama lain dan pemahaman mereka berdua mungkin tidak simetri. Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan pendapatan. py, kotak alat untuk mengira jarak bahasa dan asimetri antara bahasa berkaitan. Masuk. py membenarkan ahli bahasa untuk melakukan analisis statistik dengan cepat dan mudah dan membandingkan dengan hasil eksperimen. Kami menunjukkan efektiviti pendapatan. py dalam percubaan tidak faham pada dua bahasa Slavic: Bulgarian dan Rusia. Menggunakan incom. py kami mampu sahkan tiga kaedah untuk mengukur jarak bahasa dan asimetri: jarak Levenshtein, penyesuaian perkataan mengejutkan, dan entropi syarat sebagai prediksor sukses dalam percubaan antara pemahaman bacaan.', 'mt': "Il-lingwi jistgħu jkunu differenti minn xulxin u l-intelliġibbiltà reċiproka tagħhom tista’ tkun asimetrika. F'dan id-dokument nintroduċu d-dħul. py, kaxxa ta’ għodod għall-kalkolu tad-distanzi lingwistiċi u l-asimetriji bejn il-lingwi relatati. dħul. py allows linguist experts to quickly and easily perform statistical analyses and compare those with experimental results.  Aħna nuru l-effikaċja tad-dħul. p f’esperiment ta’ inkonsistenza fuq żewġ lingwi Slavi: Bulgaru u Russu. L-użu tad-dħul. p inkunu kapaċi jivvalidaw tliet metodi biex tkejjel id-distanzi lingwistiċi u l-asimetriji: id-distanza Levenshtein, l-adattament tal-kelma sorprendenti, u l-entropija kundizzjonali bħala predikaturi tas-suċċess f’esperiment ta’ interkomprensjoni tal-qari.", 'ml': 'ഭാഷകള്\u200d തമ്മില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമായി ദൂരെയായിരിക്കാം. അവരുടെ പരസ്പര ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയുള്ള ബുദ്ധിമുട്ട ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വര്\u200dഷം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. പൈ, ലിങ്കിസ്റ്റിക്ക് ദൂരം കണക്ക് ചെയ്യാനുള്ള ഒരു ടൂള്\u200dബോക്സ് incom. പി ഭാഷ വിശേഷികള്\u200dക്ക് വേഗം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് പെട്ടെന്ന് പരിശ നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ഫലം കാണിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടു സ്ലാവിക്ക് ഭാഷകളില്\u200d ഒരു പരീക്ഷണ പരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d പ്രശ്നമുണ്ട്: ബുള്\u200dഗേറിയനും റഷ്യനും. വര്\u200dഷം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. മൂന്നു രീതികളും ഭാഷ അസിമീറ്ററികളും അളന്നുകൊടുക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് സാധിച്ചിരുന്നു. ലെവെന്\u200dഷ്ടെയിന്\u200d ദൂരത്ത്, വാക്ക് അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d ആശ്ചര്യപ്പെട', 'mn': 'Хүмүүс бие биенээс өөр хоорондоо хол байж болох бөгөөд тэдний харилцааны оюун ухааны талаар тэнцүү байж болох юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид орлого тайлбарладаг. py, хэлний зай, асимметрийг холбоотой хэлний хооронд тооцоолох хэрэгсэл хайрцаг. орлого. py хэлний мэргэжилтнүүддээ статистикийн шинжилгээг хурдан, амархан хийж, туршилтын үр дүнтэй харьцуулах боломжтой. Бид орлогын үр дүнг үзүүлдэг. Хоёр Slavic хэл дээр ойлгохгүй туршилт дээр py: Болгарч, Орос. Үрөнгө ашиглаж байна. Бид хэл хэлний зай, асимметрийг хэмжих гурван арга хэрэглэж чадсан: Левенштейн зай, үг адаптацийн гайхамшигтай, нөхцөл энтропи унших туршилтын амжилтын тодорхойлогч болсон.', 'no': 'Språk kan vera forskjellig distant frå kvarandre, og deres mutual intelligibilitet kan vera asymmetrisk. I denne papiret introduserer vi innteken. py, eit verktøykasse for å rekna ut lingviske avstandar og asymmetrir mellom tilhøyrande språk. innteken. Name Vi viser effekten av inntekene. py i eit eksperiment for inkompresjon på to slaviske språk: Bulgarsk og russisk. Bruk innteken. py vi kunne validera tre metodar for å måle linguistiske avstandar og asymmetrier: Levenshtein avstanden, ordadaptasjon overraska og kondicionalt entropi som foregåver av suksess i ein lesingseksperiment for interkomprehension.', 'pl': 'Języki mogą być różnie odległe od siebie, a ich wzajemna zrozumiałość może być asymetryczna. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy dochody. py, zestaw narzędzi do obliczania odległości językowych i asymetrii pomiędzy językami powiązanymi. wpływ. py umożliwia językoznawcom szybkie i łatwe przeprowadzanie analiz statystycznych i porównywanie tych z wynikami eksperymentalnymi. Pokazujemy skuteczność dochodów. Pij w eksperymencie niezrozumienia na dwóch językach słowiańskich: bułgarskim i rosyjskim. Używając komunikacji. Udało nam się zweryfikować trzy metody pomiaru odległości językowych i asymetrii: odległość Levensteina, zaskoczenie adaptacji słów oraz entropię warunkową jako predyktory sukcesu w eksperymencie intercomprehension czytania.', 'ro': 'Limbile pot fi diferit îndepărtate una de cealaltă, iar inteligibilitatea lor reciprocă poate fi asimetrică. În această lucrare introducem venitul. py, un set de instrumente pentru calcularea distanțelor lingvistice și a asimetriilor dintre limbile conexe. venit. py permite experților lingviști să efectueze rapid și ușor analize statistice și să le compare cu rezultate experimentale. Noi demonstrăm eficacitatea venitului. py într-un experiment de neînțelegere pe două limbi slave: bulgară și rusă. Folosind veniturile. Am putut valida trei metode de măsurare a distanţelor lingvistice şi asimetriilor: distanţa Levenshtein, adaptarea cuvântului surpriză şi entropia condiţionată ca predictori ai succesului într-un experiment de interînţelegere a citirii.', 'sr': 'Jezici mogu biti drugačije daleko od jedne od druge, a njihova zajednička inteligencija može biti asimetrična. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prihod. py, kutija alata za izračunavanje jezičkih udaljenosti i asimetrija između povezanih jezika. Prihod. py omogućava lingvističkim ekspertima da brzo i lako izvrše statističke analize i usporede one sa eksperimentalnim rezultatima. Pokazujemo efikasnost prihoda. py u eksperimentu nesprehenzije na dva slavička jezika: Bugarski i Ruski. Koristim prihod. Bili smo u mogućnosti da potvrdimo tri metode za mjerenje jezičkih udaljenosti i asimetrija: udaljenost levenshteina, iznenađujuće riječi adaptacije i uvjetne entropije kao predviđatelje uspeha u eksperimentu za pročitanje međukompresije.', 'si': 'භාෂාවල් එක්කෙනෙක්ගෙන් වෙනස් දුරක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් ඒ වගේම ඔවුන්ගේ සමාන්\u200dය වි මේ පත්තරේ අපි ආයෝජනය කරනවා. Python ඉන්න. py භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක විශ්වාසිකයන්ට ඉක්මනින් සහ පරක්ෂක විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න සහ පරීක්ෂක ප්\u200dරතිචාරි අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා ඇවිත්වයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. ස්ලාව්වික් භාෂාවක් දෙකක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙනවා: බුල්ගරියාන් සහ රුසියාන්. ඇවිත් පාවිච්චි කරනවා. py අපිට පුළුවන් විදිහට භාෂාවික දුරස්ථානය සහ අසිමිත්\u200dරීය අවශ්\u200dය විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න විදිහට තුනක් විශ්වාස කරන්න: ලෙවෙන්ස්ටීන් දුර', 'so': 'Luqaduhu qaarkood qaarka kale way ka fogaan karaan, waxgarashada labadooduna waxay noqon karaan mid caafimaad ah. Warqadan waxaan ku soo bandhignaa dakhliga. py, sanduuq qalabka lagu xisaabinayo safarka luuqadaha iyo asymmetriyada ku dhexeeya luuqadaha la xiriira. dakhli. py wuxuu si dhaqso ah u sameynayaa baaritaanka takhasuska iyo si fudud u sameynta arimaha imtixaanka. Waxaynu muujinnaa saamaynta dakhliga. baaritaanka shaqo la’aanta ee laba luqadood oo Slavic ku qoran: Bulgaariyan iyo Ruush. Isku isticmaalka dakhliga. Waxaynu awoodi kari jirnay si aan u xaqiijinno saddex qaab oo aan ku qiyaasto safarka luqada iyo asymmetriyada: Levenshtein fog, hadalka beddelka oo la yaabsan karo, iyo qoritaanka shuruudaha ah oo ku qori karo liibaanka hoose-dhexe.', 'sv': 'Språk kan vara olika avlägset från varandra och deras ömsesidiga begriplighet kan vara asymmetrisk. I denna uppsats introducerar vi inkomst. py, en verktygslåda för att beräkna språkliga avstånd och asymmetrier mellan besläktade språk. inkomst. Med py kan språkexperter snabbt och enkelt utföra statistiska analyser och jämföra dem med experimentella resultat. Vi visar på inkomstens effektivitet. py i ett obegripligt experiment på två slaviska språk: bulgariska och ryska. Använder inkomst. py kunde vi validera tre metoder för att mäta språkliga avstånd och asymmetrier: Levenshtein avstånd, ordadaptering överraskande, och villkorad entropi som prediktorer för framgång i ett läsintercomprehensionsexperiment.', 'ta': 'மொழிகள் ஒருவருக்கொருவர் வேறு தூரமாக இருக்கலாம் மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய ஒருவருக்கொருவர் புரிந்துள்ள புத்தகம் ஒர இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் வரும் அறிவிக்கிறோம். பி, தொடர்புடைய மொழிகளுக்கிடையில் உள்ள மொழிகளுக்கு இடையே கணக்கிடுவதற்கான கருவிப்பெட்டி நுழை. பி மொழிபெயர்ப்பாளர்கள் விரைவாகவும் எளிதாகவும் புள்ளிவிவரங்களை செயல்படுத்தி சோதனையின் முடிவுகளை ஒப்பிட நாம் வரும் விளைவை காட்டுகிறோம். இரண்டு ஸ்லாவிக் மொழிகளில் உள்ள புதுப்பிக்கும் சோதனையில் பார்த்துக் கொள்ளுங்கள்: புல்கேரிய மற வரும் பயன்படுத்துகிறது. தான் மூன்று முறைகளை சரிபார்க்க முடியவில்லை மொழி தூரத்தையும் அமர்வுகளையும் சரிபார்க்க முடியவில்லை: Levenshtein தூரத்தையும், வார்த்தை ஒதுக்குதல் ஆச', 'ur': 'زبانیں ایک دوسرے سے مختلف دور ہوں گے اور ان کی ایک دوسری عقل برابر ہو سکتی ہے ہم اس کاغذ میں income معرفی کرتے ہیں. py، زبان کی فاصلہ کا حساب کرنے کے لئے ایک ابزار باکس اور ارتباط زبانوں کے درمیان آسیمیٹریس کے لئے۔ income. py زبان شناساتوں کو سریع اور آسان طریقے کے تحقیقات کرنے اور ان کو آزمائش نتیجے کے ساتھ مقایسہ کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے. ہم آینٹوں کی فعالیت دکھاتے ہیں. دو اسلاویک زبانوں پر ایک غیر قابل تعقیب آزمائش میں پی ہے: بلگاری اور روسی. اینک کا استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. پی ہم نے تین طریقے مطالب کر سکے تھے کہ زبان کی دور اور آسیم تریس کا اندازہ کریں: Levenshtein فاصلہ، کلمات اضافہ عجیب اور مستقل انٹروپی ایک پڑھنے کی آزمائش میں موفقیت کی پیش بینی کرنے والوں کی طرح۔', 'uz': "Tillar bir-бирлариdan boshqa uzoq bo'lishi mumkin va ularning bir-бирларининг aqlliligi asymmetrik bo'lishi mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, biz ijodkorni ko'rib chiqaramiz. py, tillar orasidagi masofa va asymmetrlarni hisoblash uchun asboblar qutisi. incom. py tillar ekspertlariga tez qilib statistik analyzerini bajarishga ruxsat beradi va tajriba natijalari bilan kamaytirish imkoniyatini beradi. Biz ijodkorning effektini ko'rsatamiz. Ikki Slavik tilida muvaffaqiyatli tajriba qilish mumkin: Bulgariy va Ruscha. Imloni ishlatish. tug'ilgan, biz tillar orasidagi va asymmetrlarni o'zgartirish uchun uch usulni tekshirish mumkin: Levenshtein distance, so'zning adapterini ajoyib ko'rsatish mumkin, shart yozuvchisi muvaffaqiyatli o'qish imkoniyatini o'qish imkoniyatini o'rganish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Ngôn ngữ có thể xa cách nhau hơn nhau và khả năng trí hiểu chung của chúng có thể chỉ không phù hợp. Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi giới thiệu nhập. Chỉ, một hộp dụng cụ để tính toán khoảng cách ngôn ngữ và không phù hợp. Không. Vi cho phép chuyên gia ngôn ngữ thực hiện các phân tích thống kê nhanh chóng và dễ dàng so sánh chúng với kết quả thử nghiệm. Chúng tôi chứng minh hiệu quả ẩn danh. Trong một thử nghiệm không thấu hiểu hai ngôn ngữ Slavic: Bulgaria và Nga. Sử dụng lõi năng. Chúng tôi có thể xác nhận ba phương pháp đo lường khoảng cách ngôn ngữ và không phù hợp: Khoảng cách Levenstein, từ ngạc nhiên sửa chữa, và phương trình nhiệt độ phụ thuộc là dự đoán thành công trong một thử nghiệm xuyên thấu hiểu.', 'bg': 'Езиците могат да бъдат различно отдалечени един от друг и тяхната взаимна разбираемост може да бъде асиметрична. В този документ ние въвеждаме доходите. py, инструментариум за изчисляване на езикови разстояния и асиметрии между сродните езици. Incom. Лингвистичните експерти могат бързо и лесно да извършват статистически анализи и да сравняват тези с експерименталните резултати. Ние демонстрираме ефикасността на доходите. Пи в експеримент по неразбиране на два славянски езика: български и руски. Използва доходите. Успяхме да валидираме три метода за измерване на лингвистични разстояния и асиметрии: дистанция Левънщайн, изненадваща адаптация на думи и условна ентропия като предсказатели за успех в експеримент за интерразбиране при четене.', 'hr': 'Jezici mogu biti različito udaljeni jedni od drugih, a njihova zajednička inteligencija može biti asimetrična. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prihod. py, kutija alata za izračunavanje jezičkih udaljenosti i asimetrija između povezanih jezika. Prihod. py omogućava jezičkim stručnjacima brzo i lako izvršiti statističke analize i usporediti one s eksperimentalnim rezultatima. Pokazujemo djelotvornost prihoda. py u eksperimentu nesprehenzije na dva slavica jezika: Bugarski i ruski. Koristim prihod. py smo uspjeli potvrditi tri metode za mjerenje jezičkih udaljenosti i asimetrija: udaljenost Levenshtein a, iznenađujuća prilagodba riječi i kondicionalna entropija kao predvidjetelja uspjeha u eksperimentu između čitanja međukompresije.', 'nl': 'Talen kunnen verschillend van elkaar verwijderd zijn en hun onderlinge verstaanbaarheid kan asymmetrisch zijn. In dit artikel introduceren we inkomens. py, een toolbox voor het berekenen van taalafstanden en asymmetrieën tussen verwante talen. inkomens. Met py kunnen taalkundigen snel en eenvoudig statistische analyses uitvoeren en deze vergelijken met experimentele resultaten. We tonen de doeltreffendheid van inkomens aan. Pi in een onbegrip experiment op twee Slavische talen: Bulgaars en Russisch. Gebruik inkomens. Om taalafstanden en asymmetrieën te meten, konden we drie methoden valideren: Levenstein afstand, woordadaptatie surprisal en voorwaardelijke entropie als voorspellers van succes in een leesintercomprehensie experiment.', 'da': 'Sprog kan være forskelligt fjernt fra hinanden, og deres gensidige forståelighed kan være asymmetrisk. I denne artikel introducerer vi indkomsten. py, en værktøjskasse til beregning af sproglige afstande og asymmetrier mellem beslægtede sprog. indkomst. py giver sprogeksperter mulighed for hurtigt og nemt at udføre statistiske analyser og sammenligne dem med eksperimentelle resultater. Vi viser indkomstens effektivitet. py i et uforståeligt eksperiment på to slaviske sprog: bulgarsk og russisk. Bruger indkomst. Vi var i stand til at validere tre metoder til måling af sproglige afstande og asymmetrier: Levenshtein afstand, overraskende ordtilpasning og betinget entropi som forudsigere succes i et læseforsøg.', 'id': 'Bahasa mungkin berbeda jauh dari satu sama lain dan inteligibilitas mereka berdua mungkin asimetris. Dalam surat ini kami memperkenalkan pendapatan. py, sebuah kotak alat untuk menghitung jarak bahasa dan asimetri antara bahasa terkait. masuk. py memungkinkan ahli bahasa untuk melakukan analisis statistik dengan cepat dan mudah dan membandingkan mereka dengan hasil percobaan. We demonstrate the efficacy of incom. py dalam percobaan ketidakpahaman pada dua bahasa Slavic: Bulgari dan Rusia. Menggunakan incom. py kami mampu memastikan tiga metode untuk mengukur jarak bahasa dan asimetri: jarak Levenshtein, adaptasi kata yang mengejutkan, dan entropi syarat sebagai prediksor sukses dalam percobaan intercomprension bacaan.', 'ko': '언어 사이의 거리는 다를 수 있고, 그것들 사이의 이해성은 비대칭적일 수 있다.본문은 incom을 소개했다.py는 관련 언어 간의 언어 거리와 비대칭성을 계산하는 도구 상자입니다.incom。py는 언어학자 전문가가 신속하고 가볍게 통계 분석을 하고 이를 실험 결과와 비교할 수 있도록 한다.우리는 incom의 유효성을 보여 주었다.py는 두 가지 슬라브 언어인 불가리아어와 러시아어에서 이해하지 못하는 실험을 진행했다.incom을 사용합니다.따라서 우리는 언어 거리와 비대칭성을 측정하는 세 가지 방법을 검증할 수 있다. 그것이 바로 Levenshtein 거리, 단어 적응 서프라이즈와 조건 엔트로피가 읽기 이해 실험의 성공을 예측하는 인자이다.', 'de': 'Sprachen können unterschiedlich voneinander entfernt sein und ihre gegenseitige Verständlichkeit kann asymmetrisch sein. In diesem Papier stellen wir das Einkommen vor. py, eine Toolbox zur Berechnung sprachlicher Abstände und Asymmetrien zwischen verwandten Sprachen. Einkommen. Mit py können Linguisten schnell und einfach statistische Analysen durchführen und diese mit experimentellen Ergebnissen vergleichen. Wir zeigen die Wirksamkeit von Einkommen. In einem Unverständnisexperiment mit zwei slawischen Sprachen: Bulgarisch und Russisch. Mit Incom. Um Sprachdistanzen und Asymmetrien zu messen, konnten wir drei Methoden validieren: Levenstein-Distanz, Wortadaptationssurprisal und bedingte Entropie als Erfolgsfaktoren in einem Lese-Intercomprehension-Experiment.', 'fa': 'زبانها ممکن است به طور مختلف فاصله\u200cای از یکدیگر باشند و دانش\u200cهای متفاوت آنها ممکن است متفاوت باشد. ما در این کاغذ درآمد را معرفی می کنیم. py، یک صفحه ابزار برای محاسبه فاصله\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی و آسیمتری بین زبان\u200cهای ارتباط. درآمد. py اجازه می دهد متخصص زبان\u200cشناسی سریع و آسان تحلیل آمار را انجام دهند و آنها را با نتیجه آزمایشی مقایسه کنند. ما عملکرد درآمد را نشان می دهیم. py در یک آزمایش غیر قابل تعقیب در دو زبان اسلاویک: بلگاری و روسیه. استفاده از درآمد. py ما توانستیم سه روش تایید کنیم تا فاصله های زبان و آسیمتریها را اندازه گیری کنیم: فاصله های Levenshtein، تعادل کردن کلمات عجیب و انتروپی شرایط به عنوان پیش بینی کننده های موفقیت در یک آزمایش درگیری خواندن.', 'sw': 'Lugha zinaweza kuwa tofauti na tofauti tofauti na ufahamu wao wenyewe unaweza kuwa na wasiwasi. Katika karatasi hii tunaonyesha mapato. py, a toolbox for calculating linguistic distances and asymmetries between related languages.  income. py anaruhusu wataalam wa lugha kwa haraka na kwa urahisi kufanya uchambuzi wa takwimu na kuwalinganisha wale wenye matokeo ya majaribio. Tunaonyesha madhara ya mapato. vizuri katika jaribio la upeperushi katika lugha mbili za Kislavic: Bulgaria na Urusi. Utumiaji wa kipato. vyema tuliweza kuthibitisha njia tatu za kupima umbali wa lugha na mashambulizi: Levenshtein umbali, mabadiliko ya maneno, na kuingia kwa mazingira ya mazingira kama watabiri wa mafanikio katika jaribio la kusoma lililofanana.', 'af': "Tale mag anders afstand wees van mekaar en hulle gemeenskaplike intelligibiliteit mag asimetriese wees. In hierdie papier introduseer ons inkoms. py, 'n nutsboks vir die bereken van lingvisse afstand en asymmetries tussen verwante tale. inkom. py toelaat lingviste eksperte vinnig en maklik statistiese analiserings uitvoer en hulle vergelyk met eksperimentele resultate. Ons wys die effektiviteit van inkoms. py in 'n onverstandige eksperiment op twee slavisse tale: Bulgaries en Russies. Gebruik inkom. py was ons in staat om drie metodes te valiseer om lingwisiese afstand en asymmetries te maak: Levenshtein afstand, woord aanpassing verwonderbaar en voorwaardige entropie as voorskouers van sukses in 'n lees interkomprehensie eksperiment.", 'tr': 'Diller bir-birinden daşyk bolup biler we olaryň bir-birinden daşyk duýumlyklary asymetrik bolup biler. Bu kagyzda gelirleri tanyşdyrýarys. Diller arasyndaky asymetriýa hasaplamak üçin bir esbap kuty. Gelir. py lingwistikler uzmanlaryny çalt we aňsat statistik analyzlaryny edip, munlary deneysel netijeleri bilen karşılaştyrmage rugsat berýär. Biz gelir etkinligini görkeýäris. Iki slawiýa dilinde düşünmedigine py suratynda: Bulgarça we Rusça. Gelişi ulanýar. Pi, biz dillerin uzaklaryny we asymetriýasyny ölçüp üçin üç ýola mümkin edip bilerdik: Levenshtein uzaklaşdyrylmagy, sözlerin uygulamasynyň geýtgeşik we şartly entropiýasyny okamak üçin başarnyga çarpyşyrylarynda.', 'sq': 'Gjuhat mund të jenë ndryshe larg njëri-tjetrit dhe inteligjenca e tyre e përbashkët mund të jetë asimetrike. Në këtë letër prezantojmë të ardhurat. py, një kuti mjete për llogaritjen e distancave gjuhësore dhe asimetrive midis gjuhëve të lidhura. Të ardhurat. py lejon ekspertët gjuhësorë të kryejnë shpejt dhe lehtë analiza statistike dhe të krahasojnë ato me rezultatet eksperimentale. Ne demonstrojmë efektshmërinë e të ardhurave. py në një eksperiment pa kuptim në dy gjuhë sllave: bullgare dhe ruse. Duke përdorur të ardhurat. py ne ishim në gjendje të vlerësonim tre metoda për të matur distancat gjuhësore dhe asimetritë: distancën Levenshtein, përshtatjen e fjalës surprizuese dhe entropinë kushtuese si parashikues të suksesit në një eksperiment ndërkuptimi leximi.', 'am': 'ቋንቋዎች እርስ በርሳቸው የተለየ ሊሆን ይችላል እና የሁለተኛቸው ማስታወቂያው የፀሐይ መሆኑን ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የፍሬ ውጤት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፒ፣ የቋንቋው ርቀት እና በአካባቢው ቋንቋዎች መካከል የመቆጠር የቱልባር ቦታ ኢ py የቋንቋ አስተማሪዎችን ፈጥኖ እና በተፈተና ፍሬዎችን ለመስመር በትክክል እንዲያደርጉ ይፈቅዳል፡፡ የውጤት ጥቅም እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በሁለት ስሎቪ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ውጤት ተፈተና ደስ ይለዋል፡፡ የውይይት መጠቀም በኩል ሦስት የቋንቋዊ ርቀት እና የኢሜተርሚቶችን ለመለካት የቻልንን ሥርዓት ማረጋገጥን አግኝተናል፤ Levenshtein ርቀት፣ ቃላት ማቀናቀል እና የክፍለ ጉዳይ ስርዓት በመታወቂያ ተፈተና ውስጥ ለመቀናቀል የሚችል ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'ভাষা সম্ভবত একে অপরের কাছ থেকে ভিন্ন দূরে থাকতে পারে এবং তাদের মধ্যে যুক্ত বুদ্ধিমান হতে পারে। এই পত্রিকায় আমরা আয় পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই। পি, ভাষাগত দূরত্ব এবং সংশ্লিষ্ট ভাষার মধ্যে নির্বাচনের জন্য একটি টুলবাক্স। আয়। পি ভাষাবিজ্ঞান বিশেষজ্ঞ দ্রুত এবং সহজে পরিসংখ্যান বিশ্লেষণ করে এবং পরীক্ষার ফলাফলের সাথে তুলনা করে। আমরা আয়ের কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করি। দুই স্লাভিক ভাষায় অভিযোগের পরীক্ষায় প্রাপ্ত হয়েছে: বুলগেরিয়া এবং রাশিয়ান। আয় ব্যবহার করে। প্যাই আমরা ভাষাগত দূরত্ব এবং নিরাপত্তা পরিমাপ পরিমাপের জন্য তিনটি পদ্ধতি বৈধ করতে পারিনি: লেভেনশেইন দূরত্ব, শব্দ আপেটশন বিস্ময়কর এবং অবস্থানের প্রতিষ্ঠাতারা', 'az': 'Dill…ôr bir-birind…ôn farklńĪ uzaq olar v…ô bir-birind…ôn razńĪlńĪq olar. Bu kańüńĪtda g…ôlirl…ôri tanńĪyńĪrńĪq. py, dill…ôrin uzaqlarńĪnńĪ hesablamaq √ľ√ß√ľn bir ara√ß qutusu. g…ôlir. py dil ekspertl…ôrinin statistik analizi tezlikl…ô v…ô asanlńĪqla iŇül…ôm…ôsin…ô v…ô bunlarńĪ eksperimentli sonu√ßlarńĪyla salmańüa imkan verir. Biz g…ôlirl…ôrin etkinlińüini g√∂st…ôririk. iki Slaviq dilind…ô, Bulgarca v…ô Rusya dilind…ô t…ôŇükil edilm…ôy…ôn t…ôcr√ľb…ôd…ô py. Gel…ôr istifad…ô edir. py, dil uzaqlarńĪnńĪ v…ô asimetriyalarńĪnńĪ √∂l√ß√ľrm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn √ľ√ß metodlarńĪ t…ôsdiql…ôy…ô bil…ôrdik: Levenshtein uzaqlarńĪnńĪ, s√∂zl…ôrin uyńüulamasńĪ t…ô…ôcc√ľbl√ľ, v…ô conditional entropia oxumaq m√ľv…ôff…ôqiyy…ôti t…ôcr√ľb…ôsind…ô baŇüarńĪlńĪ t…ôcr√ľb…ô ed…ônl…ôr kimi t…ôsdiql…ôy…ô bil…ôrdik.', 'hy': 'Languages may be differently distant from each other and their mutual intelligibility may be asymmetric.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք եկամուտ: py, լեզվաբանական հեռավորությունների և անհամաչափությունների հաշվարկելու գործիքների տուփ կապված լեզուների միջև: incom. py-ը հնարավորություն է տալիս լեզվաբաններին արագ և հեշտ վիճակագրական վերլուծություններ կատարել և համեմատել դրանք փորձարկման արդյունքների հետ: We demonstrate the efficacy of incom. py-ը մի անհասկանալի փորձարկում երկու սլավիական լեզուներում՝ բուլգարեն և ռուսական: Օգտագործելով եկամուտ: py we were able to validate three methods to measure linguistic distances and asymmetries: Levenshtein distance, word adaptation surprisal, and conditional entropy as predictors of success in a reading intercomprehension experiment.', 'bs': 'Jezici mogu biti drugačije udaljeni jedni od drugih, a njihova zajednička inteligencija može biti asimetrična. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prihod. py, kutija alata za izračunavanje jezičkih udaljenosti i asimetrija između povezanih jezika. Prihod. py omogućava lingvističkim stručnjacima brzo i lako izvršiti statističke analize i usporediti one s eksperimentalnim rezultatima. Pokazujemo djelotvornost prihoda. py u eksperimentu nesprehenzije na dva slavička jezika: Bugarski i ruski. Koristim prihod. Mi smo uspjeli potvrditi tri metode za mjerenje jezičkih udaljenosti i asimetrija: udaljenost Levenshtein a, iznenađujuće riječi adaptacije i kondicionalna entropija kao predviđatelja uspjeha u eksperimentu međukompresije čitanja.', 'ca': "Les llengües poden estar diferent d'una altra i la seva intel·ligibilitat mutua pot ser asimètrica. En aquest article presentem ingressos. py, una caixa d'eines per calcular distàncies lingüístices i asimetries entre llengües relacionades. ingressos. py permet als experts lingüistes fer ràpidament i fàcilment anàlisis estadístics i comparar-los amb resultats experimentals. Demonstrem l'eficacia del ingres. py en un experiment d'incomprensió en dues llengües eslàviques: búlgaro i russo. Using incom. py vam poder validar tres mètodes per mesurar distàncies lingüístices i asimetries: distància de Levenshtein, adaptació de paraules sorprenent, i entropia condicional com preditors d'èxit en un experiment d'intercomprensió de lectura.", 'cs': 'Jazyky mohou být od sebe odlišně vzdálené a jejich vzájemná srozumitelnost může být asymetrická. V tomto článku představujeme příchod. py, nástrojová sada pro výpočet jazykových vzdáleností a asymetrie mezi příbuznými jazyky. příchod. py umožňuje lingvistům rychle a snadno provádět statistické analýzy a porovnávat je s experimentálními výsledky. Dokazujeme účinnost příjmu. Při pokusu o nepochopení na dvou slovanských jazycích: bulharštině a ruštině. Používám příchod. Byli jsme schopni ověřit tři metody měření jazykových vzdáleností a asymetrie: Levensteinovu vzdálenost, adaptační překvapení slova a podmíněnou entropii jako prediktory úspěchu v experimentu meziporozumění čtení.', 'et': 'Keeled võivad olla teineteisest erinevalt kaugel ja nende vastastikune arusaadavus võib olla asümmeetriline. Selles raamatus tutvustame sissetulekut. py, tööriistakast keeleliste vahemaade ja asümmeetriate arvutamiseks seotud keelte vahel. sissetulek. py võimaldab keelekspertidel kiiresti ja lihtsalt statistilisi analüüse teha ning võrrelda neid eksperimentaalsete tulemustega. Me näitame sissetuleku efektiivsust. Mõistmatu eksperiment kahel slaavi keelel: bulgaaria ja vene keel. Kasutades sissetulekut. Õnnestus valideerida kolme meetodit keelelise kauguse ja asümmeetria mõõtmiseks: Levenshteini kaugus, sõna kohandamise üllatus ja tingimuslik entroopia kui edukuse prognoosijad lugemisvahelises eksperimendis.', 'fi': 'Kielet voivat olla eri etäisiä toisistaan ja niiden keskinäinen ymmärrettävyys voi olla epäsymmetristä. Tässä asiakirjassa esittelemme tuloja. py, työkalupakki kielellisten etäisyyksien ja epäsymmetrioiden laskemiseen sukulaiskielten välillä. tulo. py:n avulla kielitieteilijät voivat nopeasti ja helposti tehdä tilastollisia analyysejä ja verrata niitä kokeellisiin tuloksiin. Osoitamme tulojen tehokkuuden. Py:n ymmärtämyskokeessa kahta slaavilaista kieltä: bulgariaa ja venäjää. Käyttää tuloja. Onnistuimme validoimaan kolme menetelmää kielellisten etäisyyksien ja epäsymmetrioiden mittaamiseen: Levenshteinin etäisyys, sanasopeutumisen yllätys ja ehdollinen entropia lukuvälikokeen onnistumisen ennustajina.', 'jv': 'Languages Nanging papat iki, kita nambah ingkang karo dolanan. Pi, akeh panjenengan kanggo kaluhan langkung sampeyan lan akeh-sampeyan gar langgambar echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world na Awak dhéwé éntukno penggunaké kabèh lan barang. Pil karo perbudhakan sing unanggunian kanggo langa Slawih iki: Burgari karo Rusa. Ngawe Perintah sing nari pi', 'ha': "Harsunan za'a sãɓã wa jũna, kuma fahimcinsu mai yiwuwa ne misãlai. Ga wannan takardan da Muke iya ƙarar da ni. shirin ayuka mai amfani da shirin ayuka wa yin hisãbi ga tsakanin harshen da aka yi danganta. QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu Emp yana yarda masu karatun cikin harshen su tafiya sauri da sauƙi, kuma su sammeni masu samuran matsalar. Muna nuna aikin ijãra. fara cikin jarrabo na intamphencewa a cikin lugha biyu na Slavki: Bulgaria da Ruushi. Yi amfani da ijãra. Babu, ba mu iya iya gyara hanyota uku ko da za'a iya lissafa cikin linguistic da asymmetri: wuri na LeLevendshtein, yana mai mãmãki da kalma adaptori, da kalma masu cikin muhimmada da za'a yi mataimaki a cikin jarrabi ta karãtun fassarar.", 'he': 'שפות יכולות להיות רחוקות אחרת אחד מהשניים והמובנות הדדית שלהן יכולה להיות אסימטרית. בעיתון הזה אנחנו מכירים את הכנסה. פי, קופסת כלים לחישוב מרחקים שפתיים ואסימטריות בין שפות קשורות. הכנסה. py מאפשר למומחים שפתיים לבצע בדיקות סטטיסטיות בקלות ולהשוות אותם עם תוצאות ניסויים. אנחנו מראים את היעילות של הכנסה. פי בניסוי לא הבנה בשתי שפות סלאביות: בוגרית ורוסית. Using incom. פי הצלחנו לאשר שלוש שיטות למדוד מרחקים שפתיים ואסימטריות: מרחק Levenshtein, התאמה מילים מפתיעה, ואנטרופיה מונחית כצפייה של הצלחה בניסוי בין-הבנה קריאה.', 'sk': 'Jeziki so lahko drugače oddaljeni drug od drugega in njihova medsebojna razumljivost je lahko asimetrična. V tem dokumentu uvajamo dohodek. py, orodje za izračun jezikovnih razdalj in asimetrij med sorodnimi jeziki. dohodek. py jezikoslovnim strokovnjakom omogoča hitro in enostavno izvajanje statističnih analiz in primerjavo s poskusnimi rezultati. Dokazujemo učinkovitost dohodka. V eksperimentu nerazumevanja dveh slovanskih jezikov: bolgarščini in ruščini. Uporablja dohodek. Pri tem smo uspeli validirati tri metode merjenja jezikovnih razdalj in asimetrij: Levenshsteinova razdalja, presenetljiva prilagoditev besed in pogojna entropija kot napovedovalci uspeha pri branju medrazumevanja.', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་གཅིག་ལས་བར་ཐག་ཏེ་འགྱུར་བའི་ཡིན་པ་ལས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་རིམ་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དང་། ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་འབྲས་འབོར་བ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། py, སྐད་རིགས་སྐད་ཀྱི་བར་ཐག་རིང་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་དབར་གྱི་ཆ་མཚུངས་པར་རྩིས་བརྗོད་སའི་ལག་ཆ་ཁྱབ། ཚུར་འབྱོར། སྒེར་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་རྟོགས་ཅན་གྱི་ནུས་སྤེལ་བྱེད་མཁན་མྱུར་ལས་སྟབས་བདེ་མོ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། རྐྱེན་ ང་ཚོས་འབྱོར་རའི་ནུས་ཤུགས་བྱས་པ་དེ་བཀྲམ་སྟོན་ཡོད། ས་ལུབ་སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་ནང་གི་སྒོ་སློང་མེད་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་ལབ། ཚུར་འབྱོར་བེད་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པ py ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་བར་ཐག་དང་དབང་ཚད་གཞན་ཐབས་ལམ་གསུམ་ཤིག་གི་བདེ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'A Holistic Natural Language Generation Framework for the Semantic Web', 'ar': 'إطار شامل لتوليد اللغة الطبيعية للويب الدلالي', 'es': 'Un marco holístico de generación de lenguaje natural para la web semántica', 'pt': 'Um Framework Holístico de Geração de Linguagem Natural para a Web Semântica', 'fr': 'Un cadre holistique de génération de langage naturel pour le Web sémantique', 'ja': 'セマンティックWebのためのホリスティック自然言語生成フレームワーク', 'hi': 'Semantic Web के लिए एक Holistic Natural Language Generation Framework', 'zh': '语义网之体自然语言生框架', 'ru': 'Целостная структура генерации естественного языка для семантической паутины', 'ga': 'Creat Giniúint Teanga Nádúrtha Iomlánaíoch don Ghréasán Séimeantach', 'hu': 'Holisztikus természetes nyelv generálási keretrendszer a szemantikus webhez', 'el': 'Ένα ολοκληρωμένο πλαίσιο δημιουργίας φυσικής γλώσσας για τον Σημαντικό Ιστό', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Un quadro olistico di generazione del linguaggio naturale per il web semantico', 'mk': 'Холистичка рамка за генерација на природен јазик за семантичната веб', 'kk': 'Семантикалық Веб үшін холистикалық табиғи тілдерді құру фрейміName', 'lt': 'Semantinio tinklo holistinės gamtos kalbų kūrimo sistemos', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Qafas tal-Ġenerazzjoni tal-Lingwi Naturali Olistiċi għall-Internet Semantiku', 'ms': 'Name', 'mn': 'Semantic Web-ийн Холистикийн Байгалийн Холистикийн Холистикийн Холистикийн Холистикийн Холитикийн Холитикийн Холитикийн Холитикийн Холитикийн Холитикийн Холит', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Holistyczne ramy generowania języka naturalnego dla sieci semantycznej', 'sr': 'Holistički okvir generacije prirodnog jezika za semantičku mrežu', 'ro': 'Un cadru holistic de generare a limbajului natural pentru web semantic', 'sv': 'Ett holistiskt ramverk för generering av naturligt språk för den semantiska webben', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Framework for the Semantic Web', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một bộ truyền thuyết về ngôn ngữ miễn dịch cổ dụng máy.', 'bg': 'Холистична рамка за генериране на естествен език за семантичната мрежа', 'hr': 'Holistički okvir generacije prirodnog jezika za semantičku mrežu', 'da': 'En holistisk ramme for generering af natursprog for det semantiske web', 'nl': 'Een holistisch framework voor het genereren van natuurlijke talen voor het semantische web', 'de': 'Ein ganzheitliches Framework zur Generierung natürlicher Sprache für das Semantic Web', 'id': 'Sebuah Framework Generasi Bahasa Alam Holistik untuk Web Semantik', 'ko': '어의망의 전체적인 자연 언어 생성 구조', 'fa': 'Name', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një kuadër gjenerimi holistik i gjuhës natyrore për rrjetin Semantik', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa Uzalishaji wa Lugha ya asili wa Kiholistic kwa ajili ya Mtandao wa Semantic', 'tr': 'Semantik Web üçin bir Holistik Doýal Dili Bejer Framework', 'am': 'የተለመደ ቋንቋ አቀማመጥ Framework for the Semantic Web', 'az': 'Semantik 캻nternet 칲칞칲n Holistik T톛bi톛tli Dil M톛xluqat캼 Framework', 'bn': 'A Holistic Natural Language Generation Framework for the Semantic Web', 'hy': 'A Holistic Natural Language Generation Framework for the Semantic Web', 'bs': 'Holistički okvir generacije prirodnog jezika za semantičku mrežu', 'ca': 'Un marc de generació holística de llenguatges naturals per a la Web Semàtica', 'cs': 'Holistický rámec generace přirozeného jazyka pro sémantický web', 'et': 'Holistlik looduslik keele genereerimise raamistik semantilise veebi jaoks', 'fi': 'Holistinen luonnollisen kielen generointikehys semanttiselle verkolle', 'ha': 'Frame for the Semantic Web', 'sk': 'Holistični okvir za generiranje naravnega jezika za semantični splet', 'jv': 'Name', 'bo': 'Semantic Web için Holistic Natural Language Generation Framework for the Holistic Natural Language Generation', 'he': 'מסגר יצירת שפות טבעיות הוליסטית לרשת הסמנטית'}
{'en': 'With the ever-growing generation of data for the Semantic Web comes an increasing demand for this data to be made available to non-semantic Web experts. One way of achieving this goal is to translate the languages of the Semantic Web into natural language. We present LD2NL, a framework that allows verbalizing the three key languages of the Semantic Web, i.e., RDF, OWL, and SPARQL. Our framework is based on a bottom-up approach to verbalization. We evaluated LD2NL in an open survey with 86 persons. Our results suggest that our framework can generate verbalizations that are close to natural languages and that can be easily understood by non-experts. Therewith, it enables non-domain experts to interpret Semantic Web data with more than 91 % of the accuracy of domain experts.', 'ar': 'مع الجيل المتزايد باستمرار من البيانات للويب الدلالي ، يأتي الطلب المتزايد على هذه البيانات لتكون متاحة لخبراء الويب غير الدلاليين. تتمثل إحدى طرق تحقيق هذا الهدف في ترجمة لغات الويب الدلالي إلى لغة طبيعية. نقدم LD2NL ، وهو إطار يسمح بالتعبير اللفظي عن اللغات الرئيسية الثلاث للويب الدلالي ، مثل RDF و OWL و SPARQL. يعتمد إطار عملنا على نهج من أسفل إلى أعلى للتعبير اللفظي. قمنا بتقييم LD2NL في مسح مفتوح مع 86 شخصًا. تشير نتائجنا إلى أن إطار العمل الخاص بنا يمكن أن يولد تفسيرات قريبة من اللغات الطبيعية ويمكن فهمها بسهولة من قبل غير الخبراء. وبذلك ، فإنه يمكّن الخبراء من خارج المجال من تفسير بيانات الويب الدلالية بأكثر من 91٪ من دقة خبراء المجال.', 'pt': 'Com a geração cada vez maior de dados para a Web Semântica, surge uma demanda crescente para que esses dados sejam disponibilizados para especialistas em Web não semântica. Uma forma de atingir esse objetivo é traduzir as linguagens da Web Semântica em linguagem natural. Apresentamos o LD2NL, um framework que permite verbalizar as três linguagens chave da Web Semântica, ou seja, RDF, OWL e SPARQL. Nossa estrutura é baseada em uma abordagem de verbalização de baixo para cima. Avaliamos o LD2NL em uma pesquisa aberta com 86 pessoas. Nossos resultados sugerem que nosso framework pode gerar verbalizações próximas às linguagens naturais e que podem ser facilmente compreendidas por não especialistas. Com isso, ele permite que especialistas que não sejam de domínio interpretem dados da Web Semântica com mais de 91% da precisão de especialistas de domínio.', 'es': 'Con la generación cada vez mayor de datos para la Web Semántica, viene una creciente demanda de que estos datos estén disponibles para los expertos en la Web no semántica. Una forma de lograr este objetivo es traducir los idiomas de la Web Semántica al lenguaje natural. Presentamos LD2NL, un marco que permite verbalizar los tres lenguajes clave de la Web Semántica, es decir, RDF, OWL y SPARQL. Nuestro marco se basa en un enfoque ascendente de la verbalización. Evaluamos LD2NL en una encuesta abierta con 86 personas. Nuestros resultados sugieren que nuestro marco puede generar verbalizaciones cercanas a los lenguajes naturales y que los no expertos pueden entender fácilmente. Con ello, permite a los expertos que no pertenecen al dominio interpretar los datos de la Web Semántica con más del 91% de la precisión de los expertos en el dominio.', 'fr': "La génération croissante de données pour le Web sémantique entraîne une demande croissante pour que ces données soient mises à la disposition des experts du Web non sémantique. L'un des moyens d'atteindre cet objectif est de traduire les langues du Web sémantique en langage naturel. Nous présentons LD2NL, un framework qui permet de verbaliser les trois langages clés du Web sémantique, à savoir RDF, OWL et SPARQL. Notre cadre est basé sur une approche ascendante de la verbalisation. Nous avons évalué LD2NL dans le cadre d'une enquête ouverte auprès de 86 personnes. Nos résultats suggèrent que notre framework peut générer des verbalisations proches des langues naturelles et facilement compréhensibles par des non-experts. Il permet ainsi aux experts n'appartenant pas au domaine d'interpréter les données du Web sémantique avec plus de 91\xa0% de la précision des experts du domaine.", 'ja': 'セマンティックWebのデータの生成がますます増加するにつれて、このデータを非セマンティックWebの専門家が利用できるようにする必要性が高まっています。この目標を達成する1つの方法は、セマンティックWebの言語を自然言語に翻訳することです。LD 2 NLは、セマンティックWebの3つの主要な言語、すなわちRDF、OWL、SPARQLを言語化できるフレームワークです。私たちのフレームワークは、言語化に対するボトムアップのアプローチに基づいています。86人を対象とした公開調査でLD 2 NLを評価した。私たちの結果は、私たちのフレームワークが自然言語に近く、専門家以外が容易に理解できる言葉遣いを生成できることを示唆しています。これにより、ドメインエキスパート以外のエキスパートは、ドメインエキスパートの91%以上の精度でセマンティックWebデータを解釈できます。', 'zh': '随语义网而生者益长,非语义Web家供之而益大。 此一法者,语义网语翻译成自然语言。 吾言LD2NL,此一框架也,许以语言语义网三要言,即RDF,OWLSPARQL。 吾框架基于自下而上之口表达方法。 一86人公开调查估LD2NL。 吾之治结果表明,吾框架可以生近自然语言之动词,而非专家可以易知也。 故使非领域之家得以领域之家91%以上准确率说语义Web数。', 'hi': 'सिमेंटिक वेब के लिए डेटा की बढ़ती पीढ़ी के साथ इस डेटा को गैर-शब्दार्थ वेब विशेषज्ञों को उपलब्ध कराने के लिए एक बढ़ती मांग आती है। इस लक्ष्य को प्राप्त करने का एक तरीका सिमेंटिक वेब की भाषाओं को प्राकृतिक भाषा में अनुवाद करना है। हम LD2NL, एक रूपरेखा है कि शब्दार्थ वेब की तीन प्रमुख भाषाओं, अर्थात्, RDF, OWL, और SPARQL verbalizing की अनुमति देता है प्रस्तुत करते हैं. हमारा ढांचा मौखिककरण के लिए एक नीचे-ऊपर दृष्टिकोण पर आधारित है। हमने 86 व्यक्तियों के साथ एक खुले सर्वेक्षण में LD2NL का मूल्यांकन किया। हमारे परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा ढांचा मौखिककरण उत्पन्न कर सकता है जो प्राकृतिक भाषाओं के करीब हैं और जिन्हें गैर-विशेषज्ञों द्वारा आसानी से समझा जा सकता है। इसके साथ, यह गैर-डोमेन विशेषज्ञों को डोमेन विशेषज्ञों की सटीकता के 91% से अधिक के साथ सिमेंटिक वेब डेटा की व्याख्या करने में सक्षम बनाता है।', 'ru': 'С ростом генерации данных для "семантической паутины" растет спрос на эти данные, с тем чтобы они были доступны для несемантических экспертов. Одним из способов достижения этой цели является перевод языков семантической паутины на естественный язык. Мы представляем LD2NL, фреймворк, который позволяет вербализировать три ключевых языка семантической паутины, то есть RDF, OWL и SPARQL. Наши рамки основаны на восходящем подходе к вербализации. Мы оценили LD2NL в открытом опросе 86 человек. Наши результаты показывают, что наша структура может генерировать вербализации, которые близки к естественным языкам и которые могут быть легко поняты не-экспертами. При этом он позволяет не доменным экспертам интерпретировать данные Semantic Web с точностью более 91% от точности доменных экспертов.', 'ga': 'Leis an nginiúint sonraí atá ag méadú i gcónaí don Ghréasán Séimeantach tagann éileamh méadaitheach ar na sonraí seo a chur ar fáil do shaineolaithe Gréasáin neamhshéimeantacha. Bealach amháin leis an sprioc seo a bhaint amach ná teangacha an Ghréasáin Shéimeantaigh a aistriú go teanga nádúrtha. Cuirimid LD2NL i láthair, creat a ligeann do thrí phríomhtheanga an Ghréasáin Shéimeantaigh a chur i bhfocail, i.e., RDF, OWL, agus SPARQL. Tá ár gcreat bunaithe ar chur chuige ón mbun aníos i leith briathartha. Rinneamar measúnú ar LD2NL i suirbhé oscailte le 86 duine. Tugann ár dtorthaí le tuiscint gur féidir lenár gcreat briathartha a ghiniúint atá gar do theangacha nádúrtha agus is furasta do dhaoine nach saineolaithe iad a thuiscint. Leis sin, cuireann sé ar chumas saineolaithe neamhfhearainn sonraí Séimeantach Gréasáin a léirmhíniú le níos mó ná 91% de chruinneas na saineolaithe fearainn.', 'hu': 'Az egyre növekvő adatgyűjtéssel a szemantikus webre növekvő igény növekszik arra, hogy ezeket az adatokat a nem szemantikus webes szakértők számára hozzáférhetővé tegyék. E cél elérésének egyik módja a szemantikus web nyelveinek természetes nyelvre történő lefordítása. Bemutatjuk az LD2NL-t, egy olyan keretrendszert, amely lehetővé teszi a Szemantikus Web három kulcsnyelvének, azaz RDF, OWL és SPARQL verbalizálását. Keretrendszerünk a verbalizáció alulról épülő megközelítésén alapul. Az LD2NL-t 86 fős nyílt felmérésben értékeltük. Eredményeink azt sugallják, hogy a keretrendszerünk olyan szóbeli szövegeket hozhat létre, amelyek közel állnak a természetes nyelvekhez, és amelyeket nem szakértők számára is könnyen érthetnek. Ezáltal lehetővé teszi a nem domain szakértők számára, hogy a szemantikus webes adatokat a domain szakértők pontosságának több mint 91%-ával értelmezzék.', 'ka': 'Semantic Web-ის მონაცემებების უფრო მეტი განვითარებით მოდის, რომ ეს მონაცემები უფრო მეტია მოსახლეობა, რომელიც უცემენტიური ვებ ექსპერტებისთვის. ერთი მიზეზი ამ მიზეზის გავაკეთება არის Semantic Web-ის ენების თავისუფალური ენაში გადაწყენება. ჩვენ LD2NL-ს გაჩვენებთ, რომელიც სამი გასაკუთრებულ ენების გერბალიზაციას შეუძლებელია, რომელიც Semantic Web-ის სამი გასაკუთრებული ენები, მაგალითად RDF, OWL და SPARQL. ჩვენი პარამეტრი ვებერბალიზაციისთვის დაბაზიან. ჩვენ LD2NL-ს გავუმუშაოთ 86 ადამიანებით. ჩვენი წარმოდგენების შესახებ, რომ ჩვენი ფრამეტრი შეიძლება გვერბალიზაციების შექმნა, რომლებიც ბუნებური ენებისთვის წინ და რომლებიც არ არის ექსპერტისებისთვი ამიტომ, ის შეუძლია, რომ სემანტიკური ვების მონაცემები უფრო 91% დემომინის ექსპერტების წარმოდგენება.', 'el': 'Με την ολοένα αυξανόμενη παραγωγή δεδομένων για το Σημαντικό Ιστό έρχεται μια αυξανόμενη ζήτηση για αυτά τα δεδομένα να είναι διαθέσιμα σε μη σημασιολογικούς Ιστούς εμπειρογνώμονες. Ένας τρόπος επίτευξης αυτού του στόχου είναι η μετάφραση των γλωσσών του Σημαντικού Ιστού σε φυσική γλώσσα. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα πλαίσιο που επιτρέπει την προφορική διατύπωση των τριών βασικών γλωσσών του Σημαντικού Ιστού, δηλαδή, και SPARQL. Το πλαίσιο μας βασίζεται σε μια προσέγγιση εκ των κάτω προς τα πάνω για τη λεκτικοποίηση. Αξιολογήσαμε το LD2NL σε ανοιχτή έρευνα με 86 άτομα. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι το πλαίσιο μας μπορεί να δημιουργήσει λεκτικές εκφράσεις που είναι κοντά στις φυσικές γλώσσες και μπορούν εύκολα να γίνουν κατανοητές από μη ειδικούς. Με αυτόν τον τρόπο, επιτρέπει σε ειδικούς εκτός τομέα να ερμηνεύουν δεδομένα Σημαντικού Ιστού με περισσότερο από 91% της ακρίβειας των εμπειρογνωμόνων του τομέα.', 'it': 'Con la crescente generazione di dati per il Semantic Web arriva una crescente richiesta di questi dati da rendere disponibili a esperti Web non semantici. Un modo per raggiungere questo obiettivo è quello di tradurre le lingue del web semantico in linguaggio naturale. Presentiamo LD2NL, un framework che permette di verbalizzare i tre linguaggi chiave del Semantic Web, cioè RDF, OWL e SPARQL. Il nostro framework si basa su un approccio bottom-up alla verbalizzazione. Abbiamo valutato LD2NL in un sondaggio aperto con 86 persone. I nostri risultati suggeriscono che il nostro framework può generare verbalizzazioni vicine ai linguaggi naturali e che possono essere facilmente comprese da non esperti. In questo modo, consente agli esperti non di dominio di interpretare i dati Semantic Web con oltre il 91% della precisione degli esperti di dominio.', 'kk': 'Семантикалық Веб үшін деректерді жасау үшін бұл деректерді семантикалық емес веб эксперттеріне қол жеткізу үшін көптеген сұрақтар болады. Бұл мақсатты жеткізу бір жолы - Semantic Web тілдерін табиғи тіліне аудару. Біз LD2NL- ті, Semantic Web- тің үш кілт тілдерін вербализациялауға мүмкіндік беретін, т. е. RDF, OWL және SPARQL- тілдерін келтіреміз. Біздің фрейміміз вербализацияның төменгі жағдайына негізделген. Біз LD2NL-ді 86 адаммен ашық зерттеулерде бағаладық. Біздің нәтижелеріміз қоршауымыз табиғи тілдерге жақын вербализацияларды жасай алады және оны эксперттер емес түсініктерге оңай түсініп алады. Сонымен, ол доменге емес эксперттердің семантикалық веб- деректерін домендің эксперттердің дұрыстығынан 91% дегеннен артық түсіндіруге мүмкіндік береді.', 'lt': 'Kadangi Semantinio tinklo duomenys vis didėja, didėja poreikis, kad šie duomenys būtų prieinami ne semantiniams tinklo ekspertams. Vienas iš būdų pasiekti šį tikslą – verti Semantinio tinklo kalbas į natūralią kalbą. Mes pristatome LD2NL sistemą, leidžianči ą žodžiu kalbėti tris pagrindines Semantinio tinklo kalbas, t. y. RDF, OWL ir SPARQL. Mūsų sistema grindžiama požiūriu į žodžių kūrimą iš apačios į viršų. Atvirame tyrime su 86 asmenimis įvertinome LD2NL. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų sistema gali sukurti žodžius, kurie yra artimi natūralioms kalboms ir kuriuos gali lengvai suprasti ne ekspertai. Tai suteikia galimybę ne srities ekspertams aiškinti Semantinius interneto duomenis daugiau kaip 91 % srities ekspertų tikslumu.', 'mk': 'Со постојано растечката генерација на податоци за Семантичкиот веб доаѓа зголемена побарувачка за овие податоци да бидат достапни за несемантичките веб-експерти. Еден начин за постигнување на оваа цел е преведување на јазиците на семантичката веб на природен јазик. Презентираме LD2NL, рамка која овозможува вербализација на трите клучни јазици на Семантичкиот веб, т.е. РДФ, OWL и СПАРКЛ. Нашата рамка е базирана на пристап од долу нагоре кон вербализацијата. We evaluated LD2NL in an open survey with 86 persons.  Нашите резултати укажуваат на тоа дека нашата рамка може да генерира вербализации кои се блиски до природните јазици и кои може лесно да се разберат од страна на неекспертите. Со тоа, истиот овозможува експертите кои не се во домен да ги интерпретираат семантичките веб податоци со повеќе од 91 отсто од точноста на експертите во домен.', 'ms': 'Dengan generasi data yang semakin berkembang untuk Web Semantic datang permintaan yang semakin meningkat untuk data ini dibuat tersedia untuk ahli Web yang tidak semantik. Salah satu cara untuk mencapai tujuan ini adalah untuk menerjemahkan bahasa Web Semantic ke bahasa semulajadi. We present LD2NL, a framework that allows verbalizing the three key languages of the Semantic Web, i.e., RDF, OWL, and SPARQL.  kerangka kita berdasarkan pendekatan dari bawah ke atas untuk verbalizasi. Kami menilai LD2NL dalam penyelidikan terbuka dengan 86 orang. Hasil kita menunjukkan bahawa kerangka kita boleh menghasilkan perkataan yang dekat dengan bahasa alam dan yang mudah dipahami oleh bukan-ahli. Dengan itu, ia membolehkan ahli bukan-domain untuk menerangkan data Web Semantic dengan lebih dari 91% keperluan ahli domain.', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് വെബിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വളര്\u200dന്നുവരുന്ന തലമുറപ്പാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഈ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വെബിലെ വിശേഷപ് ഈ ലക്ഷ്യം എത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു വഴി സെമാന്റിക് വെബിന്റെ ഭാഷകളെ സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയിലേക്ക് അഭിപ്രായമാക സെമാന്റിക് വെബിലെ മൂന്ന് താക്കോല്\u200d ഭാഷകള്\u200d വാര്\u200dബല്\u200d ചെയ്യാന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഫ്രെയിമെയില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എളുപ്പിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്ക് വാര്\u200dബലേഷനിലേക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമാണ്. We evaluated LD2NL in an open survey with 86 persons.  നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പറയുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകള്\u200dക്ക് സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷകളുടെ അടുത്തുള്ള വാര്\u200dബാലിഷേഷങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാന അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വിശേഷികള്\u200dക്ക് സെമാന്റിക് വെബ് ഡേറ്റാ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വിശ', 'mt': 'Bil-ġenerazzjoni dejjem tikber ta’ dejta għall-Web Semantiku qed tiżdied id-domanda biex din id-dejta ssir disponibbli għal esperti mhux semantiċi tal-Web. Mod wieħed biex jintlaħaq dan l-għan huwa li l-lingwi tal-Web Semantiku jiġu tradotti f’lingwa naturali. Aħna nippreżentaw lill-LD2NL, qafas li jippermetti l-verbalizzazzjoni tat-tliet lingwi ewlenin tal-Web Semantiku, jiġifieri l-RDF, l-OWL, u l-SPARQL. Il-qafas tagħna huwa bbażat fuq approċċ minn isfel għal fuq għall-verbalizzazzjoni. Evalwajna l-LD2NL fi stħarriġ miftuħ b’86 persuna. Ir-riżultati tagħna jissuġġerixxu li l-qafas tagħna jista’ jiġġenera verbalizzazzjonijiet li huma qrib il-lingwi naturali u li jistgħu jinftiehmu faċilment minn mhux esperti. B’hekk, tippermetti lill-esperti mhux tad-dominju li jinterpretaw id-dejta Semantika tal-Web b’aktar minn 91 % tal-preċiżjoni tal-esperti tad-dominju.', 'mn': 'Семантик Веб-ын өссөн үеийн мэдээллүүдийн хувьд энэ өгөгдлийн талаар ихэвчлэн нэмэгдүүлэх хэрэгтэй болно. Энэ зорилго хүртэх нэг арга бол Semantic Web-ын хэлийг байгалийн хэл рүү орлуулах юм. Бид LD2NL, Semantic Web, RDF, OWL, SPARQL-ын гурван чухал хэлнүүдийг хэлэх боломж олгодог. Бидний үйл ажиллагаа нь хэлэлцүүлэхийн доорх арга зам дээр суурилсан. Бид LD2NL-г 86 хүнтэй нээлттэй судалгаанд дүгнэсэн. Бидний үр дүнд бидний хэлбэрээр байгалийн хэл дээр ойрхон хэлэлүүд болон мэргэжилтнүүд үүнийг амархан ойлгох боломжтой гэж үздэг. Үүнээс холбогдолгүй мэргэжилтнүүд Semantic Web өгөгдлийн тодорхойлолтоос 91% илүү тодорхойлох боломж олгодог.', 'no': 'Med den aldri økende genereringa av data for Semantiske nettet kommer ein økende etterspørsel for at denne data skal gjerast tilgjengeleg for ikkje-semantiske nettekspertar. Ein måte å oppnå dette målet er å omsetja språka i semantisk nett til naturspråk. Vi presenterer LD2NL, eit rammeverk som tillater å verbalisera dei tre nøkkelspråka i Semantiske nettet, t.d. RDF, OWL og SPARQL. Rammeverket vårt er basert på ein nedover tilnærming til verbalisering. Vi evaluerte LD2NL i eit opna undersøking med 86 personer. Resultatet våre tyder på at rammeverket vårt kan laga verbalisering som er nær naturspråk og som kan lett forstå av ikkje-ekspertar. Det gjer dermed det tilgjengeleg å tolka semantiske nettdata med meir enn 91 % av nøyaktigheten til domeneekspertane.', 'pl': 'Wraz z coraz większą generacją danych dla sieci semantycznej pojawia się coraz większe zapotrzebowanie na udostępnienie tych danych niesemantycznym ekspertom sieci Web. Jednym ze sposobów osiągnięcia tego celu jest przetłumaczenie języków sieci semantycznej na język naturalny. Przedstawiamy LD2NL, framework umożliwiający werbalizację trzech kluczowych języków sieci semantycznej, tj. RDF, OWL i SPARQL. Nasze ramy opierają się na oddolnym podejściu do werbalizacji. Oceniliśmy LD2NL w otwartym ankiecie z 86 osób. Nasze wyniki sugerują, że nasz framework może generować werbalizacje zbliżone do języków naturalnych i łatwo zrozumiałe dla nieekspertów. Dzięki temu umożliwia ekspertom nienależącym do domeny interpretację danych Semantycznej sieci internetowej z ponad 91% dokładności ekspertów domeny.', 'ro': 'Odată cu generarea tot mai mare de date pentru Web Semantic vine o cerere tot mai mare pentru ca aceste date să fie puse la dispoziția experților Web non-semantici. O modalitate de a atinge acest obiectiv este de a traduce limbile web semantice în limbaj natural. Vă prezentăm LD2NL, un cadru care permite verbalizarea celor trei limbi cheie ale Semantic Web, adică RDF, OWL și SPARQL. Cadrul nostru se bazează pe o abordare de jos în sus a verbalizării. Am evaluat LD2NL într-un sondaj deschis cu 86 de persoane. Rezultatele noastre sugerează că cadrul nostru poate genera verbalizări care sunt apropiate de limbile naturale și care pot fi ușor înțelese de către non-experți. Astfel, permite experților non-domeniu să interpreteze datele Semantic Web cu mai mult de 91% din acuratețea experților în domeniu.', 'sr': 'Sa uvek rastućom generacijom podataka za semantičku mrežu dolazi veći zahtev za to da se podaci budu dostupni neosemantičnim web stručnjacima. Jedan način postizanja ovog cilja je prevoditi jezike semantičke mreže na prirodni jezik. Predstavljamo LD2NL, okvir koji omogućava verbalizaciju tri ključna jezika Semantičke mreže, tj. RDF, OWL i SPARQL. Naš okvir je baziran na donjem pristupu verbalizaciji. Procjenili smo LD2NL u otvorenom istraživanju sa 86 osoba. Naši rezultati sugeriraju da naš okvir može stvoriti verbalizacije koje su blizu prirodnim jezicima i koje mogu lako shvatiti ne-eksperti. Zato omogućava ekspertima bez domena da interpretiraju semantičke web podatke sa više od 91% tačnosti stručnjaka domena.', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් වෙබ් වෙනුවෙන් විශාල විශාල දත්ත ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් මෙම දත්ත අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න. මේ අරමුණ වෙනුවෙන් එක ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තමයි සෙමැන්ටික් වෙබ් භාෂාව ස්වභාවික භාෂාවට අවරංච අපි LD2NL වෙනුවෙන්, සෙමැන්ටික් වෙබ් එකේ යතුරු භාෂාව තුනක් වර්ගයක් අවශ්\u200dය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරවේශයක්, ඉතින්, RDF, OWL අපේ ක්\u200dරියාමාර්ගයක් අධාරිත වාර්ගයක් වෙනුවෙන්. අපි LD2NL විශ්වාස කරලා අරින්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 86 කියලා. අපේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර ඒ වගේම, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති ඩොමේන්ටික් විශ්වාසිකයන්ට සෙමැන්ටික් වෙබ් දත්ත 91% වඩා විශ්වාසිකයෙන් අව', 'so': 'Dalka macluumaadka xafiiska Semantic waxaa laga helaa baahida koritaanka ee macluumaadkan looga heli karo macluumaadka aan xafiiska aheyn. Qaar qaab ah oo uu ku gaadho goalkan waa in lagu turjumo afka internetka ee Semantic si luqada asalka ah. Waxaynu soo wadaynaa LD2NL, kaas oo fasax u yeelan kara mid ku qoran saddexda luqadood oo afka furan e e internetka Semantic, tusaale ahaan RDF, OWL iyo SPARQL. Shaqoolkayagu waxay ku saleysan tahay habka hoose ee habaarka. Dharaar furan ayaan ku qiimeynay LD2NL oo 86 qof ah. Abaalkayaga waxaa ka muuqan kara in firaaqadeenu uu soo saari karo warqado ku dhow luqadaha dabiicadda ah, taasina si fudud looga garan karo qof aan khabiir aheyn. Sidaa darteed waxay awooddaa in ay khabiiriyiinta aan domain aheyn ay turjumaan macluumaadka internetka ee Semantic ah oo ay ka badan tahay 91% saxda khabiirada deegaanka.', 'sv': 'Med den ständigt växande genereringen av data för den semantiska webben kommer en ökande efterfrågan på att dessa data ska göras tillgängliga för icke-semantiska webbexperter. Ett sätt att uppnå detta mål är att översätta språken på den semantiska webben till naturligt språk. Vi presenterar LD2NL, ett ramverk som gör det möjligt att verbalisera de tre nyckelspråken i den semantiska webben, dvs RDF, OWL och SPARQL. Vårt ramverk bygger på ett bottom-up förhållningssätt till verbalisering. Vi utvärderade LD2NL i en öppen undersökning med 86 personer. Våra resultat tyder på att vårt ramverk kan generera verbaliseringar som är nära naturliga språk och som lätt kan förstås av icke-experter. Därmed gör det möjligt för experter utanför domänen att tolka Semantic Web data med mer än 91% av noggrannheten hos domänexperter.', 'ta': 'செமாண்டிக் இணையத்திற்கான தகவல் உருவாக்கும் போது இந்த தரவுக்கான அதிகரிக்க வேண்டும் தேவையில் வருகிறது பெரிய இணைய விஷயங்களுக இந்த இலக்கை நெருங்குவதற்கான ஒரு வழி செய்தால் செமாண்டிக் இணைய மொழிகளை இயல்பான மொழி LD2NL, ஒரு சட்டத்தை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம். அது செமாண்டிக் வலைப்பின் மூன்று விசையான மொழிகளை விவரிப்பது அனுமதிக்கிறது, அதாவது, RDF, OWL,  எங்கள் சட்டத்தை சார்ந்துகொள்ளும் ஒரு கீழ் மேல் நெருக்கம் அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது. நாம் ஒரு திறந்த பரிசோதனையில் LD2NL மதிப்பிட்டோம் 86 மனிதர்கள். எங்கள் முடிவுகள் தெரியும் என்றால் எங்கள் சட்டத்தில் சாதாரண மொழிகளை உருவாக்க முடியும் என்று நினைக்கிறது அது இயல்பான ம அதைக் கொண்டு, டோமென் இல்லாத செமான்டிக் வலைப்பின் தகவல்களை விளக்க முடியும்', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی ویب کے لئے اضافہ ہونے والی ڈیٹ کی نسل کے ساتھ اس ڈیٹ کے لئے اضافہ ہونے کی ضرورت آتی ہے جو غیر سیمنٹی ویب متخصص لوگوں کے لئے موجود ہوتی ہے۔ اس مقصد کو پہنچانے کا ایک طریقہ یہ ہے کہ سیمنٹی ویب کی زبانیں طبیعی زبان میں ترجمہ کریں۔ ہم LD2NL کو پیش کریں گے، ایک فرمود جو سیمانٹی ویب کے تین کلی زبانوں کو ویروپالیز کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے، یعنی RDF, OWL اور SPARQL. ہمارا فرمود وربولیزی کے نیچے ایک طریقہ پر بنیاد ہے۔ ہم نے LD2NL کو 86 شخصوں کے ساتھ کھلے سپری میں ارزش کیا۔ ہمارے نتیجے اس بات کو پیش کرتے ہیں کہ ہمارے فرمود ایسی باتیں پیدا کر سکتے ہیں جو طبیعی زبانوں کے نزدیک ہیں اور جو غیر علم والے کے ذریعے آسان سمجھ سکتے ہیں۔ اس کے ذریعہ، یہ غیر ڈومین متخصص کرنے والوں کو 91% سے زیادہ سیمنٹی ویب ڈیٹا کی تعبیر کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے۔', 'uz': 'Name Bu maqolani olish uchun bir usul Semantic Web tillarini tabiiy tilga tarjima qilish. Biz LD2NL, Semantic Web uchun uch tugmalar tillarini verballashga ruxsat beramiz. Masalan RDF, OWL va SPARQL. Bizning freymimiz verballikning eng pastki qismiga asoslangan. Biz 86 odamlar bilan ochiq qiymatda LD2NL qiymatimiz. Our results suggest that our framework can generate verbalizations that are close to natural languages and that can be easily understood by non-experts.  Bu bilan, bu domen ekspert haqida Semantic Veb maʼlumotlarini tahrirlash mumkin va domen ekspertlarining haqida 91% dan ortiq.', 'vi': 'Với thế hệ dữ liệu liên tục phát triển cho Semantic Web ngày càng yêu cầu những dữ liệu này được cung cấp cho chuyên gia web không///////////////động/ Một cách để đạt được mục tiêu này là dịch ngôn ngữ của Semantic Web thành ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Chúng tôi giới thiệu nhóm LD2N, một hệ thống cho phép phát tán ba ngôn ngữ chủ chốt của Semantic Web, tức là RDF, OWL, và Spa RQL. Cơ chế của chúng tôi dựa trên một cách tiếp cận từ trên xuống nói. Chúng tôi đã đánh giá LDAP giáo trong một cuộc khảo sát mở với người 86. Kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy cơ sở của chúng tôi có thể tạo ra các diễn văn gần ngôn ngữ tự nhiên và dễ hiểu bởi những người không chuyên gia. Nhờ đó, nó cho phép chuyên gia không thuộc lãnh thổ phiên dịch dữ liệu về mạng trung học với hơn so với I.1. độ chính xác của chuyên gia miền.', 'da': 'Med den stadigt voksende generation af data til Semantic Web kommer en stigende efterspørgsel efter, at disse data stilles til rådighed for ikke-semantiske webeksperter. En måde at nå dette mål på er at oversætte sprogene på det semantiske web til naturligt sprog. Vi præsenterer LD2NL, en ramme, der gør det muligt at verbalisere de tre nøglesprog i Semantic Web, dvs RDF, OWL og SPARQL. Vores rammer er baseret på en bottom-up tilgang til verbalisering. Vi evaluerede LD2NL i en åben undersøgelse med 86 personer. Vores resultater tyder på, at vores rammer kan generere verbaliseringer, der er tæt på natursprog, og som let kan forstås af ikke-eksperter. Dermed gør det muligt for eksperter uden for domæne at fortolke Semantic Web data med mere end 91% af nøjagtigheden af domæneeksperter.', 'bg': 'С все по-нарастващото генериране на данни за семантичната мрежа идва все по-голямо търсене тези данни да бъдат достъпни за несемантични уеб експерти. Един от начините за постигане на тази цел е преводът на езиците на семантичната мрежа на естествен език. Представяме рамка, която позволява вербализиране на трите основни езика на семантичната мрежа, т.е., RDF, OWL и SPARQL. Нашата рамка се основава на подход отдолу нагоре към вербализацията. Оценихме LD2NL в открито проучване с 86 души. Нашите резултати показват, че нашата рамка може да генерира вербализации, които са близки до естествените езици и които могат лесно да бъдат разбрани от неексперти. По този начин тя позволява на експерти извън домейна да интерпретират Семантична уеб данни с повече от 91% от точността на експертите в домейна.', 'nl': 'Met de steeds groeiende generatie van data voor het Semantic Web komt een toenemende vraag om deze data beschikbaar te stellen aan niet-semantische webexperts. Een manier om dit doel te bereiken is om de talen van het Semantic Web te vertalen naar natuurlijke taal. We presenteren LD2NL, een framework dat het mogelijk maakt om de drie belangrijkste talen van het Semantic Web te verbaliseren, namelijk RDF, OWL en SPARQL. Ons framework is gebaseerd op een bottom-up benadering van verbalisatie. We hebben LD2NL geëvalueerd in een open enquête met 86 personen. Onze resultaten suggereren dat ons framework verbalisaties kan genereren die dicht bij natuurlijke talen liggen en die gemakkelijk begrepen kunnen worden door niet-experts. Hiermee kunnen niet-domeinexperts Semantic Web data interpreteren met meer dan 91% van de nauwkeurigheid van domeinexperts.', 'hr': 'S uvek rastućom generacijom podataka za semantičku mrežu dolazi veći zahtjev za objavljivanje tih podataka neosemantičnim web stručnjacima. Jedan način postizanja ovog cilja je prevoditi jezike semantičke mreže na prirodni jezik. Predstavljamo LD2NL, okvir koji omogućava verbalizirati tri ključna jezika Semantičke mreže, tj. RDF, OWL i SPARQL. Naš okvir je temeljen na donjem pristupu verbalizaciji. Procijenili smo LD2NL u otvorenom istraživanju s 86 osoba. Naši rezultati sugeriraju da naš okvir može stvoriti verbalizacije koje su blizu prirodnim jezicima i koje se lako razumiju ne-stručnjaci. Zato omogućava stručnjacima bez domena interpretirati semantičke web podatke sa više od 91% preciznosti stručnjaka domena.', 'id': 'Dengan generasi data semakin tumbuh untuk Web Semantik datang permintaan semakin meningkat untuk data ini dibuat tersedia untuk ahli Web yang tidak semantis. Salah satu cara untuk mencapai tujuan ini adalah untuk menerjemahkan bahasa Web Seman ke bahasa alam. Kami mempersembahkan LD2NL, sebuah rangkaian yang memungkinkan verbalisasi tiga bahasa kunci dari Semantic Web, i.e., RDF, OWL, dan SPARQL. Our framework is based on a bottom-up approach to verbalization.  Kami mengevaluasi LD2NL dalam survei terbuka dengan 86 orang. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa kerangka kami dapat menghasilkan verbalisasi yang dekat dengan bahasa alam dan yang dapat mudah dipahami oleh non-ahli. Dengan demikian, itu memungkinkan para ahli non-domain untuk menerjemahkan data Semantik Web dengan lebih dari 91% akurasi ahli domain.', 'ko': '어의망 데이터가 끊임없이 증가함에 따라 비어의망 전문가에게 이런 데이터를 제공하는 수요도 점점 커진다.이 목표를 실현하는 방법의 하나는 어의망의 언어를 자연어로 번역하는 것이다.우리는 LD2NL을 제시했는데 이것은 어의망의 세 가지 관건적인 언어, 즉 RDF, OWL과 SPARQL을 묘사할 수 있는 프레임워크이다.우리의 틀은 아래에서 위로 올라가는 언어 표현 방법에 기초를 두고 있다.86명이 참여한 공개 조사에서 LD2NL을 평가했습니다.우리의 연구 결과에 따르면 우리의 틀은 자연 언어에 가깝고 비전문가가 쉽게 이해할 수 있는 표현을 만들 수 있다.따라서 비분야 전문가가 분야 전문가의 91%를 넘는 정확도로 의미 웹 데이터를 해석할 수 있게 한다.', 'de': 'Mit der stetig wachsenden Datengenerierung für das Semantic Web steigt der Bedarf, diese Daten nicht-semantischen Web-Experten zur Verfügung zu stellen. Ein Weg, dieses Ziel zu erreichen, ist die Übersetzung der Sprachen des Semantic Web in natürliche Sprache. Wir präsentieren LD2NL, ein Framework, das die Verbalisierung der drei Schlüsselsprachen des Semantic Web ermöglicht, d.h. RDF, OWL und SPARQL. Unser Framework basiert auf einem Bottom-up-Ansatz zur Verbalisierung. Wir haben LD2NL in einer offenen Umfrage mit 86 Personen evaluiert. Unsere Ergebnisse deuten darauf hin, dass unser Framework Verbalisierungen generieren kann, die natursprachlich nahe sind und von Nicht-Experten leicht verstanden werden können. Damit können Non-Domain-Experten Semantic Web-Daten mit mehr als 91% der Genauigkeit von Domain-Experten interpretieren.', 'fa': 'با نسل\u200cهای همیشه رشد داده\u200cها برای وب Semantic، نیاز افزایش برای این داده\u200cها برای متخصص\u200cهای وب غیر semantic را در دسترس قرار می\u200cدهد. یکی از راه رسیدن این هدف اینه که زبان وب سیمانتیک را به زبان طبیعی ترجمه کنیم. ما LD2NL را نشان می دهیم، یک چهارچوب که اجازه می دهد که سه زبان کلیدی از وب Semantic, i.e., RDF, OWL و SPARQL را تبدیل کنند. چهارچوب ما بر روی یک روش پایین بالا برای گفتگویی است. ما LD2NL را در یک تحقیقات باز با 86 نفر ارزیابی کردیم. نتیجه\u200cهای ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که چهارچوب ما می\u200cتواند کلمات\u200cها را تولید کند که نزدیک زبان طبیعی هستند و آن را به آسانی توسط متخصص\u200cهای غیر متخصص درک کنند. با این وجود، به متخصص های غیر دامنی اجازه می دهد که اطلاعات وب Semantic با بیشتر از 91 درصد دقیق متخصص دامنی تعبیر کنند.', 'sw': 'Wakati kizazi cha taarifa kwa ajili ya Mtandao wa Semantic kinaongezeka mahitaji ya takwimu hizi zinazopatikana kwa wataalam wa mtandao wa intaneti wasio na semantic. One way of achieving this goal is to translate the languages of the Semantic Web into natural language.  Tunawasilisha LD2NL, mfumo ambao unaruhusu kuingiza lugha tatu za mtandao wa Semantic Web, yaani RDF, OWL, na SPARQL. Miundombi yetu inatokana na mbinu ya chini ya kutengenezwa. Tulimevalua LD2NL katika utafiti ulio wazi na watu 86. Matokeo yetu yanapendekeza kwamba mfumo wetu unaweza kutengeneza wimbi ambazo ni karibu na lugha za asili na ambayo inaweza kuelewa kirahisi na wasio na wataalam. Kwa hiyo, inawezesha wataalam wasio wa ndani kutafsiri takwimu za mtandao wa Semantic with zaidi ya asilimia 91 ya ukweli wa wataalam wa ndani.', 'tr': "Semantik Web üçin öňünden kän döwletler gelip bolup bu maglumatlary semantik bolmadyk Web uzmanlaryna ulaşmak üçin artdyr. Bu maksady ýetmek üçin bir ýoly Semantik Web dillerini tebigy diline terjime etmekdir. Semantik Web'i ň üç a çyk dillerini, diýip RDF, OWL we SPARQL dillerini verbalizemek üçin bir çerçew görkezilýäris. Biziň çerýşümiz, we çykyşymyz we çykyşymyza daýanýar. Biz LD2NL'i 86 adam bilen açyk görüşmede deňledik. Biziň netijelerimiz çerçewçimiz tebigy dillere golaý we uzmanlaryň tarapyndan aňsat düşünip biljek verbalizasyony döredip biljekdigini maslahat berýärler. Bu sebäpden Semantik web maglumatlaryny 91% degişlikleriň dogrylygyny terjime etmegi mümkin edýär.", 'af': "Met die altyd groei generasie van data vir die Semantiese Web kom 'n groei versoek vir hierdie data om beskikbaar te word aan nie-semantiese Web eksperters. Een manier om hierdie doel te bereik is om die tale van die Semantiese Web in natuurlike taal te vertaal. Ons stel LD2NL voor 'n raamwerk wat toelaat verbalisering van die drie sleutel tale van die Semantiese Web, i.e. RDF, OWL en SPARQL. Ons raamwerk is gebaseer op 'n onderkant toegang tot verbalisasie. Ons evalueer LD2NL in 'n oop ondersoek met 86 persoon. Ons resultate beveel dat ons raamwerk kan genereer verbalisasies wat naby natuurlike tale is en wat maklik verstaan kan word deur nie-eksperte. Daarom kan dit nie-domein eksperte kan uittel Semantiese Web data met meer as 91% van die presies van domein eksperte.", 'sq': 'Me gjeneratën në rritje të të dhënave për Web Semantik vjen një kërkesë në rritje që këto të dhëna të bëhen në dispozicion për ekspertët jo-semantikë në Web. Një mënyrë për të arritur këtë qëllim është përkthimi i gjuhëve të Internetit Semantik në gjuhën natyrore. Ne paraqesim LD2NL, një kuadër që lejon verbalizimin e tre gjuhëve kryesore të Internetit Semantik, i.e., RDF, OWL dhe SPARQL. Korniza jonë është bazuar në një qasje nga poshtë lart ndaj verbalizimit. We evaluated LD2NL in an open survey with 86 persons.  Rezultatet tona sugjerojnë se kuadri ynë mund të gjenerojë verbalizime që janë pranë gjuhëve natyrore dhe që mund të kuptohen lehtë nga jo-ekspertët. Me këtë, kjo lejon ekspertët jashtë domenit të interpretojnë të dhënat Semantike në ueb me më shumë se 91% të saktësisë së ekspertëve në domeni.', 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ ցանցի տվյալների միշտ աճող սերնդի հետ կապված է աճող պահանջը, որպեսզի այս տվյալները հասանելի լինեն ոչ սեմանտիկ ցանցի մասնագետներին: Այս նպատակի իրականացման մի միջոց է սեմանտիկ ցանցի լեզուները թարգմանել բնական լեզվով: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ԼԴ2ՆԼ-ը, մի շրջանակ, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս լեզուների երեք կարևոր խոսքերը սեմանտիկ ցանցի, այսինքն՝ ՌԴՖ, ՕԼ և ՍՊԱՌՔԼ: Մեր կառուցվածքը հիմնված է վերևի վերևի մոտեցումների վրա: Մենք գնահատեցինք ԼԴ2Ն-ը բաց հարցում 86 մարդկանց հետ: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր շրջանակը կարող է ստեղծել բերբալիզացիաներ, որոնք մոտ են բնական լեզուներին և որոնք հեշտությամբ հասկանալի են ոչ մասնագետների կողմից: Therewith, it enables non-domain experts to interpret Semantic Web data with more than 91% of the accuracy of domain experts.', 'am': 'ከዘላለም እያደገፈ የዳታ ትውልድ ለሴሜንቲክ ድረ ገጽ የሚጨምረው ጥያቄ ይደርሳል፡፡ ይህንን መግለጫ ለማግኘት አንዲት መንገድ ነው የሴማኒክ ድረ ገጽ ቋንቋዎችን ወደ ፍጥረት ቋንቋ ለመለየት ነው፡፡ We present LD2NL, a framework that allows verbalizing the three key languages of the Semantic Web, i.e., RDF, OWL, and SPARQL.  የሥርዓታችን መሠረት ወደ መሠረት መሠረት ነው፡፡ ከ86 ሰዎች ጋር LD2NL በተከፈተ መረጃ ውስጥ አረጋገጥነው፡፡ ፍሬቶቻችን የፍሬማችን የፍሬማችን ቋንቋዎች ቅርብ የሚኖሩትን እና ባይኖሩ ባለምህርት ማወቅ ቀላል እንዲችሉ ይችላል፡፡ ስለዚህም የዶሜን አዋቂዎች የስሜንቲክ የዌብ ዳታ ማተርጉም ይችላል፡፡', 'az': "Semantik İnternet üçün büyüyən məlumatların nəsili ilə bu məlumatların semantik Web ekspertlərinə faydalanmasını artırmaq üçün artırmaq istəyir. Bu məqsədi başa çatmaq üçün Semantik Web dillərini təbiətli dilə çevirmək. Biz LD2NL'i, Semantik Web, RDF, OWL və SPARQL'in üç anahtar dillərini verbalizə etməyə imkan verir. Bizim qurğumuz verbalizasyonun altındakı tərzinə dayanılır. Biz LD2NL'i 86 kişi ilə açıq bir araştırma içində değerlendirdik. Nəticlərimiz təbiətli dillərə yaxın olan və təbiətli dillərə çox asanlıqla anlanabilir. Buna görə də, domena olmayan ekspertlərin Semantik Web məlumatlarını domain ekspertlərinin doğruluğundan 91%-dən çox istifadə etməsini qadir edir.", 'bs': 'Uz sve rastuću generaciju podataka za semantičku mrežu dolazi veći zahtjev za objavljivanje tih podataka neosemantičnim web stručnjacima. Jedan način postizanja ovog cilja je prevoditi jezike semantičke mreže na prirodni jezik. Predstavljamo LD2NL, okvir koji omogućava verbalizirati tri ključna jezika Semantičke mreže, tj. RDF, OWL i SPARQL. Naš okvir je baziran na donjem pristupu verbalizaciji. Procijenili smo LD2NL u otvorenom istraživanju sa 86 osoba. Naši rezultati sugeriraju da naš okvir može stvoriti verbalizacije koje su blizu prirodnim jezicima i koje se lako razumiju ne-stručnjaci. Zato omogućava ekspertima bez domena da interpretiraju semantičke web podatke sa više od 91% tačnosti stručnjaka domena.', 'ca': "Amb la generació cada cop més creixent de dades per a la Web Semàtica hi ha una demanda cada cop més gran per a que aquestes dades siguin disponibles a experts no semàntics. Una manera d'aconseguir aquest objectiu és traduir les llengües de la Web Semàtica en llengües naturals. We present LD2NL, a framework that allows verbalizing the three key languages of the Semantic Web, i.e., RDF, OWL, and SPARQL.  El nostre marc està basat en un enfocament de baix a dalt de la verbalització. Vam evaluar LD2NL en un estudi obert amb 86 persones. Els nostres resultats suggereixen que el nostre marc pot generar verbalitzacions que són properes a les llengües naturals i que no experts poden entendre fàcilment. Així doncs, permet als experts no de domini interpretar les dades Semàtics Web amb més del 91% de la precisió dels experts de domini.", 'cs': 'S neustále rostoucí generací dat pro sémantický web přichází rostoucí poptávka po tom, aby tato data byla k dispozici nesémantickým webovým expertům. Jedním ze způsobů, jak tohoto cíle dosáhnout, je přeložit jazyky sémantického webu do přirozeného jazyka. Představujeme LD2NL, framework, který umožňuje verbalizovat tři klíčové jazyky sémantického webu, tedy RDF, OWL a SPARQL. Náš rámec je založen na přístupu zdola nahoru k verbalizaci. Hodnotili jsme LD2NL v otevřeném průzkumu s 86 osobami. Naše výsledky naznačují, že náš framework může generovat verbalizace, které jsou blízké přirozeným jazykům a které lze snadno porozumět nereagovaným. Tím umožňuje non-doménovým expertům interpretovat sémantická webová data s více než 91% přesnosti doménových expertů.', 'et': 'Semantilise veebi andmete järjest kasvava generatsiooniga kaasneb üha suurem nõudlus, et need andmed oleksid kättesaadavad mittesemintilise veebi ekspertidele. Üks viis selle eesmärgi saavutamiseks on semantilise veebi keelte tõlkimine looduskeelde. Esitleme LD2NL raamistikku, mis võimaldab sõnastada kolme semantilise veebi põhikeelt, st RDF, OWL ja SPARQL. Meie raamistik põhineb alt-üles lähenemisel sõnalisele. Hindasime LD2NL avatud uuringus 86 inimesega. Meie tulemused näitavad, et meie raamistik võib genereerida sõnastusi, mis on lähedased looduskeeltele ja mida on kergesti mõistetav mitteakspertidele. Sellega võimaldab see domeenivälisetel ekspertidel tõlgendada semantilise veebi andmeid enam kui 91% ulatuses domeeniekspertide täpsusest.', 'bn': 'সেম্যান্টিক ওয়েবের জন্য তথ্য বৃদ্ধির প্রজন্মের সাথে এই তথ্য বাড়তে থাকে যারা সেম্যান্টিক ওয়েব ব বিশেষজ্ঞদের কাছে পাওয়া  এই লক্ষ্য পৌঁছার একটি উপায় হচ্ছে সেমান্টিক ওয়েবের ভাষা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় অনুবাদ করা। We present LD2NL, a framework that allows verbalizing the three key languages of the Semantic Web, i.e., RDF, OWL, and SPARQL.  আমাদের ফ্রেমের ভিত্তিতে ভিত্তি করা হয়েছে ভার্বালেশনের জন্য। ৮৬ জন ব্যক্তির সাথে একটি উন্মুক্ত জরিপে আমরা এলডি২এনএল মূল্যায়ন করেছি। আমাদের ফলাফল পরামর্শ দিয়েছে যে আমাদের ফ্রেমের কাঠামো প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার কাছাকাছি কাছাকাছি যারা স্বাভাবিক ভাষার ক এর সাথে এটি ডোমেইন বিশেষজ্ঞদের সেম্যান্টিক ওয়েব তথ্য ব্যাখ্যা করতে সক্রিয় করে ডোমেইন বিশেষজ্ঞদের সঠিকভাবে ৯১% বেশী', 'fi': 'Semanttista verkkoa varten kasvavan datan tuottamisen myötä kasvava kysyntä näiden tietojen saattamiselle ei-semanttisten web-asiantuntijoiden saataville kasvaa. Yksi tapa saavuttaa tämä tavoite on kääntää semanttisen verkon kielet luonnolliselle kielelle. Esittelemme LD2NL:n, viitekehyksen, joka mahdollistaa semanttisen verkon kolmen keskeisen kielen verbalisoinnin eli RDF:n, OWL:n ja SPARQL:n. Kehyksemme perustuu alhaalta ylöspäin suuntautuvaan lähestymistapaan verbalisointiin. Arvioimme LD2NL:ää avoimessa kyselyssä, johon osallistui 86 henkilöä. Tuloksemme viittaavat siihen, että viitekehyksemme voi tuottaa sanamuotoja, jotka ovat lähellä luonnollisia kieliä ja jotka eivät-asiantuntijat helposti ymmärtävät. Sen avulla muut kuin toimialueen asiantuntijat voivat tulkita semanttista web-dataa yli 91% toimialueen asiantuntijoiden tarkkuudesta.', 'he': 'עם הדור המתמיד גדל של נתונים לרשת הסמנטית מגיע דרישה גדולה כדי שהנתונים האלה יהיו זמינים למומחים לא סמנטיים ברשת. דרך אחת להשיג את המטרה הזאת היא לתרגם את שפות הרשת הסמנטית לשפה טבעית. אנו מציגים LD2NL, מסגרת שמאפשרת ליצור מילים בשלושת השפות המפתחות של רשת הסמנטית, כלומר RDF, OWL, ו SPARQL. המסגרת שלנו מבוססת על גישה מלמטה למעלה למילוי מילים. הערכנו את LD2NL בסקר פתוח עם 86 אנשים. התוצאות שלנו מציעות כי המסגרת שלנו יכולה ליצור מילים קרובים לשפות טבעיות וזה יכול להבין בקלות על ידי לא מומחים. Therewith, it enables non-domain experts to interpret Semantic Web data with more than 91% of the accuracy of domain experts.', 'sk': 'Z vedno večjo generacijo podatkov za semantični splet se povečuje povpraševanje po tem, da so ti podatki na voljo nesemintičnim spletnim strokovnjakom. Eden od načinov doseganja tega cilja je prevod jezikov semantičnega spleta v naravni jezik. Predstavljamo LD2NL, okvir, ki omogoča verbalizacijo treh ključnih jezikov semantičnega spleta, tj. RDF, OWL in SPARQL. Naš okvir temelji na pristopu od spodaj navzgor k verbalizaciji. LD2NL smo ocenili v odprti anketi s 86 osebami. Naši rezultati kažejo, da lahko naš okvir ustvari besedila, ki so blizu naravnim jezikom in jih lahko nestrokovnjaki zlahka razumejo. S tem nedomenskim strokovnjakom omogoča interpretiranje semantičnih spletnih podatkov z več kot 91% natančnosti domenskih strokovnjakov.', 'ha': "Idan an ƙara zaɓen data masu ƙaranci wa Web Semantic, za'a zo da wata yana ƙaranci daidai da za'a iya samar da wannan data zuwa masu shawarar Web na-Semantic. Babu hanyar da za'a sãmu wannan goal is to translate the languages of the Semantic Web to natural language. Tuna halatar da LD2NL, wani firam wanda ke yarda su balse maganar harshen uku na Samantic Web, misali, RDF, OWL, da SPARQL. Firmamiyarmu na samar a kan matabbaci ta ƙara zuwa balbala. Mun ƙaddara LD2NL a cikin wata fitina bayyananne da 86. MatamayinMu yana gaya cewa firam-kanmu za'a iya ƙara wa lugha ne mafi kusa, kuma za'a fahimta shi da sauƙi na masu masani. Daga wannan, na fassarar da masu kasa masu fitarwa na-Domen don su fassara data na Semantic Web tare da tsakanin 991% na taƙaita na masu fitarwa.", 'jv': 'Siji semani akeh luwih akeh data kanggo Kemerdekaan webu semanti dumadhi bisa ngulinakake data iki dadi kanggo dianggap karo perangkat sing ora semanti maneh Wah sampeyan pancen ing sakjane iki dadi kanggo terjamah ing langa semanti web banjur ing langa sakjane. Awak dhéwé éntuk Monday Awak dhéwé luwih-luwih éntuk LT2NL ning kapan kanggo tukang karo wis narik asai wis narik. Rejalaké awak dhéwé ngerasakno ning keasakno iso nggawe verbalizasi sing ngejaraké idiomatan sing katêpakan karo perusahaan sing bisa nguasakno uga ning acara awak dhéwé. Teretan, it enables non domain special to inter semanti c web data with than 9% of the exact of domain special.', 'bo': 'Semantic དྲ་རྒྱའི་སྐྱེས་ཆ་འཕེལ་དང་། ཆ་འཕྲིན་འགྱུར་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་ཚོ་ཆེ་རུ་གཏོང དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདི་ལ་ཐོབ་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཅིག་ནི་Semantic Web ཡི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་རང་རུང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་འགྲེལ་འདྲིས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་LD2NL ལྟ་བུའི་སྤྱོད་གཞུང་ཞིག་འདིས་Semantic Web ། དཔེར་ན RDF, OWL དང་ SPARQL ཡི་གཙོ་ཚིག་གསུམ་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོའི་གཞུང་གཞི་ནི་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་མཇུག་གི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་དང་གཞི་རྟེན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་86་ཡིན་པའི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་ཡོད་པའི་LD2NL ལ་རིམ་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན་པས། ང་ཚོའི་འབྲས་བུ དེ་བསྟུན། བྱ་ཚིག་གིས་སྤྱོད་མེད་པའི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྟོན་པར་གནང་བ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Large-Scale Hierarchical Alignment for Data-driven Text Rewriting', 'ar': 'محاذاة هرمية واسعة النطاق لإعادة كتابة النص المستند إلى البيانات', 'es': 'Alineación jerárquica a gran escala para la reescritura de texto', 'fr': 'Alignement hiérarchique à grande échelle pour la réécriture de texte pilotée', 'pt': 'Alinhamento hierárquico em grande escala para reescrita de texto orientada por dados', 'hi': 'डेटा-चालित पाठ पुनर्लेखन के लिए बड़े पैमाने पर पदानुक्रमित संरेखण', 'ru': 'Крупномасштабное иерархическое выравнивание для перезаписи текста на основе данных', 'ja': 'データ駆動型テキスト書き換えのための大規模な階層的整列', 'zh': '以数驱文本重写大分对齐', 'ga': 'Ailíniú Ordlathach ar Mhórscála le haghaidh Athscríobh Téacs atá Tiomanta ag Sonraí', 'ka': 'დიდი- სკეალური ჰიერარიქული შენახვა მონაცემების ტექსტის გადაწერისთვის', 'hu': 'Nagyléptékű hierarchikus igazítás adatvezérelt szöveg átírásához', 'el': 'Ευρεία ιεραρχική ευθυγράμμιση για την επαναγραφή κειμένου με βάση δεδομένα', 'kk': 'Деректерді қайта жазу үшін үлкен- масштабтағы гиерархикалық түрлендіру', 'it': 'Allineamento gerarchico su larga scala per la riscrittura del testo basata sui dati', 'lt': 'Didelio masto hierarchinis suderinimas duomenų pagrįstam teksto perrašymui', 'mk': 'Велика хиерархиска подрачба за презапис на текст со податоци', 'ms': 'Jajaran Hierarkikal Skala Besar untuk Tulis Semula Teks Dipemacu Data', 'ml': 'ഡേറ്റാ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പദാവലിയുടെ വീണ്ടും എഴുതുന്നതിനുള്ള വലിയ വലിപ്പം', 'mn': 'Өгөгдлийн дахин бичих үед том-хэмжээний гиерархик хэмжээсүүд', 'mt': 'Allinjament Ġerarkiku fuq Skala kbira għall-Iskrizzjoni mill-ġdid tat-Test immexxi mid-dejta', 'no': 'Stor skaleringsjustering for datadrivt tekst om attskriving', 'pl': 'Wyrównanie hierarchiczne na dużą skalę do przepisywania tekstu opartego na danych', 'ro': 'Aliniere ierarhică la scară largă pentru rescrierea textului bazată pe date', 'sr': 'Velika skala hijerarhička isprava za ponovno pisanje teksta na podacima', 'si': 'Data- drive Text Rewrite', 'so': 'Issuurtagalka sawirada aad u weyn', 'sv': 'Storskalig hierarkisk justering för datadriven textomskrivning', 'ta': 'Large-Scale Hierarchical Alignment for Data-driven Text Rewriting', 'ur': 'Data-driven Text Rewriting', 'uz': 'Maò¥lumotlar bajarildi matn qaytadan tekislash uchun katta oò£lchami', 'vi': 'Mở rộng khả năng khả năng', 'bg': 'Широко йерархично подравняване за пренаписване на текст, задвижван от данни', 'hr': 'Velika hijerarhička isprava za ponovno pisanje teksta na podacima', 'nl': 'Grootschalige hiërarchische uitlijning voor gegevensgestuurde tekst herschrijven', 'da': 'Stor hierarkisk justering til datadrevet tekstgenskrivning', 'id': 'Penjajaran Hierarkis Skala Besar untuk Penulisan Teks Bergerak Data', 'de': 'Hierarchische Ausrichtung im großen Maßstab für datengesteuertes Umschreiben von Texten', 'fa': 'مقیاس بزرگ برای بازنوشتن متن روشن به داده', 'sw': 'Uchambaji Mkubwa wa Udhibiti kwa ajili ya kuandika Maandishi yanayoendeshwa na Data', 'ko': '데이터 구동 텍스트 재작성에 사용되는 대규모 차원 정렬', 'tr': 'undo-type', 'sq': 'Rregullimi Hierarkik me Shkallë të Madhe për Rishkrimin e Tekstit me të dhëna', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Տեքստի վերագրման համար մեծ աստիճան', 'af': 'Groot- Skaal Hierariese Oplyn vir Data- driven Teks Herskryf', 'bn': 'ডাটা চালিয়ে যাওয়া টেক্সট পুনরায় লেখার জন্য বড় আকার পরিমাণ', 'bs': 'Velika hijerarhička isprava za ponovno pisanje teksta podataka', 'az': 'Verilən Metin Yenidən Yazması üçün Büyük-ölçülü Hiyerarşik İzləməsi', 'ca': 'Alliniament Hierarquic a gran escala per a la reescripció de text basada en dades', 'cs': 'Rozsáhlé hierarchické zarovnání pro přepisování textu řízeného daty', 'fi': 'Laajamittainen hierarkinen tasaus dataohjatun tekstin uudelleenkirjoittamista varten', 'et': 'Suuremahuline hierarhiline joondamine andmepõhise teksti ümberkirjutamiseks', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'he': 'התאמה היררכית במידה גדולה לכתיבה מחדש טקסט על ידי נתונים', 'sk': 'Hierarhična poravnava velikega obsega za ponovno pisanje besedila, ki temelji na podatkih', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Data-driven Text Rewriting'}
{'en': 'We propose a simple unsupervised method for extracting pseudo-parallel monolingual sentence pairs from comparable corpora representative of two different text styles, such as news articles and scientific papers. Our approach does not require a seed parallel corpus, but instead relies solely on hierarchical search over pre-trained embeddings of documents and sentences. We demonstrate the effectiveness of our method through automatic and extrinsic evaluation on text simplification from the normal to the Simple Wikipedia. We show that pseudo-parallel sentences extracted with our method not only supplement existing parallel data, but can even lead to competitive performance on their own.', 'ar': 'نقترح طريقة بسيطة غير خاضعة للإشراف لاستخراج أزواج جمل أحادية اللغة متوازية زائفة من مجموعة مماثلة ممثلة لنمطين مختلفين للنص ، مثل المقالات الإخبارية والأوراق العلمية. لا يتطلب نهجنا مجموعة أساسية موازية ، ولكن بدلاً من ذلك يعتمد فقط على البحث الهرمي على عمليات دمج المستندات والجمل المدربة مسبقًا. نبرهن على فعالية طريقتنا من خلال التقييم التلقائي والخارجي على تبسيط النص من العادي إلى ويكيبيديا البسيطة. نظهر أن الجمل الزائفة المتوازية المستخرجة من طريقتنا لا تكمل البيانات المتوازية الموجودة فحسب ، بل يمكن أن تؤدي إلى أداء تنافسي بمفردها.', 'pt': 'Propomos um método simples não supervisionado para extrair pares de frases monolíngues pseudo-paralelos de corpora comparáveis representativos de dois estilos de texto diferentes, como artigos de notícias e artigos científicos. Nossa abordagem não requer um corpus paralelo de sementes, mas depende apenas da pesquisa hierárquica sobre embeddings pré-treinados de documentos e frases. Demonstramos a eficácia do nosso método através da avaliação automática e extrínseca na simplificação de texto da Wikipedia normal para a Simples. Mostramos que as sentenças pseudo-paralelas extraídas com nosso método não apenas complementam os dados paralelos existentes, mas podem até levar a um desempenho competitivo por conta própria.', 'ja': 'ニュース記事や科学論文など、2つの異なるテキストスタイルを代表する同等のコーパスから、擬似並列単一言語の文章ペアを抽出するための単純な監督されていない方法を提案します。私たちのアプローチは、シード並列コーパスを必要とせず、代わりに事前にトレーニングされた文書と文章の埋め込みに対する階層的な検索のみに依存します。通常のWikipediaからSimple Wikipediaへのテキストの簡略化に関する自動評価と外部評価を通じて、メソッドの有効性を実証しています。我々の方法で抽出された擬似並列文は、既存の並列データを補完するだけでなく、それ自体で競争力のあるパフォーマンスにもつながることが示されています。', 'fr': "Nous proposons une méthode simple non supervisée pour extraire des paires de phrases monolingues pseudo-parallèles à partir de corpus comparables représentatifs de deux styles de texte différents, tels que des articles de presse et des articles scientifiques. Notre approche ne nécessite pas de corpus parallèle de départ, mais repose uniquement sur une recherche hiérarchique sur des intégrations préformées de documents et de phrases. Nous démontrons l'efficacité de notre méthode par l'évaluation automatique et extrinsèque de la simplification de texte, de la normale à la version simple de Wikipédia. Nous montrons que les phrases pseudo-parallèles extraites avec notre méthode complètent non seulement les données parallèles existantes, mais peuvent même conduire à des performances compétitives par elles-mêmes.", 'es': 'Proponemos un método simple no supervisado para extraer pares de oraciones monolingües pseudo-paralelas de cuerpos comparables representativos de dos estilos de texto diferentes, como artículos de noticias y artículos científicos. Nuestro enfoque no requiere un corpus paralelo semilla, sino que se basa únicamente en la búsqueda jerárquica sobre incrustaciones previamente entrenadas de documentos y oraciones. Demostramos la eficacia de nuestro método mediante la evaluación automática y extrínseca de la simplificación del texto de la Wikipedia normal a la simple. Demostramos que las oraciones pseudoparalelas extraídas con nuestro método no solo complementan los datos paralelos existentes, sino que incluso pueden conducir a un rendimiento competitivo por sí mismas.', 'zh': '吾建一简无监督之法,以从二异文本式(如新闻文科学论文)者较语料库中取伪并行单语句是也。 吾法不须种并行语料库,但赖预练文档句嵌层搜索。 以正至简维基百科文本简化之自外,以验吾法之有效性。 我们明白,用我们的方法提取的伪并行句子不但可以补现的并行数据,甚至可以独自致争性能。', 'hi': 'हम दो अलग-अलग पाठ शैलियों के तुलनीय कॉर्पोरेट प्रतिनिधि से छद्म-समानांतर मोनोलिंगुअल वाक्य जोड़े निकालने के लिए एक सरल असुरक्षित विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जैसे कि समाचार लेख और वैज्ञानिक कागजात। हमारे दृष्टिकोण को बीज समानांतर कॉर्पस की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है, बल्कि इसके बजाय दस्तावेजों और वाक्यों के पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित एम्बेडिंग पर पूरी तरह से पदानुक्रमित खोज पर निर्भर करता है। हम सामान्य से सरल विकिपीडिया तक पाठ सरलीकरण पर स्वचालित और बाह्य मूल्यांकन के माध्यम से अपनी विधि की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारी विधि के साथ निकाले गए छद्म-समानांतर वाक्य न केवल मौजूदा समानांतर डेटा को पूरक करते हैं, बल्कि अपने दम पर प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन का कारण भी बन सकते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем простой неконтролируемый метод извлечения псевдопараллельных одноязычных пар предложений из сопоставимых корпусов, представляющих два разных стиля текста, таких как новостные статьи и научные работы. Наш подход не требует параллельного семенного корпуса, а опирается исключительно на иерархический поиск над предварительно обученными вложениями документов и предложений. Эффективность нашего метода мы демонстрируем с помощью автоматической и внешней оценки по упрощению текста от обычной к простой Википедии. Мы показываем, что псевдопараллельные предложения, извлеченные нашим методом, не только дополняют существующие параллельные данные, но и могут привести к конкурентной производительности самостоятельно.', 'ga': 'Molaimid modh simplí gan mhaoirseacht chun péirí abairtí aonteangacha bréagacha comhthreomhara a bhaint as corpora inchomparáide a ionadaíonn dhá stíl éagsúla téacs, mar ailt nuachta agus páipéir eolaíocha. Ní éilíonn ár gcur chuige corpas comhthreomhar síl, ach ina ionad sin braitheann sé go hiomlán ar chuardach ordlathach thar leabú réamhoilte doiciméad agus abairtí. Léirímid éifeachtacht ár modh trí mheastóireacht uathoibríoch agus eistreach ar shimpliú téacs ón ngnáth-Vicipéid go dtí an Vicipéid Shimplí. Léirímid nach hamháin go bhforlíonann abairtí bréagacha comhthreomhara a bhaintear lenár modh na sonraí comhthreomhara atá ann cheana féin, ach go bhféadfadh feidhmíocht iomaíoch a bheith mar thoradh orthu fiú amháin.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε μια απλή μέθοδο για την εξαγωγή ψευδο-παράλληλων μονογλωσσικών ζευγαριών προτάσεων από συγκρίσιμα σώματα αντιπροσωπευτικά δύο διαφορετικών μορφών κειμένου, όπως άρθρα ειδήσεων και επιστημονικές εργασίες. Η προσέγγισή μας δεν απαιτεί ένα παράλληλο σώμα σπόρων, αλλά στηρίζεται αποκλειστικά στην ιεραρχική αναζήτηση πάνω από προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις εγγράφων και προτάσεων. Αποδεικνύουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα της μεθόδου μας μέσα από αυτόματη και εξωτερική αξιολόγηση της απλούστευσης κειμένου από την κανονική στην Απλή Βικιπαίδεια. Δείχνουμε ότι οι ψευδο-παράλληλες προτάσεις που εξάγονται με τη μέθοδο μας όχι μόνο συμπληρώνουν τα υπάρχοντα παράλληλα δεδομένα, αλλά μπορούν ακόμη και να οδηγήσουν σε ανταγωνιστικές επιδόσεις από μόνες τους.', 'hu': 'Egy egyszerű, felügyelet nélküli módszert javasolunk a pszeudo-párhuzamos, egynyelvű mondatpárok kivonására két különböző szövegstílus, például újságcikkek és tudományos cikkek összehasonlítható corporáiból. Megközelítésünk nem igényel magpárhuzamos korpuszt, hanem kizárólag a dokumentumok és mondatok előkészített beágyazásának hierarchikus keresésére támaszkodik. Módszerünk hatékonyságát automatikus és külső értékeléssel bizonyítjuk a szöveg egyszerűsítésének a normál Wikipédiától az Egyszerű Wikipédiáig történő automatikus és külső értékelésével. Megmutatjuk, hogy a módszerünkkel kivont pszeudopárhuzamos mondatok nemcsak kiegészítik a meglévő párhuzamos adatokat, hanem önmagukban is versenyképes teljesítményhez vezethetnek.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ გვეძლევა საუკეთესო მონოლოგური წიგნის კომპორაციის ორი განსხვავებული ტექსტის სტილის გამოყენება, როგორც ახალგაზრულები და მეცნიერო კომპორაციები. ჩვენი პროგორმა არ იჭირდება პარალელი კორპუსს, მაგრამ მხოლოდ მხოლოდ იერაქტიკური ძიება დოკუმენტების და სიტყვების პროგორმაციაზე. ჩვენ ჩვენი მეთოდის ეფექტიურობას ავტომატიკური და ექსტრინიკური განსაზღვრებით ტექსტის განსაზღვრებით ნორმალური განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებით ვიკიპედიაში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ პესეუდო-პარალელური სიტყვები, რომელიც ჩვენი მეტისთვის გამოგექტირებული არა მხოლოდ არსებობს მხოლოდ პარალელური მონაცემები, მაგრამ შე', 'it': "Proponiamo un semplice metodo non supervisionato per estrarre coppie di frasi monolingue pseudo-parallele da corpora comparabili rappresentative di due stili di testo diversi, come articoli di notizie e articoli scientifici. Il nostro approccio non richiede un corpus semi parallelo, ma si basa esclusivamente sulla ricerca gerarchica su incorporazioni pre-addestrate di documenti e frasi. Dimostriamo l'efficacia del nostro metodo attraverso una valutazione automatica ed estrinseca sulla semplificazione del testo dalla Wikipedia normale alla Wikipedia semplice. Mostriamo che le frasi pseudo-parallele estratte con il nostro metodo non solo integrano i dati paralleli esistenti, ma possono anche portare a prestazioni competitive da sole.", 'kk': 'Біз псевдо- параллелі монолингі сөйлеменің екі әртүрлі мәтін стилінің, мысалы, жаңалық мақалалар және ғылыми қағаздардың салыстырылатын корпораға салыстырылатын екі әртүрлі мәтін стилдерінен шыға Біздің тәсіліміз параллелі корпус тұрмайды, бірақ олардың орнына тек құжаттар мен сөйлемелердің алдын- ала оқылған құжаттарды және иерархиялық іздеуде тәуелді. Мәтінді кәдімгінен қарапайым Википедиядан автоматты және сыртқы оқиға арқылы әдіміздің эффективнігін көрсетеді. Біз псевдо параллельді сөздерді әдіміздің арқылы қана параллель деректерді қосуға арналған емес, бірақ олардың өзіміздің жалғастыру әдістерін өзімізге көмектесе аламыз', 'lt': 'Mes siūlome paprastą nepastebimą metodą pseudolygiagrečių vienkalbių sakinių poroms ištraukti iš panašių korprų, atstovaujančių dviem skirtingoms teksto stiliams, pavyzdžiui, naujienų straipsniams ir moksliniams dokumentams. Mūsų požiūris nereikalauja sėklos lygiagretaus korpuso, o vietoj to remiasi tik hierarchine paieška dėl iš anksto parengtų dokumentų ir sakinių įterpimo. Mes įrodome savo metodo veiksmingumą atliekant automatinį ir išorinį teksto supaprastinimo vertinimą nuo įprastos iki paprastos Vikipedijos. Mes parodome, kad pseudolygiagretūs sakiniai, gaunami taikant mūsų metodą, ne tik papildo esamus lygiagrečius duomenis, bet ir gali paskatinti konkurencinius rezultatus savarankiškai.', 'mk': 'Ние предложуваме едноставен ненадгледуван метод за извлекување псевдо-паралелни монојазични реченици парови од споредливи корпора претставници на два различни стили на текст, како што се вести и научни вести. Нашиот пристап не бара паралелен корпус за семето, туку само се потпира на хиерархиска потрага над предобучените вложувања на документи и реченици. Ја демонстрираме ефикасноста на нашиот метод преку автоматска и екстринзичка проценка на едноставувањето на текстот од нормална до едноставна Википедија. Ние покажуваме дека псевдо-паралелните реченици извадени со нашиот метод не само што ги комплицираат постојните паралелни податоци, туку дури и можат да доведат до конкурентна перформанса сами.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan kaedah sederhana yang tidak diawasi untuk mengekstrak pasangan kalimat monobahasa pseudo-paralel dari perwakilan corpora yang sama dengan dua gaya teks yang berbeza, seperti artikel berita dan kertas saintifik. pendekatan kita tidak memerlukan tubuh selari benih, tetapi selain itu hanya bergantung pada pencarian hierarkis atas penyampilan dokumen dan kalimat yang dilatih-dilatih. Kami menunjukkan kegunaan kaedah kami melalui penilaian automatik dan ekstrinsik tentang pemudahan teks dari normal ke Wikipedia Sederhana. Kami menunjukkan bahawa kalimat pseudo-paralel yang ditarik dengan kaedah kami tidak hanya menambah data paralel yang wujud, tetapi bahkan boleh membawa kepada prestasi kompetitif sendiri.', 'ml': 'സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ഒരു ലളിതമായ രീതിയിലാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നത്, രണ്ട് വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പെസുഡോ-പാരാളില്\u200d  നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തേക്ക് ഒരു വിത്ത് പാരാളല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെ ആവശ്യമില്ല, പക്ഷെ അതിനു പകരം മുന്\u200dപ് പരിശീലനം നല്\u200dകപ്പെട്ട രേഖകളും ശിക്ഷയും മ സാധാരണ വിക്കിപിഡിയയില്\u200d നിന്നും സാധാരണമായ വെക്കിപിഡിയയില്\u200d നിന്നും ലേഖനത്തിന്റെ എളുപ്പമുള്ള വിലയിലൂടെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുട നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും നിലവിലുള്ള പാരാളില്\u200d മാത്രമല്ലാത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d കൂട്ടിക്കൊടുക്കുന്നത് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu metodu sempliċi mhux sorveljat għall-estrazzjoni ta’ pari ta’ sentenzi monolingwi psewdo-paralleli minn korpra komparabbli rappreżentattiva ta’ żewġ stili differenti ta’ test, bħall-artikoli tal-a ħbarijiet u l-karti xjentifiċi. L-approċċ tagħna ma jeħtieġx korpus parallel taż-żerriegħa, iżda minflok jiddependi biss fuq tiftix ġerarkiku fuq inkorporazzjonijiet imħarrġa minn qabel ta’ dokumenti u sentenzi. Aħna nippruvaw l-effettività tal-metodu tagħna permezz ta’ evalwazzjoni awtomatika u esterna dwar is-simplifikazzjoni tat-test min-normal sal-Wikipedia Simple. We show that pseudo-parallel sentences extracted with our method not only supplement existing parallel data, but can even lead to competitive performance on their own.', 'mn': 'Бид шинжлэх ухааны баримт болон шинжлэх ухааны сонины хоёр өөр хэлбэрээс харьцуулагдах корпора-ын төлөөлөгчдийн pseudo-параллел нэг хэлний хэлбэрийг авахын тулд энгийн баталгаагүй арга зам санал өгдөг. Бидний арга зам нь тарианы параллел корпус хэрэгтэй биш, гэхдээ зөвхөн баримт болон өгүүлбэрүүдийн аль болон сургалтын судалгаанд хайж байдаг. Бид өөрсдийн аргын үр дүнг автоматжуулалт болон гадагшлуулалт дээр энгийн Википедияд хүртэл хэмжээний хялбарчлалтын тухай үзүүлдэг. Бид зөвхөн оршин байгаа параллел өгөгдлийг нэмэгдүүлэх биш гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ тэдний зөвхөн өрсөлдөөний үйл ажиллагаанд хүргэж чадна.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy prostą bez nadzoru metodę wyodrębniania pseudo-równoległych jednojęzycznych par zdań z porównywalnych korpusów reprezentujących dwa różne style tekstu, takie jak artykuły prasowe i artykuły naukowe. Nasze podejście nie wymaga równoległego korpusu seed, lecz opiera się wyłącznie na hierarchicznym wyszukiwaniu nad wstępnie przeszkolonymi osadzeniami dokumentów i zdań. Skuteczność naszej metody demonstrujemy poprzez automatyczną i zewnętrzną ocenę uproszczenia tekstu z normalnej do Prostej Wikipedii. Pokazujemy, że pseudo-równoległe zdania ekstraktowane naszą metodą nie tylko uzupełniają istniejące dane równoległe, ale mogą nawet prowadzić do konkurencyjności samodzielnie.', 'ro': 'Propunem o metodă simplă nesupravegheată pentru extragerea perechilor de fraze monolingve pseudo-paralele din corpore comparabile reprezentative pentru două stiluri de text diferite, cum ar fi articole de știri și articole științifice. Abordarea noastră nu necesită un corpus paralel de semințe, ci se bazează doar pe căutarea ierarhică asupra încorporărilor pre-instruite de documente și propoziții. Demonstrăm eficiența metodei noastre prin evaluarea automată și extrinsă a simplificării textului de la Wikipedia normală la Wikipedia simplă. Noi arătăm că propozițiile pseudo-paralele extrase cu metoda noastră nu numai că completează datele paralele existente, dar pot duce chiar la performanțe competitive pe cont propriu.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår ein enkel usikkerte metode for å ekstrahera pseudoparallelle monospråk setningar frå sammenlignbare korporreprezentant av to ulike tekststilar, slik som nye artiklar og vitenskapelige papir. Tilnærminga vårt krev ikkje ei frø parallell korpus, men i staden kan berre rely på hierarkisk søk over føretrainerte innbygging av dokument og setningar. Vi demonstrerer effektiviteten av metoden vårt gjennom automatisk og ekstrinsic evaluering av tekstforenklinga frå normal til enkelt Wikipedia. Vi viser at pseudoparallelle setningar ekstraherte med metoden vårt ikkje berre legg til eksisterande parallelle data, men kan til og med føre til konkurentære utføring egen.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo jednostavnu neodređenu metodu za izvlačenje pseudoparalelnih parova monojezičkih rečenica iz usporednog predstavnika korpore dve različite tekstske stila, poput novinskih članaka i naučnih papira. Naš pristup ne zahteva paralelni korpus semena, ali umjesto toga se oslanja samo na hijerarhičku pretragu nad predobučenim integracijama dokumenta i rečenica. Pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg metoda kroz automatsku i ekstrinsku procjenu o pojednostavljivanju teksta iz normalne do jednostavne Wikipedije. Pokazujemo da pseudoparalelna rečenica izvučena iz našeg metode ne samo dodaje postojeće paralelne podatke, već čak i mogu dovesti do konkurentne izvedbe samih.', 'si': 'අපි සාමාන්\u200dය නිර්මාණ විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවික වාර්තාවක් වලින් සම අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ නැහැ, ඒත් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණය සහ වාක්ය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැහැ. අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ විධානයේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය විකිපිඩියාවට සාමාන්\u200dය විකිපිඩියාවෙන් පැත්තක් ස අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පද්ධතියෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර සමාන්තික වාක්ය ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැහැ අපේ පද්ධතියෙන් ප්\u200dරතිච', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab sahlan oo aan la ilaalinayn oo aan soo bixino labada noocyo oo isku mid ah xafiiska afka noocyada ee qoyska oo u eg labo noocyo kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan warqadaha warqadaha iyo warqadaha cilmiga ah. Dhaqdhaheenna looma baahna korpus isku mid ah, laakiin waxaa ku xiran kara raadinta hierarkiisa oo kaliya meelaha loo soo baray dukumentiyada iyo xukummada. Waxaynu muujinnaa shaqaalaha qaababkayaga si gaar ah loo caddeeyo qiimeynta qoraalka sahliga ah ee caadiga ah ilaa Wikipedia fudud. Waxaynu tusnaynaa erayo isku mid ah oo lagu soo saaray qaababkayaga oo aan ahayn mid ku dari kara macluumaad isku mid ah, laakiin xittaa waxay ku socon karaan tababar-tartank.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en enkel icke övervakad metod för att extrahera pseudo-parallella enspråkiga meningspar från jämförbara corpora representativa för två olika textstilar, såsom nyhetsartiklar och vetenskapliga artiklar. Vårt tillvägagångssätt kräver inte en sådd parallell korpus, utan förlitar sig istället enbart på hierarkisk sökning över förutbildade inbäddningar av dokument och meningar. Vi visar hur effektiv vår metod är genom automatisk och extern utvärdering av textförenkling från normal till enkel Wikipedia. Vi visar att pseudoparallella meningar som extraheras med vår metod inte bara kompletterar existerande parallella data, utan även kan leda till konkurrenskraft på egen hand.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு எளிய பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத முறையில் செய்தி கட்டுரைகள் மற்றும் அறிவியல் கட்டுரைகள் மற்றும் செய்தி கலைவியல் காகிதங்களை போன்ற மொன்மொழியில எங்கள் அணுகாரணத்திற்கு ஒரு வித்தை இணையான கோர்பாஸ் தேவையில்லை, ஆனால் அதற்கு பதிலாக முன் பயிற்சி பெற்ற ஆவணங்கள் மற்றும் வாக்குகள சாதாரண விகிபிடியாவிலிருந்து சுலபமாக உரை எளிதாக்கத்தின் மூலம் தானாகவே மற்றும் வெளியேறும் மதிப்பின் மூலம் எங்கள் முறைய எங்கள் முறைமையில் வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட முறையில் உள்ள இணைப்பு தரவை மட்டும் சேர்க்க முடியும் என்பதை நாம் காட்டுகிறோம், ஆனால் அவர்கள் தன', 'ur': 'ہم ایک ساده غیر قابل تحقیق کی طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ دو مختلف ٹیکسٹ استیلوں اور علمی کاغذوں کے مقابلہ دار کورپورا کے دو مختلف ٹیکسٹ استیلوں کے مطابق خبریں اور علمی کاغذوں کے جوڑوں کو نکال سکیں۔ ہماری تقریبا کسی قسم کے مطابق غلام کی ضرورت نہیں ہے لیکن اس کے بدلے صرف سند اور کلمات کی پیش آموزش کی جگہ پر اعتماد ہے ہم اپنے طریقے کی فعالیت کو آٹوٹی اور خارجی ارزیابی کے ذریعہ ایک ساده ویکیپیڈیا تک پہنچاتے ہیں. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے طریقے سے صرف موجود موجود موجود موجود ڈیٹے کو اضافہ نہیں کرسکتے، بلکہ وہ اپنے ہی طریقے پر بھی مسابقات کرسکتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Biz bir oddiy xavfsiz qilmagan usulni boshqa bir xil matn uslublardan bir xil qo'llangan so'zlarni ajratish usuli, masalan xabar maqolalari va ilmiy qoʻllar. Бизнинг қонун-қоидамизга парламент corpus керак эмас, аммо унинг ўрнига фақатгина ҳужжатлар ва ҳужжатлар ўртасида текширилган ҳужжатлар ва ҳужжатлар ўртасида мувофиқ кўринишга боғланади. Biz oddiy Wikipediya oddiydan oddiylikga matnning soddalashtirishni avtomatik va external qiymatni ko'rsamiz. Biz shunday qilamiz, bizning usuli bilan chiqarilgan soʻzlarni faqat mavjud parametrlarni qoʻshish mumkin, balki ularning o'zimlariga rivojlanish natijasini oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp đơn giản không giám sát để trích ra một bản độc ngôn ngữ giả so với nhau từ một đại diện vật lý tương đối của hai kiểu văn bản khác nhau, như các bài báo và các giấy tờ khoa học. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta không cần một cơ thể rải rác song song song, mà chỉ dựa trên việc tìm kiếm cấp trên những sự tác động trước đây của các văn bản và câu. Chúng tôi chứng minh hiệu quả của phương pháp này qua một đánh giá tự động và dứt khoát về sự đơn giản hóa văn bản từ bình thường cho đến Wikipedia. Chúng tôi cho thấy các câu giả song với phương pháp này không chỉ bổ sung các dữ liệu song song tồn tại, mà còn có thể tự mình tạo ra hiệu ứng cạnh tranh.', 'nl': "We stellen een eenvoudige methode voor voor het extraheren van pseudo-parallelle eentalige zinsparen uit vergelijkbare corpora's die representatief zijn voor twee verschillende tekststijlen, zoals nieuwsberichten en wetenschappelijke artikelen. Onze aanpak vereist geen seed parallelle corpus, maar baseert zich uitsluitend op hiërarchisch zoeken over vooraf getrainde inbeddingen van documenten en zinnen. We demonstreren de effectiviteit van onze methode door automatische en extrinsieke evaluatie van tekstvereenvoudiging van de normale naar de eenvoudige Wikipedia. We laten zien dat pseudo-parallelle zinnen die met onze methode worden geëxtraheerd, niet alleen bestaande parallelle data aanvullen, maar zelfs kunnen leiden tot competitieve prestaties op zichzelf.", 'bg': 'Предлагаме прост, без надзор метод за извличане на псевдопаралелни едноезични двойки изречения от сравними корпуси, представителни на два различни текстови стила, като новинарски статии и научни статии. Нашият подход не изисква паралелен корпус, а разчита единствено на йерархично търсене над предварително обучени вграждания на документи и изречения. Ние демонстрираме ефективността на нашия метод чрез автоматична и външна оценка на опростяването на текста от нормалната към простата Уикипедия. Показваме, че псевдопаралелните изречения, извлечени с нашия метод, не само допълват съществуващите паралелни данни, но дори могат да доведат до конкурентно представяне сами по себе си.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo jednostavnu neodređenu metodu izvlačenja pseudoparalelnih parova monojezičkih rečenica iz usporednog predstavnika tijela dva različita teksta stila, poput novinskih članaka i znanstvenih papira. Naš pristup ne zahtijeva paralelni korpus sjemena, ali umjesto toga se oslanja samo na hijerarhičku pretragu nad predobučenim integracijama dokumenta i rečenica. Mi pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg metoda kroz automatsku i ekstrinsku procjenu o pojednostavljivanju teksta iz normalne do jednostavne Wikipedije. Pokazujemo da pseudoparalelna rečenica izvučena s našim metodom ne samo dodaje postojeće paralelne podatke, već čak i mogu dovesti do konkurentne učinke samih.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en simpel, ukontrolleret metode til at udtrække pseudo-parallelle ensprogede sætningspar fra sammenlignelige corpora repræsentative for to forskellige tekststile, såsom nyhedsartikler og videnskabelige artikler. Vores tilgang kræver ikke et frøparallellt korpus, men er i stedet udelukkende baseret på hierarkisk søgning over prætrænede indlejringer af dokumenter og sætninger. Vi demonstrerer effektiviteten af vores metode gennem automatisk og ekstern evaluering af tekstforenkling fra normal til simpel Wikipedia. Vi viser, at pseudo-parallelle sætninger udvundet med vores metode ikke kun supplerer eksisterende parallelle data, men kan endda føre til konkurrencepræstationer på egen hånd.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen eine einfache, unbeaufsichtigte Methode vor, um pseudo-parallele einsprachige Satzpaare aus vergleichbaren Korpora zu extrahieren, die zwei verschiedene Textstile repräsentieren, wie Nachrichtenartikel und wissenschaftliche Artikel. Unser Ansatz erfordert keinen seed parallelen Korpus, sondern basiert ausschließlich auf der hierarchischen Suche über vortrainierte Einbettungen von Dokumenten und Sätzen. Wir demonstrieren die Wirksamkeit unserer Methode durch automatische und extrinsische Auswertung der Textvereinfachung von der normalen zur einfachen Wikipedia. Wir zeigen, dass pseudo-parallele Sätze, die mit unserer Methode extrahiert werden, nicht nur bestehende parallele Daten ergänzen, sondern auch alleine zu Wettbewerbsleistungen führen können.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan metode sederhana yang tidak diawasi untuk mengekstraksi pasangan kalimat monobahasa pseudo-paralel dari perumpamaan perumpamaan dari dua gaya teks yang berbeda, seperti artikel berita dan kertas ilmiah. Pendekatan kita tidak membutuhkan benih corpus paralel, tetapi sebaliknya hanya bergantung pada pencarian hierarkis atas pencetakan dokumen dan kalimat yang terlatih sebelumnya. Kami menunjukkan efektivitas metode kami melalui evaluasi otomatis dan ekstrinsik tentang penyimplifikasi teks dari normal ke Wikipedia sederhana. Kami menunjukkan bahwa kalimat pseudo-paralel yang diekstraksi dengan metode kami tidak hanya menambahkan data paralel yang ada, tetapi bahkan dapat membawa ke prestasi kompetitif sendiri.', 'ko': '우리는 두 가지 서로 다른 텍스트 스타일(예를 들어 뉴스 문장과 과학 기술 논문)을 대표하는 비교 가능한 자료 라이브러리에서 위조 평행 단어 문장 쌍을 추출하는 간단한 무감독 방법을 제시했다.우리의 방법은 피드 평행 자료 라이브러리가 아니라 미리 훈련된 문서와 문장을 층별로 검색하는 데 전적으로 의존한다.우리는 일반에서 간단한 위키백과까지의 텍스트 간소화를 통해 자동과 외부 평가를 실시함으로써 우리의 방법의 유효성을 증명하였다.우리는 우리의 방법으로 추출한 위조 평행문은 기존의 평행 데이터를 보충할 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 단독으로 경쟁 성능을 초래할 수도 있다는 것을 발견했다.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش ساده غیرقابل تحمل برای اخراج جفت\u200cهای یک زبان پارالی از نماینده\u200cی قابل مقایسه\u200cای از دو سبک متن متفاوت، مانند مقاله\u200cهای خبری و کاغذهای علمی. دسترسی ما نیاز به یک کورپوس متفاوتی نیست، ولی به جای آن فقط بر جستجوی متفاوتی در مورد پیوسته\u200cهای سند و جمله\u200cهای پیش آموزش شده است. ما فعالیت روش خودمان را با ارزیابی خودکار و خارجی بر ساده ساده\u200cسازی متن از طبیعی به ویکیپدییا ساده نشان می\u200cدهیم. ما نشان می دهیم که جمله\u200cهای pseudo-parallel با روش ما اخراج شده نه تنها داده\u200cهای parallel موجود است، بلکه حتی می\u200cتوانند به انجام رقابت خودشان رقابت کنند.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza njia rahisi isiyo sahihi ya kuondoa hukumu ya kifo chenye tofauti za lugha za kimapenzi kutoka mwakilishi wa makampuni mawili tofauti, kama vile makala za habari na karatasi za kisayansi. Our approach does not require a seed parallel corpus, but instead relies solely on hierarchical search over pre-trained embeddings of documents and sentences.  Tunaonyesha ufanisi wa njia yetu kupitia utafiti wa faragha na wa nje kuhusu urahisi wa maneno kutoka kawaida mpaka Wikipedia. Tunaonyesha kwamba hukumu za usambazaji zilizotolewa kwa njia yetu siyo tu kuongeza taarifa zilizopo sawa, lakini inaweza hata kusababisha utendaji wa ushindani wao wenyewe.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n eenvoudige onverondersteunde metode vir uitpakking van pseudo-parallele monotaalse setningpaar van vergelykbare korpora voorstel van twee verskillende teks style, soos nuusartikels en wetenskaplike papiers. Ons toegang benodig nie 'n saad parallele korpus nie, maar in plaas vertrou net op hierarkies soek oor voorafgeleerde inbêding van dokumente en teikens. Ons wys die effektiviteit van ons metode deur outomatiese en extrinsice evaluering op teks vereenvoudiging van die normale af tot die Eenvoudige Wikipedia. Ons wys dat pseudo-parallele setnings met ons metode uitgevoer is nie net wat bestaande parallele data is nie, maar kan selfs lei na konkurentelike prestasie op hul eie.", 'tr': 'Biz pseudo-parallel mono dilli sözläni iki farklı metin stilinden çykarmak üçin basit bir yöntem teklip berýäris, ýaly täzelikler we ylmy kagytlar ýaly. Biziň ýaryşymyz parallel köpüsi gerek däl, ýöne bu ýerine diňe hiyerarşik gözlemleriň öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden geçirilýän sözleriň içine güýçli. Biz öz metodamyzyň otomatik we ekstrinsici metin bejermelerini adatça Wikipediýa çenli etkinleýänligini görkeýäris. Biz pseudo-parallel sözlerimizi öz yönümizde çykarylýan diňe bar paralel maglumatlarymyzy eklemedik, ýöne hem olaryň özleriniň ýaryşykly etkinleşmelerine ýok edip bileris.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një metodë të thjeshtë jo të mbikqyrur për nxjerrjen e çifteve të fjalëve monogjuhësore pseudo-paralele nga përfaqësuesit e korprave të krahasueshëm të dy stileve të ndryshme teksti, të tilla si artikujt e lajmeve dhe gazetat shkencore. Përqasja jonë nuk kërkon një korpus paralel, por në vend të kësaj mbështetet vetëm në kërkimin hierarkik mbi përfshirjet e paratrajnuara të dokumenteve dhe fjalëve. Ne demonstrojmë efektshmërinë e metodës sonë nëpërmjet vlerësimit automatik dhe ekstrinzik mbi thjeshtimin e tekstit nga normalja në Wikipedia e thjeshtë. Ne tregojmë se fjalët pseudoparalele të nxjerra me metodën tonë jo vetëm shtojnë të dhënat paralele ekzistuese, por mund të çojnë edhe në performancë konkurruese vetëm.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի պարզ անվերահսկված մեթոդ, որպեսզի հանենք կեղծ-զուգահեռ մեկլեզու նախադասությունների զուգավորներ երկու տարբեր տեքստի ոճերից, ինչպիսիք են նորությունների հոդվածները և գիտական թղթերը: Մեր մոտեցումը չի պահանջում սերմի զուգահեռ կորպուս, այլ միայն հիերարխիկ որոնումների վրա է հիերարխիկ փաստաթղթերի և նախադասությունների նախապատրաստված ներդրումների վրա: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս մեր մեթոդի արդյունավետությունը ավտոմատիկ և արտաքին գնահատման միջոցով տեքստի պարզաբանության մասին նորմալ և պարզ Վիքիփեդիայից: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդի օգնությամբ ստացված կեղծ-զուգահեռ նախադասությունները ոչ միայն լրացնում են գոյություն ունեցող զուգահեռ տվյալները, այլ նույնիսկ կարող են հանգեցնել մրցակցության արդյունքներին:', 'az': 'Biz pseudo-paralel monodilli cümlələr çiftlərini, müqayisədə olan iki müxtəlif mətn stillərinin, məsələlərin və bilimsel kağıtların, müqayisədə olan korpora şəkilindən çıxartmaq üçün basit tərzdə təmin edilməmiş bir yolu təklif edirik. Bizim yaxınlığımız paralel korpus tələb etməz, ancaq hiyerarşik araştırmaların əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş belələr və cümlələr barəsində təvəkkül edir. Biz metodlarımızın istifadəçiliğini, normaldən basit Wikipediaya qədər yazılmış və extrinsic təcrübə vasitəsilə göstəririk. Bizim metodumuzda pseudo-paralel cümlələr çıxarılmış deyil yalnız mevcut paralel məlumatları, lakin hətta onlar özlərinə müqayisədə müqayisədə göstərə bilərlər.', 'am': 'በሁለት ልዩ ጽሑፎች መልዕክቶች፣ የዜና ጽሑፎች እና የሳይንቀሳዊ ቃላት እና የኮርፖራ መልዕክት ሁለት ሁለት ዓይነቶችን ለማውጣት ቀላል ያልጠበቀውን ስሕተት እናሳስባለን፡፡ የሥርዓታችን አካባቢ የዘር ተግባር አያስፈልግም፥ ነገር ግን በመተላለፊያ የተማረ ሰነድ እና የፍርድ ክፍሎች በተለየ ጥያቄ ላይ ብቻ ይታመናል፡፡ የሥርዓታችንን ውጤት አውቶማቲካዊ እና ውጭ አካሄድ በማድረግ ካለበት የጽሑፍ ቀላልነት ወደ ቀላል Wikipedia እናሳየዋለን፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን፣ በሥርዓታችን የተለየውን የሥርዓት ተግባር ብቻ አይደለም፣ ነገር ግን ለራሳቸው የተዋጋውን ትክክል ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡', 'bn': 'আমরা সংবাদ প্রবন্ধ এবং বৈজ্ঞানিক কাগজের মতো কোর্পোরার প্রতিনিধি দুটি ভিন্ন টেক্সট স্টাইলের প্রতিনিধির দুটি প্রতিনিধি থেকে প্রস্তাব করার জন্য একটি  আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা কোন প্যারালেল কর্পাসের দরকার নেই, কিন্তু তার বদলে শুধুমাত্র পূর্ববর্তী প্রশিক্ষিত নথি এবং শাস্তি প্রদান আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এবং বিদেশী মূল্যের মাধ্যমে আমাদের পদ্ধতির কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করি সাধারণ উইকিপিডিয়া থেকে সাধারণ উইকিপিড আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের পদ্ধতির মাধ্যমে বেরিয়ে যাওয়া প্যারালেল বাক্য শুধুমাত্র বিদ্যমান প্যারালেল ডাটা যোগ করা নয়, কিন্তু এম', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme jednoduchou bez dozoru metodu extrakce pseudo-paralelních jednojjazyčných větových párů ze srovnatelných korpusů reprezentujících dva různé textové styly, jako jsou zpravodajské články a vědecké články. Náš přístup nevyžaduje seed paralelní korpus, ale spoléhá pouze na hierarchické vyhledávání nad předškolenými vloženími dokumentů a vět. Účinnost naší metody demonstrujeme automatickým a extrinzickým vyhodnocením zjednodušení textu z normální do Jednoduché Wikipedie. Ukazujeme, že pseudo-paralelní věty extrahované naší metodou nejen doplňují existující paralelní data, ale dokonce mohou vést k konkurenčnímu výkonu samy o sobě.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo jednostavnu neodređenu metodu za izvlačenje pseudoparalelnih parova monojezičkih rečenica iz usporednog predstavnika tijela dva različita teksta stila, poput novinskih članaka i naučnih papira. Naš pristup ne zahtijeva paralelni korpus semena, ali umjesto toga se oslanja samo na hijerarhičku pretragu nad predobučenim integracijama dokumenta i rečenica. Mi pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg metoda kroz automatsku i ekstrinsku procjenu o pojednostavljivanju teksta iz normalne do jednostavne Wikipedije. Pokazujemo da pseudoparalelna rečenica izvučena sa našim metodom ne samo dodaje postojeće paralelne podatke, već čak i mogu dovesti do konkurentne učinke samih.', 'et': 'Pakume välja lihtsa järelevalveta meetodi pseudoparalleelsete ühekeelsete lausepaaride eraldamiseks võrreldavatest korpustest, mis esindavad kahte erinevat tekstistiili, näiteks uudisteartikleid ja teadusartikleid. Meie lähenemine ei nõua paralleelset korpust, vaid tugineb ainult hierarhilisele otsingule dokumentide ja lausete eelnevalt koolitatud manustamisele. Tõestame oma meetodi efektiivsust automaatse ja välise hindamise kaudu teksti lihtsustamise kohta tavalisest Vikipeediasse. Näitame, et meie meetodiga ekstraheeritud pseudoparalleelsed laused mitte ainult ei täienda olemasolevaid paralleelseid andmeid, vaid võivad isegi kaasa tuua konkurentsivõimelise jõudluseni.', 'ca': 'Proposem un mètode simple sense supervisió per extrair parelles de frases monollengües pseudoparalleles de corpora comparable representant de dos estils de text diferents, com els articles de notícies i els articles científics. El nostre enfocament no requereix un corpus paral·lel de semilles, sinó només es basa en la recerca jeràrquica sobre incorporacions de documents i frases pré-entrenats. We demonstrate the effectiveness of our method through automatic and extrinsic evaluation on text simplification from the normal to the Simple Wikipedia.  Mostrem que les frases pseudoparallels extraïdes amb el nostre mètode no només suplementen les dades parallels existents, sino que fins i tot poden portar a un rendiment competitiu per ells mateixos.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme yksinkertaista valvomatonta menetelmää pseudorinnakkaisten yksikielisten lauseparien erottamiseksi kahta eri tekstityyliä edustavista korpusista, kuten uutisartikkeleista ja tieteellisistä julkaisuista. Lähestymistapamme ei vaadi rinnakkaista siemenkorpusta, vaan se perustuu pelkästään hierarkkiseen hakuun dokumenttien ja lauseiden esikoulutettujen upotusten sijaan. Osoitamme menetelmämme tehokkuuden automaattisella ja ulkoisella arvioinnilla tekstin yksinkertaistamisesta normaalista Wikipediaan. Osoitamme, että menetelmällämme puretut pseudorinnakkaiset lauseet täydentävät olemassa olevaa rinnakkaista dataa, mutta voivat jopa johtaa kilpailulliseen suorituskykyyn yksinään.', 'he': 'אנו מציעים שיטה פשוטה ללא השגחה לחלץ זוגות משפטים מונולשונות פסודו-מקבילות ממוצגים של גופרה שווים של שני סגנונים טקסט שונים, כמו מאמרים חדשות ומסמכים מדעיים. הגישה שלנו לא דורשת קורפוס מקביל זרע, אבל במקום זה תלוי רק על חיפוש הייררכי על פיצוי מסמכים ומשפטים מאומנים מראש. אנחנו מראים את היעילות של השיטה שלנו באמצעות הערכה אוטומטית וחיצונית על הפשטות טקסט מהנורמלי לוויקיפדיה פשוטה. אנחנו מראים כי משפטים פסודו-מקבילים שנוצאים בשיטתנו לא רק משלים נתונים מקבילים קיימים, אלא גם יכולים להוביל להופעה תחרותית בעצמם.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo enostavno breznadzorovano metodo za ekstrakcijo psevdo-paralelnih enojezičnih parov stavkov iz primerljivih korpusov, ki predstavljajo dva različna sloga besedila, kot so novinarski članki in znanstveni članki. Naš pristop ne zahteva semenskega vzporednega korpusa, temveč se zanaša izključno na hierarhično iskanje nad vnaprej usposobljenimi vdelavami dokumentov in stavkov. Učinkovitost naše metode dokazujemo s samodejnim in zunanjim vrednotenjem poenostavitve besedila od običajne do preproste Wikipedije. Pokazali smo, da psevdo-vzporedni stavki, ekstrahirani z našo metodo, ne samo dopolnjujejo obstoječih vzporednih podatkov, temveč lahko celo sami vodijo do konkurenčne zmogljivosti.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem sing gak nggawe luwih-luwih akeh-perusahaan kanggo nggawe soko nggawe barang-perusahaan khiripuné sampek-perusahaan khiripuné sampek durung-perusahaan layang-sampek, koyra barang-perusahaan lan basang-sampek. Awak dhéwé akses ora nyatakake tarjamahan kelompok, dadi piye mbelok ngewehi tentang karo akeh-akeh basa sing luwih dumateng dokumen lan kelompok barang kelompok tarjamahan. Awak dhéwé éntuk efek ntawehké awak dhéwé éntuk asat karo hal-hal ujian seneng nggawe barang seneng nggawe Normal sampek anyir Simple Awak dhéwé éntukno psepsepse-paralelong sing dikangkapan karo awak dhéwé nggawe perusahaan langgar dadi nyong pada perusahaan, nguasai iso nguasai perusahaan karo perusahaan langgar sampek.', 'ha': "Tuna goyya da wata hanyoyi mai sauƙi ba da tsare wa ta fitar da nau'i biyu daga makampuni biyu masu daidaita misalin misãlai biyu, kamar makarantai da takardar da masu sani. Our approach does not require a seed parallel corpus, but instead relies solely on hierarchical search over pre-trained embeddings of documents and sentences.  Kana nũna fikanci na hanyoyinmu game da hakarin farat ɗaya da ke ƙara a kan sauri na matsayin, daga normal zuwa na Wikimedia na Similar. Muna nũna cewa, cewa misãlai da aka samu da metoden mu, ba za'a ƙara da data masu da fanali kawai, kuma amma yana iya ƙara ga taƙaita farat ɗaya.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་ཡིག་ཚང་མ་འདྲ་བརྗོད་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་སྒྲིག་མེད་པའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་ཚང་མས། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ལ་ཞུགས་པ་སྦུང་བའི་དབུས་ཆ་ཞིག་དགོས་མེད་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་ནང་དུ་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཞིབ་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ་ལས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་ཡིན་པས། ང་ཚོས་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་ཕྱོགས་ཉེས་པའི་ཚིག་གྲངས་སུ་བཏོན་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག'}
{'en': 'Dependency-Based Relative Positional Encoding for Transformer NMT', 'ar': 'ترميز موضعي نسبي قائم على التبعية لمحول NMT', 'fr': 'Codage positionnel relatif basé sur la dépendance pour la NMT du transformateur', 'pt': 'Codificação posicional relativa baseada em dependência para o transformador NMT', 'es': 'Codificación posicional relativa basada en dependencias para el transformador NMT', 'zh': '变压器 NMT 基于位编码', 'ja': '変圧器NMTの依存関係ベースの相対位置符号化', 'ru': 'Относительное позиционное кодирование на основе зависимостей для трансформатора НБ', 'hi': 'ट्रांसफॉर्मर NMT के लिए निर्भरता-आधारित सापेक्ष स्थितीय एन्कोडिंग', 'ga': 'Ionchódú Coibhneasta Bunaithe ar Spleáchas le haghaidh NMT Trasfhoirmeora', 'ka': 'NMT- სთვის განსაზღვრებულობის განსაზღვრებული Relative Positional Encoding', 'hu': 'Függőség alapú relatív pozíciókódolás transzformátor NMT-hez', 'el': 'Σχετική κωδικοποίηση θέσης βασισμένη στην εξάρτηση για μετασχηματιστή NMT', 'mk': 'Релативно позиционално кодирање за трансформиран NMT базирано на зависност', 'ms': 'Pengekodan Posisi Berdasarkan Dependensi untuk NMT Transformer', 'it': 'Codifica della posizione relativa basata sulla dipendenza per trasformatore NMT', 'ml': 'പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനുവേണ്ടി ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥാനത്തിനുള്ള കോഡിങ്ങ്', 'lt': 'Atsižvelgiant į priklausomybę, santykinis pozicinis kodavimas transformatoriui NMT', 'no': 'Avhengighetsbasert relativt posisjonskoding for transformeringsNMT', 'pl': 'Względne kodowanie pozycjonalne oparte na zależności dla transformatora NMT', 'kk': 'NMT түрлендіруші үшін тәуелдік негіздеген Relative Positional Encoding', 'mt': 'Kodifikazzjoni Pożizzjonali Relattiva bbażata fuq id-Dipendenza għal NMT Transformer', 'mn': 'NMT-ийн Трансформаторын хамааралтай хамааралтай байрлал кодлог', 'so': 'Qodeynta xiriirka deganaanshaha', 'sr': 'Zavisina na osnovu Relativnog pozitivnog kodiranja za transformator NMT', 'sv': 'Beroendebaserad relativ positionskodning för transformator NMT', 'ro': 'Codificare pozițională relativă bazată pe dependență pentru transformatorul NMT', 'ta': 'மாற்றும் NMT க்கான சார்ந்த தொடர்பு நிலையான குறியீடு', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'ٹرانسفور NMT کے لئے اعتمادی-بنیادی Relative Positional Encoding', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'nl': 'Afhankelijkheidsgebaseerde relatieve positiecodering voor transformator NMT', 'da': 'Afhængighedsbaseret relativ positionskodning for Transformer NMT', 'de': 'Abhängigkeitsbasierte relative Positionskodierung für Transformator NMT', 'ko': '의존 관계 기반 변압기 NMT 상대 위치 인코딩', 'hr': 'Zavisina na osnovu Relativnog pozitivnog kodiranja za transformator NMT', 'bg': 'Базирано на зависимостта относително позиционно кодиране за трансформатор NMT', 'fa': 'رمزبندی موقعیت مربوط به بستگی برای تغییردهنده NMT', 'sw': 'Kufunguliwa kwa nafasi ya Uhusiano wa Kutegemea', 'af': 'Afhanklikheid- gebaseerde Relatiewe Posisie Enkodering vir Transformer NMT', 'id': 'Pengkodan Posisi Berdasarkan Dependensi untuk NMT Transformer', 'sq': 'Kodifikimi pozitiv relativ i bazuar në varësi për NMT Transformer', 'hy': 'Ախխտանգության հիմնված հարաբերական դիրքի կոդավորումը NMT-ի վերածման համար', 'tr': "NMT'i Transformer üçin Görnöşiklik Görnöşiklik Ködleme", 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'bn': 'ট্রান্সফার্নার্নার এনএমটির জন্য নির্ভর করা সম্পর্কিত অবস্থান এনকোডিং', 'az': 'NMT Transformer üçün bağlılıq-tabanlı Relativ Positional Encoding', 'bs': 'Zavisina na osnovu Relativnog pozitivnog kodiranja za transformator NMT', 'ca': 'Codificació positiva relativa basada en les dependencies per a la transformadora NMT', 'cs': 'Relativní polohové kódování založené na závislosti pro transformátor NMT', 'et': 'Transformer NMT suhtelise positsiooni kodeerimine sõltuvusel põhineb', 'fi': 'Muuntajan NMT:n riippuvuusperusteinen suhteellinen paikannuskoodaus', 'jv': 'Dihendekaan-Ngawe Relatif Putoken nggo Ketoken kanggo Transformer NMT', 'he': 'קוד מקומי יחסי מבוסס על תלויות עבור NMT Transformer', 'ha': 'Dependency-Based Relative Positional Encoding for Transformer NMT', 'sk': 'Relativno pozicijsko kodiranje na podlagi odvisnosti za transformator NMT', 'bo': 'རྟེན་འབྲེལ་ལ་གཞི་བརྟེན་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་ཡུལ་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་དགོས་པ NMT'}
{'en': 'This paper proposes a new Transformer neural machine translation model that incorporates syntactic distances between two source words into the relative position representations of the self-attention mechanism. In particular, the proposed model encodes pair-wise relative depths on a source dependency tree, which are differences between the depths of the two source words, in the encoder’s self-attention. The experiments show that our proposed model achieves 0.5 point gain in BLEU on the Asian Scientific Paper Excerpt Corpus Japanese-to-English translation task.', 'ar': 'تقترح هذه الورقة نموذجًا جديدًا للترجمة الآلية العصبية للمحولات يتضمن مسافات نحوية بين كلمتين مصدر في تمثيلات الموضع النسبي لآلية الانتباه الذاتي. على وجه الخصوص ، يقوم النموذج المقترح بتشفير الأعماق النسبية الزوجية على شجرة تبعية المصدر ، وهي اختلافات بين أعماق كلمتين المصدر ، في الانتباه الذاتي لجهاز التشفير. أظهرت التجارب أن نموذجنا المقترح يحقق 0.5 نقطة في BLEU في مهمة الترجمة الآسيوية العلمية لمقتطفات الورق من اليابانية إلى الإنجليزية.', 'pt': 'Este artigo propõe um novo modelo de tradução automática neural Transformer que incorpora distâncias sintáticas entre duas palavras de origem nas representações de posição relativa do mecanismo de autoatenção. Em particular, o modelo proposto codifica profundidades relativas de pares em uma árvore de dependência de fonte, que são diferenças entre as profundidades das duas palavras de origem, na autoatenção do codificador. Os experimentos mostram que nosso modelo proposto alcança um ganho de 0,5 ponto em BLEU na tarefa de tradução de japonês para inglês do Asian Scientific Paper Excerpt Corpus.', 'fr': "Cet article propose un nouveau modèle de traduction automatique neuronale Transformer qui intègre les distances syntaxiques entre deux mots sources dans les représentations de position relatives du mécanisme d'auto-attention. En particulier, le modèle proposé code des profondeurs relatives par paire sur un arbre de dépendance de source, qui sont des différences entre les profondeurs des deux mots sources, dans l'attention personnelle du codeur. Les expériences montrent que le modèle que nous proposons obtient un gain de 0,5 point en BLEU sur la tâche de traduction du japonais vers l'anglais du Corpus d'extraits d'articles scientifiques asiatiques.", 'es': 'Este artículo propone un nuevo modelo de traducción automática neuronal Transformer que incorpora distancias sintácticas entre dos palabras fuente en las representaciones de posición relativa del mecanismo de autoatención. En particular, el modelo propuesto codifica profundidades relativas por pares en un árbol de dependencia de la fuente, que son diferencias entre las profundidades de las dos palabras fuente, en la autoatención del codificador. Los experimentos muestran que nuestro modelo propuesto logra una ganancia de 0,5 puntos en BLEU en la tarea de traducción del japonés al inglés Asian Scientific Paper Excerpt Corpus.', 'ja': '本論文では、自己注目メカニズムの相対位置表現に2つの語源間の構文距離を組み込んだ新しいTransformer神経機械翻訳モデルを提案した。特に、提案されたモデルは、エンコーダの自己注目における２つのソースワードの深さの間の差であるソース依存性ツリー上のペアで相対的な深さを符号化する。実験では、アジアの科学論文抜粋コーパスの日本語から英語への翻訳タスクで、提案されたモデルがBLEUで0.5ポイントの利得を達成していることが示されています。', 'zh': '本条新Transformer神经机器翻译,以两源词之间句法相去自入。 特为编码器自注对源依树为对深编码,此两源词深度之异也。 实验明,所陈模形于亚洲科学论文录语料库日英译BLEU成0.5分之益。', 'ru': 'В этой статье предлагается новая модель нейронного машинного перевода Трансформатора, которая включает синтаксические расстояния между двумя исходными словами в относительные представления положения механизма самовнимания. В частности, предложенная модель кодирует парные относительные глубины на дереве зависимостей источника, которые являются различиями между глубинами двух исходных слов, в самовнимании кодера. Эксперименты показывают, что наша предлагаемая модель достигает 0,5 балла в BLEU по задаче перевода с японского на английский язык отрывка азиатской научной работы.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर एक नए ट्रांसफॉर्मर न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करता है जो आत्म-ध्यान तंत्र के सापेक्ष स्थिति प्रतिनिधित्व में दो स्रोत शब्दों के बीच वाक्यात्मक दूरी को शामिल करता है। विशेष रूप से, प्रस्तावित मॉडल एक स्रोत निर्भरता पेड़ पर जोड़ी-वार सापेक्ष गहराई को एन्कोड करता है, जो एनकोडर के आत्म-ध्यान में दो स्रोत शब्दों की गहराई के बीच अंतर हैं। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारे प्रस्तावित मॉडल एशियाई वैज्ञानिक पेपर अंश कॉर्पस जापानी-से-अंग्रेजी अनुवाद कार्य पर BLEU में 0.5 अंक लाभ प्राप्त करता है।', 'ga': 'Molann an páipéar seo múnla nua aistriúcháin meaisín nóral Transformer a ionchorpraíonn faid chomhréire idir dhá fhocal foinse isteach i léiriú suímh choibhneasta na meicníochta féin-aire. Go háirithe, ionchódaíonn an tsamhail atá beartaithe doimhneacht choibhneasta péire-ciallmhar ar chrann spleáchais foinse, arb iad difríochtaí iad idir doimhneacht an dá fhocal foinse, i bhféin-aird an ionchódóra. Léiríonn na turgnaimh go mbaineann ár múnla molta gnóthachan 0.5 pointe amach i BLEU ar thasc aistriúcháin Corpas Seapáinis-go-Béarla Sliocht Páipéar Eolaíoch na hÁise.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει ένα νέο μοντέλο νευρολογικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης μετασχηματιστή που ενσωματώνει συντακτικές αποστάσεις μεταξύ δύο λέξεων προέλευσης στις σχετικές αναπαραστάσεις θέσης του μηχανισμού αυτοπροσοχής. Ειδικότερα, το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο κωδικοποιεί τα σχετικά βάθη ζεύγους σε ένα δέντρο εξάρτησης πηγής, τα οποία είναι διαφορές μεταξύ των βάθεων των δύο λέξεων πηγής, στην αυτοπροσοχή του κωδικοποιητή. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο επιτυγχάνει κέρδος σημείου 0,5 στην Ασιατική εργασία μετάφρασης αποσπάσματος επιστημονικής εργασίας από Ιαπωνικά-Αγγλικά.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy új Transformer neurális gépi fordítási modellt javasol, amely a két forrásszó közötti szintaktikus távolságot beépíti az önfigyelem mechanizmus relatív pozíciójába. Különösen a javasolt modell páros relatív mélységeket kódol egy forrásfán, amelyek a két forrásszó mélysége közötti különbségeket jelentik, a kódoló önfigyelmében. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy javasolt modellünk az Ázsiai Tudományos Kivonat Corpus japán-angol fordítási feladat keretében 0,5 pont gyarapodást ér el BLEU-ban.', 'it': "Questo articolo propone un nuovo modello di traduzione automatica neurale Transformer che incorpora le distanze sintattiche tra due parole sorgente nelle rappresentazioni relative della posizione del meccanismo di auto-attenzione. In particolare, il modello proposto codifica le profondità relative in coppia su un albero di dipendenza sorgente, che sono differenze tra le profondità delle due parole sorgente, nell'auto-attenzione dell'encoder. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro modello proposto raggiunge un guadagno di 0,5 punti in BLEU sul compito di traduzione giapponese-inglese del documento scientifico asiatico Excerpt Corpus.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlomas naujas Transformer nervinės mašinos vertimo modelis, kuriame į santykinę savarankiško dėmesio mechanizmo padėtį įtraukiami sintaktiniai atstumai tarp dviejų šaltinio žodžių. Visų pirma siūlomas modelis koduoja santykinius vertybinius gylius prie priklausomybės nuo šaltinio medžio, t. y. dviejų šaltinio žodžių gylius skiriasi koduotojo dėmesyje. The experiments show that our proposed model achieves 0.5 point gain in BLEU on the Asian Scientific Paper Excerpt Corpus Japanese-to-English translation task.', 'mk': 'Овој документ предлага нов модел за превод на трансформирана невропска машина кој вклучува синтактички оддалечености помеѓу две изворни зборови во релативните позиции на механизмот за самовнимание. Посебно, предложениот модел кодира релативни длабочини на двојно на дрво на зависност од изворот, кои се разлики помеѓу длабочините на двете изворни зборови, во самото внимание на кодерот. Експериментите покажуваат дека нашиот предложен модел постигнува 0,5 поени добивка во БЛЕУ за задачата на азискиот научен хартија Експерт корпус јапонски на англиски превод.', 'ms': 'This paper proposes a new Transformer neural machine translation model that incorporates syntactic distances between two source words into the relative position representations of the self-attention mechanism.  Secara khususnya, model yang diusulkan mengekodkan kedalaman relatif sepasang pada pokok dependensi sumber, yang merupakan perbezaan antara kedalaman dua perkataan sumber, dalam perhatian diri pengekod. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa model kami diusulkan mencapai 0.5 titik keuntungan dalam BLEU pada tugas terjemahan Kertas Saintifik Asia Excerpt Corpus Jepun-ke-Inggeris.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന മെക്കയിനുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികളിലേക്ക് രണ്ട് സോര്\u200dസ്സ് വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d സിന്\u200dടാക്ടിക് ദൂരം ചേ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലിന്റെ ആഴത്തില്\u200d രണ്ട് ബുദ്ധിമാന്യമുള്ള ബന്ധുക്കളുടെ ആഴത്തെ ഒരു സോര്\u200dസ് ആശ്രയിതമായ മരത്ത പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച മോഡല്\u200d ബിലൂയില്\u200d 0.5 പോയിന്റ് നേടുന്നത് ആഷ്യ ശാസ്ത്ര കാപ്', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი ახალი ტრანფორმეტრის ნეიროლური მაქანის გადაწყვეტილების მოდელი, რომელიც ორი მხოლოდ სიტყვების შორის სიტყვების სიტყვების განმავლობაში ჩვენი თავიდან დაახლო განსაკუთრებულია, მოდელის მოდელის კოდირებულია ორივე მნიშვნელოვანი განსაკუთრებული დუნეების განსაკუთრებულობაში, რომლებიც ორივე მნიშვნელოვანი სიტყვების დუნეების განსხვავებაა, რომ ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი მოდელ 0,5 წუთი მიიღება BLEU-ში აზიანური მეცნიერო კოპოსს წაპოსში-ანგლისში გადაწყვეტილი საქმე.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз екі көзі сөздер арасындағы синтактикалық қашықтарды өзіңіздің қатынастық механизмінің қатынастық орнына қатынастырылған түрлендіруші невралдық компьютердің аудару үлгісін ұсынады Ескерту үлгісі, көзінің тәуелсіздік ағашындағы көзінің қатынасыз тереңдігін екі көзінде кодтады. Бұл екі көзінің сөздерінің тереңдігін, кодтардың өзінің қатынасында айырмашылы Тәжірибелер біздің таңдалған моделіміз Азия ғылыми қағазының көмегімен 0,5 нүкте BLEU-ге жеткізеді.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł proponuje nowy model neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego Transformera, który uwzględnia odległości składni między dwoma słowami źródłowymi w relatywnych reprezentacjach pozycji mechanizmu samo-uwagi. W szczególności proponowany model koduje względną głębokość parową na drzewie zależności źródła, które są różnicami pomiędzy głębokością dwóch słów źródłowych, w uwagi kodera. Eksperymenty pokazują, że nasz proponowany model osiąga 0,5 punktowy zysk w BLEU na zadaniu tłumaczenia japońsko-angielskim Azjatyckiego Paper Excerpt Corpus.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare propune un nou model de traducere automată neurală Transformer care încorporează distanțele sintactice dintre două cuvinte sursă în reprezentările poziției relative ale mecanismului de auto-atenție. În special, modelul propus codează adâncimi relative în perechi pe un arbore de dependență sursă, care sunt diferențe între adâncimile celor două cuvinte sursă, în auto-atenția codificatorului. Experimentele arată că modelul nostru propus obține un câștig de 0,5 puncte în BLEU pe sarcina de traducere japoneză-engleză a lucrării științifice asiatice Excerpt Corpus.', 'mt': "This paper proposes a new Transformer neural machine translation model that incorporates syntactic distances between two source words into the relative position representations of the self-attention mechanism.  In particular, the proposed model encodes pair-wise relative depths on a source dependency tree, which are differences between the depths of the two source words, in the encoder's self-attention.  The experiments show that our proposed model achieves 0.5 point gain in BLEU on the Asian Scientific Paper Excerpt Corpus Japanese-to-English translation task.", 'no': 'Denne papiret foreslår eit nytt transformeringsmodell for omsetjing av neuralmaskinen som inkluderer syntaktiske avstandar mellom to kjeldeord i den relative plasseringa av selvmerkingsmekanismenyen. Dette foreslått modellen koderer relativ dybde på ein kjeldeavhengighetstre, som er forskjellige mellom dybde på to kjeldeord, i koderens sjølvmerksomhet. Eksperimentane viser at vår foreslått modell oppnår 0,5 punkt i BLEU på den Asia vitenskapelige papirkorpus-til-engelske omsetjinga.', 'so': "Kanu wuxuu soo jeedaa model cusub oo turjumista maskaxda neurada ah, kaas oo ku qoraya durdurada syntactic ee u dhexeeya labada erayo oo ku qoran qofka u jeeda mekaniisa iskuulka ah. Si gaar ah, modellka la soo jeeday ayaa ku qoran labada qof oo xigmad leh oo ku saabsan geed sourceed oo ku xiran, kaas oo kala duwan yihiin moolka labada erayo ee warqada ah, xagga isqurxinta qoidaha. Imtixaanadu waxay muujinayaan in modelkeeni la soo jeeday ay uu BLEU ka helaa faa'iido 0.5 oo ku saabsan warqada sayniska cilmiga Aasiya ee Korpus-tan-Ingiriis.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats föreslår en ny Transformer neural maskinöversättning modell som införlivar syntaktiska avstånd mellan två källord i den relativa positionsrepresentationen av självuppmärksamhetsmekanismen. I synnerhet kodar den föreslagna modellen parvisa relativa djup på ett källberoendeträd, som är skillnader mellan djupen av de två källorden, i kodarens självuppmärksamhet. Experimenten visar att vår föreslagna modell uppnår 0,5 poäng vinst i BLEU på Asian Scientific Paper Extrarpt Corpus japansk-engelska översättningsuppgift.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže novi model prevoda neuralne mašine transformera koji uključuje sintaktične udaljenosti između dve izvorne reči u relativne predstave pozicije mehanizma samopouzdanja. Posebno, predloženi model kodira relativne dubine na izvornom drvetu zavisnosti, koje su razlike između dubina dva izvornog reči, u samopouzdanju kodera. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš predloženi model postiže dobitak od 0,5 tačka u BLEU na zadatku za prevođenje japanskih na engleskom jeziku izvan azijskog naučnog papira korpusa.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අළුත් වෙනස් කරුණාකරණය න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් වාර්ථාවක් නිර්මාණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඒ වග විශේෂයෙන්, ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණාත්මක විශේෂයෙන්, ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණාත්මක විශේෂතාවක් වර්ගයක් ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණිත වර්ගයක් වලින් සම්බන්ධ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපි', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் ஒரு புதிய மாற்றும் புதிய மாற்று புதிய இயந்திர மொழிமாற்ற மாதிரி மொழிமாற்றும் மாதிரி மாதிரி இது இரண்டு மூல வார்த்த குறிப்பிட்ட மாதிரி குறியீட்டில் இரண்டு புவிவான உறவினர் ஆழம் மூல சார்ந்த மரத்தின் மீது, அது இரண்டு மூல வார்த்தைகளின் ஆழம், குறியீட் எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி 0. 5 புள்ளி பெறுகிறது என்று காட்டுகிறது ஆசிய அறிவியல் தாள் வெற்றி கார்ப்ஸ் ஜப்பான்- முதல் ஆங்', 'ur': 'This paper proposes a new Transformer neural machine translation model that includes syntactic distances between two source words in the relative position representations of the self-attention mechanism. مخصوصاً پیشنهاد کی موڈل ایک سورس اعتباری درخت پر دو سمندر کی نسبت کی عمیق کو کوڈ کرتا ہے، جو دو سورس کلمات کی عمیق کے درمیان تفاوت ہیں، کوڈر کی self-attention میں. آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد مدل آسیا سائنس کاغذ کے مطابق کورپوس ژاپن سے انگلیسی ترجمہ کے کام پر 0.5 پوینٹ کا فائدہ ملتا ہے۔', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас өөрийгөө анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизмийн харьцаатай байрлал дээр хоёр эх үүсвэрийн үгний хоорондын синтактик зайг нэгтгэдэг шинэ Трансформаторын мэдрэлийн төвлөрүүлэлтийн загварыг сануулдаг. Ялангуяа, санал өгсөн загвар нь эх үүсвэрийн хамааралтай модны хоёр талаар харьцаатай гүн гүнзгийг коддог. Энэ нь хоёр эх үүсвэрийн хэлний гүнзгийг өөрчлөгдөж байгаа. Энэ туршилтууд бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн загвар Азийн Шинжлэх ухааны сонинд 0.5 цэг нэмэгддэг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'uz': "Ushbu qogʻoz yangi tarjima modulini tahrirlaydi. Bu ikkita manba so'zlari orasidagi ikkita so'zlar orasidan bir necha tarjima qilish modelini o'zimga tayyorlaydi. Kodlash usuli manba ishlatuvchi daraxtda ikki xil qo'shimcha qo'llanmalar qo'llanmalar qo'shiladi. Bu ikkita manba soʻzning eng qismlari orasidagi o'zgarishdir. Tasavvur qilingan modelimizning Osiy Ilmiy Qogʻozi Japoniya-Ingliz tilidan tarjima qilish vazifasi BLEU'da 0.5 nuqta yetishadi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề xuất một mô hình dịch cỗ máy biến hình mới, nó thu nhập khoảng cách cú pháp giữa hai từ nguồn vào các biểu hiện vị trí tương đối của cơ chế tự chú ý. Đặc biệt, mẫu đề xuất mã hóa chiều s âu tương đối cặp với một cây phụ thuộc nguồn, là sự khác biệt giữa chiều sâu của hai từ nguồn, trong sự chú ý của người mã hóa. Thí nghiệm cho thấy người mẫu đã đề nghị đạt được lợi nhuận cao trong tiếng LEU trên bài viết khoa học Châu Á Nếu đó là Tập đoàn Phát ngôn bằng tiếng Nhật-Anh.', 'nl': 'Deze paper stelt een nieuw Transformer neural machine translation model voor dat syntactische afstanden tussen twee bronwoorden integreert in de relatieve positie representaties van het zelfaandachtsmechanisme. In het bijzonder codeert het voorgestelde model relatieve diepten op een bronafhankelijkheidsboom, die verschillen zijn tussen de diepten van de twee bronwoorden, in de zelfaandacht van de encoder. De experimenten tonen aan dat ons voorgestelde model 0,5 puntwinst bereikt in BLEU op de Aziatische Scientific Paper Excerpt Corpus Japanese-to-English vertaaltaak.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия предлага нов трансформаторен невронен машинен превод модел, който включва синтактични разстояния между две изходни думи в относителните позиции на механизма за самовнимание. По-специално, предложеният модел кодира относителни дълбочини по двойки върху дърво на зависимост от източника, които са разлики между дълбочините на двете изходни думи, в самовниманието на кодера. Експериментите показват, че предложеният ни модел постига 0,5 пункта печалба в преводната задача от японско-английски език на азиатската научна статия.', 'da': 'Denne artikel foreslår en ny Transformer neural maskinoversættelsesmodel, der indarbejder syntaktiske afstande mellem to kildeord i den relative position repræsentationer af selvopmærksomhedsmekanismen. Den foreslåede model koder især parvise relative dybder på et kildeafhængighedstræ, som er forskelle mellem dybderne af de to kildeord, i koderens selvopmærksomhed. Eksperimenterne viser, at vores foreslåede model opnår 0,5 point gevinst i BLEU på Asian Scientific Paper Extrarpt Corpus japansk-til-engelsk oversættelsesopgave.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengusulkan model terjemahan mesin saraf Transformer baru yang mengandung jarak sintaksi antara dua kata sumber ke posisi relatif representation dari mekanisme perhatian diri. Terutama, model yang diusulkan mengkode kedalaman relatif sepasang pada pohon dependensi sumber, yang merupakan perbedaan antara kedalaman dua kata sumber, dalam perhatian diri pengekoder. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kami diusulkan mencapai 0,5 poin keuntungan di BLEU pada tugas terjemahan Korpus Sains Asia Excerpt Korpus Jepang-Inggris.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک مدل ترجمه ماشین عصبی تغییر دهنده جدید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند که بین دو کلمه منبع استفاده می\u200cکند به نمایش موقعیت نسبتی مکانیسم توجه خود را جمع می\u200cکند. مخصوصا، مدل پیشنهاد عمیق نسبت به دو طریق روی درخت بستگی منبع، که تفاوت بین عمیق دو کلمه منبع، در توجه خودش Encoder است. آزمایش ها نشان می دهند که مدل پیشنهاد ما در BLEU به دسترسی 0.5 نقطه در کاغذ علمی آسیایی برخورد می\u200cکند، جز کورپ ژاپن و انگلیسی.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže novi model prevoda neuralnih strojeva transformera koji uključuje sintaktične udaljenosti između dvije izvorne riječi u relativnu poziciju predstavljanja mehanizma samopouzdanja. Posebno, predloženi model kodira relativne dubine na izvornom drvetu zavisnosti, koje su razlike između dubine dvije izvorne riječi, u samopouzdanju kodera. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš predloženi model postigne dobitak od 0,5 bodova u BLEU-u o zadatku za prevođenje azijskog znanstvenog papira Excerpt Corpus japanskog i engleskog prevođenja.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inapendekeza modeli mpya ya kutafsiri mashine ya neura ya Transfer ambayo inajumuisha umbali wa mkanganyiko kati ya maneno mawili yanayohusiana na uwakilishi wa mfumo wa kujitegemea. Kwa hakika, muundo unapendekezwa unaonyesha kina kwa ndugu wawili wenye akili wawili kwenye mti wa kituo kinachotegemea, ambacho ni tofauti kati ya kina cha maneno mawili, katika kujitegemea kwa ujumbe huo. Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa modeli yetu iliypendekezwa inapata ongezeko la pointi 0.5 nchini BLEU kwenye kazi ya tafsiri ya Sayansi ya Asia ya Kijapani-hadi Kiingereza.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit schlägt ein neues Transformer neuronales maschinelles Übersetzungsmodell vor, das syntaktische Distanzen zwischen zwei Quellwörtern in die relativen Positionsdarstellungen des Selbstaufmerksamkeitsmechanismus einbezieht. Insbesondere kodiert das vorgeschlagene Modell paarweise relative Tiefen auf einem Quellabhängigkeitsbaum, die Unterschiede zwischen den Tiefen der beiden Quellwörter sind, in der Selbstaufmerksamkeit des Encoders. Die Experimente zeigen, dass unser vorgeschlagenes Modell einen 0,5-Punktzuwachs in BLEU auf der Asian Scientific Paper Excerpt Corpus Japanese-to-English Übersetzungsaufgabe erzielt.', 'ko': '본고는 새로운 변압기 신경기계 번역 모델을 제시했는데 이 모델은 두 원어 간의 문법 거리를 자기주의 메커니즘의 상대적인 위치 표시에 포함시켰다.특히 제시된 모델은 원본 의존 트리에서 쌍으로 인코딩된 상대적인 깊이, 즉 인코더 자체 주의에서 두 원어의 깊이 간의 차이이다.실험에 의하면 아시아 과학 기술 논문 어료 라이브러리의 일영 번역 임무에서 우리가 제시한 모델은 BLEU에서 0.5퍼센트 포인트의 이익을 얻었다.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument propozon një model të ri të përkthimit të makinës nervore Transformer që përfshin distanca sintaktike midis dy fjalëve burimi në përfaqësimet relative të pozicionit të mekanizmit të vetëvëmendjes. Në veçanti, modeli i propozuar kodon thellësitë relative në mënyrë të barabartë në një pemë varësie burimi, të cilat janë dallime midis thellësisë s ë dy fjalëve burimi, në vetëvëmendjen e koduesit. The experiments show that our proposed model achieves 0.5 point gain in BLEU on the Asian Scientific Paper Excerpt Corpus Japanese-to-English translation task.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz t채ze bir transformer n채yral ma힊yny흫 terjime modelini sa첵la첵ar. Bu k채ze iki 챌e힊me s철zlerini흫 sintaktik uzaklaryny 철z-철z체ne 체ns bermegi me첵dan챌asynda 첵akyn 첵erle힊melerine dahil ed첵채r. A첵ratyn bolsa, teklip eden nusga k철dle첵채n 챌e힊me bagyndaky agajynda iki 챌e힊me s 철zlerini흫 derinliklerinde 체첵tge힊ik edendir. Deneyler bizi흫 teklip eden nusgymyzy흫 AB-de 0.5 punkt gazan첵andygyny g철rkez첵채r. Asi첵a Ilmi Kagyzynda 횉ap Korpus Japon챌a-i흫lis챌e terjime t채blisasynda.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም አዲስ ትርጉም የናውሮል መሣሪያን ትርጉም ሞዴል በሁለቱ ምንጭ ቃላት መካከል የስናታዊ ርቀት ለራሳቸው ትኩረት ማክሰል በሚያሳየው በአካባቢው ቦታ ውስጥ የሚያሳልፍ ነው፡፡ በተለይም፣ በተዘጋጀው ሞዴል የሁለት ጥበበኛ ወዳጆች የሆኑት ጥልቅ በማድረግ ላይ ነው፡፡ ይህ በሁለቱ የsource ቃላት ጥልቅ መካከል የተለየ ነው፡፡ ፈተናዎቹ የተዘጋጀውን ሞዴል በእስያ ሳይንቀሳዊ ካርፓስ የጃፓንን-ወደ ኢንግሊዝኛ ትርጓሜ ስራ BLEU ውስጥ 0.5 ነጥብ እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "Hierdie papier voorstel 'n nuwe transformeerder neurale masjien vertaling model wat sintaktiewe afstand tussen twee bron woorde inkorpreer in die relatiewe posisie voorstellings van die selfaanmerking mekanisme. Spesiaal, die voorgestelde model kodeer parewyse relatiewe diepte op 'n bron afhanklikheidsboom, wat verskil is tussen die diepte van die twee bron woorde, in die enkoder se selfaandag. Die eksperimente wys dat ons voorgestelde model 0,5 punt verkry in BLEU op die Asies Wetenskaplike Papier Ekstrap Korpus Japaanse-na-Engels vertaling taak.", 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধে নতুন ট্রান্সফার্নাফারের নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ মডেল প্রস্তাব করেছে যা দুই উৎসের শব্দের মধ্যে সিন্ট্যাক্টিক দূরত্বে  বিশেষ করে, প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের মধ্যে একটি উৎসের নির্ভরশীল গাছের প্রতি জুড়াই-জ্ঞানী আত্মীয় আত্মীয় গভীর, যা দুই উৎসের শব্দের গভীরে পার এই পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল এশিয়ার বৈজ্ঞানিক কাগজের এক্সপ্ট কোর্পাস জাপানি থেকে ইংরেজি অনুবাদের কাজ', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին առաջարկում է նոր նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդել, որը ներառում է սինտակտիկ հեռավորություններ երկու աղբյուր բառերի միջև ինքնաուշադրության մեխանիզմի հարաբերական դիրքում: Մասնավորապես, առաջարկված մոդելը կոդավորում է երկու հարաբերական խորություններ աղբյուրի կախվածության ծառի վրա, որոնք երկու աղբյուրի բառերի խորությունների միջև տարբերություններ են կոդավորի ինքնաուշադրության մեջ: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկված մոդելը հասնում է 0.5 միավորի շահույթ ԲԼԵՎ-ի ասիացի գիտական թղթի էքսպերտ Կորպուսի թարգմանման առաջադրանքից ճապոներեն անգլերեն:', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predlaže novi model prevoda neuralnih strojeva transformera koji uključuje sintaktične udaljenosti između dvije izvorne riječi u relativnu poziciju predstavljanja mehanizma samopouzdanja. Posebno, predloženi model kodira relativne dubine na području izvora na drvetu zavisnosti, koje su razlike između dubine dvije izvorne riječi, u samopouzdanju kodera. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš predloženi model postigne dobitak od 0,5 bodova u BLEU na zadatku za prevođenje japanskih na engleskom korpusu izvan azijskog naučnog papira.', 'ca': "Aquest paper propon un nou model de traducció de la màquina neuronal Transformer que incorpora distàncies sinàctiques entre dues paraules fonts en les representacions relativas de posició del mecanisme d'autoatenció. En particular, el model proposat codifica profunditats relativas en parelles en un arbre de dependencia de fonts, que s ón diferències entre les profunditats de les dues paraules fonts, en l'autoatenció del codificador. Els experiments demostren que el nostre model proposat aconsegueix un guany de 0,5 punts en BLEU en la tasca de traducció del Japon a l'anglès del Corps Asian Scientific Paper Excerpt.", 'az': "Bu kağıt iki mənbə sözlərinin sintaktik uzaqlaşmasını özünün dikkati mehanizmasının qohum pozisyonu göstəricisinə qoşulan yeni Transformer nöral mašinin çevirim modelini təbliğ edir. Özellikle, təbliğ edilmiş modeli kodlayıcının özünün dikkatində, iki mənbə s özlərin derinliklərinin arasındakı xüsusiyyətli səviyyəni iki tərəfdən uzaqlaşdırır. Həyatlar bizim təklif etdiyimiz modellərin Asiya elmi kağıdı üzərində 0,5 nokta BLEU'da öyrəndiyini göstərir.", 'cs': 'Tento článek navrhuje nový model transformátorového neuronového strojového překladu, který zahrnuje syntaktické vzdálenosti mezi dvěma zdrojovými slovy do relativních reprezentací polohy mechanismu sebepozornosti. Navržený model především kóduje relativní hloubky ve stromu závislosti na zdroji, což jsou rozdíly mezi hloubkami dvou zdrojových slov v snímačově pozornosti. Experimenty ukazují, že náš navržený model dosahuje 0,5 bodového zisku v BLEU na asijském vědeckém papíru Excerpt Corpus japonsko-anglickém překladu.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö pakub välja uue Transformeri neuromasintõlke mudeli, mis sisaldab süntaktilisi kauguseid kahe lähtesõna vahel enesetähelepanu mehhanismi suhteliste positsioonide esitamiseks. Eelkõige kodeerib kavandatud mudel allikasõltuvuse puu paari suhtelisi sügavusi, mis on kahe lähtesõna sügavuste erinevused kodeerija enesetähelepanu. Katsed näitavad, et meie kavandatud mudel saavutab 0,5 punkti võrra BLEU-s Aasia teadusliku raamatu väljavõtte Corpus jaapani-inglise tõlke ülesandes.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotetaan uutta Transformer-neurokonekäännösmallia, joka yhdistää kahden lähdesanan väliset syntaktiset etäisyydet itsehuomiomekanismin suhteelliseen sijaintiin. Erityisesti ehdotettu malli koodaa parikohtaiset suhteelliset syvyydet lähderiippuvuuspuun, jotka ovat kahden lähdesanan syvyyksien välisiä eroja, kooderin itsetunnossa. Kokeet osoittavat, että ehdotettu malli saavuttaa 0,5 pisteen nousun BLEU:ssa Aasian tieteellisen paperin ote Corpus japani-englanti käännöstyössä.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predlagan nov model transformatorskega nevronskega strojnega prevajanja, ki vključuje sintaktične razdalje med dvema izvornima besedama v relativne predstavitve položaja mehanizma samopozornosti. Predlagani model v samopozornosti kodira relativne globine na drevesu izvorne odvisnosti, ki so razlike med globinami obeh izvornih besed. Poskusi kažejo, da naš predlagani model doseže 0,5 točke pridobivanja v BLEU pri azijskem znanstvenem odlomku Corpus prevajanja japonsko-angleščino.', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציעה מודל טרנספורטר מתרגם מכונת עצבית חדש שמכיל מרחקים סינטקטיים בין שתי מילים מקור לתוך מייצג עמדה יחסית של מנגנון תשומת לב עצמית. במיוחד, המודל המוצע קודם עמוקות יחסיות זוגות על עץ תלויות מקור, אשר הם הבדלים בין עמוקות שתי המילים המקוריות, בתשומת לב עצמית של הקודר. הניסויים מראים שהמודל המוצע שלנו משיג רווח 0.5 נקודות ב-BLEU על משימה התרגום היפנית לאנגלית של "Korpus Excerpt Scientific Paper Asian".', 'ha': 'Wannan takardar da ke ƙayyade wani misãlin translation na Transformer na rayuwar neural wanda ke haɗa tsakanin haɗiya tsakanin maganar biyu zuwa ga dangantar position-wakin amintarwa na kanarin kansa-aikin. A cikin ƙayyade, shirin da aka buɗe shi yana koda duffai biyu masu hikima kan wani itãce mai inganci, wanda ke s ãɓãni a tsakanin maganar maɓallin biyu, a cikin aikin koden. Tajararin ke nũna cewa misalinmu da ake buƙata 0.5 points a cikin BLEU a kan aikin Faris na Asian Aikimar Yabuz-zuwa-Ingiriya.', 'jv': 'Awak iki supoyo nggawe model penting transformer Neral kang sampeyan anyar sing digowudhakan langgar sampeyan winih sing dumadhi tanggal kuwi tindakan Genjer-Genjer Wang aparaning wong-wong kuwi model sing nyenggawe nyimpen 0.5 punt kanggo nyenggap barang nggawe barang sing paling Siyah Sayensi anu barang', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གཞུང་གིས་གསར་པ་ཞིག་ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནུས་པའི་མ་ལག་གི་སྣ་ཚུལ་གྱི་བར་སྟོང་དང་ཐོག་ཁུངས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་བར་སྟོང དམིགས་བསལ་ན། དམིགས་འཛུགས་པའི་མ་དབུགས་འདིས་ཁུངས་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་ཅན་གྱི་དབྱིབས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་པར་འདྲ་ཡིན། experiments show that our proposed model achieves 0.5 points in BLEU on the Asian Scientific Paper Excerpt Corpus Japanese-to-English translation task.'}
{'en': 'Building a Morphological Analyser for Laz', 'es': 'Creación de un analizador morfológico para Laz', 'fr': 'Construire un analyseur morphologique pour Laz', 'pt': 'Construindo um analisador morfológico para Laz', 'ar': 'بناء محلل صرفي لـ Laz', 'ja': 'LAZућесЂ«тйбТЁІтѕєТъљУБЁуй«сЂ«ТДІу»Ѕ', 'zh': '为Laz构形分析仪', 'ru': 'Построение морфологического анализатора для Laz', 'hi': 'लाज़ के लिए एक रूपात्मक विश्लेषक का निर्माण', 'ga': 'Anailíseoir moirfeolaíoch a thógáil do Laz', 'ka': 'ლაზის მორფოლოგიური ანალიზერის შექმნა', 'hu': 'Morfológiai elemző építése Laz számára', 'el': 'Κατασκευή ενός Μορφολογικού Αναλυτή για τον Laz', 'it': 'Costruire un analizzatore morfologico per Laz', 'lt': 'Laz morfologinio analizatoriaus kūrimas', 'mk': 'Градење морфолошки анализатор за Laz', 'kk': 'Лаз үшін морфологикалық анализерді құру', 'ms': 'Membina Analisa Morfologik untuk Laz', 'ml': 'ലാസിനുവേണ്ടി ഒരു മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d അന്യായോജക്കാരന്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Лазийн морфологик шинжилгээчийг бүтээх', 'mt': 'Il-bini ta’ Analizzatur Morfoloġiku għal Laz', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Budowa analizatora morfologicznego dla Laza', 'ro': 'Construirea unui analizor morfologic pentru Laz', 'sr': 'Napravljanje morfološkog analizatora za Laz', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Building a Morphological Analyser for Laz', 'sv': 'Att bygga en morfologisk analysator för Laz', 'ta': 'Laz க்கான ஒரு Morphological Analyzer உருவாக்குகிறது', 'ur': 'لاز کے لئے ایک مورفولوژیک تحلیل بنانے والا ہے', 'uz': 'Laz uchun Morfologik analyzerni yaratish', 'vi': 'Xây dựng nhà Morphological Analyser cho Laz', 'bg': 'Изграждане на морфологичен анализатор за Laz', 'hr': 'Izgraditi morfološki analizator za Laz', 'da': 'Opbygning af en morfologisk analysator for Laz', 'nl': 'Een morfologische analyser bouwen voor Laz', 'de': 'Aufbau eines morphologischen Analysegeräts für Laz', 'id': 'Membangun Analisa Morfologi untuk Laz', 'ko': 'Laz 형태학 분석기의 구축', 'fa': 'ساختن یک تحلیل مرفولاژی برای لاز', 'sw': 'Kujenga mchambuzi wa Kimorphological kwa Laz', 'tr': 'Laz üçin Morfolojik analýzçy guruldur', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Duke ndërtuar një analizues morfologjik për Laz', 'bn': 'লাজের জন্য মর্ফোলিক্যাল বিশ্লেষক নির্মাণ করা হচ্ছে', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Լազի մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծողի կառուցվածքը', 'az': 'Laz üçün Morphological Analyzer inşa edir', 'bs': 'Napravljenje morfološkog analizatora za Laz', 'ca': 'Construir un analitzador morfològic de Laz', 'cs': 'Stavba morfologického analyzátoru pro Laz', 'et': 'Lazi morfoloogilise analüüsi loomine', 'fi': 'Muodollisen analysaattorin rakentaminen Lazille', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Izdelava morfološkega analizatorja za Laz', 'jv': 'Gawe nggawe juter MOphologi Valisir kanggo Laz', 'he': 'בניית ניתוח מורפולוגי עבור לאז', 'bo': 'ཆས་ལ་ཤིང་གི་སྐོར་ཆེན་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'This study is an attempt to contribute to documentation and revitalization efforts of endangered Laz language, a member of South Caucasian language family mainly spoken on northeastern coastline of Turkey. It constitutes the first steps to create a general computational model for word form recognition and production for Laz by building a rule-based morphological analyser using Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). The evaluation results show that the analyser has a 64.9 % coverage over a corpus collected for this study with 111,365 tokens. We have also performed an error analysis on randomly selected 100 tokens from the corpus which are not covered by the analyser, and these results show that the errors mostly result from Turkish words in the corpus and missing stems in our lexicon.', 'ar': 'هذه الدراسة هي محاولة للمساهمة في جهود التوثيق وتنشيط لغة اللاز المهددة بالانقراض ، وهي عضو في عائلة لغة جنوب القوقاز يتحدث بها بشكل رئيسي على الساحل الشمالي الشرقي لتركيا. إنه يشكل الخطوات الأولى لإنشاء نموذج حسابي عام للتعرف على شكل الكلمات وإنتاجها لـ Laz من خلال بناء محلل مورفولوجي قائم على القواعد باستخدام Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). تظهر نتائج التقييم أن المحلل لديه تغطية 64.9٪ على مجموعة تم جمعها لهذه الدراسة مع 111365 رمزًا مميزًا. لقد أجرينا أيضًا تحليلًا للخطأ على 100 رمز تم اختياره عشوائيًا من المجموعة والتي لم يتم تغطيتها بواسطة المحلل ، وتُظهر هذه النتائج أن الأخطاء ناتجة في الغالب عن الكلمات التركية في المجموعة والسيقان المفقودة في قاموسنا.', 'fr': "Cette étude est une tentative de contribuer à la documentation et aux efforts de revitalisation de la langue laz en voie de disparition, membre de la famille linguistique du Caucase du Sud parlée principalement sur la côte nord-est de la Turquie. Il constitue les premières étapes pour créer un modèle informatique général pour la reconnaissance et la production de formes de mots pour Laz en construisant un analyseur morphologique basé sur des règles utilisant Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). Les résultats de l'évaluation montrent que l'analyseur a une couverture de 64,9\xa0% sur un corpus collecté pour cette étude avec 111 365 jetons. Nous avons également effectué une analyse d'erreur sur 100 jetons sélectionnés au hasard dans le corpus qui ne sont pas couverts par l'analyseur, et ces résultats montrent que les erreurs résultent principalement de mots turcs dans le corpus et de radicaux manquants dans notre lexique.", 'pt': 'Este estudo é uma tentativa de contribuir para os esforços de documentação e revitalização da língua Laz ameaçada de extinção, um membro da família linguística do sul do Cáucaso falado principalmente na costa nordeste da Turquia. Constitui os primeiros passos para criar um modelo computacional geral para reconhecimento e produção de formas de palavras para Laz, construindo um analisador morfológico baseado em regras usando o Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). Os resultados da avaliação mostram que o analisador tem uma cobertura de 64,9% sobre um corpus coletado para este estudo com 111.365 tokens. Também realizamos uma análise de erros em 100 tokens selecionados aleatoriamente do corpus que não são cobertos pelo analisador, e esses resultados mostram que os erros resultam principalmente de palavras turcas no corpus e radicais ausentes em nosso léxico.', 'es': 'Este estudio es un intento de contribuir a los esfuerzos de documentación y revitalización de la lengua laz, en peligro de extinción, un miembro de la familia de lenguas del Cáucaso del Sur que se habla principalmente en la costa noreste de Turquía. Constituye los primeros pasos para crear un modelo computacional general para el reconocimiento y la producción de formas de palabras para Laz mediante la construcción de un analizador morfológico basado en reglas utilizando el Kit de herramientas de estados finitos de Helsinki (HFST). Los resultados de la evaluación muestran que el analizador tiene una cobertura del 64,9% sobre un corpus recopilado para este estudio con 111.365 tokens. También hemos realizado un análisis de errores en 100 fichas seleccionadas al azar del corpus que no están cubiertas por el analizador, y estos resultados muestran que los errores se deben principalmente a palabras turcas en el corpus y a la falta de raíces en nuestro léxico.', 'ru': 'Это исследование является попыткой внести вклад в документацию и усилия по возрождению находящегося под угрозой исчезновения языка лаз, члена южнокавказской языковой семьи, на котором в основном говорят на северо-восточном побережье Турции. Она представляет собой первые шаги по созданию общей вычислительной модели для распознавания и производства слов для Laz путем создания основанного на правилах морфологического анализатора с использованием Хельсинкского инструментария конечных состояний (HFST). Результаты оценки показывают, что анализатор имеет 64,9% охват по всему корпусу, собранному для этого исследования, с 111 365 жетонами. Мы также провели анализ ошибок на случайно выбранных 100 токенах из корпуса, которые не охватываются анализатором, и эти результаты показывают, что ошибки в основном являются результатом турецких слов в корпусе и отсутствующих стеблей в нашем лексиконе.', 'ja': '本研究は、トルコ北東部の海岸線で主に話されている南コーカサス言語ファミリーの一員である絶滅危惧LAZ言語の文書化と再生への取り組みに貢献するための試みです。これは、ヘルシンキ有限状態ツールキット（ HFST ）を使用してルールベースの形態分析器を構築することによって、LAZのための単語形式認識と生成のための一般的な計算モデルを作成する最初のステップを構成します。評価結果は、分析者が111,365トークンでこの研究のために収集したコーパスに対して64.9 ％のカバレッジを有することを示しています。また、分析者がカバーしていないコーパスからランダムに選ばれた100個のトークンについてもエラー分析を行いました。これらの結果は、エラーがコーパスのトルコ語の単語と私たちの辞書の欠落した語幹に起因することを示しています。', 'zh': '其考濒临灭绝拉兹语记兴功,拉兹语为南高加索语系员,在土耳其东北海岸线上用之。 其为用赫尔辛基有限者工具包(HFST)为法之形分析器,为Laz创单词文识生产之通用算模形之首。 评估结果表明,与为本研集之111,365一代币之语料库,当分析仪覆盖率为64.9%。 又于语料库中随机所择100令牌错析之,令牌未被分析器覆,此结果表明误由语料库土耳其语单词词典少词干也。', 'hi': 'यह अध्ययन लुप्तप्राय लाज़ भाषा के प्रलेखन और पुनरुद्धार प्रयासों में योगदान करने का एक प्रयास है, जो मुख्य रूप से तुर्की के पूर्वोत्तर तट पर बोली जाने वाली दक्षिण कोकेशियान भाषा परिवार का एक सदस्य है। यह हेलसिंकी परिमित-राज्य टूलकिट (HFST) का उपयोग करके एक नियम-आधारित रूपात्मक विश्लेषक का निर्माण करके लाज़ के लिए शब्द रूप मान्यता और उत्पादन के लिए एक सामान्य कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडल बनाने के लिए पहले चरणों का गठन करता है। मूल्यांकन परिणामों से पता चलता है कि विश्लेषक के पास 111,365 टोकन के साथ इस अध्ययन के लिए एकत्र किए गए कॉर्पस पर 64.9% कवरेज है। हमने कॉर्पस से यादृच्छिक रूप से चयनित 100 टोकन पर एक त्रुटि विश्लेषण भी किया है जो विश्लेषक द्वारा कवर नहीं किया गया है, और इन परिणामों से पता चलता है कि त्रुटियां ज्यादातर कॉर्पस में तुर्की शब्दों और हमारे शब्दकोश में लापता उपजी के परिणामस्वरूप होती हैं।', 'ga': 'Iarracht atá sa staidéar seo le cur le doiciméadú agus le hiarrachtaí athbheochana na Lazise atá i mbaol, ball de theaghlach teanga na Cugais Theas a labhraítear go príomha ar chósta oirthuaisceart na Tuirce. Is é atá ann ná na chéad chéimeanna chun samhail ríomhaireachtúil ghinearálta a chruthú d’aithint agus do tháirgeadh focal i gcomhair Laz trí anailíseoir moirfeolaíoch bunaithe ar rialacha a thógáil ag baint úsáide as Uirlisí Staidéir Chríochnaithe Heilsincí (HFST). Léiríonn torthaí na meastóireachta go bhfuil clúdach 64.9% ag an anailísí thar chorpas a bailíodh don staidéar seo le 111,365 comhartha. Rinneamar anailís earráide freisin ar 100 comhartha a roghnaíodh go randamach ón gcorpas nach bhfuil clúdaithe ag an anailísí, agus léiríonn na torthaí seo gurb iad focail Tuirce sa chorpas agus na heascanna atá ar iarraidh inár bhfoclóir is mó a eascraíonn na hearráidí.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα μελέτη αποτελεί μια προσπάθεια να συμβάλει στην τεκμηρίωση και αναζωογόνηση της υπό εξαφάνιση γλώσσας Λαζ, ενός μέλους της οικογένειας γλωσσών του Νότιου Καυκάσιου που ομιλείται κυρίως στη βορειοανατολική ακτή της Τουρκίας. Αποτελεί τα πρώτα βήματα για τη δημιουργία ενός γενικού υπολογιστικού μοντέλου αναγνώρισης και παραγωγής λέξεων για τον Λαζ με την κατασκευή ενός μορφολογικού αναλυτή βασισμένου σε κανόνες χρησιμοποιώντας το Εργαλείο Finite-State Toolkit του Ελσίνκι (HFST). Τα αποτελέσματα αξιολόγησης δείχνουν ότι ο αναλυτής έχει 64,9% κάλυψη πάνω από ένα σώμα που συλλέχθηκε για την παρούσα μελέτη με μάρκες 111,365. Επίσης, έχουμε πραγματοποιήσει ανάλυση σφαλμάτων σε τυχαία επιλεγμένα 100-μάρκα από το σώμα που δεν καλύπτονται από τον αναλυτή, και τα αποτελέσματα αυτά δείχνουν ότι τα σφάλματα προκύπτουν κυρίως από τουρκικές λέξεις στο σώμα και από ελλείψεις στελεχών στο λεξικό μας.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány célja, hogy hozzájáruljon a veszélyeztetett laz nyelv dokumentációjához és revitalizálásához, amely a dél-kaukázusi nyelvcsalád tagja, elsősorban Törökország északkeleti partjain beszél. Ez az első lépés egy általános számítástechnikai modell létrehozásának a Laz számára, egy szabályalapú morfológiai elemző készülék létrehozásával Helsinki Finiste-State Toolkit (HFST) segítségével. Az értékelés eredményei azt mutatják, hogy az elemző készülék 64,9%-os lefedettséggel rendelkezik a vizsgálathoz 111 365 tokennel gyűjtött korpuszon felett. Hibaelemzést végeztünk a korpuszból származó, véletlenszerűen kiválasztott 100 tokenen is, amelyeket az analizátor nem fed le, és ezek az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a hibák leginkább a korpuszban szereplő török szavakból és a lexikonunkban hiányzó szárokból erednek.', 'ka': 'ეს კვლევა არის მოცდილობა, რომელიც დოკუმენტაციას და რევიტალიზაციის ძალადობაში ლაზის, სამხრეთ კაუკაციური ენის ოჯახის მხოლოდ სამხრეთ სამხრეთ-ოსოფლიოში საუკეთესოფლიო ეს არის პირველი მონაცემები, რომელიც ლაზისთვის სიტყვების ფორმის განაცნობის და პროექტის სხვა კომპუტაციალური მონაცემებისთვის შექმნა, რომელიც მარტივის მორპოლოგიური ანალიზატორის შექ ანალიზერი 64,9% უფრო კორპუსზე, რომელიც ამ სწავლებისთვის შექმნა 111 365 ტოკენებით. ჩვენ ასევე შეცდომის ანალიზაციას გავაკეთეთ შეცდომის ანალიზაციას, რომელიც კორპუსდან არ გადაკეთებულია ანალიზატორი, და ეს შეცდომის შეცდომები ჩვენი ლექსიკონში უფრო შეიძლება ტური', 'kk': 'Бұл зерттеу - Құжаттамасын және Түркияның Солтүстік-Шығыс берілген Лаз тілдерінің біріншісі, Оңтүстік Кавказ тілдерінің біріншісі. Бұл, Helsinki Finite- State Toolkit (HFST) арқылы ережелерді негіздеген морфологиялық анализдерді құру үшін Laz үшін жалпы есептеу үлгісін құру үшін бірінші қадам құрылады. Бұл зерттеулердің нәтижесі 111 365 белгілерімен қосылған корпус арқылы анализатордың 64,9% мәліметі бар дегенді көрсетеді. Біз сондай-ақ анализатор таңдалмаған 100 таңдалған корпустағы қате анализ жасадық. Бұл нәтижелер корпус сөздерінің көпшілігінде қате тұрғыс сөздерінен және лексикандығы жоқ қателерді көрсетеді.', 'it': "Questo studio è un tentativo di contribuire alla documentazione e agli sforzi di rivitalizzazione della lingua Laz in via di estinzione, un membro della famiglia di lingue del Caucaso meridionale parlata principalmente sulla costa nord-orientale della Turchia. Costituisce i primi passi per creare un modello computazionale generale per il riconoscimento e la produzione di forme di parola per Laz costruendo un analizzatore morfologico basato su regole utilizzando Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). I risultati della valutazione mostrano che l'analizzatore ha una copertura del 64,9% su un corpus raccolto per questo studio con 111.365 token. Abbiamo anche eseguito un'analisi degli errori su 100 token selezionati casualmente dal corpus che non sono coperti dall'analizzatore, e questi risultati mostrano che gli errori derivano principalmente da parole turche nel corpus e steli mancanti nel nostro lessico.", 'mk': 'Оваа студија е обид да придонесе за документација и ревитализација на напорите за загрозен јазик Лаз, член на семејството на јужно-кауказскиот јазик, главно говорено на североисточната бреговина на Турција. Тоа претставува први чекори за создавање на генерален компјутативен модел за препознавање и производство на форма на зборови за Лаз со изградба на правило-базиран морфолошки анализатор со користење на Хелсинки финит-државен алатки (ХФСТ). Резултатите од проценката покажуваат дека анализаторот има 64,9 отсто покривање врз корпусот собран за оваа студија со 111.365 токени. Исто така, извршивме анализа на грешките на случајно избраните 100 знаци од корпусот кои не се покриени од анализаторот, и овие резултати покажуваат дека грешките главно резултираат од турските зборови во корпусот и исчезнатите потекла во нашиот лексикон.', 'lt': 'This study is an attempt to contribute to documentation and revitalization efforts of endangered Laz language, a member of South Caucasian language family mainly spoken on northeastern coastline of Turkey.  Tai yra pirmieji žingsniai siekiant sukurti bendrą Laz žodžių formos pripažinimo ir gamybos skaičiavimo model į, kuriame būtų sukurtas taisyklėmis pagrįstas morfologinis analizatorius naudojant Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). Vertinimo rezultatai rodo, kad analizatorius 64,9 % aprėpia šiam tyrimui surinktą korpusą su 111 365 simboliais. Taip pat atlikome klaidų analizę atsitiktinai atrinktais 100 žymenų iš korpuso, kuriems analizatorius netaikomas, ir šie rezultatai rodo, kad klaidos daugiausia atsiranda dėl Turkijos žodžių korpuse ir trūkstamų mūsų leksikono kamščių.', 'ms': 'Ujian ini adalah cubaan untuk menyumbang kepada dokumentasi dan usaha pemulihan bahasa Laz yang mengancam, ahli keluarga bahasa Caucasia Selatan yang terutama bercakap di garis pantai timur laut Turki. Ia merupakan langkah pertama untuk mencipta model pengiraan umum untuk pengenalan bentuk perkataan dan produksi Laz dengan membina penganalisa morfologi berdasarkan peraturan menggunakan Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). Hasil penilaian menunjukkan bahawa penganalisa mempunyai 64.9% penutup atas korpus yang dikumpulkan untuk kajian ini dengan 111,365 token. Kami juga telah melakukan analisis ralat pada 100 token yang dipilih secara rawak dari korpus yang tidak ditutup oleh analisis, dan hasil ini menunjukkan bahawa ralat kebanyakan berasal dari perkataan Turki dalam korpus dan batu hilang dalam leksikon kami.', 'ml': 'ഈ പഠനത്തിന്റെ ശ്രമം തുര്\u200dക്കിക്കിന്റെ വടക്ക് കിഴക്ക് തെക്കേ കാക്കേഷ്യന്\u200d ഭാഷ കുടുംബത്തിന്റെ ഒരു അംഗമായ ലാസ് ഭാഷയിലേക്ക് പ്രധാനപ ലാസിന്റെ വാക്കിന്റെ രീതിയിലെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനും ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും വാക്കുകളുടെ രൂപങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഒരു പൊതുവായ കണക്കൂട്ടിക്കൂട് ഈ പഠനത്തിനുവേണ്ടി ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ഒരു 64.9% കോര്\u200dപ്പസിന് വേണ്ടി സംഘടിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു  We have also performed an error analysis on randomly selected 100 tokens from the corpus which are not covered by the analyser, and these results show that the errors mostly result from Turkish words in the corpus and missing stems in our lexicon.', 'mt': 'Dan l-istudju huwa tentattiv biex jikkontribwixxi għad-dokumentazzjoni u l-isforzi ta’ rivitalizzazzjoni tal-lingwa Laz mhedda, membru tal-familja tal-lingwa Kawkasi tan-Nofsinhar li titkellem prinċipalment fil-kosta tat-Tramuntana tat-Turkija. Hija tikkostitwixxi l-ewwel passi biex jinħoloq mudell komputattiv ġenerali għar-rikonoxximent u l-produzzjoni tal-formola tal-kliem għal Laz billi jinbena analizzatur morfoloġiku bbażat fuq ir-regoli bl-użu ta’ Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). Ir-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni juru li l-analizzatur għandu kopertura ta’ 64.9% fuq korpus miġbur għal dan l-istudju b’111,365 token. Sarna wkoll analiżi ta’ żbalji fuq 100 token magħżula b’mod każwali mill-korpus li mhumiex koperti mill-analizzatur, u dawn ir-riżultati juru li l-iżbalji jirriżultaw l-aktar mill-kliem Tork fil-korpus u l-għeruq nieqsa fil-lexicon tagħna.', 'mn': 'Энэ судалгаа бол Өмнөд Кавказ хэл гэр бүлийн гишүүн Туркийн хойд зүүн далайн шугам дээр ярьдаг Лаз хэлний баримтуудын баримтууд, дахин сэргээгдэх хичээл юм. Хельсинки Финитийн улсын хэрэглэгчийг ашиглан морфологик шинжилгээчийг бүтээж Лаз-д илэрхийлэх, үйлдвэрлэх ерөнхий тооны загварыг бүтээх эхний алхам юм. Үүний шалгалтын үр дүнд шинжилгээгч 111.365 тэмдэгтийг цуглуулсан корпус дээр 64.9% хувийн мэдээллийг харуулж байна. Мөн бид өөрсдийгөө шинжилгээчээр тайлбарлаагүй корпус дээр санамсаргүй 100 тэмдэг сонгогдсон алдаа шинжилгээ хийсэн бөгөөд эдгээр үр дүн нь бидний лексиконд Турк үг болон алдагдагдсан алдаа гарч ирдэг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Denne studien er eit forsøk å bidra til dokumentasjon og gjenoppretting av vanskeleg Laz-språk, eit medlem av Sør-Kaukasiske språk-familie, hovudsakelig snakket på Nord-Øst-kystlinje i Tyrkia. Det opprettar første steg for å laga eit generell datamaskinemodell for ordskjemarkjenning og produksjon for Laz ved å bygge eit regelbasert morfologisk analyser med Helsinki Finite-statsverktøy (HFST). Evalueringsresultatet viser at analyseren har eit 64,9% dekkevne over eit korpus samla for denne studien med 111,365 token. Vi har også utført ein feilanalyse om tilfeldig valde 100 teikn frå korpusen som ikkje er dekka av analyseren, og disse resultatene viser at feilen som hovudsakelig resulterer frå turske ord i korpusen og manglar stemmer i vårt leksikon.', 'pl': 'Niniejsze opracowanie jest próbą przyczynienia się do dokumentacji i rewitalizacji zagrożonego języka Laz, członka rodziny języków południowokakazyjskich używanych głównie na północno-wschodniej linii wybrzeża Turcji. Stanowi on pierwsze kroki do stworzenia ogólnego modelu obliczeniowego rozpoznawania i produkcji form słowa dla Laz poprzez budowę opartego na regułach analizatora morfologicznego z wykorzystaniem zestawu narzędzi Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). Wyniki oceny pokazują, że analizator ma 64,9% zasięg nad korpusem zebranym dla tego badania za pomocą tokenów 111,365. Przeprowadziliśmy również analizę błędów losowo wybranych 100 tokenów z korpusu, które nie są objęte analizą, a wyniki te pokazują, że błędy wynikają głównie z tureckich słów w korpusie i brakujących łodyg w naszym leksykonie.', 'ro': 'Acest studiu este o încercare de a contribui la documentarea și eforturile de revitalizare a limbii Laz pe cale de dispariție, un membru al familiei de limbi caucaziene de sud vorbită în principal pe coasta de nord-est a Turciei. Acesta constituie primii pași pentru crearea unui model computațional general pentru recunoașterea formelor de cuvânt și producția pentru Laz prin construirea unui analizor morfologic bazat pe reguli utilizând Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). Rezultatele evaluării arată că analizorul are o acoperire de 64,9% peste un corpus colectat pentru acest studiu cu 111.365 jetoane. De asemenea, am efectuat o analiză a erorilor pe 100 de jetoane selectate aleatoriu din corp care nu sunt acoperite de analizor, iar aceste rezultate arată că erorile rezultă în principal din cuvintele turcești din corp și tulpini lipsă din lexiconul nostru.', 'sr': 'Ova studija je pokušaj doprinijeti dokumentaciji i revitalizaciji napora ugroženog jezika Laz a, članica porodice južnog Kaukazijskog jezika koji se uglavnom govori na sjeveroistočnoj obali Turske. To predstavlja prve korake za stvaranje općeg računalnog model a za prepoznavanje i proizvodnju reči za Laz izgradnjem morfološkog analizatora na pravilima koristeći Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). Rezultati procjene pokazuju da analizator ima 64,9% pokrivanje preko korpusa koji je prikupljen za ovu studiju sa 111.365 znakova. Takoðe smo izvršili analizu greške o sluèajno odabranim 100 znakova iz korpusa koji ne pokrivaju analizator, i ovi rezultati pokazuju da greške uglavnom rezultuju od turskih reèi u korpusu i nestalih stepenica u našem leksikonu.', 'si': 'මේ පරීක්ෂණය තමයි ලාස් භාෂාව අනතුරු කරලා තුර්කියාගේ උතුරු පූර්වතුරු කුළු භාෂාව පවුලේ සාමාන්\u200dයයෙක්. It constitutes the first Step to make a generic computer Model for word form ack and product for Laz by building a Rule-based Morphiology විශ්ලේෂකය Helsinki Finite-state Toolkit (HFST) භාවිත කරන්න. විශ්ලේෂකයාට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශ්ලේෂකයාට 111,365 ටෝකන්ස් වලින් කොර්පුස් එක්ක සම්මුත අපි විශ්ලේෂකයෙන් පැහැදිලි නැති කෝර්පුස් වලින් පැහැදිලි 100 ටෝකන්ස් වලින් විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයක් කරලා තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම මේ ප්\u200dරත', 'so': 'Waxbarashadan waa isku dayo in uu ku faa’iido dukumentiyada iyo dib u soo celinta dhibaato leh luqada Laz oo ka mid ah qoyska afka koonfureed ee Kaucasian ee ugu horeysa ku hadlo xeebta woqooyi ee Turkey. Waxay sameeyaa tallaabooyinkii ugu horeeyay in loo sameeyo model xisaab ah oo loo sameeyo qoraalka aqoonsashada iyo dhaqaalaha ee Laz, kaas oo lagu dhiso baaritaanka morphologiga oo sharciga ku saleysan isticmaalka qalabka caalamiga ah ee Helsinki Finite-State (HFST). The evaluation results show that the analyser has a 64.9% coverage over a corpus collected for this study with 111,365 tokens.  Anaalbaarinta qaladka waxaan kaloo sameynnay 100 calaamad oo aan ka dooranayn korpus oo aan ku daboolayn khaliiska, sababtaas waxaa ka muuqata in qaladyadu ugu badnaan ay ka timaadaan hadallada Turkish ee ku qoran korpus iyo xerada aan la arag leksikankeena.', 'sv': 'Denna studie är ett försök att bidra till dokumentation och vitalisering av hotat lazspråk, en medlem av sydkaukasiska språkfamilj som huvudsakligen talas på nordöstra kusten i Turkiet. Den utgör de första stegen för att skapa en generell beräkningsmodell för ordformsgenerering och produktion för Laz genom att bygga en regelbaserad morfologisk analysator med hjälp av Helsingfors Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). Utvärderingsresultaten visar att analysatorn har 64,9% täckning över en korpus som samlats in för denna studie med 111 365 tokens. Vi har även utfört en felanalys på slumpmässigt utvalda 100 tokens från korpusen som inte täcks av analysatorn, och dessa resultat visar att felen främst beror på turkiska ord i korpusen och saknade stammar i vårt lexikon.', 'ta': 'இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி துருக்கிய தென் கேகாசியன் மொழி குடும்பத்தின் உறுப்பாளர் லாஸ் மொழியின் ஆவணங்கள் மற்றும் மீண்டும் முயற்சிகளுக்கு பங்க இது Laz க்கான வார்த்தை அடையாளம் மற்றும் உற்பத்திற்கான ஒரு பொது கணக்கீட்டு மாதிரியை உருவாக்கும் முதல் படிகளை உருவாக்குகிறது ஹெல்சின்கி பினைட்டு  மதிப்பிடும் முடிவுகள் அறிவிப்பாளரிடம் 64. 9% கார்புஸ் சேகரிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது 111,365 குறியீடுகளுடன். நாங்கள் ஒரு பிழை ஆய்வு செய்துள்ளோம் கார்ப்ஸில் இருந்து தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட 100 குறியீடுகளை செய்துள்ளோம் அது ஆராய்ச்சியால் மூடப்படாது, இந்த முடிவ', 'ur': 'یہ مطالعہ ایک کوشش ہے کہ لاز زبان کی خطرناک خطرناک کوشش اور دوبارہ زندہ کرنا کی کوشش کرے، جنوبی کاوکاسی زبان خاندان کی ایک عضو ہے جو ترکین کے شمال مشرق ساحل میں بات کی گئی ہے. یہ لزے کے لئے کلمات کی تصدیق اور پیدائش کے لئے ایک عمومی کمپیوٹریشن موڈل بنانے کے لئے پہلی قدم بناتا ہے۔ ہلسینکی فینیٹ-سٹیٹ تولکیٹ (HFST) کے مطابق ایک قانون پر بنیاد رکھا ہوا مورپولوژیک تحلیل کرنے والا بنا کر۔ ارزیابی نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ تحلیل کرنے والے کے لئے 111.365 ٹوکنوں کے ساتھ ایک کورپوس پر 64.9% پورٹ ہے۔ ہم نے کورپوس سے 100 ٹوکنوں کے بارے میں بھی ایک غلطی تحلیل کیا ہے جو تحلیل کرنے والے سے نہیں پورے ہیں اور یہ نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ اکثر غلطی تورکوس کے کلمات کے نتیجے میں ہیں اور ہمارے لکسیون میں گم ہونے والی ٹوکنوں کے نتیجے میں ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu ta'lim turki Janubiy qismida gapiradigan tillar qo'shilgan Laz tillarining birinchi muammoni qo'shish va qayta taʼminlovchi jarayonlariga yordam berishga harakat qiladi. U Helsinki Finite-State Asboblar (HFST) yordamida qoidagi morfologik analyzerni yaratish mumkin va Laz uchun umumiy kompyuter shaklini yaratish uchun birinchi qadam yaratish. Qiymati natijalarini koʻrsatish mumkin, analytiker esa ushbu tuzuvga qoʻshilgan kopusdan 64.9% qoʻllangan va 111,365 belgi bilan qabul qilgan. Biz cheksizdan tanlangan 100 belgilarni taʼminlovchi nazarda bajardik. Bu natijalar taʼminlovchi bo'lmagan narsalarning ko'proq xatolik ko'pchilik orqali ko'pchilik soʻzlarimiz va leksisistondagi yo'q soʻzlardan sabab beradi.", 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu này là một nỗ lực hỗ trợ tài liệu và cuộc cải tạo lại các nỗ lực của ngôn ngữ Laz đang gặp nguy hiểm, một thành viên của gia đình ngôn ngữ Nam Cap- ca được phát biểu trên bờ biển Đông Bắc của Thổ. Nó là bước đầu tiên để tạo ra một mô hình tổng tính để nhận dạng từ và sản xuất cho Laz bằng cách tạo ra một nhà phân tích lịch sự theo quy định bằng cách dùng công cụ Helsinki Finite-State (HFS). Kết quả đánh giá cho thấy rằng nhà phân tích có khoảng cách với số hiệu ứng 69.9=. trên một tập thể thu thập được cho nghiên cứu này bằng chứng 111,365. Chúng tôi cũng đã thực hiện phân tích lỗi trên các thẻ 100 ngẫu nhiên được chọn từ tập đoàn những vật thể không được phân tích bởi nhà phân tích, và kết quả này cho thấy những sai sót chủ yếu là do từ ngôn ngữ của người Thổ trong tập thể và các dòng chảy bị mất tích trong ngôn ngữ của chúng tôi.', 'bg': 'Това изследване е опит да допринесе за документиране и съживяване на застрашения език Лаз, член на южнокавказкото езиково семейство, говорещо главно на североизточното крайбрежие на Турция. Той представлява първите стъпки за създаване на общ изчислителен модел за разпознаване и производство на форми на думи за Лаз чрез изграждане на морфологичен анализатор, базиран на правила, с помощта на Хелзинкски финални държавни инструменти (HFST). Резултатите от оценката показват, че анализаторът има 64,9% покритие върху корпус, събран за това проучване с 111 365 токена. Извършихме и анализ на грешките на произволно подбрани 100 символа от корпуса, които не са обхванати от анализатора и тези резултати показват, че грешките са резултат предимно от турски думи в корпуса и липсващи стъбла в нашия лексикон.', 'da': 'Denne undersøgelse er et forsøg på at bidrage til dokumentation og revitalisering af truet Laz sprog, et medlem af den sydkaukasiske sprogfamilie hovedsageligt tales på den nordøstlige kystlinje af Tyrkiet. Det udgør de første skridt til at skabe en generel beregningsmodel for ordformegenkendelse og produktion for Laz ved at bygge en regelbaseret morfologisk analysator ved hjælp af Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). Evalueringsresultaterne viser, at analysatoren har en 64,9% dækning over et corpus indsamlet til dette studie med 111.365 tokens. Vi har også udført en fejlanalyse på tilfældigt udvalgte 100 tokens fra korpuset, som ikke er dækket af analysatoren, og disse resultater viser, at fejlene hovedsageligt skyldes tyrkiske ord i korpustet og manglende stængler i vores leksikon.', 'nl': 'Deze studie is een poging om bij te dragen aan documentatie en revitalisatie inspanningen van bedreigde Laz taal, een lid van de Zuid-Kaukasische taalfamilie voornamelijk gesproken op noordoostelijke kust van Turkije. Het vormt de eerste stappen om een algemeen rekenkundig model voor woordvormherkenning en -productie voor Laz te creëren door een regelgebaseerde morfologische analysator te bouwen met behulp van Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). De evaluatieresultaten tonen aan dat de analysator een 64,9% dekking heeft over een corpus verzameld voor deze studie met 111,365 tokens. We hebben ook een foutanalyse uitgevoerd op willekeurig geselecteerde 100-tokens uit het corpus die niet door de analysator worden gedekt, en deze resultaten tonen aan dat de fouten meestal voortvloeien uit Turkse woorden in het corpus en ontbrekende stengels in ons lexicon.', 'hr': 'Ova ispitivanja je pokušaj doprinijeti dokumentaciji i revitalizaciji napora ugroženog jezika Laz a, članica obitelji južnog Kaukazijskog jezika, koji se uglavnom govori na sjeveroistočnoj obali Turske. To predstavlja prve korake za stvaranje općeg računalnog model a za priznanje i proizvodnju riječi za Laz izgradnjem morfološkog analizatora na pravilima koristeći Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). Rezultati procjene pokazuju da analizator ima 64,9% pokrivanje preko korpusa koji je skupljen za ovu ispitivanje s 111.365 znakova. Također smo izvršili analizu greške o slučajno izabranim 100 znakova iz korpusa koji ne pokrivaju analizator, te rezultati pokazuju da greške uglavnom rezultuju od turskih riječi u korpusu i nestalih stepenica u našem leksikonu.', 'de': 'Diese Studie ist ein Versuch, zur Dokumentation und Revitalisierung der gefährdeten Laz-Sprache beizutragen, einem Mitglied der südkaukasischen Sprachfamilie, die hauptsächlich an der nordöstlichen Küste der Türkei gesprochen wird. Es stellt die ersten Schritte zur Erstellung eines allgemeinen Rechenmodells für die Wortformerkennung und -produktion für Laz dar, indem ein regelbasierter morphologischer Analysator mit Hilfe des Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST) erstellt wird. Die Auswertungsergebnisse zeigen, dass der Analysator eine 64,9% Abdeckung über einen Korpus hat, der für diese Studie mit 111,365 Token gesammelt wurde. Wir haben auch eine Fehleranalyse an zufällig ausgewählten 100-Token aus dem Korpus durchgeführt, die nicht vom Analysator abgedeckt werden. Diese Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die Fehler hauptsächlich auf türkische Wörter im Korpus und fehlende Stämme in unserem Lexikon zurückzuführen sind.', 'ko': '이 연구는 멸종 위기에 처한 라즈어의 문헌 기록과 부흥에 기여하기 위한 것이다. 라즈어는 터키 동북해안선에 주로 분포하는 남고가소 어계의 일원이다.헬싱키 유한상태 키트(HFST)를 사용하여 규칙 기반 형태학 분석기를 구축함으로써 Laz의 어형 식별과 생성을 위한 유니버설 컴퓨팅 모델을 만드는 첫걸음이다.평가 결과 본 연구에서 수집한 111365개의 표기된 어료 라이브러리 중 분석기의 커버율은 64.9%였다.우리는 또한 원료 라이브러리에서 무작위로 선택한 100개의 표기에 대해 오류 분석을 실시했는데, 분석원은 이러한 표기를 포함하지 않았다. 이러한 결과에 따르면 오류는 주로 원료 라이브러리의 터키어 단어와 어휘에 없는 어간에서 나온 것으로 나타났다.', 'id': 'Studi ini adalah percobaan untuk berkontribusi ke dokumentasi dan usaha revitalisasi bahasa Laz yang mengancam, anggota keluarga bahasa Kaukasia Selatan terutama berbicara di garis pantai timur laut Turki. It constitutes the first steps to create a general computational model for word form recognition and production for Laz by building a rule-based morphological analyser using Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST).  Hasil evaluasi menunjukkan bahwa analisnya memiliki 64,9% menutupi tubuh yang dikumpulkan untuk studi ini dengan 111,365 token. Kami juga telah melakukan analisis kesalahan pada 100 token yang secara acak dipilih dari korpus yang tidak ditutup oleh analisis, dan hasil ini menunjukkan bahwa kesalahan kebanyakan berasal dari kata-kata Turki dalam korpus dan batu hilang dalam leksikon kami.', 'sw': 'Utafiti huu ni jaribio la kuchangia dokumentari na kurekebisha juhudi za lugha ya Laz, ambaye ni mwanachama wa familia ya lugha ya Kusini ya Caucasia, hasa inazungumzwa katika pwani ya kaskazini mashariki mwa Uturuki. Inatengeneza hatua za kwanza za za kutengeneza muundo wa kompyuta kwa ajili ya kutambua na uzalishaji wa maneno kwa kutengeneza mchambuzi wa kimaadilojia anayeishi sheria kwa kutumia Kifaa cha Nchi ya Helsinki (HFST). The evaluation results show that the analyser has a 64.9% coverage over a corpus collected for this study with 111,365 tokens.  Pia tumefanya uchambuzi wa makosa kuhusu ishara 100 zilizochaguliwa kwa urahisi kutoka kwenye makampuni ambayo hayana taarifa ya mchambuzi, na matokeo haya yanaonyesha kwamba makosa mengi yanatokana na maneno ya Uturuki katika makampuni na ambayo hayakuwa na msimamo wetu wa lexico.', 'tr': 'Bu araşdyrma Türkiýanyň günorta-günbatar demirgazynda gürleýän Laz dilinden dökümentlerine täzeden geçirmek we täzeden geçirmek synanyşdyr. Helsinki Finite-Döwlet Araçları (HFST) kullanarak, Laz için umumiy hesaplama modelini tanımlamak ve üretim için ilk adımlar oluşturmak için bu şekilde düzenlenen morfolojik çözümleyicisi oluşturuyor. Taýýarlama netijesi 111,365 token bilen çykan çykyşynyň 64,9%-iniň üstünde çykyşynyň bardygyny görkezýär. Biz hem korpusdan seçilen 100 sany işaretli hata analyzasynda etdik. Bu netijeler çözümlerden ýok bolmadyklaryny görkeýärler. Şol netijeler köplenç Türkçe sözleriniň korpusynyň üstündeki hatalaryň netijesinde bolup we biziň leksiýamyzdaki ýok taýýarlaryň netijesini görkeýärler.', 'fa': 'این مطالعه تلاش برای تولید کردن به مدارک و تلاش بازسازی از زبان لاز خطرناک است، عضو خانواده زبان کاوکاسی جنوبی که در خط شمال شرق ترکیه صحبت می\u200cشود. این نخستین مرحله\u200cها را برای ایجاد یک مدل محاسبات عمومی برای شناسایی و تولید کلمه برای لاز ساخته می\u200cشود با ساختن یک تحلیل\u200cکننده مورفولوژیکی بر اساس قانون با استفاده از ابزار\u200cهای ایالت Helsinki Finite (HFST). نتایج ارزیابی نشان می دهد که تحلیل کننده 64.9 درصد پوشش دارد بر یک کورپوس که برای این مطالعه با 111.365 نشانه جمع شده است. ما همچنین یک تحلیل خطایی در مورد ۱۰۰ نشانه تصادفی انتخاب شده از کورپوس انجام دادیم که توسط تحلیل کننده پوشیده نشده است، و این نتیجه نشان داده است که اشتباهی بیشتر از کلمات ترکیه در کورپوس نتیجه می\u200cدهند و پایه\u200cهای ناپدید شده در زبان ما.', 'af': "Hierdie studie is 'n probeer om te bydra a an dokumentasie en revitaliseerde versoeke van gevaardige Las taal, 'n mede van Suid-Kaukasiese taalsfamilie in die noordeoostekantlyn van Turkey te praat. Dit bestuur die eerste stappe om 'n algemene rekenaar model te skep vir woord vorm herken en produksie vir Laz deur 'n reël-gebaseerde morfologiese analiseerder te bou deur Helsinki Finite-Staat Nutsbalk (HFST). Die evalueringsresultate vertoon dat die analiseerder 'n 64.9% dekking oor 'n korpus versamel het vir hierdie studie met 111.365 tokens. Ons het ook 'n fout analiseer uitgevoer op willekeurige gekose 100 tekens van die korpus wat nie deur die analiseerder bedek word nie, en hierdie resultate wys dat die foute meeste resultaat van Turkse woorde in die korpus en ontbreek stamme in ons leksikon.", 'sq': 'Ky studim është një përpjekje për të kontribuar në dokumentacionin dhe përpjekjet e ringjalljes të gjuhës së rrezikuar Laz, një an ëtar i familjes së gjuhës juglindore kaukaziane, kryesisht të folur në bregdetin verilindor të Turqisë. It constitutes the first steps to create a general computational model for word form recognition and production for Laz by building a rule-based morphological analyser using Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST).  Rezultatet e vlerësimit tregojnë se analizuesi ka një mbulim 64.9% mbi një korpus të mbledhur për këtë studim me 111,365 token. Ne kemi kryer gjithashtu një analizë gabimesh në 100 toka të zgjedhur në mënyrë të rastësishme nga korpusi që nuk janë mbuluar nga analizuesi dhe këto rezultate tregojnë se gabimet kryesisht rezultojnë nga fjalët turke në korpus dhe stemat e munguara në lexikonin tonë.', 'am': 'ይህ ትምህርት በቱርክ ደቡብ ምሥራቅ ዳርቻ ላይ በተናገረው የደቡብ ካካካሲ ቋንቋ ወገን አባል ለላዝ ቋንቋ እና ለመቀናቀል ማሰናከል ነው፡፡ ለLaz የቃላት መልዕክት ማውቀት እና አቀማመጥ የፊደል ደረጃዎችን ለመፍጠር የመጀመሪያውን ደረጃዎች አቀናቅሎታል፡፡ የውጤቱ ውጤቶች አካላቢው ለዚህ ትምህርት በ111,365 ምልክቶች የተሰበሰበ ካርፓስ ላይ 64.9 በመቶ ድጋፍ እንዳለው ያሳያል፡፡ በክሮፓስ ውስጥ ካልተረጉት መቶ ምልክቶች በተመረጠን የስህተት ትምህርት አፈረስን፣ እነዚህም ስህተቶች አብዛኛውን በኮርፓስ ቃላት እና በሊክሲኮን ውስጥ የተጎናኙትን ድምጾች እንዲያሳዩ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս ուսումնասիրությունը փորձում է ներդրել փաստաթղթերի և վերականգնման ջանքերի վրա, որոնք գործում են վտանգված Լազի լեզու, Հարավային Կավակասիայի լեզուների ընտանիքի անդամ, որը հիմնականում խոսում է Թուրքիայի հյուսիսավոր արև It constitutes the first steps to create a general computational model for word form recognition and production for Laz by building a rule-based morphological analyser using Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST).  Ագնահատման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ վերլուծողը 64.9 տոկոսի ծախսեր ունի այս ուսումնասիրության համար հավաքված մարմնի վրա, որն ունի 110.365 տոկոս: Մենք նաև սխալների վերլուծություն ենք կատարել պատահականորեն ընտրված 100 նշանի վրա մարմնից, որոնք վերլուծողի կողմից չեն ծածկված, և այս արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ սխալները հիմնականում հանգեցնում են թուրք բառերից մարմնի մեջ և մեր լեքսիկոնի անհետացած արմատնե', 'az': 'Bu araşdırma Türkiyənin kuzeydoğu sahilində danışan Cənubi Kauksa dillərinin üyesi olan Laz dilinin təhlükəsizliklərə və yenidən diriltmə çabalarına kömək etmək və təşkil etmək üçün çalışmaqdır. Bu ilk adımlar Laz üçün ünvanlı hesaplama modeli yaratmaq və ürəklənmək üçün Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST) vasitəsilə hökmünün tabanlı morfolojik analizicisi inşa edir. Qıymet sonuçları analizacının 111.365 möcüzələrlə birlikdə toplanmış bir korpus üzərində 64.9%-i örtüyü göstərir. Biz də analizator tarafından örtünmədiyimiz korpus 100 möcüzələrindən rastgele seçilmiş xəta analizi çəkdik. Bu sonuçlar isə korpus içindəki Türk sözlərindən çox xətaların və bizim leksiyonumuzdaki küçük sütunlardan sonuçlandığını göstərir.', 'bn': 'এই গবেষণা হচ্ছে দক্ষিণ কাকেশিয়ার ভাষার পরিবারের সদস্য লাজ ভাষার পুনরায় বিপদজনক প্রচেষ্টার প্রচেষ্টার প্রচেষ্টার প্রচেষ্টা যাতে প্রচেষ এটি লাজের জন্য একটি সাধারণ গণনামূলক মডেল তৈরি করার প্রথম পদক্ষেপ তৈরি করে হেলসিঙ্কি ফিনিট-রাষ্ট্রীয় টুলিকিট (এইচএফস্টি) ব্যবহার করে একটি নিয়মিত ম এই মূল্যের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে বিশ্লেষকের কাছে ১১,৩৬৫ প্রতীক রয়েছে ১৪. আমরা একই সাথে কোর্পাস থেকে ১০০ টি চিহ্ন নির্বাচিত বিশ্লেষণ করেছি যা বিশ্লেষক দ্বারা কাভার করে না, আর এই ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে তুরস্কের বেশীরভাগ ভুল কোর্পাসের কথ', 'ca': "Aquest estudi és un intent de contribuir a la documentació i a l'esforç de revitalització del llenguatge Laz en perill, membre de la família de llenguatges del Sud-Caucase parlat principalment a la costa nord-est de Turquia. constitueix els primers passos per crear un model computacional general de reconeixement i producció de paraules per a Laz construint un anàlisista morfològic basat en regles amb Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). Els resultats de l'evaluació demostren que l'analitzador té una cobertura del 64,9% sobre un corpus recollit per aquest estudi amb 111.365 fitxes. També hem fet una an àlisi d'errors en 100 fitxes aleatòriament seleccionats del corpus que no estan coberts per l'analitzador, i aquests resultats mostren que els errors resulten principalment de paraules turques al corpus i troncs desapareguts del nostre lexicó.", 'bs': 'Ova studija je pokušaj doprinijeti dokumentaciji i revitalizaciji napora ugroženog jezika Laz a, članica porodice južnog Kaukazijskog jezika koji se uglavnom govori na sjeveroistočnoj obali Turske. To predstavlja prve korake za stvaranje općeg računalnog model a za priznanje i proizvodnju riječi za Laz izgradnjem morfološkog analizatora na pravilima koristeći Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). Rezultati procjene pokazuju da analizator ima 64,9% preko korpusa koji je skupljen za ovu studiju sa 111.365 znakova. Također smo izvršili analizu greške o nasumično odabranim 100 znakova iz korpusa koji ne pokrivaju analizator, i ovi rezultati pokazuju da greške uglavnom rezultuju od turskih riječi u korpusu i nestalih stepenica u našem leksikonu.', 'cs': 'Tato studie se snaží přispět k dokumentaci a revitalizaci ohroženého jazyka Laz, člena jihovkavské jazykové rodiny mluvící především na severovýchodním pobřeží Turecka. Představuje první kroky k vytvoření obecného výpočetního modelu pro rozpoznávání a produkci slovních forem pro Laz vytvořením pravidelně založeného morfologického analyzátoru pomocí Helsinky Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). Výsledky hodnocení ukazují, že analyzátor má 64,9% pokrytí nad korpusem shromážděným pro tuto studii pomocí tokenů 111,365. Dále jsme provedli analýzu chyb na náhodně vybraných 100 tokenech korpusu, které analyzátor nezahrnuje, a tyto výsledky ukazují, že chyby většinou vyplývají z tureckých slov v korpusu a chybějících kmenů v našem lexikonu.', 'et': 'Käesoleva uuringu eesmärk on aidata kaasa ohustatud lazi keele dokumenteerimisele ja taaselustamisele, mis kuulub Lõuna-Kaukaasia keelteperekonda, mida räägitakse peamiselt Türgi kirdeosas. See on esimesed sammud üldise arvutusliku mudeli loomiseks sõnavormi tuvastamiseks ja tootmiseks Lazi jaoks, ehitades reeglipõhise morfoloogilise analüüsi Helsingi Finite-State Toolkit (HFST) abil. Hindamise tulemused näitavad, et analüsaatoril on 64,9% katvus käesoleva uuringu jaoks kogutud korpusest 111 365 tokeniga. Samuti oleme läbi viinud veaanalüüsi korpusest juhuslikult valitud 100 tokeni kohta, mida analüüsija ei hõlma, ning need tulemused näitavad, et vead tulenevad enamasti korpuses olevatest türgi sõnadest ja meie leksikonis puuduvatest türgi sõnadest.', 'fi': 'Tämä tutkimus pyrkii dokumentoimaan ja elvyttämään uhanalaista Lazin kieltä, joka kuuluu Etelä-Kaukasian kieliperheeseen, jota puhutaan pääasiassa Turkin koillisrannikolla. Se on ensimmäinen askel luoda yleinen laskennallinen malli sanamuotojen tunnistamiseen ja tuottamiseen Lazille rakentamalla sääntöpohjainen morfologinen analysaattori käyttäen Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). Arviointitulokset osoittavat, että analysaattorilla on 64,9% kattavuus tätä tutkimusta varten kerätystä korpusesta, jossa on 111 365 polettia. Olemme myös tehneet virheanalyysin satunnaisesti valituille 100 merkkiä korpusesta, joita analysaattori ei kata, ja nämä tulokset osoittavat, että virheet johtuvat pääosin korpusen turkkilaisista sanoista ja sanastostamme puuttuvista varsista.', 'he': 'המחקר הזה הוא ניסיון לתרום למאמצי תיעוד ולחיות מחדש של שפת לאז בסכנה, חבר של משפחת שפת דרום-לבן מדבר בעיקר על חוף צפון-מזרחי טורקיה. הוא מייצר את הצעד הראשון ליצור מודל מחשבי כללי לזהות צורת מילים וליצור לאז על ידי בניית ניתוח מורפולוגי מבוסס על חוקים באמצעות ערכת כלים של הלסינקי פיניט-סטייט (HFST). תוצאות הערכה מראות שיש למבחן כיסוי 64.9% על קורפוס שנאסף עבור המחקר הזה עם 111,365 סימנים. We have also performed an error analysis on randomly selected 100 tokens from the corpus which are not covered by the analyser, and these results show that the errors mostly result from Turkish words in the corpus and missing stems in our lexicon.', 'jv': 'Ing ujaran iki dadi kapan kanggo nyumbang nggunakake dokumen lan mbukakipun nggunakake langkung Laz nganggep, sampeyan wong wong liya Caukasi Sugar Mungkin nambah tanggal sing sampeyan banget kanggo nggawe model kompatistik kanggo awak dhéwé nggawe tarjamahan lan mburu kanggo Laz kuwi nggawe sistem modolèji sing basa gambar nggawe help helsinaki Finte-Stat Tulkit (HFT). Rejalaké pancening mungkin nganggo cara-cara sing perusahaan 64.9% nang sampeyan kawit karo perusahaan nyong nggawe kanggo ujaran iki karo 11.64 Token. Awak dhéwé éntuk énalusi nung akeh error karo perusahaan kanggo sampeyan éwé butuh dolanan karo hal-sampeyan sing entuk dhéwé kuwi duluran kanggo maneh, lan diputaaken sing iki bakal terus akeh perusahaan langkung dhéwé sakjane kanggo langgar-langgar sing perusahaan karo perusahaan lan alaman sing', 'ha': "Wannan littafin na jarraba ta ƙara wa dokumenta da kure aikin da aka yi wa laz a cikin harshen Laz, wani member of family na Lughan Kusini Caukasian, mainli wanda aka yi wa magana a kashi na yamma na Taruki. Shi na ƙididdige hanyõyin na farko da za'a ƙiƙiro wani misali na ƙidãya wa tsarin sunan faɗi da ake nuna wa Laz, kuma yana sami wani analyi na rubutun da aka rubuta a rubutun, na yi amfani da Shirin Ayuka na Finite-State (HFstan). Ana ƙidãya ya nuna cewa mai anaƙaita yana da wani asilimi 64.9 kan rufe a kowace da aka sami wa wannan tudun da ãyoyin 111,365. Haƙĩƙa, mun sami wani anayyar ɓarna a ranar da aka zãɓe 100 ãyoyin daga nau'in da ba za'a rufe su ba daga analynsa, kuma matsalan su nuna cewa misãlai ke ƙaranci daga maganar turuki a cikin korPus da sauyen da ba'a rage a cikin leksikon.", 'sk': 'Ta študija je poskus prispevanja k dokumentaciji in revitalizaciji ogroženega jezika Laza, člana južnokavkaške jezikovne družine, ki se govori večinoma na severovzhodni obali Turčije. Predstavlja prve korake za oblikovanje splošnega računalniškega modela za prepoznavanje in proizvodnjo besednih oblik za Laz z izgradnjo morfološkega analizatorja, ki temelji na pravilih, z uporabo helsinkskega finite-state Toolkit (HFST). Rezultati ocene kažejo, da ima analizator 64,9% pokritost korpusa, zbranega za to študijo s 111.365 žetoni. Izvedli smo tudi analizo napak na naključno izbranih 100 žetonih iz korpusa, ki jih analizator ne zajema, in ti rezultati kažejo, da so napake večinoma posledica turških besed v korpusu in manjkajočih stebel v leksikonu.', 'bo': 'འདི་ལྟ་བུ་ནི་ཤེས་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་བསྐྱར་གསོ་བྱེད་ནི་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པའི་སྐྱེས་ཆེན་ཁང་ཅིག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་དང་བསྐྱར་གསོ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། It constitutes the first steps to create a general computational model for word form recognition and production for Laz by building a rule-based morphological analyser using Helsinki Finite-State Toolkit (HFST). དབྱེ་ཞིབ ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཁང་ལས་སེལ་འཐུ་འབད་བའི་རྐྱེན་འཁྲུལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Quotation Detection and Classification with a Corpus-Agnostic Model', 'ar': 'كشف الاقتباس وتصنيفه باستخدام نموذج كوربوس لا أدري', 'pt': 'Detecção e Classificação de Cotação com um Modelo Corpus-Agnostic', 'es': 'Detección y clasificación de cotizaciones con un modelo independiente del cuerpo', 'fr': 'Détection et classification des devis avec un modèle indépendant du corpus', 'ja': 'コーパス認知モデルを用いた見積検出と分類', 'ru': 'Обнаружение и классификация котировок с помощью корпусно-предупредительной модели', 'hi': 'उद्धरण का पता लगाना और एक कॉर्पस-अज्ञेयवादी मॉडल के साथ वर्गीकरण', 'zh': '用语料库不可知模报价检类', 'ga': 'Brath Luachan agus Aicmiú le Múnla Corpais-Agnóiseach', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση και ταξινόμηση με Corpus-Agnostic Model', 'ka': 'Quotation Detection and Classification with a Corpus-Agnostic Model', 'hu': 'Idézetek észlelése és osztályozása Corpus-Agnostic modellel', 'it': 'Rilevamento e classificazione delle citazioni con un modello Corpus-Agnostic', 'kk': 'Корпус- агностикалық үлгісімен квоттау табу мен классификациясы', 'lt': 'Kvotų nustatymas ir klasifikavimas pagal korpuso-agnostinio modelio metodą', 'mk': 'Детектирање и класификација на цитати со корпус-агностички модел', 'ml': 'ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ്- അഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക് മോഡില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുള്ള സ്ഥിതി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Sejbien u Klassifikazzjoni tal-Kwotazzjoni b’Mudell Korpus-Agnostiku', 'mn': 'Цуврал-агностик загвартай холбогдол болон классификация', 'ms': 'Pengesanan dan Klasifikasi Quotation dengan Model Corpus-Agnostic', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie i klasyfikacja cytatów za pomocą modelu Corpus-Agnostic', 'no': 'Oppdaging og klassifisering av kvotasjon med ein korpusagnostisk modell', 'ro': 'Detectarea și clasificarea cotațiilor cu un model Corpus-Agnostic', 'sr': 'Detekcija i klasifikacija kvotacije sa korpus-Agnostičkim modelom', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga iyo baaritaanka korpus-Agnostic', 'sv': 'Upptäckt och klassificering av citat med en Corpus-Agnostisk modell', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'மேற்கோள் கண்டுபிடிப்பு மற்றும் வகுப்பு', 'ur': 'کوٹیशन شناسایی اور کلاسیفی کرپوس-اگنیسی موڈل کے ساتھ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kiểm tra đếm tiền và Hạng giác bằng mô hình Corpus-Agnosic.', 'bg': 'Откриване и класифициране на цитати с корпус-агностичен модел', 'nl': 'Citatiedetectie en classificatie met een Corpus-Agnostic Model', 'da': 'Registrering og klassificering af citater med en Corpus-Agnostic Model', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje i klasifikacija kvotacije s korpus-Agnostičkim modelom', 'de': 'Quotationserkennung und Klassifizierung mit einem Corpus-Agnostic Modell', 'id': 'Quotation Detection and Classification with a Corpus-Agnostic Model', 'sw': 'Quotation Detection and Classification with a Corpus-Agnostic Model', 'fa': 'شناسایی و کلاس\u200cشناسایی با یک مدل Corpus-Agnostic', 'ko': '자료 라이브러리 알 수 없는 모델을 바탕으로 하는 인용어 검측과 분류', 'tr': 'Kop-Agnostik Modeli bilen Taýýarlama we Renkler', 'sq': 'Zbulimi dhe klasifikimi i citimeve me një model korpus-agnostik', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'af': "Koetisie Opdekking en Klassifikasie met 'n Corpus- Agnostic Model", 'az': 'Korpus-Agnostik Modeli ilə Quotation Detection and Classification', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje i klasifikacija kvotacije sa korpus-Agnostičkim modelom', 'ca': 'Quotation Detection and Classification with a Corpus-Agnostic Model', 'cs': 'Detekce a klasifikace citací pomocí korpus-agnostického modelu', 'fi': 'Citation Detection and Classification with a Corpus-Agnostic Model', 'hy': 'Quotation Detection and Classification with a Corpus-Agnostic Model', 'bn': 'কোর্পাস- আগনোস্টিক মডেলের সাথে উদ্ধৃতি সনাক্তি এবং ক্লাসিকেশন', 'et': 'Tsitatsioonide tuvastamine ja klassifitseerimine korpus-agnostilise mudeliga', 'jv': 'Ubah detection and klassification with a corpus-agestic model', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje in klasifikacija citatov s korpusno-agnostičnim modelom', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Quotation Detection and Classification with a Corpus-Agnostic Model', 'he': 'Quotation Detection and Classification with a Corpus-Agnostic Model'}
{'en': 'The detection of quotations (i.e., reported speech, thought, and writing) has established itself as an NLP analysis task. However, state-of-the-art models have been developed on the basis of specific corpora and incorpo- rate a high degree of corpus-specific assumptions and knowledge, which leads to fragmentation. In the spirit of task-agnostic modeling, we present a corpus-agnostic neural model for quotation detection and evaluate it on three corpora that vary in language, text genre, and structural assumptions. The model (a) approaches the state-of-the-art on the corpora when using established feature sets and (b) shows reasonable performance even when us- ing solely word forms, which makes it applicable for non-standard (i.e., historical) corpora.', 'ar': 'لقد أثبت اكتشاف الاقتباسات (أي الكلام والفكر والكتابة المبلغ عنها) نفسه كمهمة تحليل البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. ومع ذلك ، فقد تم تطوير أحدث النماذج على أساس مجموعة محددة وتضمنت درجة عالية من الافتراضات والمعرفة الخاصة بالمجموعة ، مما يؤدي إلى التجزئة. بروح النمذجة الحيادية للمهمة ، نقدم نموذجًا عصبيًا لاأدريًا لاكتشاف الاقتباس وتقييمه على ثلاث مجموعات تختلف في اللغة ونوع النص والافتراضات الهيكلية. النموذج (أ) يقترب من أحدث ما توصل إليه العلم في المجموعة عند استخدام مجموعات الميزات المحددة و (ب) يُظهر أداءً معقولاً حتى عند استخدام أشكال الكلمات فقط ، مما يجعله قابلاً للتطبيق على غير المعياري (أي تاريخي. ) الجسد.', 'pt': 'A detecção de citações (ou seja, fala, pensamento e escrita relatados) estabeleceu-se como uma tarefa de análise da PNL. No entanto, modelos de ponta têm sido desenvolvidos com base em corpora específicos e incorporam um alto grau de suposições e conhecimentos específicos de corpus, o que leva à fragmentação. No espírito da modelagem agnóstica de tarefa, apresentamos um modelo neural agnóstico de corpus para detecção de citações e o avaliamos em três corpora que variam em linguagem, gênero de texto e suposições estruturais. O modelo (a) aproxima-se do estado-da-arte dos corpora ao usar conjuntos de recursos estabelecidos e (b) apresenta desempenho razoável mesmo quando usa apenas formas de palavras, o que o torna aplicável para não padronizados (ou seja, históricos ) corpora.', 'es': 'La detección de citas (es decir, el habla, el pensamiento y la escritura informados) se ha establecido como una tarea de análisis de la PNL. Sin embargo, se han desarrollado modelos de vanguardia sobre la base de cuerpos específicos e incorporan un alto grado de suposiciones y conocimientos específicos del cuerpo, lo que conduce a la fragmentación. En el espíritu del modelado agnóstico de la tarea, presentamos un modelo neuronal agnóstico del cuerpo para la detección de cotizaciones y lo evaluamos en tres cuerpos que varían en el idioma, el género del texto y las suposiciones estructurales. El modelo (a) se acerca al estado de la técnica de los cuerpos cuando se utilizan conjuntos de características establecidos y (b) muestra un rendimiento razonable incluso cuando se utilizan únicamente formas de palabras, lo que lo hace aplicable a cuerpos no estándar (es decir, históricos).', 'ja': '引用（すなわち、報告された発話、思考、および書き込み）の検出は、NLP分析タスクとして確立されている。しかし、最先端のモデルは、特定のコーパスに基づいて開発されており、コーパス固有の仮定と知識の度合いが高く、断片化につながっています。タスク非依存モデリングの精神では、引用検出のためのコーパス非依存ニューラルモデルを提示し、言語、テキストジャンル、および構造的仮定で変化する3つのコーパスで評価します。モデル(a)は、確立された機能セットを使用するときにコーパスの最先端にアプローチし、(b)単語形式のみを使用しても合理的なパフォーマンスを示し、非標準（すなわち、歴史的な）コーパスに適用できるようにする。', 'fr': "La détection de citations (c.-à-d. discours, pensées et écrits rapportés) s'est imposée comme une tâche d'analyse de la PNL. Cependant, des modèles de pointe ont été développés sur la base de corpus spécifiques et incorporent un haut degré d'hypothèses et de connaissances spécifiques au corpus, ce qui conduit à la fragmentation. Dans l'esprit de la modélisation agnostique des tâches, nous présentons un modèle neuronal agnostique du corpus pour la détection des citations et l'évaluons sur trois corpus qui varient en termes de langue, de genre de texte et d'hypothèses structurelles. Le modèle (a) se rapproche de l'état actuel des corpus lors de l'utilisation d'ensembles de caractéristiques établis et (b) montre des performances raisonnables même en utilisant uniquement des formes verbales, ce qui le rend applicable aux corpus non standard (c'est-à-dire historiques).", 'zh': '检引文(者,告之语音,思虑文章)已为NLP析。 然最先进者,发于特定语料库,而incorpo-rate高语料库特定假设知识,此碎片也。 本务无关建模神,发一语料库神经模形,施于报价检,语言文质,三语料库上评估。 (a)近语料库之最新集时(b)虽单词文见理,非标准(史)语料库。', 'hi': 'कोटेशन का पता लगाना (यानी, रिपोर्ट किए गए भाषण, विचार और लेखन) ने खुद को एक एनएलपी विश्लेषण कार्य के रूप में स्थापित किया है। हालांकि, अत्याधुनिक मॉडल को विशिष्ट कॉर्पोरेट के आधार पर विकसित किया गया है और कॉर्पस-विशिष्ट मान्यताओं और ज्ञान की एक उच्च डिग्री को रेट करता है, जो विखंडन की ओर जाता है। कार्य-अज्ञेयवादी मॉडलिंग की भावना में, हम उद्धरण का पता लगाने के लिए एक कॉर्पस-अज्ञेयवादी तंत्रिका मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं और इसे तीन कॉर्पोरेट पर मूल्यांकन करते हैं जो भाषा, पाठ शैली और संरचनात्मक मान्यताओं में भिन्न होते हैं। मॉडल (ए) स्थापित फीचर सेट का उपयोग करते समय कॉर्पोरेट पर अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोण करता है और (बी) उचित प्रदर्शन दिखाता है, भले ही हम पूरी तरह से शब्द रूपों को दर्शाते हैं, जो इसे गैर-मानक (यानी, ऐतिहासिक) कॉर्पोरेट के लिए लागू करता है।', 'ru': 'Обнаружение цитат (например, речи, мысли и письма) зарекомендовало себя как задача анализа NLP. Тем не менее, современные модели были разработаны на основе конкретных тел и темпов высокой степени корпусно-специфических предположений и знаний, что приводит к фрагментации. В духе задачно-диагностического моделирования мы представляем корпусно-диагностическую нейронную модель для обнаружения цитат и оцениваем ее на трех корпусах, которые различаются по языку, жанру текста и структурным предположениям. Модель (а) приближается к самому современному уровню на корпусах при использовании установленных наборов признаков и (б) показывает разумную производительность, даже когда мы используем только словоформы, что делает ее применимой к нестандартным (т.е. историческим) корпусам.', 'ga': 'Is tasc anailíse NLP é braite athfhriotail (i. Mar sin féin, forbraíodh samhlacha úrscothacha ar bhonn corpais ar leith agus ionchorpraítear leo leibhéal ard toimhdí agus eolas corpas-shonrach, as a dtagann ilroinnt. I spiorad na samhaltú tasc-agnóiseach, cuirimid i láthair samhail néaróra corpus-agnostic le haghaidh athfhriotail a bhrath agus luachálaimid é ar thrí chorparáid a athraíonn teanga, seánra téacs, agus boinn tuisceana struchtúracha. Téann samhail (a) i ngleic leis an úrscothacht ar an gcorpas nuair a úsáidtear tacair sainghnéithe bunaithe agus (b) taispeánann sí feidhmíocht réasúnta fiú agus foirmeacha focal amháin á n-úsáid, rud a fhágann go bhfuil sé infheidhme maidir le neamhchaighdeánach (i.e., stairiúil ) corpora.', 'hu': 'Az idézetek felismerése (azaz beszéd, gondolat és írás) NLP elemzési feladatként alakult ki. A legkorszerűbb modelleket azonban specifikus corpora alapján fejlesztették ki, és magas fokú corpus-specifikus feltételezéseket és ismereteket helyettesítettek, ami töredezettséghez vezet. A feladat-agnosztikus modellezés szellemében egy korpusz-agnosztikus neurális modellt mutatunk be az idézetek detektálására és értékeljük azt három, nyelvben, szövegműfajban és strukturális feltételezésekben eltérő korpuszon. A modell (a) meghatározott tulajdonságkészletek használata esetén megközelíti a korpuszok korszerűségét, és (b) ésszerű teljesítményt mutat akkor is, ha kizárólag szóformákat használunk, ami alkalmazható a nem szabványos (azaz történelmi) korpuszokra.', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση εισαγωγών (δηλ. αναφερθείσα ομιλία, σκέψη και γραφή) έχει καθιερωθεί ως εργασία ανάλυσης. Ωστόσο, μοντέλα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας έχουν αναπτυχθεί με βάση συγκεκριμένα σώματα και ενσωματώνουν υψηλό βαθμό συγκεκριμένων υποθέσεων και γνώσεων που οδηγούν σε κατακερματισμό. Στο πνεύμα της εργασίας-αγνωστικής μοντελοποίησης, παρουσιάζουμε ένα σώμα-αγνωστικό νευρωνικό μοντέλο για ανίχνευση εισαγωγών και το αξιολογούμε σε τρία σώματα που διαφέρουν σε γλώσσα, είδος κειμένου και δομικές παραδοχές. Το μοντέλο (α) προσεγγίζει την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας στα σώματα όταν χρησιμοποιεί καθιερωμένα σύνολα χαρακτηριστικών και (β) εμφανίζει λογική απόδοση ακόμη και όταν χρησιμοποιούμε μόνο μορφές λέξεων, γεγονός που το καθιστά εφαρμόσιμο για μη τυποποιημένα (π.χ. ιστορικά) σώματα.', 'ka': 'კოტაციების განსახულება (მაგალითად, შეტყობინებული სიტყვა, ფიქრობა და წერილება) იქნება თავს NLP ანალიზის რაოდენობა. მაგრამ კოპეფიკური კოპორაციის ბაზაზე განვითარებული მოდელები, რომლებიც კოპპორაციას და კოპორაციას უფრო მეტი კოპპორაციული წარმოდგენების და მეცნიერების განმავლობაში, რომლებიც დავალება-ადნოსტიკური მოდელების ესოში, ჩვენ კოპუს-ადნოსტიკური ნეიროლური მოდელს კოტაციის განახლებისთვის და გავამუშაოთ სამი კოპორაზე, რომელიც ენერგიში, ტექსტური გენერით და ს მოდელი (a) კოპორაში მოთავსდება კომპორაში, როდესაც გამოყენებული ფუნქციების სხვების გამოყენება და (b) გამოყენებული ფუნქციების კომპორაციას აღმოჩნდება პარამეტური კომპორაციას, მაგრამ როდესაც ჩვენ ვა', 'lt': 'Citacijų nustatymas (t. y. pranešimas apie kalbą, mąstymą ir raštą) tapo NLP analizės užduotimi. Vis dėlto naujausi modeliai buvo sukurti remiantis konkrečiais korporais ir į juos neįtraukti didelio laipsnio korpusui specifinių prielaidų ir žinių, dėl kurių atsiranda susiskaidymas. Įgyvendinant užduočių-agnostinio modeliavimo dvasią, mes pristatome korpuso-agnostinio nervo model į, skirtą citacijos nustatymui, ir vertiname jį trimis korporais, kurie skiriasi kalba, teksto genre ir struktūrinėmis prielaidomis. Pavyzdys a) naudojant nustatytus požymių rinkinius art ėja prie korpros moderniausios pažangos, ir b) rodo pagrįstą veiksmingumą net ir tuo atveju, kai kalbame tik apie žodži ų formas, todėl jis taikomas nestandartiniams (t. y. istoriniams) korporams.', 'it': "Il rilevamento delle citazioni (cioè, parlato, pensiero e scrittura riportati) si è affermato come un compito di analisi NLP. Tuttavia, modelli all'avanguardia sono stati sviluppati sulla base di corpora specifici e incorpo- rano un alto grado di ipotesi e conoscenze specifiche del corpus, che porta alla frammentazione. Nello spirito della modellazione task-agnostic, presentiamo un modello neurale corpus-agnostic per la rilevazione delle citazioni e lo valutiamo su tre corpora che variano in linguaggio, genere di testo e ipotesi strutturali. Il modello (a) si avvicina allo stato dell'arte sui corpora quando si utilizzano set di funzionalità consolidati e (b) mostra prestazioni ragionevoli anche quando si utilizzano solo forme di parola, il che lo rende applicabile ai corpora non standard (cioè storici).", 'kk': 'Китацияларды табу (т.е. сөйлесу, ойлау және жазу) өзіне NLP анализ тапсырмасы ретінде орнатылды. Бірақ бұл күй- жай моделдері керек корпора негізінде жасалған және корпус арқылы білімдерінің жоғары деңгейіндегі көпшіліктері мен білімдерінің негізінде жасалған. Тапсырма-агностикалық модельдің рухында, квитацияларды анықтау үшін корпус-агностикалық невралдық модель көрсетіп, тілде, мәтін жанр және структуралық тапсырмаларды түрленген үш корпорада оқу үшін оқу үші Бұл үлгі (a) орнатылған мүмкіндіктерді қолданғанда корпорадағы құрылғының күйіне жақын келеді. b) біз тек сөз пішімдерін қолданғанда, бұл үлгі стандартты (мәселен, тарихлық) корпораға қолданылады.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan petikan (i.e., laporkan ucapan, fikiran, dan tulisan) telah menetapkan dirinya sebagai tugas analisis NLP. Bagaimanapun, model-state-of-the-art telah dikembangkan berdasarkan korpra spesifik dan incorpo- kadar tinggi asumsi-spesifik-corpus dan pengetahuan, yang membawa kepada fragmentasi. Dalam semangat pemodelan tugas-agnostik, kami memperkenalkan model saraf corpus-agnostic untuk pengesan petikan dan menilainya pada tiga korpra yang berbeza dalam bahasa, jenis teks, dan asumsi struktur. Model (a) mendekati state-of-the-art pada korpra apabila menggunakan set ciri-ciri yang ditetapkan dan (b) menunjukkan prestasi yang masuk akal walaupun kita- hanya bentuk perkataan, yang menjadikannya berlaku untuk korpra yang tidak piawai (iaitu sejarah).', 'mk': 'Детектирањето на цитатите (т.е. известувањето на говорот, размислувањето и пишувањето) се постави како задача за анализа на НЛП. Сепак, најсовремените модели се развиени врз основа на специфични корпора и инкорпорација на висок степен на претпоставувања и знаење специфични на корпора, што води до фрагментација. Во духот на агностичкото моделирање на задачите, претставуваме корпус-агностички нервен модел за детекција на цитатите и го проценуваме на три корпора кои се различни на јазик, текст генер и структурни претпоставки. The model (a) approaches the state-of-the-art on the corpora when using established feature sets and (b) shows reasonable performance even when us- ing solely word forms, which makes it applicable for non-standard (i.e., historical) corpora.', 'mn': 'НЛП-ын шинжилгээний ажил болсон. Гэхдээ урлагийн загвар нь тодорхой корпора болон корпорусын тодорхой ойлголт болон мэдлэгтэй өндөр түвшинд хөгжүүлсэн. Бид ажлын агностик загварын сэтгэл санаанд корпус-агностик мэдрэлийн сэтгэл загвар тайлбарлаж, хэл, текст жанр, бүтэц ойлголтыг өөрчлөгдөж буй 3 корпора дээр үнэлдэг. Загвар (a) Корпора дээрх урлагийн тогтолцоог ашиглаж байх үед холбогдолтой байдаг. b) нь бидний зөвхөн үг хэлбэрийг ашиглаж байх үед зөвхөн стандарт биш (т.е. түүх) корпора-д ашиглах боломжтой үйл ажиллагааг харуулдаг.', 'ml': 'വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചറിയപ്പെട്ട സംസാരം, ചിന്തിച്ചു, എഴുതിയിരിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ കണ്ടുപിടിയ്ക്കുന്നത് NLP വിശ്വാസ എന്നിട്ടും കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയുടെയും അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്റെ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച ജോലിയുടെ അഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക്ക് മാതൃകയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ്-അഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക്ക് നെയൂറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നതിന് വ്യത് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിശേഷസജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d (a) കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയിലെ സ്ഥിതിയിലേക്ക് അടുത്തുവരുന്നു. നാം മാത്രം വാക്കുകളുടെ രീതികള്\u200d പ്ര', 'mt': 'Is-sejba tal-kwotazzjonijiet (jiġifieri d-diskors, il-ħsieb u l-kitba rrappurtati) stabbilixxiet ruħha bħala kompitu ta’ analiżi tal-NLP. Madankollu, il-mudelli l-aktar avvanzati ġew żviluppati abbażi ta’ korpura speċifika u inkorporaw grad għoli ta’ suppożizzjonijiet u għarfien speċifiċi għall-korpus, li jwasslu għal frammentazzjoni. Fl-ispirtu tal-mudell tal-kompiti-agnostiċi, a ħna nippreżentaw mudell newrali corpus-agnostic għall-identifikazzjoni tal-kwotazzjoni u jivvalutawh fuq tliet korpuri li jvarjaw fil-lingwa, il-ġeneru tat-test, u s-suppożizzjonijiet strutturali. Il-mudell (a) joqrob lejn l-aktar avvanzat fuq il-korpra meta juża settijiet ta’ karatteristiċi stabbiliti u (b) juri prestazzjoni raġonevoli anki meta ninsabu biss formoli ta’ kliem, li jagħmluha applikabbli għal korpra mhux standard (jiġifieri, storika).', 'ro': 'Detectarea citatelor (adică vorbirea, gândirea și scrierea raportată) s-a stabilit ca o sarcină de analiză PNL. Cu toate acestea, modelele de ultimă oră au fost dezvoltate pe baza unor corpore specifice și incorpo- rata un grad ridicat de ipoteze și cunoștințe specifice corpului, ceea ce duce la fragmentare. În spiritul modelării agnostice a sarcinilor, prezentăm un model neural agnostic corpus pentru detectarea citatelor și îl evaluăm pe trei corpuri care variază în limbaj, gen de text și ipoteze structurale. Modelul (a) abordează stadiul-of-the-art al corporelor atunci când utilizează seturi de caracteristici stabilite și (b) prezintă performanțe rezonabile chiar și atunci când utilizăm numai forme de cuvânt, ceea ce îl face aplicabil pentru corporele non-standard (adică istorice).', 'no': 'Oppdaging av kvotasjonar (t.d. rapporterte tale, tenk og skriving) har oppretta seg som eit NLP-analysesoppgåve. Men kunstmodeller er utvikla på grunnlag av spesifikke korpora og inkomprimert med høg grad av korpusspesifikke assumpsjoner og kunnskap, som fører til fragmentasjon. I ården av oppgåve-agnostisk modellen presenterer vi ein korpusagnostisk neuralmodell for å oppdaga kvotasjon og evaluera det på tre korporar som varierer i språk, tekstgenre og strukturelle antar. Modellen (a) nærmer kunstået på korporen når du brukar oppretta funksjonssett og (b) viser rettferdige utvikling sjølv når oss brukar berre ordformar, som gjer det tilgjengeleg for ikkje-standard (t.d. historisk) korpora.', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada qasabka (tusaale ahaan hadal, fikir, iyo qorid) wuxuu isu dhigay wax u baaritaan NALP. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa la hormariyey samooyinka farshaxanta ah oo ku saleysan shirkad gaar ah iyo iskuulka korpus darajadooda aad u sarreeya malaha iyo aqoonta, taasoo sababta burburka. Ruuxa sameynta sameynta shaqada, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa model neurada ah oo ku qoran qoraalka quriska, waxaana qiimeynaynaa saddex shirkadood oo ku kala duwan luqada, qoraalka iyo malaabooyinka rasmiga ah. Tusaale (a) wuxuu u soo dhowaadaa xaalada farshaxanka shirkadda marka uu isticmaalayo qoraalka saxda ah iyo (b) wuxuu tusiyaa bandhigyada saxda ah xittaa markaynu sameynno noocyada kaliya oo kaliya, taasoo ka dhigta mid ku habboon shirkad aan istareexin (tusaale ahaan taariikhda).', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie cytatów (tj. raportowanej mowy, myśli i pisania) stało się zadaniem analizy NLP. Jednak najnowocześniejsze modele zostały opracowane na podstawie konkretnych korpusów i zawierają wysoki stopień założeń i wiedzy o charakterze korpusu, co prowadzi do fragmentacji. W duchu modelowania agnostycznego zadaniowego prezentujemy korpusowo-agnostyczny model neuronowy do wykrywania cytatów i oceniamy go na trzech korpusach różniących się językiem, gatunkiem tekstu i założeniami strukturalnymi. Model (a) zbliża się do najnowocześniejszego stanu techniki na korporach przy użyciu ustalonych zestawów cech i (b) wykazuje rozsądną wydajność nawet przy użyciu wyłącznie form słownych, co sprawia, że ma zastosowanie do niestandardowych (tj. historycznych) korpor.', 'ta': 'மேற்கோள்களின் கண்டுபிடிப்பு (அதாவது, அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட பேச்சு, நினைத்து, மற்றும் எழுதி) தன்னை NLP ஆராய்வு பணியாக அமைத எனினும், கலைப்பாட்டின் நிலைமை மாதிரி உருவாக்கப்பட்டது குறிப்பிட்ட நிறுவனத்தின் அடிப்படையில் மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட கருத்துக்கள் மற்றும்  பணியின் மாதிரி மாதிரியில், நாம் மூன்று நிறுவனத்திற்கு ஒரு கோர்பாஸ் குறுக்கோட்டு கண்டுபிடிக்க முறைமையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் மற்றும் அதை மூன்ற மாதிரி (a) நிறுவப்பட்ட குணங்கள் அமைப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தும்போது நிலைமையின் நிலைமையை நெருங்குகிறது மற்றும் (b) நாம் மட்டுமே வார்த்தை வடிவங்களை பயன்படுத்தும்போத', 'sv': 'Upptäckten av citat (dvs rapporterat tal, tanke och skrift) har etablerat sig som en NLP-analysuppgift. Men toppmoderna modeller har utvecklats utifrån specifika corpora och inkorporerat en hög grad av korpusspecifika antaganden och kunskap, vilket leder till fragmentering. I en anda av task-agnostic modellering presenterar vi en korpusagnostisk neural modell för citat detektering och utvärderar den på tre korpus som varierar i språk, textgenre och strukturella antaganden. Modellen (a) närmar sig den senaste tekniken på korpora när man använder etablerade funktionsuppsättningar och (b) visar rimlig prestanda även när vi enbart använder ordformer, vilket gör den tillämplig på icke-standard (dvs. historiska) korpora.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje kvotacija (tj. prijavljenog govora, razmišljanja i pisanja) se uspostavilo kao zadatak analize NLP-a. Međutim, modeli države umjetnosti su razvili na osnovu određenog korporacije i nepoštovanja visokog stupnja pretpostavki i znanja koje vode do fragmentacije. U duhu agnostičkog model a, predstavljamo korpus-agnostički neuralni model za otkrivanje kvotacija i procjenjivamo ga na tri korpora koja se razlikuju jezikom, tekstualnom genru i strukturnim pretpostavkama. Model (a) se približava stanju umjetnosti na korpori kada koristi ustanovljene setove i (b) pokazuje razumne funkcije čak i kada smo mi jedini oblici riječi, što ga čini primjenjivom za ne-standardnu (tj. istorijsku) korporu.', 'si': 'කොටේසියන් හොයාගන්න (ඉතින්, වාර්තා කතාව, හිතන්න, ලියන්න) තමයි NLP විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ වැඩක් විදිහ නමුත්, විශේෂ කොර්පෝරා වලින් විශේෂ කොර්පෝරා වලින් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශ වැඩක්-අග්නෝසික් මෝඩිල් එකේ ආත්මයෙන්, අපි කෝපුස්-අග්නෝසික් න්\u200dයූරාල් මෝඩිල් එකක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා කොපොරෝරා තුන මොඩේලය (a) කොර්පෝරා වලින් ස්ථාපිත විශේෂතාවක් භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේම අපි විශේෂ වචන විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වෙන', 'ur': '(یعنی زبان, فکرت اور لکھنے کی تعلیم) اپنے آپ کو NLP تحلیل کا کام بنا دیا گیا ہے۔ اگرچہ، حیات کی مدل مخصوص شرکت کی بنیاد پر پھیلائی گئی ہے اور غیر قابل تعداد کے مطابق جسم اور علم کی ایک بلند درجہ کا مطابق ہے، جو شکستگی کی طرف پہنچتی ہے۔ تابع-agnostic موڈلینگ کی روح میں ہم ایک کوروس-agnostic نئورل موڈل کے لئے پیش کرتے ہیں اور اس کو تین کوروں پر ارزش کرتے ہیں جو زبان, ٹیکسٹ جنر اور ساختہ فرض میں متفاوت ہیں. موڈل (a) قالب کے قالب کی حالت کے پاس پہنچ جاتا ہے جب قالب فرصت کے ساتھ استعمال کرتا ہے اور (b) منطقی فعالیت کو دکھاتا ہے اگرچہ ہم صرف لفظ فرموں کے ساتھ دکھاتے ہیں جو اسے غیر استاندارڈ (یعنی تاریخی) قالب فعالیت کے لئے لازم کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Shaxsiyatlarni aniqlash (m. g'oyalar, hisobot, yozish va yozish) yani NLP analyzer vazifasi sifatida ishlatilgan. Lekin, bu holatning holati taʼminlovchi modellari xususiyatli kompaniya asosida yaratildi va uning yuqori darajada yuqori darajaga ega bo'ladi. Bu ko'paytirishga ega bo'ladi. Vazifaning agnostik modeli roʻyxatida, biz quyidagi nuural modelini ko'rsatumiz va bu tilda, matn genre va structural g'oyalarni o'zgartiradigan uchta kompaniyada qiymatmiz. Name", 'vi': 'Việc phát hiện các trích dẫn (tức là, bài phát biểu, suy nghĩ, và ghi chép) đã tự khẳng định mình là một nhiệm vụ phân tích Njala. Tuy nhiên, các mô hình hiện đại được phát triển dựa trên cơ thể đặc biệt và nhập thể một mức độ cao của khả năng lĩnh vực tập thể đặc biệt và kiến thức dẫn đến sự phân tán. Trong tinh thần tạo mẫu bồ nghĩa, chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình thần kinh Corpus-agnostic để tìm ra trích và đánh giá nó trên ba cơ thể khác nhau về ngôn ngữ, thể loại văn và cấu trúc. Mô hình (a) tiến gần với trạng thái nghệ thuật trên cơ thể khi sử dụng các b ộ đặc trưng đã xác định và (b) cho thấy khả năng hợp lý kể cả khi chúng ta chỉ sử dụng các dạng từ, đi ều đó làm cho nó có thể ứng dụng cho bất kỳ chuẩn (tức là lịch sử).', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje kvotacija (tj. prijavljenog govora, razmišljanja i pisanja) se utvrdilo kao zadatak analize NLP-a. Međutim, modeli države umjetnosti su razvili na temelju određenog korporacije i uključujući visoke stepenice pretpostavki i znanja koje vode do fragmentacije. U duhu agnostičkog model a zadataka predstavljamo korpus-agnostički neuralni model za otkrivanje kvotacija i procjenjivamo ga na tri tijela koja se razlikuju jezikom, tekstualnom genru i strukturnim pretpostavkama. Model (a) se približava stanju umjetnosti tijela kada koristi uspostavljene komplete i (b) pokazuje razumne funkcije čak i kada smo se pojavljujući jedino formulare riječi, što ga čini primjenjivom za neustandardnu (tj. istorijsku) tijelu.', 'nl': "Het opsporen van citaten (d.w.z. gerapporteerde spraak, gedachte en schrijven) heeft zich gevestigd als een NLP-analysetaak. Echter, state-of-the-art modellen zijn ontwikkeld op basis van specifieke corpora en bevatten een hoge mate van corpusspecifieke veronderstellingen en kennis, wat leidt tot fragmentatie. In de geest van taakagnostische modellering presenteren we een corpusagnostisch neuraal model voor citaatdetectie en evalueren het op drie corpora's die variëren in taal, tekstgenre en structurele aannames. Het model (a) benadert de state-of-the-art op de corpora bij gebruik van gevestigde feature sets en (b) toont redelijke prestaties, zelfs wanneer we alleen woordvormen gebruiken, waardoor het toepasbaar is voor niet-standaard (d.w.z. historische) corpora's.", 'bg': 'Откриването на цитати (т.е. докладвана реч, мисъл и писане) се утвърди като задача за анализ на НЛП. Най-съвременните модели обаче са разработени въз основа на специфични корпуси и включват висока степен на специфични предположения и знания, което води до фрагментация. В духа на задача-агностичното моделиране представяме корпус-агностичен неврален модел за откриване на цитати и го оценяваме върху три корпуса, които варират по език, текстов жанр и структурни предположения. Моделът (а) се доближава до най-съвременните корпуси при използване на установени набор от функции и (б) показва разумна производителност дори когато използваме само думи, което го прави приложим за нестандартни (т.е. исторически) корпуси.', 'da': 'Detektionen af citater (dvs. rapporteret tale, tanke og skrivning) har etableret sig som en NLP analyseopgave. Men state-of-the-art modeller er blevet udviklet på grundlag af specifikke corpora- er og inkorporerer en høj grad af korpusspecifikke antagelser og viden, hvilket fører til fragmentering. I ånden af opgaveagnostisk modellering præsenterer vi en korpusagnostisk neural model til detektion af citater og evaluerer den på tre korpuser, der varierer i sprog, tekstgenre og strukturelle antagelser. Modellen (a) nærmer sig den nyeste teknologi på korpora, når der anvendes etablerede funktionssæt, og (b) viser rimelig ydeevne, selv når vi udelukkende anvender ordformer, hvilket gør den gældende for ikke-standard (dvs. historiske) korpora.', 'de': 'Die Erkennung von Zitaten (d.h. gemeldete Sprache, Denken und Schreiben) hat sich als NLP-Analyseaufgabe etabliert. Auf Basis spezifischer Korpora wurden jedoch modernste Modelle entwickelt, die ein hohes Maß an korpusspezifischen Annahmen und Wissen enthalten, was zu Fragmentierung führt. Im Sinne der task-agnostischen Modellierung präsentieren wir ein korpusagnostisches neuronales Modell zur Zitatserkennung und bewerten es auf drei Korporen, die sich in Sprache, Textgenre und strukturellen Annahmen unterscheiden. Das Modell (a) nähert sich dem Stand der Technik auf den Korpora bei Verwendung etablierter Feature-Sets und (b) zeigt auch bei reinen Wortformen eine vernünftige Leistung, was es für nicht standardisierte (d.h. historische) Korpora anwendbar macht.', 'ko': '어록 탐지(즉 보고서의 음성, 사고와 쓰기)는 NLP 분석 임무로 확립되었다.그러나 가장 선진적인 모델은 특정한 어료 라이브러리를 바탕으로 개발된 것이고 고도로 특정한 어료 라이브러리에 대한 가설과 지식을 포함시켜 파편화를 초래했다.임무 불가지 모델링의 정신에 따라 우리는 어록 검측에 사용되는 어료 라이브러리 불가지 신경 모델을 제시했고 언어, 텍스트 유형과 구조 가설이 다른 세 개의 어료 라이브러리에서 이를 평가했다.이 모델(a)은 이미 만들어진 특징집을 사용할 때 자료 라이브러리의 최신 수준에 가깝다. (b)는 단어 형식만 사용해도 합리적인 성능을 나타내기 때문에 비표준(즉 역사) 자료 라이브러리에 적용된다.', 'id': 'Deteksi kotasi (i.e., melaporkan pidato, pikiran, dan menulis) telah menetapkan dirinya sebagai tugas analisis NLP. Namun, model terbaik telah dikembangkan berdasarkan corpora spesifik dan incorpo- tingkat tinggi asumsi spesifik corpus dan pengetahuan, yang menyebabkan fragmentasi. In the spirit of task-agnostic modeling, we present a corpus-agnostic neural model for quotation detection and evaluate it on three corpora that vary in language, text genre, and structural assumptions.  Model (a) mendekati state-of-the-art pada korpra ketika menggunakan set karakteristik tertentu dan (b) menunjukkan prestasi yang masuk akal bahkan ketika kita- ing hanya bentuk kata, yang membuatnya berlaku untuk non-standard (i.e., sejarah) korpra.', 'sw': 'Kugundua nukuu (yaani, hotuba, mawazo, na kuandika) imejiweka kama kazi ya uchambuzi wa NLP. Hata hivyo, mifano ya sanaa imeundwa kwa msingi wa makampuni maalum na kwa kiwango kikubwa cha dhana na maarifa maalum ya makampuni, ambayo yanapelekea kuvunjika. Katika roho ya muundo wa juhudi, tunaweka modeli ya neura ya makampuni yanayohusu ubunifu na kutathmini kwenye makampuni matatu yanayotofautiana na lugha, jeni ya maandishi na dhana za ujenzi. Mfano (a) unakaribia hali ya sanaa kwenye kampuni wakati kutumia vipengele vilivyowekwa na (b) inaonyesha ufanisi wa sahihi hata kama tunavyotumia mitindo ya maneno pekee, ambayo inafanya kazi kwa kampuni isiyo ya kawaida (yaani historia).', 'fa': 'شناسایی نوشته\u200cها (به عنوان گفتار، فکر و نوشتن گزارش داده شده) خودش را به عنوان یک کار تحلیل NLP ثابت کرده است. با این حال، مدل\u200cهای ایالت هنری بر اساس شرکت خاص توسعه یافته شده\u200cاند و درجه بالا از فرضیه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای و دانش\u200cهای شرکت، که به شکستگی راهنمایی می\u200cکند. در روح مدل\u200cسازی کار-agnostic، یک مدل عصبی کورپوس-agnostic برای شناسایی ذهن\u200cسازی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و آن را در سه شرکت ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم که در زبان، ژن متن و فرض\u200cسازی تغییر می\u200cدهند. مدل (a) با استفاده از مجموعه\u200cهای معمولی و (b) اجرای منطقی حتی هنگامی که ما تنها فرم\u200cهای کلمه\u200cای را انجام می\u200cدهیم، که آن را برای شرکت غیراستاندارد (یعنی تاریخی) کاربرد می\u200cکند.', 'am': 'አዲስ ንግግር፣ አሳብ እና ጽሑፍ (የNLP ማስታወሻ ስራ) ራሱን እንደ አዲስ አድራሻ አድርጎአል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የ-የ-የ-አካል ምሳሌዎች በተለየ ኮርፖርት እና በክፍለ ክፍል የቆርፓስ ስሕተት እና እውቀት የረጅም ክፍል እና እውቀት ይነካል፡፡ በሥርዓት አጎናስቲ ሞዴል በመንፈስ፣ የቆርፓስ-አጎኖስቲ ነዌር ሞዴል ለመግለጥ እና በቋንቋ፣ የጽሑፍ የሥርዓት እና የመሠረተ አካባቢ በተለየ በሦስት ኮፖርት ላይ እናረጋግጣለን፡፡ The model (a) approaches the state-of-the-art on the corpora when using established feature sets and (b) shows reasonable performance even when us- ing solely word forms, which makes it applicable for non-standard (i.e., historical) corpora.', 'tr': "Ködlemeler tapylýan (diýmek bolsa sözleri, düşünseler we ýazma) özüni NLP analyzasy täblisasy hökmünde guruldy. Bu şekilde, sanat modelleri belli korpora ve bilim üzerinde geliştirildi. Bu şekilde parçalanma yolu gösterir. Görev-agnostik modelleriniň ruhda biz küşt tanyşmak üçin korpus-agnostik nural modelini görkeýäris we muny dilde, metin jenere we strukturlaryň çarpyşynda deňleýäris. Model (a) corpora'daki sungatyň durumyna golaýlaýar", 'af': "Die opdekking van sitasies (bv. verspreiding woord, gedink en skryfing) het self as 'n NLP analisie taak gestel. Maar die state-of-the-art-modelles is ontwikkel op die basis van spesifieke korpora en inkorporeer, 'n hoë grad van korpusspesifieke aanvaardes en kennis, wat lei na fragmentasie. In die gees van taak-agnostiese modellering, voorsien ons 'n korpus-agnostiese neural model vir quotasie-opdekking en evalueer dit op drie korpore wat in taal, teks genre en strukturele voorstellings verander. Die model (a) naby die staat-van-die-kuns op die korpora wanneer gebruik word geïnstalleerde funksie stel en (b) vertoon redelike prestasie selfs wanneer ons - eintlik woord vorms, wat dit toewenbaar maak vir nie-standaard (i.e. historie) korpora.", 'az': 'NLP analizi i şləri kimi təyin edilmişdir. Lakin, sanat modelləri özlərinə bənzər korpora tərəfindən təhsil edilmişdir və buna görə də korpus təsəvvürlüyü və elmi yüksək dərəcə yüksək dərəcə təşkil edilmişdir. Görev-agnostik modellərin ruhu içində, biz bir korpus-agnostik nöral modelini kütatlı tanıtmaq üçün göstəririk və onu dil, mətn genri və strukturlu təsəllərdə dəyişiklik edən üç korpora değerləşdiririk. Model (a) mövcud mövcud şəkilləri istifadə edərkən korporasının şəkilində yaxınlaşır və (b) bizim tək-tək söz formlarımızı istifadə edərkən münasibətli performansı göstərər, bu da standart olmayan (məsələn, tarixi) korporasına uyğunlaşdırır.', 'bn': 'উদ্ধৃতি সনাক্ত (যেমন রিপোর্ট ভাষণ, চিন্তা এবং লেখা) নিজেকে এনএলপি বিশ্লেষণ কাজ হিসেবে প্রতিষ্ঠিত করেছে। তবে কোর্পোরা নির্দিষ্ট কোর্পোরার ভিত্তিতে রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের মডেল উন্নয়ন করা হয়েছে এবং বিশেষ করে কোর্পাস-নির্দিষ্ট ধারণা এবং জ্ঞানের বিভ কাজ-অ্যানোস্টিক মডেলের আত্মায়, আমরা উদ্ধৃতি সনাক্ত করার জন্য একটি কোর্পাস-অ্যাঙ্নোস্টিক নিউরেল মডেল উপস্থাপন করি এবং তিন কোর্পোরায় এটি মূল্যায়ন করি  এই মডেল (a) কোর্পোরায় প্রতিষ্ঠিত বৈশিষ্ট্য সেট ব্যবহার করার সময় কোর্পোরায় শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের কাছে পৌঁছে যায়। এমনকি যদিও আমরা শুধুমাত্র শব্দের ফর্ম ব্যবহার করি, যা', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje kvotacija (tj. prijavljenog govora, razmišljanja i pisanja) se utvrdilo kao zadatak analize NLP-a. Međutim, modeli države umjetnosti su razvili na temelju određenog korporacije i neposredno-stopiranih visokog stupnja pretpostavki i znanja koje vode do fragmentacije. U duhu agnostičkog model a, predstavljamo korpus-agnostički neuralni model za otkrivanje kvotacija i procjenjivamo ga na tri korpora koja se razlikuju jezikom, tekstualnom genru i strukturnim pretpostavkama. Model (a) se približava stanju umjetnosti tijela kada koristi uspostavljene komplekse i (b) pokazuje razumne funkcije čak i kada smo se pojavljujući samo formulari riječi, što ga čini primjenjivom za neformalnu (tj. istorijsku) korporu.', 'sq': 'Zbulimi i citimeve (pra, fjalimi i raportuar, mendimi dhe shkrimi) ka vendosur veten si një detyrë analitike NLP. Megjithatë, modelet më të mëdha janë zhvilluar në bazë të korprave të posaçme dhe incorporojnë një shkallë të lartë supozimesh dhe njohurish specifike të korpusit, që çon në fragmentim. Në shpirtin e modelimit të detyrave-agnostike, ne paraqesim një model nervor corpus-agnostic për zbulimin e citimit dhe e vlerësojmë atë në tre korpra që ndryshojnë në gjuhë, xhener teksti dhe supozime strukturore. Modeli (a) afrohet me gjendjen më të avancuar të korprës kur përdor grupe të përcaktuara funksionesh dhe (b) tregon performancë të arsyeshme edhe kur ne i japim vetëm format e fjalës, gjë që e b ën të aplikueshme për korprën jo-standarte (pra, historike).', 'hy': 'Գործողությունների հայտնաբերումը (այսինքն, հայտարարված խոսակցությունը, մտածումը և գրությունը) ինքն իրեն հաստատել է որպես ՆԼՊ-ի վերլուծության խնդիր: Այնուամենայնիվ, ամենաբարձր մոդելները զարգացել են կոնկրետ կառուցվածքի հիմքում և անհամապատասխանում են մարմնի կոնկրետ ենթադրությունների և գիտելիքների բարձր աստիճան, ինչը հանգեցնում է բաժանման: Գործի-ագնոստիկ մոդելավորման ոգում մենք ներկայացնում ենք կորպուս-ագնոստիկ նյարդային մոդել մեջբերման հայտնաբերման համար և գնահատում ենք այն երեք կորպորների վրա, որոնք տարբերվում են լեզվի, տեքստի գենդերում և կառուցվածքային ենթադրություններում: Մոդելը (a) մոտենում է կառուցվածքի բարձրագույնին, երբ օգտագործում է հաստատուն հատկանիշների համակարգեր, և (b) ցույց է տալիս բացատրական արտադրողականությունը նույնիսկ երբ մենք միայն բառերի ձևեր ենք տալիս, ինչը դարձնում է այն կիրառելի ոչ ստանդարտ (այսինքն՝ պատմական) կառու', 'fi': 'Lainausten (eli raportoidun puheen, ajatuksen ja kirjoittamisen) havaitseminen on vakiinnuttanut itsensä NLP:n analyysitehtäväksi. Nykyaikaiset mallit on kuitenkin kehitetty tiettyjen korpusten pohjalta, ja niihin sisältyy suuri määrä korpuskohtaisia oletuksia ja tietoa, mikä johtaa pirstoutumiseen. Tehtäväagnostisen mallinnuksen hengessä esittelemme korpusagnostisen neuromallin lainausten havaitsemiseen ja arvioimme sitä kolmella korpusella, jotka vaihtelevat kielen, tekstigenren ja rakenteellisten oletusten mukaan. Malli (a) lähestyy korpusten viimeisintä kehitystä vakiintuneiden ominaisuusjoukkojen avulla ja (b) osoittaa kohtuullisen suorituskyvyn myös silloin, kun käytämme vain sanamuotoja, mikä tekee siitä käyttökelpoisen epästandardien (eli historiallisten) korpusten osalta.', 'cs': 'Detekce citací (tj. hlášené řeči, myšlení a psaní) se stala úkolem analýzy NLP. Na základě specifických korpusů byly však vyvinuty nejmodernější modely, které obsahují vysoký stupeň korpusově specifických předpokladů a znalostí, což vede k fragmentaci. V duchu úlohově agnostického modelování prezentujeme korpusově agnostický neuronový model pro detekci citací a hodnotíme ho na třech korpusech, které se liší jazykem, textovým žánrem a strukturálními předpoklady. Model (a) se přibližuje k modernímu stavu korpusů při použití zavedených sad funkcí a (b) vykazuje rozumný výkon i při používání výhradně slovních forem, což je použitelné pro nestandardní (tj. historické) korpusy.', 'et': 'Tsitaatide (s.t arutatud kõne, mõtte ja kirjutamise) avastamine on end kindlaks määranud NLP analüüsi ülesandeks. Siiski on tipptasemel mudelid välja töötatud konkreetsete korpuste põhjal ning need sisaldavad suurt määra korpusspetsiifilisi eeldusi ja teadmisi, mis viib killustumiseni. Ülesandeagnostilise modelleerimise vaimus esitame korpusagnostilise närvimudeli tsitaatide tuvastamiseks ja hindame seda kolmel korpusel, mis erinevad keele, tekstižanri ja struktuuriliste eelduste poolest. Mudel (a) läheneb kehtestatud funktsioonikomplektide kasutamisel korpustele kaasaegsele tasemele ja (b) näitab mõistlikku jõudlust isegi siis, kui kasutame ainult sõnavorme, mis muudab selle kohaldatavaks mittestandardsete (st ajalooliste) korpuste puhul.', 'ca': "The detection of quotations (i.e., reported speech, thought, and writing) has established itself as an NLP analysis task.  However, state-of-the-art models have been developed on the basis of specific corpora and incorpo- rate a high degree of corpus-specific assumptions and knowledge, which leads to fragmentation.  In the spirit of task-agnostic modeling, we present a corpus-agnostic neural model for quotation detection and evaluate it on three corpora that vary in language, text genre, and structural assumptions.  El model a) s'apropa a l'estat d'avançat del corpora quan utilitza conjunts de característiques establerts i b) mostra un rendiment raonable fins i tot quan nosaltres només fem formes de paraules, el que ho fa aplicable a corpora no estàndard (i.e., històrica).", 'ha': "Ana gane quoten (misali, magana, mawadãci, kuma rubũtu) ya samar da shi kamar wani aikin Analyki na NLP. Amma, an buɗe halin-sanar, a kan bayan firma masu ƙayyadadde, da kuma an shigar da shi da darajõji mai girma na zato-zato da ilmi, wannan yana ƙara ga tsurare. In a cikin maɓallin aikin-agnostic, muna halatar da wata misãlin neural na korbas-agnostic wa gandinci na canza shi a kan makampuni uku wanda ke rarraba cikin harshen, genre na littãfi da zaluman mala'a. Moden (a) ya kusantar da halin-sanar kan korana idan ana yi amfani da tsarin tsarin da aka ƙayyade shi kuma (b) ya nuna aikin mai inganci, kõ dã ba mu yi amfani da tsarin maganar da kawai, yana da amfani da shi ga makampuni wanda ba'a daidaita (misali, historin) ba.", 'sk': 'Odkrivanje citatov (poročanega govora, misli in pisanja) se je uveljavilo kot naloga analize NLP. Vendar pa so bili najsodobnejši modeli razviti na podlagi posebnih korpusov in vključeni visoko stopnjo posebnih predpostavk in znanja, kar vodi v razdrobljenost. V duhu nalogo-agnostičnega modeliranja predstavljamo korpusno-agnostični nevronski model za detekcijo citatov in ga ocenimo na treh korpusih, ki se razlikujejo po jeziku, besedilnem žanru in strukturnih predpostavkah. Model (a) se približuje najsodobnejšemu korpusu pri uporabi uveljavljenih naborov funkcij in (b) kaže razumno učinkovitost tudi pri uporabi izključno besednih oblik, zaradi česar se uporablja za nestandardne (tj. zgodovinske) korpuse.', 'jv': 'Tatanan ingkang dadi (ya, seneng pisan, lan pisan) iki dadi seneng sebera basa NLP dadi. Nanging, model sing wis dianggap ilegal gawe nguasai perusahaan karo ngono-perusahaan langgar kelas telu kuwi dianggap banjure nggawe gerapakan karo perusahaan karo hal-aké sing ngerasai, sing wis nambah kang diolah. Nanging kaluwargane ning task-ageostik modelu, kita jewelasakno sistem podho nggawe gerakan kelas coro-ageostik kanggo Ketokanan anan karo perusahaan nambah dhéwé Model (a) kang diandeksi perusahaan-perusahaan kanggo ngilangno sampeyan (b) iso dianteksi perusahaan hukum sing dibenalke nggo awak dhéwé- iso dianteksi perusahaan langgar-awak dhéwé, sing wis dianggap kanggo nek awak dhéwé (awak dhéwé).', 'bo': 'ལྟ་བུའི་གནས་ཚུལ་རྟོགས་བཤེར་བྱེད་སྣང་། དཔེར་ན། སྒྲ་ཚིག་ བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་བྲིས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་གཏོང་ཞིབ་ཡིན་པས། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྲིད་འཛིན་གྱི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གཙོ་བོ་གཙོ་རིམ་པ་ཁག་ཅིག་གི་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བ་དང་། task-agnostic མ་དབུགས་གྱི་རྣམ་པའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོགས་རྣམས་མཐུན་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བཤད་དང་། སྐད་ཡིག་རིགས། མི་དབུགས་དང་དབུགས་རྩོམ་པ་ལ་འདྲ་བའི་ཚོགས་ཁ The model (a) approaches the state-of-the-art on the corpora when us ing established feature sets and (b) shows reasonable performance even when us- ing solely word forms, which makes it applicable for non-standard (i.e. historical) corpora.', 'he': 'The detection of quotations (i.e., reported speech, thought, and writing) has established itself as an NLP analysis task.  בכל אופן, דוגמניות חדשות התפתחו על בסיס גופורה ספציפית ולא מתאימות רמה גבוהה של הניחושות וידע ספציפיים לקורפוס, מה שמוביל לחיתוך. ברוח של מודל משימה-אגנוסטי, אנחנו מציגים מודל עצבי קופוס-אגנוסטי לזהות ציטוט ולעריך אותו על שלושה גופרות שמשונות בשפה, גנר טקסט, וההנחות המבנית. המודל (a) מתקרב למצב המאומנות על הקופורה כשמשתמש במערכות תכונות קבועות ו (b) מראה ביצועים הגיוניים אפילו כשאנו נותנים רק צורות מילים, מה שעושה את זה אפשרי עבור הקופורה לא סטנדרטית (כלומר, היסטורית).'}
{'en': 'Validation of Facts Against Textual Sources', 'ar': 'التحقق من صحة الحقائق مقابل المصادر النصية', 'pt': 'Validação de Fatos Contra Fontes Textuais', 'es': 'Validación de hechos contra fuentes textuales', 'fr': 'Validation des faits par rapport à des sources', 'ja': 'テキストソースに対する事実の検証', 'zh': '据本原验之', 'hi': 'पाठ्य स्रोतों के विरुद्ध तथ्यों का सत्यापन', 'ru': 'Подтверждение фактов в отношении текстовых источников', 'ga': 'Bailíochtú Fíricí i gCoinne Foinsí Téacsúla', 'ka': 'ტექსტუალური გამოსახულების ფაქტების შეცდომა', 'el': 'Επικύρωση των γεγονότων έναντι των κειμένων', 'hu': 'A tények szöveges forrásokkal szembeni érvényesítése', 'it': 'Convalida dei fatti contro le fonti testuali', 'mk': 'Валидирање на фактите против текстуалните извори', 'kk': 'Мәтін көзіне қарсы тексеру', 'lt': 'Faktų prieš tekstinius šaltinius patvirtinimas', 'ml': 'പദാവലിയുടെ ഉറവിടങ്ങള്\u200dക്കെതിരായുള്ള ഫാക്റ്റുകളുടെ പരിശോധിക്കുക', 'mn': 'Текст эх үүсвэрийн эсрэг үнэний шинжилгээ', 'ms': 'Pengesahan Fakta terhadap Sumber Teks', 'mt': 'Validazzjoni tal-Fatti Kontra Sorsi Tekstiċi', 'no': 'Validation of facts against textual sources', 'pl': 'Walidacja faktów wobec źródeł tekstowych', 'ro': 'Validarea faptelor împotriva surselor textuale', 'si': 'වාක්ෂික ප්\u200dරදේශ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විදියට ඇත්ත විශ්වාස කරන්න', 'so': 'Validation of Facts Against Textual Sources', 'sv': 'Validering av fakta mot textkällor', 'sr': 'Provjeravanje činjenica protiv tekstualnih izvora', 'ta': 'உரை மூலங்களுக்கு எதிரான காரணிகளை சரிபார்', 'ur': 'Textual Sources کے مقابلے میں حقیقت کی تصدیق کرنا', 'uz': 'Validation of Facts Against Textual Sources', 'vi': 'Hợp lệ các phái chống lại các nguồn văn bản', 'bg': 'Потвърждаване на факти срещу текстови източници', 'nl': 'Validatie van feiten tegen tekstbronnen', 'da': 'Bekræftelse af faktiske omstændigheder mod tekstkilder', 'hr': 'Provjeravanje činjenica protiv tekstualnih izvora', 'de': 'Validierung von Fakten gegenüber Textquellen', 'id': 'Pengesahan fakta terhadap Sumber Teks', 'ko': '텍스트 원본에 근거하여 사실을 검증하다', 'fa': 'تحقیق حقیقت علیه منبع متن', 'sw': 'Uthibitisho wa Taarifa dhidi ya vyanzo vya Kiteknolojia', 'tr': 'Metin Çeşmeleri garşy Faýllaryň Nyşanlary', 'af': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Validimi i fakteve kundër burimeve tekstuale', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Տեքստոլային աղբյուրների դեմ փաստերի ստուգելը', 'bn': 'টেক্সটেক্সটেল উৎসের বিরুদ্ধে ফ্যাক্টের পরীক্ষা', 'az': 'M…ôtn Kaynaklarƒ±na qar≈üƒ± Faylƒ±larƒ±n Qeydem…ôsi', 'bs': 'Provjera činjenica protiv tekstualnih izvora', 'et': 'Faktide kinnitamine tekstiallikate vastu', 'cs': 'Validace faktů proti textovým zdrojům', 'ca': 'Validació de fets contra fonts textuals', 'fi': 'Faktojen validointi tekstilähteistä', 'jv': 'Validity', 'sk': 'Potrditev dejstev glede na besedilne vire', 'he': 'Validation of Facts Against Textual Sources', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་ཡི་གེའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ལ་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་གཅིག་མཚུངས་པ'}
{'en': 'In today’s digital world of information, a fact verification system to disprove assertions made in speech, print media or online content is the need of the hour. We propose a system which would verify a claim against a source and classify the claim to be true, false, out-of-context or an inappropriate claim with respect to the textual source provided to the system. A true label is used if the claim is true, false if it is false, if the claim has no relation with the source then it is classified as out-of-context and if the claim can not be verified at all then it is classified as inappropriate. This would help us to verify a claim or a fact as well as know about the source or our knowledge base against which we are trying to verify our facts. We used a two-step approach to achieve our goal. At first, we retrieved evidence related to the claims from the textual source using the Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency(TF-IDF) vectors. Later we classified the claim-evidence pairs as true, false, inappropriate and out of context using a modified version of textual entailment module. Textual entailment module calculates the probability of each sentence supporting the claim, contradicting the claim or not providing any relevant information using Bi-LSTM network to assess the veracity of the claim. The accuracy of the best performing system is 64.49 %', 'es': 'En el mundo digital de la información actual, la necesidad del momento es un sistema de verificación de hechos para refutar las afirmaciones hechas en el habla, los medios impresos o el contenido en línea. Proponemos un sistema que verificaría un reclamo contra una fuente y clasificaría el reclamo como verdadero, falso, fuera de contexto o inapropiado con respecto a la fuente textual proporcionada al sistema. Se utiliza una etiqueta true si la afirmación es verdadera, false si es falsa, si la afirmación no tiene relación con la fuente, se clasifica como fuera de contexto y si la afirmación no se puede verificar en absoluto, se clasifica como inapropiada. Esto nos ayudaría a verificar una afirmación o un hecho, así como a conocer la fuente o nuestra base de conocimientos con la que tratamos de verificar nuestros hechos. Utilizamos un enfoque de dos pasos para lograr nuestro objetivo. Al principio, recuperamos evidencia relacionada con las afirmaciones de la fuente textual utilizando los vectores de Frecuencia de Documento Inverso de Frecuencia de Términos (TF-IDF). Más adelante clasificamos los pares de reclamo y evidencia como verdadero, falso, inapropiado y fuera de contexto utilizando una versión modificada del módulo de implicación textual. El módulo de implicación textual calcula la probabilidad de que cada frase respalde la afirmación, contradiga la afirmación o no proporcione ninguna información relevante utilizando la red Bi-LSTM para evaluar la veracidad de la afirmación. La precisión del sistema con mejor rendimiento es del 64,49%', 'fr': "Dans le monde numérique de l'information d'aujourd'hui, un système de vérification des faits pour réfuter les affirmations faites dans le discours, la presse écrite ou le contenu en ligne est le besoin actuel. Nous proposons un système qui vérifierait une affirmation par rapport à une source et classerait l'affirmation comme étant vraie, fausse, hors contexte ou inappropriée par rapport à la source textuelle fournie au système. Une étiquette vraie est utilisée si la revendication est vraie, faux si elle est fausse, si la revendication n'a aucun lien avec la source, elle est classée comme hors contexte et si la revendication ne peut pas être vérifiée du tout, elle est classée comme inappropriée. Cela nous aiderait à vérifier une affirmation ou un fait et à connaître la source ou notre base de connaissances par rapport à laquelle nous essayons de vérifier nos faits. Nous avons utilisé une approche en deux étapes pour atteindre notre objectif. Au début, nous avons récupéré des preuves liées aux revendications de la source textuelle à l'aide des vecteurs TF-IDF (Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency). Plus tard, nous avons classé les paires réclamation-preuve comme étant vraies, fausses, inappropriées et hors contexte à l'aide d'une version modifiée du module d'implication textuelle. Le module d'implication textuelle calcule la probabilité que chaque phrase appuie la revendication, contredit la revendication ou ne fournisse aucune information pertinente à l'aide du réseau Bi-LSTM pour évaluer la véracité de la revendication. La précision du système le plus performant est de 64,49\xa0%", 'ar': 'في عالم المعلومات الرقمي اليوم ، يعد نظام التحقق من الحقائق لدحض التأكيدات الواردة في الكلام أو الوسائط المطبوعة أو المحتوى عبر الإنترنت أمرًا ضروريًا للساعة. نقترح نظامًا يتحقق من صحة ادعاء ضد مصدر ويصنف المطالبة على أنها صحيحة أو خاطئة أو خارج السياق أو مطالبة غير مناسبة فيما يتعلق بالمصدر النصي المقدم للنظام. يتم استخدام التسمية الحقيقية إذا كانت المطالبة صحيحة ، أو كاذبة إذا كانت خاطئة ، وإذا لم يكن للمطالبة علاقة بالمصدر ، فسيتم تصنيفها على أنها خارج السياق وإذا تعذر التحقق من المطالبة على الإطلاق ، يتم تصنيفها على أنها غير مناسب. سيساعدنا هذا في التحقق من ادعاء أو حقيقة بالإضافة إلى معرفة المصدر أو قاعدة المعرفة التي نحاول على أساسها التحقق من حقائقنا. استخدمنا نهجًا من خطوتين لتحقيق هدفنا. في البداية ، قمنا باسترداد الأدلة المتعلقة بالمطالبات من المصدر النصي باستخدام متجهات مصطلح التردد العكسي للوثائق (TF-IDF). في وقت لاحق قمنا بتصنيف أزواج المطالبة والأدلة على أنها صحيحة وخاطئة وغير مناسبة وخارج السياق باستخدام نسخة معدلة من وحدة الاستدلال النصية. تحسب وحدة الاستدلال النصية احتمالية كل جملة تدعم الادعاء أو تتعارض مع الادعاء أو لا تقدم أي معلومات ذات صلة باستخدام شبكة Bi-LSTM لتقييم صحة المطالبة. دقة النظام الأفضل أداء 64.49٪', 'pt': 'No mundo digital da informação de hoje, um sistema de verificação de fatos para refutar afirmações feitas em discurso, mídia impressa ou conteúdo online é a necessidade do momento. Propomos um sistema que verificaria uma afirmação contra uma fonte e classificaria a afirmação como verdadeira, falsa, fora de contexto ou inadequada em relação à fonte textual fornecida ao sistema. Um rótulo verdadeiro é usado se a afirmação for verdadeira, falsa se for falsa, se a afirmação não tiver relação com a fonte, será classificada como fora de contexto e, se a afirmação não puder ser verificada, será classificada como inapropriado. Isso nos ajudaria a verificar uma afirmação ou um fato, bem como saber sobre a fonte ou nossa base de conhecimento contra a qual estamos tentando verificar nossos fatos. Usamos uma abordagem de duas etapas para atingir nosso objetivo. Em um primeiro momento, recuperamos evidências relacionadas às alegações da fonte textual usando os vetores Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF). Posteriormente classificamos os pares afirmação-evidência como verdadeiro, falso, inadequado e fora de contexto usando uma versão modificada do módulo de vinculação textual. O módulo de vinculação textual calcula a probabilidade de cada sentença apoiar a reivindicação, contradizendo a reivindicação ou não fornecendo nenhuma informação relevante usando a rede Bi-LSTM para avaliar a veracidade da reivindicação. A precisão do sistema com melhor desempenho é de 64,49%', 'zh': '当今之数字信息世,一事验统以驳言、印刷媒体、在线言为急。 臣等建一系统,当系统将验其声明,并以声明分类为真,虚假断章取义,或与系统文本相关者不适声明。 若声明为真,则用真标签,声明为伪,则用真标签,声明与来源无涉,则归类为断章取义,声明根本无验,则归类为非宜。 此将助我验声明事实,及知我试图验事之原知识库。 吾以两步法成吾志。 先用术语频率-反向文档频率(TF-IDF)向量从文本源中检索声明相关证据。 后用文本蕴涵模块改版本将索赔 - 证分类为真,假,不当断章取义。 文本蕴涵模块计句持权利之概率,与权利相违用Bi-LSTM网络未给信息以质权利之实。 性能至精64.49%', 'hi': 'जानकारी की आज की डिजिटल दुनिया में, भाषण, प्रिंट मीडिया या ऑनलाइन सामग्री में किए गए दावों को अस्वीकार करने के लिए एक तथ्य सत्यापन प्रणाली समय की आवश्यकता है। हम एक ऐसी प्रणाली का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो किसी स्रोत के खिलाफ दावे को सत्यापित करेगी और सिस्टम को प्रदान किए गए पाठ्य स्रोत के संबंध में सही, झूठे, आउट-ऑफ-कॉन्टेक्स्ट या अनुचित दावे के दावे को वर्गीकृत करेगी। एक सच्चे लेबल का उपयोग किया जाता है यदि दावा सही है, गलत है यदि यह गलत है, यदि दावे का स्रोत के साथ कोई संबंध नहीं है तो इसे संदर्भ से बाहर के रूप में वर्गीकृत किया जाता है और यदि दावे को बिल्कुल भी सत्यापित नहीं किया जा सकता है तो इसे अनुचित के रूप में वर्गीकृत किया जाता है। इससे हमें एक दावे या तथ्य को सत्यापित करने में मदद मिलेगी और साथ ही साथ उस स्रोत या हमारे ज्ञान के आधार के बारे में जानने में मदद मिलेगी जिसके खिलाफ हम अपने तथ्यों को सत्यापित करने की कोशिश कर रहे हैं। हमने अपने लक्ष्य को प्राप्त करने के लिए दो-चरणीय दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग किया। सबसे पहले, हमने शब्द आवृत्ति-व्युत्क्रम दस्तावेज़ आवृत्ति (TF-IDF) वैक्टर का उपयोग करके पाठ्य स्रोत से दावों से संबंधित साक्ष्य प्राप्त किए। बाद में हमने दावा-साक्ष्य जोड़े को सही, झूठे, अनुचित और संदर्भ से बाहर के रूप में वर्गीकृत किया, जो पाठ्य अनिवार्यता मॉड्यूल के संशोधित संस्करण का उपयोग कर रहे थे। Textual entailment मॉड्यूल दावे का समर्थन करने वाले प्रत्येक वाक्य की संभावना की गणना करता है, दावे का खंडन करता है या दावे की सत्यता का आकलन करने के लिए Bi-LSTM नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके कोई प्रासंगिक जानकारी प्रदान नहीं करता है। सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन प्रणाली की सटीकता 64.49% है', 'ja': '今日の情報のデジタル世界では、音声、印刷媒体、またはオンラインコンテンツでの主張を反証するための事実検証システムが必要です。 当社は、ソースに対するクレームを検証し、クレームをシステムに提供されたテキストソースに関して真実、虚偽、文脈外、または不適切なクレームに分類するシステムを提案します。 クレームがtrueの場合はtrue、falseの場合はfalse、ソースとの関係がない場合はout - contextと分類され、クレームがまったく検証できない場合は不適切と分類されます。 これにより、申し立てや事実を確認したり、事実を確認しようとしている情報源や知識ベースを知ることができます。 目標を達成するために2段階のアプローチを使用しました。 最初に、用語頻度-逆ドキュメント頻度（ TF - IDF ）ベクトルを使用して、テキストソースからクレームに関連する証拠を取得しました。 後に、修正されたテキストエンタテインメントモジュールを使用して、クレーム-エビデンスのペアを真、偽、不適切、および文脈外に分類した。 テキスト随伴モジュールは、請求項を裏付ける各文の確率を計算し、請求項と矛盾するか、または請求項の真実性を評価するためにBi - LSTMネットワークを使用して関連情報を提供しない。 最高のパフォーマンスを発揮するシステムの精度は64.49 ％です', 'ru': 'В сегодняшнем цифровом мире информации система проверки фактов для опровержения утверждений, сделанных в речи, печатных средствах массовой информации или онлайн-контенте, является необходимостью часа. Мы предлагаем систему, которая проверяла бы претензию к источнику и классифицировала бы претензию как правдивую, ложную, вне контекста или неуместную претензию в отношении текстового источника, предоставленного системе. Истинная метка используется, если претензия является истинной, ложной, если она является ложной, если претензия не имеет отношения к источнику, то она классифицируется как вне контекста и если претензия не может быть проверена вообще, то она классифицируется как неуместная. Это поможет нам проверить утверждение или факт, а также узнать об источнике или нашей базе знаний, в отношении которых мы пытаемся проверить наши факты. Мы использовали двухэтапный подход для достижения нашей цели. Сначала мы получили доказательства, связанные с претензиями, из текстового источника, используя векторы частотно-обратных документов (TF-IDF). Позже мы классифицировали пары "утверждение - доказательство" как истинные, ложные, неуместные и выходящие за рамки контекста, используя модифицированную версию текстового модуля следования. Модуль текстового влечения вычисляет вероятность каждого предложения, поддерживающего претензию, противоречащего претензии или не предоставляющего какую-либо соответствующую информацию с использованием сети Bi-LSTM для оценки достоверности претензии. Точность системы наилучшей производительности составляет 64,49%', 'ga': "I saol digiteach na faisnéise sa lá atá inniu ann, tá gá san uair le córas fíoraithe fíricí chun dearbhuithe a dhéantar sa chaint, sna meáin chlóite nó in ábhar ar líne a bhréagnú. Molaimid córas a fhíoródh éileamh i gcoinne foinse agus a dhéanfadh an t-éileamh a rangú mar éileamh fíor, bréagach, as comhthéacs nó ina éileamh míchuí maidir leis an bhfoinse téacsúil a chuirtear ar fáil don chóras. Úsáidtear lipéad fíor má tá an t-éileamh fíor, bréagach má tá sé bréagach, mura bhfuil gaol ar bith ag an éileamh leis an bhfoinse déantar é a aicmiú mar as-chomhthéacs agus mura féidir an t-éileamh a fhíorú ar chor ar bith déantar é a rangú mar míchuí. Chabhródh sé seo linn éileamh nó fíric a fhíorú chomh maith le bheith ar an eolas faoin bhfoinse nó faoin mbonn eolais a bhfuilimid ag iarraidh ár gcuid fíricí a fhíorú ina leith. D’úsáideamar cur chuige dhá chéim chun ár sprioc a bhaint amach. Ar dtús, d'aisghabhamar fianaise a bhaineann leis na héilimh ón bhfoinse téacs ag baint úsáide as na veicteoirí Téarma Minicíocht Inbhéartach Doiciméid (TF-IDF). Níos déanaí rinneamar na péirí éileamh-fianaise a rangú mar a bhí fíor, bréagach, míchuí agus as comhthéacs ag baint úsáide as leagan modhnaithe den mhodúl idirghníomhaíochta téacs. Ríomhann an modúl um theagmháil théacs an dóchúlacht go dtacóidh gach abairt leis an éileamh, ag teacht salach ar a chéile leis an éileamh nó gan aon fhaisnéis ábhartha a sholáthar trí úsáid a bhaint as líonra Bi-LSTM chun fírinneacht an éilimh a mheas. Is é 64.49% cruinneas an chórais feidhmíochta is fearr", 'hu': 'Napjaink digitális információs világában a beszédben, nyomtatott médiában vagy online tartalmakban tett állításokat cáfoló tényellenőrző rendszer az óra szükségessége. Olyan rendszert javasolunk, amely ellenőrzi a forrással szembeni igényt, és a rendszer számára biztosított szöveges forrással kapcsolatban az igényt igaznak, hamisnak, összefüggésben kívülről vagy nem megfelelőnek minősíti. A valódi címkét akkor használják, ha az állítás igaz, ha hamis, ha az állítás nincs kapcsolata a forrással, akkor az összefüggésen kívül esik, és ha az állítás egyáltalán nem ellenőrizhető, akkor nem megfelelőnek minősül. Ez segítene ellenőrizni egy állítást vagy tényt, valamint tudni arról a forrásról vagy tudásbázisról, amely alapján tényeinket próbáljuk ellenőrizni. Célunk eléréséhez kétlépcsős megközelítést alkalmaztunk. Először a szöveges forrásból származó állításokkal kapcsolatos bizonyítékokat szereztünk le a Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF) vektorokkal. Később a követelés-bizonyíték párokat igaznak, hamisnak, nem megfelelőnek és nem kontextusnak minősítettük a szöveges bevonási modul módosított változatával. A szöveges bevonás modul kiszámítja annak valószínűségét, hogy minden mondat alátámasztja a követelést, ellentmond a követelésnek, vagy nem szolgáltat semmilyen releváns információt a Bi-LSTM hálózaton keresztül, hogy felmérje a követelés valódiságát. A legjobb teljesítményű rendszer pontossága 64,49%', 'el': 'Στον σημερινό ψηφιακό κόσμο της πληροφορίας, ένα σύστημα επαλήθευσης γεγονότων για να διαψεύσει ισχυρισμούς που γίνονται σε ομιλία, έντυπα μέσα ή διαδικτυακό περιεχόμενο είναι η ανάγκη της ώρας. Προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα το οποίο θα επαληθεύει μια απαίτηση έναντι μιας πηγής και θα ταξινομεί τον ισχυρισμό ως αληθές, ψευδείς, εκτός πλαισίου ή ακατάλληλο ως προς την πηγή κειμένου που παρέχεται στο σύστημα. Μια πραγματική ετικέτα χρησιμοποιείται εάν ο ισχυρισμός είναι αληθής, ψευδής εάν είναι ψευδής, εάν ο ισχυρισμός δεν έχει καμία σχέση με την πηγή, τότε ταξινομείται ως εκτός πλαισίου και εάν ο ισχυρισμός δεν μπορεί να επαληθευτεί καθόλου, τότε ταξινομείται ως ακατάλληλος. Αυτό θα μας βοηθήσει να επαληθεύσουμε έναν ισχυρισμό ή ένα γεγονός καθώς και να γνωρίζουμε για την πηγή ή τη βάση γνώσεων μας βάσει της οποίας προσπαθούμε να επαληθεύσουμε τα γεγονότα μας. Χρησιμοποιήσαμε μια προσέγγιση δύο βημάτων για να επιτύχουμε τον στόχο μας. Αρχικά, ανακτήσαμε αποδεικτικά στοιχεία που σχετίζονται με τους ισχυρισμούς από την πηγή κειμένου χρησιμοποιώντας τους φορείς συχνότητας-αντίστροφης συχνότητας εγγράφων (TF-IDF). Αργότερα ταξινομήσαμε τα ζεύγη ισχυρισμού-αποδεικτικών στοιχείων ως αληθινά, ψεύτικα, ακατάλληλα και εκτός πλαισίου χρησιμοποιώντας μια τροποποιημένη έκδοση της ενότητας περιεκτικότητας κειμένου. Η ενότητα κειμενικής εμπλοκής υπολογίζει την πιθανότητα κάθε πρότασης να υποστηρίξει τον ισχυρισμό, να αντιταχθεί στον ισχυρισμό ή να μην παράσχει καμία σχετική πληροφορία χρησιμοποιώντας το δίκτυο Bi-LSTM για την αξιολόγηση της αληθείας του ισχυρισμού. Η ακρίβεια του συστήματος καλύτερης απόδοσης είναι 64.49%', 'ka': 'დღეს ინფორმაციის დიზიტალური მსოფლიოში, ფაქტის შემოწმება სისტემა, რომელიც საუკუნოში დაახლოებით, მედია ან ინტერნეტის შემდგომარებით დაახლოებით, საათში ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ სისტემა, რომელიც შემოწმება სისტემის შესახებ წარმოდგენა და კლასიფიკაცია სისტემის ტექსტულ გამოსახულების შესახებ სისტემის წარმოდგენა სისტემის შესახებ. მართლა ნიშანი გამოყენება თუ სიმართლია, არა თუ სიმართლია, თუ სიმართლის შესახებ არ არის სიმართლის შესახებ, შემდეგ ის კლასიფიკაცია როგორც კონტექსტის გარეშე და თუ სიმართლის შესახებ არ შეიძლება და ეს გვეხმარება, რომ შემოწმებით წარმოდგენა ან ფაქტის შესახებ, როგორც ვიცით ჩვენი წარმოდგენა ან ჩვენი ცნობილის ბაზა, რომლებსაც ჩვენ ვცდილობთ ჩვენი ფაქტი ჩვენ გამოყენეთ ჩვენი მიზეზი დავასრულოთ ორ ნაგულისხმები. პირველად, ჩვენ მივიღეთ წარმოდგენები, რომლებიც ტექსუალური წარმოდგენებისგან გამოყენებული Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency(TF-IDF) გვექტორებით. შემდეგ ჩვენ კონტექსტულის შეცდომა მოდულის შეცდომა ვერსია კონტექსტულის მოდულის გამოყენებული, არაფერი, არაფერი და არაფერი კონტექსტულის გამოყენება. ტექსტუალური მოდულია, რომელიც ყველა წესტის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც წესტის დაეხმარებას, შეცდომარების შეცდომარების შესაძლებლობას გამოყენება, ან არ დაახმარებული ინფორმაცია,  ნაი-ეჲბპთწრ ოპაგთლნთკ ჟთჟრვმა ვ 64.49%', 'it': "Nel mondo digitale dell'informazione di oggi, un sistema di verifica dei fatti per confutare affermazioni fatte nel discorso, nei media cartacei o nei contenuti online è la necessità dell'ora. Proponiamo un sistema che verificherebbe un reclamo nei confronti di una fonte e classifichi l'affermazione come vera, falsa, fuori contesto o inappropriata rispetto alla fonte testuale fornita al sistema. Un'etichetta vera è usata se l'affermazione è vera, falsa se è falsa, se l'affermazione non ha alcuna relazione con la fonte allora è classificata come fuori contesto e se la rivendicazione non può essere verificata affatto allora è classificata come inappropriata. Questo ci aiuterebbe a verificare un reclamo o un fatto, così come a conoscere la fonte o la nostra base di conoscenze contro cui stiamo cercando di verificare i nostri fatti. Abbiamo utilizzato un approccio in due fasi per raggiungere il nostro obiettivo. In un primo momento, abbiamo recuperato prove relative alle affermazioni dalla fonte testuale utilizzando i vettori Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF). Successivamente abbiamo classificato le coppie claim-evidence come vere, false, inappropriate e fuori contesto utilizzando una versione modificata del modulo di implicazione testuale. Il modulo di implicazione testuale calcola la probabilità che ogni frase sostenga il reclamo, contraddica il reclamo o non fornisca alcuna informazione pertinente utilizzando la rete Bi-LSTM per valutare la veridicità del reclamo. La precisione del sistema più performante è del 64,49%", 'kk': 'Бүгін цифрлық мәліметтердің әлемінде сөйлеу, басып шығару медиа не онлайн мазмұнын тексеру жүйесі сағат қажет. Біз көзге қарсы жағдайларды тексеру жүйесі жүйе берілген мәтін көзіне қарсы жағдайларды тексеру жүйесі үшін дұрыс, жалғыз, тұрақсыз немесе жарамсыз жағдайларды классификациялайтын жүйе ұсын Шын жарлық қолданылады, егер жалғыз болса, жалғыз болса, жалғыз болса, егер жалғыз көзге қатынас жоқ болса, жалғыз жалғыз деп жазылады, егер жалғыз тексерілмесе, жалғыз деп жазылады. Бұл бізге шындықтарымызды тексеру үшін көмектеседі. Біз мақсатымызды жеткізу үшін екі қадам арқылы қолдандық. Біріншіден, біз термин жиілігін терістеу- терістеу құжаттың жиілігін (TF- IDF) векторларымен мәтін көзінен сәйкесті жазуларды алдық. Содан кейін біз сұрақтардың екеуін текстік тіркеу модулінің өзгертілген нұсқасын қолдану үшін дұрыс, дұрыс, жарамсыз, жарамсыз, жарамсыз және сыртқы контексті түрлен Мәтіндік сұрау модулі сұрауды қолдайтын әрбір сұрау мүмкіндігін есептеп, сұрауға қарсы немесе сұраудың дұрыстығын анықтау үшін Bi- LSTM желігін қолдану үшін ешқандай мәліметті Ең жақсы орындау жүйесінің дұрыстығы 64,49%', 'lt': 'Šiandienos skaitmeniniame informaciniame pasaulyje reikalinga valanda faktinių faktų tikrinimo sistema, kuri paneigtų kalbos, spausdintinės žiniasklaidos ar interneto turinio teiginius. Siūlome sistemą, kuri patikrintų teiginį apie šaltinį ir klasifikuotų teiginį kaip teisingą, klaidingą, neteisingą ar netinkamą teiginį dėl sistemos tekstinio šaltinio. Tikra etiketė naudojama, jei teiginys yra teisingas, klaidingas, jei jis klaidingas, jei teiginys neturi jokio ryšio su šaltiniu, tada jis klasifikuojamas kaip nekintamas ir jei teiginys visiškai negali būti patikrintas, jis klasifikuojamas kaip netinkamas. Tai padėtų mums patikrinti teiginį ar faktą, taip pat žinoti apie šaltinį ar mūsų žinių bazę, su kuria bandome patikrinti savo faktus. Norėdami pasiekti savo tikslą, taikėme dviejų etapų metodą. At first, we retrieved evidence related to the claims from the textual source using the Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency(TF-IDF) vectors.  Vėliau, naudodami modifikuotą tekstinio įtraukimo modulio versiją, klasifikuojame teiginių ir įrodymų poras kaip tikras, klaidingas, netinkamas ir netinkamas kontekstas. Tekstualinis įtraukimo modulis apskaičiuoja kiekvieno pareiškimą patvirtinančio sakinio tikimybę, prieštaraujant pareiškimui arba nepateikiant jokios svarbios informacijos, naudojant Bi-LSTM tinklą, kad būtų įvertintas reikalavimo tikrumas. Geriausių rezultatų sistemos tikslumas yra 64,49 %', 'ms': 'Dalam dunia digital maklumat hari ini, sistem pengesahan fakta untuk menolak pernyataan yang dibuat dalam ucapan, media cetak atau kandungan online adalah keperluan jam. Kami mengusulkan sistem yang akan mengesahkan tuntutan terhadap sumber dan mengklasifikasikan tuntutan sebagai benar, palsu, diluar konteks atau tuntutan yang tidak sesuai terhadap sumber teks yang diberikan kepada sistem. A true label is used if the claim is true, false if it is false, if the claim has no relation with the source then it is classified as out-of-context and if the claim cannot be verified at all then it is classified as inappropriate.  Ini akan membantu kita untuk mengesahkan tuntutan atau fakta serta mengetahui tentang sumber atau pangkalan pengetahuan kita yang kita cuba mengesahkan fakta kita. Kami menggunakan pendekatan dua langkah untuk mencapai tujuan kami. At first, we retrieved evidence related to the claims from the textual source using the Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency(TF-IDF) vectors.  Kemudian kami menganggap pasangan bukti-klaim sebagai benar, palsu, tidak sesuai dan keluar dari konteks menggunakan versi diubahsuai modul penyelesaian teks. Modul penyelesaian teks mengira kebarangkalian setiap kalimat menyokong tuntutan, menentang tuntutan atau tidak menyediakan sebarang maklumat berkaitan menggunakan rangkaian Bi-LSTM untuk menilai kebenaran tuntutan. Ketepatan sistem prestasi terbaik adalah 64.49%', 'mk': 'Во денешниот дигитален свет на информации, систем за верификација на факти за одбивање на тврдењата направени на говор, печатени медиуми или онлајн содржина е потреба од еден час. Предложуваме систем кој ќе потврди тврдеое против извор и ќе го класификува тврдеоето како вистинско, лажно, надвор од контекст или несоодветно тврдеое во однос на текстуалниот извор обезбеден за системот. Вистинска етикета се користи ако тврдеоето е вистинско, лажно ако е лажно, ако тврдеоето нема врска со изворот тогаш се класификува како надвор од контекст и ако тврдеоето воопшто не може да се верификува тогаш се класификува како несоодветно. Ова би ни помогнало да верификуваме тврдења или факти, како и да знаеме за изворот или нашата база на знаење против кои се обидуваме да ги верификуваме нашите факти. Користевме две чекори пристап за да ја оствариме нашата цел. На почетокот, најдовме докази поврзани со тврдењата од текстуалниот извор користејќи ги векторите Терм- фреквенција- инверзни документи (TF- IDF). Подоцна ги класификувавме паровите на докази како вистински, лажни, несоодветни и надвор од контекст користејќи изменета верзија на текстуалниот модул. Текстуален модул за вклучување ја пресметува веројатноста на секоја реченица која го поддржува тврдеоето, контрадицирајќи го тврдеоето или не обезбедувајќи никакви релевантни информации користејќи ја мрежата Bi-LSTM за проценка на веројатноста на тврдеоето. Точноста на најдобриот систем е 64,49%', 'ml': 'ഇന്നുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഡിജിറ്റല്\u200d ലോകത്തില്\u200d, സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വാക്ക്, മീഡിയ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d അച്ചടിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വെറുതെ  സിസ്റ്റത്തിനു വിരോധമായ ഒരു വാദം തെളിയിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച്, സത്യമായിരിക്കുന്നു, തെറ്റായിരിക്കുന്നു എന്നിട്ടും വിശദീകരിക്കു സത്യമാണെങ്കില്\u200d ഒരു യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലേബിള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, തെറ്റാണെങ്കില്\u200d, അത് തെറ്റാണെങ്കില്\u200d, ഉറവിട ബന്ധമില്ലെങ്കില്\u200d, അതിനെ പുറത്തുള്ള ബന്ധമില്ലാത്ത നമ്മുടെ സത്യത്തെ പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്ന സ്രോതസ്സിനെക്കുറിച്ചോ നമ്മുടെ അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തെക്കുറിച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം എത്താന്\u200d രണ്ട് പടിയില്\u200d ഒരു വഴി ഉപയോഗിച്ചു. ആദ്യം, ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d സ്രോതസ്സുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉള്\u200dപ്പെട്ട തെളിവുകള്\u200d സംബന്ധിച്ചുള്ള തെളിവുകള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വീണ്ടെടുത്തു. ടെര്\u200dമിം ഫ്രെയ പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d തെളിവുകളുടെ ജോടികളെ സത്യമായ, തെറ്റായ, അപരിചിതമായ, മാറ്റമില്ലാത്ത ഒരു മാറ്റപ്പെടുത്തിയ ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d പ വാക്കുകളെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന ഓരോ വാക്കിന്റെയും സാധ്യതയുടെയും വാക്കുകള്\u200d കണക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നു. വാക്കുകളുടെ സത്യത്തെ നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനായി ബി- എ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ കൃത്യം 64.49%', 'mt': 'Fid-dinja diġitali tal-lum tal-informazzjoni, sistema ta’ verifika tal-fatti li tiċħad l-affermazzjonijiet magħmula fid-diskors, fil-midja stampata jew fil-kontenut onlajn hija l-ħtieġa tas-siegħa. Aħna nipproponu sistema li tivverifika talba kontra sors u tikklassifika t-talba bħala vera, foloz, barra mill-kuntest jew talba mhux xierqa fir-rigward tas-sors testwali pprovdut lis-sistema. Tikketta vera tintuża jekk it-talba tkun vera, falza jekk tkun falza, jekk it-talba ma jkollha l-ebda relazzjoni mas-sors, allura hija kklassifikata bħala barra mill-kuntest u jekk it-talba ma tistax tiġi vverifikata xejn allura hija kklassifikata bħala mhux xierqa. Dan jgħinuna jivverifikaw dikjarazzjoni jew fatt kif ukoll nafu dwar is-sors jew il-bażi tal-għarfien tagħna li kontrihom qed nippruvaw jivverifikaw il-fatti tagħna. Aħna użajna approċċ f’żewġ stadji biex nilħqu l-għan tagħna. Fl-ewwel nett, inġabru evidenza relatata mat-talbiet mis-sors testwali bl-użu tal-vetturi Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF). Later we classified the claim-evidence pairs as true, false, inappropriate and out of context using a modified version of textual entailment module.  Il-modulu ta’ involviment testwali jikkalkula l-probabbiltà ta’ kull sentenza li tappoġġja t-talba, li tikkontradixxi t-talba jew li ma tipprovdix informazzjoni rilevanti bl-użu tan-netwerk Bi-LSTM biex tivvaluta l-veraċità tat-talba. Il-preċiżjoni tas-sistema bl-aħjar prestazzjoni hija ta’ 64.49%', 'mn': 'Өнөөдөр дэлхийн дижитал мэдээллийн ертөнц дээр ярианд, хэвлэх мэдээлэл эсвэл онлайн contentment нь цаг хэрэгтэй. Бид эх үүсвэрийн эсрэг зөвшөөрөгдөж, үнэн, худлаа, бус байдлын эсвэл системд өгөгдсөн текст эх үүсвэртэй тухай зөвшөөрөгдөж буй талаар зөвшөөрөх системийг санал болгож байна. Хэрвээ тэмдэглэл үнэн бол, буруу байвал, буруу байвал, хэрвээ тэмдэглэл эх үүсвэртэй харилцаагүй бол буруу байдал гэж хуваалцдаг. Хэрвээ тэмдэглэл шалгаж чадахгүй бол буруу байдал гэж хуваалцдаг. Энэ нь бидэнд үнэндээ шалгахыг хичээж байгаа эх үүсвэр, мэдлэг суурь болон үнэнийг шалгахад тусалдаг. Бид зорилго хүртэхэд хоёр давхар арга зам ашигласан. Эхлээд бид Терм Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency(TF-IDF) векторуудыг ашиглан текстур эх үүсвэрээс харьцуулсан баримт авсан. Дараагийн дараа бид хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн доказалтын хоёрыг жинхэнэ, худлаа, буруу, зөвшөөрөгүй, мөн өөрчлөгдсөн хэлбэрээс хуваалцсан. Шинэ хэлбэрийн санааны модуль хэлбэрийг дэмжиж буй өгүүлбэрийн магадлалыг тооцоолж, хүсэлтэй эсрэг эсрэг эсвэл бусад холбоотой мэдээллийг Bi-LSTM сүлжээ ашиглах боломжтой байх боломжтой. Хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагааны системийн зөв нь 64.49%', 'pl': 'W dzisiejszym cyfrowym świecie informacji potrzeba godziny jest system weryfikacji faktów do obalenia twierdzeń wyrażonych w mowie, mediach drukowanych czy treściach online. Proponujemy system, który weryfikuje roszczenie wobec źródła i klasyfikuje roszczenie jako prawdziwe, fałszywe, niekontekstowe lub niewłaściwe w odniesieniu do źródła tekstowego dostarczonego systemowi. Etykietę prawdziwą stosuje się, jeżeli oświadczenie jest prawdziwe, jeżeli oświadczenie jest nieprawdziwe, jeżeli oświadczenie nie ma związku ze źródłem, wówczas jest klasyfikowane jako poza kontekstem, a jeżeli oświadczenie nie może zostać zweryfikowane, to jest sklasyfikowane jako niewłaściwe. Pomoże nam to zweryfikować roszczenie lub fakt, a także wiedzieć o źródłu lub bazie wiedzy, na podstawie której staramy się zweryfikować nasze fakty. Do osiągnięcia naszego celu zastosowaliśmy podejście dwuetapowe. Na początku pozyskano dowody związane z twierdzeniami ze źródła tekstowego za pomocą wektorów Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF). Później sklasyfikowaliśmy pary roszczeń-dowodów jako prawdziwe, fałszywe, niewłaściwe i poza kontekstem za pomocą zmodyfikowanej wersji modułu implikacji tekstowej. Moduł zaangażowania tekstowego oblicza prawdopodobieństwo, że każde zdanie popiera roszczenie, sprzeczne z roszczeniem lub nie dostarczy żadnych istotnych informacji za pomocą sieci Bi-LSTM do oceny prawdziwości roszczenia. Dokładność najlepiej wydajnego systemu wynosi 64.49%', 'ro': 'În lumea digitală a informațiilor de astăzi, un sistem de verificare a faptelor pentru a infirma afirmațiile făcute în vorbire, mass-media tipărită sau conținut online este nevoie de ceas. Propunem un sistem care ar verifica o reclamație împotriva unei surse și ar clasifica reclamația ca fiind adevărată, falsă, în afara contextului sau o reclamație inadecvată în raport cu sursa textuală furnizată sistemului. Se utilizează o etichetă adevărată dacă afirmația este adevărată, falsă dacă afirmația nu are nicio legătură cu sursa, atunci este clasificată ca în afara contextului și dacă afirmația nu poate fi verificată deloc, atunci este clasificată ca inadecvată. Acest lucru ne-ar ajuta să verificăm o afirmație sau un fapt, precum și să știm despre sursa sau baza noastră de cunoștințe în raport cu care încercăm să verificăm faptele noastre. Am folosit o abordare în doi pași pentru a ne atinge obiectivul. La început, am recuperat dovezi legate de afirmațiile din sursa textuală folosind vectorii Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF). Mai târziu am clasificat perechile revendicări-dovezi drept adevărate, false, inadecvate și în afara contextului folosind o versiune modificată a modulului de implicare textuală. Modulul de implicare textuală calculează probabilitatea ca fiecare propoziție să susțină cererea, să contrazică cererea sau să nu furnizeze informații relevante utilizând rețeaua Bi-LSTM pentru a evalua veridicitatea cererii. Precizia celui mai performant sistem este de 64,49%', 'no': 'I dagens digital verden for informasjon er det nødvendig for timen ein faktisk verifikasjonssystem for å forstørra asserteringar som er gjort i tale, utskrift av media eller nettverket. Vi foreslår eit systemet som vil verifisera eit tiltak mot ei kjelde og klassifisera tiltak til å vera sann, falsk, uten kontekst eller eit inapprimert tiltak mot tekstkjelden som er tilgjengeleg til systemet. Eit sann merkelapp vert brukt dersom tillegget er sann, falsk dersom det er falsk, dersom tillegget ikkje har noko relasjon med kjelden, vert det klassifisert som utanfor kontekst og dersom tillegget ikkje kan verifiserast, vert det klassifisert som ikkje tilgjengeleg. Dette vil hjelpa oss til å verifisera eit tiltak eller ein faktor, og også vite om kjelden eller kjennebasen våre, som vi prøver å verifisera fakta våre. Vi brukte ein to-steg tilnærming for å oppnå målet vårt. Først har vi hent beviser relatert til claims frå tekstkjelden ved hjelp av vektorane Term Frekvens-Inverse dokumentfrekvens(TF-IDF). Så seinare klassifiserte vi etterspørselen som sann, falsk, inapprett og uten kontekst med ein endra versjon av tekstinnhaldsmodulen. Tekstinnstillingsmodul beregner sannsynligheten for kvar setning som støttar etterspørselen, mottrykk av etterspørselen eller ikkje tilbyr nokon relevant informasjon ved bruk av Bi-LSTM- nettverk for å vurdere sannsynligheten på etterspørselen. Den beste utføringssystemet er 64,49%', 'sr': 'U današnjem digitalnom svijetu informacija, sistem provjere èinjenica da se odbaci uvjerenja koji su napravljeni na govoru, štampu medija ili online sadržaj je potreban sat vremena. Predlažemo sistem koji bi potvrdio tvrdnju protiv izvora i klasifikovao tvrdnju da je istina, lažna, izvan konteksta ili neprikladna tvrdnja u vezi sa tekstualnim izvorom predviđenim sistemu. Istina etiketa se koristi ako je tvrdnja istina, lažna ako je lažna, ako tvrdnja nema veze sa izvorom, onda se klasifikuje kao izvan konteksta i ako se tvrdnja uopšte ne može potvrditi, onda se klasifikuje kao neprikladna. To bi nam pomoglo da potvrdimo tvrdnju ili činjenicu, kao i znamo o izvoru ili bazi znanja protiv kojih pokušavamo da potvrdimo naše činjenice. Koristili smo dva koraka pristup da ostvarimo naš cilj. Prvo smo dobili dokaze povezane sa tvrdnjivima iz tekstualnog izvora koristeći vektore frekvencije termina-inversne dokumentacije (TF-IDF). Kasnije smo klasifikovali pare dokaza za tvrdnju kao istinu, lažnu, neprikladnu i izvan konteksta koristeći modificiranu verziju modula tekstualnog zadržavanja. Modul tekstualne želje proračuna verovatnoću svake rečenice koja podržava tvrdnju, suprotstavljajući tvrdnju ili ne pružajući nikakve relevantne informacije koristeći mrežu Bi-LSTM kako bi procenila vernost tvrdbe. Točnost najboljeg izvodnjeg sistema je 64,49%', 'so': "Dunida digital ee macluumaadka maanta, waxaa loola baahan yahay nidaamka xaqiijinta si ay u kala soocaan qiimaha hadalka, warqada ku daabaco media ama waxyaabaha ku jira internetka. We propose a system which would verify a claim against a source and classify the claim to be true, false, out-of-context or an inappropriate claim with respect to the textual source provided to the system.  Waxaa isticmaalaya calaamada runta ah, haddii uu xaqiiqadu run yahay, beenaad haddii uu been yahay, haddii claimku uusan xiriir la'aanin asalka, waxaa loo qeybinayaa si aan loo xaqiijiyo, haddii aan qirashadu xaqiijin karin, waxaa loo qoraa sida aan habboon ahayn. Taasi waxay inaga caawinaysaa inaannu xaqiijinno dacwad ama xaqiiq iyo sidoo kale garanayno asalka aqoontayada, taas oo aan isku dayno in aan xaqiijinno xaqiiqnimadayada. Waxaynu isticmaalnay qaab labaad oo aan dhamaadno goalkayaga. Marka ugu horeysay, waxaan soo qaadanay caddeynta la xiriira codsiga asalka ah, waxaynu isticmaalnay vector-horumarinta Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF). Dabadeedna waxaan u qornay labada lammaanood oo ay yihiin runta, been, aan sahleyn iyo mid aan suurtagal ahayn, si aan loo beddelin noocyada qoraalka ee la aqoonsan. Heshiiska aqoonta ee qoraalka ah wuxuu xisaabinayaa suurtagalka qof walba oo uu kaalmeeyo dacwadda, wuxuuna ka beddelayaa qiimeynta qiimeynta qiimeynta qiimeynta qiimeynta dalabka. Saxda nidaamka ugu fiican sameynta waa 64.49%", 'sv': 'I dagens digitala informationsvärld är ett faktakontrolleringssystem för att motbevisa påståenden som görs i tal, tryckta medier eller online-innehåll ett behov. Vi föreslår ett system som verifierar ett anspråk mot en källa och klassificerar anspråket som sant, falskt, utanför kontexten eller olämpligt anspråk med avseende på den textkälla som tillhandahålls systemet. En sann etikett används om påståendet är sant, falskt om det är falskt, om påståendet inte har något samband med källan då klassificeras det som out-of-context och om påståendet inte kan verifieras alls klassificeras det som olämpligt. Detta skulle hjälpa oss att verifiera ett påstående eller ett faktum samt känna till källan eller vår kunskapsbas mot vilken vi försöker verifiera våra fakta. Vi använde ett tvåstegssätt för att uppnå vårt mål. Först hämtade vi bevis relaterade till påståenden från textkällan med hjälp av vektorerna Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF). Senare klassificerade vi påstående-bevis paren som sanna, falska, olämpliga och utanför kontext med hjälp av en modifierad version av textinvolveringsmodul. Textuell involveringsmodul beräknar sannolikheten för att varje mening stöder påståendet, motsäger påståendet eller inte tillhandahåller någon relevant information med hjälp av Bi-LSTM-nätverket för att bedöma påståendets sanningsenlighet. Noggrannheten hos det bästa presterande systemet är 64,49%', 'si': 'අද දිගේ ඩිජිටල් ලෝකයේ තොරතුරු ගැන, ඇත්තටම ප්\u200dරශ්න පද්ධතියක්, කතාව, ප්\u200dරශ්න මිඩියාව හෝ අන්ලයින් සාමාවික අපි පද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂා කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා සහ පද්ධතියට ප්\u200dර ඇත්ත ලේබල් භාවිතා කරනවා ඇත්ත නම්, අවුල් නම්, අවුල් නම්, අවුල් සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙන්නේ නැත්ත නම්, ඒක ප්\u200dරභාව සම්බන්ධයක් නැත්ත නම්, ඒක අවුල්  මේක අපිට උදව් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැත්තක් නැත්තක් නැත්තක් නැත්තක් නැත්තම් අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැත්තම් අපේ දැනගන්න ප්\u200d අපි අපේ අරමුණ වෙනුවෙන් පැත්තක් දෙකක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා. පළමුවෙන්, අපි ලේඛණ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂයෙන් සම්බන්ධ සාක්ෂියක් ගත්තා වෙක්ටර් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිශේෂයෙන් ප පස්සේ අපි පිළිගන්න සාක්ෂි දේවල්ව ඇත්ත, වැරැද්ද, නැහැ, සම්බන්ධතාවක් නැති සහ පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් විස පාළුවන් සම්බන්ධතා මොඩියුල් සම්බන්ධතා කරන හැම වාක්යේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් ගැන ගණන් කරනවා, සම්බන්ධතාවක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීය කරනවා නැත්නම හොඳම වැඩ කරන්න පද්ධතියේ හරියටම 64.49%', 'ta': 'இன்றைய தகவல் டிஜிட்டல் உலகத்தில், பேச்சு, ஊடகங்கள் அல்லது இணைய உள்ளடக்கத்திற்கு செய்யப்பட்டுள்ள உறுதிப்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ள ஒரு உண்மை நாம் ஒரு அமைப்பை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் அது மூலத்திற்கு எதிராக ஒரு குறிப்பை சரிபார்க்க மற்றும் முறைமையில் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட மூலத்தை சரிபார்க் உண்மையான விளக்கச்சீட்டு உண்மையாக இருந்தால், பொய் என்றால், கூறுதல் மூலத்துடன் உறவு இல்லையென்றால், அது வெளியே உள்ள சூழலாக வகைபடும் மற்றும் கேட்பாடு சரிபா இது எங்களுக்கு ஒரு கூற்று அல்லது ஒரு உண்மையை சரிபார்க்க உதவும் மூலம் அல்லது எங்கள் அறிவு தளத்தை பற்றி தெரியும் என்று நாம் எங்கள்  நாங்கள் எங்கள் இலக்கை அடைவதற்கு ஒரு இரண்டு படி முறையை பயன்படுத்தினோம். முதலில், நாங்கள் உரை மூலத்திலிருந்து தெரியும் தெளிவுகளை மீட்டெடுத்தோம் முடிவு வெக்டார்கள் பயன்படுத்தி முதலில் இருந்து. பின்னர் நாம் தேவையான ஆதாரங்கள் ஜோடி உண்மை, பொய், தவறு மற்றும் மாற்றப்பட்ட மென்நிகர் தெரியாத கூற்றை பயன்படுத்தி மாற்றிய பதிப்பு  உரை தெரியும் கூறு ஒவ்வொரு வாக்கியத்தை ஆதரிக்கும் சாத்திரத்தின் சாத்திரத்தை கணக்கிடுகிறது, தேவைப்படுத்துவதை மாற்றுகிறது அல்லது பி_- LSTM பிணையத்த சிறந்த செயல்படுத்தும் அமைப்பின் திட்டம் 64. 49%', 'ur': 'آج کے دیجیٹل دنیا کی اطلاعات میں ایک حقیقت کی تصدیق سیسٹم کی بات، میڈیا یا آنلاین منصوبات کی ضرورت ہے۔ ہم ایک سیسٹم کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک سورج کے مقابلہ میں ایک ادعا کی تصدیق کرے اور اس ادعا کو سچا، غلط، غلط، غلط یا غلطی ادعا کرے جو سیسٹم کے دیے ہوئے متن سورج کے معاملہ میں غلطی ادعا کرے۔ سچ لیبل استعمال کیا جاتا ہے اگر سچ ہے، غلط ہے اگر سچ ہے، اگر سچ ہے، اگر سچ لیبل کے ساتھ کوئی تعلق نہیں ہے تو یہ بغیر متصلہ کے طور پر کلاس کیا جاتا ہے اور اگر سچ کی تصدیق نہیں کی جاتی تو یہ ناممکن طور پر کلاس کیا جاتا ہے. یہ ہماری مدد کرے گا کہ ایک معاملہ یا ایک حقیقت کی تصدیق کریں اور اس کے بارے میں ہماری سمجھ یا علم کی بنیاد جانیں جس پر ہم اپنے حقیقت کی تصدیق کرنے کی کوشش کررہے ہیں ہم نے اپنے مقصد تک پہنچانے کے لئے ایک دو قدم کا طریقہ استعمال کیا۔ پہلی بار، ہم نے ٹرمن فرکانسی-ایورس ڈکومکینٹ فرکانسی(TF-IDF) ویکتروں کے استعمال کے ذریعہ متعلق تسلیز سورس کے معاملہ میں ثابت قدم لیا۔ اس کے بعد ہم نے تقدیر-شہادت جوڑوں کو حقیقی، غلط، غلط، غلط اور غلط سمجھ کے مطابق تغییر کی نسخہ کے مطابق مخلوط کردیا ہے. متخصص تحمل موڈیل ہر جماعت کی امکان کا شمار کرتا ہے جو ادعا کی مدد کرتی ہے یا ادعا کی مخالفت کرتی ہے یا کسی معاملہ معاملہ کا ذریعہ Bi-LSTM نیٹ ورک کے مطابق ادعا کرتی ہے۔ سب سے بہترین عمل سیسٹم کی دقیق 64.49%', 'uz': "Бугунги маълумотлар жумладан маълумотлари ичида, сўзлар, тарқатиш медиёрини ёки интернет тарқатиш учун аниқ тасдиқловчи система соат зарур. Biz bir tizimni tasavvur qilamiz va tizimga berilgan matn manbasi haqiqiqiy, notoʻgʻri, hech qanday mavzu yoki notoʻgʻri davom etish mumkin. Name Bu biz haqiqamizni tasdiqlashni istaysizki, rasmni tasdiqlashni istaysizmi mumkin. Biz maqsadimizni erishish uchun ikki qadam orqali foydalanamiz. Birinchi marta, biz texnologiya manbasiga murakkablarini tasavvur qildik va Term frequency- Inverse Document frequency (TF-IDF) vektorlaridan foydalanishimiz mumkin. Keyinroq biz matn ilmiy modulining oʻzgartirilgan versiyasi yordamida haqiqiqiy, oʻrnatilgan, notoʻgʻri, notoʻgʻri va moslamadan o'zgartirish mumkin. Name Bu eng yaxshi bajarish tizimning qiymati 64.49%", 'vi': 'Trong thế giới thông tin kỹ thuật s ố ngày nay, một hệ thống kiểm tra sự thật để bác bỏ những phát biểu, truyền thông hay nội dung trực tuyến là cần thiết của thời gian. Chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống xác minh yêu cầu chống lại nguồn tin và phân loại yêu cầu đúng sai, sai, không phù hợp hay một yêu cầu không phù hợp với nguồn mở văn bản được cung cấp cho hệ thống. Một nhãn thật được dùng nếu lời khai là đúng, nếu nó sai, nếu lời khai không có liên quan tới nguồn, thì nó được coi là ngoài ngữ cảnh và nếu lời khai không thể được kiểm tra, thì nó được coi là không phù hợp. Điều này sẽ giúp chúng ta xác minh một yêu cầu hay một thực tế cũng như biết về nguồn gốc hay căn cứ kiến thức mà chúng ta đang tìm cách kiểm tra sự thật. Chúng ta đã dùng hai bước để đạt được mục tiêu. Đầu tiên, chúng tôi lấy được bằng chứng liên quan đến các yêu cầu từ nguồn văn bản bằng các giá trị tần số số của tờ Thời gian Nói Sau đó chúng tôi phân loại các cặp chứng nhận nhận bằng chứng khai thác đúng, sai, không phù hợp và ngoài ngữ cảnh bằng một phiên bản đã sửa đổi của mô- đun cấu trúc. Mô- đun thư ký viết lách tính to án khả năng của mỗi câu nói hỗ trợ yêu cầu, mâu thuẫn với yêu cầu hay không cung cấp bất cứ thông tin liên quan nào bằng mạng Bi-LSTM để đánh giá sự thật của yêu cầu. Sự chính xác của hệ thống ứng dụng tốt nhất là 42%', 'bg': 'В днешния дигитален свят на информацията, система за проверка на фактите, която опровергава твърденията, направени в речта, печатните медии или онлайн съдържание, е нуждата на часа. Предлагаме система, която да провери претенцията срещу източник и да класифицира претенцията като вярна, невярна, извън контекста или неподходяща по отношение на текстовия източник, предоставен на системата. Използва се верен етикет, ако твърдението е вярно, невярно ако е невярно, ако твърдението няма връзка с източника, то то се класифицира като извън контекста и ако твърдението изобщо не може да бъде проверено, то се класифицира като неподходящо. Това ще ни помогне да проверим дадено твърдение или факт, както и да знаем за източника или нашата база от знания, срещу които се опитваме да проверим фактите си. Използвахме двустепенен подход, за да постигнем целта си. Първоначално извличаме доказателства, свързани с твърденията от текстовия източник, използвайки векторите Терминчестота-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF). По-късно класифицирахме двойките твърдение-доказателства като верни, неверни, неподходящи и извън контекста с помощта на модул за текстово обвързване. Модулът за текстово обвързване изчислява вероятността всяко изречение да подкрепи претенцията, да противоречи на претенцията или да не предостави каквато и да е съответна информация, използвайки мрежата за оценка на истинността на претенцията. Точността на най-добре функциониращата система е 64.49%', 'da': 'I nutidens digitale informationsverden er et faktum verifikationssystem til at modbevise påstande fremsat i tale, trykte medier eller online indhold behovet for tiden. Vi foreslår et system, der vil verificere et krav mod en kilde og klassificere påstanden som sand, falsk, uden for kontekst eller en upassende påstand i forhold til den tekstkilde, der leveres til systemet. En ægte etiket anvendes, hvis påstanden er sand, falsk hvis den er falsk, hvis påstanden ikke har nogen relation til kilden, klassificeres den som uden for kontekst, og hvis påstanden slet ikke kan verificeres, klassificeres den som upassende. Dette ville hjælpe os med at bekræfte en påstand eller en kendsgerning samt kendskab til kilden eller vores vidensbase, som vi forsøger at bekræfte vores kendsgerninger mod. Vi brugte en to-trins tilgang til at nå vores mål. I første omgang hentede vi beviser relateret til påstandene fra tekstkilden ved hjælp af Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF) vektorer. Senere klassificerede vi påstand-bevis parrene som sande, falske, upassende og uden for kontekst ved hjælp af en modificeret version af tekst involvering modul. Modulet for tekst involvering beregner sandsynligheden for, at hver sætning understøtter kravet, modsiger kravet eller ikke giver relevante oplysninger ved hjælp af Bi-LSTM-netværket til at vurdere kravets sandhed. Nøjagtigheden af det bedst ydende system er 64,49%', 'hr': 'U današnjem digitalnom svijetu informacija, potreban je sat vremena sustav provjere činjenica kako bi se odbacio uvjerenja koji su napravljeni govorom, štampanjem medija ili sadržaja interneta. Predlažemo sistem koji će potvrditi tvrdnju protiv izvora i klasifikirati tvrdnju da je istina, lažna, izvan konteksta ili neprikladna tvrdnja u pogledu tekstualnog izvora pruženog sustavu. Istina etiketa se koristi ako je tvrdnja istina, lažna ako je lažna, ako tvrdnja nema veze s izvorom, onda se klasifikira kao izvan konteksta i ako se tvrdnja uopće ne može potvrditi, onda se klasifikira kao neprikladna. To bi nam pomoglo da potvrdimo tvrdnju ili činjenicu, kao i znamo o izvoru ili bazi znanja protiv kojih pokušavamo potvrditi činjenice. Koristili smo dva koraka pristup postizanju našeg cilja. Prvo smo dobili dokaze povezane s zahtjevima tekstualnog izvora koristeći vektore učestalosti dokumenta (TF-IDF). Kasnije smo klasifikovali pare za dokaze zahtjeva kao istinu, lažnu, neprikladnu i izvan konteksta koristeći modificiranu verziju modula tekstualnog zadržavanja. Modul tekstualnog zadržavanja izračuna vjerojatnost svake rečenice koja podržava tvrdnju, suprotstavljajući tvrdnju ili ne pružajući bilo kakve relevantne informacije koristeći mrežu Bi-LSTM kako bi procijenila istinitost tvrdbe. Točnost najboljeg izvršnog sustava je 64,49%', 'nl': 'In de huidige digitale wereld van informatie is een feitenverificatiesysteem om beweringen in spraak, gedrukte media of online content te weerleggen de noodzaak van het uur. Wij stellen een systeem voor dat een claim ten opzichte van een bron zou verifiëren en de claim zou classificeren als waar, onjuist, buiten context of een ongepaste claim met betrekking tot de tekstbron die aan het systeem is verstrekt. Een waarheidsetiket wordt gebruikt als de bewering waar is, onwaar als deze onjuist is, als de bewering geen verband heeft met de bron, dan wordt deze geclassificeerd als buiten context en als de bewering helemaal niet kan worden geverifieerd, dan wordt deze als ongepast geclassificeerd. Dit zou ons helpen om een claim of een feit te verifiëren en te weten over de bron of onze kennisbasis waarmee we proberen onze feiten te verifiëren. We gebruikten een tweestappenbenadering om ons doel te bereiken. In eerste instantie hebben we bewijs met betrekking tot de beweringen van de tekstbron opgehaald met behulp van de Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF)-vectoren. Later classificeerden we de claim-bewijsparen als waar, onwaar, ongepast en buiten context met behulp van een gewijzigde versie van tekstuele implicatiemodule. De tekstuele invoegment module berekent de waarschijnlijkheid dat elke zin de claim ondersteunt, de claim tegenspreekt of geen relevante informatie verstrekt met behulp van het Bi-LSTM netwerk om de waarachtigheid van de claim te beoordelen. De nauwkeurigheid van het best presterende systeem is 64.49%', 'de': 'In der heutigen digitalen Informationswelt ist ein Faktenverifizierungssystem zur Widerlegung von Behauptungen in Sprache, Printmedien oder Online-Inhalten das Bedürfnis der Stunde. Wir schlagen ein System vor, das einen Anspruch gegen eine Quelle verifiziert und den Anspruch in Bezug auf die dem System zur Verfügung gestellte Textquelle als wahr, falsch, kontextlos oder unangemessen klassifiziert. Ein wahres Etikett wird verwendet, wenn die Behauptung wahr ist, wenn sie falsch ist, wenn die Behauptung keinen Bezug zur Quelle hat, wird sie als nicht kontextbezogen eingestuft und wenn die Behauptung überhaupt nicht verifiziert werden kann, wird sie als unangemessen eingestuft. Dies würde uns helfen, einen Anspruch oder eine Tatsache zu verifizieren sowie über die Quelle oder unsere Wissensbasis zu wissen, anhand derer wir versuchen, unsere Tatsachen zu verifizieren. Wir nutzten einen zweistufigen Ansatz, um unser Ziel zu erreichen. Zunächst haben wir Beweise für die Behauptungen aus der Textquelle mit Hilfe der Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF)-Vektoren abgerufen. Später klassifizierten wir die Claim-Evidence-Paare als wahr, falsch, unangemessen und aus dem Kontext heraus, indem wir eine modifizierte Version des Textinhaltsmoduls verwendeten. Das Modul "Textliche Einbeziehung" berechnet die Wahrscheinlichkeit, dass jeder Satz den Anspruch stützt, dem Anspruch widerspricht oder keine relevanten Informationen liefert, indem es Bi-LSTM-Netzwerk verwendet, um die Wahrhaftigkeit des Anspruchs zu beurteilen. Die Genauigkeit des leistungsstärksten Systems ist 64.49%', 'id': 'Di dunia digital informasi hari ini, sistem verifikasi fakta untuk menolak pernyataan yang dibuat dalam pidato, media cetak atau konten online adalah membutuhkan jam. Kami mengusulkan sistem yang akan memverifikasi klaim terhadap sumber dan mengklasifikasi klaim menjadi benar, palsu, diluar konteks atau klaim yang tidak sesuai terhadap sumber teks yang diberikan ke sistem. Label benar digunakan jika klaim benar, palsu jika klaim salah, jika klaim tidak memiliki hubungan dengan sumber maka klaim itu diklasifikasikan sebagai luar konteks dan jika klaim tidak dapat diperiksa sama sekali maka klaim itu diklasifikasikan sebagai tidak cocok. Ini akan membantu kita untuk memverifikasi sebuah klaim atau fakta serta mengetahui sumber atau dasar pengetahuan kita yang kita coba untuk memverifikasi fakta kita. Kami menggunakan pendekatan dua langkah untuk mencapai tujuan kita. Pada awalnya, kami mengambil bukti berkaitan dengan klaim dari sumber teks menggunakan Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF) vektor. Later we classified the claim-evidence pairs as true, false, inappropriate and out of context using a modified version of textual entailment module.  Modul penyelesaian teks mengira kemungkinan setiap kalimat mendukung klaim, melanggar klaim atau tidak menyediakan informasi relevanti apapun menggunakan jaringan Bi-LSTM untuk menilai kebenaran klaim. The accuracy of the best performing system is 64.49%', 'ko': '오늘날 정보의 디지털 세계에서 강연, 인쇄 매체, 온라인 콘텐츠에서 나오는 단언을 반박하는 것은 급선무이다.우리는 시스템에 제공된 텍스트 출처에 따라 클레임을 확인하고 클레임을 진실, 허위, 단장취의 또는 부적절한 클레임으로 나누는 시스템을 제시했다.성명이 진짜라면 진짜 라벨을 사용하고, 성명이 가짜라면 가짜 라벨을 사용하며, 성명이 출처와 무관하면 단장취의로 분류하고, 성명이 검증할 수 없으면 부적절하게 분류한다.이것은 우리가 클레임이나 사실을 확인하고 우리가 사실의 출처나 지식 라이브러리를 확인하는 데 도움이 될 것이다.우리는 두 걸음 걷는 방법을 채택하여 우리의 목표를 실현했다.먼저, 텍스트 소스에서 선언과 관련된 증거를 검색하기 위해 용어 주파수 역문서 주파수(TF-IDF) 벡터를 사용합니다.이후에 우리는 수정된 텍스트 함축 모듈을 사용하여 클레임 증거를 진실, 가짜, 부적절하고 단장취의로 나누었다.텍스트 포함 모듈은 Bi LSTM 네트워크를 사용하여 각 문장에서 클레임을 지원하거나 반박하거나 관련 정보를 제공하지 않을 확률을 계산하여 클레임의 정확성을 평가합니다.가장 성능이 좋은 시스템의 정확도는 64.49%입니다.', 'fa': 'در دنیای دیجیتال اطلاعات امروز، یک سیستم تأیید حقیقت برای تأیید کردن توضیح\u200cهای صحبت، رسانه\u200cهای چاپ یا محتوای آنلاین نیاز ساعت است. ما یک سیستم پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک ادعا در مقابل یک منبع ثابت می\u200cکند و ادعا را به حقیقت، دروغ، خارج از محیط یا یک ادعا نامناسب در مقابل منبع متن به سیستم داده می\u200cشود. یک نقاشی حقیقی استفاده می\u200cشود اگر این نقاشی حقیقت باشد، false اگر false باشد، اگر این نقاشی با منبع ارتباطی نداشته باشد، آن را به عنوان خارج محیط و اگر این نقاشی اصلاً نمی\u200cتواند ثابت شود، آن را به عنوان نامناسب classified می\u200cشود. این به ما کمک می\u200cکند که یک ادعا یا یک حقیقت را ثابت کنیم و در مورد منبع یا پایگاه علمی که در برابر آن سعی می\u200cکنیم حقیقت خود را ثابت کنیم. ما از یک دستور دو قدم برای رسیدن هدف ما استفاده کردیم. در اول، ما مدرک ارتباط با ادعا از منبع متن را با استفاده از فرکانس\u200cهای مدرک\u200cهای مترجم (TF-IDF) گرفتیم. بعدش جفت مدرک\u200cهای ادعا را به عنوان حقیقت، غلط، غلط و غلط و خارج از محیط با استفاده از نسخه\u200cی تغییر داده شده\u200cی مدرک\u200cهای متن مخفی کردیم. مولد استفاده از متن احتمال هر جمله که پشتیبانی آن ادعا می\u200cکند، بر خلاف ادعا یا هیچ اطلاعاتی مربوط به استفاده از شبکه Bi-LSTM را برای ارزیابی حقیقت ادعا نمی\u200cکند، محاسبه می\u200cکند. دقیقات بهترین سیستم اجرا 64.49%', 'tr': 'Bu gün digital maglumatyň dünýäde, çykyşda, mediýalary ýa-da internet maglumatynyň ahyryny bozmak üçin bir hakyky barlama sistemasy sagatyň gereklidir. Biz sistemi bir çeşme garşy barlap iddialy barlap we sisteme berilen tekst çeşmesi bilen dogry, ýalňyş, خارج, ýalňyş bir iddialy saýlayan bir sistemi teklip berýäris. Eger sany etiket dogry bolsa, ýalňyş we ýalňyş, eger etiket çeşme bilen bir baglaşyk ýok bolsa, onsoňa bu etiket daşyp barlanmaýar we eger etiket hem barlanmaýar, onsoňa bu etiket ýagdaý hökmünde soraglanmaýar. Bu biziň hakykatymyzy barlap hakykatdanam hakykatdanam hakykatdanam bardygyny bilmek üçin bize kömek eder. Biziň maksadymyzy ýetmek üçin iki adım golaýyny ulandyk. Başlangıçta, Term Frequency-Inverse Sened Frequency(TF-IDF) vektörlerinden gelen iddialeriyle alakalıp götürdik. Sonra soňra pikir-sahypa tanyş çiplerini doğru, ýalňyş, uyumsuz we daşyrmadyk tekst modiniň üýtgeden wersiýasyny ullanýarys. Metin daşyrymy modi iddialaryň hakykatyny barlamak üçin her sözleniň sanlykyny hasaplaýar, iddialaryň tersine garşy etmek üçin ýöne bir möhüm maglumaty üýtgetmek üçin bi-LSTM netegi ullanýar Iň gowy etjek sistemiň dogry 64.49%', 'sw': 'Katika ulimwengu wa kidijitali wa taarifa leo, mfumo wa kuthibitisha ukweli wa kupinga matamko yaliyofanywa kwa hotuba, kuchapisha vyombo vya habari au maudhui ya mtandaoni ni unahitaji s a a moja. Tunazipendekeza mfumo ambao utathibitisha madai dhidi ya chanzo hicho na kuelezea madai ya ukweli, uongo, nje ya muktadha au madai yasiyo ya haki kuhusiana na chanzo cha maandishi kinachotolewa kwa mfumo huo. Alama halisi inatumiwa kama madai ni kweli, ni uongo kama ni uongo, kama madai haina uhusiano na chanzo hicho, basi imechapishwa kama nje ya muktadha na kama madai haiwezekani kuthibitishwa kwa lolote, basi inachapishwa kama isiyo sahihi. Hili litatusaidia kuthibitisha madai au ukweli na pia tunajua chanzo cha habari au msingi wa maarifa dhidi yake tunajaribu kuthibitisha ukweli wetu. We used a two-step approach to achieve our goal.  Kwanza, tulipata ushahidi kuhusiana na madai yanayohusiana na vyanzo vya msingi kwa kutumia viwango vya nyaraka vya Ufaransa-Ujadala (TF-IDF). Baadae tulifananisha wanandoa madai kuwa ni ukweli, uongo, yasiyo sahihi na nje ya muktadha kwa kutumia toleo lililobadilishwa la vifaa vinavyofahamika. Kifaa cha habari kinachofahamika kinahisi uwezekano wa kila hukumu inayounga mkono madai, kinyume na madai au kutoa taarifa muhimu kwa kutumia mtandao wa Bi-LSTM ili kutathmini ukweli wa madai hayo. Usahihi wa mfumo bora wa kufanya kazi ni asilimia 64.49', 'sq': 'Në botën dixhitale të informacionit të sotëm, një sistem verifikimi i fakteve për të kundërshtuar deklaratat e bëra në fjalim, media të shtypur apo përmbajtje online është nevoja e or ës. Ne propozojmë një sistem që do të verifikojë një pretendim kundër një burimi dhe do të klasifikojë pretendimin si të vërtetë, të rreme, jashtë kontekstit ose një pretendim të papërshtatshëm lidhur me burimin tekstual të ofruar në sistem. Një etiketë e vërtetë përdoret në qoftë se pretendimi është i vërtetë, false në qoftë se është i rreme, në qoftë se pretendimi nuk ka lidhje me burimin at ëherë klasifikohet si jashtë kontekstit dhe në qoftë se pretendimi nuk mund të verifikohet fare atëherë klasifikohet si i papërshtatshëm. Kjo do të na ndihmonte të verifikojmë një pretendim apo një fakt si dhe të dinim për burimin apo bazën tonë të njohurive kundër të cilave po përpiqemi të verifikojmë faktet tona. We used a two-step approach to achieve our goal.  Në fillim, morëm prova lidhur me pretendimet nga burimi tekstual duke përdorur vektorët e frekuencës së Term Frequency-Inverse Document (TF-IDF). Më vonë i klasifikuam çiftet e pretendimeve si të vërteta, të rreme, të papërshtatshme dhe jashtë kontekstit duke përdorur një version të modifikuar të modulit tekstual të përfshirjes. Modul tekstual i përfshirjes llogarit probabilitetin e çdo fjale që mbështet pretendimin, duke kundërshtuar pretendimin apo duke mos ofruar ndonjë informacion të rëndësishëm duke përdorur rrjetin Bi-LSTM për të vlerësuar vërtetësinë e pretendimit. Pikërishmëria e sistemit më të mirë është 64.49%', 'af': "In vandag se digitale wêreld van inligting, is 'n feit verifikasie stelsel om in spreek, druk media of online inhoud die behoefte van die uur te verkry. Ons voorstel 'n stelsel wat 'n aandrukking teen 'n bron bevestig sou word en die aandrukking waar, vals, uit-konteks of 'n ongeldige aandrukking met respek na die tekstuurlike bron wat a an die stelsel verskaf is. 'n Waar etiket word gebruik as die aanbevel waar is, vals as dit vals is, as die aanbevel het geen verwanting met die bron dan is dit geklassifiseer as uit-konteks en as die aanbevel nie waarsoek word nie, dan is dit geklassifiseer as ongepaslik. Dit sal ons help om 'n aandrukking of 'n feit te bevestig en ook te weet van die bron of ons kennis basis teen wat ons probeer om ons fakte te bevestig. Ons het 'n twee stap toegang gebruik om ons doel te bereik. Op die eerste het ons getuienis ontvang wat verwante is met die aansoek van die teks-bron met gebruik van die Term Frekwensie-Inverse Dokument Frekwensie (TF-IDF) vektore. Later het ons die aanvrag-getuienis paar as waar, vals, onpasmaak en uit konteks geklassifiseer deur te gebruik 'n verander weergawe van teks-beveling module. Tekstuele aanhouding module bereken die waarskynlikheid van elke seting wat die aanvrag ondersteun, teen die aanvrag of nie enige relevante inligting verskaf met gebruik van Bi- LSTM netwerk om die waarskynlikheid van die aanvrag te asseer nie. Die presies van die beste uitvoerde stelsel is 64.49%", 'am': 'ዛሬ በዲጂተል መረጃ ዓለም፣ በንግግር፣ ሚዲያዎችን ወይም የመረመር መረብ የሚቃወሙትን የውይይት ማረጋገጫ ስርዓት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የክፍለ ጉዳዩን በማረጋገጥ፣ እውነተኛ፣ ውሸት፣ ውሸት፣ ውሸት፣ ውጭ፣ ጥያቄ ወይም የማይገባው የጽሑፍ መልዕክት መፍትሄን እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ እውነተኛ ምልክት እውነተኛ እንደ ሆነ የተጠቀመ ነው፤ ውሸት ቢሆን፣ ክስተት ቢሆን፣ ጉዳዩ ከክፍሉ ጋር ግንኙነት ባይኖር ይታሰራል፡፡ ይህም እውነቱን እናውቀው ስለምንፈቅድበት እውነትን እናረጋግጥ ዘንድ የሚረዳን ነው፡፡ አካሄዳችንን ለማግኘት የሁለት ደረጃዎች ደረጃን ተጠቀምን፡፡ በመጀመሪያው፣ የጽሑፍ ክፍል-የፋይል ሰነድ ፍቀት (TF-IDF) vectors የተጠቃሚ ክፍተቶችን ከጽሑፍ ምንጭ ጋር የሚያስፈልገውን ማስረጃ አግኝተናል፡፡ Later we classified the claim-evidence pairs as true, false, inappropriate and out of context using a modified version of textual entailment module.  የጽሑፍ ማውቀት ሚዲል ቁጥሩን ለመደጋገም የሁሉንም ፋንታ ፈቃዱ ይቆጥራል፣ የጥያቄውን በተቃወመ ወይም የተጠቃሚ መረጃ ቢ-LSTM መረብ በመጠቀም ወይም የጥያቄውን ማስታወቂያ ማሳየት ነው፡፡ የጥሩ ስርዓት 64.49%', 'az': 'Bugünün dijital məlumatların dünyasında, s özlərdə, media və online məlumatlarında təsdiqlənmək üçün təsdiqlənmə sistemi saatın ehtiyacıdır. Biz sistemi təbliğ edirik ki, bir mənbə müqabilində təklif edir və sistemə təklif edilən mətn mənbəsi haqqında, yalan, qeyri-müqabilində və yaxşı təklif edər. Əgər doğru etiket doğru deyilsə, yalan deyilsə, əgər etiket mənbə ilə əlaqə yoxdur, bu etiket qeyri-əlaqə deyilsə və əgər etiket heç vaxt təsdiqlənməyə qadir deyilsə, o da uyğun olar. Bu bizim həqiqətlərimizi təsdiqləməyə çalışdığımız mənbə və elm bazı haqqında bildirmək üçün bizə kömək edər. Bizim məqsədimizi yerinə yetirmək üçün iki adım tərəfindən istifadə etdik. İlk dəfə Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency Sonra biz təklif-şahidlik çiftlərini doğru, yalan, uyğun və müxtəlif şəkildə təklif modulu ilə dəyişdirilmiş versiyonu ilə seçdik. Tekst dağıtma modulu iddiasına dəstəkləyən hər cümlənin ehtimalını hesablar, iddiasına qarşı və ya bi-LSTM şəbəkəsini istifadə etmək üçün heç bir məlumat verilməyən məlumatı hesablar. Ən yaxşı performans sisteminin doğruluğu 64,49%dir.', 'bs': 'U današnjem digitalnom svijetu informacija, sistem za provjeru činjenica da se odbaci uvjerenja koji su napravljeni govorom, štampanjem medija ili online sadržaj je potreban sat vremena. Predlažemo sistem koji bi potvrdio tvrdnju protiv izvora i klasifikirao tvrdnju da je istina, lažna, izvan konteksta ili neprikladna tvrdnja u vezi sa tekstualnim izvorom predviđenim sistemu. Istina etiketa se koristi ako je tvrdnja istina, lažna ako je lažna, ako tvrdnja nema veze sa izvorom, onda se klasifikuje kao izvan konteksta i ako se tvrdnja uopšte ne može potvrditi, onda se klasifikuje kao neprikladna. To bi nam pomoglo da potvrdimo tvrdnju ili činjenicu, kao i znamo o izvoru ili bazi znanja protiv kojih pokušavamo da potvrdimo činjenice. Koristili smo dva koraka pristup da ostvarimo naš cilj. Prvo smo dobili dokaze povezane sa zahtjevima iz tekstualnog izvora koristeći vektore frekvencije termina-inversne frekvencije dokumenta (TF-IDF). Kasnije smo klasifikovali pare od dokaza zahtjeva kao istinu, lažnu, neprikladnu i izvan konteksta koristeći modificiranu verziju modula tekstualnog zadržavanja. Modul tekstualnog prisluškivanja proračuna vjerojatnost svake rečenice koja podržava tvrdnju, suprotstavljajući tvrdnju ili ne pružajući nikakve relevantne informacije koristeći mrežu Bi-LSTM kako bi procijenila istinitost tvrdbe. Točnost najboljeg izvršnog sistema je 64,49%', 'hy': 'Այսօրվա թվային ինֆորմացիայի աշխարհում, ժամի անհրաժեշտությունն է փաստերի ստուգումների համակարգը, որպեսզի անտեսենք խոսքի, տպագրության մեդիայի կամ առցանց պարունակության մասին արտահայտված հայտարարությունները: Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի համակարգ, որը կստուգեր աղբյուրի դեմ պայմանավորված փաստարկը և դասակարգեր փաստարկը ճշմարիտ, կեղծ, անկոնտեքստի կամ անհարմար փաստարկ համակարգին տրամադրված տեքստային աղբյուրի նկատմամբ: Իրական պիտակ է օգտագործվում, եթե պնդումը ճշմարիտ է, սխալ է, եթե սխալ է, եթե պնդումը որևէ կապ չունի աղբյուրի հետ, ապա այն դասակարգում է որպես անկոնտեքստի և եթե պնդումը ընդհանրապես չի կարող ստուգել, ապա այն դասակարգում է որպես անհար Սա կօգնի մեզ ստուգել փաստը կամ փաստը, ինչպես նաև իմանալ աղբյուրի կամ մեր գիտելիքի հիմքի մասին, որի դեմ մենք փորձում ենք ստուգել մեր փաստերը: Մենք օգտագործեցինք երկու քայլ մոտեցում մեր նպատակի հասնելու համար: Սկզբում մենք հավաքեցինք փաստեր, որոնք կապված էին տեքստալ աղբյուրից ստացված փաստերի հետ՝ օգտագործելով տերմին Հաճախ-հակառակ փաստաթղթի հաճախ (ԹՖ-IDF) վեկտորները: Ավելի ուշ մենք դասակարգեցինք փաստարկների զույգերը ճշմարտությամբ, սխալ, անհարմար և կոնտեքստից դուրս, օգտագործելով տեքստային ներգրավման մոդուլների փոփոխված տարբերակը: Տեքստոլոգիական ներգրավման մոդուլը հաշվարկում է հավանականությունը, որ յուրաքանչյուր նախադասությունը աջակցում է փաստարկումը, հակառակվում է փաստարկումը կամ չի տրամադրում որևէ նշանակալի տեղեկատվություն, օգտագործելով Երբ-LSMT ցանց փա Ամենալավ արդյունավետ համակարգի ճշգրիտությունը 64.49 տոկոսն է,', 'ca': "En el món digital d'informació d'avui en dia, un sistema de verificació de fets que desafia les afirmacions fetes en discurs, mitjans d'impressió o continguts en línia és la necessitat d'una hora. Proposem un sistema que verifique una reclamació contra una font i classifique la reclamació com veritat, falsa, fora de context o una reclamació inadequada en relació amb la font textual proporcionada al sistema. S'utilitza una etiqueta veritable si la reclamació és veritable, falsa si és falsa, si la reclamació no té relació amb la font, és classificada com fora del context i si la reclamació no pot ser verificada en absolut, és classificada com inadequada. This would help us to verify a claim or a fact as well as know about the source or our knowledge base against which we are trying to verify our facts.  Vam utilitzar un enfocament de dos passos per aconseguir el nostre objectiu. Al principi vam obtenir proves relacionades amb les afirmacions de la font textual utilitzant els vectors de Freqüència de Term-Document Inverse Freqüència (TF-IDF). Després vam classificar els parells d'evidències de reclamació com veritables, falses, inadaptades i fora del context fent servir una versió modificada del módul d'involucració textual. El módul d'involucració textual calcula la probabilitat de cada frase que suporta la reclamació, contradiccionant la reclamació o no proporcionant informació rellevant utilitzant la xarxa Bi-LSTM per avaluar la veritat de la reclamació. La precisió del sistema de millor rendiment és del 64,49%", 'cs': 'V dnešním digitálním světě informací je systém ověřování faktů, který vyvrátí tvrzení v řeči, tiskových médiích nebo online obsahu, potřeba hodiny. Navrhujeme systém, který by ověřil tvrzení vůči zdroji a klasifikoval tvrzení jako pravdivé, nepravdivé, mimo kontext nebo nevhodné s ohledem na textový zdroj poskytnutý systému. Označení skutečné se používá, pokud je tvrzení pravdivé, nepravdivé, pokud je nepravdivé, pokud tvrzení nemá žádný vztah se zdrojem, pak je klasifikováno jako mimo kontext a pokud tvrzení nelze vůbec ověřit, pak je klasifikováno jako nevhodné. To by nám pomohlo ověřit tvrzení nebo skutečnost, stejně jako vědět o zdroji nebo naší znalostní bázi, na jejímž základě se snažíme ověřit naše skutečnosti. K dosažení našeho cíle jsme použili dvoustupňový přístup. Nejprve jsme získali důkazy týkající se tvrzení z textového zdroje pomocí vektorů Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF). Později jsme klasifikovali páry tvrzení-důkazy jako pravdivé, falešné, nevhodné a mimo kontext pomocí modifikované verze modulu textové implikace. Modul textového zahrnutí vypočítá pravděpodobnost, že každá věta podporuje tvrzení, že je v rozporu s tvrzením nebo neposkytne žádné relevantní informace pomocí sítě Bi-LSTM pro posouzení pravdivosti tvrzení. Přesnost nejlépe výkonného systému je 64,49%', 'et': 'Tänapäeva digitaalses infomaailmas on faktide kontrollimise süsteem kõnes, trükimeedias või veebisisus esitatud väidete ümber lükkamiseks tunnivajadus. Me pakume välja süsteemi, mis kontrolliks nõuet allika vastu ja liigitaks väide süsteemile esitatud tekstiallika suhtes tõeseks, valeks, kontekstiväliseks või sobimatuks. Tõelist märgist kasutatakse, kui väide on tõene, vale, kui väide on vale, kui väidel ei ole mingit seost allikaga, liigitatakse see kontekstist väljapoole ning kui väidet ei saa üldse kontrollida, liigitatakse see sobimatuks. See aitaks meil kinnitada väidet või fakti ning teada saada allikat või teadmistebaasi, mille alusel püüame oma fakte kontrollida. Me kasutasime oma eesmärgi saavutamiseks kaheastmelist lähenemisviisi. Kõigepealt leidsime tekstiallikast tõendeid väidetega seotud tõendite kohta, kasutades terminite sagedus-pöördtihedus (TF-IDF) vektoreid. Hiljem klassifitseerisime väite-tõendite paarid tõeseks, valeks, sobimatuks ja kontekstist väljas, kasutades tekstilise kaasamise mooduli muudetud versiooni. Tekstilise kaasamise moodul arvutab tõenäosuse, et iga lause toetab nõuet, on nõudega vastuolus või ei esita asjakohast teavet Bi-LSTM võrgustiku abil, et hinnata nõude õigsust. Parima tulemusega süsteemi täpsus on 64,49%', 'bn': 'আজকের ডিজিটাল বিশ্বে, ভাষণ, প্রিন্ট মিডিয়া অথবা অনলাইনের বিষয়বস্তুর বিরুদ্ধে প্রকাশিত বিবেচনা করার একটি সত্যিকারের পরিচালনা  আমরা একটি সিস্টেম প্রস্তাব করছি যা একটি উৎসের বিরুদ্ধে একটি দাবি পরীক্ষা করবে এবং সিস্টেমের প্রদান করা টেক্সচুয়াল উৎসের সম্পর্কে সঠিক, মিথ্যা, বাইরে  একটি সত্যিকার লেবেল ব্যবহার করা হয় যদি দাবি সত্য হয়, যদি মিথ্যা হয়, যদি দাবীটি উৎসের সাথে সম্পর্ক না থাকে, তাহলে সেটা বাইরে বিচ্ছিন্ন করা হয় এবং যদি দাবি নিশ্চিত না হয়, তব This would help us to verify a claim or a fact as well as know about the source or our knowledge base against which we are trying to verify our facts.  আমরা আমাদের লক্ষ্য অর্জনের জন্য একটি দুই ধাপ প্রতিক্রিয়া ব্যবহার করেছিলাম। প্রথমত, আমরা টেক্সুয়াল উৎস থেকে সংক্রান্ত প্রমাণ পুনরুদ্ধার করেছি টার্ম ফ্রেঞ্চ-ইন্টারফার্সি ডকুমেন্ট ফ্রেন্সি (TF-IDF) ভে পরবর্তীতে আমরা দাবি প্রমাণের জোড়াকে সত্য, মিথ্যা, অযথাযথ এবং পরিবর্তিত একটি পরিবর্তিত সংস্করণের মাধ্যমে পরিবর্তন করেছি। টেক্সটেক্সটেক্সিয়েন্ট মোডুল দাবির সমর্থন করার প্রত্যেক বাক্যের সম্ভাবনা হিসেবে গণনা করে, দাবীর বিরুদ্ধে বা বি এলএসএমএস নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে কোন সর্বশ্রেষ্ঠ প্রদর্শনী সিস্টেমের সঠিকভাবে 64.49%', 'fi': 'Nykypäivän digitaalisessa informaatiomaailmassa faktojen todentamisjärjestelmä puheessa, painetussa mediassa tai verkkosisällössä esitettyjen väitteiden kumoamiseksi on tunnin tarve. Ehdotamme järjestelmää, jolla varmistettaisiin väite lähteestä ja luokiteltaisiin väite todeksi, vääräksi, asiayhteydettömäksi tai sopimattomaksi järjestelmälle toimitetun tekstilähteen suhteen. Todellista merkintää käytetään, jos väite on totta, väärä, jos väite on väärä, jos väite ei liity lähteeseen, se luokitellaan asiayhteydestä riippumattomaksi ja jos väitettä ei voida todentaa lainkaan, se luokitellaan sopimattomaksi. Tämä auttaisi meitä vahvistamaan väitteen tai tosiasian sekä tietämään lähteestä tai tietopohjasta, jota vastaan yritämme todentaa tosiasiamme. Käytimme kaksivaiheista lähestymistapaa tavoitteemme saavuttamiseksi. Aluksi haettiin näyttöä väitteisiin liittyvästä tekstilähteestä käyttäen termitaajuus-käänteinen dokumenttitaajuus (TF-IDF) -vektoreita. Myöhemmin luokittelimme väitteiden ja todisteiden parit tosiksi, vääriksi, sopimattomiksi ja asiayhteydettömiksi käyttäen muokattua versiota tekstiimplementointimoduulista. Tekstuaalinen sidonnaisuusmoduuli laskee todennäköisyyden, että jokainen lause tukee vaatimusta, rikkoo vaatimusta tai ei anna mitään olennaista tietoa Bi-LSTM-verkoston avulla väitteen todenmukaisuuden arvioimiseksi. Parhaiten suoriutuvan järjestelmän tarkkuus on 64,49%', 'jv': "Nang arah-sangan digit kanggo informasi saiki, sistem weruh nggawe gerakan kanggo nganggo perusahaan langgar, gambaran media lan online kuwi diandelak kanggo ngubah dhéwé. Awak dhéwé ngerbah sistem sing arep nggawe aturan sing arep ngejaraké karo perusahaan karo perusahaan lan kelas dhéwé true, false é, iso teka-kontèks obah sing or a oleh nggawe aturan kelas nggawe sistem. UnknownMonitor vendor Iki lak ngéwangi awak dhéwé ngerasakno pangan dhéwé uga ngerasakno karo hal source dadi awak dhéwé ngerasakno sing ngregani barang awak dhéwé ngematsak barêng awak dhéwé. Awak dhéwé wis nambah kelas telu kanggo nambah iki. In first, we resumed documents connected to the ads from the textual source use the Terminal Refresh-Inertse document Refresh(TIF-ID) vectors.  Info Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog Presis kanggo sistem sing paling dhéwé nang 64.49%", 'he': 'בעולם המידע הדיגיטלי של היום, מערכת האישור העובדות כדי להפריע לטענות שנעשו בנאום, בתקשורת הדפסה או בתוכן באינטרנט היא הצורך של השעה. אנו מציעים מערכת שתאשר תביעה נגד מקור ותקלאס את הטענה להיות אמיתית, שווא, מחוץ לקשר או טענה לא הולמת בנוגע למקור טקסטלי שנספק למערכת. A true label is used if the claim is true, false if it is false, if the claim has no relation with the source then it is classified as out-of-context and if the claim cannot be verified at all then it is classified as inappropriate.  זה יעזור לנו לאמת טענה או עובדה כמו גם לדעת על המקור או בסיס הידע שלנו שאנחנו מנסים לאמת את העובדות שלנו. השתמשנו בגישה בשתי צעדים כדי להשיג את המטרה שלנו. בהתחלה, השגנו ראיות קשורות לטענויות מהמקור הטקסטלי בשימוש לוקטורי תדר התדריך ההפוך (TF-IDF). מאוחר יותר סיווחנו את זוגות הראיות-טענות כאמיתיות, שגויות, בלתי הולמות ומחוץ לקונקסט בשימוש בגרסה שינויה של מודול התערבות טקסטולית. מודול הכניסה טקסטולית מחשב את הסבירות של כל משפט שמתמך בטענה, מתנגד הטענה או לא מספק מידע רלוונטי באמצעות רשת BI-LSTM כדי להעריך את האמת של הטענה. מדויקת מערכת ההופעה הטובה ביותר היא 64.49%', 'ha': "Daga dunar digitali na yanzu, yana da tsarin gaskiyar ta gaskata da za'a motsar da gaskiyar da aka faɗa cikin hotuba, kuma, ana rubutu da zanen mutane da ke cikin shirin ayuka ko kuma yana da amfani da sa'a. We propose a system which would verify a claim against a source and classify the claim to be true, false, out-of-context or an inappropriate claim with respect to the textual source provided to the system.  An yi amfani da wani label na gaskiya idan gaskiya ta kasance ƙarya, kuma idan ƙarya ne, idan dai dai bai da wata danganci na source, to, za'a classified shi kamar bã-context kuma idan ba a iya tabbatar da daidai ba, sai a ƙayyade shi kamar ba da daidai ba. Wannan yana taimako da mu gaskata masu kalma ko gaskiya kamar yadda muka san asalin saninmu ko kuma don mu sami saninmu, don haka ne Muke jarraba ka gaskata masu gaskiya. Mun yi amfani da hanyoyi biyu zuwa ga sãmun goanmu. Ga farkon, muka sami bayanin da aka yi wa daidai daga sourcen na rubutu da ke amfani da shiryoyi na Frequency-Inspect Document (TF-IDF). Bayan haka, Muka raba nau'in shaidar-daidai kamar gaskiya, ƙarya, da kuma bã da inganci ba da wani gyare-gyare na tsarin sigogi na rubutun da ba'a sani ba. modulen da aka sani na rubutu yana ƙidãya wa'anar ɗabi'a mai ƙaranci daidai, mai motsi ga daidai ko kuma bã ya bãyar da wani maɓalli da amfani da shirin Bi-LStaM don ya ƙayyade gaskiyar daidaita. Tsariya na kasa mafi kyaun tafiyar da shi yana 64.49%", 'sk': 'V današnjem digitalnem svetu informacij je sistem za preverjanje dejstev za ovrgnitev trditev govora, tiskanih medijev ali spletnih vsebin potreba ure. Predlagamo sistem, ki bi preveril trditev proti viru in jo razvrstil kot resnično, napačno, izven konteksta ali neprimerno trditev glede na besedilni vir, zagotovljen sistemu. Resnična oznaka se uporabi, če je trditev resnična, napačna, če trditev nima povezave z virom, se razvrsti kot izven konteksta in če trditve sploh ni mogoče preveriti, se razvrsti kot neprimerna. To bi nam pomagalo preveriti trditev ali dejstvo ter vedeti o viru ali bazi znanja, na podlagi katere poskušamo preveriti naša dejstva. Za dosego cilja smo uporabili dvostopenjski pristop. Najprej smo pridobili dokaze v zvezi s trditvami iz besedilnega vira z uporabo vektorjev Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF). Kasneje smo s pomočjo spremenjene različice besedilnega modula razvrstili pare trditev-dokazov kot resnične, napačne, neprimerne in izven konteksta. Modul besedilnega vključevanja izračuna verjetnost, da vsak stavek podpira zahtevek, nasprotuje zahtevku ali ne zagotavlja pomembnih informacij z uporabo mreže Bi-LSTM za oceno verodostojnosti zahtevka. Natančnost najbolj učinkovitega sistema je 64,49%', 'bo': 'དེ་རིང་གི་གྲངས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་འཇིག་རྟེན་དེ། དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་ཐོག་མཛོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་དག་ཆུ་ཚོད་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་ཅིག་གདམ་ཁ་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་ཅིག་ལ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་པའམ་བདེན་པ། true འམ་བདེན་པའི་ཁ་ཡིག་སྟོན་ཞིག་ནི་གལ་སྲིད་trueའམ་བདེན་པར་false འདིས་ང་ཚོར་རྟོགས་ཞིག་དང་། དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་ཞིག་ཏུ་ཆོག་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་ ང་ཚོས་ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ཐུབ་པར་ཕྱོགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད། At first, we retrieved evidence related to the claims from the textual source using the Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency(TF-IDF) vectors. Later we classified the claim-evidence pairs as true, false, inappropriate and out of context using a modified version of textual entailment module. Textual entailment module calculates the probability of each sentence supporting the claim, contradicting the claim or not providing any relevant information using Bi-LSTM network to assess the veracity of the claim. བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་མ་ལག་གི་ཁྱད་ཚད་ལྡན་ཤིག་ཚད་6449%'}
{'en': 'A Neural Network Component for Knowledge-Based Semantic Representations of Text', 'ar': 'مكون شبكة عصبية للتمثيلات الدلالية القائمة على المعرفة للنص', 'fr': 'Un composant de réseau neuronal pour les représentations sémantiques de texte basées sur la connaissance', 'pt': 'Um componente de rede neural para representações semânticas de texto baseadas em conhecimento', 'es': 'Un componente de red neuronal para representaciones semánticas de texto basadas en el conocimiento', 'ja': 'テキストの知識ベースのセマンティック表現のためのニューラルネットワークコンポーネント', 'zh': '文本语义神经网络组件', 'hi': 'पाठ के ज्ञान-आधारित शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क घटक', 'ru': 'Компонент нейронной сети для семантических представлений текста на основе знаний', 'ga': 'Comhpháirt Líonra Néarach do Léirithe Séimeantacha atá Bunaithe ar Eolas ar Théacs', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Neurális hálózati komponens a tudásalapú szemantikus szövegreprezentációkhoz', 'el': 'Ένα στοιχείο νευρωνικού δικτύου για τις σημαντικές αναπαραστάσεις κειμένου βασισμένες στη γνώση', 'it': 'Componente di rete neurale per rappresentazioni semantiche basate sulla conoscenza del testo', 'kk': 'Мәтіннің білім негізіндеген семантикалық таңбаларының нейрондық желі компонентіName', 'lt': 'Neuralinio tinklo komponentas, skirtas žiniomis pagrįstoms Semantinėms teksto reprezentacijoms', 'ms': 'Name', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'അറിവു്- അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സെമാന്റിക് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്കു് വേണ്ടി നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് ഘടകംName', 'mn': 'Мэдлэг-based Semantic Representations of Text-ийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээний компонент', 'no': 'Name', 'mt': 'Komponent tan-Netwerk Newrali għar-Rappreżentazzjonijiet Semantiċi tat-Test ibbażati fuq l-Għarfien', 'pl': 'Komponent sieci neuronowej dla semantycznych reprezentacji tekstu opartych na wiedzy', 'ro': 'O componentă de rețea neurală pentru reprezentarea semantică bazată pe cunoaștere a textului', 'sr': 'Komponent neuronske mreže za semantičke predstave teksta na osnovu znanja', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En neural nätverkskomponent för kunskapsbaserade semantiska representationer av text', 'so': 'Qaybta shabakadda Neural ee aqoonta-Based Semantic Representations of Text', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படையில் அடிப்படையான பெமான்டிக் குறிப்புகளுக்கான நெருக்கல் வலைப்பின்னல் பகுதிName', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thành phần mạng thần kinh cho Hình tượng Trung học', 'da': 'En neural netværkskomponent til videnbaserede semantiske repræsentationer af tekst', 'hr': 'Komponent neuronske mreže za semantične predstave teksta na znanju', 'nl': 'Een neuronale netwerkcomponent voor kennisgebaseerde semantische representaties van tekst', 'id': 'Komponen Jaringan Neural untuk Perwakilan Semantik Berdasarkan Pengetahuan Teks', 'bg': 'Компонент на невралната мрежа за базирани на знанието семантични представяния на текст', 'de': 'Eine neuronale Netzwerkkomponente für wissensbasierte semantische Textdarstellungen', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '지식 기반의 텍스트 의미 표시 신경 네트워크 구성 요소', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Sehemu ya Mtandao wa Neural kwa ajili ya Representative wa Kimataifa inayotumiwa na ufahamu', 'tr': 'Bilgi-tabanly Semantik Metin Representations of a Neural Network Component', 'hy': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Një Komponent i Rrjetit Neural për Përfaqësimet Semantike të Tekstit Bazuar në njohuri', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'bn': 'জ্ঞান-ভিত্তিক সেম্যান্টিক প্রতিনিধির জন্য নেউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কম্পোনেন্ট', 'bs': 'Komponent neuronske mreže za semantičke predstave teksta na znanju', 'ca': 'Un component de xarxa neuronal per a representacions semenàtiques del text basades en el coneixement', 'cs': 'Součást neuronové sítě pro znalostně založené sémantické reprezentace textu', 'et': 'Teadmistepõhiste semantiliste teksti esituste neurovõrgu komponent', 'az': 'Bilim-tabanlı Semantik Metin İşyaları üçün Nöral A ğ Komponenti', 'fi': 'A Neural Network Component for Knowledge Based Semantic Representations of Text', 'jv': 'A Neral Network Kompont kanggo Awal-Basa semanti representations of Text', 'he': 'Name', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Komponenta nevralnega omrežja za znanje temelječe semantične predstavitve besedila', 'bo': 'ཤེས་རིག་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་སྔོན་ཤུགས་ཀྱི་ཡི་གེ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་སྐྱེལ་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ཆ་ཤས་'}
{'en': 'This paper presents Semantic Neural Networks (SNNs), a knowledge-aware component based on deep learning. SNNs can be trained to encode explicit semantic knowledge from an arbitrary knowledge base, and can subsequently be combined with other deep learning architectures. At prediction time, SNNs provide a semantic encoding extracted from the input data, which can be exploited by other neural network components to build extended representation models that can face alternative problems. The SNN architecture is defined in terms of the concepts and relations present in a knowledge base. Based on this architecture, a training procedure is developed. Finally, an experimental setup is presented to illustrate the behaviour and performance of a SNN for a specific NLP problem, in this case, opinion mining for the classification of movie reviews.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة الشبكات العصبية الدلالية (SNNs) ، وهي مكون مدرك للمعرفة يعتمد على التعلم العميق. يمكن تدريب SNNs لتشفير المعرفة الدلالية الصريحة من قاعدة المعرفة التعسفية ، ويمكن دمجها لاحقًا مع بنى التعلم العميق الأخرى. في وقت التنبؤ ، توفر SNNs ترميزًا دلاليًا مستخرجًا من بيانات الإدخال ، والتي يمكن استغلالها بواسطة مكونات الشبكة العصبية الأخرى لبناء نماذج تمثيل موسعة يمكن أن تواجه مشاكل بديلة. يتم تعريف بنية SNN من حيث المفاهيم والعلاقات الموجودة في قاعدة المعرفة. بناءً على هذه البنية ، تم تطوير إجراء تدريب. أخيرًا ، تم تقديم إعداد تجريبي لتوضيح سلوك وأداء SNN لمشكلة معالجة لغوية معينة محددة ، في هذه الحالة ، التنقيب عن الرأي لتصنيف مراجعات الأفلام.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta las redes neuronales semánticas (SNN), un componente de conocimiento basado en el aprendizaje profundo. Las SNN pueden entrenarse para codificar conocimiento semántico explícito a partir de una base de conocimientos arbitraria y, posteriormente, pueden combinarse con otras arquitecturas de aprendizaje profundo. En el momento de la predicción, las SNN proporcionan una codificación semántica extraída de los datos de entrada, que pueden aprovechar otros componentes de la red neuronal para construir modelos de representación ampliados que pueden enfrentar problemas alternativos. La arquitectura SNN se define en términos de los conceptos y las relaciones presentes en una base de conocimientos. Sobre la base de esta arquitectura, se desarrolla un procedimiento de formación. Finalmente, se presenta una configuración experimental para ilustrar el comportamiento y el rendimiento de una SNN para un problema específico de PNL, en este caso, la minería de opiniones para la clasificación de las críticas de cine.', 'fr': "Cet article présente les réseaux neuronaux sémantiques (SNN), un composant sensible aux connaissances basé sur le deep learning. Les SNN peuvent être formés pour coder des connaissances sémantiques explicites à partir d'une base de connaissances arbitraire, et peuvent ensuite être combinés avec d'autres architectures de deep learning. Au moment de la prédiction, les SNN fournissent un codage sémantique extrait des données d'entrée, qui peut être exploité par d'autres composants de réseau neuronal pour construire des modèles de représentation étendus qui peuvent faire face à d'autres problèmes. L'architecture SNN est définie en fonction des concepts et des relations présents dans une base de connaissances. Sur la base de cette architecture, une procédure de formation est développée. Enfin, un montage expérimental est présenté pour illustrer le comportement et les performances d'un SNN pour un problème de PNL spécifique, dans ce cas, la recherche d'opinion pour la classification des critiques de films.", 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta as Redes Neurais Semânticas (SNNs), um componente de conhecimento baseado em aprendizado profundo. Os SNNs podem ser treinados para codificar o conhecimento semântico explícito de uma base de conhecimento arbitrária e, posteriormente, podem ser combinados com outras arquiteturas de aprendizado profundo. No momento da previsão, os SNNs fornecem uma codificação semântica extraída dos dados de entrada, que pode ser explorada por outros componentes da rede neural para construir modelos de representação estendidos que podem enfrentar problemas alternativos. A arquitetura SNN é definida em termos de conceitos e relações presentes em uma base de conhecimento. Com base nessa arquitetura, um procedimento de treinamento é desenvolvido. Por fim, uma configuração experimental é apresentada para ilustrar o comportamento e desempenho de um SNN para um problema específico de PNL, neste caso, mineração de opinião para a classificação de resenhas de filmes.', 'ja': '本稿では，ディープラーニングに基づく知識認識コンポーネントであるセマンティックニューラルネットワーク（ SNN ）について紹介する。ＳＮＮは、任意の知識ベースから明示的な意味知識を符号化するように訓練することができ、その後、他の深層学習アーキテクチャと組み合わせることができる。予測時間において、ＳＮＮは、入力データから抽出されたセマンティック符号化を提供し、これは、他のニューラルネットワークコンポーネントによって利用されて、代替問題に直面し得る拡張表現モデルを構築することができる。SNNアーキテクチャは、知識ベースに存在する概念と関係性の観点から定義される。このアーキテクチャに基づいて、トレーニング手順が開発されます。最後に、特定のNLP問題に対するSNNの挙動とパフォーマンス、この場合は映画レビューの分類のためのオピニオンマイニングを例示するための実験的なセットアップを提示する。', 'zh': '本文言语义神经网络(SNN),盖深学之感知组件。 可以训SNN自任知识库之显式语义编码,然后可以合架构深学。 其占也,SNN 取诸输数之语义编码,其他神经网络组件可以编码构可代者广之。 SNN 体系结构者,以知识库之名义也。 基于此体系结构,开一训练。 最后设实验以明SNN特定NLP行性能,于例发掘电影论之类。', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлены семантические нейронные сети (SNN), компонент, основанный на глубоком обучении. SNN могут быть обучены кодировать явные семантические знания из произвольной базы знаний и впоследствии могут быть объединены с другими архитектурами глубокого обучения. Во время предсказания SNN предоставляют семантическую кодировку, извлеченную из входных данных, которая может быть использована другими компонентами нейронной сети для построения расширенных моделей представления, которые могут столкнуться с альтернативными проблемами. Архитектура SNN определяется концепциями и отношениями, присутствующими в базе знаний. На основе этой архитектуры разрабатывается процедура обучения. Наконец, представлена экспериментальная настройка для иллюстрации поведения и производительности SNN для конкретной проблемы NLP, в данном случае, для анализа мнений для классификации обзоров фильмов.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर सिमेंटिक न्यूरल नेटवर्क (एसएनएन) प्रस्तुत करता है, जो गहरी शिक्षा के आधार पर एक ज्ञान-जागरूक घटक है। एसएनएन को एक मनमाने ढंग से ज्ञान के आधार से स्पष्ट शब्दार्थ ज्ञान को एन्कोड करने के लिए प्रशिक्षित किया जा सकता है, और बाद में अन्य गहरे सीखने के आर्किटेक्चर के साथ जोड़ा जा सकता है। भविष्यवाणी के समय में, एसएनएन इनपुट डेटा से निकाले गए एक शब्दार्थ एन्कोडिंग प्रदान करते हैं, जिसे अन्य तंत्रिका नेटवर्क घटकों द्वारा विस्तारित प्रतिनिधित्व मॉडल बनाने के लिए शोषण किया जा सकता है जो वैकल्पिक समस्याओं का सामना कर सकते हैं। एसएनएन वास्तुकला को ज्ञान के आधार में मौजूद अवधारणाओं और संबंधों के संदर्भ में परिभाषित किया गया है। इस वास्तुकला के आधार पर, एक प्रशिक्षण प्रक्रिया विकसित की जाती है। अंत में, एक प्रयोगात्मक सेटअप एक विशिष्ट एनएलपी समस्या के लिए एक एसएनएन के व्यवहार और प्रदर्शन को चित्रित करने के लिए प्रस्तुत किया जाता है, इस मामले में, फिल्म समीक्षाओं के वर्गीकरण के लिए राय खनन।', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo Líonraí Séimeantacha Néaracha (SNNanna) i láthair, comhpháirt eolasbhunaithe atá bunaithe ar dhomhainfhoghlaim. Is féidir SNNanna a oiliúint chun eolas shéimeantach sainráite a ionchódú ó bhunachar eolais treallach, agus is féidir iad a chomhcheangal ina dhiaidh sin le hailtireachtaí domhainfhoghlama eile. Ag am réamh-mheastacháin, soláthraíonn SNNanna ionchódú shéimeantach a bhaintear as na sonraí ionchuir, ar féidir le comhpháirteanna eile de líonra néarúil é a shaothrú chun samhlacha ionadaíochta leathnaithe a thógáil a d’fhéadfadh fadhbanna eile a bheith ann. Sainmhínítear ailtireacht SNN i dtéarmaí na gcoincheap agus na gcaidreamh atá i láthair i mbonn eolais. Bunaithe ar an ailtireacht seo, forbraítear nós imeachta oiliúna. Ar deireadh, cuirtear socrú turgnamhach i láthair chun iompar agus feidhmíocht SNN a léiriú le haghaidh fadhb shonrach NLP, sa chás seo, mianadóireacht tuairimí maidir le haicmiú athbhreithnithe scannáin.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány bemutatja a mélytanuláson alapuló tudásra épülő szemantikus neurális hálózatokat (Szemantikus Neural Networks, SNN-eket). Az SNN-ek képezhetők arra, hogy tetszőleges tudásbázisból kódoljanak explicit szemantikai ismereteket, és ezt követően kombinálhatók más mélytanulási architektúrákkal. Az előrejelzések időpontjában az SNN-ek a bemeneti adatokból kivont szemantikai kódolást biztosítanak, amelyet más neurális hálózati komponensek használhatnak ki olyan kiterjesztett reprezentációs modellek létrehozására, amelyek alternatív problémákkal szembesülhetnek. Az SNN architektúrát a tudásbázisban jelen lévő fogalmak és kapcsolatok alapján határozzák meg. Ezen architektúra alapján kidolgozunk egy képzési eljárást. Végezetül egy kísérleti felállítást mutatunk be egy SNN viselkedésének és teljesítményének bemutatására egy adott NLP probléma esetében, ebben az esetben a filmkritikák osztályozásához szükséges véleménybányászat.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის სიმანტიკური ნეიროლური ქსელები (SNNs), ცნობიერი კომპონენტი, რომელიც ძალიან სწავლების დაბაზეულია. SNNs შეიძლება იყოს განაკეთებული სემონტიკური ცნობილების კოდირებისთვის არბრიტური ცნობილის ბაზიდან, და შემდეგ შეიძლება იყოს სხვა ძალიან სწავლების აქტიქტიქტურებით SNNs-ს წარმოდგენის დროში სენმანტიკური კოდინტიკური კოდინტიკური გამოყენება, რომელიც შეიძლება გამოყენება სხვა ნეიროლური ქსელის კომპონტენტებით, რომელიც შეიძლება გამოყენება SNN არქიტექტიკატი განსაზღვრებულია კონფექტების და შესახებების შესახებ, რომლებიც ცნობიერების ბაზაში არსებულია. ამ არქტიქტურის ბაზაზე განვითარება განვითარება. საბოლოოდ, ექსპერიმენტიური შესაძლებელია, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული NLP პრობლემის ქცევა და გამოყენება, რომელიც ამ შემთხვევაში ფილმენტის განახლებების კლასიფიკაციაში მინდომენობა.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει τα Σημαντικά Νευρικά Δίκτυα (ΣΝΝ), ένα συστατικό γνώσεων που βασίζεται στη βαθιά μάθηση. Τα SNN μπορούν να εκπαιδευτούν για να κωδικοποιήσουν ρητή σημασιολογική γνώση από μια αυθαίρετη βάση γνώσεων, και στη συνέχεια μπορούν να συνδυαστούν με άλλες αρχιτεκτονικές βαθιάς μάθησης. Κατά τη διάρκεια της πρόβλεψης, τα SNN παρέχουν μια σημασιολογική κωδικοποίηση που εξάγεται από τα δεδομένα εισόδου, η οποία μπορεί να αξιοποιηθεί από άλλα συστατικά νευρωνικών δικτύων για την κατασκευή εκτεταμένων μοντέλων αναπαράστασης που μπορούν να αντιμετωπίσουν εναλλακτικά προβλήματα. Η αρχιτεκτονική του ορίζεται με βάση τις έννοιες και τις σχέσεις που υπάρχουν σε μια βάση γνώσης. Με βάση αυτή την αρχιτεκτονική, αναπτύσσεται μια διαδικασία κατάρτισης. Τέλος, παρουσιάζεται μια πειραματική ρύθμιση για την απεικόνιση της συμπεριφοράς και της απόδοσης ενός SNN για ένα συγκεκριμένο πρόβλημα, στην προκειμένη περίπτωση, εξόρυξη γνώμης για την ταξινόμηση κριτικών ταινιών.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta le reti neurali semantiche (SNN), una componente consapevole della conoscenza basata sul deep learning. Le SNN possono essere addestrate a codificare conoscenze semantiche esplicite da una base di conoscenze arbitraria e possono successivamente essere combinate con altre architetture di deep learning. Al momento della previsione, le SNN forniscono una codifica semantica estratta dai dati di input, che può essere sfruttata da altri componenti della rete neurale per costruire modelli di rappresentazione estesi che possono affrontare problemi alternativi. L'architettura SNN è definita in termini di concetti e relazioni presenti in una base di conoscenza. Sulla base di questa architettura, viene sviluppata una procedura di formazione. Infine, viene presentato un setup sperimentale per illustrare il comportamento e le prestazioni di una SNN per uno specifico problema NLP, in questo caso, opinion mining per la classificazione delle recensioni cinematografiche.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз терең оқытуға негізделген білім беру компонентін Semantic Neural Networks (SNN) көрсетеді. СН бағдарламалардың өзгертілген білім негізінен белгілі симантикалық білімдерді кодтау үшін оқыту мүмкін болады. Содан кейін басқа терең оқыту архитектураларымен біріктіре алады. Кіріс мәліметтерден таратылған сентикалық кодтамасы келтіреді. Бұл басқа невралдық желі компоненттерлер қолданылады, олардың альтернативті мәселелерді құру үшін кеңейтілген кеңейту үлгілерін құру үші SNN архитектурасы білім негізінде бар концепциялар мен қатынастарының түрінде анықталды. Бұл архитектура негізінде оқыту процедуры жасалған. Соңғы жағдайда, СНН қасиетті NLP мәселесі үшін тәжірибе баптаулары көрсетіледі. Бұл жағдайда, фильм редакцияларының классификациясының арқылы мен әрекетті көрсетіледі.', 'mk': 'Овој документ претставува семантички неврални мрежи (СНН), компонент на знаење базиран на длабоко учење. SNNs can be trained to encode explicit semantic knowledge from an arbitrary knowledge base, and can subsequently be combined with other deep learning architectures.  Во времето на предвидување, СНН обезбедуваат семантично кодирање извадено од внатрешните податоци, кое може да биде искористено од други компоненти на нервната мрежа за изградба на проширени примероци кои можат да се соочат со алтернативни проблеми. Архитектурата на СНН е дефинирана во поглед на концептите и односите присутни во базата на знаење. На основа на оваа архитектура, се развива процедура за обука. Конечно, се претставува експериментална поставка за илустрирање на однесувањето и изведувањето на СНН за специфичен проблем со НЛП, во овој случај, минирање на мислење за класификацијата на филмските рецензии.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatomi Semantiniai neurologiniai tinklai (SNN), žiniomis pagrįsti komponentai. SNNs can be trained to encode explicit semantic knowledge from an arbitrary knowledge base, and can subsequently be combined with other deep learning architectures.  Numatymo metu SNN teikia semantinį kodavimą, išgautą iš įvesties duomenų, kurį gali naudoti kiti neurologinio tinklo komponentai, kad būtų sukurti išplėsti reprezentaciniai modeliai, galintys susidurti su alternatyviomis problemomis. SNN architektūra apibrėžiama žinių bazėje esančiomis sąvokomis ir santykiais. Remiantis šia architektūra rengiama mokymo procedūra. Galiausiai pateikiama eksperimentinė struktūra, kuria siekiama parodyti SNN elgesį ir veiklos rezultatus konkrečiai NLP problemai spręsti, šiuo atveju – nuomonės kasyba kino apžvalgoms klasifikuoti.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan Rangkaian Neural Semantik (SNN), komponen pengetahuan berdasarkan belajar dalam. SNN boleh dilatih untuk mengekodkan pengetahuan semantik secara eksplicit dari pangkalan pengetahuan arbitrari, dan kemudian boleh digabung dengan arkitektur belajar dalam lain. Pada masa ramalan, SNN menyediakan pengekodan semantik yang dikekstrak dari data input, yang boleh dieksploitasi oleh komponen rangkaian saraf lain untuk membina model perwakilan lanjutan yang boleh menghadapi masalah alternatif. Arkitektur SNN ditakrif dalam terma konsep dan hubungan yang ada dalam pangkalan pengetahuan. Berdasarkan arkitektur ini, prosedur latihan telah dikembangkan. Akhirnya, seting percubaan dipaparkan untuk memperlihatkan perilaku dan prestasi SNN untuk masalah NLP tertentu, dalam kes ini, penambahan pendapat untuk klasifikasi ulasan filem.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. ആഴത്തെ പഠനം അടിസ്ഥാനമായി അറിയുന്ന ഒരു വിവ എസ്എന്\u200dഎന്\u200dസിനെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധാരണ ജ്ഞാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് നിന്നും വ്യക്തമായി സെമാന്റിക് അറിവ് കോഡിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d  പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന സമയത്ത്, SNNs ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു സെമാന്റിക് കോഡിങ് നല്\u200dകുന്നു. അത് മറ്റു പ്രശ്നങ ജ്ഞാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ആശയങ്ങളും ബന്ധങ്ങളും വ്യക്തമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ആര്\u200dക്കിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് ഒരു ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ പ്രക്രിയയാണ് വികസിക്കുന്നത്. അവസാനം, സിനിമ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വ്യക്തമായ പ്രശ്നത്തിനുള്ള സ്വഭാവവും പ്രകടനത്തെയും കാണിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു പരീക്ഷണ സജ്ജീകരണവും കാണിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta Netwerks Newrali Semantiċi (SNNs), komponent konxju mill-għarfien ibbażat fuq tagħlim profond. L-SNN jistgħu jiġu mħarrġa biex jikkodifikaw għarfien semantiku espliċitu minn bażi ta’ għarfien arbitrarju, u sussegwentement jistgħu jiġu kkombinati ma’ arkitetturi oħra ta’ tagħlim profond. Fil-ħin tat-tbassir, l-SNNs jipprovdu kodifikazzjoni semantika estratta mid-dejta tal-input, li tista’ tiġi sfruttata minn komponenti oħra tan-netwerk newrali biex jinbnew mudelli estiżi ta’ rappreżentanza li jistgħu jiffaċċjaw problemi alternattivi. L-arkitettura SNN hija ddefinita f’termini tal-kunċetti u r-relazzjonijiet preżenti f’bażi ta’ għarfien. Abbażi ta’ din l-arkitettura, tiġi żviluppata proċedura ta’ taħriġ. Fl-a ħħar nett, qed tiġi ppreżentata struttura sperimentali biex turi l-imġiba u l-prestazzjoni ta’ SNN għal problem a speċifika tal-NLP, f’dan il-każ, it-tħaffir tal-opinjonijiet għall-klassifikazzjoni tar-reviżjonijiet tal-films.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас гүн гүнзгий сургалтын үндсэн мэдлэгтэй компонент Semantic Neural Networks (SNN) гэдгийг харуулдаг. СНН-г өөрсдийн мэдлэгийн суурь дээр тодорхой хэмжээний мэдлэгийг кодлох боломжтой болгож болох ба дараа нь бусад гүн гүнзгий суралцах архитектуруудтай холбогдож болно. Таамаглах цаг үед, СNN-д оролцооны өгөгдлийн мэдээллээс гаргасан семантик кодлог өгдөг. Энэ нь өөр мэдрэлийн сүлжээний компонентүүд ашиглаж болох, өөр өөр асуудлуудтай тулгарч чадах өргөн загварын загваруудыг бү СНН архитектур нь мэдлэг суурьдаа байгаа ойлголт болон харилцаанд тодорхойлдог. Энэ архитектур дээр сургалтын процедур хөгжүүлж байна. Эцэст нь, нэг туршилтын төлөвлөгөө нь НЛП-ын тодорхой асуудлын харилцаа, үйл ажиллагааг дүрслэх болно. Энэ тохиолдолд, киноны шалгалтын хуваалцааны талаар бодол зориулагдсан.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea prezintă Rețelele Neurale Semantice (SNN), o componentă conștientă de cunoaștere bazată pe învățarea profundă. SNN-urile pot fi instruite să codeze cunoștințe semantice explicite dintr-o bază de cunoștințe arbitrare și pot fi ulterior combinate cu alte arhitecturi de învățare profundă. La momentul predicției, SNN-urile furnizează o codificare semantică extrasă din datele de intrare, care poate fi exploatată de alte componente ale rețelei neurale pentru a construi modele extinse de reprezentare care se pot confrunta cu probleme alternative. Arhitectura SNN este definită în termeni de concepte și relații prezente într-o bază de cunoștințe. Pe baza acestei arhitecturi, se dezvoltă o procedură de instruire. În cele din urmă, este prezentată o configurație experimentală pentru a ilustra comportamentul și performanța unui SNN pentru o anumită problemă PNL, în acest caz, opinie mining pentru clasificarea recenziilor de film.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser semianske neuralnettverk (SNNs), ein kjenneverkskomponent basert på dypt læring. SNNs kan trenjast til å koda eksplisitt semantisk kunnskap frå ein tilfeldig kunnskapsbasen, og så kan kombinasjonast med andre dype læringsarkitekturar. På forhåndsvisningstid gjev SNN ein semantisk koding utpakka frå inndata, som kan brukast av andre neuralnettverkskomponentar for å bygge utvida representasjonsmodular som kan sjå på alternativ problemar. SNN- arkitekturen er definert i uttrykk av konseptane og relasjonane som finst i ein kunnskapsbasen. Basert på denne arkitekturen er ei opplæringsprosedyr utvikla. Ein eksperimentell oppsett vert vist til å illustrare oppførsel og utviklinga av ein SNN for eit spesifikke NLP-problem, i dette tilfellet, gjennomsnittet for klassifisering av filmoversiktar.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono Semantyczne Sieci Neuralne (SNN), komponent świadomy wiedzy oparty na głębokim uczeniu. SNN mogą być przeszkolone do kodowania wyraźnej wiedzy semantycznej z dowolnej bazy wiedzy, a następnie mogą być łączone z innymi architekturami głębokiego uczenia. W czasie przewidywania SNN zapewniają kodowanie semantyczne wyodrębnione z danych wejściowych, które mogą być wykorzystywane przez inne komponenty sieci neuronowej do zbudowania rozszerzonych modeli reprezentacji, które mogą stawić czoła alternatywnym problemom. Architektura SNN definiowana jest pod kątem koncepcji i relacji obecnych w bazie wiedzy. W oparciu o tę architekturę opracowana jest procedura szkoleniowa. Na koniec przedstawiono konfigurację eksperymentalną mającą na celu zilustrowanie zachowania i wydajności SNN dla konkretnego problemu NLP, w tym przypadku wydobywania opinii dla klasyfikacji recenzji filmów.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja semantičke neuralne mreže (SNN), komponentu svjesnog znanja baziranu na dubokom učenju. SNN može biti obučena kako bi kodirala pojasno semantičko znanje iz proizvoljne baze znanja, i posle toga se mogu kombinirati sa drugim dubokim učenjskim arhitekterijama. U predviđanju vremena, SNN pružaju semantički kodiranje izvučeno iz podataka o ulazu, koje mogu iskoristiti drugi komponenti neuronske mreže kako bi izgradili produžene modele predstavljanja koje mogu suočiti sa alternativnim problemima. Arhitektura SNN definisana je u smislu koncepta i odnosa koje su prisutne u bazi znanja. Na osnovu ove arhitekture, razvija se procedura obuke. Konačno se predstavlja eksperimentalna ustanova kako bi ilustrirala ponašanje i učinkovitost SNN za specifičan problem NLP-a, u ovom slučaju, rudarstvo mišljenja za klasifikaciju filmskih pregleda.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ සෙමැන්ටික් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය (SNNs), ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න අධිරූපයෙන් දන්නවත් අවශ්\u200dයයෙක් ප SNNs පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ සෙමැන්ටික් දන්නවක් කිරීම සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය දන්නවක් පිළිගන්න, සහ පස්ස විශ්වාස කාලයේදී, SNNs සෙමැන්ටික් සංකේතනයක් දෙන්නේ ඇතුළු දත්තෙන් එළියට පිළිගත්ත, ඒක අනිත් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය සමාගයක් නි SNN නිර්මාණය ස්ථාපනය විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ දැනගන්න පුළුවන් හා සම්බන්ධතාවක් තියෙන්න මේ ස්ථාපනයේ අධිරූපයෙන්, ස්ථාපනයක් විකාශ කරනවා. අන්තිමේදි, ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙන්නේ SNN විශේෂ NLP ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා සැකසුම් සහ ප්\u200dරශ', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar Semantic Neural Networks (SNN), en kunskapsmedveten komponent baserad på djuplärande. SNN:er kan utbildas för att koda explicit semantisk kunskap från en godtycklig kunskapsbas, och kan därefter kombineras med andra djupinlärningsarkitekturer. Vid prediktionstiden tillhandahåller SNN en semantisk kodning extraherad från indata data, som kan utnyttjas av andra neurala nätverkskomponenter för att bygga utökade representationsmodeller som kan möta alternativa problem. SNN-arkitekturen definieras utifrån de begrepp och relationer som finns i en kunskapsbas. Utifrån denna arkitektur utvecklas ett utbildningsförfarande. Slutligen presenteras en experimentell setup för att illustrera beteendet och prestandan hos ett SNN för ett specifikt NLP-problem, i detta fall opinion mining för klassificering av filmrecensioner.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu soo bandhigaa shabakadda Semantic Neural Network (SNNs), kooxo aqoonta ku saleysan waxbarasho aad u dheer. SNNs waxaa lagu baran karaa in aad aqoonta cayimanta ah ka kooban karto aasaaska aqoonta sharafta ah, waxaana lagu dari karaa sidoo kale dhismaha waxbarashada ee mool dheer. Waqtiga la sii sheegayo SNNs waxay soo bandhigi karaan qoraal kooban oo laga soo saaray macluumaadka input, kaas oo lagu isticmaali karo kooxaha kale ee shabakadda neurada ah si uu u dhiso modelal u taagan oo u jeedi karo dhibaatooyin kala duwan. Qoraalka SNN waxaa lagu qoraa fikrada iyo xiriirka ku jira basaaska aqoonta. Baabuurkaas waxaa lagu saleyn karaa baaritaanka waxbarashada. Ugu dambaysta waxaa loo soo bandhigaa qalabka imtixaanka si uu u muujiyo tababarka iyo sameynta SNN dhibaato gaar ah oo ay u baahan tahay dhibaatada NLP, taas darteed, qiimeynta aragtida qoraalka filimada.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செமாண்டிக் நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல்களை (SNNs), ஆழமான கற்றத்தை அடிப்படையிலான அறிவு தெரியும் பொருள். SNNs குறியீட்டில் இருந்து வெளிப்படையான அறிவிப்பை குறியீட்டாக்க பயிற்சிக்க முடியும், பின்னர் மற்ற ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளு முன்வாக்கும் நேரத்தில், SNNs உள்ளீட்டு தரவிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட ஒரு அரைப்புருவ குறியீட்டை வழங்குகிறது, அது மற்ற புதிய புதிய பிணையம்  SNN உருவாக்கி அறிவு அடிப்படையில் இருக்கும் கருத்துகள் மற்றும் தொடர்புகளை விவரிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. இந்த அடிப்படையில், ஒரு பயிற்சி செயல்பாடு உருவாக்கப்பட்டது. இறுதியில், ஒரு சோதனைப்படுத்தல் அமைப்பு ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட NLP பிரச்சனைக்கு SNN நடத்தையும் செயல்பாட்டையும் வெளிப்படுத்துவதற்காக குறிப்ப', 'ur': 'This paper presents Semantic Neural Networks (SNNs), a knowledge-aware component based on deep learning. SNN کی تعلیم کی جاتی ہے کہ صریح سمانٹی علم کو ایک غیرقابل علم کی بنیاد سے پھیر سکتی ہے اور اس کے بعد دوسری عمیق تعلیم معماری کے ساتھ مل سکتی ہے. پیش بینی کے وقت، SNS ایک سیمنٹی اکنوڈ ڈیٹ سے نکالا گیا ہے، جو دوسرے نیورل نیٹ ورک komponents کے ذریعے استعمال کر سکتے ہیں، ان کے لئے استعمال کی مدل بنا سکتے ہیں جو alternative مشکلات کے سامنے ہو سکتے ہیں. SNN معماری معماری ایک علم بنیاد میں حاضر ہونے والی نظریں اور رابطہ کے مطابق تعریف کی جاتی ہے. اس معماری پر بنیاد ہے، ایک تدریس پردازی توسعہ کی جاتی ہے۔ آخر میں، ایک آزمائش سٹاپ ایک NLP مشکل کے لئے ایک SNN کے رفتار اور فعالیت کی تعریف کے لئے پیش کیے جاتے ہیں، اس کے بارے میں، فیلم ریویزوں کی کلاسیفوں کے لئے مزید نظر کے ذریعے.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz juda yaxshi o'rganish asosida semantik Neural Tarmoq (SNNS) yaratadi. Name Diqqat vaqtda SNNs kiritish maʼlumotidan aniqlangan semantik kodlash usulini koʻrsatiladi. Ularni boshqa tarmoq komponentlaridan foydalanish mumkin. Name Ushbu arxituvga asosida, ta'lim jarayonini tugatadi. Finally, an experimental setup is presented to illustrate the behaviour and performance of a SNN for a specific NLP problem, in this case, opinion mining for the classification of movie reviews.", 'vi': 'Bài báo này đưa ra kết quả thần kinh trung thành (SNN), một thành phần nhận thức về kiến thức dựa trên học sâu. Họ có thể huấn luyện để mã hóa hiểu biết theo ngữ nghĩa rõ ràng từ một căn cứ kiến thức ngẫu nhiên, và sau đó có thể kết hợp với các kiến trúc sâu học khác. Trong thời gian dự đoán, SNNs cung cấp một loại mã hóa theo ngữ nghĩa chiết xuất từ dữ liệu nhập, có thể được sử dụng bởi các thành phần mạng thần kinh khác để xây dựng các mô hình đại rộng có thể đối mặt với các vấn đề khác. Kiểu kiến trúc của CNN được xác định theo dạng khái niệm và quan hệ trong một căn cứ kiến thức. Dựa trên kiến trúc này, một quy trình huấn luyện được phát triển. Một dự án thử nghiệm được trình bày để minh họa hành vi và khả năng của người dân thuộc liên bang về một vấn đề đặc biệt, trong trường hợp này, khai thác ý kiến cho việc phân loại các bài xem phim.', 'da': "Denne artikel præsenterer Semantic Neural Networks (SNNs), en vidensbevidst komponent baseret på dyb læring. SNN'er kan trænes til at kode eksplicit semantisk viden fra en vilkårlig vidensbase og kan efterfølgende kombineres med andre deep learning arkitekturer. På forudsigelsestidspunktet giver SNN'er en semantisk kodning udvundet fra input data, som kan udnyttes af andre neurale netværkskomponenter til at opbygge udvidede repræsentationsmodeller, der kan stå over for alternative problemer. SNN-arkitekturen defineres ud fra de begreber og relationer, der findes i en vidensbase. Baseret på denne arkitektur udvikles en uddannelsesprocedure. Endelig præsenteres et eksperimentelt setup for at illustrere en SNN's adfærd og ydeevne til et specifikt NLP-problem, i dette tilfælde opinion mining til klassificering af filmanmeldelser.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя Семантични неврални мрежи (СНН), познат компонент, базиран на дълбоко учене. SNN могат да бъдат обучени да кодират изрично семантично знание от произволна база от знания и впоследствие могат да бъдат комбинирани с други архитектури за дълбоко обучение. По време на прогнозиране SNN предоставят семантично кодиране, извлечено от входните данни, което може да бъде експлоатирано от други компоненти на невронната мрежа за изграждане на разширени модели на представяне, които могат да се сблъскат с алтернативни проблеми. Архитектурата на СНН се определя от гледна точка на понятията и отношенията, присъстващи в базата на знания. Въз основа на тази архитектура се разработва процедура за обучение. На последно място е представена експериментална настройка, която илюстрира поведението и ефективността на SNN за конкретен проблем с НЛП, в този случай извличане на мнения за класификацията на филмовите ревюта.', 'nl': "Dit artikel presenteert Semantic Neural Networks (SNN's), een kennisbewuste component gebaseerd op deep learning. SNN's kunnen getraind worden om expliciete semantische kennis te coderen vanuit een willekeurige kennisbasis, en kunnen vervolgens gecombineerd worden met andere deep learning architecturen. Bij voorspellingstijd bieden SNN's een semantische codering die wordt geëxtraheerd uit de invoergegevens, die kan worden gebruikt door andere neurale netwerkcomponenten om uitgebreide representatiemodellen te bouwen die alternatieve problemen kunnen ondervinden. De SNN-architectuur wordt gedefinieerd in termen van concepten en relaties die aanwezig zijn in een kennisbank. Op basis van deze architectuur wordt een trainingsprocedure ontwikkeld. Tenslotte wordt een experimentele opstelling gepresenteerd om het gedrag en de prestaties van een SNN te illustreren voor een specifiek NLP-probleem, in dit geval opinion mining voor de classificatie van filmrecensies.", 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt Semantic Neural Networks (SNNs) vor, eine wissensbewusste Komponente basierend auf Deep Learning. SNNs können trainiert werden, explizites semantisches Wissen aus einer beliebigen Wissensbasis zu kodieren und anschließend mit anderen Deep Learning Architekturen kombiniert werden. Zur Vorhersagezeit liefern SNNs eine semantische Kodierung, die aus den Eingabedaten extrahiert wird, die von anderen neuronalen Netzwerkkomponenten ausgenutzt werden kann, um erweiterte Darstellungsmodelle zu erstellen, die alternative Probleme bewältigen können. Die SNN-Architektur wird anhand der Konzepte und Zusammenhänge definiert, die in einer Wissensdatenbank vorhanden sind. Auf Basis dieser Architektur wird ein Trainingsverfahren entwickelt. Abschließend wird ein experimenteller Aufbau vorgestellt, um das Verhalten und die Leistung eines SNN für ein bestimmtes NLP-Problem zu veranschaulichen, in diesem Fall Opinion Mining für die Klassifizierung von Filmkritiken.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja semantičke neuronske mreže (SNNs), komponentu svjesnog znanja na temelju dubokog učenja. SNN se mogu obučiti kako bi kodirali pojasno semantičko znanje iz proizvoljne baze znanja, te nakon toga se mogu kombinirati s drugim dubokim arhitekturom učenja. U predviđanju vrijeme, SNN pružaju semantički kodiranje izvučeno iz ulaznih podataka, koje mogu iskoristiti drugi komponenti neuronske mreže kako bi izgradili produžene modele zastupanja koje mogu suočiti s alternativnim problemima. Arhitektura SNN definirana je u smislu koncepta i odnosa koje su prisutne u bazi znanja. Na temelju ove arhitekture razvija se postupak obuke. Konačno se predstavlja eksperimentalna ustanova kako bi pokazala ponašanje i učinkovitost SNN za specifičan problem NLP-a, u tom slučaju, rudarstvo mišljenja za klasifikaciju filmskih pregleda.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan Networks Neural Semantik (SNN), komponen yang menyadari pengetahuan berdasarkan belajar dalam. SNN dapat dilatih untuk mengkode pengetahuan semantis eksplicit dari sebuah pangkalan pengetahuan arbitrari, dan kemudian dapat digabung dengan arsitektur belajar dalam lainnya. Pada waktu prediksi, SNN menyediakan pengekodan semantis yang diekstraksi dari data input, yang dapat dieksploitasi oleh komponen jaringan neural lainnya untuk membangun model representation yang luas yang dapat menghadapi masalah alternatif. Arkitektur SNN didefinisikan dalam terma konsep dan hubungan yang ada di dasar pengetahuan. Berdasarkan arsitektur ini, prosedur latihan dikembangkan. Akhirnya, sebuah pengaturan eksperimen dipaparkan untuk memperlihatkan perilaku dan prestasi dari SNN untuk masalah NLP spesifik, dalam kasus ini, penambangan pendapat untuk klasifikasi revisi film.', 'ko': '깊이 있는 학습을 바탕으로 하는 지식 감지 구성 요소의 의미 신경 네트워크를 제시했다.SNN은 임의의 지식 라이브러리에서 현식 의미 지식을 인코딩하고 그 다음에 다른 심도 있는 학습 구조와 결합하도록 훈련할 수 있다.예측 시 SNN은 입력 데이터에서 추출한 의미 인코딩을 제공하고, 다른 신경 네트워크 구성 요소는 이 인코딩을 이용하여 대체 문제에 직면할 수 있는 확장 표시 모델을 구축할 수 있다.SNN 아키텍처는 Knowledgebase의 개념 및 관계에 따라 정의됩니다.이 체계 구조를 바탕으로 교육 프로그램을 개발했다.마지막으로 SNN이 특정한 NLP 문제에서의 행위와 성능을 설명하는 실험 장치를 제시했는데 이 예에서 영화 평론 분류에 사용되는 의견 발굴이다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha Mtandao wa Neural wa Semantic Neural (SNNs), kitengele kinachofahamu kinachotokana na elimu ya kina. Watu wa SNN wanaweza kufundishwa kwa ajili ya kutangaza maarifa ya wazi ya kigaidi kutoka kwenye msingi wa maarifa ya kiholela, na baadae wanaweza kuunganishwa na majengo mengine ya kina ya kujifunza. Katika kipindi cha kutabiri, SNNN hutoa kodi ya kimapenzi iliyotolewa kutoka kwenye taarifa za input, ambazo zinaweza kutumika na vifaa vingine vya mtandao wa neurali ili kutengeneza mifano ya uwakilishaji uliopo ambazo inaweza kukabiliana na matatizo mbadala. Ujengo wa SNN unaelezea kwa mujibu wa dhana na mahusiano yanayopo kwenye msingi wa maarifa. Kutokana na ujenzi huu, utaratibu wa mafunzo umeendelea. Mwisho, taasisi ya majaribio inaonyesha tabia na utendaji wa SNN kwa tatizo maalum la NLP, kwa mujibu huu, maoni yanayokuwa yakichunguza kwa ajili ya kutangaza tafiti za filamu.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ شبکه\u200cهای عصبی (SNNs) Semantic Neural presents a component-aware based on deep learning. SNN می\u200cتواند دانش شناسی مشخص را از یک پایگاه دانش تصادفی تدریج کند و بعدش می\u200cتواند با دیگر معماری عمیق یادگیری را ترکیب کند. در زمان پیش\u200cبینی، SNN ها یک رمزبندی semantic را از داده\u200cهای ورودی استخراج می\u200cکنند، که می\u200cتواند توسط دیگر رشته\u200cهای شبکه عصبی استفاده شود تا مدل\u200cهای نمایش\u200cسازی گسترده\u200cای که می\u200cتوانند با مشکلات متفاوتی روبرو شوند. معماری SNN با توجه به نظر و ارتباط که در پایگاه دانش وجود دارند تعریف می شود. بر اساس این معماری، یک روش آموزش توسعه می\u200cشود. بالاخره، یک تنظیم آزمایشی برای نشان دادن رفتار و عملکرد یک SNN برای یک مشکل NLP خاص در این مورد، توصیف دادن نظر برای تنظیم تحقیقات فیلم است.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz Semantik Neural Networks (SNNs), gaty öwrenmelere daýanýan bilgi bilgili komponenti görkezýär. SNN senagatlary öz bilim üssünden kelläp kelläp bilen kelläp kodlamak üçin bilip biler, soňra başga derin öwrenme arhitektarlaryla birleşip biler. SNN girdi maglumatyndan çykylýan semantik ködleme üýtgedýär. Bu ýerde başga nöral şebek komponentleri tarapyndan ullanylabilir. Başga çykyş eserleri örän ködlemeler üçin golaýlaşýar. SNN arhitektegi bir bilim üssünde bolan düşünjeler we baglaýyşlar bilen tanyşdyrylýar. Bu arhitektura ynanýan bolsa, okuwçylyk procedesine gelinýär. Soňunda, SNN hili kynçylyk mesele üçin bir synap setirmesi görkezildi. Şol ýagdaýda, film reviewlerin klasifikasiýasynda pikir eden pikir tapylýar.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet Rrjetet Semantike Neurale (SNN), një komponent i njohuri bazuar në mësimin e thellë. SNN-të mund të trajnohen për të koduar njohuritë semantike të shprehura nga një bazë arbitrare njohurie dhe më pas mund të kombinohen me arkitektura të tjera të mësimit të thellë. Në kohën e parashikimit, SNN ofrojnë një kodim semantik të nxjerrë nga të dhënat e hyrjes, i cili mund të shfrytëzohet nga komponente të tjera të rrjetit nervor për të ndërtuar modele përfaqësimi të zgjeruar që mund të përballen me probleme alternative. Arkitektura SNN është e përcaktuar në termat e koncepteve dhe marrëdhënieve të pranishme në një bazë njohurie. Bazuar në këtë arkitekturë, është zhvilluar një procedurë trainimi. Më në fund, është paraqitur një strukturë eksperimentale për të ilustruar sjelljen dhe shfaqjen e një SNN për një problem të veçantë NLP, në këtë rast, minierën e opinionit për klasifikimin e shqyrtimeve të filmit.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ጥልቅ ትምህርት በሚደረገው የሳማኒክ ኔural Network (SNNs) የሚታወቀውን ክፍል ያቀርባል፡፡ SNNs ከአርቢ እውቀት መቀመጫው የsemantic እውቀትን ለማቀናቀል ይችላል፣ ከዚያም በኋላ ከሌሎች ጥልቅ ትምህርት መሠረት መሠረት ጋር ሊጋጠም ይችላል፡፡ ለመፍጠር ሰዓት SNNs ከinput data የሚወለደውን የsemantic encoding የሚያደርግ ነው፡፡ የSNN የመዝገብ ግንኙነት በአውቀት መቀመጫው ውስጥ ያሉትን አካሄድ እና ግንኙነት በማስተካከል ይግለጻል፡፡ በዚህ መሠረት ላይ የተመሳሳይ የሞግዚት ፕሮጀክት ነው፡፡ በመጨረሻም፣ የፊልዮ መልዕክት ለመግለጽ የSNN ድርጊት እና የአፍላጎቱን ስርዓት ለመግለጥ የሚታየው ተፈተና ግንኙነት ነው፡፡', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel Semantiese neurale netwerke (SNNs) voorsien, 'n kennis-bewus komponent gebaseer op diep leer. SNN kan opgelei word om eksplisiese semantiese kennis te kodeer van 'n willekeurige kennisbasis, en kan daarna kombinasie word met ander diep leer arkitektuur. By voorskoutyd, SNN verskaf 'n semantiese enkodering wat uit die invoer data uitgevoer is, wat kan deur ander neurale netwerk komponente gebruik word om uitgebreide voorskou modele te bou wat alternatiewe probleme kan aangesig. Die SNN-arkitektuur is gedefinieerd in terms of the concepts and relations present in a knowledge base. Op hierdie arkitektuur is 'n onderwerp prosedure ontwikkel. Eindelik is 'n eksperimentale opstelling voorgeskryf om die gedrag en prestasie van 'n SNN te illustreer vir 'n spesifieke NLP probleem, in hierdie geval, die besluit mining vir die klasifikasie van filmreviewe.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja semantičke neuronske mreže (SNNs), komponentu svjesnog znanja na temelju dubokog učenja. SNN se mogu obučiti da kodiraju pojasno semantičko znanje iz proizvoljne baze znanja, a nakon toga se mogu kombinirati s drugim dubokim arhitekturom učenja. U predviđanju vrijeme, SNN pružaju semantički kodiranje izvučeno iz ulaznih podataka, koje mogu iskoristiti drugi komponenti neuronske mreže kako bi izgradili produžene modele predstave koje mogu suočiti sa alternativnim problemima. Arhitektura SNN definisana je u smislu koncepta i odnosa koje su prisutne u bazi znanja. Na temelju ove arhitekture, razvija se procedura obuke. Konačno se predstavlja eksperimentalna ustanova kako bi pokazala ponašanje i učinkovitost SNN za specifičan problem NLP-a, u tom slučaju, rudarstvo mišljenja za klasifikaciju filmskih pregleda.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটি গভীর শিক্ষার ভিত্তিক এক জ্ঞান-পরিচিত অংশ সেমান্টিক নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (এসএনএন) উপস্থাপন করেছে। এসএনএন-এর প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা যায় যাতে সেম্পেন্টিক জ্ঞানের বেস থেকে সুস্পষ্ট প্রকাশ করা যায় এবং পরে অন্যান্য গভীর শিক্ষা প্রতিষ্ ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী সময়ে এসএনএন-এর একটি সেমেন্টিক এনকোডিং প্রদান করে ইনপুটের তথ্য থেকে বের করা হয়েছে, যা অন্যান্য নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কম্পোনেন্টের দ্বারা  একটি জ্ঞানের বেসে উপস্থিত ধারণা এবং সম্পর্কের মাধ্যমে এসএনএন আর্কিটার নির্ধারণ করা হয়েছে। এই প্রতিষ্ঠানের ভিত্তিতে একটি প্রশিক্ষণ প্রক্রিয়া উন্নয়ন করা হয়েছে। Finally, an experimental setup is presented to illustrate the behaviour and performance of a SNN for a specific NLP problem, in this case, opinion mining for the classification of movie reviews.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt, derin öyrənməyə dayanan Semantik Nöral Networks (SNN) komponenti göstərir. SNN-lər müəyyən bir bilgi üssündən açıq semantik bilgi kodlamaq üçün təhsil edilə bilər və sonra başqa derin öyrənmə arhitektarlarıyla birləşdirilebilir. SNN tədbir vaxtında, girdi məlumatından çıxarılan semantik kodlama təklif edir. Bu, başqa nöral a ğ komponentlərin istifadə edilə bilər ki, alternatif problemlərə qarşı müvəffəq edə biləcək uzaqlaşdırılmış nümunə modelləri inşa edə bilər. SNN arhitektüsü elmdə bulunan fikirlər və əlaqələri ilə tanımlanır. Bu arhitektura baxmayaraq, təhsil proqramı geliştirilir. Sonunda, bir sınaqlı quruluş, NLP problemi üçün SNN davranışını və performansını göstərmək üçün göstərilir. Bu vaxt, film nəzarətlərinin klasifikasyonu üçün fikirləşdirilmək üçün fikirləşdirilmişdir.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է սեմանտիկ նեյրոնական ցանցեր (ՍՆՆ), գիտելիքի գիտելիքի բաղադրիչ, որը հիմնված է խորը սովորելու վրա: ՍՆՆ-ները կարող են սովորեցնել բացատրական սեմանտիկ գիտելիքների կոդավորման համար կամավոր գիտելիքների հիմքից, և հետո կարող են համադրվել այլ խորը ուսումնասիրության ճարտարապետությունների հետ: Ենթադրության ժամանակ, ՍՆՆ-ները տրամադրում են սեմանտիկ կոդավորում, որը ստացվում է ինֆորմացիայի տվյալներից, որը կարող է օգտագործվել այլ նյարդային ցանցի բաղադրիչների կողմից, որպեսզի կառուցեն ընդլայնված ներկայացման մոդելներ,  ՍՆՆ ճարտարապետությունը սահմանվում է գիտելիքի հիմքում գոյություն ունեցող գաղափարների և հարաբերությունների տեսքով: Հիմնված այս ճարտարապետության վրա, ուսուցման գործընթաց է զարգացվում: Վերջապես, փորձարկվող կառուցվածք է ներկայացնում, որպեսզի ներկայացնենք ՍՆՆ-ի վարքագիծը և արտադրողությունը որոշակի ՆԼՊ-ի խնդիրների համար, այս դեպքում, կարծիքի հանքարարությունը ֆիլմի վերանայման դասակարգու', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje sémantické neuronové sítě (SNN), znalostní složku založenou na hlubokém učení. SNN mohou být trénovány tak, aby kódovaly explicitní sémantické znalosti z libovolné znalostní báze a následně mohou být kombinovány s dalšími architekturami hlubokého učení. V době predikce poskytují SNN sémantické kódování extrahované ze vstupních dat, které mohou být využity jinými složkami neuronové sítě k vytvoření rozšířených modelů reprezentace, které mohou čelit alternativním problémům. Architektura SNN je definována z hlediska konceptů a vztahů přítomných ve znalostní bázi. Na základě této architektury je vyvinut tréninkový postup. V závěru je prezentováno experimentální nastavení, které ilustruje chování a výkon SNN pro konkrétní NLP problém, v tomto případě opinion mining pro klasifikaci filmových recenzí.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse sügavõppel põhinevat teadmistepõhist komponenti Semantilised neurovõrgud (SNN). SNN-e saab koolitada selgesõnaliste semantiliste teadmiste kodeerimiseks suvalisest teadmistebaasist ning neid saab seejärel kombineerida teiste sügavõppe arhitektuuridega. Ennustamise ajal pakuvad SNN-id sisendandmetest ekstraheeritud semantilist kodeeringut, mida saavad kasutada muud närvivõrgu komponendid laiendatud esindusmudelite loomiseks, mis võivad seista silmitsi alternatiivsete probleemidega. SNN arhitektuur on määratletud teadmistebaasis esinevate kontseptsioonide ja suhete põhjal. Selle arhitektuuri alusel töötatakse välja koolitusprotseduur. Lõpuks esitatakse eksperimentaalne seadistus, et illustreerida SNNi käitumist ja jõudlust konkreetse NLP probleemi puhul, käesoleval juhul arvamuse kaevandamine filmiaruannete klassifitseerimiseks.', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta Networks Neurals Semàntiques (SNN), un component conscient del coneixement basat en l'aprenentatge profund. Els SNN es poden capacitar per codificar coneixements semàntics explícits d'una base arbitraria de coneixements, i després es poden combinar amb altres arquitectures d'aprenentatge profund. En el temps de la predicció, els SNN proporcionen una codificació semàntica extraïda de les dades d'entrada, que pot ser explotada per altres components de la xarxa neural per construir models de representació estendits que poden enfrontar problemes alternativs. L'arquitectura SNN es defineix en termes de conceptes i relacions presents en una base de coneixement. Sobre la base d'aquesta arquitectura, es desenvolupa un procediment d'entrenament. Finalment, es presenta una configuració experimental per il·lustrar el comportament i el rendiment d'un SNN per un problem a específic de la NLP, en aquest cas, la mineria d'opinió per la classificació de revisions de pel·lícules.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään Semanttiset hermoverkot (SNN), syvälliseen oppimiseen perustuva tietotietoinen komponentti. SNN:t voidaan kouluttaa koodaamaan eksplisiittistä semanttista tietoa mielivaltaisesta tietopohjasta, ja ne voidaan myöhemmin yhdistää muihin syväoppimisarkkitehtuuriin. Ennustuksen aikaan SNN:t tarjoavat lähtötiedoista poimitun semanttisen koodauksen, jota muut neuroverkon komponentit voivat hyödyntää rakentamaan laajennettuja esitysmalleja, jotka voivat kohdata vaihtoehtoisia ongelmia. SNN-arkkitehtuuri määritellään tietopohjan käsitteiden ja suhteiden perusteella. Tämän arkkitehtuurin pohjalta kehitetään koulutusmenettely. Lopuksi esitetään kokeellinen asetelma, joka havainnollistaa SNN:n käyttäytymistä ja suorituskykyä tietyssä NLP-ongelmassa, tässä tapauksessa mielipiteiden louhinta elokuvaarvostelujen luokittelua varten.', 'jv': 'Awak-awak iki gunakake semanti-Neral Network (sNNs), kompon-awak dhuwur kuwi wis dipepon mulai nggawe barang kelas. NNs iso disenyongno karo akeh semantar kelangan kelangan seneng dipunangé semantar kelangan kelangan kuwi tindang kesempatan, lan iso disenyongno karo akeh-akeh uga ngerasakno Suggestion time, S NNs mungkur semanti nggawe data enyangka diputara winih Arkturatura NNN didalaman piye paling nggambar barang kelangan karo pawaran ning ngerasakno iki. Ngapakan nganggo architecture iki, sampeyan pating nggawe Ero, setup sing beraksi dadi nggawe geratan perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno sawar nggawe barang kanggo ngilangno NLP iki dadi, ning cah iki, kesempatan kanggo kelas perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno film perusahaan.', 'sk': 'V prispevku so predstavljena Semantična živčna omrežja (SNN), komponenta znanja, ki temelji na globokem učenju. SNN je mogoče usposobiti za kodiranje eksplicitnega semantičnega znanja iz poljubne baze znanja, nato pa jih je mogoče kombinirati z drugimi arhitekturami globokega učenja. V času napovedi SNN zagotavljajo semantično kodiranje, pridobljeno iz vhodnih podatkov, ki jo lahko izkoristijo druge komponente nevronskega omrežja za gradnjo razširjenih modelov reprezentacije, ki se lahko soočajo z alternativnimi težavami. Arhitektura SNN je opredeljena v smislu konceptov in odnosov, prisotnih v bazi znanja. Na podlagi te arhitekture se razvija postopek usposabljanja. Na koncu je predstavljena eksperimentalna postavitev, ki ponazarja vedenje in zmogljivost SNN za določen problem NLP, v tem primeru kopanje mnenja za klasifikacijo filmskih kritik.', 'ha': 'Wannan takardar na gaurar da Semantic Neural Networks (SNNs), wani componi na da sani, a kan karatun da aka sani ta baka karatun masu ƙari. Ana iya amfani da SNNs dõmin a kode bayan ilmi na semantic daga wani bassi na arbiturci, kuma kan dabam a haɗa da wasu matsayin da aka sanar da masu ƙari. At prediction time, SNNs provide a semantic encoding extracted from the input data, which can be exploited by other neural network components to build extended representation models that can face alternative problems.  An bayyana tsarin SNN cikin misãlan zato da mazaɓa da mazaɓa wanda ke cikin wani bassi na ilmi. An danne a kan wannan arkin, an buɗe wani aikin mai amfani da shi. Haƙĩƙa, an nuna wani tsari mai jarraba ko ya bayyana aikin da kuma aikin wani SNN wa wata mataimaki na NLP, a cikin wannan halin, misalin maganar gaske wa fassarar filinaiki.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציג רשתות נוירוליות סמנטיות (SNN), רכיב מודע לידע מבוסס על לימוד עמוק. SNN יכולים להיות מאומנים לקוד ידע סמנטי ברור מבסיס ידע arbitrary, ולאחר מכן יכולים להיות משולבים עם ארכיטקטורות למידה עמוקה אחרות. בזמן חזיון, SNN מספקים קוד סמנטי שנוצא מהנתונים הכניסה, אשר ניתן לנצל על ידי רכיבים נוספים של רשת עצבית לבנות דוגמנים מייצג מורחבים שיכולים להתמודד עם בעיות אלטרנטיביות. הארכיטקטורה של SNN מוגדרת במונחים של הרעיונות והיחסים הנוכחים בבסיס ידע. בהתבסס על הארכיטקטורה הזו, התפתח תהליך אימון. סוף סוף, ניסוי מוצג כדי להדגים את ההתנהגות והביצועים של SNN לבעיה מסוימת של NLP, במקרה הזה, מכרות דעות להקליטה של ביקורות סרטים.', 'bo': 'This paper presents Semantic Neural Networks (SNNs), a knowledge-aware component based on deep learning. SNNs can be trained to encode explicit semantic knowledge from an arbitrary knowledge base, and can subsequently be combined with other deep learning architectures. At prediction time, SNNs provide a semantic encoding extracted from the input data, which can be exploited by other neural network components to build extended representation models that can face alternative problems. SNN བཟོ་བཀོད་གཞུང་ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་པ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་འདི་དག་གཟུགས་དང་འབ སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་འདི་ལ་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས། གཏོང་འཕེལ་གྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་ཞིག་གནང་བ་རེད། མཇུག་རྫོགས་ན། སྒེར་གྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཞིག་ནི་སྒེར་གྱི་བྱ་སྟངས་དང་བྱ་སྟངས་མངོན་གསལ་འཆར་བྱེད་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Unsupervised dialogue intent detection via hierarchical topic model', 'pt': 'Detecção de intenção de diálogo não supervisionada por meio de modelo de tópico hierárquico', 'es': 'Detección de intenciones de diálogo sin supervisión mediante un modelo de temas jerárquico', 'fr': "Détection d'intention de dialogue non supervisée via un modèle de sujet hiérarchique", 'ja': '階層トピックモデルを介した監視されていないダイアログの意図の検出', 'zh': '基于分层主题模的无监督对话的意思检测', 'ru': 'Обнаружение намерений неконтролируемого диалога с помощью иерархической тематической модели', 'ar': 'الكشف عن نية الحوار غير الخاضعة للإشراف عبر نموذج الموضوع الهرمي', 'hi': 'पदानुक्रमित विषय मॉडल के माध्यम से असुरक्षित संवाद इरादे का पता लगाना', 'ga': 'Brath rún idirphlé gan mhaoirseacht trí mhúnla topaice ordlathach', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση προθέσεων διαλόγου χωρίς επιτήρηση μέσω ιεραρχικού μοντέλου θέματος', 'hu': 'Felügyeletlen párbeszédszándék felismerése hierarchikus témamodellen keresztül', 'it': 'Rilevamento di intenti di dialogo non monitorato tramite modello gerarchico di argomento', 'lt': 'Neprižiūrimas dialogo ketinimų nustatymas naudojant hierarchinį teminį model į', 'kk': 'Иерархикалық нақыштар үлгісімен сақталмаған диалогты анықтау мақсаты', 'ka': 'ჰიერაქტიკალური ტემების მოდელის გამოყენებაში არაფერიზებული დიალოგის მისამართვა', 'ms': 'Unsupervised dialogue intent detection via hierarchical topic model', 'mk': 'Ненадгледувано детектирање на намерите на дијалогот преку хиерархички модел на тема', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത ഡയലോഗിന്റെ ഉത്തരവാദി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Id-djalogu mhux sorveljat għandu l-intenzjoni li jidentifika permezz ta’ mudell ta’ suġġett ġerarkiku', 'mn': 'Диалогдоогүй диалогын санаа олох нь архитекийн сэдвийн загварын аргаар', 'no': 'Ikkje oppretta oppdaging av dialogvindauget via hierarkisk emnemodul', 'pl': 'Niekontrolowane wykrywanie intencji dialogu za pomocą hierarchicznego modelu tematu', 'ro': 'Detectarea intenției dialogului nesupravegheată prin intermediul modelului ierarhic de subiect', 'sr': 'Neodređena namjera za otkrivanje dijaloga putem hijerarhičkog modela teme', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විදේශ මොඩල් මධ්\u200dයමයෙන් සුරක්ෂිත සංවාදය හොයාගන්න අවශ්\u200dය සංවාදය', 'so': 'Unsupervised dialogue intent detection via hierarchical topic model', 'sv': 'Identifiering av icke övervakad dialogavsikt via hierarkisk ämnesmodell', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத உரையாடல் விருப்பத்தேர்வு தலைப்பு மாதிரியால் கண்டறிதல்', 'ur': 'ہیرارک ٹوپ موڈل کے ذریعے غیر محافظت دیالوگ کا ارادہ اچانک', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'âm mưu phát hiện âm mưu của đối thoại không giám sát', 'bg': 'Откриване на намеренията на диалоговия прозорец без надзор чрез йерархичен модел на тема', 'nl': 'Onbewaakte detectie van dialoogintenties via hiërarchisch topic model', 'hr': 'Neodređeno otkrivanje namjere dijaloga putem hierarhičkog modela teme', 'da': 'Ikke-overvåget dialog intention detektion via hierarkisk emnemodel', 'de': 'Erkennung von nicht überwachten Dialogabsichten über hierarchisches Themenmodell', 'id': 'Deteksi niat dialog tidak diawasi melalui model topik hierarkis', 'fa': 'مشخص محاورۀ محاورۀ غیرقابل حفاظت', 'ko': '층별 테마 모델 기반의 무감독 대화 의도 검출', 'sw': 'Mazungumzo yasiyopangwa kwa lengo la kutambua kwa kupitia mifano ya mada', 'tr': 'Hijerarşik meýdança modi görä namaýyşlanmady', 'af': 'Onondersteunde dialoog doel beskrywing deur hierarkies onderwerp model', 'sq': 'Dialogu i pa mbikqyrur synon zbulimin nëpërmjet modelit hierarkik të temës', 'am': 'dialogs-action', 'hy': 'Առանց վերահսկվող հաղորդակցման նպատակների հայտնաբերումը հիերարխիկ թեմայի մոդելի միջոցով', 'az': 'HiyerarŇüik m…ôs…ôl…ônin modeli vasit…ôsil…ô t…ôrz edilm…ômiŇü dialog niyy…ôti keŇüif', 'bn': 'হিয়েরার্কিয়ার্কিয়াল বিষয় মডেলের মাধ্যমে অনলাইন করা ডায়ালগের উদ্দেশ্য সনাক্ত করা হবে', 'ca': "La detecció d'intencions del diàleg no supervisada a través del model de tema jeràrquic", 'bs': 'Neodređena namjera otkrivanja dijaloga putem hijerarhičkog modela teme', 'cs': 'Detekce záměru dialogu bez kontroly prostřednictvím hierarchického tématu', 'et': 'Järelevalveta dialoogi kavatsuste tuvastamine hierarhilise teemamudeli abil', 'fi': 'Valvontaton dialogin aikomusten havaitseminen hierarkkisen aihemallin avulla', 'jv': 'Coverage', 'ha': 'Ana gane cikin zauren akwatin bayani da aka tsare', 'he': 'Unsupervised dialogue intent detection via hierarchical topic model', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje namena pogovornega okna brez nadzora prek hierarhičnega modela teme', 'bo': 'སྒྲིག་ཡུལ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་འདྲ་བ་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་སྐྱོད་རུང་མེད་པའི་ཌའི་ལོག་དམིགས་བསལ་བ'}
{'en': 'One of the challenges during a task-oriented chatbot development is the scarce availability of the labeled training data. The best way of getting one is to ask the assessors to tag each dialogue according to its intent. Unfortunately, performing labeling without any provisional collection structure is difficult since the very notion of the intent is ill-defined. In this paper, we propose a hierarchical multimodal regularized topic model to obtain a first approximation of the intent set. Our rationale for hierarchical models usage is their ability to take into account several degrees of the dialogues relevancy. We attempt to build a model that can distinguish between subject-based (e.g. medicine and transport topics) and action-based (e.g. filing of an application and tracking application status) similarities. In order to achieve this, we divide set of all features into several groups according to part-of-speech analysis. Various feature groups are treated differently on different hierarchy levels.', 'ar': 'أحد التحديات أثناء تطوير روبوت المحادثة الموجه نحو المهام هو ندرة توافر بيانات التدريب المصنفة. أفضل طريقة للحصول على واحد هو أن تطلب من المقيّمين وضع علامة على كل حوار وفقًا لهدفه. لسوء الحظ ، يعد إجراء الملصقات بدون أي بنية تجميع مؤقتة أمرًا صعبًا نظرًا لأن فكرة النية ذاتها غير محددة بشكل جيد. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نموذج موضوع منظم هرمي متعدد الوسائط للحصول على أول تقريب لمجموعة النوايا. الأساس المنطقي لاستخدام النماذج الهرمية هو قدرتها على مراعاة عدة درجات من ملاءمة الحوارات. نحاول بناء نموذج يمكنه التمييز بين أوجه التشابه القائمة على الموضوع (مثل موضوعات الطب والنقل) والقائمة على الإجراء (مثل إيداع طلب وتتبع حالة التطبيق). من أجل تحقيق ذلك ، نقسم مجموعة من جميع الميزات إلى عدة مجموعات وفقًا لتحليل جزء من الكلام. يتم التعامل مع مجموعات الميزات المختلفة بشكل مختلف على مستويات التدرج الهرمي المختلفة.', 'es': 'Uno de los desafíos durante el desarrollo de un chatbot orientado a tareas es la escasa disponibilidad de los datos de entrenamiento etiquetados. La mejor manera de conseguir uno es pedir a los evaluadores que etiqueten cada diálogo de acuerdo con su intención. Desafortunadamente, realizar el etiquetado sin una estructura de colección provisional es difícil, ya que la noción misma de la intención está mal definida. En este artículo, proponemos un modelo de tema regularizado multimodal jerárquico para obtener una primera aproximación del conjunto de intenciones. Nuestro fundamento para el uso de modelos jerárquicos es su capacidad para tener en cuenta varios grados de relevancia de los diálogos. Intentamos crear un modelo que pueda distinguir entre similitudes basadas en el tema (por ejemplo, temas de medicina y transporte) y basadas en acciones (por ejemplo, presentación de una solicitud y seguimiento del estado de la solicitud). Para lograr esto, dividimos el conjunto de todas las características en varios grupos de acuerdo con el análisis de parte del discurso. Los distintos grupos de funciones se tratan de forma diferente en los distintos niveles de jerarquía.', 'ja': 'タスク指向のチャットボット開発の課題の1つは、ラベル付けされたトレーニングデータの利用可能性が乏しいことです。 1つを取得する最良の方法は、評価者にその意図に従って各対話にタグを付けるように依頼することです。 残念ながら、意図の概念自体が不明確であるため、暫定的な収集構造なしでラベル付けを行うことは困難である。 本稿では、インテント集合の第１の近似を得るための階層的多モード正規化トピックモデルを提案する。 階層モデルを使用するための私たちの理論的根拠は、ダイアログの関連性のいくつかの度合いを考慮する能力です。 私たちは、対象に基づく（例えば、医療と輸送のトピック）と行動に基づく（例えば、申請の提出と申請状況の追跡）の類似性を区別できるモデルを構築しようとしています。 これを達成するために、私たちはすべての機能のセットを音声部分分析に従っていくつかのグループに分割します。 さまざまなフィーチャーグループは、異なる階層レベルで異なる扱いを受ける。', 'fr': "L'un des défis lors du développement d'un chatbot axé sur les tâches est la faible disponibilité des données d'entraînement étiquetées. La meilleure façon d'en obtenir un est de demander aux évaluateurs d'étiqueter chaque dialogue en fonction de son intention. Malheureusement, effectuer un étiquetage sans structure de collection provisoire est difficile car la notion même d'intention est mal définie. Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle thématique régularisé multimodal hiérarchique pour obtenir une première approximation de l'ensemble d'intentions. Notre raison d'être de l'utilisation des modèles hiérarchiques est leur capacité à prendre en compte plusieurs degrés de pertinence des dialogues. Nous essayons de construire un modèle qui puisse faire la distinction entre les similitudes basées sur le sujet (par exemple, la médecine et les transports) et les similitudes basées sur l'action (par exemple, le dépôt d'une demande et le suivi du statut de la demande). Pour ce faire, nous divisons l'ensemble de toutes les caractéristiques en plusieurs groupes selon l'analyse de la partie du discours. Différents groupes de fonctionnalités sont traités différemment selon les niveaux hiérarchiques.", 'pt': 'Um dos desafios durante o desenvolvimento de um chatbot orientado a tarefas é a escassa disponibilidade dos dados de treinamento rotulados. A melhor maneira de conseguir um é pedir aos avaliadores que marquem cada diálogo de acordo com sua intenção. Infelizmente, realizar a rotulagem sem qualquer estrutura de coleta provisória é difícil, pois a própria noção de intenção é mal definida. Neste artigo, propomos um modelo de tópico regularizado multimodal hierárquico para obter uma primeira aproximação do conjunto de intenções. Nossa justificativa para o uso de modelos hierárquicos é sua capacidade de levar em conta vários graus de relevância dos diálogos. Tentamos construir um modelo que possa distinguir entre semelhanças baseadas em assuntos (por exemplo, tópicos de medicina e transporte) e baseadas em ações (por exemplo, apresentação de um pedido e rastreamento do status do pedido). Para isso, dividimos o conjunto de todas as características em vários grupos de acordo com a análise da parte do discurso. Vários grupos de recursos são tratados de forma diferente em diferentes níveis de hierarquia.', 'zh': '向事之聊天机器人发,挑战之一,标数之可用性稀缺也。 得一对话的最佳法是要求评估员随意标记每个对话。 不幸者,无临时收结之难,以其定义不明也。 于本文中,分层多模态正则化主题模,以得意集第一近似值。 吾用分形者基本原理其能虑言相关性数也。 吾等试立一模形,可区别于题(如医运主题)与基于动者(如提交申请及踪迹申请)相似性。 以此致之,以词性论合为数朋。 异层次结构之级,异功之制。', 'hi': 'एक कार्य उन्मुख चैटबॉट विकास के दौरान चुनौतियों में से एक लेबल प्रशिक्षण डेटा की दुर्लभ उपलब्धता है। एक प्राप्त करने का सबसे अच्छा तरीका मूल्यांकनकर्ताओं को अपने इरादे के अनुसार प्रत्येक संवाद को टैग करने के लिए कहना है। दुर्भाग्य से, किसी भी अनंतिम संग्रह संरचना के बिना लेबलिंग करना मुश्किल है क्योंकि इरादे की बहुत धारणा बीमार-परिभाषित है। इस पेपर में, हम इरादा सेट का पहला सन्निकटन प्राप्त करने के लिए एक पदानुक्रमित मल्टीमॉडल नियमित विषय मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। पदानुक्रमित मॉडल के उपयोग के लिए हमारा तर्क संवादों की प्रासंगिकता के कई डिग्री को ध्यान में रखने की उनकी क्षमता है। हम एक मॉडल बनाने का प्रयास करते हैं जो विषय-आधारित (जैसे दवा और परिवहन विषयों) और कार्रवाई-आधारित (जैसे एक आवेदन की फाइलिंग और ट्रैकिंग एप्लिकेशन स्थिति) समानताओं के बीच अंतर कर सकता है। इसे प्राप्त करने के लिए, हम सभी विशेषताओं के सेट को भाग-भाषण विश्लेषण के अनुसार कई समूहों में विभाजित करते हैं। विभिन्न सुविधा समूहों को विभिन्न पदानुक्रम स्तरों पर अलग-अलग व्यवहार किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Одной из проблем при разработке чат-бота, ориентированного на выполнение задач, является ограниченная доступность отмеченных обучающих данных. Лучший способ получить его - попросить оценщиков отмечать каждый диалог в соответствии с его намерениями. К сожалению, выполнение маркировки без какой-либо предварительной структуры сбора является сложным, поскольку само понятие намерения не определено. В этой статье мы предлагаем иерархическую мультимодальную регуляризованную тематическую модель для получения первого приближения набора намерений. Нашим обоснованием использования иерархических моделей является их способность учитывать несколько степеней релевантности диалогов. Мы пытаемся построить модель, которая может различать сходства, основанные на субъектах (например, вопросы медицины и транспорта) и основанные на действиях (например, подача заявки и отслеживание статуса заявки). Для этого мы разделяем совокупность всех признаков на несколько групп в соответствии с анализом части речи. Различные функциональные группы рассматриваются по-разному на разных уровнях иерархии.', 'ga': 'Ar cheann de na dúshláin a bhaineann le forbairt chatbot atá dírithe ar thascanna is ea infhaighteacht ghann na sonraí oiliúna lipéadaithe. Is é an bealach is fearr chun ceann a fháil ná iarraidh ar na measúnóirí gach dialóg a chlibeáil de réir a rún. Ar an drochuair, tá sé deacair an lipéadú a dhéanamh gan aon struchtúr bailiúcháin sealadach toisc nach bhfuil coincheap na hintinne sainithe. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla topaice ordlathach ilmhódach rialtaithe chun an chéad chomhfhogasú a fháil ar an tacar rún. Is í an réasúnaíocht atá againn maidir le húsáid na múnlaí ordlathacha ná a gcumas céimeanna éagsúla d’ábharthacht an chomhphlé a chur san áireamh. Déanaimid iarracht samhail a thógáil ar féidir idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir cosúlachtaí ábhar-bhunaithe (m.sh. ábhair leigheas agus iompair) agus bunaithe ar ghníomh (m.sh. comhdú iarratais agus rianú stádas iarratais). Chun é seo a bhaint amach, roinnimid na gnéithe go léir ina ngrúpaí éagsúla de réir anailíse cuid cainte. Caitear go héagsúil le sainghrúpaí éagsúla ar leibhéil dhifriúla ordlathais.', 'el': 'Μια από τις προκλήσεις κατά τη διάρκεια μιας ανάπτυξης με στόχο την εργασία είναι η σπάνια διαθεσιμότητα των επισημασμένων δεδομένων κατάρτισης. Ο καλύτερος τρόπος για να αποκτήσετε ένα είναι να ζητήσετε από τους αξιολογητές να επισημάνουν κάθε διάλογο σύμφωνα με την πρόθεσή του. Δυστυχώς, η εκτέλεση επισήμανσης χωρίς προσωρινή δομή συλλογής είναι δύσκολη, δεδομένου ότι η ίδια η έννοια της πρόθεσης δεν είναι καθορισμένη. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα ιεραρχικό πολυτροπικό κανονισμένο θεματικό μοντέλο για να επιτευχθεί μια πρώτη προσέγγιση του συνόλου προθέσεων. Η λογική μας για τη χρήση ιεραρχικών μοντέλων είναι η ικανότητά τους να λαμβάνουν υπόψη αρκετούς βαθμούς σχετικότητας των διαλόγων. Προσπαθούμε να οικοδομήσουμε ένα μοντέλο που να μπορεί να διακρίνει μεταξύ θεμάτων (π.χ. ιατρικά και μεταφορικά θέματα) και ενεργειών (π.χ. υποβολή αίτησης και παρακολούθηση της κατάστασης της αίτησης) ομοιοτήτων. Για να επιτευχθεί αυτό, χωρίζουμε το σύνολο όλων των χαρακτηριστικών σε διάφορες ομάδες σύμφωνα με την ανάλυση μέρους του λόγου. Διάφορες ομάδες χαρακτηριστικών αντιμετωπίζονται διαφορετικά σε διαφορετικά επίπεδα ιεραρχίας.', 'hu': 'Egy feladatorientált chatbot fejlesztés során az egyik kihívás a címkézett képzési adatok kevés rendelkezésre állása. A legjobb módja annak, hogy megkérjük az értékelőket, hogy címkézzék meg az egyes párbeszédeket a szándékának megfelelően. Sajnos az ideiglenes gyűjtési struktúra nélküli címkézés elvégzése nehéz, mivel a szándék fogalma rosszul definiált. Jelen tanulmányban egy hierarchikus multimodális szabályozott témamodellt javasolunk a szándékkészlet első közelítésére. A hierarchikus modellek használatának indoka, hogy képesek legyenek figyelembe venni a párbeszédek relevanciáját. Megpróbálunk olyan modellt kiépíteni, amely megkülönbözteti a tantárgy alapú (pl. orvostudomány és közlekedési témák) és az akció alapú (pl. kérelem benyújtása és a kérelem állapotának nyomon követése) hasonlóságokat. Ennek érdekében a beszédrész elemzése szerint több csoportra osztjuk az összes funkciót. A különböző jellemzői csoportokat különböző hierarchiai szinteken eltérően kezelik.', 'ka': 'ერთი გამოცდილებების განვითარება საქაბოტის განვითარებაში არის მარტივი საქაბოტის მონაცემების შესაძლებლობა. ყველაზე საუკეთესო გზა მიიღება არის მოთხოვრებელი, რომ ყველა დიალოგის დამატებით მისი საზოგადოდ. მართლად, საზოგადოებლოდ, საზოგადოებო საზოგადოებო კოლექციის სტრუქტურაციას უკეთესია, რადგან საზოგადოებო საზოგადოება არაა განსა ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მივიღებთ იერაქტიკური მულტიმოდიალური რეგულაციული ტემენტიკური მოდელი, რომ პირველი მივიღებთ მისი საზოგადომის მიღება. ჩვენი იერაქტიკალური მოდელების გამოყენება არის ისინი შესაძლებლობა, რომ დიალოგების მნიშვნელობის რამდენიმე გრადუსების შესახებ აღმოჩენოთ. ჩვენ ვცდილობთ მოდელის შექმნა, რომელიც შეუძლია განსხვავება საქმენტი დაბათებული (მაგალითად მედიცია და რპანტრონტი ტემების) და მოქმედების დაბათებული (მაგალითად, პროგრამის და პროგრამის სტატის ეს გავაკეთებთ, ჩვენ ყველა ფუნქციების ნაწილის ნაწილის განმავლობაში მრავალ ჯგუფებში გაყოფილი. განსხვავებული ფუნქციების ჯგუფი განსხვავებულია განსხვავებული იერაქტიის დონეში.', 'it': "Una delle sfide durante lo sviluppo di un chatbot orientato alle attività è la scarsa disponibilità dei dati di formazione etichettati. Il modo migliore per ottenerne uno è chiedere ai valutatori di taggare ogni dialogo secondo il suo intento. Purtroppo, eseguire l'etichettatura senza alcuna struttura provvisoria di raccolta è difficile poiché la nozione stessa dell'intento è mal definita. In questo articolo, proponiamo un modello tematico multimodale gerarchico regolarizzato per ottenere una prima approssimazione dell'intent set. La nostra logica per l'utilizzo dei modelli gerarchici è la loro capacità di tenere conto di diversi gradi della rilevanza dei dialoghi. Cerchiamo di costruire un modello in grado di distinguere tra somiglianze basate su soggetti (ad esempio, medicina e trasporti) e azioni (ad esempio, deposito di una domanda e monitoraggio dello stato della domanda). Per raggiungere questo obiettivo, dividiamo l'insieme di tutte le caratteristiche in diversi gruppi in base all'analisi part-of-speech. Vari gruppi di funzionalità sono trattati in modo diverso a diversi livelli gerarchici.", 'kk': 'Тапсырманың бағытталған шат бағыттауының бірі - жарлық оқыту деректерінің қол жеткізілмейді. Барлығын алудың ең жақсы жолы - бақылаушыларының әрбір диалогын қалай тегтерді сұрауы. Кешіріңіз, кез келген уақытты жинақтау құрылғысы жоқ жарлық жарлығын орындау қиын, себебі мақсаттың түсініктемесі дұрыс анықталмаған. Бұл қағазда бірінші мақсаттың бірінші жақсарту үшін иерархикалық көптеген нақыштар үлгісін қолданамыз. Иерархикалық үлгілерді қолдану үшін бірнеше диалогтардың маңыздылығын есептеу мүмкіндігіміз. Біз тақырыбы негіздеген (мысалы, медицина және транспорт нақыштары) мен әрекеттердің негіздеген (мысалы, қолданбаны және қолданбаның күйіне қадағалау күйінің) ұқсастығын айыратын үлгілерді құру әрекет Бұны жеткізу үшін, біз бәрін бірнеше топтарда бөліп, сөйлеу талапына сәйкес келеді. Түрлі мүмкіндіктер топтары түрлі иерархияның деңгейінде әртүрлі тұрады.', 'lt': 'Vienas iš užduočių rengiant į užduotis orientuotus pokalbius kylančių uždavinių yra ribotas ženklintų mokymo duomenų prieinamumas. Geriausias būdas jį gauti yra paprašyti vertintojų pažymėti kiekvieną dialogą pagal savo ketinimus. Deja, ženklinimas be jokios laikinos surinkimo struktūros yra sudėtingas, nes tikslo sąvoka yra netinkamai apibrėžta. Šiame dokumente siūlome hierarchinį daugiarūšį reguliuojamą teminį model į, kad būtų pasiektas pirmasis ketinimų rinkinio suderinimas. Mūsų hierarchinių modelių naudojimo pagrindas yra jų gebėjimas atsižvelgti į kelis dialogų svarbos laipsnius. Bandome sukurti model į, kuris galėtų atskirti teminius (pvz., medicinos ir transporto temų) ir veiksmų (pvz., paraiškos pateikimo ir paraiškos statuso sekimo) panašumus. Kad tai būtų pasiekta, pagal kalbos dalį suskirstysime visus elementus į kelias grupes. Įvairios ypatybių grupės vertinamos skirtingai skirtingais hierarchijos lygiais.', 'mk': 'Еден од предизвиците за време на развојот на шатбот ориентиран на задачите е ретката достапност на обележаните податоци за обука. Најдобар начин да се добие еден е да се побара од проценувачите да го означат секој дијалог според неговата намера. За жал, извршувањето на етикетата без привремена структура на собирање е тешко бидејќи самата идеја за намерата е лошо дефинирана. Во овој весник, предложуваме хиерархичен мултимодален регулизиран темски модел за да се добие прво приближување на намерата. Our rationale for hierarchical models usage is their ability to take into account several degrees of the dialogues relevancy.  Ние се обидуваме да изградиме модел кој може да разликува меѓу темите базирани на субјект (на пример медицина и транспортни теми) и сличностите базирани на акција (на пример поднесување апликација и следење на статусот на апликација). За да го постигнеме ова, ги поделиме сите карактеристики во неколку групи според дел од анализата на говорот. Разни групи на карактеристики се третираат различно на различни нивоа на хиерархија.', 'ml': 'ചാട്ട്ബോട്ട് വികസിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഒരു വിലാസങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒന്നാണ് ലേബിള്\u200d ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d കുറച്ച് കൂ അതിന്റെ ഉദ്ദേശം പ്രകാരം എല്ലാ ഡയലോഗ് ടാഗ് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d കഴിവുകളോടും ചോദിക്കുന്നതാണ് ഏറ്റവും നല്ല വഴി. നിര്\u200dഭാഗ്യവശാല്\u200d, നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സംഘടനയില്ലാതെ ലേബിള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് വളരെ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടാണ് ഈ ഉദ്ദ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഹീറാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d മള്\u200dട്ടിമോഡല്\u200d നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു അതിന Our rationale for hierarchical models usage is their ability to take into account several degrees of the dialogues relevancy.  പ്രയോഗത്തിന്റെയും പ്രയോഗത്തിന്റെയും തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനുമിടയില്\u200d വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചുവെക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d നാം ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഭാഗം അനുസരിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d എല്ലാ വിഭാഗങ്ങളും പല ഗ്രൂപ്പുകളിലേക്ക് വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തും. വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായി വ്യത്യസ്തമായി പരിചയപ്പെടുന്നു.', 'ms': 'Salah satu cabaran semasa pembangunan chatbot bertujuan-tugas adalah kecukupan data latihan yang ditabel. The best way of getting one is to ask the assessors to tag each dialogue according to its intent.  Malangnya, melaksanakan label tanpa mana-mana struktur koleksi sementara adalah sukar kerana pemahaman tujuan adalah salah ditakrif. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model topik terregularisasi multimodal hierarkik untuk mendapatkan pengungkapan pertama set tujuan. Rasional kita untuk penggunaan model hierarkis adalah kemampuan mereka untuk mempertimbangkan beberapa darjah relevansi dialog. Kami cuba untuk membina model yang boleh membezakan antara peristiwa berdasarkan subjek (cth. ubat dan subjek pengangkutan) dan peristiwa berdasarkan tindakan (cth. memasang aplikasi dan mengesan status aplikasi). Untuk mencapai ini, kita bahagikan set semua ciri-ciri kepada beberapa kumpulan mengikut sebahagian analisis-ucapan. Kumpulan ciri-ciri berbeza dianggap berbeza pada aras hierarki berbeza.', 'mt': 'Waħda mill-isfidi matul żvilupp ta’ chatbot orjentat lejn ix-xogħol hija d-disponibbiltà skarsa tad-dejta ta’ taħriġ ittikkettata. L-aħjar mod kif wieħed jikseb wieħed huwa li jitlob lill-valutaturi jimmarkaw kull djalogu skont l-intenzjoni tiegħu. Unfortunately, performing labeling without any provisional collection structure is difficult since the very notion of the intent is ill-defined.  F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mudell ta’ suġġett ġerarkiku multimodali regolat biex tinkiseb l-ewwel approssimazzjoni tas-sett ta’ intenzjonijiet. Ir-raġunament tagħna għall-użu ta’ mudelli ġerarkiċi huwa l-kapaċità tagħhom li jqisu diversi gradi tar-rilevanza tad-djalogi. Aħna nippruvaw nibnu mudell li jista’ jiddistingwi bejn similaritajiet ibbażati fuq is-suġġetti (pereżempju s-suġġetti tal-mediċina u t-trasport) u dawk ibbażati fuq l-azzjoni (pereżempju l-preżentazzjoni ta’ applikazzjoni u l-istatus tal-applikazzjoni ta’ traċċar). Sabiex dan jinkiseb, aħna nqasmu sett tal-karatteristiċi kollha f’diversi gruppi skont analiżi ta’ parti mid-diskors. Gruppi ta’ karatteristiċi varji jiġu ttrattati b’mod differenti fuq livelli ta’ ġerarkija differenti.', 'mn': 'Тайлбарт дамжуулагдсан чадвар хөгжүүлэх үед нэг асуудал бол тэмдэглэгдсэн суралцах өгөгдлийн бага байдал юм. Нэгийг авах хамгийн сайн арга нь хүмүүст зорилгоор диалог бүрийг тэмдэглэхийг хүсч байна. Харамсалтай нь ямар ч хугацааны цуглуулалтын бүтэц байхгүй маркинг хийх нь зорилго нь буруу тодорхойлогдсон учраас хэцүү. Энэ цаасан дээр бид анхны зорилгоор ойртохын тулд олон загварын олон загварын загварыг санал болгож байна. Бидний иерархикийн загварын хэрэглээний түлхүүр нь тэдний диалогуудын хэдэн градус хамааралтай байдлыг ойлгох чадвар юм. Бид сургууль дээр суурилсан загвар (жишээ нь эмнэлэг, транспорт сэдэв) болон үйл явц дээр суурилсан загвар бүтээхийг хичээдэг. Үүнийг хүртэхийн тулд бид хэлэлцээний талаар бүх өөрчлөлтийг олон хэсэгт хувааж байна. Өөр төрлийн төрлийн бүлгүүд өөр өөр төрлийн хичээл дээр ажилладаг.', 'pl': 'Jednym z wyzwań podczas rozwoju chatbotów zorientowanych na zadania jest ograniczona dostępność oznaczonych danych szkoleniowych. Najlepszym sposobem na uzyskanie takiego dialogu jest poproszenie oceniających o oznaczenie każdego dialogu zgodnie z jego intencją. Niestety, wykonanie etykietowania bez jakiejkolwiek tymczasowej struktury zbiórki jest trudne, ponieważ samo pojęcie intencji jest źle zdefiniowane. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy hierarchiczny multimodalny model tematyczny regulowany w celu uzyskania pierwszego przybliżenia zbioru intencji. Naszym uzasadnieniem stosowania modeli hierarchicznych jest ich zdolność do uwzględnienia kilku stopni istotności dialogów. Staramy się zbudować model, który może rozróżnić podobieństwa tematyczne (np. medycyna i temat transportu) i działania (np. składanie wniosku i śledzenie statusu wniosku). Aby to osiągnąć, dzielimy zestaw wszystkich cech na kilka grup zgodnie z analizą części mowy. Różne grupy funkcji są traktowane różnie na różnych poziomach hierarchii.', 'no': 'Ein av utfordringane under oppgåveorientert prateutvikling er det vanskeleg tilgjengeleg av dei merkelige opplæringsdata. Den beste måten å få ein er å spørja assessorane om å merke kvar dialogvindauge etter hjelp. Dessverre er det vanskeleg å utføra merkelappen utan nokon provisional samlingsstruktur sidan det er veldig vanskeleg å gjera merkelappen. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit hierarkisk multimodal regulært temamodell for å få ein første nærminga av innstillinga. Reasjonalen vårt for bruk av hierarkiske modeller er den muligheten til å ta opp med fleire grader av dialogvindauget. Vi prøver å bygge eit modell som kan distisera mellom emnesebaserte (f.eks. medisinske og transportemne) og handlingsbaserte (f.eks. filtrering av eit program og sporingsstatus). For å oppnå dette, deler vi sett av alle funksjonar i fleire grupper etter ein del av taleanalyse. Fleire funksjonsgrupper vert behandle ulike på ulike hierarkivå.', 'sr': 'Jedan od izazova tokom razvoja otvorenih na zadatku je manja dostupnost označenih podataka o obuci. Najbolji način da dobijemo jedan je da pitam procenatore da označe svaki dijalog prema svojoj namjeri. Nažalost, izvršenje etikete bez ikakve privremene strukture skupljanja je teško jer je vrlo loše određena ideja namjere. U ovom papiru predlažemo hijerarhički multimodalni model regulariziranog tema kako bi dobili prvu približnost set a namera. Naš razlog za upotrebu hijerarhijskih modela je njihova sposobnost da uzimaju u obzir nekoliko stupnjeva relevantnosti dijaloga. Pokušavamo da izgradimo model koji može da razlikuje između sličnosti na temelju temelja (npr. medicinske i transportne teme) i na akciji (npr. prijave aplikacije i status praćenja aplikacije). Da bismo ovo postigli, podelimo set svih karakteristika u nekoliko grupa prema analizi dio govora. Razne grupe karakteristike se tretiraju drugačije na različitim nivoima hijerarhije.', 'ro': 'Una dintre provocările în timpul dezvoltării unui chatbot orientat spre sarcini este disponibilitatea limitată a datelor de instruire etichetate. Cel mai bun mod de a obține unul este de a cere evaluatorilor să eticheteze fiecare dialog în funcție de intenția sa. Din păcate, efectuarea etichetării fără nicio structură provizorie de colectare este dificilă, deoarece însăși noțiunea de intenție este greșit definită. În această lucrare, propunem un model de subiect regularizat multimodal ierarhic pentru a obține o primă aproximare a setului de intenții. Motivul nostru pentru utilizarea modelelor ierarhice este capacitatea lor de a lua în considerare mai multe grade ale relevanței dialogurilor. Încercăm să construim un model care să facă distincția între similaritățile bazate pe subiect (de exemplu, medicină și transport) și acțiuni (de exemplu, depunerea unei cereri și urmărirea statutului cererii). Pentru a realiza acest lucru, împărțim setul de toate caracteristicile în mai multe grupuri în funcție de analiza parțială de vorbire. Diferite grupuri de caracteristici sunt tratate diferit la diferite niveluri ierarhice.', 'sv': 'En av utmaningarna under en uppgiftsorienterad chatbotutveckling är den knappa tillgången på märkta träningsdata. Det bästa sättet att få en är att be bedömarna att tagga varje dialog enligt dess avsikt. Tyvärr är det svårt att genomföra märkning utan någon preliminär insamlingsstruktur eftersom själva begreppet avsikt är felaktigt definierad. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en hierarkisk multimodal regulariserad ämnesmodell för att få en första approximation av intentionsuppsättningen. Vår motivering för användning av hierarkiska modeller är deras förmåga att ta hänsyn till flera grader av dialogernas relevans. Vi försöker bygga en modell som kan skilja mellan ämnesbaserade (t.ex. medicin- och transportämnen) och handlingsbaserade (t.ex. inlämnande av en ansökan och spårning av ansökningsstatus) likheter. För att uppnå detta delar vi upp uppsättningen av alla funktioner i flera grupper enligt delanalys. Olika funktionsgrupper behandlas olika på olika hierarkiska nivåer.', 'si': 'වැඩක් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරපු චැට්බෝට් විකාශයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන එකක් තමයි ලේබෝල් කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්න එකක් ගන්න හොඳම විදියට තමයි අවශ්\u200dයාකයෝ අහන්නේ හැම සංවාදයක්ම ඔක්කොම සංවාදයේ අවශ්\u200dය විදිය අවාසනාවන්තයෙන්, කිසිම ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සංග්රහනයක් නැති ලේබිල් එක්ක කරන්න අමාරුයි, මේ අදහසක් ගැන හොයාගන්න අ මේ පැත්තට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සිද්ධා කරනවා මුලින්ම සැකසුම් සම්බන්ධයක් ලැබෙන්න. අපේ අධ්\u200dයාත්මක මොඩල් භාවිතා වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය තමයි ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සංවාදයේ විශේෂතාවක් ග අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හදන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා මොඩල් එකක් හදන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට (උදාහරණයෙන්, වෛද්\u200dය සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජන විදිහට) සහ ක්\u200dරියාව අධ්\u200dයා මේක හම්බවෙන්න, අපි සියළුම අවස්ථාවක් වලින් කණ්ඩායම් වලින් කණ්ඩායම් වලින් විශේෂ කරනවා. වෙනස් විශේෂ කණ්ඩායම් වෙනස් විශේෂ ස්තූතියේ වෙනස් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරනවා.', 'so': 'Mid ka mid ah dhibaatooyin waqtiga horumarinta chatbot ee shaqo-horaadka ah waa mid aan yarayn helin macluumaadka waxbarashada la qoray. Waddada ugu wanaagsan ee aad hesho waa in aad ku weydiisato qiimeeyayaasha in lagu tago dialog kasta si waafaqsan qasabkiisa. Nasiib la’aanta marka la sameynayo shaqo aan la’aanin dhismaha shaqada ee ku meelgaarka ah waa adag, sababtoo ah fikrada qasabka lagu sameeyo waa mid aan la caddeyn. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa tusaale ahaan la xeerariyey oo kala duduwan, si aan u helno koox ugu horeysa qoraalka qasabka. Isticmaalka modelalka hierarkiisa waxaa ku habboon kara in aad ku xisaabiso shahaado badan oo ku saabsan labadooda. Waxaan isku mid ah sameynaa tusaale ahaan oo ku kala sooci kara maadooyinka la xiriira (tusaale ahaan mada dawooyinka iyo gaadiidka) iyo shaqooyin ku saleysan (tusaale ahaan buuxinta codsiga iyo codsiga raadsashada). Si aan taas u gaadhno, waxaan u kala qaybinaynaa kooxo oo dhan sida qayb ka mid ah baaritaanka hadalka. Kooxo gaar ah waxaa lagu dhaqdhaqaaqaaqaa heerarka hierarkii kala duduwan.', 'ta': 'செயல் திசைக்கும் அரட்டை உருவாக்கும் போது சவால்களில் ஒன்று குறிப்பிட்ட பயிற்சி தரவின் குறைவானது. ஒரு பெறுவதற்கு சிறந்த வழி என்னவென்றால் ஒவ்வொரு உரையாடலுக்கும் ஒட்டுக்கொள்ள வேண்டும் என்பது பார்ப்பாளர துரதிருஷ்டவசமாக, எதுவும் தற்காலிக தொகுப்பு அமைப்பு இல்லாமல் வேலையை செய்வது கடினமாகும் ஏனெனில் நிலையின் நினைவு மி இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் முதல் நிலையான அமைப்பின் சுருக்கம் பெற முறைமையை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க முடியும். உரையாடல் செயல்பாடுகளின் பயன்பாடுகளுக்கு எங்கள் விகிதம் என்பது அவர்களுடைய சக்தி @ info பேச்சு ஆராய்ச்சி பார்ப்பு பார்ப்பு பார்வையை பொருத்தி பல குழுக்களாக பிரிக்க வேண்டும். பல்வேறு பண்புக் குழுக்கள் வேறு வித்தியாசமாக கருதப்படுகின்றன மேலும் வித்தியாசமான நிலைகளில்.', 'ur': 'ایک کام کی طرف سے چاٹبوٹ ڈولیٹ میں سے ایک چال ہے کہ لابلیٹ ٹرینگ ڈیٹوں کی کم موجودگی ہے. ایک کو حاصل کرنے کا بہترین طریقہ یہ ہے کہ آزمائش کرنے والوں سے ہر قسم کے مطابق ہر قسم کا ٹیگ کریں۔ بدبختی ہے، لابلینگ کے بغیر کسی موقت کی جمع سازی کے سامان کا انجام کرنا مشکل ہے کیونکہ مصنوعی کا خیال بد تعریف ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک حیراتیکی ملتی موڈال کی موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ پہلی مقصد کے قریب حاصل کریں۔ ہمارا قابل تحقیق مدل استعمال کے لئے ان کی قابل ہے کہ ان کی تعداد درجے کے معاملہ میں حساب کریں. ہم ایک مدل بنانے کی کوشش کررہے ہیں جو موضوع کی بنیادی (مثال medicine اور transport topics) اور اقدام کی بنیادی (مثال ایک کاریال اور کاریال موضوع کی تلاش کرنا) کے درمیان برابر اختلاف کرسکتا ہے۔ یہ کام کرنے کے لئے، ہم ہر قسم کے فرصت کو مختلف گروہوں میں تقسیم کرتے ہیں۔ مختلف فرصت گروپ مختلف سطح پر مختلف طریقے سے پکڑے جاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Vazifaning tashkilotni ta\xa0ľminlovchi ta\xa0ľminlovchi ta\xa0ľminlovchi ma\xa0ľlumotlarning yetarlicha qismi. Bir narsa olish uchun eng yaxshi usuli shu bilan bir oyna qanday oyna yordam berish. Afsuski, vaqtincha to\xa0Ľxtatish tuzuvchisi yo'q bajarish juda qiyin, chunki qanday g'oya yozib berilmagan. Bu qog\xa0Ľozda, biz birinchi qanday qo'shilgan multimodal mavzu modelini qo'yish uchun birinchi darajaga qarashni talab qilamiz. Hierarchik modellarning foydalanishimizning qiymatimiz - muloqatlarning bir necha daraja muhit darajasini hisoblash mumkin. Biz mavzu asosida va transport mavzularini ajratish mumkin modelni yaratishni harakat qilamiz va amal asosida (m. g. dastur va qo\xa0Ľllash holatini to \xa0Ľldirish mumkin). Buni amalga oshirish uchun biz hamma xossalarning bir necha guruhga aytishimiz mumkin. Har xil xossalar guruhi boshqa xierarcha darajada boshqa boshqa narsa qilinadi.", 'vi': 'Một trong những thử thách trong quá trình phát triển tập tin của một Chatur là sự khan hiếm khi có các dữ liệu được đánh dấu. Cách tốt nhất để đạt được một người là yêu cầu người đánh giá đánh dấu mỗi cuộc đối thoại theo mục đích của nó. Thật không may, việc biên hàm mà không có cấu trúc bộ sưu tập tạm thời là khó khăn vì khái niệm chủ ý không rõ ràng lắm. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình chủ đề theo quy tắc đa chiều phân cấp để đạt được một ước lượng đầu tiên của mục tiêu. Lý tưởng của việc sử dụng các mô hình cấp dưới là khả năng của họ để cân nhắc vài độ liên quan đến liên quan. Chúng tôi cố g ắng xây dựng một mô hình có thể phân biệt giữa các chủ đề (ví dụ như về y học và vận chuyển) và các đối tượng dựa trên hành động (ví dụ như việc đệ trình đơn xin tìm kiếm và tình trạng ứng dụng) tương đồng. Để đạt được điều đó, chúng ta phân chia các đặc điểm vào nhiều nhóm theo phân tích phần ngôn ngữ. Các nhóm đặc trưng được đối xử khác nhau ở các cấp bậc khác.', 'da': 'En af udfordringerne under en opgaveorienteret chatbotudvikling er den knappe tilgængelighed af de mærkede træningsdata. Den bedste måde at få en på er at bede bedømmerne om at mærke hver dialog efter dens hensigt. Desværre er det vanskeligt at udføre mærkning uden nogen foreløbig indsamlingsstruktur, da selve begrebet om hensigten er dårligt defineret. I denne artikel foreslår vi en hierarkisk multimodal reguleret emnemodel for at opnå en første tilnærmelse af hensigtssættet. Vores begrundelse for brugen af hierarkiske modeller er deres evne til at tage højde for flere grader af dialogernes relevans. Vi forsøger at opbygge en model, der kan skelne mellem emnebaserede (f.eks. medicin og transport emner) og handlingsbaserede (f.eks. indgivelse af en ansøgning og sporing af ansøgningsstatus) ligheder. For at opnå dette opdeler vi sæt af alle funktioner i flere grupper i henhold til del-of-tale analyse. Forskellige funktionsgrupper behandles forskelligt på forskellige hierarki niveauer.', 'hr': 'Jedan od izazova tijekom razvoja otmjenih na zadatku je nedostatak dostupnosti označenih podataka o obuci. Najbolji način da ga dobijete je tražiti procjenjivača da označe svaki dijalog prema svojoj namjeri. Nažalost, izvršenje etikete bez ikakve privremene strukture skupljanja je teško jer je vrlo loše određena pojma namjere. U ovom papiru predlažemo hijerarhički multimodalni model regulariziranog tema kako bi dobili prvi približavanje namjere. Naš razlog za upotrebu hijerarhičkih modela je njihova sposobnost uzimati u obzir nekoliko stupnjeva relevantnosti dijaloga. Pokušavamo izgraditi model koji može razlikovati između sličnosti na temelju temelja (npr. lijekova i prijevoznih tema) i na temelju akcije (npr. prijava status a aplikacije i praćenja aplikacije). Da bismo to postigli, podijelili smo skup svih karakteristika u nekoliko grupa prema analizi dio govora. Razne skupine karakteristike se tretiraju drugačije na različitim nivoima hijerarhije.', 'nl': 'Een van de uitdagingen tijdens een taakgerichte chatbot ontwikkeling is de schaarse beschikbaarheid van de gelabelde trainingsdata. De beste manier om er een te krijgen is door de beoordelaars te vragen elke dialoog te taggen volgens de intentie ervan. Helaas is het moeilijk etiketteren zonder enige voorlopige inzamelingsstructuur uit te voeren, omdat het begrip intentie zelf slecht gedefinieerd is. In dit artikel stellen we een hiërarchisch multimodaal geregulariseerd topic model voor om een eerste benadering van de intentieset te verkrijgen. Onze reden voor het gebruik van hiërarchische modellen is hun vermogen om rekening te houden met verschillende graden van de relevantie van de dialogen. We proberen een model te bouwen dat onderscheid kan maken tussen subject-based (bijv. geneeskunde- en transportonderwerpen) en action-based (bijvoorbeeld het indienen van een aanvraag en het bijhouden van de status van de aanvraag) overeenkomsten. Om dit te bereiken, verdelen we de set van alle kenmerken in verschillende groepen volgens een deel-van-spraak analyse. Verschillende functiegroepen worden op verschillende hiërarchieniveaus verschillend behandeld.', 'bg': 'Едно от предизвикателствата при разработването на чатбот, ориентиран към задачите, е оскъдната наличност на етикетираните данни за обучение. Най-добрият начин да получите такъв е да помолите оценителите да маркират всеки диалог според намерението му. За съжаление, извършването на етикетиране без каквато и да е временна структура на събирането е трудно, тъй като самата представа за намерението е неправилно дефинирана. В настоящата статия предлагаме йерархичен мултимодален регуляризиран тематичен модел за получаване на първо приближение на набора намерения. Нашата обосновка за използването на йерархични модели е способността им да отчитат няколко степени на релевантност на диалога. Опитваме се да изградим модел, който да разграничава сходствата между тематични (например медицински и транспортни теми) и базирани на действия (например подаване на заявление и проследяване на статуса на заявлението). За да постигнем това, разделяме набор от всички функции на няколко групи според анализ на част от речта. Различни групи функции се третират различно на различни йерархични нива.', 'id': 'Salah satu tantangan selama pembangunan chatbot orient tugas adalah kecepatan jarang dari data pelatihan yang ditabel. Cara terbaik untuk mendapatkan salah satu adalah meminta penilai untuk menandai setiap dialog menurut niatnya. Sayangnya, melaksanakan label tanpa struktur koleksi sementara sulit karena gagasan intinya tidak terdefinisikan. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model topik terregularisasi multimodal hierarkis untuk mendapatkan pendekatan pertama dari set tujuan. Rasional kita untuk penggunaan model hierarkis adalah kemampuan mereka untuk mempertimbangkan beberapa derajat dari relevansi dialog. Kami mencoba membangun model yang dapat membedakan antara berbasis subjek (cth. obat dan subjek transportasi) dan kesamaan berbasis aksi (cth. mendaftar aplikasi dan melacak status aplikasi). Untuk mencapai ini, kita membagi set semua fitur ke beberapa kelompok menurut bagian dari analisis pidato. Berbagai kelompok fitur diperlakukan berbeda di tingkat hierarki berbeda.', 'de': 'Eine der Herausforderungen bei einer aufgabenorientierten Chatbot-Entwicklung ist die knappe Verfügbarkeit der markierten Trainingsdaten. Der beste Weg, einen Dialog zu bekommen, ist, die Assessoren zu bitten, jeden Dialog entsprechend seiner Absicht zu kennzeichnen. Leider ist es schwierig, eine Kennzeichnung ohne eine vorläufige Sammelstruktur durchzuführen, da der Begriff der Absicht selbst schlecht definiert ist. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein hierarchisches multimodales regularisiertes Themenmodell vor, um eine erste Annäherung des Intent Sets zu erhalten. Unser Grund für die Verwendung hierarchischer Modelle ist ihre Fähigkeit, mehrere Grade der Dialogerelevanz zu berücksichtigen. Wir versuchen, ein Modell zu entwickeln, das zwischen fachbezogenen (z.B. Medizin- und Transportthemen) und handlungsbasierten (z.B. Antragstellung und Verfolgung des Antragsstatus) Ähnlichkeiten unterscheiden kann. Um dies zu erreichen, teilen wir den Funktionsumfang gemäß Sprachteilanalyse in mehrere Gruppen auf. Verschiedene Feature-Gruppen werden auf verschiedenen Hierarchieebenen unterschiedlich behandelt.', 'ko': '임무를 위한 채팅 로봇 개발 과정에서 도전은 표시된 교육 데이터의 가용성이 부족하다는 것이다.대화를 얻는 가장 좋은 방법은 평가원이 대화의 의도에 따라 모든 대화를 표시하는 것이다.불행하게도 임시 수집 구조가 없는 상황에서 표기하는 것은 어렵다. 의도의 개념 자체가 명확하지 않기 때문이다.본고에서 우리는 층별 다중모드 정규화 주제 모델을 제시하여 의도집의 근사성을 얻었다.우리가 분층모델을 사용하는 기본 원리는 어느 정도의 관련성을 고려할 수 있다는 것이다.우리는 주제 기반(예를 들어 의학과 교통 주제)과 행동 기반(예를 들어 신청 제출과 추적 신청 상태)의 유사성을 구분할 수 있는 모델을 구축하고자 한다.이를 실현하기 위해 우리는 어성 분석에 따라 모든 특징을 몇 개의 조로 나눈다.서로 다른 요소 그룹은 서로 다른 차원에서 서로 다른 대우를 받는다.', 'fa': 'یکی از چالش\u200cها در طول توسعه صحبت\u200cهای مشخص به کار کمی از دسترسی داده\u200cهای آموزش برچسب است. بهترین راهی برای گرفتن یکی اینه که از ارزیابکاران بپرسند که هر صحبت را بر طبق هدف خود نشان دهند. متأسفانه، برچسب کردن بدون ساختار جمع\u200cآوری موقتی سخت است از آنجا که اصلاً فکری هدف بد تعریف شده است. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل موضوع معمولی متعددی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا اولین نزدیک کردن مجموعه\u200cی هدف گیریم. قابلیت ما برای استفاده از مدل های دایره\u200cآرایشی توانایی آنها است که چندین درجه مربوط به درجه\u200cهای دایره\u200cها را به حساب بگیرند. ما سعی می\u200cکنیم یک مدل بسازیم که می\u200cتواند بین مشابه\u200cهای موضوع (مثال دارویی و موضوع انتقال) و اقدام (مثال فرستادن یک کاربرد و وضعیت کاربرد را ردیابی کند) تفاوت دهد. برای رسیدن به این، مجموعه از تمام ویژه\u200cها را به چند گروه تقسیم می\u200cکنیم بر اساس تحلیل بخشی از سخنرانی. گروه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای مختلف در سطح مختلف درمان می\u200cشوند.', 'tr': 'G철revlerde g철rkezilen 챌채pler 철s체힊inde kyn챌ylyklary흫 biri etitlen첵채n e휓itim maglumatyny흫 첵eterli 첵erindir. Birini흫 i흫 gowy 첵oly almak - tassyz챌ylary흫 her dialogy maksadyna g철r채 terjime etmeklerini soramakdyr. Gynansakda, nama첵y흫 n채dogry d체힊체nmesi 체챌in etiketlemek kyn. Bu kagyzda, biz ilkinji maksady흫 gollanmasyny almak 체챌in bir i첵erarhi첵a multimodal nusga teklip edip g철r첵채ris 횦erear힊ik nusgalarymyz 체챌in 첵철r채n seb채bimiz, dialoglary흫 birn채챌e derejesini 챌ykarmak ukypdyr. Biz subat tabalygyny tapawutlap bilen bir nusga gurmagy synany힊첵arys (mesela derman we hat meselesi) we eylem tabalygyny (철r채n bir uygulama 첵agda첵yny흫 첵agda첵yny a 첵dyp bilmek 체챌in synany힊첵arys. Bunu ba힊armak 체챌in, b체t체n 철zellikleri birn채챌e topara 챌ykaryp 챌yky힊 analyzasyna g철r채 b철leriz. Birn채챌e wajyp topar 체첵tgewleri farkl캇 i첵erarhi첵a derejesinde 체첵tge힊iril첵채r.', 'af': "Een van die uitdagings tydens 'n taak orienteerde geselskappy ontwikkeling is die skaars beskikbaarheid van die gemerkte onderwerp data. Die beste manier om een te kry is om die aanvaarders te vra om elke dialoog te merk volgens sy doel. Ongelukkig, betekening sonder enige provisionele versameling struktuur is moeilik, omdat die baie nodiging van die doel is sleg gedefinieerd. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n hierarkies multimodaal regulariseerde onderwerp model om 'n eerste toekoms van die doel stel te kry. Ons rationale vir hierarkiese modelle gebruik is hul moontlik om verskeie grade van die dialoog relevante in rekening te neem. Ons probeer om 'n model te bou wat tussen onderwerp-gebaseerde onderwerp (bv. mediese en transport-onderwerpe) en aksie-gebaseerde (bv. onderwerp van 'n toepassing en onderwerp van toepassingsstatus) gelykenisse te verkies. Om dit te bereik, deel ons stel van alle funksies in verskeie groepe volgens deel van spraak analisie. Verskeie funksie groepe word verskillende behandel op verskillende hierarkie vlakke.", 'sw': 'Moja ya changamoto wakati wa maendeleo ya mazungumzo yanayoelekezwa na kazi ni upatikanaji mdogo wa taarifa za mafunzo. Namna bora ya kupata mtu ni kuwaomba watazamaji kuandika mazungumzo ya kila mjadala kwa mujibu wa nia yake. Kwa bahati mbaya, kutekeleza maabara bila muundo wowote wa mkusanyiko wa muda ni vigumu kwa sababu dhana ya malengo hayajaeleweka. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mtindo wa mada uliofanywa na miamba mbalimbali ili kupata takribani msingi wa kwanza wa kituo hicho. Uhalali wetu wa matumizi ya mifano ya kihafidhina ni uwezo wao wa kuangalia vyeo kadhaa vya mazungumzo yanayohusiana. Tunajaribu kutengeneza mifano inayoweza kutofautisha kati ya mada yenye msingi wa mada (kama mada ya dawa na usafiri) na kwa kutumia hatua (kama vile kuutumia programu na hali ya kufuatilia matumizi). Ili kufikia hili, tunagawanya aina zote katika makundi kadhaa kwa mujibu wa uchambuzi wa hotuba. Vikundi mbalimbali vinaonekana tofauti katika viwango tofauti vya hierarchy.', 'sq': 'Një nga sfidat gjatë një zhvillimi të chatbotit të orientuar në detyrë është dispozicioni i paktë i të dhënave të trajnimit të etiketuar. The best way of getting one is to ask the assessors to tag each dialogue according to its intent.  Fatkeqësisht, kryerja e etiketave pa ndonjë strukturë të mbledhjes së përkohshme është e vështirë pasi koncepti i qëllimit është i keqpërcaktuar. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një model hierarkik të rregulluar multimodal për të marrë një përafërsim të parë të caktuar. Arsyeja jonë për përdorimin e modeleve hierarkike është aftësia e tyre për të marrë parasysh disa gradë të rëndësisë së dialogut. We attempt to build a model that can distinguish between subject-based (e.g. medicine and transport topics) and action-based (e.g. filing of an application and tracking application status) similarities.  Me qëllim që ta arrijmë këtë, ne ndajmë grupin e të gjitha karakteristikave në disa grupe sipas analizës së pjesës së fjalimit. Grupe të ndryshme karakteristike trajtohen ndryshe në nivele të ndryshme hierarkie.', 'az': 'G√∂z…ôl t…ôrzind…ô √ß…ônt t…ôrzind…ô olanlarńĪn birisi etiketli t…ôrzim m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪn √ßox az faydalanmasńĪdńĪr. Birini almaq …ôn yaxŇüńĪ yolu m√ľkafatlarńĪndan h…ôr diyal…ô niyy…ôti il…ô etiketl…ônm…ôkdir. Nec…ô olaraq, h…ôr hansńĪ bir m√ľdd…ôtli koleksiyon qurulmasńĪ olmadan etiketl…ônm…ôk m…ôqs…ôdilin fikrinin √ßox √ß…ôtin olduńüu √ľ√ß√ľn √ß…ôtin idi. Bu kańüńĪzda, bir hiyerarŇüik √ßoxlu modal m√ľzakir…ô m…ôs…ôl…ônin ilk yaxńĪnlaŇümasńĪnńĪ t…ôklif edirik. Bizim hiyerarŇüik modell…ôrin istifad…ôsi haqqńĪndakńĪmńĪz m√ľnasib…ôtimiz, dialoglarńĪn √ßoxlu d…ôr…ôc…ôl…ôrini hesablamaq bacarńĪńüńĪdńĪr. Biz m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr t…ôr…ôfind…ôn ayńĪrd ed…ô bil…ôc…ôk modeli inŇüa etm…ôy…ô √ßalńĪŇüńĪrńĪq (m…ôs…ôl…ôn, m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr v…ô t…ôkrar m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr arasńĪnda) v…ô eyni t…ôkrar t…ôr…ôfind…ôn t…ôkrar edil…ôn (m…ôs…ôl…ôn uyńüulama v…ô uyńüulama durumunu t…ôkrar ed…ô bil…ôc…ôk) m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr arasńĪnda. Bunu baŇüa d√ľŇüm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn, s√∂zl…ôrin bir par√ßasńĪ analizi il…ô b√ľt√ľn f…ôrqli qruplara b√∂l√ľŇüd√ľk. M√ľxt…ôlif x√ľsusiyy…ôtl…ôr qruplarńĪ m√ľxt…ôlif hiyararhiya s…ôviyy…ôl…ôrind…ô m√ľxt…ôlif r…ôftar edilir.', 'hy': 'Խնդիրներից մեկն այն է, որ խնդիրներից մեկը, որն ուղղություն ունի խնդիրներին շտաբոտի զարգացման ընթացքում, պիտակուցված ուսուցման տվյալների հազվադեպ հասանելիությունն է: Ամեն մեկը ստանալու լավագույն միջոցն այն է, որ խնդրենք գնահատողներին, որ յուրաքանչյուր հաղորդակցվեն ըստ իր նպատակի: Դժբախտաբար, պիտակ կատարելը առանց որևէ ժամանակակից հավաքածու կառուցվածքի դժվար է, քանի որ նպատակի հասկացությունը սխալ է սահմանափակված: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք հիերարխիկ բազմամոդալ վերահսկվող թեմային մոդել, որպեսզի ստանանք առաջին մոտեցումը նպատակների սահմանը: Մեր հիերարխիկ մոդելների օգտագործման ռացիոնալը այն է, որ նրանք կարողանում են հաշվի առնել երկու աստիճանների կարևորությունը: We attempt to build a model that can distinguish between subject-based (e.g. medicine and transport topics) and action-based (e.g. filing of an application and tracking application status) similarities.  Սա հասնելու համար մենք բաժանում ենք բոլոր հատկանիշները մի քանի խմբերի, ըստ խոսքի մասի վերլուծության: Տարբեր հատկանիշների խմբեր տարբեր կերպ են վերաբերվում տարբեր հիերարխիայի մակարդակներում:', 'am': 'በተመሳሳይ አካባቢት አካባቢ ግንኙነት አንዱ የጽሑፍ ትምህርት ዳታዎችን መግኘት የጎደለው ነው፡፡ የመስጠት የሚሻለው መንገድ የአህዮቹን ማሳየት የሚጠይቅ ጥያቄ በሁሉም ማኅበረሰብ በተስፋው መጠን ነው፡፡ በተከፋች ጊዜ፣ የአስቡን አሳብ ከስህተት ግንኙነት ሳይኖር ተግባር ማድረግ አስቸጋሪ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የመጀመሪያውን የጉዳዩ ጉዳይ ማግኘት የመጀመሪያውን ቁጥጥር ለማግኘት የሀይራርክቲክ ብዙኃላዊ ጉዳይ ሞዴል እናስባለን፡፡ የሀይራርክቲክ ዓይነቶችን ለመጠቀም የሚችሉትን አካባቢነታችንን በጥቂት ደረጃዎች የDialogue ግንኙነት ለመጠየቅ ይችላል፡፡ በጉዳዩ ላይ የሚለዩትን (ለምሳሌ አዲስ መድኃኒት እና ለመጓዝ ጉዳዮች) እና በሥርዓት መሠረት (ለምሳሌ ፕሮግራምን እና ፕሮግራምን በመስጠት እና የመግለጽ ሥርዓት) በሚመስል እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይህንን ለማግኘት፣ የሁሉን ምርጫዎች እንደ ንግግር አስተያየት ብዙዎችን ክፍሎች እናካፈላለን፡፡ የተለያየ ምርጫዎች ቡድን በተለየ አርእስክቲክ ደረጃዎች ላይ ይቆማል።', 'bs': 'Jedan od izazova tijekom razvoja otmjenih na zadatku je manja dostupnost označenih podataka o obuci. Najbolji način da dobijemo jedan je da zamolimo procjenjivače da označe svaki dijalog prema svojoj namjeri. Nažalost, izvršenje etikete bez ikakve privremene strukture skupljanja je teško jer je vrlo loše određena ideja namjere. U ovom papiru predlažemo hijerarhički multimodalni model regulariziranog tema kako bi dobili prvu približnost set a namjere. Naš racional za upotrebu hijerarhijskih modela je njihova sposobnost uzimati u obzir nekoliko stupnjeva relevantnosti dijaloga. Pokušavamo izgraditi model koji može različiti između sličnosti na temelju temelja (npr. medicinske i transportne teme) i na akciji (npr. prijavljenje aplikacije i status praćenja aplikacije). Da bismo postigli ovo, podijelili smo skup svih karakteristika u nekoliko grupa prema analizi dio govora. Razne grupe karakteristika se tretiraju drugačije na različitim nivoima hijerarhije.', 'bn': 'কাজের দিকে চ্যাটবোট উন্নয়নের সময় একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ হচ্ছে লেবেল প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য খুব কম। পাওয়ার সবচেয়ে ভাল উপায় হচ্ছে হিসাব গ্রহণকারীদের প্রত্যেক ডায়ালগ ট্যাগ করার জন্য। দুর্ভাগ্যবশত, কোন স্থায়ী সংগ্রহের কাঠামো ছাড়া লেবেল প্রদর্শন করা খুব কঠিন কারণ এই উদ্দেশ্যের ধারণা খুবই অজুহাত। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি হিরেরার্কিল মাল্টিমোডাল বিষয় নিয়মিত মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে এই উদ্দেশ্যের কাছে প্রথম প্রায় প্রায় হিয়ারার্কিল মডেল ব্যবহারের জন্য আমাদের যুক্তিত্ব হচ্ছে তাদের ক্ষমতা বেশ কয়েকটি ডিগ্রি যোগাযোগের প্রয়োজনীয় ব আমরা একটি মডেল তৈরি করার চেষ্টা করছি যা বিষয়বস্তু ভিত্তিক (যেমন মেডিক এবং পরিবহন বিষয়গুলোর মধ্যে আলাদা করতে পারে) এবং কাজের ভিত্তিক (যেমন অ্যাপলিকেশন এবং অ এই বিষয়টি অর্জনের জন্য আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী বিশ্লেষণ অনুসারে বিভিন্ন গ্রুপে বিভক্ত করি। বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্যের গ্রুপ ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন স্তরে চিকিৎসা করা হয়।', 'ca': "Un dels reptes durant un desenvolupament de chatbots orientat a les tasques és la escasa disponibilitat de les dades d'entrenament etiquetades. The best way of getting one is to ask the assessors to tag each dialogue according to its intent.  Malauradament, fer etiquetes sense cap estructura de col·lecció provisional és difícil, ja que la noció de l'intenció és maldefinida. En aquest paper, proposem un model de tema jeràrquic multimodal regularitzat per aconseguir una primera aproximació del conjunt d'intencions. La raó per l'ús de models jeràrquics és la seva habilitat de tenir en compte diversos graus de la pertinencia dels diàlegs. Intentem construir un model que pot distingir entre les similituds basades en temes (per exemple, medicina i temes de transport) i basades en acció (per exemple, la presentació d'una aplicació i el seguiment de l'e status de l'aplicació). Per tal d'aconseguir això, dividim el conjunt de totes les característiques en diversos grups segons l'anàlisi de part de la xerrada. Diversos grups de característiques es tracten de manera diferent a diferents nivells de jerarquia.", 'cs': 'Jednou z výzev při vývoji chatbotů orientovaných na úkoly je vzácná dostupnost označených tréninkových dat. Nejlepším způsobem, jak ho získat, je požádat hodnotící, aby označili každý dialog podle jeho záměru. Bohužel, provádění označování bez jakékoliv prozatímní sběrné struktury je obtížné, protože samotný pojem záměru je špatně definovaný. V tomto článku navrhujeme hierarchický multimodální regularizovaný tématický model pro získání první aproximace záměrové sady. Naším důvodem pro využití hierarchických modelů je jejich schopnost zohlednit několik stupňů relevance dialogů. Snažíme se vytvořit model, který dokáže rozlišovat mezi subjektovými (např. medicínskými a dopravními tématy) a akčními (např. podání žádosti a sledování stavu žádosti). Abychom toho dosáhli, rozdělíme soubor všech vlastností do několika skupin podle analýzy části řeči. Různé skupiny funkcí jsou na různých úrovních hierarchie zacházeny odlišně.', 'et': 'Üks ülesandepõhise chatboti arendamise väljakutseid on märgistatud koolitusandmete vähesus. Parim viis selle saamiseks on paluda hindajatel iga dialoogi märgistada vastavalt selle kavatsusele. Kahjuks on märgistamine ilma esialgse kogumisstruktuurita raske, sest kavatsuse mõiste on valesti määratletud. Käesolevas töös pakume välja hierarhilise multimodaalse regulariseeritud teemamudeli, et saada esimene lähendus kavatsuste komplekti. Hierarhiliste mudelite kasutamise põhjuseks on nende võime arvestada dialoogide asjakohasust mitmel määral. Püüame luua mudeli, mis eristaks teemapõhiseid (nt meditsiini- ja transporditeemasid) ja tegevuspõhiseid (nt taotluse esitamine ja taotluse staatuse jälgimine) sarnasusi. Selle saavutamiseks jagame kõigi omaduste komplekti mitmeks rühmaks vastavalt kõneosa analüüsile. Erinevatel hierarhiatasanditel koheldakse erinevaid funktsioonirühmi erinevalt.', 'fi': 'Yksi tehtävälähtöisen chatbotin kehittämisen haasteista on merkittyjen koulutustietojen niukka saatavuus. Paras tapa saada sellainen on pyytää arvioijia merkitsemään jokaisen dialogin tarkoituksen mukaan. Valitettavasti merkintöjen tekeminen ilman alustavaa keräysrakennetta on vaikeaa, koska itse tarkoituksen käsite on epäselvä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme hierarkkista multimodaalista säännösteltyä aihemallia saadaksemme ensimmäisen likimääräisen tavoitejoukon. Hierarkkisten mallien käytön peruste on niiden kyky ottaa huomioon dialogien merkityksen useat asteet. Pyrimme rakentamaan mallin, joka erottaa aihekohtaiset (esim. lääketiede- ja kuljetusaiheet) ja toimintopohjaiset (esim. hakemuksen jättäminen ja hakemuksen tilan seuranta) samankaltaisuudet. Tämän saavuttamiseksi jaamme kaikki ominaisuudet useisiin ryhmiin puheanalyysin mukaan. Erilaisia ominaisuusryhmiä kohdellaan eri hierarkian tasoilla eri tavalla.', 'sk': 'Eden izmed izzivov pri razvoju klepetalnih botov, usmerjenih v naloge, je omejena razpoložljivost označenih podatkov o usposabljanju. Najboljši način je, da ocenjevalce zaprosijo, da označijo vsak dialog glede na njegov namen. Žal je izvajanje označevanja brez začasne strukture zbirke težko, saj je sam pojem namena slabo opredeljen. V prispevku predlagamo hierarhični multimodalni urejeni tematski model za pridobitev prvega približka nabora namenov. Naša logika za uporabo hierarhičnih modelov je njihova sposobnost upoštevanja več stopenj relevantnosti dialogov. Poskušamo zgraditi model, ki lahko razlikuje med tematskimi podobnostmi (npr. medicinskimi in transportnimi temami) in dejanskimi podobnostmi (npr. vložitev prijave in sledenje statusa prijave). Za dosego tega sklop vseh značilnosti razdelimo v več skupin glede na analizo dela govora. Različne skupine funkcij se obravnavajo različno na različnih ravneh hierarhije.', 'jv': 'Sing barêng-barêng sing beraksi nang nggawé operasi tarjamahan karo nggawe gerakan kanggo ndelok data sing beraksi Awak dhéwé nggawe rong iki dadi kanggo nakokker-nakosik kanggo ngilangno dialog sing berarti Lalah, negori nggawe etiket sing ora ono wektu nggawe cadak, sedhaya iso nggawe barang apik sing apik gedhé. Nang pebuk iki, kita mudhun akeh sistem sistem multimodal sing ditambah bantuan nggawe gerakan kelas pertamane Awakdhéwé rationale kanggo nggawe model karo akeh dumadhi kanggo ngerasakno dadi iki dadi, ingkang dianggo barang Awak dhéwé saiki nggawe model sing bisa nggawe ungepuné karo pakem, suku isih dumateng lan cara nggawe barang seneng nggawe barang nggawe Ngawe nggo ngerti iki, kita podho nganggo cara-cara sing perusahaan nganggo cara-karo nganggo perusahaan langgar sapa-perusahaan langgar. string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'ha': "Babu wani daga gokuren a lokacin da aka gabatar da mazaɓa na aikin chatbot yana da ƙaranci da za'a iya sãmun data na tabar da aka rubũta. Tsarin ka fi kyãwo ka motsa guda ni'anar ka tambayi ma'anar gaske ga duk zauren akwatin bayanin da ke so. Babu rabon, performing labo bã da wani matsayin mai halayya da shi ya yi nauyi, saboda haka da an bayyana fikon aikin da ke so ba. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata misãlin da aka yi wa hierrrchical multi-multiodal da aka ƙayyade shi dõmin ka sami kowaci ta farkon matabbata. Tsaranci na da amfani da misãlai masu hierrarci yana da abincin su ɗauki daraja guda na zauren zauren masu da muhimmi. Tuna jarraba ka samar da wani misali wanda zai iya rarraba tsakanin masu bassi (misali madaidaici da maɓallin tafiyar da hanya) da kuma masu daidaita aiki (misali filin shirin ayuka da halin shiryoyin ayuka). Dõmin mu isa wannan, muna raba kowane tsari cikin jama'a guda kamar rabon-bakin bayani. Ana yi amfani da jama'a mãsu yawa cikin daraja dabam-dabam.", 'bo': 'One of the challenges during a task-oriented chatbot development is the scarce availability of the labeled training data. ཐོག་འགོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚོ་མཁན་ཚོས་རེ་རེའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དང་མཐོང་སྣང་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་དེ་རེད། Nay, performing labeling without any provisional collection structure is difficult since the very notion of the intent is ill-defined. ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་གི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་དང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་རྐྱེན་བཟོས་པའི་མགོ་རིམ་གཞུང་ཡིན་པའི་གནད ང་ཚོའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་དབུས་གཞུང་གི་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་ཁོང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་གནས་ཚུལ་མཐུན་ཚད་ལྟར་བཤ ང་ཚོས་གནད་དོན་དང་འདྲ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མིག་དཔེ་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་ལ། To achieve this, we set of features all into several groups according to part-of-speech analysis. དབྱིབས་ཤུགས་ཀྱི་ཚོ་ཁག་མ་འདྲ་བའི་དབྱིབས་སྒྲིག་ཚད་མ་འདྲ་བའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་སོ་སོར་བྱེད་སོང་།', 'he': 'One of the challenges during a task-oriented chatbot development is the scarce availability of the labeled training data.  The best way of getting one is to ask the assessors to tag each dialogue according to its intent.  למרבה הצער, ביצוע תיקונים ללא מבנה אוסף זמני זה קשה מאחר שהרעיון של הכוונה הוא לא מוגדר. In this paper, we propose a hierarchical multimodal regularized topic model to obtain a first approximation of the intent set.  הגיוני שלנו לשימוש בדוגמנים היררכיים הוא היכולת שלהם לשקול מספר מעלות של הרלוונטיות של הדיולוגים. אנו מנסים לבנות מודל שיכול להבדיל בין נושאים מבוססים (למשל נושאי תרופה ונושאים תחבורה) לבין נושאים מבוססים על פעולה (למשל הגישה של היישום ומעקב אחרי מצב היישום). In order to achieve this, we divide set of all features into several groups according to part-of-speech analysis.  Various feature groups are treated differently on different hierarchy levels.'}
{'en': 'Are ambiguous conjunctions problematic for machine translation?', 'ar': 'هل الاقترانات الغامضة مشكلة بالنسبة للترجمة الآلية؟', 'pt': 'As conjunções ambíguas são problemáticas para a tradução automática?', 'fr': 'Les conjonctions ambiguës sont-elles problématiques pour la traduction automatique\xa0?', 'es': '¿Las conjunciones ambiguas son problemáticas para la traducción automática?', 'ja': '曖昧な接続詞は機械翻訳にとって問題なのか？', 'hi': 'क्या मशीन अनुवाद के लिए अस्पष्ट संयोजन समस्याग्रस्त हैं?', 'ru': 'Являются ли неоднозначные соединения проблематичными для машинного перевода?', 'zh': '含糊不清之连词有问于机器翻译乎?', 'ga': 'An bhfuil fadhbanna le comhcheangail dhébhríocha maidir le haistriúchán meaisín?', 'ka': 'ამბიზუალური კონჯუქციების პრობლემატიკურია მაქინის გაგრძელებისთვის?', 'el': 'Είναι προβληματικές οι διφορούμενες συνδέσεις για τη μηχανική μετάφραση;', 'hu': 'A kétértelmű kötőhártyák problémásak a gépi fordítás szempontjából?', 'it': 'Le congiuntioni ambigue sono problematiche per la traduzione automatica?', 'kk': 'Компьютерді аудару үшін бірнеше біріктіру мәселесі бар ма?', 'lt': 'Ar dviprasmiškos jungtys yra probleminės vertimui mašina?', 'mk': 'Дали двогумните врски се проблематични за машински превод?', 'ms': 'Adakah kongsi yang ambiguh problematik untuk terjemahan mesin?', 'ml': 'Are ambiguous conjunctions problematic for machine translation?', 'no': 'Er problematisk for avgjevne sambandar for maskinsomsetjing?', 'pl': 'Czy niejednoznaczne spojrzenia są problematyczne dla tłumaczenia maszynowego?', 'mt': 'Il-konġunzjonijiet ambigwi huma problematiċi għat-traduzzjoni bil-magna?', 'mn': 'Машин хөрөнгө оруулахад асуудал бий юу?', 'ro': 'Conjuncțiile ambigue sunt problematice pentru traducerea automată?', 'si': 'මැෂින් වාර්තාව සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවද?', 'so': 'Miyey dhibaatooyin ku adag yihiin turjumaadda mashiinka?', 'sr': 'Da li su problematične veze za prevod mašine?', 'sv': 'Är tvetydiga konjunktioner problematiska för maskinöversättning?', 'ta': 'இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கு பிரச்சனையான இணைப்பு இருக்கிறதா?', 'ur': 'ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے مشکل ہیں؟', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Có mâu thuẫn mơ hồ nào khó dịch không?', 'bg': 'Неясните конюнкции проблематични ли са при машинния превод?', 'hr': 'Jesu li problematične veze za prevod strojeva?', 'nl': 'Zijn dubbelzinnige conjuncties problematisch voor machinevertaling?', 'da': 'Er tvetydige bindinger problematiske for maskinoversættelse?', 'de': 'Sind mehrdeutige Konjunktionen problematisch für die maschinelle Übersetzung?', 'id': 'Are ambiguous conjunctions problematic for machine translation?', 'ko': '다른 뜻의 연어는 기계 번역에 문제가 있습니까?', 'tr': 'Makina terjime etmek üçin wajyp bilerleşmeler kynçylykmy?', 'af': 'Is onbediende verbindings problematiek vir masjien vertaling?', 'fa': 'مشکلی برای ترجمه ماشین مشکلی نیست؟', 'sq': 'A janë lidhjet e qarta problematike për përkthimin e makinave?', 'sw': 'Je, mahusiano yanayovutia ni tatizo kwa kutafsiri mashine?', 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য কি বিপদজনক যোগাযোগ সমস্যা?', 'az': 'Makina 칞evirilm톛si 칲칞칲n m칲xt톛lif bir birlikd톛 problematik deyilmi?', 'am': 'የመሳዊ ትርጓሜ መግለጫ የሚያስቸገር ግንኙነት ነውን?', 'hy': 'Are ambiguous conjunctions problematic for machine translation?', 'cs': 'Jsou nejednoznačné spojky problematické pro strojový překlad?', 'et': 'Kas masintõlke puhul on ebaselged sidemed probleemsed?', 'fi': 'Onko konekäännöksen kannalta ongelmallista moniselitteisiä konjunktioita?', 'bs': 'Da li su problematične veze za prevod mašine?', 'ca': 'Are ambiguous conjunctions problematic for machine translation?', 'he': 'האם קשרים משותפים בעייתיים לתרגום מכונות?', 'ha': "Shin, ma'anar haɗiyar da kwamfyuta ana cikin wa'urar manyan aiki ne?", 'sk': 'Ali so dvoumne veznice problematične pri strojnem prevajanju?', 'jv': 'Apa bener yèn sampeyan pasakno sing dikarepaké karo terjamahan?', 'bo': '嘟樴紜嘟｀絺嗉嬥絺嘟侧紜嘟︵緪嘟戉紜嘟∴讲嘟傕紜嘟｀紜嘟嗋紜嘟樴綁嘟樴紜嘟戉酱嗉嬥絾嗉嬥綐嘟夃綐嗉嬥剑嘟︵紜嘟戉郊嘟撪紜嘟戉絺嘟监溅嗉嬥溅嘟樴紞'}
{'en': 'The translation of ambiguous words still poses challenges for machine translation. In this work, we carry out a systematic quantitative analysis regarding the ability of different machine translation systems to disambiguate the source language conjunctions but and and. We evaluate specialised test sets focused on the translation of these two conjunctions. The test sets contain source languages that do not distinguish different variants of the given conjunction, whereas the target languages do. In total, we evaluate the conjunction but on 20 translation outputs, and the conjunction and on 10. All machine translation systems almost perfectly recognise one variant of the target conjunction, especially for the source conjunction but. The other target variant, however, represents a challenge for machine translation systems, with accuracy varying from 50 % to 95 % for but and from 20 % to 57 % for and. The major error for all systems is replacing the correct target variant with the opposite one.', 'ar': 'لا تزال ترجمة الكلمات الغامضة تشكل تحديات أمام الترجمة الآلية. في هذا العمل ، نجري تحليلًا كميًا منهجيًا فيما يتعلق بقدرة أنظمة الترجمة الآلية المختلفة على توضيح اقترانات اللغة المصدر "لكن" و "و". نقوم بتقييم مجموعات الاختبار المتخصصة التي تركز على ترجمة هذين الاقتران. تحتوي مجموعات الاختبار على لغات مصدر لا تميز المتغيرات المختلفة للاقتران المحدد ، في حين أن اللغات الهدف تفعل ذلك. في المجمل ، نقوم بتقييم أداة الاقتران "لكن" على 20 إخراج ترجمة ، والارتباط "و" في 10. تتعرف جميع أنظمة الترجمة الآلية بشكل مثالي تقريبًا على متغير واحد من أداة الاقتران المستهدفة ، خاصةً بالنسبة إلى أداة اقتران المصدر "ولكن". ومع ذلك ، فإن البديل المستهدف الآخر يمثل تحديًا لأنظمة الترجمة الآلية ، حيث تتراوح الدقة من 50٪ إلى 95٪ لـ "لكن" ومن 20٪ إلى 57٪ لـ "and". الخطأ الرئيسي لجميع الأنظمة هو استبدال متغير الهدف الصحيح بالمتغير المقابل.', 'es': 'La traducción de palabras ambiguas sigue planteando desafíos para la traducción automática. En este trabajo, realizamos un análisis cuantitativo sistemático sobre la capacidad de los diferentes sistemas de traducción automática para desambiguar las conjunciones del idioma fuente «pero» y «y». Evaluamos conjuntos de pruebas especializados centrados en la traducción de estas dos conjunciones. Los conjuntos de pruebas contienen idiomas de origen que no distinguen diferentes variantes de la conjunción dada, mientras que los idiomas de destino sí lo hacen. En total, evaluamos la conjunción «pero» en 20 resultados de traducción y la conjunción «y» en 10. Todos los sistemas de traducción automática reconocen casi perfectamente una variante de la conjunción de destino, especialmente para la conjunción de origen «pero». Sin embargo, la otra variante objetivo representa un desafío para los sistemas de traducción automática, con una precisión que varía del 50 al 95% para «pero» y del 20 al 57% para «y». El principal error de todos los sistemas es reemplazar la variante de destino correcta por la opuesta.', 'fr': "La traduction de mots ambigus pose toujours des défis pour la traduction automatique. Dans ce travail, nous effectuons une analyse quantitative systématique de la capacité des différents systèmes de traduction automatique à lever l'ambiguïté des conjonctions «\xa0mais\xa0» et «\xa0et\xa0» de la langue source. Nous évaluons des ensembles de tests spécialisés axés sur la traduction de ces deux conjonctions. Les ensembles de tests contiennent des langues sources qui ne distinguent pas les différentes variantes de la conjonction donnée, contrairement aux langues cibles. Au total, nous évaluons la conjonction «\xa0mais\xa0» sur 20 sorties de traduction, et la conjonction «\xa0et\xa0» sur 10. Tous les systèmes de traduction automatique reconnaissent presque parfaitement une variante de la conjonction cible, en particulier pour la conjonction source «\xa0mais\xa0». L'autre variante cible représente toutefois un défi pour les systèmes de traduction automatique, avec une précision variant de 50\xa0% à 95\xa0% pour «\xa0mais\xa0» et de 20\xa0% à 57\xa0% pour «\xa0et\xa0». L'erreur majeure pour tous les systèmes est de remplacer la variante cible correcte par la variante opposée.", 'pt': 'A tradução de palavras ambíguas ainda apresenta desafios para a tradução automática. Neste trabalho, realizamos uma análise quantitativa sistemática sobre a capacidade de diferentes sistemas de tradução automática para desambiguar as conjunções da língua de partida “mas” e “e”. Avaliamos conjuntos de testes especializados focados na tradução dessas duas conjunções. Os conjuntos de teste contêm idiomas de origem que não distinguem diferentes variantes da conjunção fornecida, enquanto os idiomas de destino o fazem. No total, avaliamos a conjunção “mas” em 20 saídas de tradução e a conjunção “e” em 10. Todos os sistemas de tradução automática reconhecem quase perfeitamente uma variante da conjunção alvo, especialmente para a conjunção fonte “mas”. A outra variante alvo, no entanto, representa um desafio para os sistemas de tradução automática, com precisão variando de 50% a 95% para “mas” e de 20% a 57% para “e”. O principal erro para todos os sistemas é substituir a variante de destino correta pela oposta.', 'ja': '曖昧な単語の翻訳は、依然として機械翻訳に課題をもたらしている。 本研究では，ソース言語の接続詞「but」と「and」を解消するための異なる機械翻訳システムの能力について体系的な定量分析を行っている． 私たちは、これら2つの結合子の翻訳に焦点を当てた専門的なテストセットを評価します。 テストセットには、指定された接続の異なるバリアントを区別しないソース言語が含まれていますが、ターゲット言語には区別しません。 合計では、20の翻訳出力の連結「but」と10の連結「and」を評価します。 すべての機械翻訳システムは、特にソース接続「but」のために、ターゲット接続の1つのバリアントをほぼ完全に認識します。 しかし、他のターゲットバリアントは、機械翻訳システムにとっての課題であり、精度は「しかし」では50 ％から95 ％、「そして」では20 ％から57 ％である。 すべてのシステムの大きなエラーは、正しいターゲットバリアントを反対のバリアントに置き換えることです。', 'ru': 'Перевод неоднозначных слов по-прежнему создает проблемы для машинного перевода. В этой работе мы проводим систематический количественный анализ относительно способности различных систем машинного перевода разобраться в связях исходного языка «но» и «и». Мы оцениваем специализированные тестовые наборы, ориентированные на перевод этих двух соединений. Тестовые наборы содержат исходные языки, которые не различают различные варианты данного соединения, в то время как целевые языки различают. В общей сложности мы оцениваем сочетание «но» на 20 переводах и сочетание «и» на 10. Все системы машинного перевода почти идеально распознают один вариант целевого соединения, особенно для исходного соединения «but». Другой целевой вариант, однако, представляет собой проблему для систем машинного перевода, с точностью от 50% до 95% для «но» и от 20% до 57% для «и». Основной ошибкой для всех систем является замена правильного целевого варианта на противоположный.', 'zh': '模棱单词译仍与机器翻译挑战。 此等事,机器翻译系统消息连词语言but、and歧义之力定量分析。 我们评估专注这两个连词译的专业测试集。 试集包含不分给定连词异变体之源言,而趋言则具。 凡译 20 输连词but,10 译输连词 and。 凡机器翻译统几尽知连词一变体,尤于源连词"然"。 然一的变体于机器翻译为一挑战,"但"之准确率自50%至95%不等,"和"之准确率自20%至57%有差。 凡统之大过,以反易正变体。', 'hi': 'अस्पष्ट शब्दों का अनुवाद अभी भी मशीन अनुवाद के लिए चुनौतियां पैदा करता है। इस काम में, हम स्रोत भाषा संयोजनों "लेकिन" और "और" को विभाजित करने के लिए विभिन्न मशीन अनुवाद प्रणालियों की क्षमता के बारे में एक व्यवस्थित मात्रात्मक विश्लेषण करते हैं। हम इन दो संयोजनों के अनुवाद पर केंद्रित विशेष परीक्षण सेट का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। परीक्षण सेट में स्रोत भाषाएं होती हैं जो दिए गए संयोजन के विभिन्न रूपों को अलग नहीं करती हैं, जबकि लक्ष्य भाषाएं करती हैं। कुल मिलाकर, हम 20 अनुवाद आउटपुट पर संयोजन "लेकिन" का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, और 10 पर संयोजन "और" का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। सभी मशीन अनुवाद प्रणालियां लगभग पूरी तरह से लक्ष्य संयोजन के एक संस्करण को पहचानती हैं, विशेष रूप से स्रोत संयोजन "लेकिन" के लिए। हालांकि, अन्य लक्ष्य संस्करण मशीन अनुवाद प्रणालियों के लिए एक चुनौती का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है, जिसमें सटीकता "लेकिन" के लिए 50% से 95% तक और "और" के लिए 20% से 57% तक भिन्न होती है। सभी प्रणालियों के लिए प्रमुख त्रुटि विपरीत एक के साथ सही लक्ष्य संस्करण को प्रतिस्थापित कर रही है।', 'ga': 'Cruthaíonn aistriúchán na bhfocal débhríoch fós dúshláin don aistriúchán meaisín. San obair seo, déanaimid anailís chainníochtúil chórasach maidir le cumas na gcóras aistriúcháin meaisín éagsúla chun na comhcheangail teanga foinse a athdhébhriú “ach” agus “agus”. Déanaimid measúnú ar shraitheanna trialacha speisialaithe atá dírithe ar an dá chónascadh seo a aistriú. Tá teangacha foinseacha sna tacair tástála nach ndéanann idirdhealú idir leaganacha éagsúla den chomhcheangal a thugtar, ach is amhlaidh atá sna sprioctheangacha. Ar an iomlán, déanaimid measúnú ar an gcónasc “ach” ar 20 aschur aistriúcháin, agus ar an gcónasc “agus” ar 10. Aithníonn gach córas aistriúcháin meaisín beagnach go foirfe leagan amháin den chomhcheangal sprice, go háirithe don nasc foinse “ach”. Léiríonn an t-athróg sprice eile, áfach, dúshlán do chórais aistriúcháin mheaisín, le cruinneas éagsúil ó 50% go 95% i gcás “ach” agus ó 20% go 57% i gcás “agus”. Is í an mhórearráid do gach córas ná an ceann eile a chur in ionad an bhunathraithigh cheart.', 'hu': 'A kétértelmű szavak fordítása továbbra is kihívásokat jelent a gépi fordítás számára. Ebben a munkában szisztematikus kvantitatív elemzést végzünk arról, hogy a különböző gépi fordítási rendszerek képesek-e egyértelművé tenni a forrásnyelvi kötőhárításokat "de" és "és". E két kötőhártya fordítására összpontosított speciális tesztkészleteket értékelünk. A tesztkészletek olyan forrásnyelveket tartalmaznak, amelyek nem különböztetik meg az adott konjunkció különböző változatait, míg a célnyelvek igen. Összességében értékeljük a "de" konjunkciót 20 fordítási kimeneten, a "és" konjunkciót pedig 10-en. Minden gépi fordító rendszer szinte tökéletesen felismeri a célkötés egyik változatát, különösen a "de" forráskötés esetében. A másik célváltozat azonban kihívást jelent a gépi fordító rendszerek számára, a pontosság 50% és 95% között változik a "de" esetében, és 20% és 57% között "és". A legnagyobb hiba minden rendszer esetében az, hogy a megfelelő célváltozatot az ellenkezőre cseréljük.', 'ka': 'არსებული სიტყვების გადაწყვეტილება მაქინის გადაწყვეტილებისთვის არსებობს. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ სისტემატიკური კონტაქტიური ანალიზაციის შესაძლებლობა განსხვავებული მაქსინური გაგრძელების სისტემის შესაძლებლობა, რომ გამოყენება წიგნის ჩვენ სპეციალური ტესტის კონუქტირებულია, რომელიც ამ ორი კონუქციების გადაწყვეტაზე. ტესტის კონფიგურაციაში მხოლოდ მხოლოდ ენები არ განსხვავებენ განსხვავებული განსხვავებების განსხვავებას, მაგრამ მისაღების ენები. ჩვენ ყველაფერად გავამუშავებთ "მაგრამ" 20 გადაწყვეტილების შემდეგ და 10-ზე გადაწყვეტილების შემდეგ. ყველა მაქინის გარგზავნის სისტემი წარმოდგენა საკუთარი გარგზავნის ერთი გარიანტი, განსაკუთრებით მისაღების გარგზავნისთვის \'მაგრამ\'. მაგრამ მეორე მიზეზი გარიანტი მაქინის გარგულისხმების სისტემისთვის გამოწვება, რომელიც 50% დან 95% დან განსხვავებულია "მაგრამ" და 20% დან 57% დან. ყველა სისტემის მნიშვნელოვანი შეცდომა იყო, რომ მართლა მიზემის გარიანტის შეცვლა.', 'it': 'La traduzione di parole ambigue pone ancora sfide per la traduzione automatica. In questo lavoro, eseguiamo un\'analisi quantitativa sistematica riguardante la capacità dei diversi sistemi di traduzione automatica di disambiguare le congiunzioni della lingua di origine "ma" e "e". Valutiamo set di test specializzati focalizzati sulla traduzione di queste due congiuntioni. I set di test contengono lingue di origine che non distinguono diverse varianti della congiunzione data, mentre le lingue di destinazione lo fanno. In totale, valutiamo la congiunzione \'ma\' su 20 output di traduzione, e la congiunzione \'e\' su 10. Tutti i sistemi di traduzione automatica riconoscono quasi perfettamente una variante della congiunzione target, specialmente per la congiunzione sorgente "ma". L\'altra variante target, tuttavia, rappresenta una sfida per i sistemi di traduzione automatica, con precisione variabile dal 50% al 95% per "ma" e dal 20% al 57% per "e". L\'errore principale per tutti i sistemi è sostituire la variante target corretta con quella opposta.', 'el': 'Η μετάφραση αμφιλεγόμενων λέξεων εξακολουθεί να θέτει προκλήσεις για τη μηχανική μετάφραση. Στην εργασία αυτή, διεξάγουμε μια συστηματική ποσοτική ανάλυση σχετικά με την ικανότητα διαφορετικών συστημάτων μηχανικής μετάφρασης να διασαφηνίσουν τις συνδέσεις της γλώσσας προέλευσης "αλλά" και "και". Αξιολογούμε εξειδικευμένα σετ δοκιμών που επικεντρώνονται στη μετάφραση αυτών των δύο επιπεφυκών. Τα δοκιμαστικά σύνολα περιέχουν γλώσσες προέλευσης που δεν διακρίνουν διαφορετικές παραλλαγές της δεδομένης ένωσης, ενώ οι γλώσσες-στόχοι το κάνουν. Συνολικά, αξιολογούμε τη συνάρτηση "αλλά" στα 20 μεταφραστικά αποτελέσματα, και τη συνάρτηση "και" στο 10. Όλα τα συστήματα μηχανικής μετάφρασης αναγνωρίζουν σχεδόν τέλεια μια παραλλαγή της σύνδεσης στόχου, ειδικά για τη σύνδεση πηγής "αλλά". Ωστόσο, η άλλη παραλλαγή στόχου αποτελεί πρόκληση για τα συστήματα μηχανικής μετάφρασης, με ακρίβεια που κυμαίνεται από 50% έως 95% για το "αλλά" και από 20% έως 57% για το "και". Το μεγαλύτερο σφάλμα για όλα τα συστήματα είναι η αντικατάσταση της σωστής παραλλαγής στόχου με την αντίθετη.', 'mk': "Преводот на двогледни зборови сé уште претставува предизвици за машински превод. Во оваа работа, спроведуваме систематска квантитивна анализа во врска со способноста на различните машински преведувачки системи да ги дејамбигираме конекциите на изворниот јазик „но“ и „и“. Ги проценуваме специјализираните тестови фокусирани на преводот на овие две конекции. Тестовите содржат изворни јазици кои не ги разликуваат различните варијанти на дадената комуникација, додека целните јазици ги разликуваат. Вкупно, ја проценуваме конекцијата „но“ на 20 преводни излези, а конекцијата „и“ на 10. All machine translation systems almost perfectly recognise one variant of the target conjunction, especially for the source conjunction 'but'.  The other target variant, however, represents a challenge for machine translation systems, with accuracy varying from 50% to 95% for 'but' and from 20% to 57% for 'and'.  The major error for all systems is replacing the correct target variant with the opposite one.", 'kk': 'Мұндай сөздерді аудару әлі машина аудару үшін әсер етіледі. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз басқа компьютердің аудару жүйелерінің көзінің тілдерінің "бірақ" және "және" тілдерін бұғаттау мүмкіндігін жүйесінде жүйелік санатты анализ істеп т Біз бұл екі жинақтардың аудармасына көздейтін тест жинақтарын бағалаймыз. Сынақ баптауларында, мақсатты тілдердің айырмашылығын айырмайтын көзі тілдері бар. Жалпы біз 20 аудармалардың шығысында "бірақ" тіркелгісін, 10- ден "және" тіркелгісін бағалаймыз. Барлық компьютердің аудармалы жүйелері мақсатты қосылымдың бір айнымалылығын білмейді, осымен қатар \'бірақ\' көзі қосылу үшін. Бірақ басқа мақсатты вариант компьютерді аудару жүйелерінің мәселесін көрсетеді. Оның дұрыстығы \'бірақ\' дегенге 50% ден 95% дегенге өзгертілген, 20% ден 57% дегенге өзгертілген. Барлық жүйелердің негізгі қатесі қарсы дегенмен дұрыс мақсатты вариантті алмастыру.', 'ml': "വാക്കുകളുടെ പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി വിലാസങ്ങള ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, വ്യത്യസ്ത മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷണ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ കഴിവിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റമിക്കല്\u200d പരിശോധന നടത്തുന്നു. സോര We evaluate specialised test sets focused on the translation of these two conjunctions.  ലക്ഷ്യ ഭാഷകള്\u200d ചെയ്യുമ്പോള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഭാഷകള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നു മൊത്തത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു 'പക്ഷെ' 20 പരിഭാഷപ്രവർത്തിക് എല്ലാ യന്ത്രങ്ങളുടെയും പരിഭാഷ സിസ്റ്റത്തിലും ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ ഒരു മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നു, പ്രത്യ മറ്റുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ വേരിനെറ്റ്, എന്നാലും മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ കൃത്യം 50 എല്ലാ സിസ്റ്റത്തിനുമുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പിശക് തെറ്റായ ലക്ഷ്യം മാറ്റുന്നത് എതിര്\u200dത്തിരിക്കുന", 'ms': "The translation of ambiguous words still poses challenges for machine translation.  Dalam kerja ini, kita melakukan analisis kuantitatif sistematik mengenai kemampuan sistem terjemahan mesin yang berbeza untuk menyalahambiguasi sambungan bahasa sumber 'but' dan 'and'.. Kami menilai set ujian khusus yang fokus pada terjemahan dua kumpulan ini. Set ujian mengandungi bahasa sumber yang tidak membezakan varian yang berbeza bagi kongsi yang diberi, sementara bahasa sasaran. In total, we evaluate the conjunction 'but' on 20 translation outputs, and the conjunction 'and' on 10.  All machine translation systems almost perfectly recognise one variant of the target conjunction, especially for the source conjunction 'but'.  Variasi sasaran lain, bagaimanapun, mewakili cabaran untuk sistem terjemahan mesin, dengan ketepatan yang berbeza dari 50% hingga 95% untuk 'tetapi' dan dari 20% hingga 57% untuk 'dan'. NAME OF TRANSLATORS Ralat utama bagi semua sistem menggantikan varian sasaran yang betul dengan yang bertentangan.", 'mt': "It-traduzzjoni ta’ kliem ambigwu għadha toħloq sfidi għat-traduzzjoni bil-magna. F'dan ix-xogħol, nagħmlu analiżi kwantitattiva sistematika dwar il-kapaċità ta' sistemi differenti ta' traduzzjoni tal-magni li jiddiżambigaw il-konġunzjonijiet tal-lingwa tas-sors 'iżda' u 'u'. u Nivvalutaw settijiet ta’ testijiet speċjalizzati ffukati fuq it-traduzzjoni ta’ dawn iż-żewġ konġunzjonijiet. Is-settijiet tat-test fihom lingwi tas-sors li ma jiddistingwux varjanti differenti tal-konġunzjoni partikolari, filwaqt li l-lingwi fil-mira jagħmlu dan. B'kollox, jivvalutaw il-konġunzjoni 'iżda' fuq 20 riżultat tat-traduzzjoni, u l-konġunzzjoni 'u' fuq 10. All machine translation systems almost perfectly recognise one variant of the target conjunction, especially for the source conjunction 'but'.  The other target variant, however, represents a challenge for machine translation systems, with accuracy varying from 50% to 95% for 'but' and from 20% to 57% for 'and'.  L-iżball ewlieni għas-sistemi kollha qed jissostitwixxi l-varjant fil-mira korrett b’dak oppost.", 'no': 'Omsetjinga av uavhengige ord gjer framleis utfordringar for maskinsomsetjing. I denne arbeida utfører vi eit systematisk kvantitativ analyse om kapasiteten til ulike maskinsomsetjingssystemer for å slå av kjeldespråkskonjunksjonane « men » og « og ». Vi evaluerer spesialiserte testsett fokusert på omsetjinga av desse to samlingane. Testinnstillingane inneheld kjeldespråk som ikkje skildrar ulike variantar av den oppgjevne samlinga, mens målspråket gjer. I alt evaluerer vi samlinga « men » på 20 oversettelsesutdata, og samlinga « og » på 10. Alle maskineoversettelsystemer kjenner nesten perfekt ein variant av målsamninga, spesielt for kjeldesamlinga « men ». Den andre målvarianten representerer imidlertid eit utfordring for maskinsomsetjingssystemet, med nøyaktighet varierer frå 50% til 95% for « men » og frå 20% til 57% for « og ». Den store feilen for alle systema erstattar den rette målvarianten med den motsatte.', 'mn': 'Гэвч хэцүү үгнүүдийн орчуулалт машины орчуулалтын сорилт үүсгэдэг. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид өөр машины орчуулах системийн чадварын тухай систематикийн хэмжээний шинжилгээ хийдэг. Бид эдгээр хоёр хоёр холбоонуудыг орлуулахад төвлөрсөн шинжлэх ухааныг үнэлдэг. Тест хэлбэрээр өгсөн холбооны өөр өөр өөрчлөлтийг тодорхойлж чадахгүй эх үүсвэрийн хэлнүүд байдаг. Нийтэд бид 20 орчуулалтын үр дүнд холбоотой гэхдээ 10-ын холбоотой холбоотой байдаг. Бүх машин орчуулах системүүд бараг нэг төрлийн холбооны өөрчлөлтийг ойлгох болно. Ялангуяа эх үүсвэрийн холбооны нэг өөрчлөлтийг ойлгох болно. Гэхдээ бусад зорилготой хувилбар нь машины хөрөнгө оруулах системийн сорилт юм. 50% ээс 95% гэсэн тодорхой байдал нь "гэхдээ" болон 20% ээс 57% гэсэн тодорхой байдал юм. Бүх системийн гол алдаа нь зөв загварыг эсрэг загвартай орлуулах юм.', 'lt': 'Dviprasmiškų žodžių vertimas vis dar kelia sunkumų mašininiam vertimui. In this work, we carry out a systematic quantitative analysis regarding the ability of different machine translation systems to disambiguate the source language conjunctions \'but\' and \'and\'.  Vertiname specializuotus bandymų rinkinius, skirtus šių dviejų jungčių vertimui. The test sets contain source languages that do not distinguish different variants of the given conjunction, whereas the target languages do.  In total, we evaluate the conjunction \'but\' on 20 translation outputs, and the conjunction \'and\' on 10.  Visose mašinų vertimo sistemose beveik visiškai pripažįstamas vienas tikslinės jungties variantas, ypač šaltinio jungties "but". Tačiau kitas tikslinis variantas yra iššūkis mašinų vertimo sistemoms, kurių tikslumas skiriasi nuo 50 % iki 95 % ir nuo 20 % iki 57 % ir. The major error for all systems is replacing the correct target variant with the opposite one.', 'ro': 'Traducerea cuvintelor ambigue reprezintă încă provocări pentru traducerea automată. În această lucrare, efectuăm o analiză cantitativă sistematică privind capacitatea diferitelor sisteme de traducere automată de a dezambiguiza conjuncțiile limbii sursă "dar" și "și". Evaluăm seturi de teste specializate axate pe traducerea acestor două conjuncții. Seturile de testare conțin limbi sursă care nu disting diferite variante ale conjuncției date, în timp ce limbile țintă o fac. În total, evaluăm conjuncția "dar" pe 20 de rezultate de traducere, iar conjuncția "și" pe 10. Toate sistemele de traducere automată recunosc aproape perfect o variantă a conjuncției țintă, în special pentru conjuncția sursă "dar". Cu toate acestea, cealaltă variantă țintă reprezintă o provocare pentru sistemele de traducere automată, cu precizie variind de la 50% la 95% pentru "dar" și de la 20% la 57% pentru "și". Eroarea majoră pentru toate sistemele este înlocuirea variantei țintă corectă cu cea opusă.', 'pl': 'Tłumaczenie niejednoznacznych słów nadal stanowi wyzwania dla tłumaczenia maszynowego. W niniejszej pracy przeprowadzamy systematyczną analizę ilościową dotyczącą zdolności różnych systemów tłumaczenia maszynowego do rozróżniania spojówek języka źródłowego "ale" i "i". Oceniamy specjalistyczne zestawy testowe skupiające się na tłumaczeniu tych dwóch spojówek. Zestawy testowe zawierają języki źródłowe, które nie odróżniają różnych wariantów danej konjunkcji, podczas gdy języki docelowe to robią. W sumie oceniamy połączenie "ale" na 20-tych wyjściach tłumaczeniowych, a połączenie "i" na 10. Wszystkie systemy tłumaczenia maszynowego niemal doskonale rozpoznają jeden wariant połączenia docelowego, zwłaszcza dla połączenia źródłowego "ale". Drugi wariant docelowy stanowi jednak wyzwanie dla systemów tłumaczenia maszynowego, z dokładnością różniącą się od 50% do 95% dla "ale" i od 20% do 57% dla "i". Głównym błędem dla wszystkich systemów jest zastąpienie właściwego wariantu docelowego przeciwnym.', 'so': "Turjumidda hadalka caqliga ahna weli waxay leedahay dhibaatooyin lagu turjumo machine. In this work, we carry out a systematic quantitative analysis regarding the ability of different machine translation systems to disambiguate the source language conjunctions 'but' and 'and'.  Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa koobab imtixaanka gaarka ah oo ku kalsoonaan turjumidda labadan isku xiriir. Imtixaanka waxaa ku yaala luuqadaha asalka ah oo aan kala duwanaan kala duwan islamarkaasna ay leeyihiin luqadaha la hagayo. Dhammaan, waxaynu qiimeynaynaa shuruudaha la xiriira, laakiin ‘’waxaynu ku qiimeynaynaa 20 ka soo baxa turjumaadda, isla xiriirka 'iyo' 10 sano. Isticmaalka machine-ka oo dhammu waxay u dhowaan aqoonsadaan si gaar ah hal kala duwan oo la isku xiriirayo, khusuusan marka lagu soo ururiyo asalka, laakiin '. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, bedelka kalena waxaa ka mid ah dhibaato ay u leedahay nidaamka turjumidda maskaxda, si saxda ah waxay u kala duwan tahay 50% ilaa 95% ee 'laakiin' iyo 20% ilaa 57% in 'iyo'. Xaladda ugu weyn ee nidaamka oo dhan wuxuu beddelaa bedelka saxda oo ku bedela isbedelka ka duwan.", 'sr': 'Prevod neobičnih reči i dalje predstavlja izazove za prevod mašine. U ovom poslu provodimo sistematsku kvantitativnu analizu u vezi sposobnosti različitih sustava prevoda mašine da bi razdvojili konjunkcije izvornog jezika "ali" i "i". Procjenjujemo specijalizovane testove usredotočene na prevod ovih dvije kombinacije. Testovi seti sadrže izvorne jezike koje ne razlikuju različite variante određene kombinacije, dok ciljni jezici rade. Ukupno procjenjujemo povezanost \'ali\' na 20 rezultata prevoda, i povezanost \'i\' na 10. Svi sistemi prevoda mašine skoro savršeno prepoznaju jednu variantu ciljne kombinacije, posebno za izvornu kombinaciju \'ali\'. Druga ciljna variant a predstavlja izazov za sisteme prevoda mašine, sa tačnošću koja se razlikuje od 50% do 95% za \'ali\' i od 20% do 57% za \'i\'. Velika greška za sve sisteme je zamjena pravu ciljnu varijantu suprotnom.', 'ur': 'جاہلیت کلمات کی ترجمہ ابھی بھی ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے چالیں پیدا کرتی ہیں۔ ہم اس کام میں ایک سیستماتیک منطقی تحلیل کریں گے جو مختلف ماشین ترجمہ سیستم کی قابلیت کے بارے میں سورس زبان کی جماعتیں \'لیکن\' اور \'اور\'. ہم نے ان دونوں جماعتوں کی ترجمہ پر مخصوص تست سٹ کا ارزش کیا ہے آزمائش سٹ میں سراسر زبانیں لکھتی ہیں جن کو دی گئی جمع کی مختلف متفاوتوں کا اختلاف نہیں کرتا، حالانکہ موجود زبانیں کرتے ہیں. ہم جمع کریں گے کہ "لیکن" 20 ترجمہ اجلام پر، اور 10 پر جمع کریں گے. تمام ماشین ترجمہ سیسٹم تقریباً موجود ملکیت کی ایک متفاوت کو پہچان لیتے ہیں، مخصوصاً سورج ملکیت کے لئے \'لیکن\'. لیکن دوسری موجود الفاظت، ماشین ترجمہ سیسٹم کے لئے ایک چالیٹ کی تعریف کرتی ہے، اس سے بالکل 50% سے 95% کے لئے مختلف ہوتی ہے، لیکن 20% سے 57% کے لئے۔ تمام سیسٹم کے لئے بہترین خطا ہے کہ ٹھیک موجود موجود الفاظت کو مخالف سے بدل دیتا ہے.', 'ta': "The translation of ambiguous words still poses challenges for machine translation.  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் வேறு இயந்திரத்தின் மொழி மொழியின் இணைப்புகளை பிரித்துக்கொள்ள முடியும் என்று மற்றும் 'மற்றும்' மற்றும் ' இந்த இரண்டு இணைப்புகளின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பை முகவரிப்போம். சோதனை அமைப்புகளில் மூல மொழிகள் இருக்கின்றன, அது கொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ள மாறுபாடுகளை வேறுபடுத்தாது, இலக்கு மொழிகள்  மொத்தமாக, நாம் தொடர்பு 'ஆனால்' 20 மொழிபெயர்ப்பு வெளியீட்டில், மற்றும் தொடர்பு 'மற்றும் '10. எல்லா இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு அமைப்புகளும் இலக்கு இணைப்பின் ஒரு மாறியை முழுமையாக புரிந்து கொள்ள முடியும், குற ஆனால் மற்ற இலக்கு மாறி இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு முறைமைகளுக்கு ஒரு சவால்லானத்தை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, அது சரியாக '50% லிருந்து 95% மாறுபடுகிறத அனைத்து கணினிகளுக்கும் முக்கிய பிழை சரியான இலக்கு மாறியை மாற்றுகிறது எதிர் ஒன்றுடன்.", 'sv': '횜vers채ttningen av tvetydiga ord inneb채r fortfarande utmaningar f철r maskin철vers채ttning. I detta arbete genomf철r vi en systematisk kvantitativ analys av f철rm책gan hos olika maskin철vers채ttningssystem att g철ra k채llspr책kskonsinktionerna "men" och "och". Vi utv채rderar specialiserade testset med fokus p책 철vers채ttning av dessa tv책 bindningar. Testupps채ttningarna inneh책ller k채llspr책k som inte skiljer olika varianter av den givna kopplingen, medan m책lspr책ken g철r det. Sammanlagt utv채rderar vi kopplingen "men" p책 20 철vers채ttningsutg책ngar, och kopplingen "och" p책 10. Alla maskin철vers채ttningssystem k채nner n채stan perfekt igen en variant av m책lkopplingen, s채rskilt f철r k채llkopplingen "men". Den andra m책lvarianten utg철r emellertid en utmaning f철r maskin철vers채ttningssystem, med en noggrannhet som varierar fr책n 50% till 95% f철r "men" och fr책n 20% till 57% f철r "och". Det st철rsta felet f철r alla system 채r att ers채tta r채tt m책lvariant med motsatt.', 'si': "මෙචින් වාර්තාව සඳහා අවශ්\u200dය වචන අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා. මේ වැඩේ අපි පද්ධතිය විශ්ලේෂණයක් කරන්නේ වෙනස් පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියේ වෙනස් පද්ධතියේ භාෂාව සම්බන්ධ කරගන්න පුළුව අපි විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණා සැකසුම් විශේෂ කරනවා මේ සම්බන්ධ දෙකක් ගැන භාවිතානය කරනවා. පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධයෙන් මුළු භාෂාවල් තියෙනවා ඒ වගේම දෙන්න තියෙන්නේ සම්බන්ධයේ වෙනස් වෙනස් භාෂ සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, අපි සම්පූර්ණය 'නමුත්' විශ්වාස කරන්නේ අනුවාද 20 ප්\u200dරතිචාරය, සම්පූර්ණය 'සම්පූර්ණය ඔක්කොම පණිවිධ පද්ධතිය සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම ලක්ෂණ සම්බන්ධයේ එක විකල්පයක් අඳුන්න, විශේෂයෙන්ම මූ නමුත්, අනිත් ලක්ෂණ විකල්පය, පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය සඳහා අභ්\u200dයානයක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරනවා, 50% වෙනුවෙන් 95% වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් 'නම සියළු පද්ධතියට ප්\u200dරධාන දෝෂය තමයි විරුද්ධ පද්ධතියට හරි ලක්ෂණ වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනු", 'uz': "The translation of ambiguous words still poses challenges for machine translation.  Bu ishda, biz boshqa mashina tarjima tizimlarini 'lekin' va 'va' kabi manba tilning bog'liqlarini ajratish qobiliyati haqida tizim tizimni bajaramiz. Biz bu ikkita aloqalarni tarjima qilish uchun foydalanuvchimiz. Name Umumiy, biz birlashtirishni qiymatimiz, lekin 20 tarjima natijalarida, va birlashtirish 'va' 10 yilda. Hamma mashinalar tarjima tizimi qachon bir nechta bir nechta bogʻlanishni aniqlaydi, hususan manba bogʻlanish uchun 'lekin'. Koʻpchilik maydoni, balki mashina tarjima tizimlarining qismini taʼminlovchi bo'ladi. 'lekin '50% dan 95% dan' va 'va' uchun' 20% dan 57% dan' va ' @ info", 'vi': 'Dịch ra những từ mơ hồ vẫn là thách thức cho việc dịch chuyển máy. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi tiến hành một cuộc phân tích tích tích về khả năng của các hệ thống dịch chuyển máy khác nhau biến đổi ngôn ngữ phát sinh của "nhưng" và "và". Chúng tôi đánh giá các bộ thử đặc biệt tập trung vào việc dịch hai kết quả này. Các bộ thử nghiệm chứa ngôn ngữ nguồn mà không phân biệt biến thể khác nhau của kết cấu này, trong khi ngôn ngữ đích thì có. Tổng thể, chúng tôi đánh giá kết quả "nhưng" trên các kết quả dịch đôi, và kết hợp "và" trên 10. Tất cả các hệ thống dịch chuyển máy gần như hoàn hảo nhận ra một biến thể của sự kết hợp đích, đặc biệt là với mật mã\'nhưng\'. Tuy nhiên, đối với đối tượng khác, nó là một thử thách cho hệ thống dịch chuyển máy, với độ chính xác khác nhau từ 500kg tới 97=* cho\'và\'. Lỗi chính cho tất cả các hệ thống là thay thế phiên bản đích đúng bằng phiên bản đối diện.', 'bg': 'Преводът на неясни думи все още поставя предизвикателства пред машинния превод. В тази работа се извършва систематичен количествен анализ на способността на различните системи за машинен превод да разграничават изходните езикови конюнкции "но" и "и". Оценяваме специализирани тестови комплекти, фокусирани върху превода на тези две конюнктии. Тестовите комплекти съдържат изходни езици, които не разграничават различните варианти на дадената конюнкция, докато целевите езици го правят. Общо оценяваме конюнкцията "но" на 20 изхода от превода и конюнкцията "и" на 10. Всички системи за машинен превод почти перфектно разпознават един вариант на целевата конюнкция, особено за изходната конюнкция "но". Другият целеви вариант обаче представлява предизвикателство за системите за машинен превод, като точността варира от 50% до 95% за "но" и от 20% до 57% за "и". Основната грешка за всички системи е замяната на правилния целеви вариант с противоположния.', 'da': 'Oversættelsen af tvetydige ord udgør stadig udfordringer for maskinoversættelse. I dette arbejde foretager vi en systematisk kvantitativ analyse af muligheden for forskellige maskinoversættelsessystemer til at adskille kildesprogets konjunktioner "men" og "og". Vi evaluerer specialiserede testsæt med fokus på oversættelse af disse to bindinger. Testsættene indeholder kildesprog, der ikke adskiller forskellige varianter af den givne konjunktion, mens målsprogene gør det. I alt vurderer vi konjunktionen \'men\' på 20 oversættelsesudgange, og konjunktionen \'og\' på 10. Alle maskinoversættelsessystemer genkender næsten perfekt én variant af målkonjunktionen, især for kildekonjunktionen "men". Den anden målvariant udgør imidlertid en udfordring for maskinoversættelsessystemer, idet nøjagtigheden varierer fra 50% til 95% for"men"og fra 20% til 57% for"og". Den største fejl for alle systemer er at erstatte den korrekte målvariant med den modsatte.', 'id': "Terjemahan kata-kata yang ambigus masih menantang untuk terjemahan mesin. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami melakukan analisis kuantitatif sistematis mengenai kemampuan dari sistem terjemahan mesin yang berbeda untuk menyalahkan sambungan bahasa sumber 'tapi' dan 'dan'.. Kami mengevaluasi set tes khusus fokus pada terjemahan dua kongsi ini. Set tes mengandung bahasa sumber yang tidak membedakan varian yang berbeda dari konjunksi yang diberikan, sementara bahasa sasaran itu. Secara keseluruhan, kita mengevaluasi kongsi 'tapi' pada 20 hasil terjemahan, dan kongsi 'dan' pada 10. Semua sistem terjemahan mesin hampir sempurna mengenali satu varian dari konjunksi sasaran, terutama untuk konjunksi sumber 'tapi'.. Variasi target lainnya, bagaimanapun, mewakili tantangan untuk sistem terjemahan mesin, dengan akurasi berbeda dari 50% hingga 95% untuk 'tapi' dan dari 20% hingga 57% untuk 'dan'.. Galat utama bagi semua sistem adalah menggantikan varian target yang benar dengan varian yang bertentangan.", 'hr': 'Prevod neobičnih riječi još uvijek predstavlja izazove za prevod strojeva. U ovom poslu provodimo sistematsku kvantitativnu analizu u vezi sposobnosti različitih sustava prevoda strojeva za disambiguaciju konjunkcija izvornog jezika "ali" i "i". Procjenjujemo specijalizirane testove usredotočene na prevod tih dva kombinacija. Test seti sadrže izvorne jezike koje ne razlikuju različite variante određene spojene, dok ciljni jezici rade. Ukupno procjenjujemo spoj \'ali\' na 20 rezultata prevoda, i spoj \'i\' na 10. Svi sustavi prevoda stroja skoro savršeno prepoznaju jednu variantu ciljne spojene, posebno za izvornu spojenu \'ali\'. Druga ciljna variant a, međutim, predstavlja izazov za sustave prevoda stroja, s preciznošću koja se razlikuje od 50% do 95% za \'ali\' i od 20% do 57% za \'i\'. Velika greška za sve sustave zamjenjuje pravu ciljnu varijantu suprotnom.', 'de': 'Die Übersetzung von mehrdeutigen Wörtern stellt die maschinelle Übersetzung immer noch vor Herausforderungen. In dieser Arbeit führen wir eine systematische quantitative Analyse der Fähigkeit verschiedener maschineller Übersetzungssysteme durch, die Ausgangssprachenkombinationen "aber" und "und" zu unterscheiden. Wir evaluieren spezialisierte Testsets, die sich auf die Übersetzung dieser beiden Konjunktionen konzentrieren. Die Testsätze enthalten Quellsprachen, die unterschiedliche Varianten der gegebenen Konjunktion nicht unterscheiden, während die Zielsprachen es tun. Insgesamt bewerten wir die Konjunktion "aber" auf 20-Übersetzungsausgaben und die Konjunktion "und" auf 10. Alle maschinellen Übersetzungssysteme erkennen fast perfekt eine Variante der Zielkonjunktion, insbesondere für die Quellkonjunktion "aber". Die andere Zielvariante stellt jedoch eine Herausforderung für maschinelle Übersetzungssysteme dar, deren Genauigkeit von 50% bis 95% für "aber" und von 20% bis 57% für "und" variiert. Der größte Fehler bei allen Systemen besteht darin, die richtige Zielvariante durch die gegenüberliegende zu ersetzen.', 'fa': 'ترجمه کلمات مختلف هنوز برای ترجمه ماشین چالش می\u200cکند. در این کار، ما یک تحلیل منبع سیستماتیک در مورد توانایی سیستم\u200cهای ترجمه ماشین مختلف را انجام می\u200cدهیم تا ترجمه\u200cهای زبان منبع «اما» و «و». ما تست مخصوص را ارزیابی می کنیم که روی ترجمه این دو ترجمه تمرکز شده است. تنظیم آزمایش شامل زبانهای منبع است که متفاوتهای متفاوتی از اتصال داده نمی\u200cشوند، در حالی که زبانهای هدف انجام می\u200cدهند. در کل، ما ترکیب "اما" را در بیست نتیجه ترجمه ارزیابی می کنیم، و ترکیب "و" در ۱۰. تمام سیستم\u200cهای ترجمه ماشین تقریباً کاملاً یک متغیر از اتصال هدف را می\u200cشناسند، مخصوصا برای اتصال منبع «اما». ولی دیگر تغییر هدف، یک چالش برای سیستم\u200cهای ترجمه ماشین را نشان می\u200cدهد، با دقیق از ۵۰٪ تا ۹۵٪ برای «اما» و از ۲۰٪ تا ۷۷٪ برای «و». خطای بزرگی برای همه سیستم\u200cها جایگزینی متغیر هدف درست با متغیر است.', 'nl': "Het vertalen van dubbelzinnige woorden vormt nog steeds uitdagingen voor machinevertaling. In dit werk voeren we een systematische kwantitatieve analyse uit naar het vermogen van verschillende machinevertaalsystemen om de brontaalconjuncties 'maar' en 'en' te verduidelijken. We evalueren gespecialiseerde testsets gericht op de vertaling van deze twee conjuncties. De testsets bevatten brontalen die geen onderscheid maken tussen verschillende varianten van de gegeven conjunctie, terwijl de doeltalen dat wel doen. In totaal evalueren we de conjunctie 'maar' op 20-vertaaloutputs en de conjunctie 'en' op 10. Alle machinevertaalsystemen herkennen vrijwel perfect één variant van de doelconjunctie, vooral voor de bronconjunctie 'maar'. De andere doelvariant vormt echter een uitdaging voor machinevertaalsystemen, waarbij de nauwkeurigheid varieert van 50% tot 95% voor 'maar' en van 20% tot 57% voor 'en'. De grootste fout voor alle systemen is het vervangen van de juiste doelvariant door de tegenovergestelde.", 'tr': "Wagtlaýyn sözlerin terjime edilmesi entägem maşynyň terjime edilmesi üçin kynçylyklary bar. Bu işde, başga maşynyň terjime sistemalarynyň 'emma' we 'we', çeşme dili bilen birleşmelerini çykarmak üçin sistematik miktarda çözümleşdirip bardyk. Biz bu iki sanlaryň terjimesine üns berilýän çykyşlygyny çykýarys. Testiň düzümleri berilen toplantyň beýleki wariantlaryny tapawutlamaýan çeşme dilleri bar. Toplumatda birleşme hasaplanýarys ýöne 20 terjime netijesinde we 10-de birleşme hasaplanýarys. Hemme maşynyň terjime sistemleri galan bilen bir wariantyny tanaýarlar, ýöne çeşme bilen 'emma'. Ýöne başga maksady wariantçysy maşynyň terjime sistemleri üçin kynçylyk görkezýär. Bu meselede 50% we 95% tarapyndan däl bolup 'ýöne' we 20% we 57% tarapyndan 'we'. Hemme sistemler üçin esasy hata dogry maksad wariantyny tersine almakda.", 'af': "Die vertaling van ongelukkige woorde stel nog uitdagings vir masjien vertaling. In hierdie werk, ons uitvoer 'n sistematiese kvantitatiewe analiseer aangaande die moontlikheid van verskillende masjien vertalingsstelsels om die bron taal verbindings 'maar' en 'en'. Ons evalueer spesialiseerde toets stelle fokus op die vertaling van hierdie twee verbindings. Die toets stel bevat bron tale wat nie verskillende variante van die gegewe saamgevoer nie, terwyl die doel tale doen nie. In totaal, ons evalueer die verbinding 'maar' op 20 vertaling uitvoerdes, en die verbinding 'en' op 10. Alle masjien vertalingsstelsels byna perfekte herken een variant van die doel verbinding, veral vir die bron verbinding 'maar'. Die ander doel variant verteenwoordig egter 'n uitdrukking vir masjien vertaling stelsels, met waarheid verander van 50% tot 95% vir 'maar' en van 20% tot 57% vir 'en'. Die grootste fout vir alle stelsels vervang die korrekte doel variant met die teenwoordige een.", 'sq': 'Përkthimi i fjalëve të dyshimta përbën ende sfida për përkthimin e makinave. In this work, we carry out a systematic quantitative analysis regarding the ability of different machine translation systems to disambiguate the source language conjunctions \'but\' and \'and\'.  Ne vlerësojmë grupet e testeve të specializuara të përqëndruara në përkthimin e këtyre dy lidhjeve. Testet përmbajnë gjuhë burimi që nuk dallojnë variante të ndryshme të bashkimit të dhënë, ndërsa gjuhët objektive e bëjnë. Në përgjithësi, ne vlerësojmë lidhjen \'por\' në 20 rezultate përkthimi, dhe lidhjen \'dhe\' në 10. All machine translation systems almost perfectly recognise one variant of the target conjunction, especially for the source conjunction \'but\'.  Varianti tjetër objektiv, megjithatë, përfaqëson një sfidë për sistemet e përkthimit të makinave, me saktësi që ndryshon nga 50% në 95% për "por" dhe nga 20% në 57% për "dhe". Gabimi kryesor për të gjithë sistemet është zëvendësimi i variantit të saktë të objektivit me variantin e kundërt.', 'am': 'የንግግር ትርጉም ገና የመሳሳይ ትርጓሜዎችን ለማድረግ ጥቃት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የቋንቋውን ቋንቋ ግንኙነት ግን ‹እና› እና› በማስተካከል ልዩ የሞክራዊ ትርጉም ሲስተካከል የስርዓት ምርጫዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ የፍጥረት ፈተናዎች እነዚህን ሁለቱን ግንኙነት ትርጉም ላይ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ The test sets contain source languages that do not distinguish different variants of the given conjunction, whereas the target languages do.  በሙሉ ‹ነገር ግን› በ20 ትርጉም ውጤቶች እና ግንኙነት ‹እና›› በማስተካከል ነው፡፡ የሜክስል ትርጉም ስርዓቶች ሁሉ የአካባቢውን ግንኙነት በተለየ አንዱን መለያየት በሙሉ ግንኙነት ግን በሙሉ የሚያውቅ ይቻላል፡፡ ሁለተኛውም ተቃውሞ ቢሆንም፣ የሞክራዊ ትርጉም ስርዓት መግለጫ ያቆያል፡፡ የዋነኛው ስህተት ለሁሉም ስርዓቶች የእርሱን መክፈት የሚለውጥ ክፍተት በተቃወመ አንዱን ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Անշուշտ բառերի թարգմանումը դեռևս մարտահրավեր է առաջացնում մեքենայի թարգմանման համար: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք կատարում ենք սիստեմատիկ քանակական վերլուծություն տարբեր մեքենայի թարգմանման համակարգերի կարողության վերաբերյալ բացատրել աղբյուր լեզվի կապերը "բայց" և "և": Մենք գնահատում ենք այս երկու հատվածների թարգմանման վրա կենտրոնացված մասնագիտական փորձարկումներ: Տեստի համակարգերը պարունակում են աղբյուր լեզուներ, որոնք չեն տարբերակում տվյալ հատվածի տարբեր տարբերակները, մինչդեռ նպատակային լեզուները այդպես են: Ընդհանուր առմամբ, մենք գնահատում ենք հատվածը "բայց" 20 թարգմանման արդյունքների վրա, իսկ հատվածը "և" 10-ի վրա: Բոլոր մեքենային թարգմանման համակարգերը գրեթե կատարյալ կերպ ճանաչում են նպատակային հաղորդակցման մեկ տարբերակը, հատկապես աղբյուրի հաղորդակցման համար "բայց": Այնուամենայնիվ, մյուս նպատակային տարբերակը մարտահրավեր է ներկայացնում մեքենայի թարգմանման համակարգերի համար, որոնց ճշգրտությունը տարբերվում է 50-ից 95-ից "բայց" և 20-ից 57-ից "և": Բոլոր համակարգերի մեծ սխալն այն է, որ ճիշտ նպատակային տարբերակը փոխարինվում է հակառակ տարբերակով:', 'ko': "잘못된 단어의 번역은 여전히 기계 번역이 직면한 도전이다.이 작업에서 우리는 서로 다른 기계 번역 시스템이 원시 언어의 연어but와 and의 다른 뜻을 제거하는 능력에 대해 체계적인 정량 분석을 실시했다.우리는 이 두 단어를 번역하는 데 전념한 전문 테스트 집합을 평가한다.테스트 집합에 포함된 원본 언어는 주어진 연어의 다른 변체를 구분하지 않고 목표 언어는 구분한다.전체적으로 말하면 우리는 20개의 번역 출력 중의 연어'그런데', 그리고 10개의 번역 출력 중의 연어'와'를 평가했다.모든 기계 번역 시스템은 목표 연결어의 변체를 거의 완벽하게 식별할 수 있는데, 특히 원본 연결어인 but를 완벽하게 식별할 수 있다.그러나 또 다른 목표 변체는 기계 번역 시스템에 도전이다.'하지만'의 정확도는 50%에서 95%까지 같지 않고'화'의 정확도는 20%에서 57%까지 다르다.모든 주요 변수를 하나의 주요 변수로 바꾸는 것이 정확하다.", 'bn': "মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য চ্যালেঞ্জের প্রতি অনুবাদ করা হয়েছে। এই কাজে আমরা বিভিন্ন মেশিন অনুবাদ সিস্টেমের ক্ষমতা সম্পর্কে সিস্টেমিক পরিমাণ বিশ্লেষণ করি কিন্তু সোর্স ভাষার সংযোগ 'কিন্তু' এবং ' আমরা বিশেষ পরীক্ষার বিষয়টি মূল্যায়ন করি এই দুই সম্পর্কের অনুবাদের দিকে মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি। এই পরীক্ষার মধ্যে উৎস ভাষা আছে যা প্রদান করা হয়েছে সংযোগের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন সম্পূর্ণভাবে আমরা এই সংযোগের মূল্যায়ন করি 'কিন্তু' ২০ টি অনুবাদের আউটপুট এবং ১০ তারিখে। সকল মেশিন অনুবাদ সিস্টেম সম্পূর্ণ লক্ষ্যবস্তুর একটি পরিবর্তন চিনতে পারে, বিশেষ করে উৎসের সংযোগ 'কিন্তু'. তবে অন্যান্য টার্গেট ভেরেন্ট মেশিন অনুবাদ সিস্টেমের জন্য একটি চ্যালেঞ্জের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে, যার মধ্যে সঠিকভাবে ৫০% থেকে ৯৫% থেকে ব The major error for all systems is replacing the correct target variant with the opposite one.", 'sw': "Tafsiri ya maneno yenye uchunguzi bado inachangamoto za kutafsiri mashine. Katika kazi hii, tunafanya uchambuzi wa mfumo wa kiasi kikubwa kuhusu uwezo wa mfumo wa kutafsiri mashine tofauti wa kutofautisha mahusiano ya lugha 'lakini' na 'na'. Tunatathmini seti za majaribio maalum zinalenga makini tafsiri ya makubaliano haya mawili. Mpango wa jaribio lina lugha za vyanzo ambazo haziganganisha tofauti tofauti za muungano huo, wakati lugha zinazolenga. Kwa ujumla, tunatathmini ushirikiano huo 'lakini' katika matokeo ya tafsiri 20, na ushirikiano 'na' katika miaka 10. Mifumo yote ya kutafsiri mashine inakaribia kutambua tofauti moja ya ushirikiano wa malengo, hususani kwa muungano wa chanzo 'lakini'. Tofauti nyingine kwa lengo hilo, hata hivyo, inawakilisha changamoto kwa mfumo wa kutafsiri mashine, yenye uhakika tofauti kutoka asilimia 50 hadi 95 kwa 'lakini' na kutoka asilimia 20 hadi 57 kwa 'na'. Kosa kubwa kwa mifumo yote inabadilisha mabadiliko sahihi ya lengo hilo na kinyume chake.", 'bs': 'Prevod neobičnih riječi još uvijek predstavlja izazove za prevod mašine. U ovom poslu provodimo sistematsku kvantitativnu analizu u vezi sposobnosti različitih sustava prevoda strojeva za disambiguaciju konjunkcija izvornog jezika "ali" i "i". Procjenjujemo specijalizovane testove usredotočene na prevod tih dva kombinacija. Test seti sadrže izvorne jezike koje ne razlikuju različite variante određene spojene, dok ciljni jezici rade. Ukupno procjenjujemo spoj \'ali\' na 20 rezultata prevoda, i spoj \'i\' na 10. Svi sistemi prevoda mašine skoro savršeno prepoznaju jednu variantu ciljne kombinacije, posebno za izvornu kombinaciju \'ali\'. Međutim, druga ciljna variant a predstavlja izazov za sisteme prevoda mašine, sa tačnošću koja se razlikuje od 50% do 95% za \'ali\' i od 20% do 57% za \'i\'. Velika greška za sve sisteme zamjenjuje pravu ciljnu varijantu suprotnom.', 'et': 'Ebaselgete sõnade tõlkimine tekitab masintõlkele endiselt probleeme. Käesolevas töös teostame süstemaatilise kvantitatiivse analüüsi erinevate masintõlkesüsteemide võime eristada lähtekeele sidemeid "aga" ja "ja". Hindame spetsiaalseid testikomplekte, mis keskenduvad nende kahe konjunktsiooni tõlkimisele. Testikomplektid sisaldavad lähtekeeli, mis ei erista antud konjunktsiooni erinevaid variante, samas kui sihtkeeled eristavad. Kokku hindame koosmõju "aga" 20 tõlke väljundit ja koosmõju "ja" 10. Kõik masintõlke süsteemid tunnevad peaaegu ideaalselt ära sihtkonjunktsiooni ühe variandi, eriti lähtekonjunktsiooni "aga" puhul. Teine sihtvariant kujutab siiski endast väljakutset masintõlke süsteemide jaoks, mille täpsus varieerub 50–95% sõnade "aga" puhul ja 20–57% sõnade "ja" puhul. Kõigi süsteemide peamine viga on õige sihtvariandi asendamine vastandvariandiga.', 'ca': 'La traducció de paraules ambigues encara pose reptes per a la traducció automàtica. In this work, we carry out a systematic quantitative analysis regarding the ability of different machine translation systems to disambiguate the source language conjunctions \'but\' and \'and\'.  Evaluam conjunts de proves especialitzats centrats en la traducció d\'aquestes dues conjuncions. Els conjunts d\'exàmens contenen llengües fonts que no distingeixen diferents variants de la conjunció dada, mentre que les llengües alvo sí. In total, we evaluate the conjunction \'but\' on 20 translation outputs, and the conjunction \'and\' on 10.  Tots els sistemes de traducció màquina reconeixen gairebé perfectament una variant de la conjuncció d\'objectiu, especialment per la conjuncció de fonts "però". L\'altra variant d\'objectiu, no obstant això, representa un repte per als sistemes de traducció màquina, amb precisió que varia del 50% al 95% per "però" i del 20% al 57% per "i". L\'error major de tots els sistemes és substituir la variant d\'objectiu correcta per l\'altra.', 'az': 'Müəyyən sözlərin tərcüməsi hələ də maşın tərcüməsi üçün çətinliklərə bənzəyir. Bu işdə, müxtəlif maşın tercümə sistemlərinin qabiliyyəti haqqında sistematik kvantitatlı analizi çəkirik ki, mənbə dili birliklərini \'ancaq\' və \'və\'. Biz xüsusiyyətli sınama qurğularını bu iki birliklərin çevirilməsinə odaqlayırıq. Sınama qurğuları verilən birlikdə müxtəlif dəyişiklikləri seçməyən mənbə dilləri barəsindədir. Halbuki məqsəd dilləri seçirlər. Toplam, birlikdə \'ancaq\' 20 tercümə çıxışlarında, birlikdə \'və\' 10-də değerləşdiririk. Bütün maşın tərcümə sistemləri, həqiqətən də mənbə birliklərinin bir dəyişikliyini tanıyır. Lakin digər məqsəd dəyişdirilməsi maşına çevirim sistemlərinin çətinliklərini göstərir, bu dəyişdirilməsi 50% ilə 95% ilə "ancaq" və 20% ilə 57% ilə "və". Bütün sistemlərin ən böyük xətası düzgün məqsəd variant ını tərəfindən əvəz edir.', 'cs': 'Překlad nejednoznačných slov stále představuje výzvu pro strojový překlad. V této práci provádíme systematickou kvantitativní analýzu schopnosti různých systémů strojového překladu rozlišovat konjunkce zdrojového jazyka "ale" a "a". Hodnotíme specializované testovací sady zaměřené na překlad těchto dvou spojivek. Testovací sady obsahují zdrojové jazyky, které nerozlišují různé varianty dané konjunkce, zatímco cílové jazyky ano. Celkově hodnotíme konjunkci "ale" na dvaceti překladových výstupech a konjunkci "a" na 10. Všechny systémy strojového překladu téměř dokonale rozpoznají jednu variantu cílové konjunkce, zejména u zdrojové konjunkce "ale". Druhá cílová varianta však představuje pro systémy strojového překladu výzvu, přičemž přesnost se liší od 50% do 95% pro "ale" a od 20% do 57% pro "a". Hlavní chybou pro všechny systémy je nahrazení správné cílové varianty opačnou.', 'fi': 'Moniselitteisten sanojen kääntäminen asettaa edelleen haasteita konekäännökselle. Tässä työssä tehdään systemaattinen kvantitatiivinen analyysi eri konekäännösjärjestelmien kyvystä erottaa lähdekielen liitokset \'mutta\' ja \'ja\'. Arvioimme erikoistuneita testisarjoja, jotka keskittyvät näiden kahden sidekalvon kääntämiseen. Testit sisältävät lähdekieliä, jotka eivät erota tietyn konjunktion eri variantteja, kun taas kohdekielet erottavat. Yhteensä arvioimme konjunktion "mutta" 20 käännöksen tuotoksen ja konjunktion "ja" 10. Kaikki konekäännösjärjestelmät tunnistavat lähes täydellisesti yhden kohdekonjunktion variantin, erityisesti lähdekonjunktion "mutta" osalta. Toinen kohdevaihtoehto on kuitenkin haaste konekäännösjärjestelmille, sillä tarkkuus vaihtelee 50–95 prosentista "mutta" ja 20–57 prosenttiin "ja". Suurin virhe kaikissa järjestelmissä on oikean kohdevariantin korvaaminen vastakkaisella.', 'jv': "translation Nang karo iki, kita dadi sistem sistem sing dadi kapan tanggal nggawe sistem itoleh-sistem karo nggawe sapa tanggal nggawe aturan kelas 'nguasai' lan 'karo'. Awak dhéwé nggunaké perusahaan neng ujian sing wis nggawe nang tarjamahan iki Test Tulung, kita deweke nggambar kelas 'pero' lan 10 Lah sistem terjamahan karo sistem sing mesthi kabeh wek, akeh variant sing tek gawe Junksi dadi, sithik kanggo kelas konJunksi yang dipun section Eror sing dipun kanggo saben sistem sing bisa alih akeh variant sing ditambah saben karo nganggo cora.", 'he': 'The translation of ambiguous words still poses challenges for machine translation.  בעבודה הזאת, אנו מבצעים ניתוח קונטיבי שיטתי בנוגע ליכולת של מערכות התרגום מכונות שונות לנתק את הקשרים של השפה המקורית \'אבל\' ו\'. ו. אנחנו מעריכים קבוצות מבחנים מיוחדות שמוקדות על התרגום של שתי הקונציונציות האלה. קבוצות הבדיקות מכילות שפות מקורות שלא מבחינות שונות של הקונציונציה הנתונה, בעוד שפות המטרה כן. בסך הכל, אנו מעריכים את התחברה \'אבל\' על 20 תוצאות התרגום, וההתחברה \'ו\' על 10. כל מערכות התרגום מכונות מזהה כמעט באופן מושלם שונה אחת של התחברת המטרה, במיוחד עבור התחברת המקור \'אבל\'... עם זאת, שונה המטרה האחרת מייצגת אתגר למערכות התרגום מכונות, עם מדויקה שונה מ-50% ל-95% עבור "אבל" ומ20% ל-57% עבור "ו". השגיאה הגדולה לכל המערכות היא להחליף את השינוי המטרה הנכון עם השני.', 'sk': 'Prevajanje dvoumnih besed še vedno predstavlja izzive strojnemu prevajanju. V tem delu izvajamo sistematično kvantitativno analizo sposobnosti različnih sistemov strojnega prevajanja za razločitev izvornih jezikovnih konjunkcij \'ampak\' in \'in\'. Ocenjujemo specializirane testne sklope, osredotočene na prevajanje teh dveh veznic. Sklopi testov vsebujejo izvorne jezike, ki ne razlikujejo različnih različic dane konvekcije, ciljni jeziki pa razlikujejo. Skupaj ocenimo konjunkcijo "ampak" na 20 izhodih prevodov in konjunkcijo "in" na 10. Vsi sistemi strojnega prevajanja skoraj popolnoma prepoznajo eno različico ciljne konjunkcije, zlasti za izvorno konjunkcijo "ampak". Druga ciljna različica pa predstavlja izziv za sisteme strojnega prevajanja, pri čemer se natančnost razlikuje od 50% do 95% za "ampak" in od 20% do 57% za "in". Glavna napaka za vse sisteme je zamenjava pravilne ciljne različice z nasprotno.', 'ha': "Tsarin sarrafar da maganar kwamfyuta, yana kasa ƙarami wa fassarar mashine. Daga wannan aikin, munã tafiyar da wani anayyar masu tsari na'ura da ko kuma, ana samun ma'abũcin fassarori daban-daban na'urar da 'kuma'... Mu ƙaddara tsarin jarrabai da aka ƙayyade masu ƙayyadadde zuwa fassarar wannan biyu. Tsarin na ƙunsa da harshen source waɗanda ba su rarraba wasu daban-daban haɗiyar da aka ba, da kuma lugha masu amfani da za'a yi amfani da. Gansa da kamma, za'a iya ƙayyade haɗin 'amma' kan masu fitarwa 20, da kuma haɗin' da ke cikin 10. Dukan fassarar ɗin maɓallin ayuka na kusa su gane kowace variant guda na haɗin shirin goan, kuma hususann haɗin maɓallin 'amma'... Bayan yana mai amfani da shi, kuma amma, yana wakiyyar da kimar wa'urar fassarori na mashine, da tsari yana tsawo daga 50% zuwa 95% amma 'kuma' kuma daga %20 zuwa 57% dõmin 'kuma'. QXml", 'bo': 'གནད་དོན་མེད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ཚིག་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དུ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྩོད་གཏོང་དང་། ང་ཚོས་རྩོལ་བ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གློག་འཕྲིན་འགྱུར་བ་སྤྱོད་མ་འདྲ་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལུགས་ལ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཚད་ལྟར་བྱས་པར་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྐད་བསྒྱུར་བཅུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡ The test sets contain source languages that do not distinguish different variants of the given conjunction, whereas the target language do. ཡོངས་བསྡུས་ཀྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དེ་ཚིག་དབྱིབས་བྱ་ཚིག་༢༠་དང་། མཉམ་དུ་༡༠་རེད། མ་ལག་གི་ལུགས་སྒྱུར ཡིན་ནའང་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གཞན་མི་འདྲ་ཞིག་ནི་་མ་ལག་གི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་གནད་དོན་ཅིག་མཚོན་གྱི་ཡོད། མ་ལག་ཆ་ཡོད་པའི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ནི་བདེན་པོར་དམིགས་ཡུལ་སྔོན་ཚོགས་ལ་བསྐྱར་བཅོས་བྱེད་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'NE-Table : A Neural key-value table for Named Entities', 'fr': 'NE-Table\xa0: une table clé-valeur neuronale pour les entités nommées', 'ar': 'NE-Table: جدول قيم مفتاح عصبي للكيانات المسماة', 'es': 'NE-Table: una tabla de clave-valor neuronal para entidades con nombre', 'pt': 'NE-Table: Uma tabela de valores-chave Neural para Entidades Nomeadas', 'ja': 'NE -テーブル:名前付きエンティティのニューラルキー値テーブル', 'zh': 'NE 表:名实体者神经键值表', 'ru': 'NE-Table: Нейронная таблица ключевых значений для именованных сущностей', 'hi': 'NE-तालिका: नामित निकायों के लिए एक तंत्रिका कुंजी-मान तालिका', 'ga': 'NE-Tábla: Tábla Néarluacha eochrach le haghaidh Aonáin Ainmnithe', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური გასაღების თარიღი', 'el': 'Πίνακας NE: Ένας νευρωνικός πίνακας κλειδιών-τιμών για Ονόματες Οντότητες', 'hu': 'NE-táblázat: Neurális kulcsérték-táblázat a nevezett entitásokhoz', 'it': 'Tabella NE: una tabella dei valori chiave neurali per le entità denominate', 'kk': 'НЕ- кесте: Аталған нысандар үшін нейрондық кілттер кестесі', 'mk': 'NE- Table: A Neural key- value table for Named Entities', 'lt': 'NE lentelė: Pavadintų subjektų neurologinės rakto vertės lentelė', 'mt': 'NE-Table: A Neural key-value table for Named Entities', 'ml': 'NE- ടേബിള്\u200d: A Neural key- value table for Named Entities', 'mn': 'НЕ-хүснэгт: Нэмэгдсэн Entities-ын мэдрэлийн түлхүүр хүснэгт', 'ms': 'Jadual-NE: Jadual nilai-kekunci saraf untuk Entiti Nama', 'pl': 'Tabela NE: Tabela neuronowa klucza-wartości dla nazwanych podmiotów', 'ro': 'Tabelul NE: Un tabel cu valori cheie neurale pentru entitățile denumite', 'sr': 'NE-Tabla: Tabla za neuronske vrijednosti ključa imenovanih podataka', 'no': 'NE- tabell: ein neiraln nøkkelverditabell for namnet einingar', 'si': 'A neural key- VALUE', 'so': 'NE-Table: A Neural key-value table for Named Entities', 'sv': 'NE-tabell: En neural nyckelvärdetabell för namngivna enheter', 'ta': 'NE-Table: A Neural key-value table for Named Entities', 'ur': 'نو ٹیبل', 'uz': 'Jadval: A Neural key- value table for Named Entities', 'vi': 'N-table: A Neural Key-value for Named Enties', 'bg': 'NE- Таблица: Таблица с неврални ключови стойности за имена', 'da': 'NE-tabel: En neural nøgleværditabel for navngivne enheder', 'hr': 'NA-Tablica: Tablica neuronske vrijednosti ključa za imenovane subjekte', 'nl': 'NE-tabel: Een neurale sleutel-waarde tabel voor benoemde entiteiten', 'de': 'NE-Tabelle: Eine neurale Schlüssel-Wert-Tabelle für benannte Entitäten', 'id': 'NE-Table: A Neural key-value table for Named Entities', 'fa': 'میز نو: یک میز ارزش کلید عصبی برای شرکتهای نامیده', 'ko': 'NE 테이블:명명된 솔리드의 신경 키 값 테이블', 'sw': 'Table: A Neural key-value table for Named Entities', 'tr': 'pretty_formated_entries', 'af': 'Nee- Tabel: A Neural key- value table for Named Entities', 'sq': 'NE-Table: A Neural key-value table for Named Entities', 'hy': 'New', 'am': 'ሠንጠረዥ', 'az': 'Növ- Sətif: A Neural key- value table for Named Entities', 'bn': 'NE- টেবিল: নিউরাল কী - মান টেবিল', 'bs': 'NE-Tablica: Tablica neuroloških ključnih vrijednosti za imenovane subjekte', 'cs': 'NE-tabulka: Tabulka neurálních klíčových hodnot pro pojmenované entity', 'et': 'NE-tabel: Nimetatud üksuste neuraalse võtme väärtuse tabel', 'ca': 'Tabla NE: Una taula neuronal de valors clau per a les Entitats Nomades', 'fi': 'NE-Taulukko: Nimettyjen entiteettien hermoavainarvotaulukko', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringNew', 'sk': 'Tabela NE: Tabela nevralnih ključev z vrednostmi za imenovane subjekte', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'NE-Table: A Neural key-value table for Named Entities', 'bo': 'NE-ཐིག་ཁྲམ། མིང་བཏགས་ཡོད་པའི་རྩིས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཐིག་ཁྲམ'}
{'en': 'Many Natural Language Processing (NLP) tasks depend on using Named Entities (NEs) that are contained in texts and in external knowledge sources. While this is easy for humans, the present neural methods that rely on learned word embeddings may not perform well for these NLP tasks, especially in the presence of Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) or rare NEs. In this paper, we propose a solution for this problem, and present empirical evaluations on : a) a structured Question-Answering task, b) three related Goal-Oriented dialog tasks, and c) a Reading-Comprehension task, which show that the proposed method can be effective in dealing with both in-vocabulary and OOV NEs. We create extended versions of dialog bAbI tasks 1,2 and 4 and OOV versions of the CBT test set which are available at-https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'pt': 'Muitas tarefas de Processamento de Linguagem Natural (NLP) dependem do uso de Entidades Nomeadas (NEs) que estão contidas em textos e em fontes externas de conhecimento. Embora isso seja fácil para humanos, os métodos neurais atuais que dependem de incorporações de palavras aprendidas podem não ter um bom desempenho para essas tarefas de PNL, especialmente na presença de Fora do Vocabulário (OOV) ou NEs raros. Neste artigo, propomos uma solução para este problema e apresentamos avaliações empíricas sobre: a) uma tarefa estruturada de resposta a perguntas, b) três tarefas de diálogo orientadas para metas relacionadas ec) uma tarefa de compreensão de leitura, que mostram que o O método proposto pode ser eficaz para lidar com ENs de vocabulário e OOV. Criamos versões estendidas das tarefas de diálogo bAbI 1,2 e 4 e versões OOV do conjunto de testes CBT que estão disponíveis em - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'ar': 'تعتمد العديد من مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP) على استخدام الكيانات المسماة (NEs) المضمنة في النصوص وفي مصادر المعرفة الخارجية. في حين أن هذا سهل بالنسبة للبشر ، فإن الأساليب العصبية الحالية التي تعتمد على زخارف الكلمات المكتسبة قد لا تؤدي أداءً جيدًا لمهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية هذه ، خاصة في وجود خارج المفردات (OOV) أو NEs النادرة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح حلاً لهذه المشكلة ، ونقدم تقييمات تجريبية حول: أ) مهمة منظمة للإجابة على الأسئلة ، ب) ثلاث مهام حوار موجهة نحو الهدف ، ج) مهمة فهم القراءة ، والتي توضح أن يمكن أن تكون الطريقة المقترحة فعالة في التعامل مع كل من المفردات و OOV NEs. نقوم بإنشاء إصدارات موسعة من مهام bAbI 1 و 2 و 4 وإصدارات OOV من مجموعة اختبار CBT المتوفرة على - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'fr': "De nombreuses tâches de traitement du langage naturel (NLP) dépendent de l'utilisation d'entités nommées (NE) contenues dans des textes et dans des sources de connaissances externes. Bien que cela soit facile pour les humains, les méthodes neuronales actuelles qui reposent sur des intégrations de mots apprises peuvent ne pas fonctionner correctement pour ces tâches de PNL, en particulier en présence de Out-of-Vocabulary (OOV) ou de rares NE. Dans cet article, nous proposons une solution à ce problème et présentons des évaluations empiriques sur\xa0: a) une tâche structurée de réponse aux questions, b) trois tâches de dialogue orientées vers un objectif, et c) une tâche de compréhension de lecture, qui montrent que la méthode proposée peut être efficace pour traiter à la fois dans le vocabulaire et hors vue END. Nous créons des versions étendues des tâches 1,2 et 4 de la boîte de dialogue BABi et des versions OOV de l'ensemble de tests CBT qui sont disponibles à l'adresse suivante\xa0: https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/", 'es': 'Muchas tareas de Procesamiento del Lenguaje Natural (NLP) dependen del uso de Entidades Nombradas (NE) que están contenidas en textos y en fuentes de conocimiento externas. Si bien esto es fácil para los humanos, los métodos neuronales actuales que se basan en la incorporación de palabras aprendidas pueden no funcionar bien para estas tareas de PNL, especialmente en presencia de NE fuera de vocabulario (OOV) o NEs poco frecuentes. En este artículo, proponemos una solución para este problema y presentamos evaluaciones empíricas sobre: a) una tarea estructurada de preguntas y respuestas, b) tres tareas relacionadas de diálogo orientado a objetivos, y c) una tarea de comprensión de lectura, que muestran que el método propuesto puede ser eficaz para tratar tanto el vocabulario como el OOV NEs. Creamos versiones ampliadas de las tareas 1,2 y 4 de BaBi de diálogo y las versiones OOV del conjunto de pruebas CBT que están disponibles en https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'ja': '多くの自然言語処理（ NLP ）タスクは、テキストおよび外部知識ソースに含まれる名前付きエンティティ（ NE ）の使用に依存します。これはヒトにとって容易であるが、学習された単語埋め込みに依存する現在のニューラルメソッドは、特にOut - Of - Vocabulary （ OOV ）または稀なNEの存在下では、これらのNLPタスクに対してうまく機能しない可能性がある。本稿では，この問題に対する解決策を提案し， a ）構造化された質問回答タスク， b ） 3つの関連する目標指向のダイアログタスク， c ）読解タスクに関する実証的評価を提示し，提案された方法が語彙内およびOOV NEの両方に効果的であることを示した．ダイアログbAbIタスク1、2、4の拡張バージョンとCBTテストセットのOOVバージョンを作成します。これらはhttps://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/で入手できます。', 'zh': '诸自然语言处分 (NLP) 赖用文本及外识源中含名实体 (NE)。 虽于人类甚易,然赖于学词神经法或不能善行NLP务,尤在词汇外(OOV)罕见之NE。 夫文者,解决方案也,以下有实,a)结构化之问也,b)三关之对,及c)读解,此可以处词汇OOV NE也。 我作对话框 bAbI 务 1、2 、 4 之广版及 CBT 试集之 OOV ,可于 https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'hi': 'कई प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (NLP) कार्य नामित निकायों (NEs) का उपयोग करने पर निर्भर करते हैं जो ग्रंथों और बाहरी ज्ञान स्रोतों में निहित हैं। हालांकि यह मनुष्यों के लिए आसान है, वर्तमान तंत्रिका विधियां जो सीखे गए शब्द एम्बेडिंग पर भरोसा करती हैं, इन एनएलपी कार्यों के लिए अच्छा प्रदर्शन नहीं कर सकती हैं, खासकर आउट-ऑफ-शब्दावली (ओओवी) या दुर्लभ एनई की उपस्थिति में। इस पेपर में, हम इस समस्या के लिए एक समाधान का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, और अनुभवजन्य मूल्यांकन प्रस्तुत करते हैं: ए) एक संरचित प्रश्न-उत्तर देने वाला कार्य, बी) तीन संबंधित लक्ष्य-उन्मुख संवाद कार्य, और सी) एक रीडिंग-कॉम्प्रिहेंशन कार्य, जो दिखाता है कि प्रस्तावित विधि इन-शब्दावली और ओओवी एनई दोनों से निपटने में प्रभावी हो सकती है। हम संवाद bAbI कार्यों 1,2 और 4 और CBT परीक्षण सेट के OOV संस्करणों के विस्तारित संस्करण बनाते हैं जो - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/ पर उपलब्ध हैं', 'ru': 'Многие задачи обработки на естественном языке (NLP) зависят от использования именованных объектов (NE), которые содержатся в текстах и внешних источниках знаний. Хотя это легко для людей, существующие нейронные методы, которые полагаются на изученные вложения слов, могут не работать хорошо для этих задач NLP, особенно в присутствии Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) или редких NE. В этой статье мы предлагаем решение этой проблемы и представляем эмпирические оценки по: a) структурированной задаче «Вопрос-ответ», b) трем связанным задачам диалога, ориентированного на цель, и c) задаче «Чтение-сознание», которые показывают, что предлагаемый метод может быть эффективным в работе как с НЭ в словаре, так и с НЭ в OOV. Мы создаем расширенные версии диалоговых bAbI-задач 1,2 и 4 и OOV-версий тестового набора CBT, которые доступны по ссылке - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'ga': 'Braitheann go leor tascanna Próiseála Teanga Nádúrtha (NLP) ar úsáid a bhaint as Aonáin Ainmnithe (NEanna) atá i dtéacsanna agus i bhfoinsí eolais seachtracha. Cé go bhfuil sé seo éasca do dhaoine, d’fhéadfadh sé nach n-éireoidh go maith leis na modhanna néaracha reatha atá ag brath ar leabú focal foghlamtha do na tascanna NLP seo, go háirithe nuair a bhíonn As Stór Focal (OOV) nó NEanna neamhchoitianta i láthair. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid réiteach don fhadhb seo, agus cuirimid luachálacha eimpíreacha i láthair ar: a) tasc struchtúrtha Freagraí Ceiste, b) trí thasc dialóige a bhaineann le Spriocdhíriú, agus c) tasc Léamhthuiscint, a thaispeánann go bhfuil an is féidir leis an modh molta a bheith éifeachtach chun déileáil leis an bhfoclóir agus leis an OOO araon. Cruthaímid leaganacha leathnaithe de thascanna dialóg bAbI 1,2 agus 4 agus leaganacha OOV den tacar tástála CBT atá ar fáil ag - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'el': 'Πολλές εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας εξαρτώνται από τη χρήση ονομάτων οντοτήτων που περιέχονται σε κείμενα και σε εξωτερικές πηγές γνώσης. Ενώ αυτό είναι εύκολο για τους ανθρώπους, οι σημερινές νευρωνικές μέθοδοι που βασίζονται σε ενσωματωμένες λέξεις μπορεί να μην αποδίδουν καλά για αυτές τις εργασίες ειδικά με την παρουσία εκτός λεξιλογίου (OOV) ή σπάνιων ΝΕ. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια λύση για το πρόβλημα αυτό και παρουσιάζουμε εμπειρικές αξιολογήσεις σχετικά με: α) μια δομημένη εργασία Απάντησης Ερωτήσεων, β) τρεις σχετικές εργασίες διαλόγου Στόχου και γ) μια εργασία ανάγνωσης-κατανόησης, οι οποίες δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος μπορεί να είναι αποτελεσματική στην αντιμετώπιση τόσο του λεξιλογίου όσο και των ΝΕ. Δημιουργούμε εκτεταμένες εκδόσεις εργασιών διαλόγου 1,2 και 4 και εκδόσεις του συνόλου δοκιμών οι οποίες είναι διαθέσιμες στο - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'hu': 'Számos természetes nyelvfeldolgozási (NLP) feladat a szövegekben és külső tudásforrásokban található Nevezett entitások használatától függ. Bár ez könnyű az emberek számára, a jelenlegi neurális módszerek, amelyek tanult szó beágyazására támaszkodnak, nem teljesítenek jól ezekhez a NLP feladatokhoz, különösen a Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) vagy ritka NE jelenlétében. Ebben a tanulmányban a probléma megoldását javasoljuk, és empirikus értékeléseket mutatunk be: a) strukturált kérdésválaszolási feladat, b) három kapcsolódó célorientált párbeszédfeladat, valamint c) olvasási-értékelési feladat, amelyek azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszer hatékonyan kezelhető mind a szókincsben, mind az OOV NE-k kezelésében. A CBT tesztkészlet bAbI párbeszéd 1,2 és 4 és OOV verzióinak kiterjesztett verzióit hozzuk létre, melyek elérhetők a - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'ka': 'ბევრი თავისუფალური ენის პროცესი (NLP) დააყენებულია სახელი ინტერნეტიების გამოყენებაზე, რომლებიც ტექსტში და გარეშე ინტერნეციის ფოსტებში შექმნა. მაგრამ ეს ადამიანისთვის ადამიანისთვის ადამიანისთვის, მიმდინარე ნეიროლური მეტოვები, რომელიც განვიწყებული სიტყვების შესახებ შეიძლება ამ NLP დავალებებისთვის მუშაობას, განსაკუთრებით საკუთარი ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ მინდა ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტის პასუხი, და აღმოჩნეთ ემპერიკალური გადაწყვეტილება: a) სტრუქტურული კითხვა-პასუხის პასუხი, b) სამი შესაბამისი მისამართო დიალოგის პასუხი, და c) კითხვა-კომპრენციის პასუხი, რომელიც ჩვენ შევქმნით გაფართებული დიალოგის გარეშე bAbI დავალებების 1,2 და 4 და OOV ვერსიები CBT ტესტის გარეშე, რომლებიც შეიძლება - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'it': "Molte attività di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (NLP) dipendono dall'utilizzo di entità denominate (NE) contenute nei testi e nelle fonti di conoscenza esterne. Anche se questo è facile per gli esseri umani, i metodi neurali attuali che si basano su incorporazioni di parole apprese potrebbero non funzionare bene per questi compiti NLP, specialmente in presenza di Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) o rare NE. In questo articolo, proponiamo una soluzione a questo problema e presentiamo valutazioni empiriche su: a) un compito strutturato di risposta alle domande, b) tre attività correlate di dialogo orientato agli obiettivi, e c) un compito di lettura-comprensione, che dimostrano che il metodo proposto può essere efficace nel trattare sia in-vocabulary che in OOV NE. Creiamo versioni estese delle attività di dialogo bAbI 1,2 e 4 e versioni OOV del set di test CBT disponibili su - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/", 'lt': 'Daugelis gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo (NLP) užduočių priklauso nuo tekstuose ir išoriniuose žinių šaltiniuose esančių pavadintų subjektų naudojimo. While this is easy for humans, the present neural methods that rely on learned word embeddings may not perform well for these NLP tasks, especially in the presence of Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) or rare NEs.  Šiame dokumente siūlome išspręsti šią problem ą ir pateikti empirinius vertinimus: a) struktūrizuota užduotis atsakyti į klausimus, b) trys susijusios užduotys, susijusios su dialogu, orientuota į tikslus, ir c) užduotis, susijusi su skaitymu ir supratimu, kuri rodo, kad siūlomas metodas gali b ūti veiksmingas sprendžiant tiek žodyno, tiek OOV NEs klausimus. Sukuriame išplėstines dialogo bAbI užduočių 1,2 ir 4 versijas ir OOV versijas CBT bandymų rinkinyje, kurios pateikiamos - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'mk': 'Многу задачи за процес на природен јазик (NLP) зависат од употребата на именувани ентитети (NEs) кои се содржат во текстови и во надворешни извори на знаење. И покрај тоа што ова е лесно за луѓето, сегашните нервни методи кои се потпираат на научени зборови вложување може да не успеат добро за овие NLP задачи, особено во присуство на надвор од зборови (OOV) или ретки NEs. Во овој документ, предложуваме решение за овој проблем и претставуваме емпирички проценки за: a) структурирана задача за одговори на прашања, b) три поврзани задачи за дијалог со цели и c) задача за читање-разбирање, која покажува дека предложениот метод може да биде ефикасен во справувањето со и во-вокаларниот и OOV NEs. Ние создаваме проширени верзии на дијалогот bAbI задачи 1, 2 и 4 и OOV верзии на сетот на CBT тестови кои се достапни на - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'ms': 'Banyak tugas Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami (NLP) bergantung pada menggunakan Entiti Nama (NEs) yang terdapat dalam teks dan sumber pengetahuan luaran. Sementara ini mudah bagi manusia, kaedah saraf yang kini bergantung pada penyampaian perkataan belajar mungkin tidak berjalan dengan baik untuk tugas NLP ini, terutama dalam kehadiran Out of-Vocabulary (OOV) atau NEs langka. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan penyelesaian untuk masalah ini, dan mempersembahkan penilaian empirik pada: a) tugas struktur Pertanyaan-Jawapan, b) tiga tugas dialog Goal-Oriented yang berkaitan, dan c) tugas Pembacaan-Pemahaman, yang menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan boleh berkesan dalam menangani kedua-dua dalam-vocabulari dan OOV NEs. Kami mencipta versi sambungan tugas bAbI dialog 1,2 dan 4 dan versi OOV set ujian CBT yang tersedia di - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'ml': 'പദാവലികളിലും പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവുസ്രോതസ്സിലും ഉള്ള പേരുള്ള എന്റിറ്റികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിലും സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d പലരും  ഇത് മനുഷ്യര്\u200dക്ക് എളുപ്പമാണെങ്കില്\u200d, പഠിച്ച വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d രീതികള്\u200d, ഈ NLP ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നല്ലത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിനുള്ള ഒരു പരിഹാരം പ്രായണം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഒരു ചോദ്യം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട ചോദ്യം- ഉത്തരം ചെയ്യുന്ന ജോലി (b) മൂന്നു സംബന്ധിച്ച ഗോള്\u200d- ഉത്തരവാദിത്തമായ ഡയലോഗ് ജോലി സിബിടി ടെസ്റ്റ് സെറ്റ് സെറ്റ് സെറ്റ് സെറ്റില്\u200d ലഭ്യമാകുന്ന സംവിധാനത്തിന്റെ ഡയലോഗ് ബിബിഐ ജോലികളുടെ വിശാലമാ https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'mt': 'Ħafna kompiti ta’ Proċessar tal-Lingwi Naturali (NLP) jiddependu fuq l-użu ta’ Entitajiet Ismija (NEs) li jinsabu fit-testi u f’sorsi esterni ta’ għarfien. Filwaqt li dan huwa faċli għall-bnedmin, il-metodi newrali preżenti li jiddependu fuq l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem imgħallem jistgħu ma jwettqux tajjeb għal dawn il-kompiti NLP, speċjalment fil-preżenza ta’ Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) jew NEs rari. F’dan id-dokument, nipproponu soluzzjoni għal din il-problem a, u nippreżentaw evalwazzjonijiet empiriċi dwar: a) kompitu strutturat ta’ tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet, b) tliet kompiti relatati ta’ djalogu orjentat lejn l-Għanijiet, u c) kompitu ta’ qari u komprensjoni, li juru li l-metodu propost jista’ jkun effettiv fit-trattament kemm tal-NEs in-vokabulari kif ukoll tal-OOV. Aħna nħolqu verżjonijiet estiżi tad-djalogu bAbI kompiti 1,2 u 4 u verżjonijiet OOV tas-sett tat-test CBT li huma disponibbli fuq - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'no': 'Mange naturlege språkprosesseringar (NLP) er avhengig av bruk av namnet einingar (NES) som er inneheld i tekstar og i eksterne kjelde for kunnskap. Mens dette er enkelt for mennesker, kan det gjeldande neuralmetodane som er tilgjengelege på lærte ordinnbygging ikkje utføra godt for desse NLP- oppgåvene, spesielt i tilgjengelege utskriftsordsamlingar (OOV) eller rare NES. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein løysing for dette problemet, og presenterer empiriske evalueringar om: a) ein strukturert oppgåve for spørsmål-svar, b) tre relaterte målsorienterte dialogoppgåver, og c) ei oppgåve for lesing-komprehensing, som viser at den foreslåde metoden kan vera effektiv i handling med b åde i-ordboka og OOV-NES. Vi lagar utvida versjonar av dialogvindauget bAbI-oppgåver 1,2 og 4 og OOV-versjonar av CBT-testsettet som er tilgjengelege på - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'pl': 'Wiele zadań przetwarzania języka naturalnego (NLP) zależy od użycia nazwanych podmiotów (NEs), które są zawarte w tekstach i zewnętrznych źródłach wiedzy. Chociaż jest to łatwe dla ludzi, obecne metody neuronowe, które opierają się na nauczonych osadzeniach słów, mogą nie sprawdzać się dobrze w tych zadaniach NLP, zwłaszcza w obecności poza słownictwem (OOV) lub rzadkich NE. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy rozwiązanie tego problemu oraz przedstawiamy empiryczne oceny: a) zorganizowanego zadania odpowiedzi na pytania, b) trzech powiązanych z nim zadań dialogu celowego oraz c) zadania czytania-zrozumienia, które pokazują, że proponowana metoda może być skuteczna zarówno w obsłudze słownictwa, jak i OOV NE. Tworzymy rozszerzone wersje dialogowych zadań bAbI 1,2 i 4 oraz wersje OOV zestawu testowego CBT dostępne pod adresem - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл процесс (NLP) олон даалгавар нь текст болон гадаад мэдлэгийн эх үүсвэрээр дүүрэн нэрлэгдсэн Нэгт (NES) хэрэглээнээс хамаарна. Хүмүүст үүнийг амархан хэдий ч, сурсан үгнээс хамаарч байгаа мэдрэлийн арга нь эдгээр NLP ажлын тулд сайн ажиллаж чадахгүй, ялангуяа Out-of-Vocabulary (OOV) эсвэл ховор НЭ-н байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид энэ асуудлын шийдэл гаргаж, эмперикийн дүгнэлт гаргаж байна: a) бүтээгдэхүүнтэй асуулт-хариулт үйл ажиллагаа, b) 3 холбоотой зорилго-ориентиролт диалог үйл ажиллагаа, c) Reading-Comprehension үйл ажиллагаа. Энэ нь санал өгсөн арга нь сөрөг сөрөг болон OOV NES-тэй хоёулан Бид цахим хувилбарын хувилбаруудыг бий болгож байгаа CBT тестийн хувилбаруудын 1,2, 4 болон OOV хувилбаруудыг бий болгож байна. https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'ro': 'Multe sarcini de procesare a limbajului natural (PNL) depind de utilizarea entităților denumite (NE) care sunt conținute în texte și în surse externe de cunoștințe. Deși acest lucru este ușor pentru oameni, metodele neurale actuale care se bazează pe încorporarea cuvintelor învățate ar putea să nu funcționeze bine pentru aceste sarcini PNL, în special în prezența Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) sau NE rare. În această lucrare, propunem o soluție pentru această problemă și prezentăm evaluări empirice cu privire la: a) o sarcină structurată de răspuns la întrebări, b) trei sarcini conexe de dialog orientate spre obiective și c) o sarcină de lectură-înțelegere, care arată că metoda propusă poate fi eficientă în abordarea atât în vocabular, cât și în OOV NE. Creăm versiuni extinse ale sarcinilor de dialog bAbI 1,2 și 4 și versiunile OOV ale setului de testare CBT care sunt disponibile la - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය (NLP) වැඩක් නැමතික අංශ්\u200dය (NEs) භාවිත කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා පස්සේ සහ ප්\u200dරතිදේ මේක මිනිස්සු වෙනුවෙන් ලේසි වෙනුවෙන්, ඉගෙන ගත්ත වචනය සම්බන්ධ විදිහට විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් මේ NLP වැඩ සඳහා හොඳ වැඩ කරන්න, විශේෂයෙ මේ පැත්තේ, අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ: a) සංස්ථාවිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, b) සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තුන අපි සංවාදයේ විස්තාරණ සංවාදයේ සංවාදය bAbbI වැඩක් 1,2 සහ 4 සහ OOOv සංවාදය සැකසුම් සැකසුම් සැකසුම් සැකස https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'kk': 'Түзіндік тілдерді өңдеу (NLP) тапсырмалары мәтіндерде және сыртқы білім көзінде бар аталған нысандар (NES) қолдануға тәуелді. Бұл адамдар үшін оңай болғанда, оқылған сөздерді ендіру арқылы, осы NLP тапсырмалар үшін жақсы жұмыс істемейді, осылай-ақ сөздерді (ООВ) немесе кейбір НЕС болғанда. Бұл қағазда біз осы мәселеге шешімін және эмпирикалық мәселелерді: a) құрылған сұрақ- жауап беру тапсырмасы, b) үш сәйкесті мақсатты диалог тапсырмасы және c) оқу- сәйкестік тапсырмасы, бұл тапсырма сөздерінде және OOV НЕ-леріне қатынауға Біз қол жеткізетін CBT сынақтарының 1, 2, 4 және OOV нұсқаларын бұл диалогтың кеңейтілген нұсқаларын құрамыз. https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'sr': 'Mnogi zadaci prirodnog procesa jezika (NLP) zavise od korištenja imenovanih područja (NES) koji su sadržani u tekstima i vanjskim izvorima znanja. Iako je to lako za ljude, sadašnje neurološke metode koje se oslanjaju na naučene reèi uključene ne mogu dobro izvršiti za te NLP zadatke, posebno u prisustvu izvan reèi ili rijetkih NES-a. U ovom papiru predlažemo rješenje ovog problem a i predstavljamo empiričke procjene: a) strukturirani zadatak odgovora na pitanje, b) tri zadatak sa ciljem-Orijentiranim dijalogom, i c) zadatak za čitanje-komprehenziju, koji pokazuje da predloženi metod može biti efikasan u rješavanju objekata na rečenju i na rečenju jezika i na OOV NEs. Napravili smo produžene verzije dijaloga bAbI zadataka 1,2 i 4 i OOV verzije nastave CBT testa koji su dostupni na - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'so': "Shaqooyin badan oo ka shaqeynta afka asalka ah (NLP) waxay ku xiran yihiin isticmaalka magaca Entities (NEs) oo ku qoran qoraalka iyo noocyada aqoonta dibadda ah. Inta ay dadku u fudud tahay, qaababka neurada ee joogta ah oo ku tiirsan karta hadalka lagu bartay, ma suurtowdo inay si wanaagsan u sameeyaan shaqaalahaas NLP, khusuusan ku jirto presence-out-of-Vocabulary (OOV) ama NE aad u yaraan. Qoraalkan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa xal ka qabsashada dhibaatadan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qiimeynta ku saabsan: a) shaqo la dhisay su'aal-ka jawaabta, b) saddex xafiisyo la xiriiray oo ku saabsan dialog-ka-oriented, c) oo ah xafiiska akhriska-Comparinta, kaas oo muujinaya in qaababka la soo jeeday ay ay faa’iido u yeelan karto macluumaadka ku saabsan hadalka iyo afka OV NEs. Waxaynu sameynaa warqado dheer oo ku qoran qoraalka bAbI shaqooyinka 1,2 iyo 4 iyo OOV versiyaha imtixaanka CBT ee ku jira - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/", 'sv': 'Många uppgifter inom Natural Language Processing (NLP) är beroende av att Named Entities (NE) används som finns i texter och i externa kunskapskällor. Även om detta är lätt för människor, kan nuvarande neurala metoder som förlitar sig på inlärda ord inbäddningar inte fungera bra för dessa NLP-uppgifter, särskilt i närvaro av Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) eller sällsynta NEs. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en lösning på detta problem och presenterar empiriska utvärderingar av: a) en strukturerad frågesvarsuppgift, b) tre relaterade målorienterade dialoguppgifter, och c) en Reading-Comprehension uppgift, som visar att den föreslagna metoden kan vara effektiv för att hantera både in-vokabulär och OOV NE. Vi skapar utökade versioner av dialog bAbI uppgifter 1,2 och 4 samt OOV versioner av CBT testset som finns tillgängliga på - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'ta': '@ info: whatsthis இது மனிதர் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இந்த பிரச்சனைக்கான தீர்வை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், தற்போது விருப்பப்படுத்தும் விளக்கங்கள்: a) அமைப்பிடப்பட்ட கேள்வி-பதில் செய்யும் செயல், b) மூன்று தொடர்புடைய பொருள் த நாம் உரையாடல் பிஅபி செயல்களின் விரிவாக்கப்பட்ட பதிப்பு https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'ur': 'بہت سی طبیعی زبان پردازشی (NLP) کاموں پر نامہ دار ایٹیونیٹ (NES) کے استعمال سے اعتماد ہے جو texts اور external knowledge sources میں لکھی جاتی ہیں. حالانکہ یہ انسانوں کے لئے آسان ہے، اب کی نئورل طریقے جن کی تعلیم لکھی ہوئی باتوں پر بھروسہ رکھتی ہیں ان NLP کے کاموں کے لئے اچھا کام نہیں کرسکتے، مخصوصاً آواز وکلیز (OOV) یا نادر نئر کے حضور. اس کاغذ میں ہم اس مسئلہ کے لئے ایک حل پیش کریں گے، اور اس کے ذریعہ مضبوط تحقیقات پیش کریں گے: a) ایک ساختہ سوال-جواب کا کام، b) تین رابطہ دار گول-Oriented диалог کا کام، اور c) ایک Reading-Comprehension کا کام، جو دکھاتا ہے کہ پیش کیا گیا طریقہ ان کے ساتھ both vocabulary اور OOV NES کے بارے میں اثر ہو سکتا ہے. ہم نے سی بی ٹی ٹیسٹ کے ٹیسٹ کے ٹیسٹ کی گھیرے ہوئے برگزیدہ نسخے بنائے ہیں جو ان میں موجود ہیں - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'uz': "Name Bu insonlar uchun oddiy bo'lsa, o'rganilgan so'zlar davomida ishlatadigan neyrolik usullari bu NLP vazifalar uchun bajariladigan narsalar yoki oddiy NE (OOV) mavjud boʻlishi mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, bu muammola uchun xabar qilamiz, va bu muammola qiymatni hozir qilamiz: a) yaratilgan savol va javob berish vazifasi (b) uchta xabar muloqat muloqat vazifalari va (c) o'qishni o'qish vazifasi bilan ishlatiladi. Bu rivojlanadigan usul soʻzni va OOV NES bilan ta'sir qilish imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi. BAbI muloqat oynasidagi kengaytirilgan versiyalarni yaratishmiz. Bu yerda mavjud boʻlgan CBT sinov moslamalarining 1,2 va 4 va OOV versiyalarini yaratishmiz. https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/", 'vi': 'Nhiều công việc sản xuất ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLP) phụ thuộc vào việc sử dụng các tổ chức có tên (NEs) chứa trong văn bản và trong các nguồn kiến thức bên ngoài. Trong khi điều này dễ dàng cho con người, các phương pháp thần kinh hiện tại dựa trên sự nhúng vào từ đã học có thể không thực hiện tốt cho các công việc NLP, đặc biệt là trong sự hiện diện của out-Of-Vosau (OOOV) hay Nes hiếm. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một giải pháp cho vấn đề này, và đưa ra đánh giá c ó kinh nghiệm: a) một nhiệm vụ Trả lời câu hỏi có cấu trúc, b) ba công việc liên quan đến buổi hội thoại hướng mục tiêu, và c) một nhiệm vụ xóa toàn kiến, cho thấy phương pháp được đề nghị có thể hiệu quả trong việc xử lý cả từ vựng và ROV NEs. Chúng tôi tạo ra phiên bản mở rộng của hộp thoại giải pháp 1,2 và 4 và OOOV trong các phiên bản thử nghiệm CBT mà có sẵn ở- https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'bg': 'Много задачи за обработка на естествения език зависят от използването на имена (НЕ), които се съдържат в текстове и във външни източници на знания. Въпреки че това е лесно за хората, настоящите невронни методи, които разчитат на усвояване на научени думи, може да не работят добре за тези задачи на НЛП, особено в присъствието на Извън речника (OOV) или редки НЕ. В настоящата статия предлагаме решение на този проблем и представяме емпирични оценки на: а) структурирана задача за отговор на въпроси, б) три свързани задачи за диалогов диалог, ориентирани към целта, и в) задача за четене-разбиране, които показват, че предложеният метод може да бъде ефективен в справянето както с вътрешните речници, така и с ОВ НЕ. Създаваме разширени версии на диалогови задачи 1,2 и 4 и версии на тестовия комплект КБТ, които са достъпни на - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'de': 'Viele Aufgaben der Natural Language Processing (NLP) hängen von der Verwendung von Named Entities (NEs) ab, die in Texten und externen Wissensquellen enthalten sind. Während dies für den Menschen einfach ist, können die gegenwärtigen neuronalen Methoden, die auf erlernten Worteinbettungen beruhen, für diese NLP-Aufgaben möglicherweise nicht gut funktionieren, insbesondere in Gegenwart von Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) oder seltenen NEs. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine Lösung für dieses Problem vor und stellen empirische Auswertungen zu: a) einer strukturierten Fragebeantwortung, b) drei verwandten zielorientierten Dialogaufgaben und c) einer Leseverständnisaufgabe vor, die zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode sowohl im Umgang mit In-Vokabeln als auch OOV-NEs effektiv sein kann. Wir erstellen erweiterte Versionen der dialog bAbI Aufgaben 1,2 und 4 und OOV Versionen des CBT Testsets, die unter - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'da': "Mange Natural Language Processing (NLP) opgaver afhænger af brugen af navngivne enheder (NE), der er indeholdt i tekster og i eksterne videnkilder. Mens dette er let for mennesker, kan de nuværende neurale metoder, der er afhængige af indlejringer af lærte ord, ikke fungere godt til disse NLP-opgaver, især i tilstedeværelse af Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) eller sjældne NE'er. I denne artikel foreslår vi en løsning på dette problem, og præsenterer empiriske evalueringer af: a) en struktureret spørgsmålsbesvarelsesopgave, b) tre relaterede målorienterede dialogopgaver, og c) en læsning-forståelsesopgave, som viser, at den foreslåede metode kan være effektiv til at håndtere både in-ordforråd og OOV NE. Vi skaber udvidede versioner af dialog bAbI opgaver 1,2 og 4 og OOV versioner af CBT testsættet, som er tilgængelige på - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/", 'hr': 'Mnogi zadaci prirodnog procesa jezika (NLP) ovise o korištenju imenovanih područja (NES) koji su sadržani u tekstima i vanjskim izvorima znanja. Iako je to lako za ljude, sadašnje neurološke metode koje se oslanjaju na učene riječi uključene mogu dobro obaviti za te zadatke NLP-a, posebno u prisutnosti rijetkih riječica (OOV) ili rijetkih NES-a. U ovom papiru predlažemo rješenje ovog problem a i predstavljamo empiričke procjene o: a) strukturiranom zadatku odgovora na pitanje, b) tri odgovorne zadatke o dijalogu s ciljem orientiranim, i c) zadatku o pročitanju-komprehenziji, koji pokazuje da predloženi metod može biti učinkovit u rješavanju kako u rečenju riječnika i OOV NEs. Napravili smo produžene verzije dijaloga bAbI zadataka 1,2 i 4 i OOV verzije nastave CBT testa koji su dostupni na - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'nl': "Veel Natural Language Processing (NLP) taken zijn afhankelijk van het gebruik van Named Entities (NO's) die zijn opgenomen in teksten en externe kennisbronnen. Hoewel dit gemakkelijk is voor mensen, kunnen de huidige neurale methoden die afhankelijk zijn van geleerde woord embeddings niet goed presteren voor deze NLP-taken, vooral in de aanwezigheid van Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) of zeldzame NE's. In dit artikel stellen we een oplossing voor dit probleem voor en presenteren we empirische evaluaties van: a) een gestructureerde taak voor het beantwoorden van vragen, b) drie gerelateerde doelgerichte dialoogtaken, en c) een leestaak, die aantonen dat de voorgestelde methode effectief kan zijn in het omgaan met zowel in-woordenschat als OOV NEs. We maken uitgebreide versies van dialoog bAbI taken 1,2 en 4 en OOV versies van de CBT test set die beschikbaar zijn op - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/", 'ko': '많은 자연 언어 처리(NLP) 작업은 텍스트와 외부 지식원에 포함된 명명된 실체(NE)를 사용하는 데 의존한다.인간에게는 쉽지만 현재 단어가 박힌 신경을 배우는 방법으로는 이런 NLP 임무를 잘 수행하지 못할 수도 있다. 특히 어휘표 밖(OOV)이나 보기 드문 NES 상황에서는 그렇다.본고에서 우리는 이 문제를 해결하는 방법을 제시했고 다음과 같은 세 가지 문제에 대해 실증 평가를 실시했다. a) 구조화된 문답 임무, b) 세 가지 관련 목표 가이드 대화 임무, 그리고 c) 읽기와 이해 임무는 제시한 방법이 어휘와 OOV를 효과적으로 처리할 수 있음을 나타낸다.DIAlog bAbI tasks 1, 2, 4의 확장 버전과 CBT 테스트 세트의 OOV 버전을 만들었습니다. 이 버전은 다음 웹 사이트에서 확인할 수 있습니다.https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'fa': 'بسیاری از وظیفه\u200cهای پرداخت زبان طبیعی (NLP) بستگی دارند از استفاده از واحدهای نامیده (NES) که در متن و منابع علم خارجی محتوی دارند. در حالی که این برای انسان آسان است، روش\u200cهای عصبی که بر کلمه\u200cهای یاد گرفته\u200cاند، ممکن است برای این کار NLP، مخصوصا در حضور کلمه\u200cهای بیرون (OOV) یا NES نادر انجام دهند. در این کاغذ، ما یک راه حل برای این مشکل پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، و ارزیابی امپراتیک را در آن پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم: a) یک کار جواب سوال-پاسخ ساخته شده، b) سه کار مسئله محاورۀ مسئله\u200cای که ارتباط دارد، و c) یک کار خواندن-تعقیب، که نشان می\u200cدهد که این روش پیشنهاد می\u200cتواند موثر باشد در کنار هر دو کلمه\u200cای و OOV NES. ما نسخه\u200cهای گسترده\u200cشده\u200cای از مسائل\u200cهای مبارزه BAbI ۱،۲ و ۴ و نسخه\u200cهای OOV از مجموعه آزمایش CBT که در دسترسی دارند ایجاد می\u200cکنیم - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'sw': 'Kazi nyingi za Utendaji wa Lugha za asili (NLP) zinategemea kutumia Mitandao ya Jinai (NEs) yaliyojumuisha kwenye maandishi na kwenye vyanzo vya habari vya nje. Wakati hili ni rahisi kwa binadamu, mbinu za kiserikali za sasa zinazotegemea maneno ya kujifunza inaweza kutokufanya vizuri kwa kazi hizi za NLP, hususani kwa uwepo wa maneno yasiyo na lugha (OOV) au NE nadra. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza suluhisho la tatizo hili, na sasa tathmini za msisitizo kuhusu: a) kazi iliyoandaliwa na maswali ya kujibu, b) kazi tatu zinazohusiana na mazungumzo ya kimaadili, na c) jukumu la Kusoma, ambalo linaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa linaweza kuwa na ufanisi katika kushughulikia lugha na NEHA za OV. Tunaweza kutengeneza toleo lenye mijadala ya bAbI kazi 1,2 na 4 na OOV ya seti ya jaribio la CBT ambazo zinapatikana - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'id': 'Banyak tugas Proses Bahasa Alami (NLP) bergantung pada menggunakan Entitas Nama (NEs) yang terkandung dalam teks dan sumber pengetahuan luar. Sementara hal ini mudah bagi manusia, metode saraf saat ini yang bergantung pada pembangunan kata belajar mungkin tidak berhasil untuk tugas NLP ini, terutama dalam kehadiran luar dari kata (OOV) atau NEs langka. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan solusi untuk masalah ini, dan mempersembahkan evaluasi empirik pada: a) tugas strukturasi Pertanyaan-Jawaban, b) tiga tugas dialog yang berhubungan dengan Goal-Oriented, dan c) tugas Reading-Comprehension, yang menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan dapat efektif dalam menghadapi baik dalam vocabulari maupun OOV NEs. Kami menciptakan versi panjang dari dialog tugas bAbI 1,2 dan 4 dan versi OOV dari set tes CBT yang tersedia di - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'sq': 'Shumë detyra të procesimit të gjuhës natyrore (NLP) varen nga përdorimi i njësive të emëruara (NEs) që janë përmbajtur në tekste dhe në burime të jashtme të njohurive. Ndërsa kjo është e lehtë për njerëzit, metodat e tanishme nervore që mbështeten në përfshirjen e fjalëve të mësuara mund të mos funksionojnë mirë për këto detyra NLP, veçanërisht në praninë e jashtëzakonshme (OOV) apo NEs të rralla. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një zgjidhje për këtë problem dhe paraqesim vlerësime empirike mbi: a) një detyrë strukturuar për përgjigjen e pyetjeve, b) tre detyra të lidhura me dialogun me qëllime të orientuara dhe c) një detyrë për leximin e kuptimin, që tregojnë se metoda e propozuar mund të jetë e efektshme në trajtimin e si në fjalor, ashtu edhe OOV NEs. We create extended versions of dialog bAbI tasks 1,2 and 4 and OOV versions of the CBT test set which are available at -  https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'af': "Baie Natuurlike Taal Verwerking (NLP) taak afhang van gebruik van Naamde Eenheidse (NEs) wat in teks en in eksterne kennis bronne bevat word. Alhoewel dit maklik is vir mense, die huidige neurale metodes wat op leer woord inbettings kan nie goed uitvoer vir hierdie NLP-opdragte, veral in die voorsiening van uit-van-woorde (OOV) of rare NEs. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n oplossing vir hierdie probleem, en voorstel empiriese evaluasies op: a) ' n struktureerde vraag-antwoord taak, b) drie verwante Goal-Orienteerde dialoog taak, en c) â\x80\x99n Lees-Komprimensie taak, wat wys dat die voorstel metode effektief kan wees in handeling met beide in-woordeboek en OOV NEs. Ons skep uitgebreide weergawe van dialoog bAbI opdragte 1,2 en 4 en OOV weergawe van die CBT toets stel wat beskikbaar is op - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/", 'hy': 'Շատ բնական լեզվի վերաբերյալ գործողություններ կախված են նշված հաստատությունների (ՆԵ) օգտագործումից, որոնք պարունակվում են տեքստներում և արտաքին գիտելիքների աղբյուրներում: Մինչդեռ դա հեշտ է մարդկանց համար, ներկայիս նյարդային մեթոդները, որոնք հիմնված են սովորված բառերի ներդրման վրա, կարող են լավ չեն աշխատում այս ՆԼՊ-ի առաջադրանքների համար, հատկապես բառարանից դուրս գտնվող կամ հազվադեպ ՆԵ-ների ներկայությամբ: In this paper, we propose a solution for this problem, and present empirical evaluations on: a) a structured Question-Answering task, b) three related Goal-Oriented dialog tasks, and c) a Reading-Comprehension task, which show that the proposed method can be effective in dealing with both in-vocabulary and OOV NEs.  Մենք ստեղծում ենք BABI-ի առաջադրանքների 1,2 և 4 բաղադրամասի և OOOO-ի բաղադրամասի ընդլայնված տարբերակներ, որոնք հասանելի են https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'bn': 'অনেক স্বাভাবিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া (NLP) কাজের উপর নির্ভর করে যা লেখায় লেখা এবং বাইরের জ্ঞান উৎসে রয়েছে তার নাম এন্টিটি (NE) ব্যবহার করে। যদিও এটা মানুষের জন্য সহজ, বর্তমান নিউরেল পদ্ধতি যারা শিক্ষিত শব্দের বিরুদ্ধে নির্ভর করে তারা এনএলপি কাজের জন্য ভালো কাজ করতে পারে না, বিশেষ করে বিশেষ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এই সমস্যার সমাধানের প্রস্তাব করি এবং এই বিষয়টির উপর জরুরী মূল্য প্রস্তাব করি: a) একটি কাঠামো প্রশ্ন-উত্তরের কাজ, b) তিনটি সম্পর্কিত গোলাল-উল্লেখযোগ্য ডায়ালগ কাজ এবং c) একটি পাঠক-সমাপূর্ণ কাজ আমরা বিবিটি পরীক্ষার সেটের ১,২ এবং ৪ এবং ওওভি সংস্করণের বিস্তারিত সংস্করণ ব্যবহার করেছি- https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'az': 'Təbiətli Dil İşləməsi (NLP) işləri textlərdə və dış bilgi kaynaqlarında daxil olan İsmim Entitələri (NES) istifadə etməyə bağlıdır. Bu insanlar üçün asandır, öyrəndiyi sözlərə təvəkkül edən nLP işləri üçün yaxşı işlər görməz, özlərinə də Out-of-Vocabulary (OOV) və nadir NLP işlərində. Bu kağızda, biz bu problem in çözümünü təbliğ edirik, və empirik değerlendirmələri haqqında: a) strukturlu sual-cavab verən işləri, b) üç haqqındakı Möqli-Orientli Dialog işləri və c) oxu-Comprehension işləri təbliğ edir, bu yolun hər ikisini də sözlərdə və OOV NEs ilə çəkmək üçün faydalı olar. BAbI işləri 1,2, 4 və OOV versiyonlarının genişləndirilmiş versiyonlarını yaratdıq. https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'tr': 'Natal dil işlemleri (NLP) metinlerde we daşarydaky bilim çeşmelerinde metinlerde bolan Ady Entiteler (NEs) ulanmakdan baglanýar. İnsanlar için bu kolay olsa da, öğrendikleri kelimelere dayanan bu NLP görevleri için bu şekilde uygunlaşmayabilir, özellikle Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) veya nadir NES varlığında. Bu kagyzda, biz bu mesele üçin çözüm teklip edip, we empirik deňlenmeleri şu wagtda: a) strukturlyk sorag-jogaplama zady, b) üç gol-Orijent dialogyň zady we c) okamak-jemgyýetleme zady. Bu teklip eden yöntemiň hem sözler we OOV NEs bilen çözmek üçin etkinleşendir. Biz CBT testleriniň 1,2 we 4-nji wersiýasyny bejerdik https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'bs': 'Mnogi zadaci prirodnog procesa jezika (NLP) ovise o korištenju imenovanih područja (NES) koji su sadržani u tekstima i vanjskim izvorima znanja. Iako je to lako za ljude, sadašnje neurološke metode koje se oslanjaju na učene riječi uključene, možda ne ispunjavaju dobro za te NLP zadatke, posebno u prisustvu van-riječne riječi ili rijetkih NES-a. U ovom papiru predlažemo rješenje ovog problem a i predstavljamo empiričke procjene o: a) strukturiranom zadatku odgovora na pitanje, b) tri odgovorne zadatke o dijalogu s ciljem orientiranim, i c) zadatku o čitanju-komprehenziji, koji pokazuje da predloženi metod može biti učinkovit u rješavanju objekata na rečenju i na rečenici i na OOV NEs. Napravili smo produžene verzije dijaloga bAbI zadataka 1,2 i 4 i OOV verzije nastave CBT testa koji su dostupni na - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'ca': 'Moltes tasques de processament de llenguatges naturals (NLP) depenen d\'utilitzar Entitats Nomades (NEs) que estan contenides en textos i fonts externes de coneixement. Mentre això és fàcil per als humans, els mètodes neurals actuals que confien en l\'incorporació de paraules aprengutes poden no funcionar bé per aquestes tasques de NLP, especialment en la presença de "Out-Of-Vocabulary" (OOV) o de "NEs rares". En aquest paper, proposem una solució a aquest problema i presentem evaluacions empíriques sobre: a) una tasca estructurada de resposta a preguntes, b) tres tasques relacionades de diàleg orientat als objectius, i c) una tasca de llegir-entendre, que demostren que el mètode proposat pot ser eficaç en tractar-se tant amb les NEs en vocabulari com amb les NEs OOV. Creem versions extenses del diàleg bAbI tasques 1,2 i 4 i OOV del conjunt de tests CBT que estan disponibles en - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'am': 'ብዙ የተለመደው ቋንቋ ፕሮግራም (NLP) ስራዎችን በመጽሐፎች እና በውጭ እውቀት ምንጮች ውስጥ የተገኘውን ስም Entities (NEs) በመጠቀም ይጠብቃሉ። ይህም ለሰዎች ለቀላል ቢሆን፣ በተማሩ ቃላት አካባቢዎች ላይ የሚታመኑ የneyራ ዘዴዎች፣ ይልቁንም የውጭ ቃላት (OOV) ወይም ትንሽ NE በመቀበል፣ ለዚህ NLP ሥርዓቶች ለመፈጸም አይችሉም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ለዚህ ጉዳይ መፍትሄን እና የውይይት ማስታወቂያውን ለመቀበል እና ለዚህ ጉዳይ መፍትሄ እና ለጥያቄ-መልስ ስራ (b) ሦስት የተገኘ የጎዳና-አቀማመጥ ማህበረሰብ ስራ እና (c) የሚታየው ጥያቄ እና የOV NES በማስተካከል ጥያቄ እንዲሆን ይችላል፡፡ የ.አ.አ.አ.2 እና 4 ስራዎችን እና የCBT ፈተና ስርዓት የክፍለ ክፍሎች እናደርጋለን- https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'et': 'Paljud looduskeele töötlemise ülesanded sõltuvad tekstides ja välistes teadmisallikates sisalduvate nimetatud üksuste kasutamisest. Kuigi see on inimestele lihtne, ei pruugi praegused neuraalsed meetodid, mis tuginevad õppitud sõnade manustamisele, nende NLP ülesannete täitmisel hästi toimida, eriti sõnavara (OOV) või haruldaste NEde olemasolul. Käesolevas töös pakume välja selle probleemi lahenduse ning esitame empiirilisi hinnanguid: a) struktureeritud küsimustele vastamise ülesande, b) kolme seotud eesmärgile orienteeritud dialoogi ülesande ja c) lugemise-arusaamise ülesande, mis näitavad, et kavandatud meetod võib olla efektiivne nii sõnavara- kui ka OOV-NEde käsitlemisel. Loome dialoogi bAbI ülesannete 1,2 ja 4 laiendatud versioonid ning CBT testikomplekti OOV versioonid, mis on saadaval aadressil - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'fi': 'Monet Natural Language Processing (NLP) -tehtävät riippuvat tekstien ja ulkoisten tietolähteiden sisältämien nimettyjen entiteettien käytöstä. Vaikka tämä on ihmisille helppoa, nykyiset neuromenetelmät, jotka perustuvat opittuihin sanaupotuksiin, eivät välttämättä toimi hyvin näissä NLP-tehtävissä, etenkään sanaston ulkopuolella (OOV) tai harvinaisten NE:ien läsnä ollessa. Tässä työssä ehdotamme ratkaisua tähän ongelmaan ja esitämme empiirisiä arviointeja: a) strukturoitu kysymys-vastaustehtävä, b) kolme tavoitelähtöistä dialogitehtävää ja c) luku-ymmärtäminen tehtävä, jotka osoittavat, että ehdotettu menetelmä voi olla tehokas käsittelemään sekä sanaston sisäisiä että OOV-ongelmia. Laadimme laajennetut versiot dialogi bAbI tehtävät 1,2 ja 4 sekä OOV versiot CBT testisarjasta, jotka ovat saatavilla osoitteessa - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'cs': 'Mnoho úkolů zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP) závisí na použití pojmenovaných entit (NE), které jsou obsaženy v textech a externích zdrojích znalostí. I když je to pro lidi snadné, současné neuronové metody, které spoléhají na naučené vložení slov, nemusí fungovat dobře pro tyto NLP úkoly, zejména v přítomnosti Out-Of-Slovacabulary (OOV) nebo vzácných NE. V tomto článku navrhujeme řešení tohoto problému a představujeme empirická hodnocení: a) strukturovaného úkolu zodpovězení otázek, b) tří souvisejících úkolů dialogu orientovaného na cíl a c) úkolu čtení-porozumění, které ukazují, že navržená metoda může být efektivní při řešení ve slovní zásobě i OOV NE. Vytváříme rozšířené verze dialogových bAbI úloh 1,2 a 4 a OOV verze CBT testovací sady, které jsou k dispozici na adrese - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Aka da wannan ya sauƙi ga mutum, hanyoyin neural na yanzu, wanda ke dõgara a kan maganar da aka shigar da su, ba za su iya aikata aikin waɗannan NLP ba mai kyau, hasa'a, idan an presence of Out-of-Voice (OOV) ko kuma kaɗan na NE. A cikin wannan takarda, Munã buɗa masu amfani da wannan mataimaki, kuma tuna ƙidãya masu amfani da muhimmada a kan: a) aikin wanda aka daidaita na tambayar-mai tambaya, b) aikin bayani uku masu shirya na zauren zauren akwatin bayani na Goal-Orientated, da c) wani aikin karanta-Comprehentarwa, wanda yana nũna c ẽwa metoden da aka buƙata yana iya amfani da su yi sakanin su cikin tsarin-maganar da OOV NEs. Mu ƙiƙiro versiyar zauren akwatin zauren akwatin bayani na bAbI da aiki 1,2 da 4 da OOV na tsarin jarrabar CBT da za'a iya saman - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/", 'sk': 'Številne naloge obdelave naravnega jezika (NLP) so odvisne od uporabe imenovanih entitet (NE), ki jih vsebujejo besedila in zunanji viri znanja. Čeprav je to za ljudi enostavno, sedanje nevronske metode, ki se zanašajo na naučene vgradnje besed, morda ne delujejo dobro pri teh nalogah NLP, zlasti v prisotnosti izven besedišča (OOV) ali redkih NE. V prispevku predlagamo rešitev za ta problem in predstavljamo empirične vrednotenje: a) strukturirane naloge odgovarjanja na vprašanja, b) treh povezanih ciljno usmerjenih dialogskih nalog in c) naloge branja-razumevanja, ki kažejo, da je predlagana metoda lahko učinkovita pri obravnavanju tako znotraj besedišča kot tudi OOV NE. Ustvarjamo razširjene različice pogovornih opravil bAbI 1,2 in 4 ter OOV različice testnega nabora CBT, ki so na voljo na - https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'jv': 'Algorithm Nyong sampeyan ngomong kegampang kanggo wong-wong, nggampang kuwi wis nambah ilegal sing gampang gampang In this paper, we proposal a question for this question, and present empircal assertions on: a) a structural question-respwering task, b) 3 Relative Goal-Oriented dialog tasks, and c) a Reading-Compréncion task, that show that the proposal method can be effectual in dilaping with the Awak dhéwé nggawe versi perusahaan sing dibutuhke dialoog bAbI tasks 1,2 lan 4 lan OOOOT versi dadi kapan ingkang dipenepakan https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'bo': 'སྤྱིའི་ལུགས་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་སྦྱོར་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་མིང་བཏགས་ཡོད་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་དང་། While this is easy for humans, the present neural methods that rely on learning word embeddings may not perform well for these NLP tasks, especially in the presence of Out-Of-Vocabulary (OOV) or rare NEs. འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་དཀའ་ངལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ཤེས་སྤྲོད་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་དཀའ་ངལ་གྱི་དཔྱད་སྒྲུབ་ཚོགས་གནང་བ་ཚོད་དང་། b) རྒྱུ་དངོས་འབྲེལ་བའི་Goal-Oriented dialog tasks་གསུམ་སྟོན་ཡོད། Reading-Comprehension task་བ We create extended versions of dialog bAbI tasks 1,2 and 4 and OOV versions of the CBT test set which are available at -  https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/', 'he': 'משימות רבות של מעבדת שפת טבעית (NLP) תלויות בשימוש באיחויות בשמות (NEs) שמכילות בטקסטים ומקורות ידע חיצוניים. למרות שזה קל עבור בני אדם, השיטות העצביות הנוכחיות שסומכות על קישור מילים למודעות אולי לא מבצעות היטב עבור משימות NLP אלה, במיוחד בנוכחות של מחוץ למילה (OOV) או NEs נדירים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים פתרון לבעיה זו, ולהציג ערכות אמפיריות על: a) משימה מבוססת לענות לשאלות, b) שלושה משימות דיאלוג ממוקדות למטרות, c) משימה קריאה-הבנה, שמראה שהשיטה המוצעת יכולה להיות יעילה בתמודדות בין המילים ובין המילים OOV NEs. We create extended versions of dialog bAbI tasks 1,2 and 4 and OOV versions of the CBT test set which are available at -  https://github.com/IBM/ne-table-datasets/'}
{'en': 'Semantic Textual Similarity with Siamese Neural Networks', 'ar': 'تشابه نصي دلالي مع الشبكات العصبية السيامية', 'fr': 'Similitude textuelle sémantique avec les réseaux neuronaux siam', 'pt': 'Semântica Textual Similaridade com Redes Neurais Siamesas', 'es': 'Similitud textual semántica con las redes neuronales siamesas', 'hi': 'सियामी तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ शब्दार्थ पाठ्य समानता', 'ru': 'Семантическое текстовое сходство с сиамскими нейронными сетями', 'zh': '与暹罗神经网络语义文本相似性', 'ja': 'Siamese Neural Networksとのセマンティックテキストの類似性', 'ga': 'Cosúlacht Téacs Shéimeantach le Líonraí Néaracha Siamese', 'hu': 'Szemantikus szöveges hasonlóság a sziámi ideghálózatokkal', 'el': 'Σημαντική κειμενική ομοιότητα με τα σιαμικά Νευρικά Δίκτυα', 'ka': 'Semantic Textual Similarity with Siamese Neural Networks', 'lt': 'Semantinis tekstinis panašumas į Siamo nervinius tinklus', 'it': 'Similitudine testuale semantica con le reti neurali siamese', 'kk': 'Сиамикалық нейралық желілерімен біртіндегі мәтіннің ұқсастығы', 'mk': 'Семантичка текстуална сличност со сијамските неврални мрежи', 'mt': 'Similarità Testwali Semantika man-Netwerks Newrali Siamiċi', 'ms': 'Persamaan Teks Semantik dengan Rangkaian Neural Siamese', 'ml': 'Name', 'mn': 'Semantic Textual Similarity with Siamese Neural Networks', 'pl': 'Semantyczne podobieństwo tekstowe z syjamskimi sieciami neuronowymi', 'no': 'Semantisk tekstulikhet med syamesiske neuralnettverk', 'ro': 'Similaritate textuală semantică cu rețelele neurale siameze', 'sr': 'Semantička tekstualna sličnost sa Siamejskim nervnim mrežama', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Semantic Textual Similarity with Siamese Neural Network', 'sv': 'Semantisk textlig likhet med siamesiska neurala nätverk', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'سیامی نیورال نیٹورک کے ساتھ سیمانٹی ٹکسٹیول برابری', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hơi trung thành với mạng thần kinh Siamese', 'bg': 'Семантична текстова сходство със сиамските неврални мрежи', 'hr': 'Semantična tekstualna sličnost sa Siamejskim neuronskim mrežama', 'nl': 'Semantische tekstuele gelijkenis met Siamese Neurale Netwerken', 'da': 'Semantisk tekstuel lighed med siamesiske neurale netværk', 'de': 'Semantische Textgleichheit mit siamesischen neuronalen Netzwerken', 'id': 'Simulasi Teks Semantik dengan Rangkaian Neural Siamese', 'fa': 'شبیه\u200cسازی متن سیامی با شبکه\u200cهای عصبی سیامی', 'ko': '샴페인 신경 네트워크 기반의 의미 텍스트 유사도', 'sw': 'Similarity of Semantic Text with Siamese Neural Network', 'tr': 'Sematik Metin Benzerliği Siamese Nöral Networks ile', 'sq': 'Semantik Textual Similarity me Siamese Neural Networks', 'am': 'Textual Similarity with Siamese Neural Network', 'af': 'Semantiese teks gelykbaarheid met Siamese neurale netwerke', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Siaml캼 N칬ral S톛n톛l톛ri il톛 Semantik Textual Similarity', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Semantična tekstualna sličnost sa Siamejskim neuronskim mrežama', 'ca': 'Semàtica Similaritat Textual amb les xarxes neuronals siames', 'cs': 'Sémantická textová podobnost s siamskými neuronovými sítěmi', 'et': 'Semantiline tekstiline sarnasus siaami närvivõrkudega', 'fi': 'Semanttinen tekstillinen samankaltaisuus siamilaisten hermoverkkojen kanssa', 'jv': 'Sampeyan Tekst Sampeyan karo Siamse Neral Network', 'sk': 'Semantna besedilna podobnost s siamskimi živčnimi mrežami', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Semantic Textual Similarity with Siamese Neural Networks', 'he': 'דומה טקסטולית סמנטית עם רשתות נוירויות סיאמיות'}
{'en': 'Calculating the Semantic Textual Similarity (STS) is an important research area in natural language processing which plays a significant role in many applications such as question answering, document summarisation, information retrieval and information extraction. This paper evaluates Siamese recurrent architectures, a special type of neural networks, which are used here to measure STS. Several variants of the architecture are compared with existing methods', 'ar': 'يعد حساب تشابه النص الدلالي (STS) مجالًا بحثيًا مهمًا في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية والذي يلعب دورًا مهمًا في العديد من التطبيقات مثل الإجابة على الأسئلة وتلخيص المستندات واسترجاع المعلومات واستخراج المعلومات. تقيم هذه الورقة معماريات السيامي المتكررة ، وهي نوع خاص من الشبكات العصبية ، والتي تُستخدم هنا لقياس STS. تتم مقارنة العديد من المتغيرات للهندسة المعمارية بالطرق الحالية', 'es': 'El cálculo de la similitud textual semántica (STS) es un área de investigación importante en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural que desempeña un papel importante en muchas aplicaciones, como la respuesta a preguntas, el resumen de documentos, la recuperación de información y la extracción de información. Este artículo evalúa las arquitecturas recurrentes siamesas, un tipo especial de redes neuronales, que se utilizan aquí para medir STS. Se comparan varias variantes de la arquitectura con los métodos existentes', 'fr': "Le calcul de la similarité sémantique textuelle (STS) est un domaine de recherche important dans le traitement du langage naturel qui joue un rôle important dans de nombreuses applications telles que la réponse aux questions, la synthèse de documents, la récupération d'informations et l'extraction d'informations. Cet article évalue les architectures récurrentes siamoises, un type particulier de réseaux neuronaux, qui sont utilisées ici pour mesurer le STS. Plusieurs variantes de l'architecture sont comparées aux méthodes existantes", 'pt': 'O cálculo da semelhança textual semântica (STS) é uma importante área de pesquisa em processamento de linguagem natural que desempenha um papel significativo em muitas aplicações, como resposta a perguntas, resumo de documentos, recuperação e extração de informações. Este artigo avalia arquiteturas recorrentes siamesas, um tipo especial de redes neurais, que são usadas aqui para medir STS. Várias variantes da arquitetura são comparadas com os métodos existentes', 'ja': 'セマンティックテキスト類似性（ STS ）の計算は、自然言語処理における重要な研究分野であり、質問回答、文書要約、情報検索、情報抽出などの多くのアプリケーションで重要な役割を果たしています。本論文では、ここでSTSを測定するために使用されている特殊な種類のニューラルネットワークであるSiamese Recurrent Architectureを評価する。アーキテクチャのいくつかの変形は、既存の方法と比較される。', 'zh': '计语义文本相似性(STS)自然语言治之大者也,问答、文档摘要、信息检索、信息提取之用也。 本文评估暹罗递归架构,此殊类之神经网络,于此以测STS。 将体系结构数种变体与现有法较之', 'hi': 'सिमेंटिक टेक्स्ट समानता (एसटीएस) की गणना करना प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में एक महत्वपूर्ण अनुसंधान क्षेत्र है जो कई अनुप्रयोगों जैसे प्रश्न उत्तर, दस्तावेज़ सारांश, सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति और जानकारी निष्कर्षण में महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाता है। यह पेपर सियामी आवर्तक आर्किटेक्चर का मूल्यांकन करता है, जो एक विशेष प्रकार का तंत्रिका नेटवर्क है, जिसका उपयोग यहां एसटीएस को मापने के लिए किया जाता है। आर्किटेक्चर के कई रूपों की तुलना मौजूदा तरीकों से की जाती है', 'ru': 'Вычисление семантического текстового сходства (STS) является важной областью исследований в обработке естественного языка, которая играет значительную роль во многих приложениях, таких как ответы на вопросы, обобщение документов, поиск информации и извлечение информации. В данной работе оцениваются сиамские рекуррентные архитектуры, особый тип нейронных сетей, которые используются здесь для измерения STS. Несколько вариантов архитектуры сравниваются с существующими методами', 'ga': 'Is réimse tábhachtach taighde i bpróiseáil nádúrtha teanga é Cosúlacht Shéimeantach Téacs a Ríomh (STS) a imríonn ról suntasach in go leor feidhmeanna mar fhreagairt ceisteanna, achoimriú doiciméad, aisghabháil faisnéise agus eastóscadh faisnéise. Déanann an páipéar seo meastóireacht ar ailtireachtaí athfhillteacha Siamese, cineál speisialta líonraí néaracha, a úsáidtear anseo chun STS a thomhas. Cuirtear roinnt leaganacha den ailtireacht i gcomparáid leis na modhanna atá ann cheana féin', 'el': 'Ο υπολογισμός της Σημματικής Ομοιότητας Κειμένων (ΣΤ) είναι ένας σημαντικός ερευνητικός τομέας στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας που διαδραματίζει σημαντικό ρόλο σε πολλές εφαρμογές όπως η απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις, η σύνοψη εγγράφων, η ανάκτηση πληροφοριών και η εξαγωγή πληροφοριών. Η παρούσα εργασία αξιολογεί σιαμικές επαναλαμβανόμενες αρχιτεκτονικές, έναν ειδικό τύπο νευρωνικών δικτύων, τα οποία χρησιμοποιούνται εδώ για τη μέτρηση STS. Πολλές παραλλαγές της αρχιτεκτονικής συγκρίνονται με τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους', 'hu': 'A szemantikus szöveghasonlóság (STS) kiszámítása fontos kutatási terület a természetes nyelv feldolgozásában, amely jelentős szerepet játszik számos alkalmazásban, mint például a kérdések megválaszolása, a dokumentumok összefoglalása, az információk lekeresése és az információk kinyerése. A tanulmány értékeli a sziámi visszatérő architektúrákat, egy speciális típusú neurális hálózatokat, amelyeket itt az STS mérésére használnak. Az architektúra több változatát hasonlítjuk össze a meglévő módszerekkel', 'ka': 'Semantic Textual Similarity (STS) წარმოადგენა მნიშვნელოვანი პარამეტრების პროცექციაში, რომელიც მნიშვნელოვანი პროლექციაში მნიშვნელოვანი პროლექცია, როგორც კითხვა, დოკუმენტის კუმენტირება, ინფ ეს დოკუმენტი გაუმუშაობს სიამის რეკურენტი აქტიქტიქტურები, სპეციალური ნეიროლური ქსელების ტიპი, რომლებიც აქ გამოყენება STS-ის განზომილებ არქტიქტურის რამდენიმე განრამეტრები არქტიქტურის შემდგომარებულია', 'it': "Il calcolo della somiglianza testuale semantica (STS) è un'importante area di ricerca nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale che svolge un ruolo significativo in molte applicazioni come la risposta alle domande, la sintesi dei documenti, il recupero di informazioni e l'estrazione di informazioni. Questo articolo valuta le architetture siamese ricorrenti, un tipo speciale di reti neurali, che qui vengono utilizzate per misurare le STS. Diverse varianti dell'architettura sono confrontate con i metodi esistenti", 'kk': 'Semantic Textual Similarity (STS) дегенді есептеу - табиғи тілдер процессінде маңызды зерттеу аумағы. Бұл көптеген қолданбаларда, мысалы, сұрақ жауап беру, құжат тұжырымдамасы, мәліметті алу және мәліметті Бұл қағаз сиамлық қайталанатын архитектураларды, мұнда STS өлшемі үшін қолданылатын неврал желінің арнайы түрін бағалады. Архитектердің бірнеше варианты бар әдістерімен салыстырылады', 'lt': 'Semantinio teksto panašumo (STS) apskaičiavimas yra svarbi gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo mokslinių tyrimų sritis, kuri atlieka svarbų vaidmenį daugelyje paraiškų, pavyzdžiui, atsakymas į klausimus, dokumentų santrauka, informacijos gavimas ir informacijos gavimas. Šiame dokumente vertinamos Siamo pasikartojančios architektūros, specialios rūšies nervų tinklai, kurie naudojami STS matavimui. Keli architektūros variantai palyginami su esamais metodais.', 'mk': 'Калкулацијата на семантичката текстуална сличност (STS) е важна област на истражување во природното обработување јазик, која игра значителна улога во многу апликации како што се одговорите на прашањата, резултатите на документите, преземањето информации и извлекувањето информации. Оваа хартија ја оценува сијамската рецидентна архитектура, специјален тип на нервни мрежи, кои се користат тука за мерење на STS. Неколку варијанти на архитектурата се споредуваат со постојните методи', 'ms': 'Mengirakan Persamaan Teks Semantik (STS) adalah kawasan kajian penting dalam pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi yang bermain peran yang signifikan dalam banyak aplikasi seperti menjawab soalan, ringkasan dokumen, pemulihan maklumat dan ekstraksi maklumat. This paper evaluates Siamese recurrent architectures, a special type of neural networks, which are used here to measure STS.  Several variants of the architecture are compared with existing methods', 'mt': 'Calculating the Semantic Textual Similarity (STS) is an important research area in natural language processing which plays a significant role in many applications such as question answering, document summarisation, information retrieval and information extraction.  Dan id-dokument jevalwa arkitetturi rikorrenti Siami, tip speċjali ta’ netwerks newrali, li jintużaw hawnhekk biex jitkejjel STS. Diversi varjanti tal-arkitettura jitqabblu mal-metodi eżistenti', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് ടെക്സ്റ്റല്\u200d സാമാന്ത്രികമായ പദ്ധതിയുടെ (STS) കണക്കാക്കുന്നത് സ്വാഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷയില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പരിശോധന സ്ഥലമാണ്. അത ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സീയാമീസ് ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറുകള്\u200d, ഒരു പ്രത്യേക തരം നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികളോടൊപ്പം ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കുന്ന പല മാറികള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Semantic Textual Similarity (STS) тооцоолох нь байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн чухал судалгааны талбай юм. Энэ нь олон програмын асуулт хариулт, баримт цуглуулалт, мэдээлэл авах болон мэдээлэл гаргах маш чухал үүрэг юм. Энэ цаас нь Сиамийн дахин давтагдах архитектуруудыг үнэлдэг. Энэ нь STS-г хэмжихэд хэрэглэгддэг мэдрэлийн сүлжээний төрлийн төрлийн төрлийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээг. Архитектикийн олон төрлийн өөрчлөлт нь', 'pl': 'Obliczanie podobieństwa tekstowego (STS) jest ważnym obszarem badawczym w zakresie przetwarzania języka naturalnego, który odgrywa istotną rolę w wielu zastosowaniach, takich jak odpowiedź na pytania, podsumowanie dokumentów, pozyskiwanie informacji i ekstrakcja informacji. W artykule dokonano oceny syjamskich architektur rekrutujących, specjalnego typu sieci neuronowych, które są wykorzystywane do pomiaru STS. Porównano kilka wariantów architektury z istniejącymi metodami', 'no': 'Utrekna av semiantiske tekstliknande (STS) er eit viktig forskningsområde i naturspråk- handsaming som speler ein signifikant rolle i mange program som svarar på spørsmål, dokumentsamansering, informasjonshenting og utpakking av informasjon. Denne papiret evaluerer Siamesiske gjentakelige arkitektur, eit spesiell type neuralnettverk som vert brukt her for å måle STS. Fleire variantar av arkitekturen er samanlikna med eksisterande metodar', 'ro': 'Calculul Similarității Textuale Semantice (STS) este un domeniu important de cercetare în procesarea limbajului natural, care joacă un rol semnificativ în multe aplicații, cum ar fi răspunsul la întrebări, rezumarea documentelor, recuperarea informațiilor și extragerea informațiilor. Această lucrare evaluează arhitecturile siameze recurente, un tip special de rețele neurale, care sunt folosite aici pentru a măsura STS. Mai multe variante ale arhitecturii sunt comparate cu metodele existente', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් පාළුවන් සමීලතාවය (STS) විශ්වාස කරන්නේ ස්වභාවික භාෂා පරීක්ෂණයේ වැදගත් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරදේශයක් තියෙනවා වගේ වැදගත් භා Name ස්ථාපනයේ වෙනස් කිහිපයක් තියෙන්නේ තියෙන්න තියෙන විදියට', 'sv': 'Beräkning av Semantic Textual Similarity (STS) är ett viktigt forskningsområde inom naturspråksbehandling som spelar en viktig roll i många tillämpningar såsom frågesvar, dokumentsammanfattning, informationssökning och informationsutvinning. Denna uppsats utvärderar siamesiska återkommande arkitekturer, en speciell typ av neurala nätverk, som används här för att mäta STS. Flera varianter av arkitekturen jämförs med befintliga metoder', 'so': "Xisaabta qoraalka si isku mid ah (STS) waa meel muhiim ah oo lagu baaraandegayo baaritaanka afka dabiicadda ah, kaas oo ka qayb gala qayb muhiim ah codsiyada badan, sida jawaabta su'aalaha, summarinta wargeyska, helitaanka macluumaadka iyo soo saaridda macluumaadka. Kanu wuxuu qiimeynayaa dhismaha soo socda ee Siamese, noocyo gaar ah oo ah shabakado neurada, kaas oo halkan loo isticmaalaa si ay u qiyaasaan STS. Isku barbaro qalabka dhismaha qaarkood", 'sr': 'Proračunati semantičku tekstualnu sličnost (STS) je važno istraživanje područje u procesu prirodnog jezika koja ima značajnu ulogu u mnogim aplikacijama poput odgovora na pitanja, sažetka dokumenta, prikupljanja informacija i izvlačenja informacija. Ovaj papir procjenjuje Siamejske rekonstrukcije arhitekture, posebnu vrstu neuralnih mreža, koje se koriste ovde za mjerenje STS-a. Nekoliko varianta arhitekture se uspoređuje sa postojećim metodama', 'ta': 'Semantic Textual Similarity (STS) கணக்கிடும் இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்படுத்தலில் ஒரு முக்கியமான ஆராய்ச்சி பகுதியாகும். இது கேள்வி பதில், ஆவண சுருக்குதல், தகவல் பெறுதல் மற்றும்  இந்த தாள் அளவு மீண்டும் திரும்ப திரும்ப அமைப்புகளை மதிப்பிடுகிறது, ஒரு சிறப்பு வகை புதிய பிணைய வலைப்பின்னல்கள், STS அளவு  கட்டப்பணியின் பல மாறிகள் இருக்கும் முறைகளுடன் ஒப்பிடும்', 'ur': 'Semantic Textual Similarity (STS) کا شمار کرنا ایک اہم تحقیقات منطقه ہے طبیعی زبان پردازش میں جو بہت سی کاربریوں میں ایک اہم رول لگا رہا ہے جیسے سوال جواب، سند جمع کرنا، معلومات حاصل کرنا اور معلومات اضافہ کرنا۔ This paper evaluates Siamese recurrent architectures, a special type of neural networks, which are used here to measure STS. معماری کے بہت سے متفاوت موجود طریقے سے مقایسہ کیے جاتے ہیں', 'uz': 'Name Bu qogʻoz orqaga qaytadan oʻtish arxivlarga qiymat qiladi. Bu yerda STS ўлчашга фойдаланадиган махсус тарзда фойдаланилган. Name', 'vi': 'Tính toán tỷ lệ Văn bản Trung Bình (STS) là một khu vực nghiên cứu quan trọng trong việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, đóng vai trò quan trọng trong nhiều ứng dụng như câu hỏi đáp trả, tóm tắt tài liệu, thu thập thông tin và khai thác thông tin. Bài này đánh giá kiến trúc tái tạo của Siamese, một loại mạng thần kinh đặc biệt, được dùng ở đây để đo STS. Nhiều biến thể của kiến trúc được so sánh với các phương pháp tồn tại', 'bg': 'Изчисляването на семантичната текстова сходство е важна изследователска област в обработката на естествения език, която играе важна роля в много приложения като отговор на въпроси, обобщаване на документи, извличане на информация и извличане на информация. Тази статия оценява сиамските повтарящи се архитектури, специален вид невронни мрежи, които се използват тук за измерване на STS. Няколко варианта на архитектурата са сравнени със съществуващите методи', 'da': 'Beregning af Semantic Textual Similarity (STS) er et vigtigt forskningsområde inden for naturlig sprogbehandling, som spiller en væsentlig rolle i mange applikationer såsom spørgsmål besvarelse, dokumentopsummering, informationssøgning og informationsudvinding. Denne artikel evaluerer siamesiske tilbagevendende arkitekturer, en særlig type neurale netværk, som bruges her til at måle STS. Flere varianter af arkitekturen sammenlignes med eksisterende metoder', 'nl': 'Het berekenen van de Semantic Textual Similarity (STS) is een belangrijk onderzoeksgebied in de verwerking van natuurlijke taal dat een belangrijke rol speelt in veel toepassingen zoals vragen beantwoorden, document samenvatting, informatie ophalen en informatie extractie. Deze paper evalueert Siamese recidivierende architecturen, een speciaal type neurale netwerken, die hier worden gebruikt om STS te meten. Verschillende varianten van de architectuur worden vergeleken met bestaande methoden', 'hr': 'Proračunati semantičku sličnost teksta (STS) je važno istraživanje područja prirodnog jezika koji ima značajnu ulogu u mnogim aplikacijama poput odgovora na pitanja, sažetka dokumenta, prikupljanja informacija i izvlačenja informacija. Ovaj papir procjenjuje Siamese rekonstruirane arhitekture, posebnu vrstu neuralnih mreža, koje se ovdje koriste za mjerenje STS-a. Nekoliko varianta arhitekture se uspoređuje s postojećim metodama', 'de': 'Die Berechnung der semantischen Textgleichheit (STS) ist ein wichtiges Forschungsgebiet in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache, das in vielen Anwendungen wie Fragestellung, Dokumentenverfassung, Informationsgewinnung und Informationsextraktion eine bedeutende Rolle spielt. In diesem Beitrag werden siamesische rezidivierende Architekturen, eine spezielle Art neuronaler Netze, evaluiert, die hier zur Messung von STS verwendet werden. Mehrere Varianten der Architektur werden mit bestehenden Methoden verglichen', 'id': 'Mengkalkulasi Similaritas Teks Semantik (STS) adalah daerah penelitian penting dalam proses bahasa alam yang bermain peran yang signifikan dalam banyak aplikasi seperti menjawab pertanyaan, ringkasan dokumen, penerimaan informasi dan ekstraksi informasi. This paper evaluates Siamese recurrent architectures, a special type of neural networks, which are used here to measure STS.  Beberapa varian arsitektur dibandingkan dengan metode yang ada', 'ko': '의미 텍스트 싱크로율(STS) 계산은 자연 언어 처리에서 중요한 연구 분야로 문답, 문서 요약, 정보 검색과 정보 추출 등 응용에서 중요한 역할을 발휘한다.본고는 STS를 측정하는 데 사용되는 샴로의 귀속 구조, 특수한 유형의 신경 네트워크를 평가했다.이 체계 구조의 몇 가지 변체는 기존 방법과 비교하였다', 'fa': 'محاسبه شبیه\u200cسازی Textual Semantic (STS) یک منطقه تحقیقات مهم در پرداخت زبان طبیعی است که نقش مهم در بسیاری از کاربردهای مانند جواب سوال، جمع کردن سند، گیر دادن اطلاعات و اخراج اطلاعات را اجرا می\u200cکند. این کاغذ معماری\u200cهای دوباره سیامی را ارزیابی می\u200cکند، یک نوع ویژه شبکه\u200cهای عصبی که برای اندازه\u200cگیری STS در اینجا استفاده می\u200cشوند. چندتا متفاوت معماری با روش\u200cهای موجود مقایسه می\u200cشوند', 'sw': 'Kuhesabu Ukweli wa Teknolojia (STS) ni eneo muhimu la utafiti katika utafiti wa lugha za asili ambalo linacheza jukumu kubwa katika matumizi mengi kama vile majibu ya maswali, muhtasari wa nyaraka, kupata taarifa na utoaji wa habari. Gazeti hili linatathmini majengo yanayoendelea kwa Siamese, aina maalum ya mitandao ya neura, ambayo hutumiwa hapa ili kupima STS. Mabadiliko kadhaa ya ujenzi yanalinganishwa na njia zilizopo', 'tr': 'Semantik metin ýakynlaşdyrylygy (STS) dogal dil işlemlerinde möhüm araştyrma alandyr. Köp uygulamalar ýaly sorag jogaplama, sened terjimesini, maglumat alma we maglumat harplamak üçin möhüm roli oýnaýar. Bu kagyz seýrekli arhitektarlaryny deňleýär. Bu ýerde STS ölçüsi üçin ullanýar. Arhitekturyň birnäçe sany bar yöntemleri bilen gurlaşýar', 'af': "Bereken die Semantiese Tekstuele Ligging (STS) is 'n belangrik ondersoek area in natuurlike taal verwerking wat speel 'n betekende rol in baie programme soos vraag antwoord, dokument opsomming, inligting ontvang en inligting uittrek. Hierdie papier evalueer Siamese herhaalde arkitektuure, 'n spesiaal tipe neuralnetwerke, wat hier gebruik word om STS te maak. Verskeie variante van die arkitektuur word vergelyk met bestaande metodes", 'sq': 'Kalkullimi i ngjashmërisë Semantike Tekstuale (STS) është një fushë e rëndësishme kërkimi në procesimin natyror të gjuhës që luan një rol të rëndësishëm në shumë aplikacione të tilla si përgjigja e pyetjeve, përmbledhja e dokumenteve, marrja e informacionit dhe nxjerrja e informacionit. Ky dokument vlerëson arkitekturat e përsëritura Siamese, një lloj të veçantë rrjetesh nervore, që përdoren këtu për të matur STS. Disa variante të arkitekturës krahasohen me metodat ekzistuese', 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ տեքստոլային նմանությունը (ՍՏՍ) հաշվարկելը շատ ծրագրերում կարևոր ուսումնասիրության ոլորտ է բնական լեզվի վերամշակում, որը կարևոր դեր է խաղում, ինչպիսիք են հարցերի պատասխանը, փաստաթղթերի համառոտագրությունը, տեղեկատվության վերացումը և տեղեկատվ This paper evaluates Siamese recurrent architectures, a special type of neural networks, which are used here to measure STS.  ճարտարապետության մի քանի տարբերակներ համեմատում են գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդների հետ,', 'az': 'Semantik Textual Similarity (STS) hesablaması təbiətli dil işləməsində möhkəm bir araştırma alandır. Bu, bir çox proqramlarda sual cavab vermək, dökümə toplama, məlumat alınması və məlumat çıxartması kimi möhkəm rol oynayır. Bu kağıt Siamlı tekrarlı arhitektarları, STS ölçmək üçün istifadə edilən nürol a ğlarının xüsusi türünü değerləşdirir. Arhitektura bəzi dəyişiklik mövcud yollarla salınır', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ গবেষণা এলাকা হিসেবে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ যা অনেক অ্যাপ্লিকেশনে প্রশ্নের উত্তর, নথিবদের সংক্ষেপ, তথ্য পুনরা এই পত্রিকাটি সিয়ামের পুনরায় প্রতিষ্ঠান, একটি বিশেষ ধরনের নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মূল্যায়ন করে, যা STS মাপের জন্য এখানে ব্যবহৃত। আর্কিটেক্টারের বেশ কয়েকটি ভেরিয়েন্ট বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতির সাথে তুলনা করা হয়েছে', 'bs': 'Proračunati semantičku sličnost teksta (STS) je važna istraživačka područja u procesu prirodnog jezika koja ima značajnu ulogu u mnogim aplikacijama poput odgovora na pitanja, sažetka dokumenta, prikupljanja informacija i izvlačenja informacija. Ovaj papir procjenjuje Siamejske rekonstrukcije arhitekture, posebnu vrstu neuralnih mreža, koje se koriste ovdje za mjerenje STS-a. Nekoliko varianta arhitekture se uspoređuje sa postojećim metodama', 'ca': "Calcular la Similaritat Textual Semàtica (STS) és una àrea de recerca important en el processament natural de llenguatges que desempenya un paper important en moltes aplicacions, com la resposta a preguntes, el resum de documentos, la recuperació d'informació i l'extracció d'informació. Aquest article evalua arquitectures siames recurrents, un tipus especial de xarxes neurals, que s'utilitzen aquí per mesurar STS. Diverses variants de l'arquitectura es comparen amb els mètodes existents", 'cs': 'Výpočet sémantické textové podobnosti (STS) je důležitou oblastí výzkumu v oblasti zpracování přirozeného jazyka, která hraje významnou roli v mnoha aplikacích, jako je odpověď na otázky, shrnutí dokumentů, vyhledávání informací a extrakce informací. Tento článek hodnotí siamské rekurentní architektury, speciální typ neuronových sítí, které se zde používají k měření STS. Několik variant architektury je porovnáno se stávajícími metodami', 'fi': 'Semanttisen tekstin samankaltaisuuden (STS) laskeminen on tärkeä luonnonkielen käsittelyn tutkimusalue, jolla on merkittävä rooli monissa sovelluksissa, kuten kysymyksissä vastaamisessa, asiakirjojen yhteenvedossa, tiedonhaussa ja tiedonhankinnassa. Tässä työssä arvioidaan siamilaisia toistuvia arkkitehtuureja, erityisiä neuroverkkoja, joita käytetään tässä STS:n mittaamiseen. Useita arkkitehtuurin muunnelmia verrataan olemassa oleviin menetelmiin', 'et': 'Semantilise tekstisarnasuse (STS) arvutamine on looduskeele töötlemise oluline uurimisvaldkond, millel on oluline roll paljudes rakendustes, nagu küsimustele vastamine, dokumentide kokkuvõte, teabe hankimine ja teabe väljavõtmine. Käesolevas töös hinnatakse siiami korduvaid arhitektuure, spetsiaalset tüüpi närvivõrke, mida siin kasutatakse STS mõõtmiseks. Mitmeid arhitektuuri variante võrreldakse olemasolevate meetoditega', 'am': 'የስሜናቲክ ጽሑፍ ብጤት (STS) በተፈጥሮ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል የተጠቃሚ ትምህርት ቦታ ነው፤ እንደጠያቂው መልስ፣ የሰነድ ማቀናቀል፣ መረጃ ማቅረብ እና መረጃ ምርጫዎች በብዙ ፕሮግራሞች ውስጥ ያስተካክላል፡፡ ይህ የሕትመት ግንኙነት የሲሜሲ መደጋገሚያ የአካባቢ ምርጫዎች፣ የተለየ የናቡር መረብ፣ በዚህ STS ለመለካት ይጠቅማል፡፡ የመዝገብ ቤት ውስጥ የተለየ', 'sk': 'Izračun semantične besedilne podobnosti (STS) je pomembno raziskovalno področje obdelave naravnega jezika, ki igra pomembno vlogo v številnih aplikacijah, kot so odgovor na vprašanja, povzetek dokumentov, pridobivanje informacij in pridobivanje informacij. V prispevku so ocenjene siamske ponavljajoče se arhitekture, posebne vrste nevronskih omrežij, ki se tu uporabljajo za merjenje STS. Primerjamo več različic arhitekture z obstoječimi metodami', 'ha': 'Ana hisãbi da Textural Similarity na Semantic (S) yana da wani wurin na muhimu a cikin shirin jarraba harshe na natura wanda yana play wani roli mai girma a cikin wasu shiryoyin ayuka, kamar jibin masu tambaya, ƙararin takardar, motsari da masu sani. This paper evaluates Siamese recurrent architectures, a special type of neural networks, which are used here to measure STS.  Babu variant na matsayin an sami da metoden da ke da', 'jv': 'Ukuran semanti Tekst Simularity (URL) iki sak bantuan kanggo ngilangno langgambar obah-obahan sing dumateng input dumadhi karo aplikasi sing wis an a sing nggantgantgantgantiné karo pakek, sumulasi dokumen, ndheke informasi n\'al gambar kelas informasi Laptop" and "Desktop string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'he': 'החישוב של דמיון טקסטול סמנטי (STS - Semantic Textual Similarity) הוא אזור מחקר חשוב בעבודת שפת טבעית שמשחק תפקיד משמעותי בהרבה היישומים כמו תשובת שאלות, סכם מסמכים, השיג מידע וחילוץ מידע. הנייר הזה מעריך ארכיטקטורות סיאמיות חוזרות, סוג מיוחד של רשתות עצביות, אשר משתמשים כאן כדי למדוד STS. מספר שינויים של הארכיטקטורה שווים לשיטות קיימות', 'bo': 'རྩི་མོལ་ནུས་ཡི་གེ་དང་མཉམ་འབྲེལ་ས། ཤོག སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་བཟོ་བཀོད་ཡུལ་གྱི་འགྱུར་ཁ་ཤས་གཅིག་གནས་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་མཉམ་བཟོ་བ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Self-Attentional Models Application in Task-Oriented Dialogue Generation Systems', 'pt': 'Aplicação de Modelos Autoatencionais em Sistemas de Geração de Diálogos Orientados a Tarefas', 'ar': 'تطبيق نماذج الاهتمام الذاتي في أنظمة توليد الحوار الموجه نحو المهام', 'fr': "Application de modèles d'auto-attention dans les systèmes de génération de dialogue orientés tâches", 'es': 'Aplicación de modelos de autoatención en sistemas de generación de diálogos orientados a tareas', 'ja': 'タスク指向のダイアログ生成システムにおける自己応答モデルの応用', 'zh': '自己关注模样在对面的对话', 'ru': 'Применение моделей самовосприятия в системах генерации диалога, ориентированных на решение конкретных задач', 'hi': 'कार्य उन्मुख संवाद पीढ़ी प्रणालियों में स्व-चौकस मॉडल अनुप्रयोग', 'ga': 'Feidhmiú Múnlaí Féin-Aireach i gCórais Ghiniúint Idirphlé Tasc-Dírithe', 'ka': 'თავისუფალური მოდელების პროგრამი დავალების დასაწყებელი დიალოგის შექმნა სისტემებში', 'el': 'Εφαρμογή αυτοπροσοχής μοντέλων σε συστήματα δημιουργίας διαλόγων προσανατολισμένων στην εργασία', 'hu': 'Az önfigyelmes modellek alkalmazása feladatorientált párbeszédgeneráló rendszerekben', 'it': 'Applicazione di modelli auto-attenti nei sistemi di generazione di dialoghi orientati alle attività', 'lt': 'Savarankiško dėmesio modelių taikymas į užduotis orientuotose dialogo generavimo sistemose', 'mk': 'Апликација на модели за самовнимание во системите за генерање дијалог ориентирани на задачите', 'kk': 'Тапсырма- бағытталған диалогты құру жүйелерінде өзінің қатынасыз үлгілер қолданбасы', 'mt': 'Applikazzjoni ta’ mudelli ta’ awtonomija f’Sistemi ta’ Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Djalogu orjentati lejn ix-Xogħol', 'ms': 'Aplikasi Model Perhatian-Sendiri dalam Sistem Jenerasi Dialog Berorientasi-Tugas', 'mn': 'Өөрийгөө сонирхолтой загваруудын загваруудын хэрэглээ', 'ml': 'ജോലിയുടെ സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രയോഗം', 'no': 'Programet for selvgjennomsiktige modeller i oppgåveorienterte dialogopprettingssystemer', 'pl': 'Zastosowanie modeli własnej uwagi w systemach generowania dialogów zorientowanych na zadania', 'ro': 'Aplicarea modelelor auto-atenționale în sistemele de generare a dialogurilor orientate spre sarcini', 'sr': 'Aplikacija samoopazljivih modela u sistemima generacije dijaloga orijentiranih na zadatku', 'si': 'ස්වාම්ප්\u200dරේෂණික මොඩේල් වැඩසටහන් වැඩසටහන් සංවාදය නිර්මාණය පද්ධතියේ', 'so': 'Isticmaalka dalbashada dhaqanka shaqada', 'sv': 'Sj√§lvuppm√§rksamhetsmodeller Till√§mpning i uppgiftsorienterade dialoggenereringssystem', 'ta': 'பணியில் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட உரையாடல் உருவாக்கு அமைப்பு', 'ur': 'ٹاکس-Oriented диалог پیدائش سیسٹم میں خود-Attentional Models Application in Task-Oriented Dialog Generation Systems', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Đơn ứng dụng tự chuẩn trong Hệ thống phát ngôn ngữ hướng dẫn', 'bg': 'Приложение на модели за самонаблюдение в системи за генериране на диалог, ориентирани към задачите', 'nl': 'Zelfoplettende modellen Toepassing in taakgerichte dialooggeneratiesystemen', 'da': 'Selvopmærksomhedsmodeller Anvendelse i opgaveorienterede dialoggenereringssystemer', 'hr': 'Aplikacija samoopazljivih modela u sustavima generacije dijaloga orijentiranih na zadatku', 'de': 'Selbstachtende Modelle Anwendung in aufgabenorientierten Dialoggenerierungssystemen', 'ko': '자기주의 모델이 임무형 대화 생성 시스템에서의 응용', 'id': 'Aplikasi Model Perhatian Sendiri dalam Sistem Generasi Dialog Berorientasi Tugas', 'fa': 'کاربرد مدل\u200cهای خودتان توجه در سیستم\u200cهای تولید محاورۀ ایجاد کردن محاورۀ کارها', 'sw': 'Application for Models Self-Attention in Task-oriented Dialogue Systems Generation Dialogue', 'tr': 'Otomatik Saýlaw Modler Uyglamak', 'sq': 'Self-Attentional Models Application in Task-Oriented Dialogue Generation Systems', 'af': 'Self- aandaglike Model Aansoek in Opdrag- Oriënteerde Dialoog Generasie Sistems', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'কাজ- উল্লেখিত ডায়ালগ জেনারেশন সিস্টেমে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মনোযোগ মোডেল অ্যাপ্লিকেশন', 'bs': 'Aplikacija samouuzdanih modela u sistemima generacije dialoga orijentiranih na zadatku', 'ca': "Aplicació de models d'auto-atenció en sistemes de generació de diàleg orientat a les tasques", 'az': 'G칬nd톛ril톛n Dialoog Yenilm톛si Sisteml톛rind톛 칐z-칐z칲n칲n 칐z칲n칲n 칐z칲n칲n Modell톛ri Uygulamas캼', 'cs': 'Samoobslužné modely aplikace v systémech generování dialogů orientovaných na úkoly', 'et': 'Enesehoidlike mudelite rakendamine ülesannetele orienteeritud dialoogi loomise süsteemides', 'fi': 'Itsevarautuvien mallien soveltaminen tehtävälähtöisissä vuoropuhelun luomisjärjestelmissä', 'jv': 'Self-Attential model Application in task-Oriented Dialog Generation System', 'ha': 'Shirin Ayuka na Naƙasar Taurar da Aiki', 'sk': 'Uporaba samopostrežnih modelov v sistemih za ustvarjanje dialoga, usmerjenih v naloge', 'bo': 'Self-Attentional Models Application in Task-Oriented Dialog Generation Systems', 'he': 'שימוש מודלים שמים לב עצמי במערכות ליצירת דיאלוגים ממוקדות למשימות'}
{'en': 'Self-attentional models are a new paradigm for sequence modelling tasks which differ from common sequence modelling methods, such as recurrence-based and convolution-based sequence learning, in the way that their architecture is only based on the attention mechanism. Self-attentional models have been used in the creation of the state-of-the-art models in many NLP task such as neural machine translation, but their usage has not been explored for the task of training end-to-end task-oriented dialogue generation systems yet. In this study, we apply these models on the DSTC2 dataset for training task-oriented chatbots. Our finding shows that self-attentional models can be exploited to create end-to-end task-oriented chatbots which not only achieve higher evaluation scores compared to recurrence-based models, but also do so more efficiently.', 'ar': 'تعد النماذج ذاتية الانتباه نموذجًا جديدًا لمهام نمذجة التسلسل والتي تختلف عن طرق نمذجة التسلسل الشائعة ، مثل التعلم المتسلسل المستند إلى التكرار والقائم على الالتفاف ، بالطريقة التي تعتمد بها بنيتها على آلية الانتباه فقط. تم استخدام النماذج ذاتية الانتباه في إنشاء أحدث النماذج في العديد من مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية مثل الترجمة الآلية العصبية ، ولكن لم يتم استكشاف استخدامها لمهمة التدريب الشامل على المهام. نظم جيل الحوار حتى الان. في هذه الدراسة ، نطبق هذه النماذج على مجموعة بيانات DSTC2 لتدريب روبوتات المحادثة الموجهة نحو المهام. تُظهر النتائج التي توصلنا إليها أنه يمكن استغلال النماذج ذاتية الانتباه لإنشاء روبوتات محادثة موجهة نحو المهام من البداية إلى النهاية والتي لا تحقق فقط درجات تقييم أعلى مقارنة بالنماذج القائمة على التكرار ، ولكنها تحقق ذلك أيضًا بشكل أكثر كفاءة.', 'fr': "Les modèles auto-attentionnels constituent un nouveau paradigme pour les tâches de modélisation de séquences qui diffèrent des méthodes de modélisation de séquence courantes, telles que l'apprentissage de séquences basé sur la récurrence et la convolution, dans la mesure où leur architecture est uniquement basée sur le mécanisme d'attention. Des modèles d'auto-attention ont été utilisés dans la création de modèles de pointe dans de nombreuses tâches de PNL telles que la traduction automatique neuronale, mais leur utilisation n'a pas encore été explorée pour la tâche de formation de systèmes de génération de dialogue orientés vers les tâches de bout en bout. Dans cette étude, nous appliquons ces modèles au jeu de données DSTC2 pour la formation de chatbots orientés tâches. Notre résultat montre que les modèles d'auto-attention peuvent être exploités pour créer des chatbots de bout en bout orientés sur les tâches qui non seulement obtiennent des scores d'évaluation plus élevés que les modèles basés sur la récurrence, mais le font également plus efficacement.", 'pt': 'Modelos autoatencionais são um novo paradigma para tarefas de modelagem de sequência que diferem dos métodos comuns de modelagem de sequência, como aprendizado de sequência baseado em recorrência e baseado em convolução, na medida em que sua arquitetura é baseada apenas no mecanismo de atenção. Modelos autoatencionais têm sido usados na criação dos modelos de última geração em muitas tarefas de PNL, como tradução automática neural, mas seu uso não foi explorado para a tarefa de treinamento orientado a tarefas de ponta a ponta. sistemas de geração de diálogo ainda. Neste estudo, aplicamos esses modelos no conjunto de dados DSTC2 para treinar chatbots orientados a tarefas. Nossa descoberta mostra que modelos autoatencionais podem ser explorados para criar chatbots orientados a tarefas de ponta a ponta que não apenas alcançam pontuações de avaliação mais altas em comparação com modelos baseados em recorrência, mas também o fazem com mais eficiência.', 'es': 'Los modelos de autoatención son un nuevo paradigma para las tareas de modelado de secuencias que difieren de los métodos de modelado de secuencias comunes, como el aprendizaje de secuencias basado en la recurrencia y el aprendizaje de secuencias basado en la convolución, en la forma en que su arquitectura solo se basa en el mecanismo de atención. Los modelos de autoatención se han utilizado en la creación de modelos de vanguardia en muchas tareas de PNL, como la traducción automática neuronal, pero su uso aún no se ha explorado para la tarea de entrenar sistemas de generación de diálogo orientados a tareas de extremo a extremo. En este estudio, aplicamos estos modelos en el conjunto de datos DSTC2 para entrenar chatbots orientados a tareas. Nuestro hallazgo muestra que los modelos de autoatención pueden aprovecharse para crear chatbots orientados a tareas de principio a fin que no solo logren puntuaciones de evaluación más altas en comparación con los modelos basados en la recurrencia, sino que también lo hagan de manera más eficiente.', 'hi': 'स्व-ध्यान देने वाले मॉडल अनुक्रम मॉडलिंग कार्यों के लिए एक नया प्रतिमान हैं जो सामान्य अनुक्रम मॉडलिंग विधियों से भिन्न होते हैं, जैसे कि पुनरावृत्ति-आधारित और कनवल्शन-आधारित अनुक्रम सीखने, जिस तरह से उनकी वास्तुकला केवल ध्यान तंत्र पर आधारित है। तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद जैसे कई एनएलपी कार्यों में अत्याधुनिक मॉडल के निर्माण में आत्म-ध्यान देने वाले मॉडल का उपयोग किया गया है, लेकिन उनके उपयोग को अभी तक एंड-टू-एंड टास्क-ओरिएंटेड डायलॉग जनरेशन सिस्टम के प्रशिक्षण के कार्य के लिए नहीं खोजा गया है। इस अध्ययन में, हम इन मॉडलों को प्रशिक्षण कार्य-उन्मुख चैटबॉट्स के लिए DSTC2 डेटासेट पर लागू करते हैं। हमारी खोज से पता चलता है कि आत्म-ध्यान देने वाले मॉडल का उपयोग एंड-टू-एंड टास्क-ओरिएंटेड चैटबॉट्स बनाने के लिए किया जा सकता है जो न केवल पुनरावृत्ति-आधारित मॉडल की तुलना में उच्च मूल्यांकन स्कोर प्राप्त करते हैं, बल्कि अधिक कुशलता से भी करते हैं।', 'zh': '自注模者,序建模之新式,与常见之序建模法(如递归基于卷积)不同,盖其体系结构基于机制也。 凡NLP之务(如神经机器翻译)之中,自注模形已施于先进,而于训端到端向之对成系统者,未究其用。 于此论之,宜于DSTC2数集,以练向事之聊天机器人。 臣等所见,自注模形可以创端到端之聊天机器人,比之于重复之形,此机器人非徒可以得高估分数,又可以有效于此也。', 'ja': '自己注意モデルは、アーキテクチャが注意メカニズムにのみ基づいているように、再帰ベースおよび畳み込みベースのシーケンス学習などの一般的なシーケンスモデリング方法とは異なる、シーケンスモデリングタスクの新しいパラダイムである。自己着想モデルは、ニューラルマシン翻訳などの多くのNLPタスクで最先端モデルの作成に使用されてきたが、エンドツーエンドのタスク指向の対話生成システムをトレーニングするタスクでは、それらの使用はまだ検討されていない。この研究では、これらのモデルをDSTC 2データセットに適用して、タスク指向のチャットボットをトレーニングします。私たちの調査結果は、自己依存モデルを利用してエンドツーエンドのタスク指向チャットボットを作成することができることを示しています。これは、再発ベースのモデルと比較して高い評価スコアを達成するだけでなく、より効率的に達成することができます。', 'ru': 'Модели самовнимания представляют собой новую парадигму для задач моделирования последовательностей, которые отличаются от обычных методов моделирования последовательностей, таких как обучение последовательностей на основе повторения и свертки, тем, что их архитектура основана только на механизме внимания. Самовнимательные модели использовались при создании самых современных моделей во многих задачах NLP, таких как нейронный машинный перевод, но их использование еще не было исследовано для задачи обучения сквозных систем формирования диалога, ориентированных на решение задач. В этом исследовании мы применяем эти модели на наборе данных DSTC2 для обучения ориентированных на задачи чат-ботов. Наш вывод показывает, что модели самовнимания могут быть использованы для создания сквозных задач-ориентированных чат-ботов, которые не только достигают более высоких оценок по сравнению с моделями, основанными на повторениях, но и делают это более эффективно.', 'ga': 'Is paraidím nua iad samhlacha féin-aireach do thascanna samhaltaithe seichimh atá difriúil ó mhodhanna samhaltaithe seichimh choiteanna, amhail foghlaim seichimh atá bunaithe ar atarlú agus atá bunaithe ar conbhabhlóid, sa chaoi is nach bhfuil a n-ailtireacht bunaithe ach ar an meicníocht aird. Baineadh úsáid as samhlacha féin-aireach i gcruthú na múnlaí úrscothacha i go leor tascanna NLP cosúil le haistriúchán meaisín néarach, ach níor scrúdaíodh a n-úsáid chun oiliúint a chur ar thasc-dhírithe ó cheann go ceann. córais giniúna idirphlé fós. Sa staidéar seo, cuirimid na samhlacha seo i bhfeidhm ar thacar sonraí DSTC2 le haghaidh chatbots atá dírithe ar thascanna a thraenáil. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí gur féidir leas a bhaint as samhlacha féin-aireach chun chatbots ceann-go-deireadh atá dírithe ar thascanna a chruthú a ghnóthaíonn ní hamháin scóir mheastóireachta níos airde i gcomparáid le samhlacha atá bunaithe ar atarlú, ach a dhéanann amhlaidh ar bhealach níos éifeachtaí.', 'ka': 'თავისუფლებელი მოდელები არის ახალი პარადიგმი მოდელური მოდელური მოდელური მოდელური მოდელური მოდელური მოდელური მოდელური მეტისგან განსხვავებულია, როგორც განსხვავებული მოდელური მოდელური მეტისგან, როგორც განსხვავებული მოდელურ მსოფლიო მოდელები გამოყენებულია NLP მოდელების შექმნაში, როგორც ნეიროლური მაქსინის გაგრძელებაში, მაგრამ ისინი გამოყენება არ იყო განსხვავებული საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი დავალების დიალოგის შექმნარებ ამ კვლევაში, ჩვენ ამ მოდელების DSTC2 მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის განაკლებისთვის დავყენებთ. ჩვენი შემოძლება აჩვენებს, რომ საკუთარი მოდელები შეიძლება გამოყენება საკუთარი მოდელების შექმნა, რომლებიც არა მხოლოდ უფრო მეტი განსაზღვრებული მოდელების შესახებ, მაგრამ უფრო ეფექტიურად გამოყენება.', 'hu': 'Az önfigyelemmel kísérő modellek új paradigmát jelentenek a szekvencia modellezési feladatok számára, amelyek eltérnek a közös szekvencia modellezési módszerektől, mint például az ismétlődés alapú és a konvolúció alapú szekvencia tanulás, úgy, hogy architektúrájuk csak a figyelemmel kísérő mechanizmuson alapul. A legkorszerűbb modellek létrehozásához önfigyelemre méltó modelleket használtak számos NLP feladatban, például neurális gépi fordításban, de ezek használatát még nem vizsgálták fel végponttól végpontig feladatorientált párbeszédgeneráló rendszerek képzésére. Ebben a tanulmányban ezeket a modelleket a DSTC2 adatkészleten alkalmazzuk feladatorientált chatbotok képzésére. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy az önfigyelmes modellek kihasználhatók olyan end-to-end feladatorientált chatbotok létrehozására, amelyek nem csak magasabb értékelési pontszámokat érnek el a visszatérő alapú modellekhez képest, hanem hatékonyabban is teszik.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα αυτοπροσοχής αποτελούν ένα νέο παράδειγμα για τις εργασίες μοντελοποίησης ακολουθιών που διαφέρουν από τις κοινές μεθόδους μοντελοποίησης ακολουθιών, όπως η εκμάθηση ακολουθιών με βάση την επανάληψη και τη σύγχυση, με τον τρόπο που η αρχιτεκτονική τους βασίζεται μόνο στον μηχανισμό προσοχής. Τα μοντέλα αυτοπροσοχής έχουν χρησιμοποιηθεί για τη δημιουργία μοντέλων τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε πολλές εργασίες όπως η νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση, αλλά η χρήση τους δεν έχει διερευνηθεί για το έργο της εκπαίδευσης ολοκληρωμένων συστημάτων δημιουργίας διαλόγου προσανατολισμένων σε εργασίες. Σε αυτή τη μελέτη, εφαρμόζουμε αυτά τα μοντέλα στο σύνολο δεδομένων για την εκπαίδευση στοχευμένων chatbots. Τα ευρήματά μας δείχνουν ότι τα μοντέλα αυτοπροσοχής μπορούν να αξιοποιηθούν για να δημιουργήσουν ολοκληρωμένα προγράμματα που όχι μόνο επιτυγχάνουν υψηλότερες βαθμολογίες αξιολόγησης σε σύγκριση με μοντέλα που βασίζονται στην επανάληψη, αλλά και πιο αποτελεσματικά.', 'it': "I modelli di auto-attenzione sono un nuovo paradigma per i compiti di modellazione delle sequenze che differiscono dai metodi di modellazione delle sequenze comuni, come l'apprendimento delle sequenze basato su ricorrenza e convoluzione, nel modo in cui la loro architettura è basata solo sul meccanismo di attenzione. Modelli di auto-attenzione sono stati utilizzati nella creazione di modelli all'avanguardia in molti compiti NLP come la traduzione automatica neurale, ma il loro utilizzo non è stato ancora esplorato per il compito di formare sistemi di generazione di dialoghi end-to-end orientati all'attività. In questo studio, applichiamo questi modelli sul dataset DSTC2 per la formazione di chatbot orientati alle attività. Il nostro risultato mostra che i modelli di auto-attenzione possono essere sfruttati per creare chatbot end-to-end orientati alle attività che non solo raggiungono punteggi di valutazione più elevati rispetto ai modelli basati sulle ricorrenze, ma lo fanno anche in modo più efficiente.", 'mk': 'Самовнимателните модели се нов парадигм за задачите за моделирање на секвенции кои се разликуваат од заедничките методи за моделирање на секвенции, како што е учењето на секвенции базирано на повторување и на конволуција, на начин на кој нивната архитектура се базирана само на механизмот на внимание. Самовнимателни модели се употребени во создавањето на најновите модели во многу НЛП задачи како што е нервниот машински превод, но нивната употреба сé уште не е испитана за задачата на обука на системи за генерација на дијалог од крај до крај ориентирани на задачите. Во оваа студија, ги применуваме овие модели на податоците на ДСТЦ2 за обука на chatbots ориентирани на задачите. Нашите откритија покажуваат дека самовнимателните модели можат да се искористат за да се создадат конечно ориентирани шатботи кои не само постигнуваат повисоки оценки во споредба со моделите базирани на повторување, туку и поефикасно.', 'lt': 'Savarankiški modeliai yra naujas sekos modeliavimo užduočių paradigm as, kuris skiriasi nuo bendrų sekos modeliavimo metodų, pvz., pakartotinio ir konvoliucinio sekos mokymosi, taip, kad jų architektūra grindžiama tik dėmesio mechanizmu. Daugelyje NLP užduočių, pavyzdžiui, nervinių mašin ų vertimo, sukurti naujausius modelius buvo naudojami savarankiški modeliai, tačiau jų panaudojimas mokymo užduočių pabaigoje dialogo generavimo sistemoms dar neištirtas. In this study, we apply these models on the DSTC2 dataset for training task-oriented chatbots.  Mūsų išvados rodo, kad savarankiški modeliai gali būti naudojami siekiant sukurti užduotims orientuotus pokalbio botus, kurie ne tik siekia didesnių vertinimo rezultatų, palyginti su pasikartojimo modeliais, bet ir veiksmingiau.', 'kk': 'Өзіңіздің тәжірибелі үлгілері - олардың архитектурасы тек тәжірибелі механизміне негізделген түрде қайталану және қайталану негізделген реттерді оқыту үшін жаңа модель тапсырмалардың парадигмі. Өзіңіздік үлгілері NLP тапсырмасының көпшілігін құру үлгілерінде қолданылды, мысалы, невралдық компьютердің аударуы сияқты, бірақ олардың пайдалануы тапсырманың соңғы- соңғы тапсырманың диалог жасау жүйелері Бұл зерттеулерде, осы моделдерді DSTC2 деректер қорларына тапсырмаларды бағыттау үшін қолданамыз. Біздің табуымыз өзіміздің қайталану үлгілерімен қайталану үлгілеріне салыстырып, қайталану үлгілеріне салыстырып, қайталану үлгілеріне қайталану үлгілерін жасауға болады.', 'ms': 'Model perhatian-diri adalah paradigm a baru untuk tugas pengimedahan jujukan yang berbeza dari kaedah pengimedahan jujukan umum, seperti pembelajaran jujukan berdasarkan ulangan dan konvolusi, dengan cara arkitektur mereka hanya berdasarkan mekanisme perhatian. Model perhatian-diri telah digunakan untuk mencipta model-state-of-the-art dalam banyak tugas NLP seperti terjemahan mesin saraf, tetapi penggunaan mereka belum dijelajahi untuk tugas latihan sistem generasi dialog-arah tugas akhir-akhir lagi. Dalam kajian ini, kami melaksanakan model ini pada set data DSTC2 untuk latihan chatbot bertujuan tugas. Penemuan kami menunjukkan bahawa model perhatian-diri boleh dieksploitasi untuk mencipta chatbot-arah tugas akhir-akhir yang tidak hanya mencapai skor penilaian yang lebih tinggi dibandingkan dengan model berasaskan ulangan, tetapi juga melakukannya dengan lebih efisien.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d സെക്കന്റ് മോഡലിങ്ങ് ജോലികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പുതിയ പ്രദര്\u200dശനമാണ്. അത് സാധാരണ സെക്കന്റ് മോഡലിങ് രീതി സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെ പോലുള്ള പല ജോലിയിലുള്ള സ്റ്റേറ്റ്- ഓ- ആര്\u200dട്ട് മോഡലുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ട In this study, we apply these models on the DSTC2 dataset for training task-oriented chatbots.  നമ്മുടെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d അവസാനിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയുടെ അവസാനത്തേക്കുള്ള ചട്ട്ബോട്ടുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കു', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli li jagħtu attenzjoni lilhom infushom huma paradigm a ġdida għal kompiti ta’ mmudellar tas-sekwenzi li jvarjaw minn metodi komuni ta’ mmudellar tas-sekwenzi, bħal tagħlim tas-sekwenzi bbażat fuq ir-rikorrenza u bbażat fuq konvoluzzjoni, bil-mod li l-arkitettura tagħhom hija bbażata biss fuq il-mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni. Self-attentional models have been used in the creation of the state-of-the-art models in many NLP task such as neural machine translation, but their usage has not been explored for the task of training end-to-end task-oriented dialogue generation systems yet.  In this study, we apply these models on the DSTC2 dataset for training task-oriented chatbots.  Is-sejba tagħna turi li jistgħu jiġu sfruttati mudelli li jagħtu attenzjoni lilhom infushom biex jinħolqu chatbots orjentati lejn kompiti minn tarf għal tarf li mhux biss jiksbu punteġġi ta’ evalwazzjoni ogħla meta mqabbla ma’ mudelli bbażati fuq ir-rikorrenza, iżda jagħmlu dan ukoll b’mod aktar effiċjenti.', 'mn': 'Өөрсдийгөө анхаарлаа хандуулах загварууд нь дарааллын загварын загваруудын шинэ парадигм юм. Энэ нь ерөнхий дарааллын загварын загваруудын загваруудаас ялгаатай. Жишээ нь дахин дахин дахин суурилсан, дахин дахин дахин дахин суралцах загварууды Өөрийгөө сонирхолтой загварууд NLP даалгаврын төвшин загварын бүтээлд ашиглаж байгаа. Гэхдээ тэдний хэрэглээ ажлын төгсгөл-төгсгөл-төгсгөл диалог бүтээлч системийн даалгаврын даалгаврын тулд судалгаагүй. Энэ судалгаанд бид эдгээр загваруудыг DSTC2 өгөгдлийн санд дасгал хөдөлгөөн дасгал дээр ашиглаж байна. Бидний ололт нь өөрсдийгөө анхаарлын загвар дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин өндөр дүгнэлтийн оноо гаргаж чадахгүй, дахин дахин дахин суурилсан загвартай харьцуулахад ашиглаж болно.', 'pl': 'Modele samoobserwacyjne są nowym paradygmatem zadań modelowania sekwencji, które różnią się od powszechnych metod modelowania sekwencji, takich jak nauka sekwencji oparta na powtarzaniu i konwolucji, w taki sposób, w jaki ich architektura opiera się wyłącznie na mechanizmie uwagi. Modele samoobserwacyjne zostały wykorzystane do tworzenia najnowocześniejszych modeli w wielu zadaniach NLP, takich jak neuronowe tłumaczenie maszynowe, ale ich wykorzystanie nie zostało jeszcze zbadane do zadania szkolenia kompleksowych systemów generowania dialogów zorientowanych na zadania. W niniejszym opracowaniu stosujemy te modele na zbiorze danych DSTC2 dla szkolenia chatbotów zorientowanych na zadania. Nasze ustalenia pokazują, że modele samoobserwacyjne mogą być wykorzystane do tworzenia kompleksowych chatbotów zorientowanych na zadania, które nie tylko osiągają wyższe wyniki oceny w porównaniu z modelami opartymi na powtarzaniu, ale również robią to bardziej efektywnie.', 'no': 'Sjølvgjennomsiktige modeller er ein ny paradigm for sekvensmodellingsoppgåver som forskjeller frå felles sekvensmodellingsmetodar, som gjentakingsbasert og konvolusjonsbasert sekvenslæring, på måten den arkitekturen berre er basert på oppmerksmekanismen. Sjølvoppmerkingsmodular er brukte i opprettinga av kunstmodeller i mange NLP-oppgåver som neuralmaskinsomsetjing, men bruken av dei er ikkje utforska for oppgåva av opplæringssystemet for oppgåve som er orientert til slutt-til-slutt-oppgåve enno. I denne studien bruker vi desse modelane på DSTC2-datasettet for opplæring med oppgåveorientert samtaler. Finninga vårt viser at sjølvgjennomsiktige modeller kan brukast for å laga samtaler med oppgåve som er orientert til slutt til slutt, som ikkje bare oppnår høgare evalueringspoeng samanlikna med gjentakingsbaserte modeller, men gjer det også meir effektivt.', 'ro': 'Modelele auto-atenționale reprezintă o nouă paradigmă pentru sarcinile de modelare a secvențelor care diferă de metodele comune de modelare a secvențelor, cum ar fi învățarea secvențelor bazată pe recurență și convoluție, în felul în care arhitectura lor se bazează doar pe mecanismul de atenție. Modelele auto-atenționale au fost utilizate în crearea modelelor de ultimă oră în multe sarcini PNL, cum ar fi traducerea automată neurală, dar utilizarea lor nu a fost explorată încă pentru sarcina de formare a sistemelor end-to-end de generare a dialogurilor orientate spre sarcini. În acest studiu, aplicăm aceste modele pe setul de date DSTC2 pentru instruirea chatboților orientați spre sarcini. Rezultatele noastre arată că modelele auto-atenționale pot fi exploatate pentru a crea chatbots end-to-end orientate spre sarcini, care nu numai că obțin scoruri de evaluare mai mari în comparație cu modelele bazate pe recurență, ci și o fac mai eficient.', 'sr': 'Samoopazljivi modeli su novi paradigm za modeliranje sekvencija koji se razlikuju od metoda modeliranja zajedničkih sekvencija, kao što su učenje sekvencija na osnovu rekonstrukcije i konvolucije, na način na koji je njihova arhitektura zasnovana samo na pažnji mehanizmu. Samopouzdani modeli su korišteni u stvaranju modela stanja umjetnosti u mnogim zadacima NLP kao što je prevod neuralne mašine, ali njihova upotreba još nije istražena za zadatak treninga sistema generacije dijaloga na kraju do kraja. U ovom istraživanju, primjenjujemo te modele na setu podataka DSTC2 za trening otvorenih na zadatku. Naše nalaženje pokazuje da se samoopazljivi modeli mogu iskoristiti kako bi stvorili razgovor orijentirani na kraju zadataka koji ne samo postigli viši rezultati procjene u usporedbi s modelima na osnovu ponovnosti, nego i to učinkovitiji.', 'si': 'ස්වාම්ප්\u200dරමාණ විදියට අලුත් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණ විදියට අලුත් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වෙනුවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරමාණ විදියට වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණ ව ස්වාම්ප්\u200dරමාණික ප්\u200dරමාණය නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ NLP වැඩක් වගේ ස්ථිතියේ කාර්යාන්ත්\u200dරයක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, නමුත් ඔවුන්ගේ භාවිතාව ත මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි මේ මොඩේල්ස් එක DSTC2 දත්ත සූදානයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා. අපේ හොයාගන්න පෙන්වන්නේ ස්වයංගික අවධාන මොඩල් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් අවධාන කාර්යයෙන් අවධාන කාර්යයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, ඒ වගේම තව ප', 'sv': 'Sjﾃ､lvuppmﾃ､rksamhetsmodeller ﾃ､r ett nytt paradigm fﾃｶr sekvensmodelleringsuppgifter som skiljer sig frﾃ･n vanliga sekvensmodelleringsmetoder, sﾃ･som ﾃ･terkommande och konvulutionsbaserad sekvensinlﾃ､rning, pﾃ･ det sﾃ､ttet att deras arkitektur bara baseras pﾃ･ uppmﾃ､rksamhetsmekanismen. Sjﾃ､lvuppmﾃ､rksamhetsmodeller har anvﾃ､nts vid skapandet av toppmoderna modeller i mﾃ･nga NLP-uppgifter sﾃ･som neural maskinﾃｶversﾃ､ttning, men deras anvﾃ､ndning har ﾃ､nnu inte utforskats fﾃｶr uppgiften att utbilda end-to-end uppgiftsorienterade dialoggenereringssystem. I denna studie tillﾃ､mpar vi dessa modeller pﾃ･ DSTC2 datauppsﾃ､ttningen fﾃｶr trﾃ､ning av uppgiftsorienterade chatbots. Vﾃ･rt resultat visar att sjﾃ､lvuppmﾃ､rksamhetsmodeller kan utnyttjas fﾃｶr att skapa end-to-end uppgiftsorienterade chatbots som inte bara uppnﾃ･r hﾃｶgre utvﾃ､rderingspoﾃ､ng jﾃ､mfﾃｶrt med ﾃ･terkommande modeller, utan ocksﾃ･ gﾃｶr det mer effektivt.', 'so': 'Tusaaladaha iskaa taxadar u leh waa qaab cusub oo ku saabsan shaqooyinka sameynta xilliga, taasoo ka duwan qaababka tusaale ahaan barashada dib-u-socoshada iyo barashada dib-u-socoshada, sida dhismaha la dhigo oo kaliya ayaa lagu saleynayo meymisyada dhegta. Self-attentional models have been used in the creation of the state-of-the-art models in many NLP task such as neural machine translation, but their usage has not been explored for the task of training end-to-end task-oriented dialogue generation systems yet.  Waxbarashadan waxaynu ku codsanaynaa modelladan DSTC2-ka-bandhigyada shaqo-ku-jeeda. Helitaankeena wuxuu muujin karaa in loo isticmaali karo tilmaamaha iskuulka u jeeda shaqada dhammaadka ee ugu dambaysta, taasoo aan keliyahoo gaadhin qiimeynta sare oo la barbarbaranayo tusaalooyinka dib u soo noqoshada, laakiin sidoo kale si faa’iido leh u sameeya.', 'ta': 'தொடர்ச்சி மாதிரிகளுக்கு புதிய அளபுருவாகும். இது பொதுவான வரிசை மாதிரி முறைமைகளிலிருந்து வேறுபாடு இருக்கும், மீண்டும் அடிப்படையான தொடர்ச்சி கற்றல் போன்று, தொ புதிய கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு போன்ற பல NLP செயலில் நிலையான- கலை மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்கும் பாதுகாப்பு மாதிரிகள் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, ஆனால் அவர்களுடைய பயன்பாடு முடிவு முட இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் இந்த மாதிரிகளை DSTC2 தகவல் அமைப்பில் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் பணியின் திசையில் செலுத்தும எங்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்பு தெரியும் நிகழ்வு மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்க முடியும் முடிவு செயல் முடிவில் செல்லும் அரட்டாட்களை உருவாக்க பயன்படுத்தலாம் அது திரும்ப முற', 'ur': 'اپنی حفاظت کی مدلکوں کے لئے ایک نئی پارادیگ ہے کہ ان کے معمار صرف توجه کی مکانیزی پر متفاوت ہیں۔ اپنا اچھا موڈل NLP کی بہت سی کاموں میں استعمال کیا گیا ہے جیسے نیورل ماشین ترجمہ، لیکن ان کا استعمال آخر-تا-end task-oriented ڈیلوگو کی سیستموں کے لئے اپنا استعمال نہیں ہے. اس مطالعہ میں ہم ان موڈلوں کو DSTC2 ڈیٹ سٹ پر استعمال کرتے ہیں تابع کی اصلی باتبوٹ کے لئے. ہماری پیدا کی نشانیاں دکھاتی ہیں کہ اپنے آپ کو اپنا اچھا موڈل استعمال کر سکتے ہیں تاکہ آخر-to-end-end-task-oriented chatbots بنا سکتے ہیں جو صرف دوبارہ بار بار بار بار بار کے موڈل کے مقابلہ میں بلند ارزیابی اسکور کو پہنچ سکتے ہیں، بلکہ اس سے بھی زیادہ اثبات', 'uz': 'Name Name Bu taʼminotda, bu modellarni DSTC2 maʼlumotlar setiga qoʻllayapmiz, vazifa bilan taʼminlovchi chatbotlar uchun. Our finding shows that self-attentional models can be exploited to create end-to-end task-oriented chatbots which not only achieve higher evaluation scores compared to recurrence-based models, but also do so more efficiently.', 'vi': 'Bản mẫu chăm chú là một biểu tượng mới cho các công việc mô hình dãy khác nhau với các phương pháp mô hình dãy chung, như việc học chuỗi quy trình dựa vào sự tái tạo và kết nối, theo cách kiến trúc của chúng chỉ dựa trên cơ cấu chú ý. Tự chăm sóc bản thân đã được sử dụng trong việc tạo ra các mô hình hiện đại trong nhiều nhiệm vụ của đài sục sạo như dịch máy thần kinh, nhưng cách sử dụng của chúng chưa được khám phá ra để huấn luyện các hệ thống tạo ra các nhiệm vụ dựa trên các nhiệm vụ. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi áp dụng những mẫu này trên bộ dữ liệu DSTC2 để huấn luyện chat chuyên nghiệp. Theo kết luận của chúng tôi, các mô hình chăm sóc bản thân có thể được khai thác để tạo ra các khu vực tập sự kết thúc, mà không chỉ đạt được điểm đánh giá cao hơn so với các mô hình dựa trên tái diễn, mà còn làm vậy hiệu quả hơn.', 'bg': 'Моделите на самовниманието са нова парадигма за задачи за моделиране на последователност, които се различават от обичайните методи за моделиране на последователност, като например базирано на повторение и базирано на конволюция обучение на последователност, така че тяхната архитектура се основава само на механизма на вниманието. Моделите на самовниманието са използвани при създаването на най-съвременните модели в много задачи на НЛП като невронния машинен превод, но използването им все още не е проучено за задачата за обучение на системи за генериране на диалог от край до край. В това проучване ние прилагаме тези модели върху набора от данни за обучение на задачи ориентирани чатботи. Нашата констатация показва, че моделите на самовниманието могат да бъдат експлоатирани, за да се създадат от край до край ориентирани чатботи, които не само постигат по-високи оценки в сравнение с базираните на повторения модел модели, но и го правят по-ефективно.', 'nl': 'Self-attentional modellen zijn een nieuw paradigma voor sequentiemodeling taken die verschillen van gangbare sequentiemodeling methoden, zoals recidive-based en convolution based sequence learning, op de manier dat hun architectuur alleen is gebaseerd op het aandachtsmechanisme. Self-attentional modellen zijn gebruikt bij het maken van de state-of-the-art modellen in veel NLP-taken, zoals neurale machinevertaling, maar hun gebruik is nog niet onderzocht voor de taak van het trainen van end-to-end taakgerichte dialooggeneratiesystemen. In dit onderzoek passen we deze modellen toe op de DSTC2 dataset voor het trainen van taakgerichte chatbots. Onze bevinding toont aan dat zelfattentiemodellen gebruikt kunnen worden om end-to-end taakgerichte chatbots te creëren die niet alleen hogere evaluatiescores behalen in vergelijking met herhalingsmodellen, maar dat ook efficiënter doen.', 'hr': 'Samopouzdani modeli su novi paradigm za modeliranje sekvencija koji se razlikuju od metoda modeliranja zajedničkih sekvencija, kao što su učenje sekvencija na temelju rekonstrukcije i konvolucije, na način na koji je njihova arhitektura temeljena samo na mehanizmu pažnje. Samopouzdani modeli su korišteni u stvaranju modela stanja umjetnosti u mnogim zadacima NLP-a poput prevoda neuroloških strojeva, ali njihova uporaba još nije istražena za zadatak obrazovanja sustava generacije dijaloga usmjerenih na kraj do kraja zadataka. U ovom ispitivanju, primjenjujemo te modele na setu podataka DSTC2 za obuku otvorene na zadatku. Naše otkriće pokazuje da se samoopazljivi modeli mogu iskoristiti kako bi stvorili razgovor orijentirani na kraju zadatka koji ne samo postigli viši rezultati procjene u usporedbi s modelima na temelju ponovnosti, već i učinkovitiji.', 'da': 'Selvopmærksomhedsmodeller er et nyt paradigme for sekvensmodelleringsopgaver, der adskiller sig fra almindelige sekvensmodelleringsmetoder, såsom gentagelsesbaseret og konvulutionsbaseret sekvenslæring, på den måde, at deres arkitektur kun er baseret på opmærksomhedsmekanismen. Selvopmærksomhedsmodeller er blevet brugt i skabelsen af de state-of-the-art modeller i mange NLP-opgaver såsom neural maskinoversættelse, men deres brug er endnu ikke blevet undersøgt til opgaven med at træne end-to-end opgaveorienterede dialoggenereringssystemer. I denne undersøgelse anvender vi disse modeller på DSTC2 datasættet til træning af opgaveorienterede chatbots. Vores resultater viser, at selvopmærksomhedsmodeller kan udnyttes til at skabe end-to-end opgaveorienterede chatbots, der ikke kun opnår højere evalueringsscorer sammenlignet med gentagelsesbaserede modeller, men også gør det mere effektivt.', 'de': 'Selbstaufmerksamkeitsmodelle sind ein neues Paradigma für Sequenzmodellierungsaufgaben, die sich von gängigen Sequenzmodellierungsmethoden wie rezidiv- und convolutionsbasiertem Sequenzlernen insofern unterscheiden, als ihre Architektur nur auf dem Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus basiert. Selbstaufmerksamkeitsmodelle wurden bei der Erstellung der State-of-the-Art-Modelle in vielen NLP-Aufgaben wie der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung verwendet, aber ihre Verwendung wurde noch nicht für die Aufgabe untersucht, aufgabenorientierte Dialoggenerierungssysteme zu trainieren. In dieser Studie wenden wir diese Modelle auf den DSTC2 Datensatz für das Training aufgabenorientierter Chatbots an. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass Selbstaufmerksamkeitsmodelle genutzt werden können, um End-to-End aufgabenorientierte Chatbots zu erstellen, die im Vergleich zu wiederkehrenden Modellen nicht nur höhere Evaluationsscores erzielen, sondern dies auch effizienter tun.', 'id': 'Model perhatian diri adalah paradigm a baru untuk tugas modeling urutan yang berbeda dari metode modeling urutan umum, seperti pelajaran urutan berdasarkan ulangan dan konvolusi, dengan cara arsitektur mereka hanya berdasarkan mekanisme perhatian. Model perhatian-diri telah digunakan untuk menciptakan model-state-of-the-art dalam banyak tugas NLP seperti terjemahan mesin saraf, tetapi penggunaan mereka belum dieksplorasi untuk tugas latihan sistem generasi dialog orient tugas akhir-akhir belum. Dalam studi ini, kami menerapkan model-model ini pada set data DSTC2 untuk latihan chatbot orient tugas. Penemuan kami menunjukkan bahwa model perhatian diri dapat dieksploitasi untuk menciptakan chatbot berbaris tugas yang tidak hanya mencapai nilai evaluasi yang lebih tinggi dibandingkan dengan model berbasis ulangan, tetapi juga melakukannya dengan lebih efisien.', 'ko': '자기 주의 모델은 서열 모델링 임무의 새로운 모델로 흔히 볼 수 있는 서열 모델링 방법과 다르다. 예를 들어 중복과 권적을 바탕으로 하는 서열 학습을 바탕으로 하고 그 구조는 주의 메커니즘만 바탕으로 한다.많은 자연 언어 처리 임무(예를 들어 신경기계 번역)에서 자기주의 모델은 이미 가장 선진적인 모델을 만드는 데 사용되었지만 훈련단에서 단면으로 임무를 향한 대화 생성 시스템에서의 사용은 아직 탐색되지 않았다.본 연구에서 우리는 이 모델들을 DSTC2 데이터 집합에 응용하여 임무를 대상으로 하는 채팅 로봇을 훈련시킬 것이다.우리의 발견은 자기주의 모델을 이용하여 끝에서 끝까지 임무를 위한 채팅 로봇을 만들 수 있음을 나타낸다. 중복된 모델을 바탕으로 하는 채팅 로봇에 비해 이 채팅 로봇은 더욱 높은 평가 점수를 얻을 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 효율도 높다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'fa': 'مدل خودتان مواظب خودتان یک پارادیگ جدید برای مدل\u200cهای مدل\u200cسازی است که از طریق\u200cهای مدل\u200cسازی مدل\u200cسازی مشترک تفاوت می\u200cکنند، مثل یادگیری\u200cهای مدل\u200cسازی بر اساس دوباره\u200cسازی و تغییر\u200cسازی\u200cسازی بر اساس مدل\u200cسازی توجه است. مدلهای خودتان توجه کننده در ایجاد مدلهای هنری در بسیاری از کار NLP مثل ترجمه ماشین عصبی استفاده شده\u200cاند، ولی استفاده از آنها هنوز برای کار آموزش سیستم\u200cهای نسل\u200cهای صحبت\u200cکننده\u200cی کار به پایان و پایان تحقیق نشده\u200cاند. در این مطالعه، ما این مدل\u200cها را روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای DSTC2 برای تمرین صحبت\u200cهای مستقیم به کار می\u200cگیریم. پیدا کردن ما نشان می دهد که مدلهای خودتان را می توانند برای ایجاد صحبت\u200cهای مربوط به پایان و پایان به کار استفاده کنند که نه تنها امتیاز ارزیابی بالاتر را در مقایسه با مدلهای مربوط به بازگشت، بلکه همچنین کاری بیشتر انجام دهند.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa kujitegemea ni upya wa kazi za kutengeneza mifano inayotofautiana na mbinu za mifano ya kawaida, kama vile kujifunza kwa msingi wa mara kwa mara, na kwa jinsi ujenzi wao ni msingi tu wa mfumo wa ufuatiliaji. Mradi wa kujitegemea umetumiwa katika kutengeneza mifano ya hali ya sanaa katika kazi nyingi za NLP kama vile tafsiri ya mashine ya kisasa, lakini matumizi yao hayajachunguzwa kwa ajili ya juhudi za mafunzo ya mfumo wa mazungumzo yenye mwangalizi wa mwisho wa majadiliano. Katika utafiti huu, tunatumia mifano hii kwenye seti ya data ya DSTC2 kwa ajili ya mazungumzo yenye mafunzo. Ugunduzi wetu unaonyesha kuwa mifano ya kujitegemea inaweza kutumika ili kutengeneza mabadiliko yenye juhudi za mwisho ambazo sio tu kufikia vipimo vya juu vya uchunguzi ukilinganishwa na mifano inayotokea, lakini pia hufanya vizuri zaidi.', 'sq': 'Modelet vetëvëmendje janë një paradigm ë e re për detyrat e modelimit të sekuencës që ndryshojnë nga metodat e përbashkëta të modelimit të sekuencës, të tilla si mësimi i sekuencës bazuar në përsëritje dhe konvolution, në mënyrën se arkitektura e tyre është bazuar vetëm në mekanizmin e vëmendjes. Self-attentional models have been used in the creation of the state-of-the-art models in many NLP task such as neural machine translation, but their usage has not been explored for the task of training end-to-end task-oriented dialogue generation systems yet.  Në këtë studim, ne i aplikojmë këto modele në grupin e të dhënave DSTC2 për trajnimin e chatbotëve të orientuar në detyra. Gjetja jonë tregon se modelet e vetë-vëmendjes mund të shfrytëzohen për të krijuar chatbot të orientuar nga fundi në fundin e detyrave që jo vetëm arrijnë rezultate më të larta vlerësimi krahasuar me modelet e bazuar në përsëritje, por gjithashtu e bëjnë këtë me më efektshmëri.', 'tr': 'Öz ünsli modeller düzenleme zadalary üçin täze bir paradigm. Bu şekilde orta sıralar modelleme metodlarynyň, ýene-täzeden we konvolution tabanly sıralar öwrenmesi ýaly, arhitekturmalaryň diňe üns mehanizmasyna daýanýan ýaly. Öz ünsli nusgalar NLP täblisasynda-ýagtylyk nusgalarynyň döwletlerini bejermek üçin ullanýar, ýöne olaryň ýönelikleri entäk at-soňra görkezilen täblis sistemlerine gözlenmedi. Bu okuwçyda, biz bu nusgalary DSTC2 veri setirinde görkezilýän zady üçin görkezilýän çätbotlar üçin uygulaýarys. Tapylyklarymyz özüni dikkati nusgalaryň ahyry bilen netije-täsirli zady üçin ýokary deňlenme notlaryny diňe ýeterli deňlenme noktalaryny tekrarly döredilen nusgalara görä ulanyp biljekdigini görkez.', 'af': "Selfmoontlik modele is 'n nuwe paradigme vir sekwensiemodellering taak wat verskil van gemeenskaplike sekwensiemodellering metodes, soos herhaal-gebaseerde en konvolusie-gebaseerde sekwensieleer, op die manier dat hulle arkitektuur slegs gebaseer is op die aandag mekanisme. Selfmoontlik modele is gebruik in die skepping van die state-of-the-art modele in baie NLP taak soos neurale masjien vertaling, maar hulle gebruik is nog nie uitgesoek vir die taak van onderwerp end-to-end taak-orienteerde dialoog generasie stelsels. In hierdie studie, het ons hierdie modele aanwend op die DSTC2 datastel vir opvoering van taak orienteerde geselste. Ons vinding wys dat selfmoontlik-modele kan uitgebruik word om end-to-end-task-orienteerde chatbots te skep wat nie net hoëre evalueringstelling bereik nie in vergelyking met herhaal-gebaseerde modele nie, maar ook so meer effektief doen.", 'am': 'የራሳቸው አካባቢ ሞዴል አዲስ የሥርዓት ምርጫዎች ናቸው፡፡ የራሳቸውን ምርጫዎች በሥርዓት-የ-art-models በመፍጠር በብዙ NLP አድራሻ ውስጥ ተጠቃጥለዋል፤ ነገር ግን የጠቃሚ መሣሪያን ትርጉም፣ የመጨረሻ-to-end-task-oriented dialog ትውልድ ስርዓት መፍጠር ገና አልተመረጠም፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት፣ እነዚህን ምሳሌዎች DSTC2 ዳታተር ላይ ለስራ ማህበረሰብ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ ማግኘታችን የራሳቸውን ተቃውሞ ሞዴል ለመፍጠር የሚችል የፍጻሜውን ወደ መጨረሻ የሚያደርገውን የሥርዓት አካባቢዎችን ለመፍጠር ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Ինքնաուշադրության մոդելները նոր պարադիգմ են հաջորդականության մոդելների առաջադրանքների համար, որոնք տարբերվում են ընդհանուր հաջորդականության մոդելների մեթոդներից, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ կրկնվելու և հակադարձման հիմնված հաջորդականության ուսումնասիրությունը, այնպես, որ նրանց ճարտարապետությունը հիմն Ինքնաուշադրություն առնող մոդելները օգտագործվել են նորագույն մոդելների ստեղծման մեջ շատ ՆԼՊ-ի առաջադրանքներում, ինչպիսիք են նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանումը, բայց դրանց օգտագործումը դեռ չի ուսումնասիրել վերջ-վերջ խնդիրների վրա ուղղությամբ աշխատանքային երկխոսային համա Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք օգտագործում ենք այս մոդելները DST2ի տվյալների համակարգի վրա, որպեսզի սովորեցնենք խնդիրներին ուղղությամբ զրուցակիցներ: Մեր հայտնաբերությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ ինքնաուշադրություն դարձնող մոդելները կարող են օգտագործվել վերջ-վերջ խնդիրների վրա ուղղությամբ շտաբոտներ ստեղծելու համար, որոնք ոչ միայն ավելի բարձր գնահատման արդյունքներ են հասնում համեմատած կրկնվող մոդելների հետ, այլ նաև ավելի արդ', 'bn': 'স্বেচ্ছাসেবক মডেলের জন্য একটি নতুন প্যারাডিম, যা সাধারণ সেকেন্ড মডেলিং পদ্ধতি থেকে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন, যেমন পুনরাবার ভিত্তিক এবং কনফুলেশন-ভিত্তিক সেকেন্ড শিক্ষা,  অনেক এনএলপি কাজের মত নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদের মতো রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প মডেল তৈরি করার জন্য স্বেচ্ছাসেবক মডেল ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে, কিন্তু এখনও তাদের ব্যবহার শেষ পর্যন্ত কাজ শ এই গবেষণায় আমরা ডিস্টিসি২ ডাটাসেটে এই মডেলগুলোকে প্রশিক্ষণ করার জন্য প্রশিক্ষণ করি। আমাদের আবিষ্কার দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আত্মমনোযোগী মডেল ব্যবহার করা যায় শেষ পর্যন্ত কাজ-শেষ পর্যন্ত চ্যাটবোট তৈরি করার জন্য যা পুনরাবার ভিত্তিক মডেলের তুলনায় আরো কার', 'bs': 'Samopouzdani modeli su novi paradigm za modeliranje sekvencija koji se razlikuju od metoda modeliranja zajedničkih sekvencija, kao što su učenje sekvencije na temelju rekonstrukcije i konvolucije, na način na koji je njihova arhitektura temeljena samo na mehanizmu pažnje. Samopouzdani modeli su korišteni u stvaranju modela stanja umjetnosti u mnogim zadacima NLP-a poput prevoda neuralnih strojeva, ali njihovo uporabe još nije istraženo za zadatak obuke sistema generacije dijaloga orientiranog na kraju do kraja zadataka. U ovom istraživanju, primjenjujemo te modele na setu podataka DSTC2 za trening otvorenih na zadatku. Naše otkriće pokazuje da se samoopazljivi modeli mogu iskoristiti kako bi stvorili razgovor orijentirani na kraju zadataka koji ne samo postigli viši rezultati procjene u usporedbi s modelima na temelju ponovnosti, već i učinkovitiji.', 'az': 'Öz dikkatli modellər sıralama modelləri üçün yeni bir paradigm. Bu modellərin yalnızca dikkatli mehānismi üzərində dəyişiklik seçmə metodlarından fərqli olar. Öz dikkati modellər NLP işində nöral maşına çevirilməsi kimi təhsil modellərini yaratmaq üçün istifadə edilmişdir, amma onların istifadəsi hələ end-to-end task-oriented dialoq sistemlərinin təhsil etməsi üçün keşfedilməmişdir. Bu təcrübədə, bu modelləri DSTC2 veri qutusuna təhsil etmək üçün istifadə edirik. Bizim tapıldığımız göstərir ki, özünüzü gözləmə modelləri yenidən təkrarlanan modellərlə müqayisədə daha yüksək değerlendirmə nəticələrini istifadə etmək üçün istifadə edilə bilər, lakin daha faydalı olarlar.', 'ca': "Els models d'autoatenció són un nou paradigm a per a les tasques de modelació de seqüències que difereixen de mètodes comuns de modelació de seqüències, com l'aprenentatge de seqüències basat en recurències i convolucions, de la manera que la seva arquitectura només està basada en el mecanisme d'atenció. Els models d'auto-atenció s'han utilitzat en la creació de models d'última generació en moltes tasques del NLP, com la traducció neural de màquines, però encara no s'ha explorat el seu ús en la tasca d'entrenar sistemes de generació de diàleg orientats a tasques de capa a capa. En aquest estudi, aplicam aquests models al conjunt de dades DSTC2 per a capacitar chatbots orientats a tasques. El nostre descobriment mostra que els models d'auto-atenció poden ser explotats per crear chatbots orientats a tasques de capa a capa que no només aconsegueixen puntuacions d'evaluació més grans que els models basats en recurències, sinó també ho fan de manera més eficient.", 'cs': 'Samoobslužné modely jsou novým paradigmatem pro úlohy modelování sekvencí, které se liší od běžných metod modelování sekvencí, jako je například učení sekvencí založené na opakování a konvoluci, tak, že jejich architektura je založena pouze na mechanismu pozornosti. Při tvorbě nejmodernějších modelů v mnoha úlohách NLP, jako je například neuronový strojový překlad, byly použity modely sebe-pozornosti, ale jejich využití nebylo zkoumáno pro úkol výcviku komplexních systémů generování dialogů orientovaných na úlohy zatím. V této studii aplikujeme tyto modely na datovou sadu DSTC2 pro výcvik chatbotů orientovaných na úlohy. Naše zjištění ukazuje, že modely sebepozornosti lze využít k vytvoření end-to-end chatbotů orientovaných na úkoly, které nejen dosahují vyšších hodnocení ve srovnání s modely založenými na opakování, ale také efektivněji.', 'et': 'Enesetähelepanu mudelid on uus paradigma jadade modelleerimiseks, mis erinevad tavalistest jadade modelleerimise meetoditest, nagu kordumispõhine ja konvolutsioonipõhine jadade õppimine, nii et nende arhitektuur põhineb ainult tähelepanu mehhanismil. Enesetähelepanu mudeleid on kasutatud kaasaegsete mudelite loomisel paljudes NLP ülesannetes, näiteks neuromasintõlkes, kuid nende kasutamist ei ole veel uuritud ülesannetele orienteeritud dialoogi genereerimise süsteemide koolitamiseks. Selles uuringus rakendame neid mudeleid DSTC2 andmekogumile ülesannetele orienteeritud chatbotide koolitamiseks. Meie tulemused näitavad, et enesetähelepanu mudeleid saab kasutada, et luua lõpp-lõpuni ülesannetele orienteeritud chatbote, mis mitte ainult ei saavuta kõrgemaid hindamisskoore võrreldes kordumispõhiste mudelitega, vaid ka tõhusamalt.', 'fi': 'Itsehuomiomallit ovat uusi paradigma sekvenssimallinnalle, joka eroaa tavallisista sekvenssimallinnallisista menetelmistä, kuten toisto- ja konvoluatiopohjaisesta sekvenssimallinnasta, sillä niiden arkkitehtuuri perustuu vain huomiomekanismiin. Itsehuomiomalleja on käytetty nykyaikaisten mallien luomisessa monissa NLP-tehtävissä, kuten neurokonekäännöksessä, mutta niiden käyttöä ei ole vielä tutkittu kokonaisvaltaisten tehtävälähtöisten dialogijärjestelmien kouluttamisessa. Tässä tutkimuksessa näitä malleja sovelletaan tehtävälähtöisten chatbottien kouluttamisen DSTC2-aineistoon. Löydöksemme osoittaa, että itsetarkkaavaisia malleja voidaan hyödyntää kokonaisvaltaisten tehtävälähtöisten chatbottien luomiseen, jotka eivät ainoastaan saavuta korkeampia arviointipisteitä toistuviin malleihin verrattuna, vaan myös tehokkaammin.', 'jv': 'Self Self Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné aplikasi model iki ning dataset dumaten kanggo triyang task-Orientation Kita ngelompok maneh da model sing sami-tenan iso nggawe nyimpen nggawe end-to-end task-direction karo nggawe barang nggawe gerakan sami tanggal manungsa model sing bisa diapakan karo perusahaan, dadi bisa ngono akeh operasi layang.', 'he': 'Self-attentional models are a new paradigm for sequence modelling tasks which differ from common sequence modelling methods, such as recurrence-based and convolution-based sequence learning, in the way that their architecture is only based on the attention mechanism.  דוגמנים בעצמם השתמשו ביצירת הדוגמנים המיוחדים ביותר במשימות רבות של NLP, כמו תרגום מכונות עצביות, אך השימוש שלהם עדיין לא נחקר למשימה של אימון מערכות דיאלוג מסויימות למשימות מסוף-לסוף. במחקר הזה, אנו משתמשים בדוגמנים האלה על קבוצת נתונים DSTC2 לאימון chatbots ממוקדים למשימות. הממצא שלנו מראה שמודלים שמשמעים בעצמם יכולים להינצל כדי ליצור שיטבוטים מסויימים למשימות סוף-סוף שלא רק להשיג נקודות עריכה גבוהות יותר בהשוואה לדוגמנים המבוססים על התחזרות, אלא גם לעשות זאת בצורה יותר יעילה.', 'ha': "Shiryoyin masu shawara kanayen masu tsari ne a yanzu wa aikin masu shiryi masu sakan da ke rarraba daga shiryoyin misãlai masu motsi da ɗabi'a, kamar karatun masu tsari a baka kan dubi'in da aka baka ta kafo-bakin, a kan hanyar da ake samar da musamman masu aikin muhimmanci kawai. An yi amfani da shiryoyin-masu inganci cikin the ƙiƙiro of the state-of-the-art motel in many of the NLP tasks, such as translation of neural mashine, but not an zartar da amfani da su zuwa aikin yin aiki na tsari-end-to-end-job-originated zauren zauren akwatin bayani na daban. Daga wannan lõkaci, muna amfani da waɗannan misãlai kan danne na DstanC2 dõmin yin shirin sabo-masu shirya aiki. FantayinMu na nũna cewa, za'a iya amfani da misãlai masu saurara kanzu-fara zuwa-ƙari, wanda ke shirya wa aikin zuwa-ƙari, wanda bã ya iya sãmun score masu ƙaranci fãce da misãlai masu baka da takwai, kuma amma yana sami da sa mafi fasahan.", 'sk': 'Modeli samopozornosti so nova paradigma za naloge modeliranja zaporedja, ki se razlikujejo od običajnih metod modeliranja zaporedja, kot so učenje zaporedja na osnovi ponovitve in učenje zaporedja na osnovi konvolucije, tako da njihova arhitektura temelji le na mehanizmu pozornosti. Modeli samopozornosti so bili uporabljeni pri ustvarjanju najsodobnejših modelov v številnih nalogah NLP, kot je nevronsko strojno prevajanje, vendar njihova uporaba še ni bila raziskana za nalogo usposabljanja sistemov generacije dialoga od konca do konca. V tej študiji uporabljamo te modele na naboru podatkov DSTC2 za usposabljanje chatbotov, usmerjenih v naloge. Naše ugotovitve kažejo, da je mogoče modele samopozornosti izkoristiti za ustvarjanje chatbotov, usmerjenih od konca do konca, ki ne le dosegajo višje ocene v primerjavi z modeli, ki temeljijo na ponovitvi, temveč tudi učinkoviteje.', 'bo': 'Self-attentional models are a new paradigm for sequence modelling tasks which differ from common sequence modelling methods, such as recurrence-based and convolution-based sequence learning, in the way that their architecture is only based on the attention mechanism. Self-attentional models have been used in the creation of the state-of-the-art models in many NLP task such as neural machine translation, but their usage has not been explored for the task of training end-to-end task-oriented dialog generation systems yet. In this study, we apply these models on the DSTC2 dataset for training task-oriented chatbots. ང་ཚོའི་རྗེས་སུ་རང་ཉིད་ལུགས་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་བྱ་རིམ་ཅིག་བེད་སྤྲོད་ནས་end-to-end task-oriented chatbots་ཞིག་འཆར་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ'}
{'en': 'Persistence pays off : Paying Attention to What the LSTM Gating Mechanism Persists', 'pt': 'A persistência compensa: prestando atenção ao que o mecanismo de fechamento do LSTM persiste', 'ar': 'المثابرة تؤتي ثمارها: الانتباه إلى ما تستمر آلية بوابة LSTM', 'fr': 'La persévérance est payante\xa0: prêter attention à ce que le mécanisme de contrôle LSTM persiste', 'es': 'La persistencia vale la pena: prestar atención a lo que persiste el mecanismo de activación de LSTM', 'ja': '永続性は利益をもたらす： LSTMゲーティングメカニズムが持続するものに注意を払う', 'zh': '持久性曰: LSTM 门控机存也', 'ru': 'Постоянство окупается: Обращая внимание на то, что механизм стробирования LSTM сохраняется', 'hi': 'दृढ़ता बंद भुगतान करता है: क्या LSTM गेटिंग तंत्र बनी रहती है पर ध्यान देना', 'ga': 'Éiríonn le dianseasmhacht: Aird a Dhéanamh ar A bhFeidhmíonn an Mheicníocht Geata LSTM', 'ka': 'მუშაობელობა დაახლობა: დაახლობა რას LSTM მოქმენისმის პერსისტი', 'el': 'Η επιμονή αποδίδει αξία: Δίνοντας προσοχή σε ό, τι επιμένει ο μηχανισμός συλλογής LSTM', 'hu': 'A kitartás kifizetődő: figyelem arra, hogy mit tart fenn az LSTM kapcsolási mechanizmus', 'it': 'La persistenza paga: prestare attenzione a ciò che il meccanismo di Gating LSTM persiste', 'kk': 'Тұрақтылығы төледі: LSTM жылжыту механизмінің қандай тұрақтығына назар беру', 'mk': 'Постојаноста одговара: Внимание врз она што персистира механизмот за собирање на ЛСТМ', 'lt': 'Persistencija padengia: dėmesys skiriamas LSTM surinkimo mechanizmui, kuris išlieka', 'mn': 'Үзэлтгэл төлөвлөгөө төлөвлөгдөж байна: LSTM хаалтын механизм хэн байдаг вэ?', 'ms': 'Persistensi membayar: Memberi perhatian kepada apa yang LSTM Gating Mechanism Persists', 'ml': 'എൽസ്റ്റിം ഗെറ്റിങ്ങ് മെക്കാനിസ്റ്റിമുട്ടുകാരുടെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ കൊടുക്കുന്നത് കൊടുക്ക', 'mt': 'Il-persistenza tħallas lura: Attenzjoni għal X’Persisti l-Mekkaniżmu ta’ Ġbir LSTM', 'no': 'Persistens betaling av: Betaling merksomhet på kva LSTM-gating-mekanismen persisterer', 'si': 'ස්ථිර විශ්වාස කරනවා: LSTM ගැටීම් පද්ධතිය ස්ථිර විශ්වාස කරනවා', 'pl': 'Wytrwałość opłaca się: zwracanie uwagi na to, co utrzymuje się mechanizm zbierania LSTM', 'ro': 'Persistența merită: acordarea atenției la ceea ce persistă mecanismul de colectare LSTM', 'sr': 'Persistencija isplaćuje: plaćanje pažnje na ono što LSTM mehanizam prikupljanja persistent', 'sv': 'Varaktighet lönar sig: Att uppmärksamma vad LSTM Gating Mechanism kvarstår', 'ta': 'பொறுப்பு செலுத்துகிறது:', 'ur': 'ثابت ہوتی ہے: LSTM گٹینگ مکانیسم کی حفاظت کرتی ہے', 'so': 'Mushaar bixinta: Paying attention to what the LSTM Gating mechanism Persists', 'uz': "Qo'shlik esa paydo qiladi: LSTM'ning mekanismeni qanday qilish", 'vi': 'Thành trì có hiệu quả: Trả lời chú ý tới Hiệu ứng tuyển tập trung LSTM', 'bg': 'Постоянството се отплаща: обръщане на внимание на това, което продължава механизмът за затваряне на ЛСТМ', 'da': 'Vedholdenhed betaler sig: At være opmærksom på, hvad LSTM Gating Mechanism vedholder', 'hr': 'Persistencija isplaćuje: plaćanje pažnje na ono što LSTM mehanizam prikupljanja stoji', 'nl': 'Persistentie loont zich: aandacht besteden aan wat het LSTM Gating Mechanisme aanhoudt', 'de': 'Ausdauer zahlt sich aus: Aufmerksamkeit auf das, was der LSTM Gating Mechanism aushält', 'id': 'Persistensi membayar: memperhatikan apa yang LSTM Gating Mechanism Persists', 'ko': '견지하는 것은 보답이 있다: LSTM 선택 메커니즘의 견지에 주목한다', 'fa': 'پایداری پرداخت می\u200cشود: توجه به آنچه مکانیسم جمع کردن LSTM پایداری می\u200cکند', 'tr': 'Durumsuzluk ödülüyor:', 'sq': 'Persistenca paguan: duke i kushtuar vëmendjen asaj që mekanizmi i mbledhjes LSTM-së persiston', 'af': 'Persistensie betaal af: Betaal aandag aan wat die LSTM versameling Mekanisme Persistent', 'sw': 'Ushirikiano unalipa: Kutoa hadhira kwa kile ambacho watu wa Mfumo wa Kukusanya', 'am': 'ሁኔታ የቆጣጠር ነው: የLSTM መግቢያ መፍታት የፖስታ ጦማሪዎች', 'az': 'Daxillik ödənilir: LSTM Gating Mechanism Persists Nedir?', 'bs': 'Persistencija isplaćuje: Pažnja na ono što LSTM mehanizam prikupljanja persistent', 'bn': 'প্রতিষ্ঠানের মূল্য দিয়েছে: এলএসএমএস গেটিং মেক্সিস্ট বাসিন্দাদের দৃষ্টিতে মনোযোগ দিচ্ছে', 'hy': 'Կարևորությունը վճարում է. ուշադրություն դարձնելով այն բանին, թե ինչ է տեղի ունենում LSMT-ի հավաքածու մեխանիզմը,', 'ca': 'La persistència paga: prestar atenció a què persisteix el mecanisme de recollida LSTM', 'cs': 'Vytrvalost se vyplatí: Věnovat pozornost tomu, co LSTM Gating Mechanism trvá', 'et': 'Püsivus tasub ära: pöörates tähelepanu sellele, mida LSTM värvimismehhanism püsib', 'fi': 'Persistenssi kannattaa: Kiinnitä huomiota siihen, mitä LSTM-porttimekanismi ylläpitää', 'jv': 'Ngudud kesempatan ora ono: iso nggunakake cara-cara sing paling apa Ngudud milih', 'he': 'התמידות משלמת: שימו לב למה שהמכונות השיגור של LSTM פורסיסטים', 'sk': 'Vztrajnost se izplača: posvečanje pozornosti vzdrževanju mehanizma LSTM', 'ha': 'Pay Attemption to what the LTRM Garing Mekanimatis Persists', 'bo': 'རིམ་མཐུན་པ་སྤྲོད་བཏུབ། LSTM་མཉམ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་བཟོ་ཅན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གང་ཞིག་ལ་ཉར་རྒྱུ་དེ་'}
{'en': 'Recurrent Neural Network Language Models composed of LSTM units, especially those augmented with an external memory, have achieved state-of-the-art results in Language Modeling. However, these models still struggle to process long sequences which are more likely to contain long-distance dependencies because of information fading. In this paper we demonstrate an effective mechanism for retrieving information in a memory augmented LSTM LM based on attending to information in memory in proportion to the number of timesteps the LSTM gating mechanism persisted the information.', 'ar': 'لقد حققت نماذج لغة الشبكة العصبية المتكررة المكونة من وحدات LSTM ، وخاصة تلك المزودة بذاكرة خارجية ، أحدث النتائج في نمذجة اللغة. ومع ذلك ، لا تزال هذه النماذج تكافح لمعالجة التسلسلات الطويلة التي من المرجح أن تحتوي على تبعيات بعيدة المدى بسبب تلاشي المعلومات. في هذه الورقة ، نوضح آلية فعالة لاسترداد المعلومات في ذاكرة LSTM LM المعززة بناءً على الاهتمام بالمعلومات الموجودة في الذاكرة بما يتناسب مع عدد الخطوات الزمنية التي استمرت فيها آلية بوابة LSTM في الحفاظ على المعلومات.', 'es': 'Los modelos de lenguaje de redes neuronales recurrentes compuestos por unidades LSTM, especialmente las ampliadas con una memoria externa, han logrado resultados de vanguardia en el modelado del lenguaje. Sin embargo, estos modelos todavía tienen dificultades para procesar secuencias largas que tienen más probabilidades de contener dependencias de larga distancia debido al desvanecimiento de la información. En este artículo demostramos un mecanismo efectivo para recuperar información en un LM LSTM de memoria aumentada basado en atender la información en la memoria en proporción al número de pasos de tiempo en que el mecanismo de activación LSTM conservó la información.', 'fr': "Les modèles de langage de réseaux neuronaux récurrents composés d'unités LSTM, en particulier ceux enrichis d'une mémoire externe, ont obtenu des résultats de pointe en matière de modélisation linguistique. Cependant, ces modèles ont encore du mal à traiter de longues séquences qui sont plus susceptibles de contenir des dépendances à longue distance en raison de l'évanouissement de l'information. Dans cet article, nous démontrons un mécanisme efficace pour récupérer des informations dans un LM LSTM augmenté en mémoire basé sur la prise en charge des informations en mémoire proportionnellement au nombre de pas de temps pendant lesquels le mécanisme de portillonnage LSTM a persisté les informations.", 'pt': 'Modelos de Linguagem de Rede Neural Recorrente compostos por unidades LSTM, especialmente aquelas aumentadas com memória externa, têm alcançado resultados de última geração em Modelagem de Linguagem. No entanto, esses modelos ainda lutam para processar sequências longas que são mais propensas a conter dependências de longa distância devido ao desvanecimento da informação. Neste artigo, demonstramos um mecanismo eficaz para recuperar informações em um LSTM LM com memória aumentada, com base no atendimento de informações na memória em proporção ao número de passos de tempo em que o mecanismo de disparo LSTM persistiu a informação.', 'ja': 'LSTMユニット、特に外部メモリで拡張されたもので構成された再帰的ニューラルネットワーク言語モデルは、言語モデリングで最先端の結果を達成している。しかしながら、これらのモデルは依然として、長いシーケンスを処理するのに苦労しており、長いシーケンスは、情報のフェーディングのために長距離の依存関係を含んでいる可能性が高い。本論文では、LSTMゲーティング機構が情報を持続させたタイムステップ数に比例して、メモリ内の情報に注意を払うことに基づいて、メモリ拡張LSTM LM内の情報を取得するための有効な機構を実証した。', 'zh': 'LSTM单元之递归神经网络言,尤以外存储器益之,言建模先进。 然犹难处长序,信息褪色,更有可长距离恃者。 于本文中,展在存储器增强型LSTM LM中检索信息的有效机制,该机制基于与LSTM门控机制存信息的时间步长成比例地关注内存中的信息。', 'ru': 'Языковые модели рекуррентных нейронных сетей, состоящие из блоков LSTM, особенно дополненных внешней памятью, достигли самых современных результатов в языковом моделировании. Тем не менее, эти модели все еще пытаются обработать длинные последовательности, которые, скорее всего, будут содержать зависимости от расстояния из-за затухания информации. В данной работе мы демонстрируем эффективный механизм извлечения информации в расширенной памяти LSTM LM, основанный на посещении информации в памяти пропорционально количеству временных шагов, которые механизм стробирования LSTM сохранил в информации.', 'hi': 'आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क भाषा मॉडल LSTM इकाइयों से बना है, विशेष रूप से एक बाहरी स्मृति के साथ संवर्धित, भाषा मॉडलिंग में अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त किया है। हालांकि, ये मॉडल अभी भी लंबे अनुक्रमों को संसाधित करने के लिए संघर्ष करते हैं जो जानकारी लुप्त होने के कारण लंबी दूरी की निर्भरताओं को शामिल करने की अधिक संभावना रखते हैं। इस पेपर में हम एक स्मृति संवर्धित LSTM LM में जानकारी को पुनर्प्राप्त करने के लिए एक प्रभावी तंत्र का प्रदर्शन करते हैं, जो स्मृति में जानकारी में भाग लेने के आधार पर LSTM गेटिंग तंत्र द्वारा जानकारी को बनाए रखने वाले टाइमस्टेप्स की संख्या के अनुपात में होता है।', 'ga': "Tá torthaí úrscothacha sa Mhúnlú Teanga bainte amach ag Múnlaí Teanga Líonra Néaracha Athfhillteach comhdhéanta d'aonaid LSTM, go háirithe iad siúd atá méadaithe le cuimhne sheachtrach. Mar sin féin, tá deacrachtaí fós ag na samhlacha seo seichimh fhada a phróiseáil ar dóichí go mbeidh spleáchais fad-achair iontu mar gheall ar chealú faisnéise. Sa pháipéar seo léirímid meicníocht éifeachtach chun faisnéis a aisghabháil i LSTM LM méadaithe cuimhne bunaithe ar fhreastal ar fhaisnéis sa chuimhne i gcomhréir leis an líon céimeanna ama a d'fhan meicníocht geataithe LSTM leis an bhfaisnéis.", 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα γλώσσας επαναλαμβανόμενων νευρωνικών δικτύων που αποτελούνται από μονάδες ειδικά αυτά που εμπλουτίζονται με εξωτερική μνήμη, έχουν επιτύχει αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στη μοντελοποίηση γλωσσών. Ωστόσο, αυτά τα μοντέλα εξακολουθούν να αγωνίζονται να επεξεργαστούν μεγάλες ακολουθίες οι οποίες είναι πιο πιθανό να περιέχουν εξαρτήσεις μεγάλης απόστασης λόγω της εξασθένισης των πληροφοριών. Σε αυτή την εργασία καταδεικνύουμε έναν αποτελεσματικό μηχανισμό ανάκτησης πληροφοριών σε μια ενισχυμένη μνήμη βασισμένο στην παρακολούθηση πληροφοριών στη μνήμη σε αναλογία με τον αριθμό των χρονοβημάτων που ο μηχανισμός πύλης επέμεινε στις πληροφορίες.', 'ka': 'შემდეგ ნეიროლური ქსელის ენერგიის მოდელები, რომლებიც LSTM ერთეულებისგან შექმნა, განსაკუთრებით გარეშე მეხსიერებისგან, მიიღეთ ენერგიის მოდელების შესახებ. მაგრამ, ეს მოდელები უკვე ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან დიდ განტოლების დასახლოებით ინფორმაციის გამოცდილობისთვის. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ევმონსტირებთ ეფექტიური მექანსი ინფორმაციის მიღებისთვის LSTM LM-ში, რომელიც ამოხსენებული ინფორმაციის მიღებაზე დავუწყებულია, რომელიც LSTM მიღების მექანსის მრიცხვის შემდეგ ინფ', 'it': "I modelli linguistici di rete neurale ricorrenti composti da unità LSTM, in particolare quelli con memoria esterna, hanno ottenuto risultati all'avanguardia nella modellazione linguistica. Tuttavia, questi modelli ancora lottano per elaborare sequenze lunghe che hanno maggiori probabilità di contenere dipendenze a lunga distanza a causa della dissolvenza delle informazioni. In questo articolo mostriamo un meccanismo efficace per il recupero di informazioni in un LSTM LM aumentato di memoria basato sulla cura delle informazioni in memoria in proporzione al numero di passi di tempo che il meccanismo di gating LSTM persisteva le informazioni.", 'hu': 'Az LSTM egységekből álló ismétlődő neurális hálózati nyelvmodellek, különösen azok, amelyek külső memóriával bővítették, korszerű eredményeket értek el a nyelvmodellezésben. Ezek a modellek azonban továbbra is nehezen dolgoznak fel hosszú szekvenciákat, amelyek valószínűleg nagyobb valószínűséggel tartalmaznak hosszú távú függőségeket az információ elhalványulása miatt. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a memóriában lévő információk visszakeresésére szolgáló hatékony mechanizmust, amelynek alapján a memóriában lévő információk kezelése az LSTM átjáró mechanizmus által fenntartott információk számának arányában történik.', 'kk': 'Қайталанған Ньюралдық желінің тіл үлгілері LSTM бірліктерінен құрылған, осымен қатар, сыртқы жады бойынша көтерілген, тіл үлгісінің күй- жайы нәтижесін жеткізді. Бірақ бұл үлгілер мәліметтің жоғалуы себебінде ұзындық реттеулерді өзгерту үшін көмектеседі. Бұл қағазда, LSTM жүктеу механизмі мәліметті жадында көтерілген LSTM LM мәліметті алу үшін эффективні механизмін көрсетедік.', 'lt': 'Recurrent Neural Network Language Models composed of LSTM units, especially those augmented with an external memory, have achieved state-of-the-art results in Language Modeling.  Tačiau šie modeliai vis dar stengiasi apdoroti ilgas sekas, kurios greičiausiai susidurs su ilgalaikėmis priklausomybėmis dėl informacijos nykimo. Šiame dokumente parodomi veiksmingas mechanizmas informacijos gavimui atmintinėje padidintoje LSTM LM, pagrįstas informacijos teikimu atmintinėje proporcingai su LSTM gating mechanizmu susijusių laiko žingsnių skaičiumi.', 'ml': 'LSTM യൂണിറ്റുകളില്\u200d കൂട്ടിയ നെയുറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്ക് മോഡലുകള്\u200d, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് പുറത്തുള്ള മെമ്മറിയോടൊപ്പം കൂട്ടിയി എന്നാലും ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d നീണ്ട സെക്കന്\u200dസ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പോരാടുന്നു. വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നഷ്ടപ്പെടുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ദൂരം ആശ്രയി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പിന്തിരിക്കുന്നതിനായി കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. മെമ്മറിയില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനായി', 'mn': 'Ялангуяа гадаад санамжтайгаар нэмэгдсэн мэдрэлийн сүлжээний хэл загварууд нь хэл загварын үр дүнг хүртсэн. Гэхдээ эдгээр загварууд мэдээллийн алдагдсан учраас урт хугацаанд хамааралтай байх боломжтой урт хугацаанд хамааралтай байх боломжтой болно. Энэ цаасан дээр бид LSTM цуглуулах механизмийн хэдэн цаг хугацааны хэмжээний хэмжээний хугацааны тухай мэдээлэл дээр нэмэгдсэн LSTM LM-д мэдээлэл авах эффективний механизмийг харуулж байна.', 'mk': 'Рекурентните модели на неурална мрежа на јазик составени од ЛСТМ единици, особено оние зголемени со надворешна меморија, постигнаа најдобри резултати во моделирањето на јазик. Сепак, овие модели сé уште се борат да процесираат долги секвенции кои најверојатно ќе содржат долги зависности поради исчезнувањето на информациите. Во овој документ демонстрираме ефикасен механизам за преземање информации во меморијата зголемена LSTM LM базирана на присуството на информациите во меморијата во пропорција со бројот на временски чекори механизмот за преземање на LSTM ги продолжи информациите.', 'ms': 'Model Bahasa Rangkaian Neural Berulang yang terdiri dari unit LSTM, terutama yang ditambah dengan memori luaran, telah mencapai keputusan state-of-the-art dalam Modeling Bahasa. Namun, model ini masih berjuang untuk memproses urutan panjang yang lebih mungkin mengandungi dependensi jarak panjang kerana maklumat memudar. Dalam kertas ini kami menunjukkan mekanisme yang berkesan untuk mendapatkan maklumat dalam LSTM LM yang ditambah memori berdasarkan menghadiri maklumat dalam memori dalam nisbah dengan bilangan langkah masa mekanisme gating LSTM terus menerus maklumat.', 'pl': 'Modele językowe powtarzające się neuronalne sieci językowe składające się z jednostek LSTM, zwłaszcza te poszerzone o pamięć zewnętrzną, osiągnęły najnowocześniejsze rezultaty w modelowaniu języka. Jednak modele te nadal trudno przetwarzać długie sekwencje, które są bardziej prawdopodobne, że zawierają zależności na odległość z powodu zanikania informacji. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiono skuteczny mechanizm pobierania informacji w rozszerzonym pamięci LSTM LM oparty na uwzględnianiu informacji w pamięci proporcjonalnie do liczby kroków czasowych, w których mechanizm bramowania LSTM utrzymywał informacje.', 'mt': 'Mudelli ta’ Lingwa tan-Netwerk Newrali rikorrenti magħmulin minn unitajiet LSTM, speċjalment dawk miżjuda b’memorja esterna, kisbu riżultati l-aktar avvanzati fil-Mudellar tal-Lingwa. Madankollu, dawn il-mudelli għadhom diffiċli biex jipproċessaw sekwenzi twal li x’aktarx ikun fihom dipendenzi fuq distanzi twal minħabba li l-informazzjoni tonqos. F’dan id-dokument qed nippruvaw mekkaniżmu effettiv għall-ġbir ta’ informazzjoni f’LSTM LM miżjud fil-memorja bbażat fuq l-attendenza għal informazzjoni fil-memorja fi proporzjon man-numru ta’ passi ta’ żmien li l-mekkaniżmu ta’ gating LSTM ippersisti l-informazzjoni.', 'ro': 'Modelele de limbaj neural recurente compuse din unități LSTM, în special cele amplificate cu memorie externă, au obținut rezultate de ultimă oră în modelarea limbajului. Cu toate acestea, aceste modele încă se luptă să proceseze secvențe lungi care sunt mai probabil să conțină dependențe la distanțe lungi din cauza dispariției informațiilor. În această lucrare demonstrăm un mecanism eficient de recuperare a informațiilor într-un LM LSTM augmentat de memorie bazat pe participarea la informațiile din memorie proporțional cu numărul de pași de timp în care mecanismul de gătire LSTM a persistat informația.', 'si': 'ආයෙත් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය භාෂාව මොඩේල් LSTM යුනිට් වල සංයුතුයි, විශේෂයෙන්ම එළිය මතකයෙන් විශේෂය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, භ නමුත්, මේ මොඩල් තාමත් ලොකු පරීක්ෂණයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම තොරතුරු නැති විසින් ලොකු ද මේ පත්තරේ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ LSTM LM මතකයෙන් තොරතුරු ගැනීමට සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙන්නේ මතකයෙන් තොරතුරු ගැනීමට සම්බන්ධ වෙ', 'no': 'Gjennomsiktige neuralnettverksspråk- modeller som er laga av LSTM- einingar, spesielt dei som er auka med eit eksternt minne, har oppnådd status- of- the- art- resultat i språk- modellering. Desse modelane støttar imidlertid fortsatt for å handsama lange sekvensar som er sannsynleg å innehalda langavstandavhengighet på grunn av feileg av informasjon. I denne papiret viser vi ein effektiv mekanisme for å henta informasjon i ei minne augmentert LSTM LM basert på å delta til informasjon i minne i proporsjon til talet på tidsstrekk LSTM-gating-mekanismen fortsatt informasjonen.', 'sr': 'Ponavljajući neuronski jezik mreže koji su sastavljeni od LSTM jedinica, posebno one koje su povećane sa spoljnom pamćenjem, postigli su state-of-the-art rezultate u modelima jezika. Međutim, ovi modeli se i dalje bore za proces dugih sekvencija koji su vjerojatniji da sadrže zavisnosti od daljine zbog nestanka informacija. U ovom papiru pokazujemo efikasan mehanizam prikupljanja informacija u uspomeni povećanog LSTM LM-a na osnovu prisustvovanja informacijama u uspomeni u proporciji broja vremenskih koraka koje je mehanizam prikupljanja LSTM-a nastavio podaci.', 'so': "Muuqashada luuqada ee Neural ee ku soo dhowaaday ee ka mid ah qaybaha LSTM, khusuusan kuwa ku daray xasuusta dibadda ah, waxay gaadheen xaaladda farshaxanka ah oo ku baxaya qaabilaadda luqada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee tusaalahaas waxay weli u dagaalamayaan in ay sii baaraandegaan xilliyo dheer, kuwaas oo suurtagal ah inay ku jirto ku xiran meel fog, sababtoo ah macluumaad baabba'aya. Qoraalkan waxaynu muujinnaa meyr faa’iido ah oo ku heli karo macluumaad xor ah oo lagu kordhiyey LSTM LM, taasoo lagu saleyn karo macluumaadka xasuusta si waafaqsan tallaabooyinka waqtiyada la xiriira macluumaadka ku saabsan sawirada LSTM.", 'sv': 'Återkommande neurala nätverksspråkmodeller som består av LSTM-enheter, särskilt de som förstärks med ett externt minne, har uppnått toppmoderna resultat inom språkmodellering. Men dessa modeller kämpar fortfarande för att bearbeta långa sekvenser som är mer benägna att innehålla fjärrberoenden på grund av att informationen bleknar. I denna uppsats visar vi en effektiv mekanism för att hämta information i en minnesförstärkt LSTM LM baserad på att ta hand om information i minnet i proportion till antalet tidssteg LSTM gating mekanismen kvarstod informationen.', 'ta': 'தற்போது நெருக்கல் வலைப்பின்னல் மொழி மாதிரிகள் LSTM அலகுகளில் சேர்க்கப்பட்டது, குறிப்பாக வெளி நினைவகத்துடன் சேர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளவர் ஆனால், இந்த மாதிரிகள் இன்னும் நீண்ட வரிசைகளை செயல்படுத்த முயற்சி செய்கிறார்கள். அது தூரத்தில் சார்ந்த சார்பு கொண்டு In this paper we demonstrate an effective mechanism for retrieving information in a memory augmented LSTM LM based on attending to information in memory in proportion to the number of timesteps the LSTM gating mechanism persisted the information.', 'ur': 'دوبارہ نیورال نیورل نیٹ ورک زبان موڈل LSTM یونیٹوں سے جوڑے ہوئے ہیں، مخصوصاً جو بیرون یاد کے ساتھ اضافہ کئے گئے ہیں، زبان موڈلینگ کے نتیجے میں موجود ہوئے ہیں. لیکن، یہ نمڈلے ابھی دور کی سفارش کرنے کے لئے کوشش کرتے ہیں جو زیادہ ممکن ہے کہ معلومات فائدہ ہونے کے باعث دور کی دور کی تعلقات رکھیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک مکانیسم کو دکھاتے ہیں جو LSTM گیٹنگ مکانیسم کی تعداد کے مطابق اس مکانیسم کی اطلاعات کے ذریعہ سے ذکر کے ذریعے بنے ہوئے LSTM کی مکانیسم کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے موثرت کا مکانیسم ہے۔', 'uz': "Recurrent Neural Network Language Models composed of LSTM units, especially those augmented with an external memory, have achieved state-of-the-art results in Language Modeling.  Lekin, bu modellar davomida uzun chegaralarni bajarishga harakat qiladi. Bu maʼlumot yozib qolayotgan sababi uzoq masofadan ishlatmaydi. Bu hujjatda biz LSTM tashkilotlarini xotiraga olish uchun xotira qo'shilgan LSTM LM'da maʼlumotni xotiraga olish uchun foydalanuvchi mechanisni ko'rsatamiz. LSTM tashkilotlari mechanisining haqida maʼlumot davom etadi.", 'vi': 'Chế độ ngôn ngữ thần kinh liên tục gồm các đơn vị LSTM, đặc biệt những bộ phận được tăng thêm với trí nhớ bên ngoài, đã đạt được kết quả tối tân trong Chế độ ngôn ngữ. Tuy nhiên, những mô hình này vẫn không thể xử lý các chuỗi dài mà nhiều khả năng có thể chứa các quan hệ phụ thuộc xa xôi do thông tin bị phai màu. Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi chứng minh một cơ chế có hiệu quả để lấy thông tin trong một bộ nhớ đã gia tăng LSTM LM dựa trên việc chăm sóc thông tin trong bộ nhớ so với số thời gian mà cơ lệnh bắt nguồn LSTM vẫn còn giữ thông tin.', 'bg': 'Моделите на повтарящи се неврални мрежови езикови модели, съставени от ЛСТМ единици, особено тези, увеличени с външна памет, са постигнали най-съвременни резултати в езиковото моделиране. Въпреки това, тези модели все още се борят да обработват дълги последователности, които са по-вероятно да съдържат зависимости на дълги разстояния поради избледняване на информацията. В тази статия демонстрираме ефективен механизъм за извличане на информация в увеличена памет ЛСТМ ЛМ въз основа на вниманието към информацията в паметта пропорционално на броя от времето, в които механизмът за свързване на ЛСТМ е запазил информацията.', 'nl': 'Recurrent Neural Network Language Modellen bestaande uit LSTM-eenheden, met name die die zijn uitgebreid met een extern geheugen, hebben state-of-the-art resultaten bereikt in Taalmodellering. Echter, deze modellen worstelen nog steeds met het verwerken van lange sequenties die waarschijnlijk afhankelijkheden op lange afstand bevatten vanwege het vervagen van informatie. In dit artikel demonstreren we een effectief mechanisme voor het ophalen van informatie in een geheugen augmented LSTM LM gebaseerd op het behandelen van informatie in het geheugen in verhouding tot het aantal tijdsstappen dat het LSTM gating mechanisme de informatie persistente.', 'da': 'Tilbagevendende neurale netværkssprogmodeller bestående af LSTM-enheder, især dem, der er forstærket med en ekstern hukommelse, har opnået state-of-the-art resultater inden for sprogmodellering. Disse modeller har imidlertid stadig svært ved at behandle lange sekvenser, som er mere tilbøjelige til at indeholde langdistanceafhængigheder på grund af information falmer. I denne artikel demonstrerer vi en effektiv mekanisme til at hente information i en hukommelsesforøget LSTM LM baseret på at tage sig af information i hukommelsen i forhold til antallet af tidstrin LSTM gating mekanismen vedvarede informationen.', 'hr': 'Povratni modeli neuronske mreže, sastavljeni od LSTM jedinica, posebno one povećane s vanjskim sjećanjem, postigli su stanje umjetnosti rezultate u modelima jezika. Međutim, ovi modeli se još uvijek bore za procesiranje dugih sekvencija koje su vjerojatnije sadržavale zavisnosti iz daleke udaljenosti zbog nestanka informacija. U ovom papiru pokazujemo učinkovit mehanizam prikupljanja informacija u povećanom sjećanju LSTM LM na temelju prisustvovanja informacija u sjećanju u proporciji broja vremenskih koraka koje je mehanizam prikupljanja LSTM nastavio podaci.', 'id': 'Recurrent Neural Network Language Models composed of LSTM units, especially those augmented with an external memory, have achieved state-of-the-art results in Language Modeling.  Namun, model ini masih berjuang untuk memproses urutan panjang yang lebih mungkin mengandung dependensi jarak jauh karena informasi menghilang. Dalam kertas ini kami menunjukkan mekanisme efektif untuk mengambil informasi dalam memori meningkat LSTM LM berdasarkan menjaga informasi dalam memori dalam proporsi dengan jumlah langkah waktu mekanisme gating LSTM mempertahankan informasi.', 'de': 'Recurrent Neural Network Language Modelle, die aus LSTM-Einheiten bestehen, insbesondere solche, die mit einem externen Speicher erweitert werden, haben in der Sprachmodellierung den neuesten Stand der Technik erreicht. Allerdings haben diese Modelle immer noch Schwierigkeiten, lange Sequenzen zu verarbeiten, die aufgrund des Ausbleichs von Informationen eher Fernabhängigkeiten enthalten. In dieser Arbeit demonstrieren wir einen effektiven Mechanismus zum Abrufen von Informationen in einem speichererweiterten LSTM LM basierend auf der Behandlung von Informationen im Speicher proportional zur Anzahl der Zeitschritte, die der LSTM Gating Mechanismus die Information persistierte.', 'ko': 'LSTM 단원으로 구성된 귀속 신경 네트워크 언어 모델, 특히 외부 기억을 증가시킨 모델은 언어 모델링에 있어서 최신 성과를 거두었다.그러나 이 모델들은 정보가 쇠퇴하기 때문에 장거리 의존을 포함할 수 있기 때문에 장거리 서열을 처리하기 어렵다.본고에서 우리는 메모리가 강화된 LSTM LM에서 정보를 검색하는 데 효과적인 메커니즘을 보여 주었다. 이 메커니즘은 LSTM 선택 메커니즘에 따라 정보를 보존하는 시간이 긴 비율에 따라 메모리에 있는 정보를 주목한다.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای زبان شبکه عصبی دوباره ساخته شده از واحدهای LSTM، مخصوصاً کسانی که با حافظه خارجی افزایش شده\u200cاند، نتیجه\u200cهای وضعیت هنری در مدل\u200cسازی زبان به دست آورده\u200cاند. ولی این مدلها هنوز برای پرداخت دستورالعمل طولانی که احتمالاً بستگی های دور فاصله دارند به خاطر نابود کردن اطلاعات می\u200cکوشند. در این کاغذ ما یک مکانیسم تاثیر برای گرفتن اطلاعات در یک حافظه افزایش LSTM LM را نشان می دهیم که بر پایه حضور اطلاعات در حافظه در مقایسه با تعداد مرحله زمانی که مکانیسم جمع کردن LSTM اطلاعات را ادامه داد.', 'tr': "Saýlaw Jaýyr dili Ýöne bu nusgalar dowam edip uzak hatlary proses etmek üçin mücadele edýär. Bu nusgalar informasiýa ýok bolmagy sebäbi uzak hatlary dowam edýär. Bu kagyzda biz LSTM gatlama meýdançasynyň hasaplanjak üçin etkinji meýdançasyny hatda ýagşyrylýan LSTM LM'de maglumatlary almak üçin etkinji meýdançasyny görkezip durupdyk.", 'sw': 'Hivi sasa, Modeli za Lugha za Ki-Neural zilizotengenezwa na viungo vya LSTM, hususani wale walioongezwa kwa kumbukumbu ya nje, wamefanikiwa kuwa na matokeo ya sanaa katika Utawala wa Lugha. Hata hivyo, mifano hii bado inapambana na kuchukua mfululizo wa muda mrefu ambao una uwezekano wa kuwepo na kutegemea kwa sababu ya taarifa zinazopungua. Katika karatasi hii tunaonyesha mfumo wa ufanisi wa kupata taarifa katika kumbukumbu iliyoongezwa na LSTM kwa kutumia huduma ya taarifa kwa kiwango kikubwa cha hatua za wakati ambazo mfumo wa kujiunga na LSTM uliendelea na taarifa hizo.', 'af': "Herhaalde Neurale Netwerk Taal Modelle wat gemaak is van LSTM eenhede, veral die wat met 'n eksterne geheue vergroot is, het toestand- of- the- art resultate in Taal Modeling bereik. Maar hierdie modele struikel nog steeds om lange sekwensies te proses wat meer waarskynlik is om langafstand afhanklikhede te bevat vanweë inligting verdwyn. In hierdie papier wys ons 'n effektief mekanisme om inligting in 'n geheue vergroot LSTM LM te ontvang, gebaseer op by by by aangaande inligting in geheue in proporsie tot die aantal tydstrekkings die LSTM versameling mekanisme die inligting voorgebly.", 'sq': 'Modelet e gjuhës së rrjetit neural të përsëritur të përbërë nga njësitë LSTM, veçan ërisht ato të shtuara me një kujtim të jashtëm, kanë arritur rezultate më të larta në modelimin e gjuhës. However, these models still struggle to process long sequences which are more likely to contain long-distance dependencies because of information fading.  Në këtë letër ne demonstrojmë një mekanizëm efektiv për marrjen e informacionit në një LSTM LM të rritur në kujtesë bazuar në ndjekjen e informacionit në kujtesë në proporcion me numrin e hapave kohore mekanizmi gating LSTM vazhdoi informacionin.', 'am': 'የአሁኑ የኔural Network ቋንቋ ሞዴል LSTM ዩንቨሮች በተለየ፣ በተለይም ውጭ ማስታወሻ የተጠቀሙት የቋንቋ-አርእስት ፍሬቶች በቋንቋ ሞዴል ውስጥ ደረሱ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች ደግሞ የረጅም ግንኙነትን ለመሥራት ይጋደላሉ፣ የሩቅ ተቃውሞ የሚታመኑት መረጃዎች ስለጠፉ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም የLSTM የመታሰቢያ ደረጃዎች በተደረገው የጊዜው ደረጃዎች መጠቀም በመታሰቢያ ውስጥ መረጃዎችን ለማግኘት የሚችል አካባቢ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Կրկին նյարդային ցանցի լեզվի մոդելները, որոնք կազմված են LSMT միավորներից, հատկապես նրանք, որոնք ավելացվել են արտաքին հիշողությամբ, հասել են լեզվի մոդելման ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս մոդելները դեռևս պայքարում են երկար հաջորդականություններ վերլուծելու համար, որոնք ավելի հավանական են, որ կպարունակեն երկար հեռավորության կախվածություններ տեղեկատվության անհետացման պատճառով: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ցույց ենք տալիս ինֆորմացիայի վերադարձման արդյունավետ մեխանիզմ հիշողության մեջ աճեցված LSMT LM-ում, հիմնված հիշողության մեջ տեղեկատվության սովորելու վրա, համեմատաբար LSMT Gating մեխանիզմի ժամանակային քայլերի քանակի հետ, որը', 'az': "Dərvəli Nöral Ağ Dili Modelləri LSTM birliklərindən olub, özlərinə də dış yaddaşları ilə yüksələnlər, dil modellərinin məhsullarına müvəffəq etdilər. Ancaq bu modellər hələ də uzun sequences işləmək üçün mübahisə edirlər ki, məlumatların yox olduğu üçün uzun uzaq bağlılıqları içəriləcək olar. Bu kağıtda LSTM toplama mehanizmisinin məlumatlarının sayı ilə istifadə edilməsi üçün məlumatlarını LSTM LM'də artırmaq üçün effektiv bir mehanizmini göstəririk.", 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক ভাষার মোডেল LSTM ইউনিটের সংগঠিত, বিশেষ করে যারা বাইরের স্মৃতির সাথে যোগ দিয়েছে, তারা ভাষার মডেলিং-এর স্ট তবে এই মডেলগুলো এখনও দীর্ঘ সংক্রান্ত প্রক্রিয়ার জন্য সংগ্রাম করে যাচ্ছে যা তথ্য ধারার কারণে দীর্ঘ দূরত্বের নির্ভ এই প্রবন্ধে আমরা একটি কার্যকর পদ্ধতি প্রদর্শন করেছি এলএসএমএমএলএমএমএর স্মৃতিতে তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধার করার জন্যে তথ্য প্রদর্শন করা যাচ্ছে যা সময়ের সংখ্যার সংখ্যার মাধ্যমে', 'bs': 'Ponovne neuronske jezičke modele koje su sastavljene od LSTM jedinica, posebno one koje su povećane sa spoljnom sjećanjem, postigle su state-of-the-art rezultate u modelima jezika. Međutim, ovi modeli se i dalje bore za proces dugih sekvencija koje su vjerojatnije sadržavajući zavisnosti od daleke udaljenosti zbog nestanka informacija. U ovom papiru pokazujemo efikasan mehanizam za prikupljanje informacija u uspomeni povećanog LSTM LM-a na temelju prisustvovanja informacija u sjećanju u proporciji broja vremenskih koraka koje je mehanizam prikupljanja LSTM-a nastavio podaci.', 'ca': "Models de llenguatge de la xarxa neural recurrent composts d'unitats LSTM, especialment aquells augmentats amb una memòria externa, han aconseguit resultats més avançats en la Modelació de llenguatge. No obstant això, aquests models encara lluiten per processar seqüències llargues que tenen més probabilitats de contenir depències a llargues distàncies a causa de la desaparició de la informació. In this paper we demonstrate an effective mechanism for retrieving information in a memory augmented LSTM LM based on attending to information in memory in proportion to the number of timesteps the LSTM gating mechanism persisted the information.", 'et': 'LSTM-üksustest koosnevad korduvad neurovõrgu keelemudelid, eriti välise mäluga täiendatud mudelid, on saavutanud keelemudelite modelleerimises tipptasemel tulemusi. Kuid need mudelid ei suuda siiski töödelda pikki järjestusi, mis sisaldavad suurema tõenäosusega kaugsõltuvusi teabe hajumise tõttu. Käesolevas töös demonstreerime tõhusat mehhanismi teabe hankimiseks mälu suurendatud LSTM LM-s, mis põhineb teabe käsitlemisel mälus proportsionaalselt aegade arvuga, mil LSTM-i värvimismehhanism teavet püsis.', 'cs': 'Modely recidivních neuronových sítí složené z LSTM jednotek, zejména ty rozšířené o externí paměť, dosáhly nejmodernějších výsledků v jazykovém modelování. Tyto modely se však stále potýkají se zpracováním dlouhých sekvencí, které mají větší pravděpodobnost, že budou obsahovat dálkové závislosti kvůli vyblednutí informací. V tomto článku demonstrujeme efektivní mechanismus získávání informací v paměťovém rozšířeném LSTM LM založený na zájmu informací v paměti v poměru k počtu časových kroků, které LSTM gating mechanismus přetrvával informace.', 'fi': 'LSTM-yksiköistä koostuvat toistuvat hermoverkkokielimallit, erityisesti ulkoisella muistilla lisätyt, ovat saavuttaneet viimeisimpiä tuloksia kielimallinnuksessa. Näillä malleilla on kuitenkin edelleen vaikeuksia käsitellä pitkiä sekvenssejä, jotka todennäköisesti sisältävät pitkän matkan riippuvuuksia tiedon haalistumisen vuoksi. Tässä artikkelissa osoitetaan tehokas mekanismi tiedon noutamiseksi muistin lisätystä LSTM LM:stä, joka perustuu muistiin tallennettuun informaatioon suhteessa siihen, kuinka monta kertaa LSTM-gating-mekanismi säilytti tiedon.', 'he': 'דוגמני שפת רשת נוירולית מחדשות המרכיבים ביחידות LSTM, במיוחד אלה שגודלים עם זיכרון חיצוני, השיגו תוצאות חדשות במודיל שפת. עם זאת, דוגמנים אלה עדיין נאבקים לתהליך רצפים ארוכים שכנראה יותר מכילים תלויות במרחקים ארוכים בגלל המידע נעלם. בעיתון הזה אנחנו מראים מנגנון יעיל להשיג מידע בזיכרון משותף LSTM LM מבוסס על להשתתף במידע בזיכרון בהתאם למספר צעדים הזמן מנגנון גייט LSTM המשיך במידע.', 'sk': 'Ponavljajoči se živčni jezikovni modeli, sestavljeni iz enot LSTM, zlasti tistih, ki so povečani z zunanjim pomnilnikom, so dosegli najsodobnejše rezultate v jezikovnem modeliranju. Vendar pa ti modeli še vedno težko obdelujejo dolga zaporedja, ki zaradi bledenja informacij verjetneje vsebujejo odvisnosti na dolge razdalje. V tem prispevku smo prikazali učinkovit mehanizem za pridobivanje informacij v pomnilniškem LSTM LM, ki temelji na skrbi za informacije v pomnilniku sorazmerno s številom časovnih korakov, ko je LSTM mehanizem ohranil informacije.', 'ha': "@ action: button A lokacin da haka, waɗannan misãlai sun yi ƙari zuwa tafiyar da sauri masu yiwuwa sun fi kusa su sami danganta ga tsawo mai tsawo, saboda haka da information za'a fade. In this paper we demonstrate an effective mechanism for retrieving information in a memory augmented LSTM LM based on attending to information in memory in proportion to the number of timesteps the LSTM gating mechanism persisted the information.", 'jv': 'rectangle-tool-options Nanging, modelo iki sampeyan nguasai nggawe akeh operasi layang seneng pisan kang dipunangé luwih dumateng, kaya ngono informasi layang. Nang pepulan iki kita nambah mehanimis sing ora nggawe informasi ing nggawe informasi ning laran ning memperbudhakan sing lihok GLM sing bisa supoyo nambah kanggo ngeratan informasi ning dipunangé sampek karo nganggo langkung aku operasi kanggo mehanimis kang nggawe informasi', 'bo': 'Recurrent Neural Network Language Models composed of LSTM units, especially those augmented with an external memory, have achieved state-of-the-art results in Language Modeling. However, these models still struggle to process long sequences which are more likely to contain long-distance dependencies because of information fading. In this paper we demonstrate an effective mechanism for retrieving information in a memory augmented LSTM LM based on attending to information in memory in proportion to the number of timesteps the LSTM gating mechanism persisted the information.'}
{'en': 'Development and Evaluation of Three Named Entity Recognition Systems for Serbian-The Case of Personal Names', 'ar': 'تطوير وتقييم ثلاثة أنظمة للتعرف على الكيانات المسماة للصربية - حالة الأسماء الشخصية', 'fr': "Développement et évaluation de trois systèmes de reconnaissance d'entités nommées pour le serbe - Le cas des noms de personnes", 'es': 'Desarrollo y evaluación de tres sistemas de reconocimiento de entidades nombradas para serbio: el caso de los nombres personales', 'pt': 'Desenvolvimento e Avaliação de Três Sistemas de Reconhecimento de Entidades Nomeadas para Sérvio - O Caso de Nomes Pessoais', 'ja': 'セルビア人のための3つの名前付きエンティティ認識システムの開発と評価-個人名のケース', 'ru': 'Разработка и оценка трех названных систем распознавания сущностей для сербского языка - случай личных имен', 'hi': 'सर्बियाई के लिए तीन नामित इकाई मान्यता प्रणालियों का विकास और मूल्यांकन - व्यक्तिगत नामों का मामला', 'zh': '塞尔维亚语三命实体识别系统开估——人名案例', 'ga': 'Forbairt agus Meastóireacht ar Trí Chóras Aitheantais Aonáin Ainmnithe don Seirbis - Cás na nAinmneacha Pearsanta', 'ka': 'სამი სახელი ინტერტის განახლების სისტემის განვითარება და განსაზღვრება - პირადი სახელის შესახებ', 'el': 'Ανάπτυξη και Αξιολόγηση Συστημάτων Αναγνώρισης Τριών Οντών για τη Σερβική', 'hu': 'Három nevezett entitás felismerő rendszer fejlesztése és értékelése szerb számára - A személyes nevek esete', 'it': 'Sviluppo e valutazione di tre sistemi di riconoscimento delle entità nominate per il serbo - Il caso dei nomi personali', 'lt': 'Development and Evaluation of Three Named Entity Recognition Systems for Serbian - The Case of Personal Names', 'mk': 'Развој и евалуација на системите за признавање на три именувани ентитети за српско - случај на лични имиња', 'kk': 'Сербияның үш аталған нысандарды анықтау жүйесінің құрылымы және оқиға - Дербес атаулар үшін', 'mn': 'Гурван нэрлэгдсэн Объект Recognition Systems for Serbian - The Case of Personal Names', 'mt': "Żvilupp u Evalwazzjoni ta' Sistemi ta' Rikonoxximent ta' Tliet Entitajiet Ismija għas-Serb - Il-Każ ta' Ismijiet Personali", 'ms': 'Pembangunan dan penilaian Sistem Pengenalan Tiga Entiti bernama untuk Serbia - Kasus Nama Peribadi', 'ml': 'സെര്\u200dബിയയ്ക്കുള്ള മൂന്നു പേരുള്ള എന്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള സിസ്റ്റം വികസിപ്പിക്കുക', 'pl': 'Opracowanie i ocena systemów rozpoznawania trzech podmiotów nazwanych dla serbskiego przypadku imion osobistych', 'ro': 'Dezvoltarea și evaluarea a trei sisteme de recunoaștere a entităților numite pentru sârbă - Cazul numelor personale', 'no': 'Utvikling og evaluering av tre namn oppkjenningssystemer for serbisk – Case of Personal Names', 'sr': 'Razvoj i procjena tri imenovane sistema prepoznavanja entiteta za Srbiju - slučaj ličnih imena', 'si': 'සෙර්බියාන් විකාශය සහ විශ්වාසය තුනක් නම් ඇන්තිත් ප්\u200dරතිකාරණ පද්ධතිය - The case of personals Names', 'so': 'Development and evaluation of Three Named Entity Recognition Systems for Serbian - Case of Personal Names', 'ta': 'செர்பியனுக்கான மூன்று பெயரிடப்பட்ட Entity Recognition Systems for Development and Evaluation of Personal Names Case of Case of Personal Names', 'sv': 'Utveckling och utvärdering av system för erkännande av tre namngivna enheter för serbiska - fallet med personliga namn', 'ur': 'سوربی کے لئے تین نام دار Entity Recognition Systems کی توسعہ اور Evaluation - The Case of Personal Names', 'vi': 'Phát triển và đánh giá ba hệ thống nhận dạng con người có tên cho người Séc- Vụ án tên cá nhân', 'uz': 'Name', 'da': 'Udvikling og evaluering af tre navngivne enhedsanerkendelsessystemer for serbisk - Tilfældet med personnavne', 'bg': 'Разработване и оценка на три системи за признаване на имена за сръбски език - случаят с личните имена', 'hr': 'Razvoj i procjena sustava priznanja tri imena entiteta za Srbije - Slučaj osobnih imena', 'nl': 'Ontwikkeling en evaluatie van drie naamloze entiteitsherkenningssystemen voor Servisch in het geval van persoonlijke namen', 'de': 'Entwicklung und Evaluation von Drei Named Entity Recognition Systemen für Serbisch im Fall von Personennamen', 'id': 'Pembangunan dan Evaluasi Sistem Pengenalan Tiga Entitas bernama untuk Serbia - Kasus Nama Pribadi', 'ko': '세르비아인 세 가지 명명 실체 식별 시스템의 개발과 평가 - 인명을 중심으로', 'fa': 'توسعه و ارزیابی سیستم شناسایی یک entity نامیده برای سربی - پرونده نام شخصی', 'sw': 'Development and Evaluation of Three Named Entity Recognition Systems for Serbian - The Case of Personal Names', 'tr': 'Serbçe üçin Adlanýän Taýýarlama Systemleri', 'af': 'Ontwikkeling en Evaluering van drie genoem Entiteit-herkeningsstelsels vir Serbiese - Die Kas van Persoonlike Naams', 'am': 'የሦስት የተባለው Entity Recognition Systems for Serbian - The Case of Personal Names', 'sq': 'Zhvillimi dhe vlerësimi i tre sistemeve të njohjes së njësive të emëruara për serbët - rasti i emrave personale', 'az': 'Sırbistan üçün Üç Adlı Entity Recognition Systemlərin Geliştirməsi və Qərcləməsi - Şahsiy Adları Davası', 'bs': 'Razvoj i procjena sustava priznanja tri imena entiteta za srbije - Slučaj ličnih imena', 'hy': 'Սրբերական երեք անվանված անհատականության ճանաչման համակարգերի զարգացումը և գնահատումը - Անձնական անվանների դեպքում', 'bn': 'সার্বিয়ানের জন্য তিনটি নামের প্রতিষ্ঠান পরিচিতি সিস্টেমের উন্নয়ন এবং মূল্যায়ন- ব্যক্তিগত নামের মামলা', 'cs': 'Vývoj a hodnocení systémů rozpoznávání tří jmenovaných subjektů pro srbský případ osobních jmen', 'ca': 'Desenvolviment i evaluació de sistemes de reconeixement de tres entitats anomenats per a serb - El cas de noms personals', 'et': 'Kolme nimega üksuse tunnustamise süsteemi arendamine ja hindamine serbia keeles - isikuandmete juhtum', 'fi': 'Kolmen nimetyn yksikön tunnistusjärjestelmän kehittäminen ja arviointi serbiaksi - Henkilönimien tapaus', 'jv': 'Attribute lan Validity of 3 Named EntityAttribution System for Server - The Case of Personal Names', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Razvoj in ocena treh sistemov za prepoznavanje imenovanih subjektov za srbski jezik - primer osebnih imen', 'bo': 'སྒེར་གྱི་མིང་དང་མིང་བཏགས་པའི་Entity Recognition Systems for Serbian ་གི་ཡར་རྒྱས་སྐྱོར་དང་Evaluation of Three Named Entity Recognition Systems for Serbian - The Case of Personal Names', 'he': 'פיתוח והעריכה של שלוש מערכות זיהוי איכויות בשמות לסרבית - מקרה של שמות אישיים'}
{'en': 'In this paper we present a rule- and lexicon-based system for the recognition of Named Entities (NE) in Serbian newspaper texts that was used to prepare a gold standard annotated with personal names. It was further used to prepare training sets for four different levels of annotation, which were further used to train two Named Entity Recognition (NER) systems : Stanford and spaCy. All obtained models, together with a rule- and lexicon-based system were evaluated on two sample texts : a part of the gold standard and an independent newspaper text of approximately the same size. The results show that rule- and lexicon-based system outperforms trained models in all four scenarios (measured by F1), while Stanford models has the highest precision. All systems obtain best results in recognizing full names, while the recognition of first names only is rather poor. The produced models are incorporated into a Web platform NER&Beyond that provides various NE-related functions.', 'ar': 'نقدم في هذا البحث نظامًا قائمًا على القواعد والمعجم للتعرف على الكيانات المسماة (NE) في نصوص الصحف الصربية والذي تم استخدامه لإعداد معيار ذهبي مشروح بأسماء شخصية. كما تم استخدامه لإعداد مجموعات التدريب لأربعة مستويات مختلفة من التعليقات التوضيحية ، والتي تم استخدامها أيضًا لتدريب نظامين للتعرف على الكيانات المسماة (NER): ستانفورد و spaCy. تم تقييم جميع النماذج التي تم الحصول عليها ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع النظام القائم على القواعد والمعجم على نصين نموذجيين: جزء من المعيار الذهبي ونص صحيفة مستقل بنفس الحجم تقريبًا. تظهر النتائج أن النظام القائم على القواعد والمعجم يتفوق في الأداء على النماذج المدربة في جميع السيناريوهات الأربعة (تقاس بـ F1) ، بينما تتميز نماذج ستانفورد بأعلى دقة. تحصل جميع الأنظمة على أفضل النتائج في التعرف على الأسماء الكاملة ، في حين أن التعرف على الأسماء الأولى فقط ضعيف نوعًا ما. تم دمج النماذج المُنتجة في منصة الويب NER & Beyond التي توفر العديد من الوظائف ذات الصلة بـ NE.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons un système basé sur des règles et un lexique pour la reconnaissance des entités nommées (NE) dans les textes de journaux serbes qui a été utilisé pour préparer un étalon-or annoté avec des noms de personnes. Il a également été utilisé pour préparer des ensembles de formation pour quatre niveaux d'annotation différents, qui ont ensuite été utilisés pour former deux systèmes de reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER)\xa0: Stanford et SPAcy. Tous les modèles obtenus, ainsi qu'un système basé sur des règles et des lexiques, ont été évalués sur deux exemples de textes\xa0: une partie de l'étalon-or et un texte de journal indépendant d'environ la même taille. Les résultats montrent que les systèmes basés sur des règles et des lexiques surpassent les modèles entraînés dans les quatre scénarios (mesurés par F1), tandis que les modèles de Stanford offrent la plus haute précision. Tous les systèmes obtiennent les meilleurs résultats en matière de reconnaissance des noms complets, alors que la reconnaissance des seuls prénoms est plutôt médiocre. Les modèles produits sont intégrés dans une plate-forme Web NER&Beyond qui fournit diverses fonctions liées à la NE.", 'es': 'En este artículo presentamos un sistema basado en reglas y léxicos para el reconocimiento de las Entidades Nombradas (NE) en los textos de los periódicos serbios que se utilizó para preparar un patrón oro anotado con nombres personales. Además, se utilizó para preparar conjuntos de entrenamiento para cuatro niveles diferentes de anotación, que se utilizaron para entrenar dos sistemas de reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER): Stanford y SpAcy. Todos los modelos obtenidos, junto con un sistema basado en reglas y léxico, se evaluaron en dos textos de muestra: una parte del patrón oro y un texto de periódico independiente de aproximadamente el mismo tamaño. Los resultados muestran que el sistema basado en reglas y léxicos supera a los modelos entrenados en los cuatro escenarios (medidos por F1), mientras que los modelos de Stanford tienen la mayor precisión. Todos los sistemas obtienen mejores resultados en el reconocimiento de nombres completos, mientras que el reconocimiento de los nombres solo es bastante deficiente. Los modelos producidos se incorporan a una plataforma web NER&beyond que proporciona varias funciones relacionadas con la NE.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo apresentamos um sistema baseado em regras e léxico para o reconhecimento de Entidades Nomeadas (NE) em textos de jornais sérvios que foi usado para preparar um padrão-ouro anotado com nomes pessoais. Foi ainda usado para preparar conjuntos de treinamento para quatro níveis diferentes de anotação, que foram usados para treinar dois sistemas de Reconhecimento de Entidade Nomeada (NER): Stanford e spaCy. Todos os modelos obtidos, juntamente com um sistema baseado em regras e léxicos, foram avaliados em dois textos de amostra: uma parte do padrão-ouro e um texto de jornal independente de aproximadamente o mesmo tamanho. Os resultados mostram que o sistema baseado em regras e léxico supera os modelos treinados em todos os quatro cenários (medidos por F1), enquanto os modelos de Stanford têm a maior precisão. Todos os sistemas obtêm melhores resultados no reconhecimento de nomes completos, enquanto o reconhecimento apenas dos primeiros nomes é bastante pobre. Os modelos produzidos são incorporados a uma plataforma Web NER&Beyond que oferece diversas funções relacionadas ao NE.', 'ja': 'この論文では、セルビアの新聞テキストにおける名前付きエンティティ（ NE ）を認識するためのルールベースおよび辞書ベースのシステムを紹介します。これは、個人名で注釈されたゴールドスタンダードを作成するために使用されました。さらに、４つの異なるレベルの注釈のためのトレーニングセットを準備するために使用した。これらは、さらに、２つの名前付きエンティティ認識（ ＮＥＲ ）システム： ＳｔａｎｆｏｒｄとＳｐａＣｙのトレーニングに使用した。得られたすべてのモデルは、ルールベースおよびレキシコンベースのシステムと共に、金基準の一部とほぼ同じサイズの独立した新聞テキストの2つのサンプルテキストで評価された。結果は、ルールベースおよび辞書ベースのシステムが、（ F 1によって測定される）すべての4つのシナリオで訓練されたモデルよりも優れていることを示していますが、スタンフォードモデルは最も精度が高いことを示しています。すべてのシステムは、フルネームを認識するのに最適な結果を得ますが、ファーストネームのみの認識はかなり貧弱です。生産されたモデルは、様々なNE関連機能を提供するWebプラットフォームNER&amp;Beyondに組み込まれています。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем основанную на правилах и лексике систему распознавания именованных сущностей (NE) в текстах сербских газет, которая была использована для подготовки золотого стандарта с аннотацией личных имен. Кроме того, он использовался для подготовки учебных наборов для четырех различных уровней аннотирования, которые затем использовались для обучения двух систем распознавания именованных образований (NER): Стэнфордской и SpaCy. Все полученные модели вместе с системой на основе правил и лексиконов оценивались на двух образцах текстов: часть золотого стандарта и независимый текст газеты примерно одинакового размера. Результаты показывают, что основанная на правилах и лексиконе система превосходит обученные модели во всех четырех сценариях (измеренных с помощью F1), в то время как Стэнфордские модели имеют самую высокую точность. Все системы добиваются наилучших результатов в распознавании полных имен, в то время как распознавание только имен является довольно слабым. Полученные модели интегрированы в веб-платформу NER&amp;Beyond, которая обеспечивает различные функции, связанные с NE.', 'zh': '本文者,立一法词典之统,以别塞尔维亚报纸名实之(NE),以备黄金之注。 更以备四注,更以练二名(NER)统:斯坦福、spaCy。 凡得模形,及法词典之统,皆以两本为质:黄金之一,大小大同报纸本。 结果表明者,法词典之统也,四者皆优于教(F1度),而斯坦福有至精。 凡统在全名皆得其最,而仅知名则差。 生整合一Web台NER&Beyond中,供百NE之功。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम सर्बियाई समाचार पत्र ग्रंथों में नामित संस्थाओं (एनई) की मान्यता के लिए एक नियम- और शब्दकोश-आधारित प्रणाली प्रस्तुत करते हैं जिसका उपयोग व्यक्तिगत नामों के साथ एनोटेट किए गए सोने के मानक को तैयार करने के लिए किया गया था। इसका उपयोग एनोटेशन के चार अलग-अलग स्तरों के लिए प्रशिक्षण सेट तैयार करने के लिए किया गया था, जिसका उपयोग आगे दो नामित एंटिटी रिकग्निशन (एनईआर) सिस्टम को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए किया गया था: स्टैनफोर्ड और स्पासी। सभी प्राप्त मॉडल, एक नियम- और शब्दकोश-आधारित प्रणाली के साथ दो नमूना ग्रंथों पर मूल्यांकन किए गए थे: सोने के मानक का एक हिस्सा और लगभग एक ही आकार का एक स्वतंत्र समाचार पत्र पाठ। परिणाम बताते हैं कि नियम- और शब्दकोश-आधारित प्रणाली सभी चार परिदृश्यों (एफ 1 द्वारा मापा जाता है) में प्रशिक्षित मॉडल को मात देती है, जबकि स्टैनफोर्ड मॉडल में उच्चतम परिशुद्धता होती है। सभी प्रणालियां पूर्ण नामों को पहचानने में सर्वोत्तम परिणाम प्राप्त करती हैं, जबकि पहले नामों की मान्यता केवल खराब होती है। उत्पादित मॉडल को एक वेब प्लेटफ़ॉर्म एनईआर एंड बियॉन्ड में शामिल किया गया है जो विभिन्न एनई-संबंधित कार्य प्रदान करता है।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid i láthair córas bunaithe ar rialacha agus foclóir d’aithint Eintitis Ainmnithe (NE) i dtéacsanna nuachtáin Seirbis a úsáideadh chun caighdeán óir a ullmhú a bhfuil anót air le hainmneacha pearsanta. Úsáideadh tuilleadh é chun tacair oiliúna a ullmhú do cheithre leibhéal éagsúla anótála, a úsáideadh tuilleadh chun dhá chóras Aitheantais Aonán Ainmnithe (NER) a thraenáil: Stanford agus spaCy. Rinneadh measúnú ar na samhlacha go léir a fuarthas, mar aon le córas bunaithe ar rialacha agus foclóir ar dhá théacs shamplacha: cuid den chaighdeán óir agus téacs neamhspleách nuachtáin a bhí thart ar an méid céanna. Léiríonn na torthaí go n-éiríonn níos fearr leis an gcóras atá bunaithe ar rialacha agus ar fhoclóirí ná samhlacha oilte i ngach ceann de na ceithre chás (arna thomhas ag F1), agus tá an cruinneas is airde ag samhlacha Stanford. Faigheann gach córas na torthaí is fearr maidir le hainmneacha iomlána a aithint, cé go bhfuil aitheantas céadainmneacha amháin sách lag. Ionchorpraítear na samhlacha a tháirgtear in ardán Gréasáin NER&Beyond a sholáthraíonn feidhmeanna éagsúla a bhaineann le NE.', 'ka': 'ამ დოგუნში ჩვენ ჩვენ სერბიანური გახსნილის ტექსტში, რომელიც სერბიანური გახსნილის სისტემაში გამოიყენებულია, რომელიც პირადგილური სახელებით მონიშნულია დოლექსიკონური სტანდარ ეს მეტი გამოყენებულია, რომ საკუთარი განსხვავებული ანტოციის 4 განსხვავებული დონეებისთვის გარგება, რომლებიც მეტი გამოყენებულია ორი სახელი ინტერტის განახლება (NER) სისტემისთვის: სტ ყველა მიიღებული მოდელები, რომელიც წესების და ლექსიკონური სისტემის დამატებული სისტემის შემდეგ ორი მოდელური ტექსტიდან გაუმუშავებულია: დალარტის სტანდარტულის ნაწილი და დამუშ პროცემები ჩვენებს, რომ პროგრამის და ლექსიკონის ბაზაზე სისტემა უფრო გავაკეთებს მოდელებს ყველა ოთხი სენარიოში (F1-ზე მოზემილი), როცა სტანფორდის მოდელების უფრო დიდი ყველა სისტემები უკეთესი შედეგები მიიღებს ყველა სახელის განაცნობაში, მაგრამ პირველი სახელის განაცნობა მხოლოდ ცოტა. გამოიყენებული მოდელები ვებ პლატატურაში დაყენებულია NER&Beyond, რომელიც განსხვავებული NE-თან დაკავშირებული ფუნქციები.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban bemutatunk egy szabály- és lexikon alapú rendszert a Nevezett Entitások (NE) felismerésére a szerb újságszövegekben, amelynek segítségével személyes nevekkel ellátott arany szabványt készítettünk. Továbbá négy különböző szintű megjegyzések képzésére használták, amelyeket tovább két Nevezett Entity Recognition (NER) rendszer képzésére használtak: Stanford és spaCy. Az összes kapott modellt, valamint egy szabály- és lexikon-alapú rendszert két mintaszöveg alapján értékeltük: az aranyszabvány egy része és egy független újságszöveg körülbelül azonos méretű. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a szabályok és lexikon alapú rendszerek mind a négy forgatókönyvben felülmúlják a képzett modelleket, míg a Stanford modellek a legnagyobb pontossággal rendelkeznek. A teljes nevek felismerésében minden rendszer a legjobb eredményt éri el, míg csak a keresztnevek felismerése meglehetősen gyenge. Az előállított modellek egy NER&Beyond webplatformba épülnek, amely különböző NE-hez kapcsolódó funkciókat biztosít.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζουμε ένα σύστημα αναγνώρισης ονομάτων οντοτήτων σε κείμενα σερβικών εφημερίδων που χρησιμοποιήθηκε για την προετοιμασία ενός χρυσού προτύπου με σχόλια προσωπικού χαρακτήρα. Χρησιμοποίησε περαιτέρω για την προετοιμασία εκπαιδευτικών συνόλων για τέσσερα διαφορετικά επίπεδα σχολιασμού, τα οποία χρησιμοποιήθηκαν περαιτέρω για την εκπαίδευση δύο συστημάτων αναγνώρισης Ονόματων Οντότητας: Στάνφορντ και spaCy. Όλα τα μοντέλα που ελήφθησαν μαζί με ένα σύστημα βασισμένο σε κανόνες και λεξικό αξιολογήθηκαν σε δύο δείγματα κειμένων: ένα μέρος του χρυσού προτύπου και ένα ανεξάρτητο κείμενο εφημερίδας περίπου του ίδιου μεγέθους. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το σύστημα βασισμένο σε κανόνες και λεξικά ξεπερνά τα εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα και στα τέσσερα σενάρια (μετρημένα με F1), ενώ τα μοντέλα Στάνφορντ έχουν την υψηλότερη ακρίβεια. Όλα τα συστήματα επιτυγχάνουν τα καλύτερα αποτελέσματα στην αναγνώριση των πλήρων ονομάτων, ενώ η αναγνώριση μόνο των ονομάτων είναι μάλλον κακή. Τα παραγόμενα μοντέλα ενσωματώνονται σε μια διαδικτυακή πλατφόρμα που παρέχει διάφορες λειτουργίες που σχετίζονται με το ΒΑ.', 'it': 'In questo articolo presentiamo un sistema basato su regole e lessici per il riconoscimento delle entità nominate (NE) nei testi dei giornali serbi che è stato utilizzato per preparare un gold standard annotato con nomi personali. È stato inoltre utilizzato per preparare set di formazione per quattro diversi livelli di annotazione, che sono stati ulteriormente utilizzati per formare due sistemi di riconoscimento delle entità denominate (NER): Stanford e spaCy. Tutti i modelli ottenuti, insieme ad un sistema basato su regole e lessici, sono stati valutati su due testi campione: una parte del gold standard e un testo indipendente di giornale di circa le stesse dimensioni. I risultati mostrano che il sistema basato su regole e lessici supera i modelli addestrati in tutti e quattro gli scenari (misurati da F1), mentre i modelli Stanford hanno la massima precisione. Tutti i sistemi ottengono i migliori risultati nel riconoscimento dei nomi completi, mentre il riconoscimento solo dei nomi è piuttosto scarso. I modelli prodotti sono incorporati in una piattaforma Web NER&Beyond che fornisce varie funzioni relative alla NE.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз аталған нысандар (НБ) тізіміне белгіленген алтын стандартты тізімді дайындау үшін серб жаңалық мәтіндерінде арналған ережелер мен лексиканды негіздеген жүйесін көрсетедік. Бұл төрт әртүрлі жазбалардың төрт түрлі деңгейінде оқыту бағдарламасын дайындау үшін қолданылды. Бұл екі аталған нысандарды қалау (NER) жүйесі: Станфорд және Спаци. Бүкіл алған үлгілер, ережелер мен лексиканың негіздеген жүйесі бірге екі үлгілер мәтіндеріне бағалады: алтын стандарттың бөлігі және тәуелсіз қағаз мәтіндерінің бір өлшемі. Нәтижелер ережелер мен лексиканды негіздеген жүйенің төрт сценариясында оқылған үлгілерді (F1 деген өлшемі), Станфорд үлгілерінде ең дұрыс бар. Барлық жүйелер толық атауларды анықтау үшін ең жақсы нәтижелерді алады, бірақ бірінші атауларды анықтау үшін тек кедей болады. Жасалған үлгілер NER&Beyond веб- платформасына қосылған. Бұл әртүрлі NE- қатынастық функцияларды қамтамасыз етеді.', 'lt': 'Šiame laikraštyje Serbijos laikraščių tekstuose pateikiama taisyklėmis ir tekstais pagrįsta pavadintų subjektų (NE) pripažinimo sistema, kuri buvo naudojama rengti aukso standartą, pažymėtą asmeniniais vardais. It was further used to prepare training sets for four different levels of annotation, which were further used to train two Named Entity Recognition (NER) systems: Stanford and spaCy.  Visi gauti modeliai kartu su taisyklėmis ir tekstais pagrįsta sistema buvo įvertinti pagal du pavyzdžius: aukso standarto dalį ir maždaug vienodo dydžio nepriklausomą laikraščio tekstą. The results show that rule- and lexicon-based system outperforms trained models in all four scenarios (measured by F1), while Stanford models has the highest precision.  All systems obtain best results in recognizing full names, while the recognition of first names only is rather poor.  Gaminti modeliai įtraukti į tinklalapį NER&Beyond, kuriame numatytos įvairios su NE susijusios funkcijos.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник претставуваме систем базиран на правила и лексикони за признавање на именуваните ентитети (НЕ) во српските весници тексти кои беа користени за подготвување златен стандард анотиран со лични имиња. Истата беше понатаму употребена за подготвување на сетови на обука за четири различни нивоа на анотација, кои беа понатаму употребени за обука на два системи на препознавање на именувани ентитети (NER): Стенфорд и spaCy. Сите добиени модели, заедно со систем базиран на правила и лексикони, беа проценети на два тексти на примероци: дел од златниот стандард и независен весник текст од околу иста големина. Резултатите покажуваат дека системот базиран на правила и лексикони ги надминува обучените модели во сите четири сценарија (мерени од Ф1), додека Стенфордските модели имаат највисока прецизност. Сите системи добиваат најдобри резултати во признавањето на целосни имиња, додека признавањето на презимите е доста лошо. Произведените модели се вклучени во веб платформата NER&Beyond која обезбедува различни функции поврзани со NE.', 'ms': 'In this paper we present a rule- and lexicon-based system for the recognition of Named Entities (NE) in Serbian newspaper texts that was used to prepare a gold standard annotated with personal names.  It was further used to prepare training sets for four different levels of annotation, which were further used to train two Named Entity Recognition (NER) systems: Stanford and spaCy.  Semua model yang diperoleh, bersama dengan sistem berdasarkan peraturan dan leksikon telah diteliti pada dua teks sampel: sebahagian dari piawai emas dan teks surat khabar independen sekitar saiz yang sama. The results show that rule- and lexicon-based system outperforms trained models in all four scenarios (measured by F1), while Stanford models has the highest precision.  All systems obtain best results in recognizing full names, while the recognition of first names only is rather poor.  Model yang dihasilkan disertai dalam platform Web NER&Beyond yang menyediakan berbagai fungsi berkaitan NE.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെര്\u200dബിയയിലെ പത്രത്തിലെ പേരുകളുടെ (NE) തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനായി നാം നിയമവും ലെക്സിക്കോണ്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം കൊണ്ടുവരുന നാലു വ്യത്യസ്ത പരിശീലനത്തിനുള്ള പരിശീലന സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d തയ്യാറാക്കുവാന്\u200d അത് ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരുന്നു. രണ്ട് പേരുള്ള എന്റിറ്റിയിറ്റി  കിട്ടിയ എല്ലാ മോഡലുകളും ഒരു നിയമവും ലെക്സിക്കോണ്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സിസ്റ്റം കൊണ്ട് രണ്ട് മാമ്പിള്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d വിലയിച്ചു ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നിയമവും ലെക്സിക്സണ്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള സിസ്റ്റം എല്ലാ നാല് സിനിയകളിലും പരിശീലന മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക് എല്ലാ സിസ്റ്റത്തിലും പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പേരുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യ പേര സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഒരു വെബ് പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dത്തിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിനു പുറമെ നെയിന്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെ', 'mt': 'F’din id-dokument qed nippreżentaw sistema bbażata fuq ir-regoli u l-lexicons għar-rikonoxximent ta’ Entitajiet Ismija (NE) fit-testi tal-gazzetti Serbi li ntużaw biex jitħejja standard tad-deheb annotat b’ismijiet personali. Kien użat ukoll biex jitħejjew settijiet ta’ taħriġ għal erba’ livelli differenti ta’ annotazzjoni, li ntużaw aktar biex jitħarrġu żewġ sistemi ta’ Rikonoxximent ta’ Entità Ismija (NER): Stanford u spaCy. All obtained models, together with a rule- and lexicon-based system were evaluated on two sample texts: a part of the gold standard and an independent newspaper text of approximately the same size.  The results show that rule- and lexicon-based system outperforms trained models in all four scenarios (measured by F1), while Stanford models has the highest precision.  Is-sistemi kollha jiksbu l-aħjar riżultati fir-rikonoxximent tal-ismijiet sħaħ, filwaqt li r-rikonoxximent tal-ismijiet biss huwa pjuttost fqir. Il-mudelli prodotti huma inkorporati f’pjattaforma tal-internet NER&Beyond li tipprovdi diversi funzjonijiet relatati mal-NE.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид Серб нэрлэгдсэн Ерөнхийлөгч (NE) гэдэг сонины бичиг дээр алтын стандарт бэлтгэхэд хэрэглэгдсэн сонины бичиг бичсэн. Үүнийг дахиад 4 өөр түвшинд дасгал хөгжүүлэх сургалтыг бэлдэхийн тулд ашиглаж байсан. Энэ нь Стэнфорд болон Спаци хоёр нэрлэгдсэн Entity Recognition (NER) системийг сургалтын тулд ашиглаж байсан. Бүх хүлээн авсан загварууд, хууль болон лексикон суурилсан системтэй хамтдаа хоёр жишээн бичсэн. Алтан стандартын нэг хэсэг болон хамааралтай сонины хэсэг нь ойролцоогоор ижил хэмжээтэй. Үүний үр дүнд дүрэм болон лексикон суурилсан систем бүх 4 хувилбарт сургалтын загваруудыг (F1-ээр хэмжигдсэн), Стэнфорд загварууд хамгийн өндөр тодорхой байдаг. Бүх системүүд бүрэн нэр хүлээн зөвхөн анхны нэр хүлээн зөвхөн ядуу байдаг. Ингээд бүтээгдэхүүний загварууд нь NER&Beyond веб-платформуудад бүрдсэн юм. Энэ нь NER-тэй холбоотой олон функцийг хангадаг.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi eit regel- og leksikonbasert system for å gjenkjenna namnet einingar (NE) i Serbiske arktekstar som vart brukt til å forberede eit gull- standard merkt med personlege namn. Det var lenger brukt for å forberede opplæringssett for fire ulike nivå av annotasjonar, som var lenger brukt til å trenja to namnet entitetskjenningssystemer: Stanford og spaCy. Alle opptekte modeller, saman med eit regel- og leksikonbasert system, vart evaluert på to prøvetekstar: ein del av gullstartet og ein uavhengig tekst på bakgrunnen med omtrent same storleik. Resultatet viser at regel- og leksikonbasert systemet utfører trengte modeller i alle fire scenario (målt av F1), mens Stanford- modeller har den høgste presisjonen. Alle systema får beste resultat i gjenkjenning av fullstendige namn, mens berre gjenkjenning av første namn er ganske fattig. Dette produserte modelane er inkludert i eit nettplattform NER&Beyond som tilbyr ulike funksjonar med NE-relaterte funksjonar.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy oparty na regułach i leksykonach system rozpoznawania Nazwanych Podmiotów (NE) w serbskich tekstach gazetowych, który został wykorzystany do przygotowania złotego standardu adnotacji imionami osobistymi. Ponadto wykorzystano go do przygotowania zestawów szkoleniowych dla czterech różnych poziomów adnotacji, które zostały wykorzystane do szkolenia dwóch systemów rozpoznawania nazwanych podmiotów (NER): Stanford i spaCy. Wszystkie uzyskane modele wraz z systemem opartym na regułach i leksykonach oceniano na dwóch przykładowych tekstach: części złotego standardu i niezależnego tekstu gazetowego o mniej więcej takiej samej wielkości. Wyniki pokazują, że system oparty na regułach i leksykonach przewyższa przeszkolone modele we wszystkich czterech scenariuszach (mierzone przez F1), natomiast modele Stanforda mają najwyższą precyzję. Wszystkie systemy uzyskują najlepsze rezultaty w rozpoznawaniu pełnych imion, natomiast rozpoznawanie tylko imion jest raczej słabe. Produkowane modele są włączone do platformy internetowej NER&Beyond, która zapewnia różne funkcje związane z NE.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare prezentăm un sistem bazat pe reguli şi lexiconice pentru recunoaşterea entităţilor numite (NE) în textele ziarelor sârbeşti, care a fost folosit pentru a pregăti un standard de aur adnotat cu nume personale. Acesta a fost folosit în continuare pentru a pregăti seturi de instruire pentru patru niveluri diferite de adnotare, care au fost utilizate în continuare pentru a instrui două sisteme de recunoaștere a entităților denumite (NER): Stanford și spaCy. Toate modelele obținute, împreună cu un sistem bazat pe reguli și lexicon, au fost evaluate pe două exemplare de texte: o parte a standardului aur și un text independent de ziar de aproximativ aceeași dimensiune. Rezultatele arată că sistemul bazat pe reguli și lexicon depășește modelele instruite în toate cele patru scenarii (măsurate prin F1), în timp ce modelele Stanford au cea mai mare precizie. Toate sistemele obțin cele mai bune rezultate în recunoașterea numelor complete, în timp ce recunoașterea numelor numai de prenume este destul de slabă. Modelele produse sunt încorporate într-o platformă web NER&Beyond care oferă diferite funcții legate de NE.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo sistem koji se temelji na pravilima i leksikonu za prepoznavanje imenih subjekta (NE) u tekstima srpskih novina koji je korišćen za pripremu zlatnog standard a annotiranog ličnim imenima. Dalje je korišćeno za pripremu seta obuke za četiri različite nivoa annotacije, koje su dalje korišćene za obuku dva sustava priznanja imenovanih entiteta (NER), Stanford i spaCy. Svi dobiveni modeli, zajedno sa pravilnim i leksikonskim sistemom, procjenjivali su na dva uzorka teksta: deo zlatnog standard a i nezavisnih teksta novina sa približno istom veličinom. Rezultati pokazuju da pravila i leksički sistem iznosi obučene modele u svim četiri scenarija (mjerene od F1), dok modeli Stanforda imaju najvišu preciznost. Svi sistemi dobijaju najbolje rezultate u priznanju punih imena, dok priznanje prvih imena je prilično siromašno. Proizvođeni modeli su uključeni u web platformu NER&Beyond koja pruža različite funkcije povezane sa NE.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaan ku soo qoraynaa nidaam sharci ah oo ku saleysan leksikan si loo aqoonsado magacyada Entitiitiitis (NE) ee qoraalka wargeyska Serbiyada oo loo isticmaalay inuu diyaariyo 标准 dahab ah oo magacyo shakhsiyan ah. Waxaa kale oo loo isticmaalay in lagu diyaariyo koorasyo waxbarasho oo loo diyaariyo afarta heer oo kala duduwan, kuwaas oo lagu sii baran jiray laba nidaam oo lagu magacaabay aqoonsashada Entity (NER): Stanford iyo spaCy. Dhammaan tusaalooyin la helay, isla markaasna waxaa lagu qiimeeyay nidaam qayb ka mid ah qoraalka tusaale ahaan ee dahabka iyo qoraal xor ah oo ku qoran isku mid ah. Abaalku waxay muuqataa in nidaamka ku saleysan ee xukun- iyo lexicon ay ka soo baxaan modello tababar lagu tababaray oo dhan afarta scenariyo (qiyaas ku qiyaasay F1), marka modellada Stanford ay haystaan xisaabta ugu sarreeya. Isticmaalka oo dhammu waxay heli karaan sabab ugu wanaagsan in lagu aqoonso magaca buuxda, marka lagu aqoonsado magaca hore oo kaliya waa baahan yahay. Tusaalada la soo saaray waxaa lagu qoraa shabakadda NER&Beyonka, kaas oo bixiya shaqooyin kala duduwan ee la xidhiidha NE.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi ett regelbaserat och lexikonbaserat system för erkännande av Named Entities (NE) i serbiska tidningstexter som användes för att utarbeta en guldstandard märkt med personliga namn. Den användes vidare för att förbereda utbildningsuppsättningar för fyra olika nivåer av notering, som ytterligare användes för att träna två Named Entity Recognition (NER) system: Stanford och spaCy. Alla erhållna modeller, tillsammans med ett regel- och lexikonbaserat system utvärderades på två exempeltexter: en del av guldstandarden och en oberoende tidningstext av ungefär samma storlek. Resultaten visar att regel- och lexikonbaserade system överträffar utbildade modeller i alla fyra scenarier (mätt med F1), medan Stanfordmodeller har högsta precision. Alla system får bästa resultat när det gäller att känna igen fullständiga namn, medan erkännandet av förnamn bara är ganska dålig. De producerade modellerna är integrerade i en webbplattform NER&Beyond som tillhandahåller olika NE-relaterade funktioner.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் ஒரு விதி- மற்றும் லெக்சிகோன் அடிப்படையான முறைமையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம். செர்பிய செய்திக்காரர் குறிப்புகளில் பெயர் உள நான்கு வித்தியாசமான நிலைகளுக்கு பயிற்சி அமைப்புகளை தயாரிப்பதற்கு அது பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டது, அது மேலும் இரண்டு பெயர் பெயர் உள்ளீட்டு அறிவிப அனைத்து பெற்ற மாதிரிகளும், ஒரு விதி- மற்றும் லெக்சிகோன் அடிப்படையான முறைமையுடன் இரண்டு மாதிரி உரைகளில் மதிப்பெடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது: தங்கத்த @ info: whatsthis அனைத்து கணினிகளும் முழு பெயரையும் அறிய முடியும் சிறந்த முடிவு உருவாக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் இணைய தளத்தில் சேர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது NER &க்குப் பின்னால் உள்ளடக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. இது பல NE-related செ', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි නීතියක් හා ලෙක්සිකෝන් අධාරිත පද්ධතියක් සෙර්බියාන් පත්තර ප්\u200dරතිකාරයේ නම් අධාරිත්වය (NE) ගැන අඳුරගන්න සඳහා  ඒක වෙනස් ස්ටන්ෆෝර්ඩ් හා ස්පාසි සියළුම ප්\u200dරමාණයක්, නීතිය- සහ ලෙක්සිකෝන් අධාරිත පද්ධතිය සමඟ සැමැල්ම් පත්තර දෙකක් පිළිබඳින් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ නීතිය- සහ ලෙක්සිකෝන් අධික පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්නේ සියළු මොඩේල් හතර සිද්ධ සියලුම පද්ධතියේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරත නිර්මාණය කරපු මෝඩේල් එක්ක වෙබ් ප්ලේටෆෝට්මය NER&Outside එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙලා තියෙනවා ඒකෙන් විවිධ', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک قانون اور لکسیون کی بنیادی سیسٹم کو سربی کاغذ پیغام میں پہچان لینے کے لئے پیش کرتے ہیں جو شخصی ناموں کے ساتھ سونے کی استاندارڈ تیار کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا تھا۔ اس کا استعمال اس سے زیادہ تھا کہ چار مختلف نقطے کے لئے تدریس سٹ تیار کریں، جو دو نام دار انٹیٹی Recognition (NER) سیستموں کے لئے استعمال کیے گئے: استنفورد اور اسپاسی۔ سارے حاصل کئے ہوئے موڈل، ایک قانون اور لکسیون بنیاد سیسٹم کے ساتھ دو سمبل ٹیکسٹ پر مطالعہ کیا گیا تھا: سونے کی استاندارڈ کا ایک حصہ اور ایک غیر مستقل کاغذ کا ایک سائز ہے۔ نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ قانون اور لکسیون بنیاد سیسٹم ہر چار سناریوں میں تدریس کی موڈلیاں (F1 سے اندازہ کیا گیا) نکلتا ہے، حالانکہ استنفورد موڈلیاں سب سے زیادہ دقیق ہیں۔ تمام سیستموں کو پورا نام پہچان کرنے کے لئے بہترین نتیجے ملتے ہیں، حالانکہ پہلی ناموں کا پہچان صرف محتاج ہے. پیدا کئے ہوئے موڈلز ایک ویب پلٹورم NER&Beyond میں شامل کئے گئے ہیں جو مختلف نیا رابطہ دار функциوں کو فائدہ دیتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Trong tờ báo này chúng tôi giới thiệu một hệ thống quy luật và ngôn ngữ để nhận biết các loài có tên (đông) trong các văn bản báo chí Serbia được dùng để chuẩn bị một tiêu chuẩn vàng được ghi tên cá nhân. Nó được dùng để chuẩn bị các tập đoàn huấn luyện cho bốn mức độ ghi chú khác nhau, còn được dùng để huấn luyện hai hệ thống nhận dạng loài người có tên là Stanford và spaCy. Tất cả các mô hình được lấy, cùng với hệ thống quy luật và ngôn ngữ, được đánh giá dựa trên hai mẫu: một phần của tiêu chuẩn vàng và một tờ báo độc lập có kích thước xấp xỉ. Kết quả cho thấy hệ thống quy luật và ngôn ngữ thực hiện các mô hình được huấn luyện thông qua trong bốn viễn cảnh (đo bằng F1) trong khi mô hình Stanford có độ chính xác cao nhất. Tất cả hệ thống đạt được kết quả tốt nhất trong việc nhận ra tên đầy đủ, trong khi việc nhận dạng tên tuổi chỉ là khá kém. Các mẫu sản xuất được nhập vào một tổ chức khác mạng cung cấp các chức năng liên quan tới loại đông bắc.', 'uz': 'In this paper we present a rule- and lexicon-based system for the recognition of Named Entities (NE) in Serbian newspaper texts that was used to prepare a gold standard annotated with personal names.  Ko\'pchilik boshqa boshqa taʼminlov darajalari uchun to\'rtta ta\'lim satrlarini tayyorlashga ishlatilgan edi. Bu ikkita nomli "Taʼminlovchi" tizimini ishlatish uchun qo\'llangan edi: Stanford va spacy. Hamma olingan modellar bilan qoidalar va leksika asosiy tizim bilan ikki misol matnlarda qiymat qilindi: gull standardidagi bir qismi va bu bir xil oʻlchami bo\'lgan xotira gazeti matnning bir qiymati. Natijalar qoidalar va leksikan asosida qoidagi tizim hamma to\'rtta ta\'minlovchi modellarni bajaradi (F1 tomonidan oʻrnatilgan) va Stanford modellarida eng yuqori imkoniyat bor. Hamma tizimlar toʻliq nomlarni aniqlashda eng yaxshi natijalar topadi, ammo birinchi nomli nomlarni aniqlashda faqat juda yoqib boʻlmadi. Name', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo pravila i leksikonski sustav za prepoznavanje imenih subjekta (NE) u tekstima srpskih novina koji je korišten za pripremu zlatnog standard a annotiranog ličnim imenima. Dalje je korišćeno za pripremu obuke za četiri različite razine annotacije, koje su dalje korišćene za obuku dva sustava priznanja imenovanih područja (NER), Stanford i spaCy. Svi dobiveni modeli zajedno s pravilnim i leksikonskim sustavom procijenjeni su na dva uzorka teksta: dio zlatnog standard a i nezavisnih teksta novina s približno istom veličinom. Rezultati pokazuju da sustav na temelju pravila i leksikona iznosi obučene modele u svim četiri scenarija (mjerena od F1), dok modeli Stanford imaju najvišu preciznost. Svi sustavi dobivaju najbolje rezultate u priznanju punih imena, dok priznanje prvih imena samo je prilično siromašno. Proizvođeni modeli su uključeni u web platformu NER&Beyond koja pruža različite funkcije povezane s NE.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме система, основана на правила и лексикони, за признаване на имена (НЕ) в текстовете на сръбските вестници, използвана за изготвяне на златен стандарт, анотиран с лични имена. Освен това тя е използвана за подготовка на набор от обучения за четири различни нива на анотация, които са използвани за обучение на две системи за разпознаване на имена на субекти (NER): Станфорд и spaCy. Всички получени модели, заедно с правила и лексиконова система, бяха оценени на два примерни текста: част от златния стандарт и независим вестникарски текст с приблизително еднакъв размер. Резултатите показват, че системата, базирана на правила и лексикони, надминава тренираните модели във всичките четири сценария (измерена с Формула 1), докато моделите Станфорд имат най-висока прецизност. Всички системи получават най-добри резултати при разпознаването на пълните имена, докато разпознаването само на първите имена е доста лошо. Произведените модели са вградени в уеб платформа която осигурява различни функции, свързани с НЕ.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi et regel- og leksikonbaseret system til anerkendelse af navngivne enheder (NE) i serbiske avistekster, der blev brugt til at udarbejde en guldstandard med personnavne. Det blev yderligere brugt til at forberede træningssæt til fire forskellige niveauer af annotation, som blev yderligere brugt til at træne to Named Entity Recognition (NER)-systemer: Stanford og spaCy. Alle opnåede modeller sammen med et regel- og leksikonsbaseret system blev evalueret på to eksempeltekster: en del af guldstandarden og en uafhængig avistekst af omtrent samme størrelse. Resultaterne viser, at regel- og leksikonbaserede system overgår trænede modeller i alle fire scenarier (målt ved F1), mens Stanford modeller har den højeste præcision. Alle systemer opnår de bedste resultater i genkendelsen af fulde navne, mens anerkendelsen af fornavne kun er temmelig dårlig. De producerede modeller er indarbejdet i en webplatform NER&Beyond, der leverer forskellige NE-relaterede funktioner.', 'nl': "In dit artikel presenteren we een op regels en lexicon gebaseerd systeem voor de erkenning van Named Entities (NE) in Servische krantentexten dat werd gebruikt om een gouden standaard met persoonlijke namen te maken. Het werd verder gebruikt om trainingssets voor vier verschillende annotatieniveaus voor te bereiden, die verder werden gebruikt om twee Named Entity Recognition (NER) systemen te trainen: Stanford en spaCy. Alle verkregen modellen, samen met een op regels en lexicon gebaseerd systeem, werden geëvalueerd op twee voorbeeldteksten: een deel van de gouden standaard en een onafhankelijke krantentekst van ongeveer dezelfde grootte. De resultaten tonen aan dat op regels en lexicon gebaseerde systemen beter presteren dan getrainde modellen in alle vier scenario's (gemeten door F1), terwijl Stanford modellen de hoogste precisie hebben. Alle systemen behalen het beste resultaat bij het herkennen van volledige namen, terwijl alleen de erkenning van voornamen vrij slecht is. De geproduceerde modellen worden verwerkt in een webplatform NER&Beyond dat verschillende NE-gerelateerde functies biedt.", 'id': 'Dalam koran ini kami mempersembahkan sistem berdasarkan aturan dan leksikon untuk pengenal Entitas bernama (NE) dalam teks koran Serbia yang digunakan untuk mempersiapkan standar emas yang dicatat dengan nama pribadi. Ini digunakan lebih lanjut untuk mempersiapkan set latihan untuk empat tingkat annotasi yang berbeda, yang lebih lanjut digunakan untuk melatih dua sistem Pengenalan Entitas bernama (NER): Stanford dan spaCy. Semua model yang diperoleh, bersama dengan sistem berdasarkan aturan dan leksikon telah diuji pada dua teks sampel: bagian dari standar emas dan teks koran independen sekitar ukuran yang sama. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa sistem berdasarkan aturan dan leksikon melebihi model terlatih dalam semua empat skenario (diukur oleh F1), sementara model Stanford memiliki presisi tertinggi. Semua sistem mendapatkan hasil terbaik dalam mengenali nama penuh, sementara mengenali nama pertama hanya agak buruk. Model-model yang diproduksi didalam platform web NER&Beyond yang menyediakan berbagai fungsi berkaitan dengan NE.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein regelbasiertes und lexikon-basiertes System zur Erkennung von Named Entities (NE) in serbischen Zeitungstexten vor, das verwendet wurde, um einen Goldstandard mit persönlichen Namen zu erstellen. Weiterhin wurden Trainingssets für vier verschiedene Annotationsstufen vorbereitet, mit denen zwei Named Entity Recognition (NER)-Systeme trainiert wurden: Stanford und spaCy. Alle erhaltenen Modelle sowie ein regelbasiertes und lexikon-basiertes System wurden an zwei Beispieltexten ausgewertet: einem Teil des Goldstandards und einem unabhängigen Zeitungstext in etwa gleicher Größe. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass regelbasierte und lexikon-basierte Systeme trainierte Modelle in allen vier Szenarien (gemessen mit F1) übertreffen, während Stanford-Modelle die höchste Präzision aufweisen. Alle Systeme erzielen beste Ergebnisse bei der Erkennung vollständiger Namen, während die Erkennung nur von Vornamen eher schlecht ist. Die produzierten Modelle werden in eine Webplattform NER&Beyond integriert, die verschiedene NE-bezogene Funktionen bereitstellt.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما یک سیستم قانون و لکسیون بر اساس تعریف اجتماعی نامیده شده (NE) را در متن روزنامه\u200cهای سربی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که برای آماده کردن استاندارد طلا که با نام شخصی مشخص شده است. برای آماده کردن مجموعه آموزش برای چهار سطح متفاوت آگاهی که برای آموزش دو سیستم شناسایی (NER) نامیده شده استفاده می\u200cشد: استنفورد و اسپاسی. همه مدل\u200cهای دریافت شده، همراه با یک سیستم قانون و لکسیکون بر روی دو متن نمونه\u200cها ارزیابی می\u200cشوند: بخشی از استاندارد طلا و یک متن روزنامه\u200cهای مستقل تقریباً همان اندازه است. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که سیستم بر اساس قانون و زبان\u200cشناسی از مدل\u200cهای آموزشی در هر چهار سیناریو (به F1 اندازه\u200cگیری) بیشتر می\u200cکند، در حالی که مدل\u200cهای استنفورد بالاترین دقیق دارد. تمام سیستم\u200cها بهترین نتیجه\u200cهای شناسایی نام\u200cهای کامل را می\u200cگیرند، در حالی که شناسایی نام\u200cهای اول فقط خیلی فقیر است. مدل\u200cهای تولید شده در یک پلاکتر وب NER&Beyond شامل شده\u200cاند که عملکرد\u200cهای مختلف نسبت به نو ارتباط می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii tunaweka mfumo wa sheria- na wa-lexico kwa ajili ya kutambuliwa kwa Mitandao ya Jinai (NE) katika maandishi ya magazeti ya Serbia yaliyotumika kwa ajili ya kuandaa kiwango cha dhahabu kinachochapishwa na majina binafsi. Ilitumika zaidi kuandaa seti za mafunzo kwa kiwango nne tofauti cha matangazo, ambazo zilitumika zaidi kufundisha mfumo wa Kutambua Ujadala wa Kiraia (NER): Stanford na spaCy. Wote zilizopata mifano, pamoja na mfumo wa utawala- na lexico ulievaluliwa kwenye maandishi mawili ya sampuli: sehemu ya kiwango cha dhahabu na ujumbe huru wa gazeti la karibu kiasi hicho. The results show that rule- and lexicon-based system outperforms trained models in all four scenarios (measured by F1), while Stanford models has the highest precision.  Mifumo yote hupata matokeo bora zaidi ya kutambua majina kamili, wakati kutambua majina ya kwanza ni masikini tu. Mradi uliotengenezwa unajumuisha kwenye jukwaa la mtandaoni la NER&Beyond which provides various functions zinazohusiana na NE.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 세르비아 신문 텍스트의 명칭 실체(NE)를 식별하는 규칙과 사전을 바탕으로 하는 시스템을 제시했다. 이 시스템은 인명 주석이 달린 금 표준을 작성하는 데 사용된다.이것은 네 개의 서로 다른 단계의 주석을 위한 훈련 집합을 준비하고 두 개의 명칭 실체 식별 (NER) 시스템인 Stanford와spacy를 훈련하는 데도 사용된다.모든 얻은 모델과 규칙과 사전을 바탕으로 한 시스템은 두 개의 견본 텍스트에서 평가를 진행했다. 한 부분은 금 표준 텍스트이고 다른 한 부분은 크기가 대체적으로 같은 독립된 신문 텍스트이다.그 결과 규칙과 사전을 바탕으로 한 시스템은 모든 네 가지 상황에서(F1로 평가) 훈련 모델보다 우수했고 스탠퍼드 모델의 정밀도가 가장 높았다.모든 시스템은 전체 이름을 식별하는 데 가장 좋은 효과를 거두었지만 이름만 식별하는 효과는 상당히 떨어졌다.생성된 모델은 웹 플랫폼 NER & Beyond에 통합되어 있으며 이 플랫폼은 각종 네트워크 관련 기능을 제공한다.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda biz Serbçe Ady Entitekler (NE) hasaplamak üçin bir düzgün we leksikon sistemini şahsy adlar bilen golyn standartlary taýýarlamak üçin ullanýardyk. Bu ýerde dört dürli sözleşme üçin okuwçylyk taýýarlamak üçin ulanyldy. Bu iki diňe Adly Entity Recognition (NER) sistemasyny: Stanford we SpaCy öwrenmek üçin ulanyldy. Hemme alan nusgalar, kural we leksikon sistemi bilen birlikte iki örnek metin üçin deňlendirildi: altyn standartiniň bir bölümi we bağımsız gazetin metini birnäçe ölçüde deňlendirildi. Netijenler kural we leksiýa daýanýan sistemadan ähli dört senaryda ukyply nusgalar çykarýar (F1 bilen ölçülen), Stenfordan nusgalaryň iň yüksek dyggaty bar. Hemme sistemler doly adlary tanamak üçin iň gowy netijesi tapylýar, ilkinji adlary tanamak diňe garypdyr. Çaplanýan nusgalar NER&Beyond-de web platformasyna ýazylýar.', 'af': "In hierdie papier stel ons 'n reël- en leksikone- gebaseerde stelsel voor die herken van Gegenoem Entiteit (NE) in Serbiese koerant teks wat gebruik word om 'n goue standaard te berei wat met persoonlike name aangekies is. Dit is verder gebruik om onderwerp stelle vir vier verskillende vlakke van annotasie te berei, wat verder gebruik word om twee genoem eenheid herkenning (NER) stelsels te tref: Stanford en spasie. Alle verkry modele, saam met 'n reël- en leksikone- gebaseerde stelsel is geevalueer op twee voorbeeld teks: ' n deel van die goue standaard en 'n onhangbare koerant teks van omtrent dieselfde grootte. Die resultate vertoon dat reël- en lexikon- gebaseerde stelsel uitvoer opgelei modele in alle vier scenarios (gemeet deur F1), terwyl Stanford modele het die hoogste presisie. Alle stelsels kry beste resultate in die herken van volle naams, terwyl die herken van eerste naams slegs is eerder arm. Die produseerde modele is ingesluit in 'n Web platform a NER&Beyond wat verskillende NE-verwante funksies verskaf.", 'am': 'In this paper we present a rule- and lexicon-based system for the recognition of Named Entities (NE) in Serbian newspaper texts that was used to prepare a gold standard annotated with personal names.  ለአራት ልዩ ደረጃዎች የተለየ ማስታወቂያ ተዘጋጅቷል፡፡ ሁሉም የተገኘው ምሳሌዎች፣ በሥርዓት እና በሌክሲኮን-ሥርዓት-እና በሁለት ምሳሌዎች ጽሑፎች ላይ ተረጋገጠ፤ የወርቅ ድምፅ አንዱ ክፍል እና ነፃ የጋዜጠት ገጽ ጽሑፍ በኩል አንድ መጠን ነው፡፡ ፍጥረቶቹ የሕግ- እና የሊክሲኮን ስርዓት በአራቱ ስናይኖች (F1 በተለካ) የተጠቃሚ ሞዴላዎችን እንዲያሳየቁ ነው፤ ስቴንፎርድ ሞዴላዎች ከፍተኛ ቁጥጥር አለባቸው፡፡ የሥርዓት ሁሉ የሙሉ ስም የሚያውቅ ፍሬዎች ትልቅ ሆኖ ያገኛል፣ የመጀመሪያውን ስም ማወቅ ግን በጣም ድሀ ነው፡፡ The produced models are incorporated into a Web platform NER&Beyond that provides various NE-related functions.', 'az': 'Bu kağıtda biz, şəxs adları ilə bildirilmiş altın standartlarını hazırlamaq üçün kullanılan Sırbistan gazeteci mətnlərində İsimli Entitələr (NE) təsdiqlənmək üçün hökmü və leksikon tabanlı sistemini göstəririk. Dörd müxtəlif məlumatlar üçün təhsil quruları hazırlamaq üçün istifadə edildi. Bu iki adı Adlı Entity Recognition (NER) sistemi: Stanford və SpaCy təhsil etmək üçün istifadə edildi. Bütün alınan modellər, hökmü və leksikon sistemi ilə birlikdə iki nümunə mətnlərində değerlendirildi: altın standartlarının bir parçası və bağımsız bir gazetin mətnlərinin çox böyüklüyü. Sonuçlar, düzgün və leksikon sistemində təhsil edilmiş modellərin bütün dörd senaryoya (F1 ilə ölçülü), Stanford modellərinin ən yüksək dəqiqliyi vardır. Bütün sistemlər tamamlanmaq üçün ən yaxşı nəticələri alırlar, ilk adların tanınması is ə sadəcə kasıbdır. Yapılmış modellər NER&Beyond ilə müxtəlif NER-lə bağlı funksiyaları sağlayan Web platformasına daxil edilmişdir.', 'hy': "Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք կանոններով և լեքսիկոններով հիմնված համակարգ՝ Սերբական թերթերի տեքստներում անվանումներ հայտնաբերելու համար, որը օգտագործվել էր անձնական անուններով գրված ոսկու ստանդարտ պատրաստելու համար: Այն նաև օգտագործվել է ուսուցման համակարգերի պատրաստելու համար չորս տարբեր նշումների մակարդակների համար, որոնք նաև օգտագործվել են երկու անվանումների ճանաչման (ՆԵՌ) համակարգերի՝ Ստենֆորդի և սպասի ուսուցման համար: Բոլոր ստացված մոդելները, միասին կանոններով և լեքսիկոններով հիմնված համակարգով, գնահատվեցին երկու նմուշ տեքստի վրա' ոսկու ստանդարտի մի մասի և մոտավորապես նույն չափի անկախ թերթի տեքստի վրա: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ կանոններով և լեքսիկոններով հիմնված համակարգը գերազանցում է վարժեցված մոդելները բոլոր չորս սցենարներում (չափված F1-ով), մինչդեռ Ստենֆորդի մոդելները ամենաճշգրիտ են: All systems obtain best results in recognizing full names, while the recognition of first names only is rather poor.  The produced models are incorporated into a Web platform NER&Beyond that provides various NE-related functions.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সার্বিয়ার সংবাদপত্রের লেখাগুলোতে নাম এন্টিটিস (NE) স্বীকৃতির জন্য একটি নিয়ম- এবং লেক্সিকোন ভিত্তিক সিস্টেম উপস্থাপন করেছ It was further used to prepare training sets for four different levels of annotation, which were further used to train two Named Entity Recognition (NER) systems: Stanford and spaCy.  All obtained models, together with a rule- and lexicon-based system were evaluated on two sample texts: a part of the gold standard and an independent newspaper text of approximately the same size.  ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে নিয়ম- এবং লেক্সিকোন ভিত্তিক সিস্টেম সকল চার পরিস্থিতিতে প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল প্রদর্শন করে (এফ১ দ্বারা পরিমাপ করে)  সকল সিস্টেম পূর্ণ নাম স্বীকার করার জন্য সেরা ফলাফল পায়, কিন্তু প্রথম নামের স্বীকৃতি শুধুমাত্র দারি উৎপাদনের মডেলগুলো একটি ওয়েব প্লাটফর্ম নিউ আর &বাইরে যোগাযোগ করা হয়েছে যা বিভিন্ন NE-এর সংশ্লিষ্ট কাজ প্রদান করে।', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo pravilo i leksikonski sistem za prepoznavanje imenovanih subjekta (NE) u tekstima srpskih novina koji je korišćen za pripremu zlatnog standard a annotiranog ličnim imenima. Dalje je korišćeno za pripremu obuke za četiri različite nivoa annotacije, koje su dalje korišćene za treniranje dva sustava priznanja imenovanih entiteta (NER), Stanford i spaCy. Svi dobiveni modeli, zajedno sa pravilima i leksikonom-baziranim sistemom, procjenjivali su na dva uzorka teksta: dio zlatnog standard a i nezavisni tekst novina s približno iste veličine. Rezultati pokazuju da sistem koji se temelji na pravilu i leksikonu iznosi obučene modele u svim četiri scenarija (mjerena od F1), dok modeli Stanford imaju najvišu preciznost. Svi sustavi dobijaju najbolji rezultat priznanja punih imena, dok priznanje prvih imena je prilično siromašno. Proizvođeni modeli su uključeni u web platformu NER&Beyond koja pruža različite funkcije povezane sa NE.', 'ca': "En aquest article presentem un sistema basat en regles i lexicòniques per reconèixer les Entitats Nomades (NE) en textos de diari sèrbic que es va utilitzar per preparar un estàndard d'or anotat amb noms personals. També va ser utilitzat per preparar conjunts de formació per quatre nivells diferents d'anotació, que van ser utilitzats per formar dos sistemes de reconeixement d'entitats anomenades (NER): Stanford i spaCy. Tots els models obtinguts, juntament amb un sistema basat en regles i lexicòniques, van ser evaluats en dos textos de mostra: una part de l'estàndard d'or i un text de diari independent de aproximadament la mateixa mida. Els resultats demostren que el sistema basat en regles i lexicones supera els models entrenats en totes les quatre escenaries (mesurats per F1), mentre que els models de Stanford tenen la més precisió. Tots els sistemes obtenen els millors resultats en reconèixer noms complets, mentre que el reconèixement de noms noms és bastant pobre. Els models produïts estan incorporats en una plataforma web NER&Beyond que proporciona diverses funcions relacionades amb el NE.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme pravidla a lexikon založený systém pro rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit (NE) v srbských novinových textech, který byl použit k přípravě zlatého standardu anotovaného osobními jmény. Dále byla použita k přípravě výcvikových sad pro čtyři různé úrovně anotace, které byly dále použity k tréninku dvou systémů rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit (NER): Stanford a spaCy. Všechny získané modely spolu se systémem založeným na pravidlech a lexikonech byly vyhodnoceny na dvou vzorových textech: části zlatého standardu a nezávislého novinového textu přibližně stejné velikosti. Výsledky ukazují, že systém založený na pravidlech a lexikonech překonává trénované modely ve všech čtyřech scénářích (měřených F1), zatímco Stanfordské modely mají nejvyšší přesnost. Všechny systémy dosahují nejlepších výsledků při rozpoznávání celých jmen, zatímco rozpoznávání pouze křestních jmen je poměrně špatné. Vyrobené modely jsou začleněny do webové platformy NER&Beyond, která poskytuje různé funkce související s NE.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame eeskirjadel ja leksikonil põhinevat süsteemi nimeliste üksuste (NE) tunnustamiseks Serbia ajalehetekstides, mida kasutati isiklike nimedega märgitud kuldstandardi koostamiseks. Seda kasutati ka nelja erineva annoteerimistaseme koolituskomplektide ettevalmistamiseks, mida kasutati kahe nimelise üksuse tunnustamise (NER) süsteemi koolitamiseks: Stanford ja spaCy. Kõiki saadud mudeleid koos reegli- ja leksikonipõhise süsteemiga hinnati kahe näidisteksti põhjal: kuldstandardi osa ja ligikaudu sama suurusega sõltumatu ajalehe tekst. Tulemused näitavad, et reeglitel ja leksikonil põhinev süsteem ületab treenitud mudeleid kõigis neljas stsenaariumis (mõõdetuna F1-ga), samas kui Stanfordi mudelid on kõige täpsemad. Kõik süsteemid saavad parimad tulemused täisnimede äratundmisel, samas kui ainult eesnimede tunnustamine on üsna kehv. Toodetud mudelid on integreeritud veebiplatvormi NER&Beyond, mis pakub erinevaid NE-ga seotud funktsioone.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään sääntö- ja sanastopohjainen järjestelmä nimettyjen entiteettien (NE) tunnustamiseksi serbialaisissa sanomalehtiteksteissä, jota käytettiin laatimaan kultainen standardi, johon on merkitty henkilönimiä. Sen avulla valmisteltiin koulutussarjoja neljälle eri annotointitasolle, joita käytettiin myös kahden Nimetyn Entiteetin Reconhecimento (NER) -järjestelmän kouluttamiseen: Stanford ja spaCy. Kaikki saadut mallit sekä sääntö- ja sanastopohjainen järjestelmä arvioitiin kahden näytetekstin perusteella: osa kultastandardia ja riippumaton sanomalehtiteksti suunnilleen samankokoinen. Tulokset osoittavat, että sääntö- ja sanastopohjainen järjestelmä päihittää koulutetut mallit kaikissa neljässä skenaariossa (mitattuna F1-menetelmällä), kun taas Stanfordin malleilla on korkein tarkkuus. Kaikki järjestelmät saavat parhaat tulokset koko nimen tunnistamisessa, kun taas vain etunimien tunnistaminen on melko huono. Tuotetut mallit on yhdistetty NER&Beyond-verkkoalustaan, joka tarjoaa erilaisia NE-toimintaan liittyviä toimintoja.', 'sq': 'In this paper we present a rule- and lexicon-based system for the recognition of Named Entities (NE) in Serbian newspaper texts that was used to prepare a gold standard annotated with personal names.  It was further used to prepare training sets for four different levels of annotation, which were further used to train two Named Entity Recognition (NER) systems: Stanford and spaCy.  All obtained models, together with a rule- and lexicon-based system were evaluated on two sample texts: a part of the gold standard and an independent newspaper text of approximately the same size.  Rezultatet tregojnë se sistemi me bazë rregullash dhe lexikonësh ekzekuton modele të stërvitura në të katër skenarët (të matura nga F1), ndërsa modelet e Stanfordit kanë saktësinë më të lartë. All systems obtain best results in recognizing full names, while the recognition of first names only is rather poor.  Modelet e prodhuara janë përfshirë në një platform ë web NER&Beyond që ofron funksione të ndryshme të lidhura me NE.', 'ha': "A cikin wannan takarda, Munã halatar da wata na'urar- da aka ƙayyade wa sunan Entities (NE) a cikin littafan newspaper na Ceribiya, wanda aka yi amfani da su gabatar da wata takardar zĩnãriya da aka ambaci sunayen shakka. An ƙara amfani da shi dõmin a yi amfani da tsarin mafarinta wa huɗu daraja na dabam-dabam, wanda aka yi amfani da su wajen kodi biyu na sunan Entity Recognition (NER): Stanford da spacy. Dukan motsi da aka motsa, da kuma a saman wata na'urar-da-leksiya, aka ƙaddara shi a kan littãfin misalin biyu: rabin rubutun na zĩnãriya da wani matsayin wata takarda na takarda guda na rubutun daidai girma. Mataimakin na nuna cewa na'urar- da aka ƙayyade leksikon yana tafiyar da shiryoyin shiryayyu a cikin duk huɗu sanaron (aka ƙaddara da F1), kuma a lokacin da misalin Stanford yana da mafi ƙayyade. Kowane system sunã da mafi kyau matsalar su gane sunayen cikakken, kuma idan an gane sunayen farko kawai, yana da mafiya haske. An shigar da shirin ayuka zuwa wata platform na NER _BayonWeb, da ke samar da wasu functionin da ke samu da NE.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo sistem pravil in leksikon za priznavanje imenovanih subjektov (NE) v srbskih časopisnih besedilih, ki je bil uporabljen za pripravo zlatega standarda z oznakami osebnih imen. Uporabljali so ga tudi za pripravo naborov usposabljanj za štiri različne stopnje označevanja, ki so se nadalje uporabljali za usposabljanje dveh sistemov za prepoznavanje imenovanih entitet (NER): Stanford in spaCy. Vsi pridobljeni modeli, skupaj s sistemom na osnovi pravil in leksikona, smo ocenili na dveh vzorčnih besedilih: del zlatega standarda in neodvisnega časopisnega besedila približno enake velikosti. Rezultati kažejo, da sistem, ki temelji na pravilih in leksikonu, presega usposobljene modele v vseh štirih scenarijih (merjeno s F1), medtem ko imajo Stanfordovi modeli najvišjo natančnost. Vsi sistemi dosegajo najboljše rezultate pri prepoznavanju polnih imen, medtem ko je prepoznavanje samo imena precej slabo. Izdelani modeli so vključeni v spletno platformo NER&Beyond, ki zagotavlja različne funkcije, povezane z NE.', 'jv': 'Nan pepul iki, nambah dhéwé éntukno sistem sing wis ana banget- lan luwih-sistem sing basa pernik dianggap Entité sing nganggep nyeangke dhéwé (NVE) lan textu Perintah sing isi rbian kanggo ngewehku nambah sing berarti awak dhéwé, sadurungé anake person. Ora wis dipoleh nggawe nggawe aturan sing gawe nggawe aturan kanggo kalah upat sing dumadhi, sing dumadhi nyimpen kanggo nggawe sistem sing dibenakno Entty (NeR), iki dadi: STANford lan spaCi. Samsul Rejalaké wong-wong kuwi rule- lan lexèkon- basa sistem sing bisa butaké model sing ditambah ning kalah sekenari (mehmuran karo F1), sampeyan model dhe stèn dhéwé, dadi sing ngomong akeh dhéwé. Puwedhakan wong sistem punika dipoleh sing larang awak dhéwé, sanes pangan sing paling apik dhéwé. Rasané model sing dibutuhke ning sakjane ning web-sistem NeR&Awal sing bisa supoyo barang nggawe funksi sing sampeyan ne.e', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྲིད་ཡིག་ཆའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་འཛིན་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་ལུས་ཀྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་གཅིག་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། འདི་ལ་ཚོར་མིང་བཏགས་པའི་ལྕགས་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གྲྭའི་མཐོ་རིམ་གཞན་བཞིན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་གྲ་སྒྲིག་གཏོང་བཅུག་པ་ཡིན། གྲངས་བ་ཡོད་པའི་མ་དབུགས་གཅིག་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱས་ཡོད། སྲོལ་རིམ་དང་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་མ་ལག The results show that rule- and lexicon-based system outperforms trained models in all four scenarios (measured by F1), while Stanford models have the highest precision.[3] མ་ལག་ཆ་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་ཀྱིས་མིང་ཡོངས་རྟོགས་པ་དང་མིང་ཐོག་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ལ་དགའ་ཤོས་ཡོད། གསར་བསྐྲུན་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་འདི་ཚོ་དྲ་རྒྱ་གླིང་གི་སྟེང་NER&Beyond་ནང་དུ་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པ་ལྟར་སྐྱེལ་བ་དང་མཐུད་པའི་ལས་', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנו מציגים מערכת מבוססת על חוקים ולקסיקונים לזהות של יחידות בשמות (NE) בטקסטים של עיתונים סרביים שנשתמשו כדי להכין סטנדרט זהב שנמצא בשמות אישיים. It was further used to prepare training sets for four different levels of annotation, which were further used to train two Named Entity Recognition (NER) systems: Stanford and spaCy.  כל הדוגמנים שנקבלו, יחד עם מערכת מבוססת על חוקים ולקסיקונים הוערכו על שני טקסטים דגימה: חלק מהסטנדרט הזהב וטקסט עיתון עצמאי בערך באותו גודל. התוצאות מראות שהמערכת המבוססת על חוקים ולקסיקונים מציגה מודלים מאומנים בכל ארבע תרחישים (למדוד על ידי F1), בעוד לדוגמנים של סטנפורד יש מדויק גבוה ביותר. כל המערכות מקבלות תוצאות טובות ביותר בזהות שמות מלאים, בזמן שהזיהוי של שמות פרטים הוא די עני. הדוגמנים המופיעים מורכבים לתוך פלטפורמה אינטרנטית NER&Beyond שמספקת תפקידים שונים בקשר ל NE.'}
{'en': 'Moral Stance Recognition and Polarity Classification from Twitter and Elicited Text', 'ar': 'التعرف على الموقف الأخلاقي وتصنيف القطبية من تويتر والنصوص المُنتَجة', 'fr': 'Reconnaissance de la position morale et classification de polarité à partir de Twitter et de textes sollicités', 'es': 'Reconocimiento de la postura moral y clasificación de polaridad de Twitter y texto obtenido', 'pt': 'Reconhecimento de Postura Moral e Classificação de Polaridade do Twitter e Texto Elicitado', 'ja': 'Twitterと紹介されたテキストからの道徳的スタンスの認識と極性の分類', 'zh': '自Twitter及引文本道德立场识极性分类', 'hi': 'नैतिक रुख मान्यता और चहचहाना से Polarity वर्गीकरण और पाठ elicited', 'ru': 'Признание моральной позиции и классификация полярности из Twitter и вызванного текста', 'ga': 'Aitheantas Seasamh Morálta agus Aicmiú Polarachta ó Twitter agus Téacs Faighte', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση ηθικής θέσης και ταξινόμηση πολικότητας από το Twitter και το επιλεγμένο κείμενο', 'hu': 'Erkölcsi helyzet felismerése és polaritási osztályozás a Twitterről és az Elicited Text-ről', 'it': 'Riconoscimento della posizione morale e classificazione della polarità da Twitter e Testo Elicited', 'kk': 'Твиттерден моралды станцияны анықтау және Польтикалық классификациясы', 'lt': 'Moralinio požiūrio pripažinimas ir poliariškumo klasifikavimas iš Twitter ir atitinkantis tekstas', 'mk': 'Признавање на моралниот стан и класификација на поларитетот од Твитер и избраниот текст', 'ms': 'Pengenalan Stensi Moral dan Klasifikasi Polariti dari Twitter dan Teks Ditinggalkan', 'ml': 'ട്രൂട്ടരില്\u200d നിന്നും എലിസിറ്റിട്ടില്\u200d നിന്നും മോരിയല്\u200d സ്റ്റേന്\u200dസ് തിരിച്ചറിയുകയും പോളിറിറ്റ', 'mt': 'Ir-Rikonoxximent tal-Istanza Morali u l-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Polarità minn Twitter u t-Test Eliċitat', 'mn': 'Твиттерээс Морал Стэнс Recognition, Polarity Classification from Twitter and Elicited Text', 'no': 'Moral Stance Recognition and Polarity Classification from Twitter and Elicited Text', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea stării morale și clasificarea polarității de pe Twitter și text elicitat', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie stanu moralnego i klasyfikacja polarności z Twittera i tekstu Elicytowanego', 'sr': 'Moralna priznanja stanja i klasifikacija polarnosti iz Twitter i Elicitovanog teksta', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada jinsiyada iyo baaritaanka farsamada ee Twitter iyo Elicited text', 'sv': 'Erkännande av moralisk ställning och polaritetsklassificering från Twitter och Elicited Text', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'توئیٹر اور الیسیٹ ٹیکسٹ سے مورال استنس پتچار اور پولیریت کلاسیفٹ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thừa nhận và Đánh giá trạng cực từ Twitter và văn bản được nhắc đến', 'nl': 'Morele standherkenning en polariteitsclassificatie van Twitter en geëlimineerde tekst', 'bg': 'Разпознаване на моралното положение и класификация на полярността от Туитър и елиминиран текст', 'fa': 'شناسایی مجازی و کلاس\u200cشناسایی پلاستوری از توئیتر و متن الیسیت', 'de': 'Moral Stance Recognition and Polarity Classification from Twitter and Elicited Text', 'id': 'Pengenalan Stans Moral dan Klasifikasi Polaritas dari Twitter dan Teks Dipilih', 'tr': 'Moral Stans Tanyş we Polşanlyk Täzelikden we Elicited Metin', 'ko': '트위터와 유도 텍스트의 도덕적 입장 식별과 극성 분류', 'da': 'Anerkendelse af moralsk stilling og polaritetsklassificering fra Twitter og Elicited Text', 'af': 'Morale Stance Recognition and Polarity Classification from Twitter and Elicited Text', 'hr': 'Moralna priznanja stanja i klasifikacija poljoprivrednosti iz Twitter i Elicitiranog teksta', 'sw': 'Kutambua msimamo wa maadili na Kutangaza Usalama kutoka Twita na Maandishi ya Elikali', 'am': 'እና ከትዊተር እና ኤልcited ጽሑፍ የሞላዊ ስርዓት እና Polarity Classification', 'sq': 'Njohja morale e qëndrimit dhe klasifikimi i poliaritetit nga Twitter dhe teksti i elikuar', 'hy': 'Թվիթերից և հեռացված տեքստից', 'az': 'Moral Stance Recognition and Polarity Classification from Twitter and Elicited Text', 'bn': 'টুইটার এবং এলিcited টেক্সট থেকে নৈতিক স্টেন্স স্বীকৃতি এবং বহুবিধা ক্লাসিকেশন', 'ca': 'Recognició moral de la posició i classificació de la polaritat a partir de Twitter i el text elicitat', 'bs': 'Moralna priznanja stanice i klasifikacija polarnosti iz Twitter i Elicitovanog teksta', 'cs': 'Rozpoznávání morálních postojů a klasifikace polarity z Twitteru a vyloučeného textu', 'et': 'Moraalse seisukoha äratundmine ja polaarsuse klassifitseerimine Twitterist ja väljendatud tekstist', 'fi': 'Moraalisen asenteen tunnistus ja polariteettiluokitus Twitteristä ja Elicited Textistä', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje moralnega stanja in klasifikacija polarnosti iz Twitterja in izbranega besedila', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'זיהוי עמדה מוסרית וסימון פוליריות מטוויטר וטקסט מוצדק', 'bo': 'Moral Stance Recognition and Polarity Classification from Twitter and Elicited Text'}
{'en': 'We introduce a labelled corpus of stances about moral issues for the Brazilian Portuguese language, and present reference results for both the stance recognition and polarity classification tasks. The corpus is built from Twitter and further expanded with data elicited through crowd sourcing and labelled by their own authors. Put together, the corpus and reference results are expected to be taken as a baseline for further studies in the field of stance recognition and polarity classification from text.', 'es': 'Presentamos un corpus etiquetado de posturas sobre cuestiones morales para el idioma portugués brasileño y presentamos resultados de referencia para las tareas de reconocimiento de posturas y clasificación de polaridad. El corpus se construye a partir de Twitter y se amplía aún más con datos obtenidos a través de la colaboración masiva y etiquetados por sus propios autores. En conjunto, se espera que el corpus y los resultados de referencia se tomen como referencia para futuros estudios en el campo del reconocimiento de posturas y la clasificación de polaridad a partir del texto.', 'ar': 'نقدم مجموعة معنونة من المواقف حول القضايا الأخلاقية للغة البرتغالية البرازيلية ، ونقدم نتائج مرجعية لكل من مهام التعرف على الموقف وتصنيف القطبية. تم إنشاء المجموعة من Twitter وتم توسيعها بشكل أكبر باستخدام البيانات التي تم الحصول عليها من خلال التعهيد الجماعي وتم تصنيفها بواسطة مؤلفيها. مجتمعة ، من المتوقع أن تؤخذ المجموعة والنتائج المرجعية كخط أساس لمزيد من الدراسات في مجال التعرف على الموقف وتصنيف القطبية من النص.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons un corpus étiqueté de positions sur des questions morales pour la langue portugaise brésilienne, et présentons des résultats de référence pour les tâches de reconnaissance de position et de classification de polarité. Le corpus est construit à partir de Twitter et élargi avec des données obtenues grâce au crowdsourcing et étiquetées par leurs propres auteurs. Ensemble, le corpus et les résultats de référence devraient servir de base pour d'autres études dans le domaine de la reconnaissance de position et de la classification de polarité à partir du texte.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos um corpus rotulado de posturas sobre questões morais para a língua portuguesa do Brasil e apresentamos resultados de referência para as tarefas de reconhecimento de postura e classificação de polaridade. O corpus é construído a partir do Twitter e expandido com dados obtidos por meio de crowdsourcing e rotulados por seus próprios autores. Juntos, espera-se que o corpus e os resultados de referência sejam tomados como base para estudos futuros na área de reconhecimento de postura e classificação de polaridade a partir de texto.', 'ja': '私たちは、ブラジルポルトガル語の道徳的問題に関するスタンスのラベル付けされたコーパスを紹介し、スタンス認識と極性分類の両方のタスクの参照結果を提示します。コーパスはTwitterから構築され、クラウドソーシングを通じて抽出されたデータと自身の著者によってラベル付けされてさらに拡張されます。まとめると、コーパスと参照結果は、テキストからのスタンス認識と極性分類の分野でのさらなる研究のためのベースラインとなることが期待される。', 'zh': '为巴西葡萄牙语引入道德语料库,备识极性之分。 其语料库由Twitter而成,因众包而广之,由其作者而志之。 总而言之,语料库参相望于立场极性别域之基线。', 'hi': 'हम ब्राजील की पुर्तगाली भाषा के लिए नैतिक मुद्दों के बारे में रुख का एक लेबल कॉर्पस पेश करते हैं, और रुख मान्यता और ध्रुवीयता वर्गीकरण कार्यों दोनों के लिए संदर्भ परिणाम पेश करते हैं। कॉर्पस ट्विटर से बनाया गया है और भीड़ सोर्सिंग के माध्यम से प्राप्त डेटा के साथ आगे बढ़ाया गया है और अपने स्वयं के लेखकों द्वारा लेबल किया गया है। एक साथ रखो, कॉर्पस और संदर्भ परिणामों को पाठ से रुख मान्यता और ध्रुवीयता वर्गीकरण के क्षेत्र में आगे के अध्ययन के लिए एक आधार रेखा के रूप में लेने की उम्मीद है।', 'ru': 'Для бразильского португальского языка мы вводим маркированный свод позиций по моральным вопросам и представляем справочные результаты как для задач распознавания позиций, так и для задач классификации полярности. Корпус построен на основе Twitter и дополнен данными, полученными с помощью краудсорсинга и помеченными их собственными авторами. Ожидается, что в своей совокупности результаты по корпусу и эталону будут использоваться в качестве исходных данных для дальнейших исследований в области распознавания положения и классификации полярности из текста.', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach corpas seasaimh lipéadaithe faoi cheisteanna morálta do theanga na Portaingéile Brasaíle, agus cuirimid torthaí tagartha i láthair maidir leis na tascanna a bhaineann le haithint seasamh agus le haicmiú polaraíocht araon. Tógtar an corpas ó Twitter agus déantar é a fhairsingiú tuilleadh le sonraí a fuarthas trí slua-fhoinsiú agus lipéadaithe ag a n-údair féin. Le cur le chéile, táthar ag súil go nglacfar an corpas agus na torthaí tagartha mar bhunlíne le haghaidh tuilleadh staidéir i réimse an aitheantais seasaimh agus aicmiú polarachta ón téacs.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მორალური პორტეგური ენათის შესახებ მორალური პროგრალური პროგრალური სახელისთვის ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ შევცვალოთ სტანციას და პოლარიტის კლასიფიკაციის სახელისთვის შე კორპუსი Twitter-დან შექმნა და უფრო გაფარდება მონაცემებით, რომლებიც მსოფლიოს სურათებით გაფარდება და მათი თავისოფლიო ავტორებით აღწერა. კორპუს და რეფერენტის შედეგები იქნება, რომ ტექსტიდან კლასიფიკაცია სტანციის განაცნობის და პოლარიტის კლასიფიკაციაში დასრულებული სწავლებისთვის.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a brazil portugál nyelv erkölcsi kérdéseiről szóló álláspontok címkézett korpuszát, és referenciaeredményeket mutatunk be mind az álláspont felismerésére, mind a polaritás osztályozására vonatkozóan. A korpusz Twitterről épül, és tovább bővül a crowd sourcing segítségével keltett adatokkal és saját szerzőik által címkézett adatokkal. Összességében a korpusz és a referencia eredményeket várhatóan alapként fogják venni a szövegből történő álláspontfelismerés és polaritás osztályozás területén végzett további tanulmányokhoz.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα μαρκαρισμένο σώμα στάσεων σχετικά με ηθικά ζητήματα για τη βραζιλιάνικη πορτογαλική γλώσσα και παρουσιάζουμε αποτελέσματα αναφοράς τόσο για την αναγνώριση στάσεων όσο και για την ταξινόμηση πολικότητας. Το σώμα είναι χτισμένο από το Twitter και διευρύνεται περαιτέρω με δεδομένα που συλλέγονται μέσω του κοινού και επισημαίνονται από τους δικούς τους συγγραφείς. Συνολικά, το σώμα και τα αποτελέσματα αναφοράς αναμένεται να ληφθούν ως βάση για περαιτέρω μελέτες στον τομέα της αναγνώρισης στάσεων και της ταξινόμησης πολικότητας από το κείμενο.', 'it': 'Introduciamo un corpus etichettato di posizioni sulle questioni morali per la lingua portoghese brasiliana e presentiamo i risultati di riferimento sia per il riconoscimento della posizione che per i compiti di classificazione della polarità. Il corpus è costruito da Twitter e ulteriormente ampliato con i dati ottenuti attraverso il crowd sourcing ed etichettati dai propri autori. Insieme, i risultati del corpus e di riferimento dovrebbero essere presi come base di riferimento per ulteriori studi nel campo del riconoscimento della posizione e della classificazione della polarità dal testo.', 'lt': 'We introduce a labelled corpus of stances about moral issues for the Brazilian Portuguese language, and present reference results for both the stance recognition and polarity classification tasks.  Korpus yra sukurtas iš Twitter ir toliau plėtojamas su duomenimis, gautais naudojant visuomenės šaltinius ir pažymėtais jų autorių. Apibendrinant, tikimasi, kad corpus ir etaloniniai rezultatai bus laikomi pagrindu tolesniems tyrimams pozicijų pripažinimo ir poliarumo klasifikavimo iš teksto srityje.', 'mk': 'Ние воведуваме обележан корпус на ставови во врска со моралните прашања за бразилскиот португалски јазик, и претставуваме референциски резултати за признавањето на ставови и класификацијата на поларитетот. Корпусот е изграден од Твитер и понатаму се проширува со податоци предизвикани преку crowd sourcing и означени од нивните сопствени автори. Заедно, резултатите на корпусот и референцијата се очекува да се земат како основа за понатамошни студии во областа на признавањето на ставовите и класификацијата на поларитетот од текстот.', 'ms': 'We introduce a labelled corpus of stances about moral issues for the Brazilian Portuguese language, and present reference results for both the stance recognition and polarity classification tasks.  Korpus ini dibina dari Twitter dan dikembangkan lebih lanjut dengan data yang diberikan melalui sumber ramai dan ditabel oleh penulis mereka sendiri. Bersama-sama, hasil corpus dan rujukan dijangka untuk dianggap sebagai dasar untuk kajian lanjut dalam medan pengenalan kedudukan dan klasifikasi polariti dari teks.', 'kk': 'Біз Бразилиялық португаль тілінің моралдық мәселелері туралы жарлық корпус таңдап береміз, және қазір таңдау және полярлық классификациялық тапсырмалар үшін сілтеменің нәтиже Корпус Твиттерден құрылды және олардың авторлары жазылған көпшілікті көпшілікті көпшілікті көпшілікті көпшілікті көпшілікті көпшіл Корпус және сілтеменің нәтижелері мәтіннен келесі зерттеулердің қосымша зерттеулерінің негізгі жолы болуы үшін болады.', 'ml': 'ബ്രാസീലിയന്\u200d പോര്\u200dട്ടുഗീഷ് ഭാഷ കുറിച്ചുള്ള നീതിപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പസിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. സ് The corpus is built from Twitter and further expanded with data elicited through crowd sourcing and labelled by their own authors.  ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുക, പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്ഥിതി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനും പരിശോധനത്തിനും കൂടുതല്\u200d പഠനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu korp ittikkettat ta’ pożizzjonijiet dwar kwistjonijiet morali għall-lingwa Portugiża Brażiljana, u nippreżentaw riżultati ta’ referenza kemm għall-kompiti tar-rikonoxximent tal-pożizzjonijiet kif ukoll għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-polarità. Il-korpus huwa mibni minn Twitter u jiġi estiż aktar bid-dejta kkawżata minn crowd sourcing u ttikkettata mill-awturi tagħhom stess. Put together, the corpus and reference results are expected to be taken as a baseline for further studies in the field of stance recognition and polarity classification from text.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy oznaczony korpus stanowisk dotyczących kwestii moralnych dla brazylijskiego języka portugalskiego oraz przedstawiamy wyniki referencyjne zarówno dla zadań rozpoznawania stanowiska, jak i klasyfikacji polaryzacji. Korpus zbudowany jest z Twittera i dalej poszerzany o dane pozyskiwane poprzez crowdsourcing i oznaczone przez własnych autorów. Łącząc, oczekuje się, że wyniki korpusu i referencji będą traktowane jako baza podstawowa dla dalszych badań w zakresie rozpoznawania stanowiska i klasyfikacji polaryzacji z tekstu.', 'mn': 'Бид Бразилийн Португалийн хэл дээр шашны асуудлын тухай байдлын корпус нэрлэгдсэн байдлыг тайлбарлаж, нөхцөл байдлын танихын тулд хариултын үр дүнг бий болгодог. Корпус нь Твиттерээс бүтээсэн бөгөөд олон нийтийн эх үүсвэр болон өөрсдийн зохиолчдын тэмдэглэгдсэн мэдээллээр нэмэгдсэн. Корпус болон санал нийлүүлэлтийн үр дүнг текстээс илүү олон судалгаа хийх ёстой.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer eit merkelig korpus av stasjonar om moralske problemer for Brasiliansk portugisisk språk, og presenterer referanse til både oppgåver for å gjenkjenne stasjonen og klassifisere polaritet. Corpusen er bygd frå Twitter og utvida meir med data som er elisert gjennom crowd sourcing og merket av sine eige forfattarane. Dette er forventa at korpus og referanse-resultatet skal brukast som grunnlinje for fleire studier i stadsgjenkjenning og polaritetsklassifikasjonen frå teksten.', 'ro': 'Introducem un corpus etichetat de poziții despre probleme morale pentru limba portugheză braziliană și prezentăm rezultatele de referință atât pentru recunoașterea poziției, cât și pentru sarcinile de clasificare a polarității. Corpusul este construit de pe Twitter și extins în continuare cu date obținute prin crowdsourcing și etichetate de proprii autori. Rezultatele corpului și referințele vor fi luate ca bază pentru studii suplimentare în domeniul recunoașterii poziției și clasificării polarității din text.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo označen korpus stanja o moralnim pitanjima Brazilskog portugalskog jezika, i predstavljamo rezultate referentnog rezultata za zadatke za prepoznavanje stanja i klasifikaciju polarnosti. Korpus je izgrađen iz Twittera i dalje se proširio sa podacima izraženim putem izvora gomile i označavanih svojim autorima. Skupite se, očekuje se da će korpus i rezultati referencije biti uzeti kao osnovnu liniju za daljnje ispitivanje u oblasti priznanja stanja i klasifikacije polarnosti iz teksta.', 'si': 'අපි බ්\u200dරාජිලියාන් පොර්ටුගුලි භාෂාව සඳහා නිර්මාණික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන ලේබල් කරපු කොර්පුස් එකක් පෙනුම් කරනවා, සහ ප්\u200dර කොර්පුස් ට්විටර් වලින් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ තව තියෙන්නේ ඒ වගේම දත්ත ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති කරලා තියෙන්නේ  සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න, කෝර්පස් සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් බලාපොරොත්තු වෙන්නේ පුළුවන් අධ්\u200dයානයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200d', 'so': 'Waxaannu soo bandhignaynaa xaaladaha caadiga ah oo ku saabsan dhibaatooyinka rasmiga ah ee afka Burtuqiis ee Brazil, isla markaasna waxan ka helaynaa fasaxyada aqoonsashada iyo baaritaanka. Korpus waxaa laga dhisaa Twitterka kadibna waxaa lagu sii kordhiyaa macluumaad ay ku qoran yihiin taariikhda dadka oo ay ku qoran yihiin macluumaadka dadka. Si wada jir ah waxaa loola yaabaa in dhammaan looga dhigo koorasyada qoyska iyo midhaha referanshaha looga barto waxbarasho dheeraad ah ee lagu baranayo beerta aqoonsashada joogtada iyo bandhigyada baaritaanka.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en märkt korpus av ställningstaganden om moraliska frågor för det brasilianska portugisiska språket, och presenterar referensresultat för både ställningstagande erkännande och polaritetsklassificering uppgifter. Korpusen är byggd från Twitter och utökas ytterligare med data som erhållits genom crowdsourcing och märkts av sina egna författare. Sammantaget förväntas korpus- och referensresultaten tas som utgångspunkt för ytterligare studier inom området ställningsigenkänning och polaritetsklassificering från text.', 'ur': 'ہم برازیل پورتوگل زبان کے لئے اخلاقی مسئلہ کے بارے میں ایک لابل کی جگہ کی جگہ معلوم کرتے ہیں، اور موقعیت شناسایی اور قطعیت کلاسیفوں کے لئے ارتباط نتیجے پیش کرتے ہیں. کورپوس ٹویٹر سے بنایا گیا ہے اور اس سے زیادہ پھیلا گیا ہے جو جماعت سورسینگ کے ذریعے اور اپنے لیبل کے ذریعے لکھا گیا ہے۔ اکٹھے، کورپوس اور منظور نتیجے کی انتظار کی جاتی ہے کہ متن سے دوسری تحقیقات کے لئے بنسس لین بنائے جائیں۔', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் பிரேசிலிய போர்த்துகீசிய மொழிக்கான நிலைகளை பற்றி ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட நிலைகளை அறிவிக்கிறோம், இப்போது குறிப்பு முடிவுகள் இருந் இந்த கார்ப்புஸ் தொடர்பிலிருந்து உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் மேலும் விரிவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் அவர்கள் சொந ஒன்றாக சேர்க்கவும், குறிப்பு மற்றும் முடிவு', 'uz': "Biz Braziliya Portugalcha tillarining qo'l muammolari haqida ko'rsatuvchimiz, va hozir o'zgarishni tasavvur qilish va taqdimlik tashkilotlarini anglatadi. Name Birlashtirish mumkin, korpus va reference natijalari matnning davomida davom etish va taʼminlovchi darajadagi darajada koʻproq taʼminlovchi natijasi deb ataladi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đưa ra một tập hợp kịch bản về vấn đề đạo đức cho ngôn ngữ Bồ Đào Nha Brazil, và đưa ra kết quả tham khảo cho cả nhiệm vụ nhận biết quan điểm và phân tích cực. Tập đoàn được xây dựng từ Twitter và được mở rộng thêm với dữ liệu thu thập từ đám đông và được biên tập bởi tác giả của chính họ. Tập hợp lại, kết quả tập hợp và kết quả tham khảo được dự kiến là cơ sở cơ bản cho những nghiên cứu tiếp theo về nhận vị trí và phân tích cực từ văn bản.', 'bg': 'Представяме обозначен корпус от позиции по морални въпроси за бразилския португалски език и представяме референтни резултати както за задачите за разпознаване на позиции, така и за класификация на полярността. Корпусът е изграден от Туитър и допълнително разширен с данни, получени чрез групово снабдяване и етикетирани от собствените им автори. Очаква се корпусът и референтните резултати да бъдат взети като база за по-нататъшни изследвания в областта на разпознаването на позициите и класификацията на полярността от текст.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo označen korpus stanja o moralnim pitanjima Brazilskog portugalskog jezika i predstavljamo referentni rezultat i zadataka za priznanje stanja i klasifikaciju polarnosti. Corpus je izgrađen iz Twitter-a i dalje se proširio s podacima izraženim putem društvenih izvora i označavanih svojim autorima. Očekuje se da će korpus i rezultati referencije biti uzeti kao početnu liniju za daljnje ispitivanje u području priznanja stanja i klasifikacije polarnosti iz teksta.', 'nl': 'We introduceren een gelabeld corpus van standpunten over morele kwesties voor de Braziliaanse Portugese taal, en presenteren referentieresultaten voor zowel de standpunten herkenning als polariteit classificatie taken. Het corpus is opgebouwd uit Twitter en verder uitgebreid met data verkregen door crowdsourcing en gelabeld door hun eigen auteurs. Samengevat zullen de corpus- en referentieresultaten naar verwachting als uitgangspunt worden genomen voor verdere studies op het gebied van standherkenning en polariteitsclassificatie uit tekst.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer et mærket korpus af holdninger om moralske spørgsmål for det brasilianske portugisiske sprog, og præsenterer reference resultater for både holdningsanerkendelse og polaritetsklassificering opgaver. Korpusset er bygget ud fra Twitter og yderligere udvidet med data fremkaldt gennem crowdsourcing og mærket af deres egne forfattere. Samlet forventes korpus- og referenceresultaterne at blive taget som baseline for yderligere undersøgelser inden for stillingsgenkendelse og polaritetsklassificering fra tekst.', 'de': 'Wir stellen einen markierten Korpus von Standpunkten zu moralischen Fragen f羹r die brasilianische portugiesische Sprache vor und pr瓣sentieren Referenzergebnisse sowohl f羹r die Positionserkennung als auch f羹r die Polarit瓣tsklassifikation. Das Korpus wird aus Twitter aufgebaut und mit Daten erweitert, die durch Crowdsourcing gewonnen und von eigenen Autoren markiert wurden. Zusammenfassend sollen die Korpus- und Referenzergebnisse als Grundlage f羹r weitere Studien im Bereich der Positionserkennung und Polarit瓣tsklassifizierung aus Texten herangezogen werden.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan sebuah korpus berdetak tentang masalah moral untuk bahasa Portugis Brazil, dan memperkenalkan hasil referensi untuk kedua tugas pengenal posisi dan klasifikasi polaritas. Korpus dibangun dari Twitter dan diperbesar lebih lanjut dengan data yang muncul melalui sumber keramaian dan ditabel oleh penulis mereka sendiri. Bersama-sama, hasil corpus dan referensi diharapkan untuk dianggap sebagai dasar untuk penelitian lanjut dalam bidang pengenal posisi dan klasifikasi polaritas dari teks.', 'fa': 'ما یک جسد مشخص شده از وضعیت های اخلاقی برای زبان پورتوژیک برزیلی معرفی می کنیم و نتیجه های ارتباط برای شناسایی وضعیت و کلانتریت مشخص می کنیم. کورپوس از توئیتر ساخته شده و با داده\u200cهایی که از طریق منابع جمعیت\u200cها و توسط نویسندگان خودشان نشان داده\u200cاند، بیشتر گسترش داده می\u200cشود. جمع کنید، انتظار دارد که نتایج مربوط و مربوط به عنوان یک خط بنیادی برای تحقیقات بیشتری در زمینه شناسایی وضعیت و ترکیب قطعیت از متن بگیرند.', 'ko': '우리는 브라질 포르투갈어 도덕 문제의 입장 표기 자료 라이브러리를 소개하고 입장 식별과 극성 분류 임무의 참고 결과를 제시했다.자료 라이브러리는 트위터에서 만들어진 것으로 패키지를 통해 얻은 데이터를 더욱 확장하고 자신의 저자가 표시한다.요컨대 어료 라이브러리와 참고 결과는 입장 식별과 텍스트의 극성 분류 분야를 더욱 연구하는 기선이 될 전망이다.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha viungo vinavyotajwa kuhusu masuala ya kimaadili kwa lugha ya Kireno ya Brazil, na kwa sasa matokeo ya kutambua msimamo na kazi za uchafuzi. Kampuni hiyo imejengwa kutoka Twita na imepandishwa zaidi na taarifa zinazoonyesha kupitia vyanzo vya habari vya umma na kuchapishwa na waandishi wao wenyewe. Kusanyika pamoja, matokeo ya makampuni na maoni yanatarajiwa kuchukuliwa kama msingi kwa ajili ya tafiti zaidi katika uwanja wa kutambua msimamo na kutangazwa kwa uchafuzi kutoka kwa maandishi.', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n merkelike korpus van staanse oor morale aandag vir die Braziliaanse Portugese taal, en voorsien verwysing resultate vir beide die staanse herken en polarisie klassifikasie opdragte. Die korpus is gebou van Twitter en verder uitgevou met data wat verlig is deur skare uitbreiding en gemerk word deur hul eie outeure. Sit saam, word die korpus en verwysing resultate verwag om as 'n basislien te neem vir verdere studie in die veld van staatstans herken en polarisiteit klasifikasie van teks.", 'tr': 'Biz Braziliýa portugalça dilinde ahlaky meseleler barada etilgeli bir korpus çykyşyny görkeýäris we durum tanyşynyň we polaritlik klasifikasy uzmanlarynyň hem çykyş netijesini görkeýäris. Korpus Twitterden guruldy we köp adamlary tarapyndan berilen we öz awtorlary tarapyndan etiket edilen maglumatlary bilen öňündürildi. Birleşik bilen, korpus we referens netijeleri metiniň tanyş we polaritlik klasifikasy üçin esasy çykmak üçin gözlenýär.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një korpus të etiketuar qëndrimesh rreth çështjeve morale për gjuhën portugale brasileze dhe paraqesim rezultate reference si për detyrat e njohjes së qëndrimeve ashtu edhe për klasifikimin e polaritetit. Korpus është ndërtuar nga Twitter dhe zgjeruar më tej me të dhëna të krijuara nëpërmjet burimeve publike dhe etiketuar nga autorët e tyre. Bashkë, rezultatet e korpusit dhe referencës pritet të marrin si bazë për studime të mëtejshme në fushën e njohjes së qëndrimeve dhe klasifikimit të polaritetit nga teksti.', 'am': 'የብራዚላዊ ፖርቱጋሊስ ቋንቋ የሕግ ጉዳዮች እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ካርፓስ ከትዊተር የተገነባ እና የህዝብ አቀማመጥ እና በራሳቸው ጸሐፊዎች የተደረገ ዳርተቶችን የተሰፋነ ነው፡፡ በተሰበሰቡ፣ የቆርፓስ እና የፍሬው ውጤቶች ከጽሑፍ ለመቀናቀል እና የርኵሰት ትምህርት መጻሕፍት የበለጠ ጥያቄ መሆኑን በመቀበል ይጠቅማል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք բրազիլիացի պորտուգալիացի լեզվի բարոյական հարցերի մասին մի կորպոս դիրքեր, և ներկայացնում ենք համեմատական արդյունքներ, ինչպես դիրքերի ճանաչման, ինչպես նաև հյուսիսային դասակարգման խնդիրների համար: Կորպուսը կառուցված է Թվիթերից և ավելի լայնացված տվյալներով, որոնք առաջացել են ամբոխի կողմից և որոնք պիտակում են իրենց հեղինակների կողմից: Կարծում է, որ կորպուսի և հաղորդակցման արդյունքները պետք է ընդունվեն որպես հիմք տեքստից հետագա ուսումնասիրությունների ոլորտում դիրքի ճանաչման և հյուսիսականության դասակարգում:', 'az': 'Biz Braziliyalı Portugalca dilinin moral məsələləri haqqında mövzuların korpusu təşkil edirik və mövzuların tanınması və polarlıq klasifikasiya görevlərinin mənfəətlərini təşkil edirik. Korpus Twitterdən inşa edilir və öz yazıcıları tarafından yazılmış qövmünün istifadə edilən məlumatları ilə daha çox genişlənir. Birlikte, korpus və referens sonuçları mətndən daha çox təhsil etmək və polyarlıq klasifikasyonu sahəsində daha çox təhsil ediləcək.', 'bn': 'আমরা ব্রাজিলীয় পর্তুগীজ ভাষার নৈতিক বিষয়গুলো সম্পর্কে একটি চিহ্নিত কোর্পাসের সাথে পরিচিত করেছি এবং বর্তমানে স্বীকৃতি এবং দূষণীয়তা বিভ এই কোর্পাস টুইটার থেকে তৈরি করা হয়েছে এবং তাদের নিজেদের লেখকের মাধ্যমে জনগণের সোর্সিং এবং লেবেলের মাধ্যমে তথ্য বিস একত্রিত করুন, কোর্পাস এবং রেফারেন্সের ফলাফল প্রত্যাশা করা হচ্ছে টেক্সট থেকে স্বীকৃতি এবং দূষণীয়তার ক্ষেত্রে আরো গবেষণার জন্য।', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo označen korpus stanja o moralnim pitanjima Brazilskog portugalskog jezika, i predstavljamo rezultate referentnog rezultata za zadatke za priznanje stanja i klasifikaciju polarnosti. Korpus je izgrađen iz Twitter-a i dalje se proširio sa podacima izraženim putem izvora masovnih izvora i označavanih svojim autorima. Skupite se, očekuje se da će korpus i rezultati referencije biti uzeti kao početnu liniju za daljnje ispitivanje u oblasti priznanja stanja i klasifikacije polarnosti iz teksta.', 'ca': "Introduïm un cos etiquetat de postures sobre problemes morals per a la llengua portuguesa brasilera, i presentem resultats de referència tant per al reconeixement de postures com per a les tasques de classificació de polaritat. El corpus està construït a partir de Twitter i s'expandeix més amb les dades generades a través de la publicitat i etiquetades pels seus propis autors. Junts, s'espera que els resultats del corpus i de la referència siguin considerats com a base per a més estudis en el camp del reconeixement de posicions i la classificació de polaritat a partir del text.", 'cs': 'Představujeme označený korpus postojů k morálním otázkám brazilského portugalského jazyka a prezentujeme referenční výsledky jak pro rozpoznávání postojů, tak pro klasifikaci polarity. Korpus je postaven na Twitteru a dále rozšiřován o data získaná crowdsourcingu a označená vlastními autory. Dohromady se očekává, že korpusové a referenční výsledky budou brány jako základ pro další studie v oblasti rozpoznávání postojů a klasifikace polarity z textu.', 'et': 'Tutvustame Brasiilia portugali keele moraalsete küsimuste märgistatud seisukohtade korpust ning esitame viitetulemusi nii seisukohtade tuvastamise kui ka polaarsuse klassifitseerimise ülesannete kohta. Korpus on ehitatud Twitterist ja laiendatud andmetega, mida kogutakse läbi massiallikate ja mis on märgistatud nende enda autorite poolt. Kokku võetakse korpus ja viitetulemused eeldatavasti aluseks edasistele uuringutele asendituvastuse ja polaarsuse klassifitseerimise valdkonnas tekstist.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme brasilialaisen portugalin kielen moraalisia kysymyksiä koskevan merkityn kantakokonaisuuden ja esitämme viitetuloksia sekä asennon tunnistus- että polariteettiluokitustehtäviin. Korpus rakentuu Twitteristä ja laajenee edelleen joukkohankinnan kautta kerätyllä ja omien tekijöiden leimaamalla datalla. Korpus- ja viitetulosten odotetaan olevan lähtökohdaksi jatkotutkimuksille, jotka koskevat asentotunnistusta ja polariteettiluokitusta tekstistä.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk karo perusahaan sing nggawe gerangkat dhéwé kesempatan kanggo nggawe barang portugis, lan nyimpen dhéwé nggawe barang dhéwé kesempatan karo hal kedaulatan tanggal nggawe gerangkat dhéwé. Gosoko wong-wong kiyuwis nggawe YouTube lan luwih dumadhi sak ono data nyang mempernik perusahaan winih lan didalah sing ngedol oleh lan oleh-oleh sing nganggo perusahaan liyane Piyambak karo, sawetakno karo kongkon mruput lan banjurpun dipolekake sampeyan mruput kanggo tukang mruput dumadhi kapan winih dhéwé, kita nguasakno perusahaan karo kelas piyambak lan kelas kuwi kesempatan.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים גוף עמדות מסומנים על בעיות מוסריות לשפה הפורטוגזית הברזילית, ומציגים תוצאות התייחסות גם לזהות עמדות וגם למשימות מסווג הקוטב. הקורפוס בנוי מטוויטר ומרחב יותר עם נתונים שנוצרים דרך מקורות קהל ומתווים על ידי הסופרים שלהם. ביחד, התוצאות הקורפוס והתוצאות התייחסות צפויות להילקח כבסיס עבור מחקרים נוספים בשטח זיהוי עמדה וקוליטיות מהטקסט.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo označen korpus stališč o moralnih vprašanjih brazilskega portugalskega jezika in predstavljamo referenčne rezultate za naloge prepoznavanja stališč in polarnosti klasifikacije. Korpus je zgrajen iz Twitterja in še naprej razširjen s podatki, ki jih zbirajo prek množičnega vira in označujejo lastni avtorji. Pričakuje se, da bodo korpusni in referenčni rezultati skupaj upoštevani kot izhodišče za nadaljnje študije na področju prepoznavanja položaja in razvrščanja polarnosti iz besedila.', 'ha': "Tuna ƙara wani marubuci na hayan da aka faɗa masu kashfa ga harshen Kirangiz na Bjerzil, kuma da matsalar muhimmanci na matsalar da aikin tambuwanta da sifilafinci. An gina makampuni daga Twitter kuma aka ƙara bayan bayan data da aka sanar da shi a kan mutane na source da aka rubuta na mutane. Ana ƙayyade a haɗa kowaci, matsaran kowace da matsala za'a ɗauki matsayin bayani dõmin a sake karatun ƙarami cikin field da ganin istanci da siffarori na tsari daga matsayin.", 'bo': 'We introduce a labelled corpus of stances about moral issues for the Brazilian Portuguese language, and present reference results for both the stance recognition and polarity classification tasks. སྒེར མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་ན། དབུས་པ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་དག་གི་གཟུགས་རིས་ཡིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་རྟོགས་དང་མཐུན་རིམ'}
{'en': 'Offence in Dialogues : A Corpus-Based Study', 'ar': 'جريمة في الحوارات: دراسة على أساس الجسد', 'es': 'El delito en los diálogos: un estudio basado en el corpus', 'fr': "L'infraction dans les dialogues\xa0: une étude fondée sur un corpus", 'pt': 'Ofensa em Diálogos: Um Estudo Baseado em Corpus', 'ja': '対話における不快感：コーパスベースの研究', 'hi': 'संवादों में अपराध: एक कॉर्पस-आधारित अध्ययन', 'zh': '其犯:语料库之究也', 'ga': 'Cion in Agallamh: Staidéar Corpas-Bhunaithe', 'ru': 'Преступление в диалоге: исследование, основанное на корпусе', 'el': 'Η προσβολή στους διαλόγους: Μια μελέτη βασισμένη στο Σώμα', 'hu': 'Bűncselekmény a párbeszédekben: Corpus-alapú tanulmány', 'ka': 'დიალოგში მომხმარება: Corpus- დაბაზული სწავლება', 'it': "L'offesa nei dialoghi: uno studio basato sul corpo", 'lt': 'Dialoginių dialogų įvykiai: korpusu pagrįstas tyrimas', 'kk': 'Диалогтардың қашықтығы: Жергілікті зерттеу', 'mk': 'Настанок во дијалози: студија базирана на корпус', 'ms': 'Kejadian dalam Dialog: Pelajaran Berdasarkan Korpus', 'ml': 'ഡയലോഗുകളില്\u200d പുറപ്പെടുക: ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ്- അടിസ്ഥാനമായ പഠനം', 'mn': 'Диалогдуудын ажиллагаа: Хүмүүсийн суурь судалгаа', 'mt': 'Offenza fid-Djalogi: Studju bbażat fuq il-Korp', 'no': 'Utvikling i dialogvindauge: Eit korpusbasert studie', 'pl': 'Obrażenie w dialogach: badanie oparte na korpusie', 'ro': 'Ofensiva în dialoguri: un studiu bazat pe corpus', 'sr': 'Odstupanje u dijalogima: Proučavanje na korpusu', 'si': 'Comment', 'so': 'Fursada dialogues: A Corpus-Based Study', 'sv': 'Brott i dialoger: En korpusbaserad studie', 'ta': 'உரையாடலில் வெளியேறுதல்: ஒரு கார்புஸ் அடிப்படையான ஆய்வு', 'ur': 'Dialogs میں نافس: ایک Corpus-Based Study', 'uz': 'Dialoglarda tashqari: A Corpus asosiy Study', 'vi': 'Tác dụng trong cuốn Dialogo: A Corpus-Based study.', 'bg': 'Престъпление в диалозите: проучване, основано на корпус', 'nl': 'Belediging in dialoog: een corpusgebaseerde studie', 'hr': 'Počinnost u dijalogima: ispitivanje na temelju korpusa', 'da': 'Overtrædelse i dialoger: En korpusbaseret undersøgelse', 'de': 'Offensive im Dialog: Eine korpusbasierte Studie', 'ko': '대화에서의 무례함: 어료 라이브러리에 기초한 연구', 'fa': 'اجرا در محاورها: یک مطالعه بر پایه Corpus', 'id': 'Kecelakaan dalam Dialog: Studi Berdasarkan Korpus', 'sw': 'Utafiti katika Dialogu: Utafiti wa Kikosi', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Ofenca në dialoge: Një studim bazuar në korpus', 'tr': 'Dialoglarda söndürme: Korpus tabanlı okuw', 'am': 'የመስመር ዝርዝር: A Corpus-Based Study', 'hy': 'Պատճառները դասախոսություններում. Կորպուսի հիմնված ուսումնասիրություն', 'az': 'Dialoqlarda f…Щaliyy…Щt: Corpus-Based Study', 'bn': 'ডায়ালগে অফেন্স: একটি কোর্পুস-ভিত্তিক গবেষণা', 'bs': 'Odstupanje u dijalogu: Ispitivanje na temelju korpusa', 'ca': 'Delincció en Diàleg: Un estudi basat en el Corpus', 'cs': 'Útok v dialogu: Studie založená na korpusu', 'et': 'Kuritegu dialoogides: korpusel põhinev uuring', 'fi': 'Rikos vuoropuheluissa: Corpus-pohjainen tutkimus', 'jv': 'Pasang kanggo Dialog: Una Mesasai sing diangkat-diangkat', 'sk': 'Kaznivo dejanje v dialogih: študija, ki temelji na korpusu', 'he': 'עבירה בדיולוגים: מחקר מבוסס על קורפוס', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'དྲ་བ་དང་བློ་གཏོང་ཐོག་གི་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་ལ། རྩིས་གཞི་གཞི་རྟེན་གཞི་བརྗོད་ཞིབ'}
{'en': 'In recent years an increasing number of analyses of offensive language has been published, however, dealing mainly with the automatic detection and classification of isolated instances. In this paper we aim to understand the impact of offensive messages in online conversations diachronically, and in particular the change in offensiveness of dialogue turns. In turn, we aim to measure the progression of offence level as well as its direction-For example, whether a conversation is escalating or declining in offence. We present our method of extracting linear dialogues from tree-structured conversations in social media data and make our code publicly available. Furthermore, we discuss methods to analyse this dataset through changes in discourse offensiveness. Our paper includes two main contributions ; first, using a neural network to measure the level of offensiveness in conversations ; and second, the analysis of conversations around offensive comments using decoupling functions.', 'es': 'Sin embargo, en los últimos años se ha publicado un número cada vez mayor de análisis del lenguaje ofensivo, que se ocupan principalmente de la detección automática y la clasificación de casos aislados. En este artículo pretendemos entender diacrónicamente el impacto de los mensajes ofensivos en las conversaciones en línea y, en particular, el cambio en la ofensividad de los giros de diálogo. A su vez, nuestro objetivo es medir la progresión del nivel ofensivo, así como su dirección, por ejemplo, si una conversación está aumentando o disminuyendo en la ofensiva. Presentamos nuestro método para extraer diálogos lineales de conversaciones estructuradas en árbol en datos de redes sociales y hacemos que nuestro código esté disponible públicamente. Además, discutimos métodos para analizar este conjunto de datos a través de cambios en la ofensividad del discurso. Nuestro artículo incluye dos contribuciones principales; primero, el uso de una red neuronal para medir el nivel de ofensividad en las conversaciones; y segundo, el análisis de conversaciones en torno a comentarios ofensivos mediante funciones de disociación.', 'ar': 'في السنوات الأخيرة ، تم نشر عدد متزايد من التحليلات للغة الهجومية ، ومع ذلك ، تتناول بشكل أساسي الاكتشاف التلقائي وتصنيف الحالات المعزولة. نهدف في هذه الورقة إلى فهم تأثير الرسائل المسيئة في المحادثات عبر الإنترنت بشكل غير متزامن ، وعلى وجه الخصوص التغيير في التحولات الهجومية للحوار. في المقابل ، نهدف إلى قياس تقدم مستوى الجريمة وكذلك اتجاهها - على سبيل المثال ، ما إذا كانت المحادثة تتصاعد أو تنخفض في الجريمة. نقدم طريقتنا في استخراج الحوارات الخطية من المحادثات المبنية على شجرة في بيانات وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ونجعل الكود الخاص بنا متاحًا للجمهور. علاوة على ذلك ، نناقش طرق تحليل مجموعة البيانات هذه من خلال التغييرات في هجوم الخطاب. تتضمن ورقتنا مساهمتين رئيسيتين ؛ أولاً ، استخدام شبكة عصبية لقياس مستوى العدوانية في المحادثات ؛ وثانيًا ، تحليل المحادثات حول التعليقات المسيئة باستخدام وظائف الفصل.', 'fr': "Ces dernières années, un nombre croissant d'analyses de langage offensant ont toutefois été publiées, traitant principalement de la détection automatique et de la classification des cas isolés. Dans cet article, nous visons à comprendre l'impact diachronique des messages offensants dans les conversations en ligne, et en particulier le changement de caractère offensant des tournures de dialogue. À notre tour, nous visons à mesurer la progression du niveau d'infraction ainsi que sa direction - Par exemple, si une conversation s'intensifie ou diminue en infraction. Nous présentons notre méthode d'extraction de dialogues linéaires à partir de conversations structurées en arborescence dans les données des réseaux sociaux et rendons notre code accessible au public. En outre, nous discutons des méthodes permettant d'analyser cet ensemble de données à travers les changements dans le discours offensif. Notre article comprend deux contributions principales\xa0; premièrement, l'utilisation d'un réseau neuronal pour mesurer le niveau d'offense dans les conversations\xa0; et deuxièmement, l'analyse des conversations autour de commentaires offensants à l'aide de fonctions de découplage.", 'pt': 'Nos últimos anos, um número crescente de análises de linguagem ofensiva tem sido publicado, no entanto, tratando principalmente da detecção automática e classificação de instâncias isoladas. Neste artigo pretendemos compreender o impacto das mensagens ofensivas nas conversas online diacronicamente, e em particular a mudança na ofensividade dos turnos de diálogo. Por sua vez, nosso objetivo é medir a progressão do nível de ofensa, bem como sua direção - por exemplo, se uma conversa está aumentando ou diminuindo a ofensa. Apresentamos nosso método de extração de diálogos lineares de conversas estruturadas em árvore em dados de mídia social e disponibilizamos nosso código publicamente. Além disso, discutimos métodos para analisar esse conjunto de dados por meio de mudanças na ofensividade do discurso. Nosso artigo inclui duas contribuições principais; primeiro, usando uma rede neural para medir o nível de ofensividade nas conversas; e segundo, a análise de conversas em torno de comentários ofensivos usando funções de dissociação.', 'hi': 'हाल के वर्षों में आक्रामक भाषा के विश्लेषण की बढ़ती संख्या प्रकाशित की गई है, हालांकि, मुख्य रूप से अलग-अलग उदाहरणों के स्वचालित पता लगाने और वर्गीकरण से निपटने के लिए। इस पेपर में हम ऑनलाइन वार्तालापों में आक्रामक संदेशों के प्रभाव को समझने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं, और विशेष रूप से संवाद की आक्रामकता में परिवर्तन बदल जाता है। बदले में, हम अपराध के स्तर की प्रगति के साथ-साथ इसकी दिशा को मापने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं - उदाहरण के लिए, चाहे कोई वार्तालाप अपराध में बढ़ रहा हो या घट रहा हो। हम सोशल मीडिया डेटा में पेड़-संरचित वार्तालापों से रैखिक संवाद निकालने की हमारी विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं और हमारे कोड को सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध कराते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम प्रवचन आक्रामकता में परिवर्तन के माध्यम से इस डेटासेट का विश्लेषण करने के तरीकों पर चर्चा करते हैं। हमारे पेपर में दो मुख्य योगदान शामिल हैं; सबसे पहले, बातचीत में आक्रामकता के स्तर को मापने के लिए एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करना; और दूसरा, डिकपलिंग कार्यों का उपयोग करके आक्रामक टिप्पणियों के आसपास बातचीत का विश्लेषण।', 'ru': 'Однако в последние годы все чаще публикуется анализ оскорбительных формулировок, касающихся главным образом автоматического обнаружения и классификации отдельных случаев. В этой статье мы стремимся понять влияние оскорбительных сообщений в онлайн-беседах диахронно, и в частности изменение оскорбительности диалоговых поворотов. В свою очередь, мы стремимся измерить продвижение уровня правонарушения, а также его направление - например, эскалация разговора или отказ от него. Мы представляем наш метод извлечения линейных диалогов из деревянных бесед в социальных сетях и делаем наш код общедоступным. Кроме того, мы обсуждаем методы анализа этого набора данных через изменения в оскорбительности дискурса. Наша работа включает в себя два основных вклада: во-первых, использование нейронной сети для измерения уровня оскорбительности в разговорах; и, во-вторых, анализ разговоров вокруг оскорбительных комментариев с использованием функций развязки.', 'ja': 'しかし、近年では、孤立したインスタンスの自動検出と分類を主に扱う攻撃的言語の分析が増えてきている。本稿では、オンライン会話における不快なメッセージの影響、特に対話ターンの不快感の変化を同期的に理解することを目指す。次に、犯罪レベルの進行状況とその方向性を測定します。たとえば、会話がエスカレートしているか、犯罪が減少しているかなどです。私たちは、ソーシャルメディアデータ内のツリー構造化された会話から線形対話を抽出し、コードを公開する方法を提示します。さらに、議論の不快感の変化を通じてこのデータセットを分析する方法について議論します。私たちの論文には、2つの主な貢献が含まれています。1つ目は、ニューラルネットワークを使用して会話の不快感のレベルを測定することです。2つ目は、デカップリング機能を使用した不快なコメントをめぐる会話の分析です。', 'zh': '然近年以来,攻击性言益多者已发,盖孤立之自动检测类也。 在本文中,我们旨在知道冒犯性信息在线对话中,特别是对话转折的冒犯性变化。 反是,吾之所向,量其进退 - 如对升降。 我们介介了社交媒体数据中的树结构对话中提取线性对话的方法,并使我们的代码公明可用。 又论语言冒犯之变,析其数集之法。 臣等论文,兼两大献; 先用神经网络以量言攻击性; 次用解耦函数析其对。', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas foilsíodh líon méadaitheach d’anailísí ar theanga maslach, áfach, a dhéileálann go príomha le haimsiú uathoibríoch agus le rangú cásanna leithlisithe. Sa pháipéar seo tá sé mar aidhm againn an tionchar a bhíonn ag teachtaireachtaí maslacha i gcomhráite ar líne a thuiscint ar bhealach déachrónach, agus go háirithe an t-athrú ar ionsaitheacht na gcaingne idirphlé. Ina dhiaidh sin, tá sé mar aidhm againn dul chun cinn leibhéal an chiona a thomhas chomh maith lena threo - Mar shampla, cibé an bhfuil an cion ag ardú nó ag laghdú i gcomhrá. Cuirimid i láthair ár modh chun idirphlé líneacha a bhaint as comhráite crann-struchtúrtha i sonraí meán sóisialta agus cuirimid ár gcód ar fáil go poiblí. Ina theannta sin, pléimid modhanna chun anailís a dhéanamh ar an tacar sonraí seo trí athruithe ar ionsaitheacht dioscúrsa. Áiríonn ár bpáipéar dhá phríomhchuidiú; ar dtús, líonra néarúil a úsáid chun leibhéal na maslaí i gcomhráite a thomhas; agus ar an dara dul síos, anailís ar chomhráite faoi thuairimí maslacha ag baint úsáide as feidhmeanna díchúplála.', 'el': 'Τα τελευταία χρόνια, ωστόσο, έχει δημοσιευθεί αυξανόμενος αριθμός αναλύσεων προσβλητικής γλώσσας, που ασχολούνται κυρίως με την αυτόματη ανίχνευση και ταξινόμηση μεμονωμένων περιπτώσεων. Στην παρούσα εργασία επιδιώκουμε να κατανοήσουμε διαχρονικά τον αντίκτυπο των προσβλητικών μηνυμάτων στις διαδικτυακές συνομιλίες και ειδικότερα την αλλαγή στην επιθετικότητα των στροφών διαλόγου. Με τη σειρά μας, στοχεύουμε στη μέτρηση της εξέλιξης του επιπέδου παραβίασης καθώς και της κατεύθυνσης του, για παράδειγμα, εάν μια συνομιλία κλιμακώνεται ή μειώνεται σε προσβολή. Παρουσιάζουμε τη μέθοδο εξαγωγής γραμμικών διαλόγων από συζητήσεις δομημένες από δέντρα σε δεδομένα κοινωνικών μέσων και καθιστούμε τον κώδικα μας διαθέσιμο στο κοινό. Επιπλέον, συζητάμε μεθόδους ανάλυσης αυτού του συνόλου δεδομένων μέσω αλλαγών στην επιθετικότητα του λόγου. Η εργασία μας περιλαμβάνει δύο βασικές συνεισφορές: πρώτον, χρησιμοποιώντας ένα νευρωνικό δίκτυο για τη μέτρηση του επιπέδου επιθετικότητας στις συνομιλίες. και δεύτερον, η ανάλυση των συνομιλιών γύρω από προσβλητικά σχόλια χρησιμοποιώντας λειτουργίες αποσύνδεσης.', 'hu': 'Az utóbbi években azonban egyre több sértő nyelvi elemzés jelent meg, amelyek elsősorban elszigetelt esetek automatikus felismerésével és osztályozásával foglalkoznak. Jelen tanulmány célja, hogy megértsük a sértő üzenetek hatását az online beszélgetésekben diakrónikus módon, és különösen a párbeszédfordulatok sértőképességének változását. A bűncselekmények szintjének és irányának mérésére törekszünk, például arról, hogy egy beszélgetés fokozódik-e vagy csökken-e a bűncselekmény szempontjából. Bemutatjuk a lineáris párbeszédek kinyerésének módszerét a közösségi média adataiban, és nyilvánosan hozzáférhetővé tesszük kódunkat. Ezen túlmenően megvitatjuk az adatkészlet elemzésének módszereit a diskurzus offenzivitásának változásain keresztül. Tanulmányunk két fő hozzájárulást tartalmaz: először egy idegi hálózat használata a beszélgetések offenzív szintjének mérésére; Másodszor pedig a sértő megjegyzések körüli beszélgetések elemzése, függetlenítő funkciókkal.', 'ka': 'ბოლო წლის შემდეგ ატვინციური ენის ანალიზების უფრო დიდება, მაგრამ განახლებული ინსტაციების ავტომატური განახლება და კლასიფიკაციაზე გააკეთებულია. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდა გავიგოთ ინტერნეტიური შეტყობინებების შესახებ დიაკონონიურად, და განსაკუთრებით დიალოგის შეცვლა. მაგრამ, ჩვენ მინდომის მიზეზი გადავამზადოთ საზოგადომის დონეზე და მისი მიზეზი - მაგალითად, თუ საზოგადომის განმავლობა ან გადავამზადოთ საზოგადომიში. ჩვენ ჩვენი მიზეზი სოციალური მედიაში სოციალური მონაცემების სტრუქტურული პარამეტრებიდან ლეინერი დიალოგიების გამოყენება და ჩვენი კოდის ადგილურად გახს დამატებით, ჩვენ განსაკუთრებულია მონაცემების შეცვლებით ამ მონაცემების შესახებ განსაკუთრებულობას. ჩვენი წიგნი აქვს ორი მნიშვნელოვანი დამატება; პირველად, ნეიროლური ქსელის გამოყენება, რომელიც საუბრალობაში საუბრალობის დონე ზომის გამოყენება; და მეორე, შესაბამისი კომენტურების ანალიზაცია, რომელიც გამოყენება ფუნქციების გამოყენება.', 'it': "Negli ultimi anni è stato pubblicato un numero crescente di analisi del linguaggio offensivo, occupandosi principalmente del rilevamento automatico e della classificazione di istanze isolate. In questo articolo vogliamo comprendere l'impatto diacronico dei messaggi offensivi nelle conversazioni online, e in particolare il cambiamento di offensività dei turni di dialogo. A sua volta, miriamo a misurare la progressione del livello di reato e la sua direzione - ad esempio, se una conversazione sta escalation o declino nell'offesa. Presentiamo il nostro metodo per estrarre dialoghi lineari da conversazioni strutturate ad albero nei dati dei social media e rendere il nostro codice disponibile pubblicamente. Inoltre, discutiamo metodi per analizzare questo set di dati attraverso cambiamenti nell'offensività del discorso. Il nostro documento comprende due contributi principali: in primo luogo, utilizzando una rete neurale per misurare il livello di offensività nelle conversazioni; e in secondo luogo, l'analisi delle conversazioni intorno a commenti offensivi utilizzando funzioni di disaccoppiamento.", 'kk': 'Соңғы жылдар бойынша қарсы тілдің анализацияларының саны өзгертілген, бірақ олардың көпшілігі бөлек инстанцияларының автоматты түрде анықтау және шектеу арқылы жасалған. Бұл қағазда біз онлайн сұрақтардың диагроникалық түсініктерінің әсерін түсінуге мақсат береміз, осындай-ақ диалогтың өзгерістерін түсінеміз. Мысалы, бұл сұхбат қарсы деңгейінің және бағыттауын өлшеміміз келеді - мысалы, сұхбат қарсы көтеріп не қарсы көтеріп тұрады. Біз социалдық медиақтар мәліметінде ағаш құрылған сұрақтарды сызық диалогтарды тарқату әдісімізді таңдап, кодымызды көбірек қол жеткізеді. Қосымша, бұл деректер жинағын дискурстардың өзгерістерімен анализ ету әдістерін талқылаймыз. Қағаз екі негізгі қатынас бар; біріншіден, сөйлесуде қарсылық деңгейін өлшеу үшін невралдық желі қолданылады; Екіншіден, жұмыс істеу функцияларын қолдану арқылы официялық түсініктемелер туралы сұрақтарды анализ.', 'lt': 'Vis dėlto pastaraisiais metais buvo paskelbta vis daugiau agresyvios kalbos analizių, daugiausia susijusių su automatiniu atskirtų atvejų nustatymu ir klasifikavimu. Šiame dokumente siekiame suprasti priešiškų pranešimų poveikį internetiniams pokalbiams diachroniškai, ypač pokyčius dialogo priešiškumo atžvilgiu. Savo ruožtu siekiame įvertinti nusikaltimų lygio progresavimą ir jo kryptį - pavyzdžiui, ar pokalbiai didėja, ar nusikaltimų skaičius mažėja. Pateikiame savo metodą ištraukti linijinius dialogus iš medžių struktūrizuotų pokalbių social in ės žiniasklaidos duomenise ir viešai paskelbsime savo kodą. Be to, diskutuojame apie metodus, kaip analizuoti šį duomenų rinkinį pasikeitus diskursiniam nusikalstamumui. Mūsų dokumente pateikiami du pagrindiniai įnašai; first, using a neural network to measure the level of offensiveness in conversations;  ir antra, pokalbių apie įžeidžiančias pastabas analizė naudojant atskyrimo funkcijas.', 'mk': 'Во последниве години, сепак, се објавува зголемен број анализи на офанзивниот јазик, кои се однесуваат главно на автоматското детекција и класификација на изолирани случаи. In this paper we aim to understand the impact of offensive messages in online conversations diachronically, and in particular the change in offensiveness of dialogue turns.  Од своја страна, ние имаме за цел да го мериме напредокот на нивото на кривичниот дел како и неговата насока - на пример, дали разговорот се ескалира или се намалува во кривичниот дел. Го претставуваме нашиот метод за извлекување линијарни дијалози од дрвја-структурирани разговори во податоците на социјалните медиуми и го направиме нашиот код јавно достапен. Furthermore, we discuss methods to analyse this dataset through changes in discourse offensiveness.  Нашиот весник вклучува два главни придонеси; прво, користејќи нервна мрежа за мерење на нивото на офанзивност во разговорите; и второ, анализата на разговорите околу офанзивните коментари користејќи функции за одврзување.', 'ms': 'Dalam tahun-tahun terakhir, jumlah peningkatan analisis bahasa serangan telah diterbitkan, bagaimanapun, berurusan terutama dengan pengesan automatik dan klasifikasi kes-kes terpisah. Dalam kertas ini kami bertujuan untuk memahami kesan mesej serang dalam perbualan online secara diakronik, dan terutama perubahan dalam serangan dialog berubah. Sebaliknya, kita bertujuan untuk mengukur kemajuan tahap jenayah dan arahnya - misalnya, sama ada perbualan meningkat atau menurun dalam jenayah. Kami memperkenalkan kaedah kami untuk mengekstrak dialog linear dari perbualan struktur pokok dalam data media sosial dan membuat kod kami tersedia kepada masyarakat. Selain itu, kita membincangkan kaedah untuk menganalisis set data ini melalui perubahan dalam penyerangan diskors. Kertas kami termasuk dua kontribusi utama; pertama-tama, menggunakan rangkaian saraf untuk mengukur aras serangan dalam perbualan; dan kedua, analisis perbualan sekitar komen serangan menggunakan fungsi pemisahan.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d അക്രമത്തിന്റെ ഭാഷയുടെ അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സ്വയം കണ് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വിചാരിക്കാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d സംസാരത്തില്\u200d ആക്രമിക്കുന്ന സന്ദേശങ്ങളുടെ പ്രഭാവം മനസ്സില കുറ്റകൃത്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ പ്രോഗത്തിന്\u200dറെയും അതിന്\u200dറെ നേരെയും അളന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുവാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി, ഒരു സംസാരം കൂടു ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട സംസാരത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും വൃക്ഷത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട സംസാരിക് കൂടാതെ, സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ കുറ്റമില്ലാത്ത മാറ്റങ്ങളിലൂടെ ഈ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് അന്വേഷിക്കാനുള്ള ഞങ്ങളുടെ പത്രത്തില്\u200d രണ്ടു പ്രധാന പങ്കുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ട്; ആദ്യം, സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d അപരാധിക്കുന്ന നിലയില്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു; രണ്ടാമത്തേതായി, ആക്രമിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പേരില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനെ അന്വേഷിക്കുക.', 'mt': 'F’dawn l-aħħar snin ġie ppubblikat numru dejjem akbar ta’ analiżi tal-lingwa offensiva, madankollu, li tittratta l-aktar id-detezzjoni awtomatika u l-klassifikazzjoni ta’ każijiet iżolati. F’dan id-dokument għandna l-għan li nifhmu l-impatt ta’ messaġġi offensivi fil-konverżjonijiet onlajn b’mod dijakroniku, u b’mod partikolari l-bidla fl-offensività tad-djalogu. Min-naħa l-oħra, għandna l-għan li tkejjel il-progress tal-livell tar-reat kif ukoll id-direzzjoni tiegħu - Pereżempju, jekk konverżjoni tkunx qed tiżdied jew qed tonqos fir-reat. We present our method of extracting linear dialogues from tree-structured conversations in social media data and make our code publicly available.  Barra minn hekk, niddiskutu metodi għall-analiżi ta’ dan is-sett ta’ dejta permezz ta’ bidliet fl-offensività diskors. Id-dokument tagħna jinkludi żewġ kontribuzzjonijiet ewlenin; l-ewwel nett, bl-użu ta’ netwerk newrali biex jitkejjel il-livell ta’ offensività fil-konverżjonijiet; u t-tieni, l-analiżi ta’ konverżjonijiet dwar kummenti offensivi bl-użu ta’ funzjonijiet ta’ diżakkoppjar.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн жилийн дотор дайралт хэлний шинжилгээ нэмэгдсэн. Гэхдээ ихэнхдээ ганц тохиолдлуудын автоматжуулалт болон хуваалтын тухай ажиллаж байна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид онлайн ярилцлагуудын үр дүнг ойлгохын тулд, ялангуяа диалог давуу байдлын өөрчлөлтийг ойлгохын тулд зориулсан. Үүний хувьд бид гэмт хэргийн түвшин болон түвшингийн давхар хөгжлийг хэмжихдээ зориулсан. Жишээлбэл, ярилцлага гэмт хэрэглэгддэг эсвэл гэмт хэрэглэгддэг. Бид нийгмийн медиа өгөгдлийн модны бүтээгдэхүүнээс шугам диалогуудыг гаргаж, бидний кодыг олон нийтэд ашиглаж чадна. Үүнээс гадна бид энэ өгөгдлийн сангийн шинжлэх ухааны арга замыг ярилцдаг. Бидний цаасан хоёр үндсэн үр дүнг дүрсэлж байна. Эхлээд, сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээг ашиглаж ярилцлаганд хүчирхийллийн хэмжээг хэмжээд байдаг. Харин хоёр дахь, хэлэлцээний тухай ярилцлагын талаар шинжилгээ нь хуваалцах функцуудыг ашиглаж байна.', 'no': 'I løpet av siste år er det utvikla eit økt antal analyser av offensivspråk, men hovudsakelig har det utvikla det automatisk oppdaging og klassifisering av isolerte instansar. I denne papiret må vi forstå effekten av offensivne meldingar i internett samtaler diakronisk, og spesielt endringane i offensivitet av dialogen. I tillegg målar vi å måle framgangen av lovbrudd og retningen. For eksempel om eit samtale er forskyvinga eller nedgang i lovbrudd. Vi presenterer metoden vårt for å ekstrahera lineære dialogar frå trestrukturerte samtaler i sosiale media data og gjera koden vårt offentlig tilgjengeleg. I tillegg diskuterer vi metodar for å analysera denne dataset gjennom endringar i diskurs offensivitet. Papir vårt inneheld to hovudbidrag; først, ved å bruka eit neuralnettverk for å måle nivået av offensivitet i samtaler; Og andre, analysen av samtaler rundt offensiv kommentarar med dekupleringsfunksjonar.', 'pl': 'W ostatnich latach publikowano jednak coraz większą liczbę analiz języka obraźliwego, zajmujących się głównie automatycznym wykrywaniem i klasyfikacją pojedynczych przypadków. Celem artykułu jest zrozumienie diachronicznego wpływu obraźliwych komunikatów w rozmowach online, a w szczególności zmiany ofensywności zwrotów dialogowych. Z kolei staramy się mierzyć postęp poziomu przestępstwa, jak również jego kierunek. Na przykład, czy rozmowa eskaluje się czy maleje w przestępstwie. Prezentujemy naszą metodę wyodrębniania dialogów liniowych z rozmów strukturalnych drzew w danych mediów społecznościowych i udostępniamy nasz kod publicznie. Ponadto omawiamy metody analizy tego zbioru danych poprzez zmiany w ofensywności dyskursu. Nasza praca zawiera dwa główne wkłady: po pierwsze, wykorzystanie sieci neuronowej do mierzenia poziomu ofensywności w rozmowach; a po drugie, analiza rozmów wokół obraźliwych komentarzy za pomocą funkcji oddzielania.', 'ro': 'În ultimii ani au fost publicate tot mai multe analize ale limbajului ofensator, care se ocupă în principal de detectarea automată și clasificarea instanțelor izolate. În această lucrare ne propunem să înțelegem în mod diacronic impactul mesajelor ofensatoare în conversațiile online și, în special, schimbarea în ofensivitate a conversațiilor de dialog. La rândul său, ne propunem să măsurăm progresia nivelului infracțiunii, precum și direcția acesteia - de exemplu, dacă o conversație este în creștere sau în scădere în infracțiune. Vă prezentăm metoda noastră de extragere a dialogurilor liniare din conversațiile structurate în copaci din datele rețelelor sociale și de a face codul nostru disponibil public. Mai mult, discutăm metode de analiză a acestui set de date prin schimbări ale ofensivității discursului. Lucrarea noastră include două contribuții principale; în primul rând, utilizarea unei rețele neurale pentru a măsura nivelul de ofensivitate în conversații; și în al doilea rând, analiza conversațiilor în jurul comentariilor ofensatoare folosind funcții de decuplare.', 'sr': 'Za poslednje godine je objavljen povećan broj analiza ofanzivnog jezika, međutim, uglavnom s automatskim otkrivanjem i klasifikacijom izolovanih slučajeva. U ovom papiru imamo cilj da razumemo uticaj ofanzivnih poruka u internetskim razgovorima diakronično, i posebno promjenu ofenzivnosti dijaloga. Na osnovu toga, nameravamo da mjerimo napredak nivoa zločin a, kao i njegovog smjera - na primjer, da li razgovor povećava ili smanjuje zločine. Predstavljamo naš metod izvlačenja linearnih dijaloga iz razgovora sa drveæim strukturovanim razgovorima u podacima društvenih medija i javno objavljujemo naš kod. Osim toga, razgovaramo o metodama analiziranja ovog seta podataka putem promjena diskurskih prekršaja. Naš papir uključuje dva glavna doprinosa; prvo, koristeći neuralnu mrežu za mjerenje nivoa ofenzivnosti u razgovorima; I drugo, analiza razgovora o uvrednim komentarima koristeći funkcije rasključavanja.', 'si': 'අන්තිම අවුරුදු වලින් විශ්ලේෂණයක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරලා තියෙනවා, නමුත්, ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්ලේෂණය සහ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ් මේ පත්තරේ අපි අදහස් කරනවා අන්ලයින් කතාවක් වලින් පිළිබඳ පණිවිඩයක් තේරුම් ගන්න, විශේෂයෙන් සංවාදයේ අපරා ඒ වගේම, අපි අල්ලගන්නවා අපරාධ ස්ථානයේ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය, ඒ වගේම ඒකේ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය - උදාහරණයෙන්, සංවාදයක් අපරාධ ව අපි සමාජික මධ්\u200dයමාධාරික දත්තේ වලින් ක්\u200dරීඩ් සංවාදයක් අරගෙන පිළිගන්න අපේ විධානය ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න. තවත්, අපි මේ දත්ත සැට විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනය කතා කරනවා කතා කරනවා කතා කරපු අපරාධකාරීය වලින්. අපේ පත්තරේ ප්\u200dරධාන සදහස් දෙකක් තියෙනවා; මුලින්, කතාවක් වලින් අපරාධකාරීය ස්ථානයක් පරීක්ෂා කරන්න න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය භාවිත කරන්න; දෙවෙනි විශ්ලේෂණය, අපරාධ කතාවක් වලින් විශ්ලේෂණය විස්තර කරන්න.', 'so': 'Sannadihii ugu danbeeyey waxaa la soo daabacay baaritaano badan oo ku qoran luqada caafimaadka, habase yeeshee marka ugu horeysa baaritaanka bilowga ah iyo fasaxa xaaladaha kala duwan. In this paper we aim to understand the impact of offensive messages in online conversations diachronically, and in particular the change in offensiveness of dialogue turns.  Sidoo kale waxaynu u baahan nahay inaad qiyaasto heerka dembiga horumarinta iyo hagitaankiisa – tusaale ahaan hadalku inuu kordhayo ama uu dembigu ka sii yaraanayo. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaabka aan ka soo bixino labaalooyinka linenka ah oo ka soo baxaya hadallada qoriga ah oo ku qoran macluumaadka shabakadda bulshada, waxaana si bayaan ah u heli karnaa codkeenna. Furthermore, waxaynu kala sheekaynaa qaabab lagu baarayo sawiradan si aan ugu baarayno beddelmo xadgudubyada hadalka. Warqaddayada waxaa ku jira laba kharasho oo muhiim ah; marka ugu horeysa, isticmaalka shabakadda caqliga ah si uu u qiyaaso heerka xadgudubyada hadallada; labaadna, baaritaanka hadallada oo ku wareegsan kommentaha dhibaatada isticmaalaya shaqooyin kala duduwan.', 'sv': 'Under de senaste åren har ett ökande antal analyser av stötande språk publicerats, dock främst med automatisk upptäckt och klassificering av isolerade instanser. I denna uppsats syftar vi till att förstå effekten av stötande meddelanden i onlinesamtal diakroniskt, och i synnerhet förändringen i offensivitet i dialogvändningar. Vi strävar i sin tur efter att mäta brottsnivåns utveckling och dess riktning - till exempel om ett samtal eskalerar eller minskar i brott. Vi presenterar vår metod att extrahera linjära dialoger från trädstrukturerade konversationer i sociala mediedata och göra vår kod tillgänglig för allmänheten. Vidare diskuterar vi metoder för att analysera detta dataset genom förändringar i diskursoffensiv. Vårt dokument innehåller två huvudsakliga bidrag: För det första, använda ett neuralt nätverk för att mäta nivån av offensivitet i samtal; och för det andra analysen av samtal kring stötande kommentarer med hjälp av frikopplingsfunktioner.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் மொழியின் அதிகரிக்கும் எண்ணிக்கையான ஆய்வுகள் பொதுவாக வெளிப்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, பின்னரும் முக்கியமாக தானாகவே கண்டறிதல இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் நேரடியாக இணைய உரையாடலில் குறிப்பிட்ட செய்திகளின் விளைவுகளை புரிந்து கொள்ள நோக்குகிறோம், குறி In turn, we aim to measure the progression of offence level as well as its direction - For example, whether a conversation is escalating or declining in offence.  நாங்கள் கோடு உரையாடல்களை மரங்கள் வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட பேச்சில் இருந்து வெளியேற்ற முறைமையை கொண்டுவருகிறோம் மற்றும் நம்  மேலும், நாம் இந்த தகவல் அமைப்பை பரிசோதிக்க முறையில் பேச்சு குற்றங்களில் மாற்றங்களை மூலம் விளக்க முட எங்கள் தாளில் இரண்டு முக்கிய பங்கள் உள்ளன; முதலில், ஒரு புதிய பிணையத்தை பயன்படுத்தி பேச்சில் குற்றங்களின் நிலையை அளவிடுவதற்கு; மற்றும் இரண்டாவது, செயல்பாடுகளை பயன்படுத்தி செயல்பாடுகளை சுற்றி பேசும் விளக்கம்.', 'ur': 'اگلے سالوں میں فساد کی زبان کی بہت زیادہ تحقیقات کی تعداد ظاہر کی گئی ہے، لیکن اکثریت میں ایک دوسرے مواقع کے ساتھ اپنا اٹکلیٹ شناسایی اور کلاسیفوں کا معاملہ ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم سمجھنے کا ارادہ رکھتے ہیں کہ آنلاین کی باتوں میں فساد پھیلانے والی پیغامات کا اثر سمجھ سکیں، اور مخصوصاً دیالوگ کی فساد پھیلانے کی تغییر. اس کے بعد ہم چاہتے ہیں کہ گناہ کے سطح اور اس کی طرف سے چلنے کا اندازہ مقرر کریں - مثال یہ ہے کہ کوئی بات بڑھتی ہے یا گناہ کے ذریعہ کمی ہوتی ہے ہم نے اپنے طریقے کو سوسیل میڈیا ڈیٹا میں درخت کے ساختہ صحبت سے لینیر ڈیلوگوں کو نکالنے کے لئے پیش کیا ہے اور ہمارے کڈ کو ظاہر طور پر موجود کر دیتے ہیں۔ اس کے علاوہ، ہم اس ڈیٹ سٹ کا تحقیق کرنے کے لئے طریقے سے بحث کرتے ہیں کہ اس طریقے کی تغییرات کے ذریعہ بحث کریں. ہمارے کاغذ میں دو سرداروں میں شامل ہے پہلے، ایک نیورل نیٹ ورک کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ باتوں میں فساد کی سطح اندازہ کرے، اور دوسرا، دکوپولٹ فعالیزوں کے مطابق بحث کی تحلیل ہے.', 'uz': "Yaqinda yil ichida hisoblash tilini aniqlash uchun ko'proq tarjima qilindi, ammo, asosida avtomatik aniqlash va alohida shakllar darajasini boshqarish mumkin. Bu sahifani biz tarmoq talabatlarni aniqqat tarqalashtirish xabarlari natijasida o'zgarishni tushunamiz, hususan dialog'ning noto'zgarishni o'zgartiradi. Masalan, суҳбат қўшимча ёки хато жиҳатидан камайтирилган бўлса ҳам, биз хато даражасини ва ўз юзисини ўлчашга ҳаракат қиламиз. Biz jamiyatli media maʼlumotidagi daraxt-quyidagi muloqatlarni chiqarish usulini ko'rsatish usulini ko'rsatdik va kodlash muvaffaqiyatlarimizni public qilishimiz mumkin. Koʻrsatganda, bu maʼlumotlar tarkibini o'zgartirish orqali o'rganish usullarini o'rganamiz. Qogʻozimizning ikki asosiy paydo bor; birinchi so'zda, muloqonchalarning yetarmoq darajasini o'zgartirish uchun neyrol tarmoqdan foydalanadi; Ikkinchi so'zda, ko'proq funksiyatlarni yordamida harakat qilish izohlari haqida gapiruvchi analytiki.", 'vi': 'Trong những năm gần đây, một số lượng phân tích ngôn ngữ khiêu chiến đã được xuất bản, nhưng chủ yếu liên quan đến việc phát hiện tự động và phân loại các trường hợp bị tách biệt. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi muốn hiểu về tác động của các thông điệp xúc phạm trong các cuộc nói chuyện trực tuyến theo chiều hướng kinh điển, và đặc biệt là thay đổi về tình trạng xúc phạm của cuộc đối thoại. Mục tiêu của chúng tôi là đo lường sự phát triển của mức độ phạm tội cũng như hướng đi của nó. Ví dụ, liệu cuộc đối thoại có ngày càng tăng hay giảm vi phạm. Chúng tôi trình bày phương pháp khai thác các cuộc đối thoại tuyến từ các cuộc nói chuyện cấu trúc cây trong dữ liệu mạng xã hội và công khai đoạn mã này. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi thảo luận các phương pháp phân tích dữ liệu này qua các thay đổi về chủ đề. Trong báo cáo có hai đóng góp chính; Trước tiên, sử dụng mạng thần kinh để đo mức độ có hứng tình trong cuộc nói chuyện; và thứ hai, phân tích cuộc đối thoại xung quanh các bình luận tấn công sử dụng các chức năng tách ra.', 'bg': 'През последните години обаче се публикуват все по-голям брой анализи на офанзивния език, занимаващи се основно с автоматичното откриване и класификация на отделни случаи. В настоящата статия се стремим да разберем диахронно въздействието на обидните съобщения в онлайн разговорите и по-специално промяната в обидността на диалоговите завои. От своя страна, ние се стремим да измерим напредъка на нивото на престъплението, както и посоката му - например дали разговорът ескалира или намалява в престъплението. Представяме нашия метод за извличане на линейни диалози от дървесни структурирани разговори в социалните медии и правим нашия код публично достъпен. Освен това обсъждаме методи за анализ на този набор от данни чрез промени в дискурсната офанзивност. Нашата статия включва два основни приноса: първо, използване на невронна мрежа за измерване на нивото на обидност в разговорите; и второ, анализ на разговорите около обидни коментари с помощта на функции за отделяне.', 'nl': 'De afgelopen jaren zijn echter steeds meer analyses van aanstootgevende taal gepubliceerd, waarbij vooral aandacht wordt besteed aan het automatisch opsporen en classificeren van geïsoleerde gevallen. In dit artikel willen we de impact van beledigende berichten in online gesprekken diachronisch begrijpen, en in het bijzonder de verandering in offensiviteit van dialogwendingen. Op onze beurt proberen we de voortgang van het delict niveau en de richting ervan te meten. Bijvoorbeeld of een gesprek escaleert of afneemt in delict. We presenteren onze methode om lineaire dialogen te extraheren uit boomgestructureerde gesprekken in social media data en maken onze code openbaar. Verder bespreken we methoden om deze dataset te analyseren door veranderingen in discoursoffensiviteit. Ons document bevat twee belangrijke bijdragen: Ten eerste, gebruik maken van een neuraal netwerk om het niveau van offensiviteit in gesprekken te meten; en ten tweede, de analyse van gesprekken rond aanstootgevende opmerkingen met behulp van ontkoppelingsfuncties.', 'da': 'I de senere år er der imidlertid offentliggjort et stigende antal analyser af offensivt sprog, der primært beskæftiger sig med automatisk detektering og klassificering af isolerede tilfælde. I denne artikel har vi til formål at forstå virkningen af krænkende budskaber i onlinesamtaler diakronisk, og især ændringen i offensiv i dialogvendinger. Til gengæld har vi til formål at måle udviklingen i lovovertrædelsesniveauet samt dens retning - f.eks. om en samtale eskalerer eller falder i lovovertrædelsen. Vi præsenterer vores metode til at udtrække lineære dialoger fra træstrukturerede samtaler i sociale medier data og gøre vores kode offentligt tilgængelig. Desuden diskuterer vi metoder til at analysere dette datasæt gennem ændringer i diskursoffensiv. Vores dokument indeholder to hovedbidrag: for det første at bruge et neuralt netværk til at måle niveauet af offensivitet i samtaler; og for det andet analyse af samtaler omkring stødende kommentarer ved hjælp af afkoblingsfunktioner.', 'hr': 'Za poslednje godine objavljen je povećan broj analiza ofanzivnog jezika, međutim, uglavnom s automatskim otkrivanjem i klasifikacijom izoliranih slučajeva. U ovom papiru imamo cilj razumjeti učinak ofanzivnih poruka u internetskim razgovorima dijagronično, a posebno promjenu ofanzivnosti dijaloga. Na osnovu toga, namjeravamo mjeriti napredak razine prekršaja, kao i njegov smjer - na primjer, da li se razgovor povećava ili smanjuje prekršaja. Predstavljamo naš metod izvlačenja linearnih dijaloga iz razgovora s strukturovanim drvećem u podacima društvenih medija i javno učiniti naš kod dostupnim. Osim toga, razgovaramo o metodama analiziranja ovog seta podataka putem izmjena djelovanja diskursa. Naš papir uključuje dva glavna doprinosa; prvo, koristeći neuralnu mrežu kako bi mjerili razinu ofenzivnosti u razgovorima; i drugo, analiza razgovora o uvrednim komentarima koristeći funkcije rasključavanja.', 'de': 'In den letzten Jahren wurden jedoch immer mehr Analysen offensiver Sprache veröffentlicht, die sich hauptsächlich mit der automatischen Erkennung und Klassifizierung isolierter Instanzen befassen. In diesem Beitrag wollen wir die Auswirkungen beleidigender Botschaften in Online-Gesprächen diachron verstehen, insbesondere die Veränderung der Offensivität von Dialogkurven. Im Gegenzug versuchen wir, den Verlauf des Straftatbestands sowie dessen Richtung zu messen, z.B. ob ein Gespräch eskaliert oder in Straftat abnimmt. Wir stellen unsere Methode vor, lineare Dialoge aus baumstrukturierten Konversationen in Social Media Daten zu extrahieren und unseren Code öffentlich zugänglich zu machen. Darüber hinaus diskutieren wir Methoden zur Analyse dieses Datensatzes durch Veränderungen der Diskursoffensivität. Unser Papier enthält zwei Hauptbeiträge: Erstens, Verwendung eines neuronalen Netzes zur Messung der Offensivität in Gesprächen; Zweitens die Analyse von Gesprächen um anstößige Kommentare mittels Entkopplungsfunktionen.', 'ko': '그러나 최근 몇 년 동안 점점 더 많은 공격적인 언어 분석을 발표했는데 주로 고립된 실례의 자동 검측과 분류와 관련된다.본고에서 우리는 공격적인 정보가 온라인 대화에서 미치는 영향, 특히 대화 전환의 공격적인 변화를 역사적인 측면에서 이해하고자 한다.반대로, 우리의 목표는 무례함의 진전과 방향을 평가하는 것이다. 예를 들어, 대화의 무례함이 상승하고 있는지 하락하고 있는지.우리는 소셜미디어 데이터 중의 트리 구조 대화에서 선형 대화를 추출하는 방법을 제시하고 코드를 공개했다.이 밖에 우리는 말의 공격적인 변화를 통해 이 데이터 집합을 분석하는 방법도 논의했다.우리의 논문은 두 가지 주요 공헌을 포함한다.먼저 신경 네트워크를 이용하여 대화 중의 공격성 수준을 측정한다.둘째, 공격적인 평론을 둘러싼 대화를 해체 함수로 분석한다.', 'id': 'Dalam bertahun-tahun terakhir jumlah peningkatan analisis bahasa yang menyerang telah diterbitkan, bagaimanapun, berurusan terutama dengan deteksi otomatis dan klasifikasi kasus yang terisolasi. Dalam kertas ini kami bertujuan untuk memahami dampak pesan serangan dalam percakapan online secara diakronis, dan terutama perubahan dalam serangan dialog berubah. Sebagai contoh, kita bertujuan untuk mengukur kemajuan tingkat pelanggaran dan arahnya - misalnya, apakah percakapan meningkat atau menurun dalam pelanggaran. Kami mempersembahkan metode kami untuk mengekstraksi dialog linear dari percakapan struktur pohon dalam data media sosial dan membuat kode kami tersedia publik. Selain itu, kita mendiskusikan metode untuk menganalisis dataset ini melalui perubahan dalam ofensif diskors. Kertas kami termasuk dua kontribusi utama; pertama, menggunakan jaringan saraf untuk mengukur tingkat ofensif dalam percakapan; dan kedua, analisis percakapan sekitar komentar serangan menggunakan fungsi pemisahan.', 'sw': 'In recent years an increasing number of analyses of offensive language has been published, however, dealing mainly with the automatic detection and classification of isolated instances.  Katika karatasi hii tunalenga kuelewa madhara ya ujumbe wa mashambulizi katika mazungumzo ya mtandaoni kwa muda mrefu, hasa mabadiliko ya makosa ya mazungumzo yanageuka. Kwa mfano, tunalenga kupunguza maendeleo ya kiwango cha makosa pamoja na mwelekeo wake – kwa mfano, ikiwa mazungumzo yanaongezeka au kupungua kwa makosa. Tunaweza kuweka mbinu yetu ya kuondoa mazungumzo ya mistari kutoka katika mazungumzo yaliyotengenezwa na miti katika taarifa za mitandao ya kijamii na kutengeneza sheria yetu kwa uwazi. Zaidi ya hayo, tunajadili njia za kuchambua taarifa hii kwa kupitia mabadiliko ya kutokuwepo kwa makosa ya mazungumzo. Gazeti letu linajumuisha michango makuu mawili; kwanza, kwa kutumia mtandao wa neura kupima kiwango cha kutokuwa na makosa katika mazungumzo; na pili, uchambuzi wa mazungumzo yanayohusu maoni yanayoshambulia kwa kutumia nafasi mbalimbali.', 'tr': 'Son 첵yllarda k철p kanagat챌y dillerin analyzasy 챌ykyl첵ar, 첵철ne esasy otomatik tany힊dyryl첵ar we 첵al흫y힊dyryl첵ar. Bu kagyzda internetki g체rr체흫lerde d철w체rmeli mesajlary흫 t채sirini di첵ip d체힊체nmek ama챌larymyz bar. I흫 pikirim챌e, biz g체n채k채rl채k derejesini흫 geli힊mesini we 첵okaryny 철l챌체rmek ama챌larymyz.Mesela, s철hbetde힊lik 첵okary 첵a-da g체n채k채rl채k bolsa. Biz 챌yzgyly d체zg체n dialoglarymyzy sosyal med첵채ni흫 maglumatynda aga챌 d체zg체nlerinden 챌ykarmak we bizi흫 kodymyzy publika g철rkezmek 체챌in tassyklandyr첵arys. Mundan hem, bu maglumaty takmynan 챌yky힊 etmek 체챌in 챌yky힊 etmek 체챌in 첵ola 챌yk첵arys. Bizi흫 kagyzymyz iki sany esasy t채sirler bar; Ilkinji gezek, g체rr체흫lerde ukyp derejesini 철l챌체mek 체챌in neural a 첵jy ullan첵ar; Ikinjisi, fa첵llary a챌mak 체챌in ur힊awy terjimeler bilen g체rr체흫lik analizi.', 'fa': 'در سال های اخیر افزایش تعداد تحلیل\u200cهای زبان تجاوز، ولی در اصل با شناسایی و برنامه\u200cبندی از مواقع\u200cهای جدا جدا شده، منتشر شده است. در این کاغذ ما هدف داریم تا تأثیر پیغام\u200cهای تجاوز در صحبت\u200cهای آنلاین را درک کنیم، و مخصوصا تغییر تبدیل\u200cهای تجاوز دیalog را درک کنیم. در عوض، ما قصد داریم پیشرفت سطح تجاوز و مسیرش را اندازه گیریم - برای مثال، آیا یک مکالمه به افزایش یا کمتر از تجاوز است. ما روش\u200cهای خودمان را نشان می\u200cدهیم که از گفتگوهای ساخته شده\u200cی درختان در داده\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی بیرون بیاوریم و کد ما را به طور عمومی در دسترس می\u200cدهیم. به علاوه، ما روش\u200cهایی برای تحلیل این مجموعه داده\u200cها با تغییرات در گفتگوهای نافرمانی صحبت می\u200cکنیم. کاغذ ما شامل دو کمک اصلی است، اول، از یک شبکه عصبی برای اندازه سطح تجاوز در گفتگوها استفاده می کند. و دوم، تحلیل مکالمات در مورد توضیح های تجاوز با استفاده از عملکرد جدا کردن.', 'am': 'ባለፈው ዓመታት በቁጥጥር የሚጨምረው የቋንቋ አካባቢ አካባቢ እና በተለየ ሁኔታዎችን በተለየ አውቶማቲ እና በተለያዩ ሁኔታዎችን በመግለጫው ላይ ተዘጋጅቷል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም የኢንተርኔት መልዕክቶች በጥያቄ፣ በተለይም የባሕላዊ ስህተት ውጤት በማስተዋል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪው፣ የዓመፃ ደረጃን እና አካሄዱን ለመለካት እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የዛፍ አካባቢ ንግግሮችን በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ዳታዎች እና የኮድራችንን ገልፅ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ ይህን ዳታዎችን በመለወጥ በንግግር ክፋት በማስተካከል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የፕሬዝዳንታችን ሁለት ዋጋዎች ናቸው፤ አስቀድሞ በመናገር የዓመፃን ደረጃን ለመለካት የጥረት መረብ በመጠቀም፥ በሁለተኛውም፣ በአሳማሚ ትርጓሜዎችን በመጠቀም የንግግርን አስተያየት፡፡', 'sq': 'Në vitet e fundit një numër në rritje analizash të gjuhës ofensive është botuar megjithatë, duke trajtuar kryesisht zbulimin dhe klasifikimin automatik të rasteve të izoluar. Në këtë letër ne synojmë të kuptojmë ndikimin e mesazheve ofensivë në bisedimet online diakronisht dhe veçanërisht ndryshimin në ofensivën e dialogut. Nga ana tjetër, ne synojmë të matim përparimin e nivelit të krimit si dhe drejtimin e tij, për shembull, nëse një bisedë po eskalohet apo po bie në krim. Ne paraqesim metodën tonë për nxjerrjen e dialogeve lineare nga bisedimet me pemë të strukturuara në të dhënat e medias sociale dhe bëjmë kodin tonë të disponueshëm publikisht. Përveç kësaj, diskutojmë metodat për të analizuar këtë grup të dhënash nëpërmjet ndryshimeve në ofensivën diskursore. Our paper includes two main contributions;  së pari, duke përdorur një rrjet nervor për të matur nivelin e ofensivës në bisedime; dhe së dyti, analiza e bisedimeve rreth komenteve ofensive duke përdorur funksionet e ndarjes.', 'hy': 'Վերջին տարիների ընթացքում գրավիչ լեզվի վերլուծությունների աճող քանակը հրատարակվել է, սակայն դրանք հիմնականում վերաբերվում են մեկուսացված դեպքերի ավտոմատիկ հայտնաբերման և դասակարգումների հետ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նպատակում ենք հասկանալ օնլայն հաղորդագրությունների վրա զայրացնող հաղորդագրությունների ազդեցությունը դիախրոնիկ կերպով, և հատկապես խոսակցության զայրացնող փոփոխությունը: Մենք, ի վերջո, նպատակում ենք չափել հանցագործության մակարդակի առաջընթացը, ինչպես նաև դրա ուղղությունը, օրինակ, արդյոք խոսակցությունը զարգանում է, թե անգամ նվազում է հանցագործության մեջ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների տվյալներում գծային հաղորդակցման մեթոդը և հանրային հասանելի դարձնում ենք մեր կոդը: Ավելին, մենք քննարկում ենք այս տվյալների համակարգի վերլուծության մեթոդները խոսակցական հանցագործության փոփոխությունների միջոցով: Մեր թղթին ներառում է երկու հիմնական ներդրումներ, առաջինը՝ օգտագործելով նյարդային ցանց հակառակցության մակարդակի չափման համար, and second, the analysis of conversations around offensive comments using decoupling functions.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে আক্রমণের ভাষার ব্যাপক বিশ্লেষণ প্রকাশিত হয়েছে, তবে মূলত স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সনাক্ত এবং বিচ্ছিন্ন ঘটনার বিভিন্ন বি এই পত্রিকায় আমরা অনলাইন আলোচনায় আক্রান্ত বার্তার প্রভাব বুঝতে চাই, বিশেষ করে ডায়ালগের অপরাধের পরিবর্তন ঘটে। পরিবর্তে আমরা অপরাধের স্তরের উন্নয়ন এবং তার দিকেও পরিমাপ করি- উদাহরণস্বরূপ, একটি কথোপকথন অপরাধ বাড়ছে কি না কিংবা কমে যাচ্ছে। আমরা সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের তথ্য থেকে গাছের কাঠামো আলোচনা থেকে লাইনার আলোচনা বের করার পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি এবং আমাদের কোড প এছাড়াও, আমরা এই তথ্য বিশ্লেষণের পদ্ধতি নিয়ে আলোচনা করি কথোপকথনের অপরাধের মাধ্যমে পরিবর্তনের মাধ্যমে। আমাদের কাগজের মধ্যে দুই প্রধান অবদান রয়েছে; first, using a neural network to measure the level of offensiveness in conversations;  আর দ্বিতীয়, আক্রান্ত মন্তব্যের বিশ্লেষণের বিশ্লেষণ বিভিন্ন কার্যক্রম ব্যবহার করে।', 'az': 'Son illərdə həddi aşan dillərin analizi artırmaq üçün daha çox yayınlanmışdır, amma çox təkrar təkrar təkrar təkrar edilmiş olaraq, təkrar-təkrar təkrar edilmiş olaraq. Bu kağızda, internette danışmaqların dəyişikliklərinin dəyişikliklərini anlamaq istəyirik, özlərinə də diyalət dəyişikliklərinin dəyişikliklərini anlamaq istəyirik. Bununla belə, biz günah seviyyətini və yolunu ölçürmək istəyirik - məsələn, bir söhbət günah yüksəlir və ya azalır. Biz sosyal media məlumatının ağacları qurulmuş görüşmələrindən linear dialogları çıxartmaq və kodumuzu açıq-aşkar mövcuddur. Daha sonra, bu veri quruluğunu dəyişdirmək üçün metodları danışırıq. Kağıdımız iki ana kömək var; ilk dəfə, söhbətlərdə həddi a şmaq üçün nöral ağı istifadə edir; İkincisi də, fərqləndirmək fərqlərini istifadə edərək offensiv şəhadətlərin barəsindəki söhbətlərin analizi.', 'cs': 'V posledních letech se však zveřejňuje stále větší počet analýz urážlivého jazyka, které se zabývají především automatickou detekcí a klasifikací izolovaných instancí. V tomto článku se snažíme porozumět dopadu urážlivých sdělení v online konverzacích diachronicky, a zejména změně útočnosti dialogových obratů. Naším cílem je měřit průběh úrovně útoku a jeho směr například, zda konverzace eskaluje nebo klesá v útoku. Prezentujeme naši metodu extrahování lineárních dialogů ze stromově strukturovaných konverzací v datech sociálních médií a zpřístupníme náš kód veřejně. Dále diskutujeme metody analýzy tohoto datového souboru prostřednictvím změn v diskurzní ofenzivě. Naše práce obsahuje dva hlavní příspěvky: za prvé, použití neuronové sítě k měření úrovně útočnosti v konverzacích; a za druhé, analýza konverzací kolem urážlivých komentářů pomocí funkcí oddělení.', 'ca': "En els últims anys s'ha publicat un número cada vegada més d'an àlisis de llenguatge ofensiu, encara que s'ocupen principalment de la detecció automàtica i la classificació de cas aïllats. En aquest article busquem entendre diacrònicament l'impacte dels missatges ofensius en les converses en línia, en particular el canvi d'ofensivitat del diàleg. Per exemple, si una conversa està escalant o disminuint. Presentam el nostre mètode d'extrair diàlegs linears de converses estructurades en arbres en les dades dels mitjans socials i fem públic el nostre codi. A més, discutem mètodes per analitzar aquest conjunt de dades mitjançant canvis en l'ofensivitat del discurs. El nostre paper inclou dues contribucions principals; primer, utilitzant una xarxa neuronal per mesurar el nivell d'ofensivitat en les converses; i segon, l'anàlisi de converses al voltant de comentaris ofensius utilitzant funcions de descopplicació.", 'af': "In onlangse jaar is daar 'n vergroot aantal analiserings van offensivele taal gepubliseer, maar met die automatiese opdekking en klasifikasie van isolateerde voorwaardes. In hierdie papier doen ons doel om te verstaan die vloek van offensivele boodskappe in online gesprekke diakronisies, en in besonderhede die verandering in offensivenes van dialoog draai. In turn, we aim to measure the progression of offence level as well as its direction - for example, of a conversation is escalating of declining in offence. Ons stel ons metode van uitpakking van lineêre dialoog van boom-structureerde gesprekke in sosiale media data en maak ons kode openlik beskikbaar. Ons bespreek ook metodes om hierdie datastel te analiseer deur veranderinge in diskursie offensiviteit. Ons papier inkluit twee hoofbydraaghings; eerste, gebruik 'n neuralnetwerk om die vlak van offensiviteit in gesprekke te maak; en tweede, die analiseer van gesprekke rondom offensive kommentaar met gebruik van afkoppeling funksies.", 'et': 'Viimastel aastatel on avaldatud üha rohkem solvava keele analüüse, mis käsitlevad peamiselt üksikute juhtumite automaatset tuvastamist ja klassifitseerimist. Käesolevas töös püüame mõista diakrooniliselt solvavate sõnumite mõju internetivestlustes, eriti dialoogipöörete solvavuse muutust. Meie eesmärk on omakorda mõõta süüteotaseme progresseerumist ja suunda - näiteks seda, kas vestlus eskaleerub või väheneb süüteos. Esitleme oma meetodit lineaarsete dialoogide eraldamiseks puustruktureeritud vestlustest sotsiaalmeedia andmetes ja teeme koodi avalikult kättesaadavaks. Lisaks arutame meetodeid selle andmekogumi analüüsimiseks diskursuse ründavuse muutuste kaudu. Meie dokumendis on kaks peamist panust: esiteks närvivõrgu kasutamine vestluste solvavuse taseme mõõtmiseks; ja teiseks, solvavate kommentaaride ümber peetavate vestluste analüüs, kasutades lahtisidumisfunktsioone.', 'fi': 'Viime vuosina on kuitenkin julkaistu yhä enemmän loukkaavaa kieltä koskevia analyysejä, jotka käsittelevät pääasiassa yksittäisten tapausten automaattista havaitsemista ja luokittelua. Tässä artikkelissa pyrimme ymmärtämään verkkokeskusteluissa esiintyvien loukkaavien viestien vaikutusta diakronisesti ja erityisesti vuoropuhelun loukkaavuuden muutosta. Pyrimme puolestaan mittaamaan rikostason etenemistä ja sen suuntaa - esimerkiksi sitä, onko keskustelu paheneva vai vähenevä rikoksessa. Esittelemme menetelmämme poimia lineaarisia dialogeja puurakenteisista keskusteluista sosiaalisen median datassa ja teemme koodimme julkisesti saataville. Lisäksi keskustelemme menetelmistä analysoida aineistoa diskurssihyökkäyksen muutosten kautta. Asiakirjamme sisältää kaksi keskeistä kannanottoa: Ensinnäkin käyttämällä hermoverkkoa mittaamaan keskustelujen loukkaavuuden tasoa; ja toiseksi, loukkaavien kommenttien ympärillä käytävien keskustelujen analysointi käyttämällä irrotustoimintoja.', 'bs': 'U poslednjih godina je objavljen povećan broj analiza ofanzivnog jezika, međutim, uglavnom s automatskim otkrivanjem i klasifikacijom izolovanih slučajeva. U ovom papiru imamo cilj razumjeti utjecaj ofanzivnih poruka u internetskim razgovorima dijagronično, i posebno promjenu ofanzivnosti dijaloga. Na osnovu toga, ciljamo se mjeriti napredak nivoa zločin a, kao i njegovog smjera - na primjer, da li se razgovor povećava ili smanjuje u zločinu. Predstavljamo naš metod izvlačenja linearnih dijaloga iz razgovora o drvetu u podacima društvenih medija i javno objavljujemo naš kod. Osim toga, razgovaramo o metodama analiziranja ovog seta podataka kroz promjene diskurskih prekršaja. Naš papir uključuje dva glavna doprinosa; prvo, koristeći neuralnu mrežu za mjerenje nivoa ofenzivnosti u razgovorima; I drugo, analiza razgovora o uvrednim komentarima koristeći funkcije rasključavanja.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé, akeh sing paling nèng akeh akeh pansinipun dipunangé luwih dumadhi, mengko kuwi, nggawe sawayakno ngono nggawe layakno karo perusahaan layakno. Nang pepul iki kita balik bakal terus nggawe kapan bakal terus nggawe gerakan kanggo ngilangno karo perusahaan online Ing ujian, kita balik nggambar dianggo yen nggawe aturan tapi iki dadi luwih-luwih dumadhi, dadi kapan kuwi nggawe gerakan o nggawe gerakan. Awak dhéwé nglanggar tarjamahan kanggo ngilanggar dialog linear nggawe barang-barêng langgar nge dadi media sotiki dan nggawe kode sing ngewehke Label Awakdhéwé éntuk kuwi tanggal sawar duruh; akeh sampeyan, digawe tambah jewelis nggambar kapan kanggo kalagayaan pirsahan;  politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'ha': "A cikin shekara na farko an nuna ko ƙari ƙidãya wa lugha na ƙiyayya, kuma amma, an yi aiki mainli game da gandin farat ɗaya da siffarwa na shiryoyin shiryoyin ayuka da aka sani. Daga wannan takardan da Muke aimar mu fahimta matsayin mala'a-abubuwa a cikin mazaɓan akwatin bayani, da haske musanyi cikin makosa na zauren zauren akwatin. In turn, we aim to measure the progression of offence level as well as its direction - For example, whether a conversation is escalating or declining in offence.  Tuna gabatar da hanyoyinmu ga fita zauren akwatin lissafa daga mazaɓa na itãce-bakin da aka samu'a cikin mita da jamii, kuma mu sami kowanmu da ake samu. Da haka, muna jãyayya hanyoyin yin yin anayyar da wannan dataset a kafin musanyawa a cikin bayani na'urar magana. Gazanmu na ƙunsa da mataimaki biyu; farkon, ana yi amfani da waton neural dõmin ya cika leveln zunubi a cikin mazaɓa; da na ƙara, Ana yi anayyar da mazaɓa masu husũma a cikin bayani da ke amfani da functionin bayani.", 'sk': 'V zadnjih letih je bilo objavljenih vse več analiz žaljivega jezika, ki se ukvarjajo predvsem s samodejnim odkrivanjem in klasifikacijo posameznih primerov. V prispevku želimo diakronično razumeti vpliv žaljivih sporočil v spletnih pogovorih in zlasti spremembo v žaljivosti dialognih obratov. Namen pa je meriti napredovanje ravni kaznivih dejanj in njegovo smer – na primer, ali se pogovor stopnjuje ali upada v kaznivih dejanjih. Predstavljamo našo metodo pridobivanja linearnih dialogov iz drevesno strukturiranih pogovorov v podatkih družbenih omrežjih in dajemo našo kodo javno dostopno. Poleg tega razpravljamo o metodah analize tega nabora podatkov skozi spremembe diskurzne ofenzivnosti. Naš dokument vsebuje dva glavna prispevka: prvič, uporaba nevronskega omrežja za merjenje ravni napadalnosti v pogovorih; in drugič, analiza pogovorov o žaljivih komentarjih z uporabo funkcij ločevanja.', 'he': 'בשנים האחרונות פורסמו מספר גדול של ניתוחים של שפה פגיעה, עם זאת, מתמודדים בעיקר עם גילוי אוטומטי והקליפורה של מקרים בודדים. בעיתון הזה אנו מתכוונים להבין את ההשפעה של הודעות פגיעות בשיחות באינטרנט באופן דיאכרוני, ובמיוחד את השינוי בפגיעות של הדיולוג. במידה מסוימת, אנחנו מתכוונים למדוד את התקדמות של רמת הפשע כמו גם את הכיוון שלה, לדוגמה, אם שיחה מתדרדרת או מתדרדרת בפשע. אנחנו מציגים את השיטה שלנו להוציא דיאלוגים לינריים משיחות מובנות עצים בנתונים של התקשורת החברתית ולהפוך את הקוד שלנו פנוי לציבור. Furthermore, we discuss methods to analyse this dataset through changes in discourse offensiveness.  Our paper includes two main contributions;  ראשית, בשימוש ברשת עצבית כדי למדוד את רמת הפגיעה בשיחות; ושנייה, ניתוח השיחות סביב הערות פגיעות בשימוש בתפקידים הפרידה.', 'bo': 'འོན་ཀྱང་། འདས་བའི་ལོ་ངོ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་གཏུབ་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་མང་ཤོས་དུ་གཏོང་ཚར་བ་ཡིན་ནའང་། སྐད་རིགས་དབྱེ་ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་དྲ་རྒྱའི་གཏམ་གླེང་ནང་གི་འཕྲིན་ཡིག དེ་ལྟར། ང་ཚོས་བློ་གཏད་ཀྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ་དཔྱད་ན། མ་ཟད། གཏམ་གླེང་ཞིག་ནི་གང་ཟག་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནམ། ང་ཚོས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གནས་ཚུལ་ནང་གི་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་ཕྱིར་འདོན་ཐབས་ལམ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་པ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་པར་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བཤད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཤོག་བུ་རྩ་བའི་གུས་ཞབས་རས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད། དང་པོ་དེ། གཏམ་གླེང་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་སྐྱེས་པའི་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ཚད་གཞན་པ་ཡིན། གནད་དོན་གཉིས་པ། ཡུལ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་མཆན་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'A Morpho-Syntactically Informed LSTM-CRF Model for Named Entity Recognition', 'pt': 'Um Modelo LSTM-CRF Morfo-Sintaticamente Informado para Reconhecimento de Entidade Nomeada', 'es': 'Un modelo LSTM-CRF con información morfosintáctica para el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas', 'fr': "Un modèle LSTM-CRF informé morpho-syntaxiquement pour la reconnaissance d'entités nommées", 'ar': 'نموذج LSTM-CRF مُعلم بشكل مورفو للتعرّف على الكيان المُسمّى', 'ja': '名前付きエンティティ認識のためのMorpho - Syntactically Informed LSTM - CRFモデル', 'zh': '以名实体之形语法通 LSTM-CRF 模形', 'hi': 'नामित इकाई पहचान के लिए एक Morpho-Syntactically सूचित LSTM-CRF मॉडल', 'ru': 'Морфо-синтаксически информированная модель LSTM-CRF для распознавания именованных сущностей', 'ga': 'Samhail LSTM-CRF a bhfuil an Eolas Morpho-chomhréir ar an eolas uirthi le haghaidh Aitheantas Aonán Ainmnithe', 'el': 'Ένα Μορφο-Συντακτικά ενημερωμένο μοντέλο για αναγνώριση Ονόματος Οντότητας', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Morpho-szintaktikusan tájékoztatott LSTM-CRF modell a nevezett szervezetek felismerésére', 'it': 'Un modello LSTM-CRF Morfo-Sintatticamente informato per il riconoscimento delle entità nominate', 'kk': 'Name', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'mn': 'Морфо-Синтактик мэдээлэл өгөгдсөн LSTM-CRF загвар нэрлэгдсэн Entity Recognition загвар', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Mudell LSTM-CRF Informat b’mod Morfo-Sintetiku għar-Rikonoxximent ta’ Entità Ismija', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Morfosyntaktycznie informowany model LSTM-CRF do rozpoznawania nazwanych podmiotów', 'sr': 'Morfo-sintaktički informativni LSTM-CRF model za prepoznavanje imenovanih entiteta', 'ro': 'Un model LSTM-CRF informat morfo-sintactic pentru recunoașterea entităților denumite', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En morfosyntaktiskt informerad LSTM-CRF-modell för identifiering av namngivna enheter', 'so': 'A Morpho-Syntactically Informed LSTM-CRF Model for named Entity Recognition', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một Morpho-Syntacically Informically LSTM-CRF Model for Named Entity recognition', 'bg': 'Морфо-синтактично информиран LSTM-CRF модел за разпознаване на наименувано лице', 'hr': 'Morfo-sintaktički informirani LSTM-CRF model za priznanje imenovanih podataka', 'nl': 'Een morfo-syntactisch geïnformeerd LSTM-CRF model voor naamsbekendheid', 'da': 'En morfosyntaktisk informeret LSTM-CRF-model til anerkendelse af navngivne enheder', 'de': 'Ein morpho-syntaktisch informiertes LSTM-CRF-Modell zur Erkennung benannter Entitäten', 'fa': 'Name', 'id': 'A Morpho-Syntactically Informed LSTM-CRF Model for Named Entity Recognition', 'ko': '명명된 솔리드 인식을 위한 형태 구문 정보 LSTM-CRF 모델', 'sw': 'Mradi wa LSTM-CRF kwa jina la kutambuliwa', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Adynyň Taýýarlama üçin Morfo-Sintaktik Maglumaty LSTM-CRF nusgasy', 'sq': 'Një model LSTM-CRF i informuar në mënyrë morfo-sintaktike për njohjen e njësisë së quajtur', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Մորֆո-սինտակտիկ տեղեկացված LStm-ԿՌՖ մոդել անվանումների ճանաչման համար', 'bn': 'Name', 'az': 'Adlı Entity Recognition üçün Morpho-Syntactically Informed LSTM-CRF Modeli', 'bs': 'Morfo-sintaktički informativni LSTM-CRF model za prepoznavanje imenovanih entiteta', 'ca': "Un model LSTM-CRF morfo-sintàticament informat per a la reconeixement d'entitats anomenades", 'cs': 'Morpho-syntakticky informovaný LSTM-CRF model pro rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit', 'et': 'Morphosüntaktiliselt informeeritud LSTM-CRF mudel nimetatud üksuste tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'Morfosyntaktisesti informoitu LSTM-CRF-malli nimettyjen yksiköiden tunnistamista varten', 'jv': 'Yuta Marpho-Singatik Informisasi SLtM-CF model kanggo Ngawe Entité Coksi', 'he': 'מודל LSTM- CRF מוודע באופן מורפו- סינטקטי לזהות איכות בשם', 'ha': 'A Morpho-Syntactically Informed LSTM-CRF Model for Named Entity Recognition', 'sk': 'Morfosintaktično obveščen model LSTM-CRF za prepoznavanje imenovanega subjekta', 'bo': 'Morpho-Syntactically Informed LSTM-CRF Model for Named Entity Recognition'}
{'en': 'We propose a morphologically informed model for named entity recognition, which is based on LSTM-CRF architecture and combines word embeddings, Bi-LSTM character embeddings, part-of-speech (POS) tags, and morphological information. While previous work has focused on learning from raw word input, using word and character embeddings only, we show that for morphologically rich languages, such as Bulgarian, access to POS information contributes more to the performance gains than the detailed morphological information. Thus, we show that named entity recognition needs only coarse-grained POS tags, but at the same time it can benefit from simultaneously using some POS information of different granularity. Our evaluation results over a standard dataset show sizeable improvements over the state-of-the-art for Bulgarian NER.', 'ar': 'نقترح نموذجًا مستنيرًا من الناحية الشكلية للتعرف على الكيانات المسماة ، والذي يعتمد على بنية LSTM-CRF ويجمع بين عمليات دمج الكلمات ، وتضمينات الأحرف Bi-LSTM ، وعلامات جزء من الكلام (POS) ، والمعلومات المورفولوجية. بينما ركز العمل السابق على التعلم من مدخلات الكلمات الأولية ، باستخدام الزخارف بالكلمات والشخصيات فقط ، نوضح أنه بالنسبة للغات الغنية شكليًا ، مثل البلغارية ، يساهم الوصول إلى معلومات نقاط البيع في مكاسب الأداء أكثر من المعلومات الصرفية التفصيلية. وبالتالي ، نظهر أن التعرف على الكيانات المسماة يحتاج فقط إلى علامات نقاط البيع ذات الحبيبات الخشنة ، ولكن في نفس الوقت يمكنه الاستفادة من استخدام بعض معلومات نقاط البيع ذات الدقة المختلفة في نفس الوقت. تُظهر نتائج التقييم الخاصة بنا على مجموعة بيانات قياسية تحسينات كبيرة على أحدث التقنيات في معدل NER البلغاري.', 'pt': 'Propomos um modelo morfologicamente informado para reconhecimento de entidades nomeadas, que é baseado na arquitetura LSTM-CRF e combina incorporação de palavras, incorporação de caracteres Bi-LSTM, tags de parte da fala (POS) e informações morfológicas. Enquanto o trabalho anterior se concentrou em aprender a partir da entrada de palavras brutas, usando apenas incorporações de palavras e caracteres, mostramos que, para idiomas morfologicamente ricos, como o búlgaro, o acesso às informações POS contribui mais para os ganhos de desempenho do que as informações morfológicas detalhadas. Assim, mostramos que o reconhecimento de entidade nomeada precisa apenas de tags POS de granularidade grosseira, mas ao mesmo tempo pode se beneficiar do uso simultâneo de algumas informações POS de granularidade diferente. Nossos resultados de avaliação em um conjunto de dados padrão mostram melhorias consideráveis em relação ao estado da arte do NER búlgaro.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un modèle morphologiquement informé pour la reconnaissance d'entités nommées, qui est basé sur l'architecture LSTM-CRF et combine des intégrations de mots, des intégrations de caractères bi-LSTM, des balises de partie du discours (POS) et des informations morphologiques. Alors que les travaux précédents se sont concentrés sur l'apprentissage à partir de la saisie de mots bruts, en utilisant uniquement l'intégration de mots et de caractères, nous montrons que pour les langues morphologiquement riches, comme le bulgare, l'accès aux informations POS contribue davantage aux gains de performance que les informations morphologiques détaillées. Ainsi, nous montrons que la reconnaissance d'entités nommées ne nécessite que des étiquettes POS grossières, mais qu'elle peut également bénéficier de l'utilisation simultanée de certaines informations POS de granularité différente. Les résultats de notre évaluation sur un ensemble de données standard montrent des améliorations considérables par rapport à l'état de la technologie pour le NER bulgare.", 'es': 'Proponemos un modelo morfológicamente informado para el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas, que se basa en la arquitectura LSTM-CRF y combina incrustaciones de palabras, incrustaciones de caracteres Bi-LSTM, etiquetas de parte del habla (POS) e información morfológica. Si bien el trabajo anterior se centró en aprender de la entrada de palabras sin procesar, utilizando solo la incrustación de palabras y caracteres, demostramos que para los idiomas con gran riqueza morfológica, como el búlgaro, el acceso a la información de PDV contribuye más a las mejoras de rendimiento que la información morfológica detallada. Por lo tanto, mostramos que el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas solo necesita etiquetas POS de grano grueso, pero al mismo tiempo puede beneficiarse del uso simultáneo de cierta información de POS de diferente granularidad. Los resultados de nuestra evaluación sobre un conjunto de datos estándar muestran mejoras considerables con respecto al estado de la técnica para la NER búlgara.', 'ja': 'LSTM - CRFアーキテクチャに基づき、単語埋め込み、Bi - LSTM文字埋め込み、音声部分（ POS ）タグ、および形態情報を組み合わせた、名前付きエンティティ認識のための形態情報モデルを提案します。以前の研究では、生の単語入力からの学習に焦点を当てており、単語と文字の埋め込みのみを使用していましたが、ブルガリア語などの形態豊富な言語では、POS情報へのアクセスが詳細な形態情報よりもパフォーマンス向上に寄与していることが示されています。したがって、名前付きエンティティ認識は、粗粒度のPOSタグのみを必要とするが、同時に、異なる粒度のいくつかのPOS情報を同時に使用することで利益を得ることができることを示している。標準的なデータセットに対する当社の評価結果は、ブルガリアのNERの最先端のデータセットよりも大幅に改善されています。', 'zh': '立LSTM-CRF架构名实体识形态学知情模形,合词嵌之,Bi-LSTM字符嵌之,词性(POS)标形信息。 虽前事侧重于从原始单词输入中学,仅用单词符嵌入,然吾等明之,于形容丰语(如保加利亚语),访POS信息大于详形信息。 故名实者,粗粒度之POS也;益之者,异粒度之POS也。 凡准数之评结果显示,比保加利亚NER之最新术,有大改进。', 'hi': 'हम नामित इकाई मान्यता के लिए एक रूपात्मक रूप से सूचित मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो एलएसटीएम-सीआरएफ आर्किटेक्चर पर आधारित है और शब्द एम्बेडिंग, द्वि-एलएसटीएम चरित्र एम्बेडिंग, पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच (पीओएस) टैग और रूपात्मक जानकारी को जोड़ता है। जबकि पिछले काम ने कच्चे शब्द इनपुट से सीखने पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है, केवल शब्द और चरित्र एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करके, हम दिखाते हैं कि रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भाषाओं के लिए, जैसे बल्गेरियाई, पीओएस जानकारी तक पहुंच विस्तृत रूपात्मक जानकारी की तुलना में प्रदर्शन लाभ में अधिक योगदान देती है। इस प्रकार, हम दिखाते हैं कि नामित इकाई मान्यता को केवल मोटे-दाने वाले पीओएस टैग की आवश्यकता होती है, लेकिन एक ही समय में यह विभिन्न ग्रैन्युलैरिटी की कुछ पीओएस जानकारी का एक साथ उपयोग करने से लाभ उठा सकता है। एक मानक डेटासेट पर हमारे मूल्यांकन के परिणाम बल्गेरियाई एनईआर के लिए अत्याधुनिक पर बड़े सुधार दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем морфологически обоснованную модель распознавания именованных сущностей, которая основана на архитектуре LSTM-CRF и объединяет вложения слов, вложения символов Bi-LSTM, теги части речи (POS) и морфологическую информацию. Хотя предыдущая работа была сосредоточена на изучении исходного ввода слов, используя только вложения слов и символов, мы показываем, что для морфологически богатых языков, таких как болгарский, доступ к информации POS вносит больший вклад в повышение производительности, чем подробная морфологическая информация. Таким образом, мы показываем, что распознавание именованных сущностей требует только грубозернистых POS-тегов, но в то же время оно может извлечь выгоду из одновременного использования некоторой POS-информации различной детализации. Результаты нашей оценки по сравнению со стандартным набором данных свидетельствуют о значительных улучшениях по сравнению с современным болгарским NER.', 'ga': 'Molaimid múnla a bhfuil eolas moirfeolaíoch uirthi maidir le haitheantas aonáin ainmnithe, atá bunaithe ar ailtireacht LSTM-CRF agus a chomhcheanglaíonn leabaithe focal, leabaithe carachtar Dé-LSTM, clibeanna cuid cainte (POS), agus faisnéis mhoirfeolaíoch. Cé gur dhírigh obair roimhe seo ar fhoghlaim ó ionchur focal amh, ag baint úsáide as leabú focal agus carachtar amháin, léirímid go gcuireann rochtain ar fhaisnéis POS níos mó leis na gnóthachain feidhmíochta ná an fhaisnéis mhionsonraithe mhoirfeolaíoch do theangacha atá saibhir go moirfeolaíoch, mar an Bhulgáiris. Mar sin, léirímid nach dteastaíonn ach clibeanna POS garbh-ghrámhara le haitheantas aonáin ainmnithe, ach ag an am céanna is féidir leas a bhaint as roinnt faisnéise POS a bhfuil gráinneacht éagsúil acu a úsáid ag an am céanna. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí meastóireachta thar thacar sonraí caighdeánach feabhsuithe suntasacha ar an úrscothacht do NER na Bulgáire.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα μορφολογικά ενημερωμένο μοντέλο αναγνώρισης ονομαστικών οντοτήτων, το οποίο βασίζεται στην αρχιτεκτονική και συνδυάζει ενσωμάτωση λέξεων, ενσωμάτωση χαρακτήρων, ετικέτες τμήματος ομιλίας και μορφολογικές πληροφορίες. Ενώ η προηγούμενη εργασία έχει επικεντρωθεί στην εκμάθηση από ακατέργαστη εισαγωγή λέξεων, χρησιμοποιώντας μόνο ενσωμάτωση λέξεων και χαρακτήρων, καταδεικνύουμε ότι για μορφολογικά πλούσιες γλώσσες, όπως τα βουλγαρικά, η πρόσβαση σε πληροφορίες συμβάλλει περισσότερο στην απόδοση από τις λεπτομερείς μορφολογικές πληροφορίες. Έτσι, δείχνουμε ότι η αναγνώριση ονομαστικής οντότητας χρειάζεται μόνο χονδροειδείς ετικέτες αλλά ταυτόχρονα μπορεί να επωφεληθεί από τη ταυτόχρονη χρήση ορισμένων πληροφοριών διαφορετικής κοκκώδους. Τα αποτελέσματα αξιολόγησης μας σε ένα τυποποιημένο σύνολο δεδομένων δείχνουν σημαντικές βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με την υπερσύγχρονη κατάσταση για τη βουλγαρική NER.', 'hu': 'Egy LSTM-CRF architektúrán alapuló morfológiailag tájékozott modellt javasolunk a nevezett entitások felismerésére, amely kombinálja a szóbeágyazásokat, a Bi-LSTM karakterek beágyazását, a beszédrész (POS) címkéket és a morfológiai információkat. Míg az előző munkák a nyers szóbevitelből származó tanulásra összpontosítottak, csak szó- és karakterbeágyazásokat használva, azt mutatjuk, hogy morfológiailag gazdag nyelvek, például a bolgár nyelvek esetében a POS információkhoz való hozzáférés jobban hozzájárul a teljesítménynövekedéshez, mint a részletes morfológiai információk. Így megmutatjuk, hogy a nevezett entitások felismerése csak durva szemcséjű POS címkékre van szükség, ugyanakkor előnyös lehet néhány különböző szemcséjű POS információ egyidejűleg használatából. Egy szabványos adatkészleten végzett értékelési eredményeink jelentős javulást mutatnak a bolgár NER korszerűségéhez képest.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მოგულისხმებით მოპოროლოგიურად ინფორმაციული მოდელი, რომელიც LSTM-CRF არქტიქტურაზე ბაზიან და შემყვებით სიტყვების ინფორმაცია, Bi-LSTM სიტყვების ინფორმაცია, სიტყვების ნაწილი (POS) ტეგიები და მოპოროლო მაგრამ წინა სამუშაო სამუშაო მხოლოდ სიტყვებით და სიტყვებით გამოყენებული, ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოყენებთ, რომ მორპოლოგიურად ღარიბული ენებისთვის, როგორც ბულდარიული, POS ინფორმაციისთვის მიმართვა უფ ამიტომ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ სახელ ინტერტის განაცნობა უნდა მხოლოდ გავაკეთებული POS ჭდეები, მაგრამ იგივე დროში ეს შეიძლება ერთად გამოიყენოთ სხვა დრანულაციის POS ინფორმა ჩვენი განსაზღვრებების შედეგი სტანდარული მონაცემების სახელსაწყისთვის ბულდარიური NER-ის განსაზღვრებისთვის უფრო დიდი შექმნა.', 'kk': 'Біз LSTM-CRF архитектурасына негізделген морфологиялық мәлімет үлгісін таңдап, сөздерді ендіру, Bi-LSTM таңбаларын ендіру, сөздердің бөлігі (POS) тегтерін және морфологиялық мәліметін біріктіру үлгісін таңда Алдыңғы жұмыс сөздерді келтіріп, тек сөздерді және таңбаларды ендіру үшін оқытуға көмектесіп, Болгарша секілді морфологиялық баяны тілдер үшін POS мәліметіне қатынау үшін тегжейлі морфологиялық мәлі Бұл үшін біз аталған нысандарды анықтау үшін тек POS тегтері қажет етеді, бірақ бір-бір уақытта ол бір-бір POS мәліметін түрлі грануляриялық мәліметін қолдануға болады. Стандартты деректер қорларының бағалау нәтижелеріміз Болгария NER үшін суреттің күйінде өзгертілген жақсартуларын көрсетеді.', 'it': "Proponiamo un modello morfologicamente informato per il riconoscimento di entità denominate, che si basa sull'architettura LSTM-CRF e combina incorporazioni di parole, incorporazioni di caratteri Bi-LSTM, tag POS (part-of-speech) e informazioni morfologiche. Mentre il lavoro precedente si è concentrato sull'apprendimento dall'input di parole grezze, utilizzando solo l'incorporazione di parole e caratteri, mostriamo che per le lingue morfologicamente ricche, come il bulgaro, l'accesso alle informazioni POS contribuisce più ai guadagni di prestazioni rispetto alle informazioni morfologiche dettagliate. Pertanto, mostriamo che il riconoscimento delle entità denominate necessita solo di tag POS a grana grossa, ma allo stesso tempo può trarre vantaggio dall'utilizzo simultaneo di alcune informazioni POS di granularità diversa. I risultati della nostra valutazione su un set di dati standard mostrano notevoli miglioramenti rispetto allo stato dell'arte per Bulgarian NER.", 'lt': 'Siūlome morfologiškai pagrįstą vardinio subjekto pripažinimo model į, kuris grindžiamas LSTM-CRF architektūra ir apima žodžių įdėjimus, biLSTM simbolių įdėjimus, kalbos dalį (POS) žymenis ir morfologinę informaciją. Nors ankstesniame darbe daugiausia dėmesio buvo skiriama mokymuisi iš žaliavinių žodžių įvedimų, naudojant tik žodžių ir simbolių įvedimus, mes rodome, kad morfologiškai turtingoms kalboms, pvz., bulgarų kalboms, prieiga prie POS informacijos labiau prisideda prie rezultatų pagerėjimo nei išsami morfologinė informacija. Taigi rodome, kad pavadintam subjektui pripažinti reikia tik stambių grūdų POS ženklų, tačiau tuo pačiu metu jis gali pasinaudoti tuo pačiu metu naudojant tam tikrą skirtingo granuliarumo POS informaciją. Mūsų vertinimo rezultatai pagal standartinį duomenų rinkinį rodo gerokai pagerėjusius, palyginti su naujausiais Bulgarijos NER duomenimis.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме модел информиран од морфологија за препознавање на именувани ентитети, кој е базиран на архитектура на LSTM-CRF и комбинира вградувања на зборови, вградувања на знаци Bi-LSTM, ознаки на дел од говорот (POS) и морфолошки информации. Иако претходната работа се фокусираше на учењето од внесувањето на сурови зборови, користејќи само внесувања на зборови и карактери, покажуваме дека за морфолошки богати јазици, како што е бугарскиот, пристапот до информациите за POS придонесува повеќе за добивањето на резултатите отколку деталните морфоло Така, покажуваме дека препознавањето на именуваниот ентитет има потреба само на грубо-зелени POS ознаки, но истовремено може да има корист од истовремено користење на некои POS информации од различна грануларност. Нашите резултати на евалуацијата во врска со стандардниот податок покажуваат значителни подобрувања во врска со најновите за бугарската НЕР.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു മോര്\u200dഫോളോഗിക്കല്\u200d വിവരമറിയിക്കുന്ന ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d പ്രൊദാനം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് LSTM-CRF ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണ്. വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്തേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത്, ബി-  മുമ്പുള്ള വാക്കിന്റെ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്നതിനെ ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, വാക്കും അക്ഷരരൂപത്തിനും മാത്രമേ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നുള്ളൂ, മൊര്\u200dഫോ അതുകൊണ്ട് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, പേരിട്ട വസ്തുക്കളുടെ തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d മാത്രമേ കോര്\u200dസ്കോര്\u200dസ് ഗ്രേഡ് ചെയ്ത പോസ് ടാഗുകള്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള് ഞങ്ങളുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d സാധാരണ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്\u200dറെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ബുള്\u200dഗേരിയയിലെ നെയറിന്\u200dറെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് മു', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan model yang diberitahu secara morfologik untuk pengenalan entiti bernama, yang berdasarkan arkitektur LSTM-CRF dan menggabungkan penyampaian perkataan, penyampaian aksara Bi-LSTM, tag-bahagian-ucapan (POS), dan maklumat morfologik. Sementara pekerjaan terdahulu telah fokus pada belajar dari input perkataan mentah, menggunakan penyampilan perkataan dan aksara sahaja, kami menunjukkan bahawa bagi bahasa yang kaya secara morfologik, seperti bahasa Bulgari, akses kepada maklumat POS berkontribusi lebih kepada keuntungan prestasi daripada maklumat morfologik terperinci. Oleh itu, kita menunjukkan bahawa pengenalan entiti bernama hanya memerlukan tag POS yang terbuka, tetapi pada masa yang sama ia boleh berguna dari menggunakan beberapa maklumat POS yang berbeza granularity. Keputusan penilaian kami melalui set data piawai menunjukkan peningkatan yang besar atas state-of-the-art untuk NER Bulgaria.', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu mudell morfoloġikament infurmat għar-rikonoxximent tal-entità msejjaħ, li huwa bbażat fuq arkitettura LSTM-CRF u jikkombina inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem, inkorporazzjonijiet tal-karattri Bi-LSTM, tikketti tal-parti tad-diskors (POS), u informazzjoni morfoloġika. While previous work has focused on learning from raw word input, using word and character embeddings only, we show that for morphologically rich languages, such as Bulgarian, access to POS information contributes more to the performance gains than the detailed morphological information.  Thus, we show that named entity recognition needs only coarse-grained POS tags, but at the same time it can benefit from simultaneously using some POS information of different granularity.  Ir-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni tagħna fuq sett ta’ dejta standard juru titjib konsiderevoli fuq l-aktar avvanzat għall-Bulgarija NER.', 'mn': 'Бид үүнийг LSTM-CRF архитектур дээр суурилсан морфологически мэдээллийн загварын загварыг санал болгоно. Энэ нь үг нэмж, Bi-LSTM архитектур нэмж, ярианы хэсэг, морфологик мэдээллийг нэгтгэдэг. Өмнөх ажлын ажил зөвхөн үг бичсэн орнуудаас суралцах, үг болон харин дүрсийг ашиглан, Болгарын зэрэг морфологик баян хэл, POS мэдээлэлд хүрэх боломжтой болсон ч бид нарийвчлалтай морфологик мэдээллээс илүү илүү үр дүнтэй Иймээс бид нэгж нэртэй хүлээн авах нь зөвхөн цэцэглэгдсэн POS тегтэй хэрэгтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ одоогийн хугацаанд энэ нь өөр гранулацийн POS мэдээллийг ашиглаж болох юм. Бидний оюутнуудын үр дүнд стандарт өгөгдлийн сан дээр Болгарийн НЕР-ийн хувьд урлагийн хувьд хэмжээний сайжруулалтыг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit morfologisk informert modell for gjenkjenning av namnet entitet, som er basert på LSTM-CRF-arkitektur og kombinerer ordinnbygging, Bi-LSTM-teikn-innbygging, del-av-tale (POS) taggar og morfologisk informasjon. Mens tidlegare arbeid har fokusert på læring frå råordinndata, bare ved bruk av ord og teiknkombinasjonar, viser vi at for morfologisk rike språk, som Bulgarsk, tilgang til POS-informasjon bidrar meir til utviklinga enn detaljerte morfologiske informasjon. Derfor viser vi at oppgjevnaden med namn på einingar treng berre korrekte POS-taggar, men samtidig kan det bruke noen POS-informasjon om ulike granularitet. Våre evalueringsresultatet over ein standard dataset viser storleikbare forbedringar over kunsttilstanden for bulgarske NER.', 'ro': 'Propunem un model informat morfologic pentru recunoașterea entităților denumite, care se bazează pe arhitectura LSTM-CRF și combină încorporarea cuvintelor, încorporarea caracterelor Bi-LSTM, etichetele part-of-speech (POS) și informațiile morfologice. În timp ce lucrările anterioare s-au concentrat pe învățarea din introducerea de cuvinte brute, folosind numai încorporarea de cuvinte și caractere, arătăm că pentru limbile bogate din punct de vedere morfologic, cum ar fi bulgara, accesul la informațiile POS contribuie mai mult la câștigurile de performanță decât informațiile morfologice detaliate. Astfel, arătăm că recunoașterea entităților numite necesită numai etichete POS cu granulație grosieră, dar în același timp poate beneficia de utilizarea simultană a unor informații POS cu granularitate diferită. Rezultatele evaluării noastre asupra unui set de date standard arată îmbunătățiri considerabile față de cele mai moderne tehnologii pentru NER bulgar.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy morfologicznie poinformowany model rozpoznawania nazwanych jednostek, który opiera się na architekturze LSTM-CRF i łączy osadzenia słów, osadzenia znaków Bi-LSTM, tagi części mowy (POS) oraz informacje morfologiczne. Podczas gdy poprzednie prace koncentrowały się na uczeniu się z surowego wprowadzania słów, wykorzystując tylko osadzenia słów i znaków, pokazujemy, że w przypadku języków bogatych morfologicznie, takich jak bułgarski, dostęp do informacji POS przyczynia się bardziej do wzrostu wydajności niż szczegółowe informacje morfologiczne. W ten sposób pokazujemy, że rozpoznawanie nazwanych jednostek wymaga tylko gruboziarnistych tagów POS, ale jednocześnie może skorzystać z jednoczesnego wykorzystania niektórych informacji POS o różnej granularności. Nasze wyniki oceny w oparciu o standardowy zestaw danych pokazują znaczną poprawę w stosunku do najnowocześniejszych technologii dla bułgarskiej NER.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo morfološki informirani model za priznanje entiteta koja se temelji na arhitekturi LSTM-CRF i kombinira integraciju riječi, uloženje karaktera Bi-LSTM, uloženje govora (POS) i morfološke informacije. Iako je prethodni rad usredotočen na učenje od ulaska sirovine riječi, koristeći samo riječi i uloženje karaktera, pokazujemo da za morfološki bogate jezike, poput Bugarske, pristup POS informacijama doprinosi više dobitku učinka nego detaljne morfološke informacije. Dakle, pokazujemo da priznanje entiteta potrebno je samo oznake POS, ali u isto vreme može koristiti od istovremenog korištenja nekih POS informacija o različitim granularnostima. Naši rezultati procjene na standardnom setu podataka pokazuju velike poboljšanja nad državom umjetnosti Bugarskog NER-a.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මොර්ෆෝලෝජික විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dය මුලින් වැඩේ ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් වචන ඇතුළුවෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් වුනා වචන සහ අක්ෂර සංවිධානය විතරයි, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මොර්ෆෝලෝජික ඉතින්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ නම් අයිතියක් අඳුරගන්න පුළුවන් POS ටැග් විතරයි, ඒත් එකම වෙලාවට ඒක ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් වෙන අපේ විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරමාණික දත්ත සෙට් එකේ බුල්ගරියාන් NER සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en morfologiskt informerad modell för namngiven entitetsigenkänning, som bygger på LSTM-CRF-arkitektur och kombinerar ordinbäddningar, Bi-LSTM-teckenbäddningar, POS-taggar och morfologisk information. Medan tidigare arbete har fokuserat på att lära sig från råa ord inmatning, endast med ord och tecken inbäddningar, visar vi att tillgången till POS-information för morfologiskt rika språk, såsom bulgariska, bidrar mer till prestationsvinsterna än detaljerad morfologisk information. Således visar vi att namngiven entitetsigenkänning endast behöver grovkorniga POS-taggar, men samtidigt kan det dra nytta av att samtidigt använda viss POS-information med olika granularitet. Våra utvärderingsresultat över ett standarddataset visar på betydande förbättringar jämfört med den senaste tekniken för Bulgarian NER.', 'so': 'Waxaan soo jeedaynaa model ogeysiis ah oo lagu magacaabay aqoonsi entity, kaas oo ku saleysan LSTM-CRF architecture and combines word embeddings, Bi-LSTM characters embedding, qayb ka mid ah hadal (POS) tags, iyo macluumaad morphological ah. Intii shaqadii hore uu ku kalsoonaa barashada hadalka saxda ah, waxaynu muujinnaa in luqadaha hodanka ah, sida Bulgarian, in macluumaadka helitaanka POS uu ka faa’iido badan helayo macluumaadka dhaqaalaha oo la qoray. Sidaas darteed waxaynu tusnaa in aqoonsashada qofka la magacaabay uu u baahan yahay alaabta kooxaha lagu qoray oo kaliya, laakiin isla waqtigaas waxay faa’iido ka heli kartaa isticmaalka macluumaadka POS ee barbaarinta kala duduwan. Qiimeyntayada waxaa ka soo baxaya kooban danbiyada ee caadiga ah oo muuqata horumarinta oo aad u bedelanaya xaaladda farshaxanka ee shabakadda Bulgaria.', 'ta': 'LSTM- CRF அடிப்படையில் அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது மற்றும் சொல்லை உள்ளடக்கங்களை சேர்க்கிறது, Bi- LSTM எழுத்துக்கள் உள்ளீடுகள், பேச்சின் பகுதி ஒட்டுகள், மற்றும் மோர்ஃபோலிகல் தகவல் முந்தைய வேலை குறைந்த வார்த்தை உள்ளீட்டிலிருந்து கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் போது, வார்த்தையும் எழுத்துக்கள் உள்ளீடுகளையும் மட்டும் பயன்படுத்தி மட்டும், நாம் காட் பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் அடையாளத்தை காட்டுகிறோம் போஸ் ஒட்டுகள் மட்டுமே தேவைப்படும், ஆனால் அதே நேரத்தில் அது வேறு வித்தியாசமான போஸ் தகவல்கள நிலையான தரவுத்தளத்தின் மீது எங்கள் மதிப்பு முடிவுகள் பூக்கிரிய நெருக்கான நிலையில் முன்னேற்றங்களை காட்டுக', 'ur': 'ہم ایک مورفولوژیکی معلوم موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جن کا نام ایست کی پہچان ہے، جو LSTM-CRF معماری پر بنیاد ہے اور کلمات ابڈینگ، Bi-LSTM کریٹر ابڈینگ، بول کی (POS) ٹاگ اور مارفولوژیکی معلومات کو ترکیب کرتا ہے. اگلے کام صرف لفظ اور کریٹر انڈینگ کے استعمال کے ذریعے روئے لفظ سے سیکھنے پر تمرکز کیا گیا ہے، ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ مورپولوژیکی ثروت زبانوں کے لئے، جیسے بلغاریایی، POS معلومات کی دسترسی پو س معلومات کے ذریعے مفصل کے مطاب اسی طرح ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ انٹیٹ کی پہچان کی ضرورت صرف کرسی دانے کے POS ٹاگ ہیں، لیکن اسی طرح یہ ایک دوسرے سے فائدہ پہنچا سکتا ہے ایک دوسرے سے مختلف انٹیولیٹ کی POS معلومات کے مطابق۔ ہمارے ارزش کا نتیجہ ایک استاندارڈیٹ سٹ پر بولګاری نیر کے لئے بہت ساز ترقی دکھائی جاتی ہے.', 'uz': "Biz LSTM-CRF architektasi asosida yaratilgan va so'zlarni birlashtirish mumkin, Bi-LSTM belgini, POS (POS) teglarining qismlarini bir qismi va morfologik maʼlumotini birlashtiramiz. Oldingi ishni o'rganishda faqat so'zlar va harflarni qo'llashdan foydalanishiga foydalanadi, biz Bulgariy tillarga bog'liq hovflik tillarda, POS maʼlumotiga ega bo'lgan maʼlumotni aniqlangan morfologik maʼlumotidan ko'proq yordam beradi. Shunday qilib, biz quyidagi tashkilotni tasdiqlash kerak faqat koordinata qo'llangan POS taglari kerak, lekin shu paytida bu bir necha POS haqida boshqa granulik haqida foydalanishi mumkin. Bizning qiymatlarimiz andoza maʼlumotlar sahifasi esa Bulgariy NER davlatning holatida juda ko'p yaxshi improvementlarini koʻrsatadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình dựa theo quyết định của công ty nhận dạng có tên, dựa trên kiến trúc LSTM-CRF và kết hợp các sự tham gia từ ngữ, sự nhúng ghép tính cách của Bi-LSTM, các thẻ bài phát biểu (POS) và thông tin lịch sử. Trong khi công việc trước đây đã tập trung vào việc học từ thô, chỉ sử dụng từ và sự gắn kết nhân cách, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng đối với các ngôn ngữ giàu lịch sử, như Bun-ga-ri, truy cập vào dữ liệu POS có thể giúp tăng hiệu suất hơn là các thông tin morphology chi tiết. Cho nên, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng nhận dạng thực thể tên chỉ cần các thẻ hoàn toàn có màu sắc, nhưng đồng thời nó có thể lợi dụng cùng lúc sử dụng một số thông tin về độ hạt khác nhau. Kết quả đánh giá trên một bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn cho thấy có những cải tiến lớn về công nghệ tối tân cho cái máy tụ Bulgaria.', 'nl': 'We stellen een morfologisch geïnformeerd model voor naamsbekendheid voor, dat is gebaseerd op LSTM-CRF architectuur en combineert woord embeddings, Bi-LSTM tekens embeddings, part-of-speech (POS) tags en morfologische informatie. Terwijl vorig werk zich concentreerde op het leren van ruwe woordinvoer, alleen met behulp van woord- en tekeninsluitingen, tonen we aan dat voor morfologisch rijke talen, zoals het Bulgaars, toegang tot POS-informatie meer bijdraagt aan de prestatiewinst dan de gedetailleerde morfologische informatie. Zo laten we zien dat naamloze entiteitsherkenning alleen grove POS-tags nodig heeft, maar tegelijkertijd kan het profiteren van het gelijktijdig gebruik van POS-informatie van verschillende granulariteit. Onze evaluatieresultaten over een standaard dataset laten aanzienlijke verbeteringen zien ten opzichte van de state-of-the-art voor Bulgaarse NER.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en morfologisk informeret model for navngivet entitetsgenkendelse, som er baseret på LSTM-CRF arkitektur og kombinerer ordindlejringer, Bi-LSTM tegn indlejringer, POS-tags og morfologisk information. Mens tidligere arbejde har fokuseret på at lære af rå ord input, kun ved hjælp af ord og tegn indlejringer, viser vi, at adgang til POS-oplysninger for morfologisk rige sprog, såsom bulgarsk, bidrager mere til performance gevinster end de detaljerede morfologiske oplysninger. Således viser vi, at navngivne enheder anerkendelse kun behøver grovkornede POS-tags, men samtidig kan det drage fordel af samtidig at bruge nogle POS-oplysninger af forskellig granularitet. Vores evalueringsresultater over et standarddatasæt viser betydelige forbedringer i forhold til den nyeste teknologi for bulgarsk NER.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме морфологично информиран модел за разпознаване на наименовани обекти, който се основава на архитектурата и комбинира вграждания на думи, вграждания на знаци Би-ЛСТМ, тагове за част от речта (ПОС) и морфологична информация. Докато предишната работа се фокусира върху ученето от въвеждане на сурови думи, използвайки само вграждания на думи и знаци, ние показваме, че за морфологично богати езици, като българския, достъпът до ПОС информация допринася повече за повишаването на производителността, отколкото подробната морфологична информация. По този начин показваме, че разпознаването на наименовани обекти се нуждае само от грубозърнести ПОС тагове, но в същото време може да се възползва от едновременното използване на някои ПОС информация с различна гранулираност. Резултатите от оценката ни върху стандартен набор от данни показват значителни подобрения в сравнение със съвременните технологии за българския НЕР.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan model yang diberitahu secara morfologis untuk pengenalan entitas bernama, yang berdasarkan arsitektur LSTM-CRF dan menggabungkan penyembedding kata, penyembedding karakter Bi-LSTM, tag-part-of-speech (POS) dan informasi morfologis. Sementara pekerjaan sebelumnya fokus pada belajar dari input kata mentah, hanya menggunakan embedding kata dan karakter, kami menunjukkan bahwa untuk bahasa yang kaya secara morfologis, seperti bahasa Bulgari, akses ke informasi POS berkontribusikan lebih pada keuntungan prestasi daripada informasi morfologis terperinci. Jadi, kami menunjukkan bahwa pengenalan entitas bernama hanya membutuhkan tag POS yang besar, tapi pada saat yang sama dapat berguna dari simultan menggunakan beberapa informasi POS yang berbeda granularitas. Hasil evaluasi kami melalui set data standar menunjukkan peningkatan yang besar atas state-of-the-art untuk Bulgarian NER.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein morphologisch fundiertes Modell zur Erkennung benannter Entitäten vor, das auf der LSTM-CRF Architektur basiert und Worteinbettungen, Bi-LSTM Zeichen Einbettungen, Part-of-Speech (POS) Tags und morphologische Informationen kombiniert. Während sich frühere Arbeiten auf das Lernen aus rohen Worteingaben konzentriert haben, zeigen wir, dass für morphologisch reiche Sprachen, wie Bulgarisch, der Zugang zu POS-Informationen mehr zum Leistungszuwachs beiträgt als die detaillierten morphologischen Informationen. So zeigen wir, dass die Erkennung benannter Entitäten nur grobkörnige POS-Tags benötigt, aber gleichzeitig von der gleichzeitigen Verwendung einiger POS-Informationen unterschiedlicher Granularität profitieren kann. Unsere Auswertungsergebnisse über einen Standard-Datensatz zeigen deutliche Verbesserungen gegenüber dem Stand der Technik für bulgarische NER.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo morfološki obavješteni model priznanja entiteta koja se temelji na arhitekturi LSTM-CRF-a i kombinira integraciju riječi, integraciju karaktera Bi-LSTM-a, dijelom govora (POS) etikete i morfološke informacije. Iako je prethodni rad usredotočen na učenje od ulaska sirovine riječi, koristeći samo riječi i uloženje karaktera, pokazujemo da za morfološki bogate jezike, poput Bugarskih, pristup POS-ovim informacijama doprinosi više dobitku učinka nego detaljne morfološke informacije. Dakle, pokazujemo da priznanje imena entiteta zahtijeva samo oznake POS-a, ali u isto vrijeme može koristiti od istovremeno koristeći neke POS informacije o različitim granularnosti. Naši rezultati procjene iznad standardnog seta podataka pokazuju velike poboljšanje tijekom države umjetnosti Bugarske NER-e.', 'ko': '우리는 LSTM-CRF 구조를 바탕으로 단어 삽입, 이중 LSTM 문자 삽입, 어성 라벨과 형태학 정보를 결합한 형태학 정보 명명 실체 식별 모델을 제시했다.이전의 작업은 주로 원시 단어 입력에서 배우고 단어와 문자만 삽입하는 데 집중되었지만 불가리아어와 같은 형태가 풍부한 언어에 대한 방문어성 정보는 상세한 형태정보보다 성능 향상에 기여하는 바가 더 크다는 것을 알 수 있다.따라서 명명 실체 식별은 굵은 입도의 POS 표기만 필요하지만, 동시에 서로 다른 입도의 POS 정보를 동시에 사용하는 데 이익을 얻을 수 있음을 나타낸다.표준 데이터 세트에 대한 평가 결과에 따르면 불가리아 NER의 최첨단 수준에 비해 불가리아 NER는 상당히 개선되었다.', 'fa': 'ما یک مدل مورفولوژیکی اطلاع داده شده برای شناسایی entities نامیده شده را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که بر اساس معماری LSTM-CRF بنیاد می\u200cآید و جمع می\u200cکند جمع کردن کلمه\u200cها، جمع کردن شخصیت Bi-LSTM، برچسب\u200cهای سخنرانی (POS) و اطلاعات مورفولوژیکی. در حالی که کارهای قبلی روی یادگیری از ورودی کلمه خالی تمرکز شده، با استفاده از کلمه\u200cها و شخصیت\u200cها تنها، ما نشان می\u200cدهیم که برای زبان\u200cهای ثروتمند مورفولوژیکی، مثل بولگاری، دسترسی به اطلاعات POS بیشتر به پیروزی عملکرد از اطلاعات مورفولوژیکی جز بنابراین، ما نشان می دهیم که شناسایی یک entity به عنوان یک entity نیاز دارد تنها نقاشی POS متصل شده، ولی در همین زمان می تواند از همزمان استفاده از بعضی اطلاعات POS از granularity متفاوتی استفاده کند. نتیجه ارزیابی ما بر روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای استاندارد بهترین اندازه\u200cای در حالت هنر برای NER بلگاری نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Tunawapendekeza muundo wa kinachoelezwa kwa kimaadilojia kwa jina la kutambua entity, ambao una msingi wa ujenzi wa LSTM-CRF na kuunganisha ujumbe wa maneno, mhusika wa Bi-LSTM, sehemu ya alama za hotuba (POS), na taarifa za kifolojia. While previous work has focused on learning from raw word input, using word and character embeddings only, we show that for morphologically rich languages, such as Bulgarian, access to POS information contributes more to the performance gains than the detailed morphological information.  Kwa hiyo, tunaonyesha kwamba kutambuliwa kwa entity unahitaji tu alama za mkononi, lakini wakati huo huo unaweza kunufaika na kutumia baadhi ya taarifa za POS za ubora tofauti. Tathmini zetu zinaonyesha maendeleo makubwa zaidi ya hali ya sanaa ya Uhuru wa Bulgaria.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n morfologiese inligbare model vir genaamde entiteiterkenning, wat is gebaseer op LSTM-CRF-arkitektuur en kombinieer woord inbêdings, Bi-LSTM karakterinbêdings, deel-van-woord (POS) etikette en morfologiese inligting. Terwyl die vorige werk gefokus het op die leer van raai woord ingevoer, net met woord en karakter inbettings gebruik, wys ons dat vir morfologiese ryk tale, soos Bulgaries, toegang tot POS inligting bydra meer aan die uitvoerings as die gedetale morfologiese inligting. So, ons wys dat die genoem entiteit herkening slegs korse-korne POS etikette nodig, maar op dieselfde tyd kan dit voordeel van samelewing van sommige POS inligting van verskillende granulariteit. Ons evalueringsresultate oor 'n standaard datastel wys groottebaar verbeteringe oor die staat van die kuns vir Bulgarse NER.", 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք մարֆոլոգիապես տեղեկացված մոդել անվանված էության ճանաչելու համար, որը հիմնված է LSMT-ԿՌՖ ճարտարապետության վրա և համադրում է բառերի ներդրումներ, երկու-ԼՍԹՄ բնորոշների ներդրումներ, խոսքի մասի (POS) նշաններ և մարֆոլոգիական տեղեկատվություն: Մինչդեռ նախորդ աշխատանքը կենտրոնացել է ոչ բառերի ներմուծից սովորելու վրա, միայն բառերի և բնավորների ներմուծման վրա օգտագործելով, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մորֆոլոգիապես հարուստ լեզուների, ինչպիսիք են բուլգարենը, POS տեղեկատվության հասանելիությունը ավելի շատ է ներդրում արտադր Այսպիսով, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ կոչված էության ճանաչման կարիքն ունի միայն խոր հագուստ POS-ի նշաններ, բայց միևնույն ժամանակ այն կարող է օգտագործել տարբեր հագուստ POS-ի որոշ տեղեկատվություն: Մեր գնահատման արդյունքները ստանդարտ տվյալների համակարգի միջոցով ցույց են տալիս Բուլգարիայի ՆԵՌ-ի ամենահետաքրքիր զարգացումները:', 'az': 'Biz adlı entitə tanıması üçün morfolojik bilgili modeli təbliğ edirik. Bu LSTM-CRF arhitektüsünə dayanılır və sözləri inkişaf edir, Bi-LSTM karakter inkişafları, sözlərin bir parçası (POS) etiketlərini və morfolojik məlumatlarını birləşdirir. Əvvəlki işlər yalnız söz və karakter içərisindən öyrənməyə başladıqları halda, Bulgaristan kimi morfolojik zəngin dilləri üçün POS məlumatlarına istifadə etmək detaylı morfolojik məlumatlarından daha çox faydalanır. Beləliklə, bizə göstəririk ki, ünvanların tanıması yalnızca dənli POS etiketlərinə ehtiyacı vardır, amma bu da bir dəfə müxtəlif granuların POS məlumatını istifadə edə bilər. Standardlı veri quruluğu ilə müəyyən etdiyimiz təcrübə sonuçlarımız Bulgaristan NER-in quruluğu ilə böyük düzəltmələri göstərir.', 'tr': 'Biz adlanmış bir zat tanamak üçin morfolojik bilgili nusga teklip edip, bu LSTM-CRF arhitektegine daýanýar we sözleriň girişini, Bi-LSTM karakter ködlemeleri, sözleriň bir bölegi (POS) tägleri we morfolojik maglumaty birleştirir. Öňki işiň çyz söz girişinden öwrenmegi üçin üns berilýär diňe söz we karakter girişimlerini ulanyp, Bulgarça ýaly baý diller üçin, POS maglumatyna gol etmek üçin täzeliklerde täzelikleýän morpholojik maglumatdan kömekleyär. Şonuň üçin adly zatlary tanamagymyz diňe goýulmuş POS taglarynyň gerekdigini görkezip, ýöne bu wagtda birnäçe granularyň birnäçe POS maglumatyny ulanmakdan fayda berip biler. Biziň çykyşymyz standart veri setigimizde Bulgarça NER durumynda ýakynlaşyk taýýarlançylygy üýtgedip biljek gelişmeleri görkezýär.', 'am': 'የLSTM-CRF መሠረት የተገኘውን እና የቃላትን አቀማመጥ፣ ቢ-LSTM ፊደል ማቀናጃ፣ የንግግር ክፍል (POS) መክፈት እና የሞሮፎሎጂ መረጃዎችን እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የቀድሞው ሥራ ከንጹሕ ቃላት እና የፊደል ግንኙነት ብቻ በመማር ላይ ተማርቷል፣ እንደቡልጋሪኛ የፖስታ መረጃ ለመግኘት ከጥሩ ሞፎሎጂ መረጃዎች ይልቅ ለማድረግ ይጨምርበታል፡፡ እንደዚህም፣ የተባለው አካባቢ ማውቀት የኮርፖርት መክፈቻ ብቻ እንዲያስፈልጋቸው እናሳየዋለን፣ ነገር ግን በዚያው ሰዓት የፖስታ መረጃዎች በተለየ ጥቅምት ይጠቅማል፡፡ አካውንታችን የብልጋሪያዊ መረብ አካባቢ ሀገራት ላይ የተደረገው ትልቅ ማድረግ ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি মর্ফোলজিক্যালিক তথ্যের মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যা নামের স্বীকৃতি স্বীকারের জন্য ভিত্তিতে রয়েছে এলসিএম-সিআরএফ আর্কিকেটারেক্টারের ভিত্তিতে এবং শব্দ বিভিন্ন স পূর্ববর্তী কাজের প্রতি মনোযোগ প্রদান করে শুধুমাত্র শব্দ এবং চরিত্রের ব্যবহার করে, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে মানবিক সমৃদ্ধ ভাষার জন্য, যেমন বুলগেরিয়ার মতো বুলগেরিয়ার তথ্য প্রবে তাই আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে নামের প্রতিষ্ঠানের স্বীকৃতি শুধুমাত্র ককোর্স-গ্রেফতার করা পএস ট্যাগের প্রয়োজন, কিন্তু একই সাথে এটি বিভিন্ন আমাদের মূল্যের ফলাফল বুলগেরিয়ান নেটারের রাষ্ট্রের শিল্পের ব্যাপারে বিশাল উন্নতি প্রদর্শন করে।', 'bs': 'Predlažemo morfološki informirani model za priznanje entiteta koja se temelji na arhitekturi LSTM-CRF i kombinira integraciju riječi, integraciju karaktera Bi-LSTM, dijelom govora (POS) i morfološku informaciju. Iako je prethodni rad usredotočen na učenje od ulaska sirovine riječi, koristeći samo riječi i uloženje karaktera, pokazujemo da za morfološki bogate jezike, poput Bugarske, pristup POS informacijama doprinosi više dobitku učinka nego detaljne morfološke informacije. Dakle, pokazujemo da priznanje entiteta potrebno je samo oznake POS, ali u isto vrijeme može koristiti od istovremenog korištenja nekih POS informacija o različitim granularnosti. Naši rezultati procjene na standardnom setu podataka pokazuju velike poboljšanja u odnosu na državu umjetnosti Bugarske NER-e.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme morfologicky informovaný model pro rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit, který je založen na architektuře LSTM-CRF a kombinuje vložení slov, vložení znaků Bi-LSTM, značky části řeči (POS) a morfologické informace. Zatímco předchozí práce se zaměřila na učení se ze vstupu surového slova pouze pomocí vložení slov a znaků, ukazujeme, že u morfologicky bohatých jazyků, jako je bulharština, přístup k POS informacím přispívá více k zisku výkonu než podrobné morfologické informace. Ukazujeme tedy, že rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit potřebuje pouze hrubozrnné POS tagy, ale zároveň může těžit z současného použití některých POS informací různé granularity. Naše výsledky hodnocení ve standardním datovém souboru ukazují výrazné zlepšení oproti nejmodernějším stavem pro bulharskou NER.', 'et': 'Pakume välja morfoloogiliselt informeeritud mudeli nimega olemi tuvastamiseks, mis põhineb LSTM-CRF arhitektuuril ja ühendab sõna manustamise, Bi-LSTM märgi manustamise, kõneosa (POS) siltide ja morfoloogilise informatsiooni. Kuigi varasemad tööd on keskendunud toorsõnade sisestamisest õppimisele, kasutades ainult sõna- ja tähemärkide manustamist, näitame, et morfoloogiliselt rikkalike keelte puhul, nagu bulgaaria keel, aitab juurdepääs POS-teabele rohkem jõudlust kui detailne morfoloogiline teave. Seega näitame, et nimetatud olemi tuvastamine vajab ainult jämeda teraga POS silte, kuid samal ajal võib see kasu saada erineva granulaarsusega POS teabe samaaegsest kasutamisest. Meie hindamistulemused standardsete andmekogumite kohta näitavad Bulgaaria NERi tehnika tasemega võrreldes märkimisväärset paranemist.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme morfologisesti tietoon perustuvaa mallia nimetylle entiteetintunnistukselle, joka perustuu LSTM-CRF-arkkitehtuuriin ja yhdistää sanaupotukset, Bi-LSTM-merkkiupotukset, POS-tunnisteet ja morfologiset tiedot. Aiemmissa tutkimuksissa on keskitytty oppimaan raakasanan syötteestä käyttäen vain sanoja ja merkkejä, mutta osoitamme, että morfologisesti rikkailla kielillä, kuten bulgarialla, POS-tietojen saatavuus lisää suorituskykyä enemmän kuin yksityiskohtainen morfologinen tieto. Näin ollen osoitamme, että nimetyn entiteetin tunnistus tarvitsee vain karkeita POS-tunnisteita, mutta samalla se voi hyötyä siitä, että samanaikaisesti käytetään joitakin POS-tietoja eri granulaarisuudesta. Standarditietoaineiston perusteella saadut arviointitulokset osoittavat, että Bulgarian NER:n nykytasoon verrattuna ovat parantuneet huomattavasti.', 'ca': "Proposem un model morfològicament informat per al reconeixement d'entitats anomenats, que es basa en arquitectura LSTM-CRF i combina incorporacions de paraules, incorporacions de caràcters Bi-LSTM, etiquetes de part-of-speech (POS) i informació morfològica. While previous work has focused on learning from raw word input, using word and character embeddings only, we show that for morphologically rich languages, such as Bulgarian, access to POS information contributes more to the performance gains than the detailed morphological information.  Així doncs, demostram que el reconeixement d'entitats només necessita etiquetes POS groses, però al mateix temps pot beneficiar d'utilitzar simultàneament alguna informació POS de granularitat diferent. Our evaluation results over a standard dataset show sizeable improvements over the state-of-the-art for Bulgarian NER.", 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një model të informuar në mënyrë morfologjike për njohjen e emëruar të njësisë, i cili është bazuar në arkitekturën LSTM-CRF dhe kombinon përfshirjet e fjalëve, përfshirjet e karaktereve Bi-LSTM, etiketat e pjesës së fjalimit (POS) dhe informacionin morfologjik. Ndërsa puna e mëparshme është përqëndruar në mësimin nga të dhënat e fjalëve të papërpunuara, duke përdorur vetëm përmbajtjet e fjalëve dhe karaktereve, ne tregojmë se për gjuhët morfologjikisht të pasura, të tilla si bullgarët, aksesi në informacionin POS kontribuon më shumë në përfitimet e paraqitjeve sesa informacioni morfologjik i detajuar. Kështu, ne tregojmë se njohja e njësisë së quajtur ka nevojë vetëm për etiketa POS me kokërra të mëdha, por në të njëjtën kohë mund të përfitojë nga përdorimi njëkohësisht i disa informacioneve POS të granularitetit të ndryshëm. Rezultatet tona të vlerësimit lidhur me një sërë të dhënash standarte tregojnë përmirësime të mëdha lidhur me gjendjen e fundit për NER bullgare.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngeruhke sistem informasi nang modèl kanggo nambah aksi nêmên, sing basa karo architecture SLT-CF lan combinêt perangkat embedding, bi-LTT caratar embedding, parts-of-language (po S) tags, lan informasi nyong lanjut. Nanging previous Suara, awak dhéwé ngerasakno pernik nambah Entète, dadi mêng ngomong nik kabèh poliS ditambah akeh kotak nggawe lan sampek iso nggawe barang kelas PokS karo sampek. Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé éntukno awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing gak dhéwé nggawe barang kanggo kalagayaan-karat kanggo ngerggo barang nggawe barang nggawe dataset Bolgari.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo morfološko informiran model za prepoznavanje imenovanih entitet, ki temelji na LSTM-CRF arhitekturi in združuje besedne vdelave, Bi-LSTM znakov vdelave, oznake delnega govora (POS) in morfološke informacije. Medtem ko se je predhodno delo osredotočilo na učenje iz vnosa surovih besed z uporabo samo besed in znakov, smo pokazali, da za morfološko bogate jezike, kot je bolgarščina, dostop do informacij POS prispeva več k povečanju učinkovitosti kot podrobne morfološke informacije. Tako pokažemo, da prepoznavanje imenovanih entitet potrebuje le grobozrnate oznake POS, hkrati pa lahko koristi od hkratne uporabe nekaterih informacij POS z različnimi granulacijami. Rezultati našega ocenjevanja na podlagi standardnega nabora podatkov kažejo znatne izboljšave v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi rezultati bolgarskega NER.', 'ha': "Tune buɗe wani motel da aka sanar da shi na rubutun abun, wanda ke ƙayyade an daidaita LSSM-CRF kuma ke haɗa maganar da aka embedded, da baƙa ƙo-faɗi na Bi-LStM, da rabon faɗi (PSS) tagogi, da kuma maɓallin mutafalologi. Waka da aikin da ya gabãta ya fokus a kan karanta daga tsarin magana mai raw, yana amfani da maganar da takardar da aka shigar da shi kawai, za mu nuna cẽwa, dõmin harshen masu rikitacce, kamar misali Bulgaria, ma'anar amfani da maɓallin PoS, yana ƙara wa mafiya amfani da mafarinsa ko da information na fassarar morfological. Kamar haka, muna nũna cewa sunan sunan abun halin yana da amfani kawai ga tagogi na koyi-grammani, kuma a sami wannan yana iya amfani da wasu maɓallin haske na daban-daban. Ana ƙidãya matsayinMu a kan daidaita danna tsari na kamata, yana nũna mafiya kyauta mai girma kan halin-halin-sanawa na Bulgaria.", 'he': 'אנו מציעים מודל מוודע מורפולוגי לזהות ישויות בשם, שמבוסס על ארכיטקטורה LSTM-CRF ומשולב תוספות מילים, תוספות אופי Bi-LSTM, תוויות חלק מהנאום (POS) ומודע מורפולוגי. בעוד העבודה הקודמת התמקדה ללמוד מהכניסה של מילים גרועות, בשימוש בלבד של מילים ואותרים, אנו מראים כי לשפות עשירות מורפולוגית, כמו בולגרית, גישה למידע POS תורמה יותר לזכויות ההופעה מאשר מידע מורפולוגי מפורט. ככה, אנחנו מראים שהזיהוי של ישות בשם זקוק רק לתגים POS עצומים, אבל באותו הזמן הוא יכול להשתמש בו זמנית באמצעות מידע POS של granularity שונה. תוצאות הערכה שלנו מעל קבוצת נתונים סטנדרטית מראות שיפורים משמעותיים מעל המצב החדש של NER הבולגרי.', 'bo': 'We propose a morphologically informed model for named entity recognition, which is based on LSTM-CRF architecture and combines word embeddings, Bi-LSTM character embeddings, part-of-speech (POS) tags, and morphological information. While previous work has focused on learning from raw word input, using word and character embeddings only, we show that for morphologically rich languages, such as Bulgarian, access to POS information contributes more to the performance gains than the detailed morphological information. དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ནི་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་ལས་ཕན་རིས་ཀྱི་ཞིབ་ཡིན་པའི་(coarse-grained POS)རྟགས་མི་དགོས་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་འདྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས ང་ཚོའི་རིམ་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་ཐོག་མཛོད་ཁང་གི་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'Automated Text Simplification as a Preprocessing Step for Machine Translation into an Under-resourced Language', 'pt': 'Simplificação automatizada de texto como uma etapa de pré-processamento para tradução automática em um idioma com poucos recursos', 'ar': 'تبسيط النص آليًا كخطوة معالجة مسبقة للترجمة الآلية إلى لغة قليلة الموارد', 'fr': "Simplification automatique du texte en tant qu'étape de prétraitement pour la traduction automatique dans une langue sous-financée", 'es': 'Simplificación automatizada de textos como paso de preprocesamiento para la traducción automática a un idioma con pocos recursos', 'ja': '機械翻訳のリソース不足言語への前処理ステップとしての自動化されたテキスト簡素化', 'zh': '自文本简化为预处理步驿,以机器翻译为资源贫乏之语', 'ru': 'Автоматизированное упрощение текста как этап предварительной обработки для машинного перевода на язык с недостаточными ресурсами', 'hi': 'स्वचालित पाठ सरलीकरण एक Under-resourced भाषा में मशीन अनुवाद के लिए एक Preprocessing चरण के रूप में', 'ga': 'Simpliú Téacs Uathoibrithe mar Chéim Réamhphróiseála d’Aistriúchán Meaisín go Teanga Gan Acmhainniú', 'hu': 'Automatizált szövegegyszerűsítés mint előfeldolgozási lépés a gépi fordításhoz egy kevés forrásokkal rendelkező nyelvre', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Αυτοματοποιημένη απλοποίηση κειμένου ως βήμα προεπεξεργασίας για τη μηχανική μετάφραση σε γλώσσα που δεν διαθέτει πόρους', 'it': 'Semplificazione automatica del testo come fase di pre-elaborazione per la traduzione automatica in un linguaggio con risorse insufficienti', 'lt': 'Automatinis teksto supaprastinimas kaip mašinų vertimo į nepakankamai išteklių kalbą išankstinis apdorojimo etapas', 'kk': 'Автоматты мәтінді механизмтің аудармасының алдын- ала өзгерту қадамы ретінде баптауName', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'Name', 'ms': 'Simplifikasi Teks Automatik sebagai Langkah Preproses untuk Terjemahan Mesin ke Bahasa Dibawah Sumber', 'mt': 'Simplifikazzjoni tat-test awtomatizzat bħala Pass ta’ Preproċessar għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni f’Lingwa b’Riżorsi Inqas', 'mn': 'Автоматтын Текст Хялбарлалт Машин Информацийн Холбоонд Автоматтын Хялбарлалт', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Automatyczne uproszczenie tekstu jako krok przetwarzania wstępnego dla tłumaczenia maszynowego na język niewyposażony w zasoby', 'ro': 'Simplificarea automată a textului ca pas de prelucrare pentru traducerea automată într-o limbă cu resurse insuficiente', 'sr': 'Automatisano pojednostavljanje teksta kao korak predobrađivanja za preobrađivanje mašine u podresursni jezik', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Soo fududeynta Text as a Preprocessing Step for Machine Translation into an Under-resource language', 'sv': 'Automatisk textförenkling som ett förbehandlingssteg för maskinöversättning till ett språk med underresurser', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đơn giản văn bản tự động như một bước sửa chữa cỗ máy để dịch vào một ngôn ngữ thiếu nguồn', 'bg': 'Автоматизирано опростяване на текста като стъпка на предварителната обработка за машинен превод на език с недостатъчни ресурси', 'hr': 'Automatirano pojednostavljanje teksta kao korak predobrađivanja za preobrađivanje strojeva u podizvođeni jezik', 'da': 'Automatiseret tekstforenkling som et forbearbejdningstrin til maskinoversættelse til et sprog med underressourcer', 'nl': 'Geautomatiseerde tekstvereenvoudiging als voorbewerkingsstap voor machinevertaling in een taal met weinig middelen', 'de': 'Automatisierte Textvereinfachung als Vorverarbeitungsschritt für die maschinelle Übersetzung in eine Sprache mit wenig Ressourcen', 'id': 'Simplifikasi Teks Otomatis Sebagai Langkah Preproses untuk Translasi Mesin ke Bahasa Dibawah Sumber', 'ko': '자동 텍스트 간소화는 기계를 자원 부족 언어로 번역하는 사전 처리 절차로 한다', 'fa': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Simplified text as a Preprocessing Step for Translation of Mashine into an Under-resource language', 'tr': 'Ullançy terjime üçin ön işlemek adı olarak otomatik Metin Besitlendirmek', 'sq': 'Simplifikimi i automatizuar i tekstit si një hap paraprocesimi për përkthimin e makinës në një gjuhë të pakufishme', 'af': 'Comment', 'am': 'text-tool-action', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Mašin Çevirməsi üçün Ön-işləmə Adı olaraq Ön-işləmə Mətn Yapışması', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Automatirano pojednostavljanje teksta kao korak predobrađivanja za preobrađivanje mašine u pod resursom jezik', 'ca': 'Simplificació automàtica del texto com un pas de pré-processament per a la traducció de màquines en un llenguatge amb menys recursos', 'cs': 'Automatizované zjednodušení textu jako krok předzpracování strojového překladu do jazyka s nedostatečnými zdroji', 'et': 'Automaatne teksti lihtsustamine kui masintõlke eeltöötluse etapp vähese ressursiga keelde', 'fi': 'Automaattinen tekstin yksinkertaistaminen esikäsittelyvaiheena konekääntämiselle vajaakäyttöiselle kielelle', 'jv': 'Layout', 'sk': 'Samodejna poenostavitev besedila kot korak predobdelave strojnega prevajanja v jezik s premalo virov', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Automated Text Simplification as a Preprocessing Step for Machine Translation into an Under-resourced Language', 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཡིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གྱི་གྲོང་རིམ་གྱི་འགོད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ'}
{'en': 'In this work, we investigate the possibility of using fully automatic text simplification system on the English source in machine translation (MT) for improving its translation into an under-resourced language. We use the state-of-the-art automatic text simplification (ATS) system for lexically and syntactically simplifying source sentences, which are then translated with two state-of-the-art English-to-Serbian MT systems, the phrase-based MT (PBMT) and the neural MT (NMT). We explore three different scenarios for using the ATS in MT : (1) using the raw output of the ATS ; (2) automatically filtering out the sentences with low grammaticality and meaning preservation scores ; and (3) performing a minimal manual correction of the ATS output. Our results show improvement in fluency of the translation regardless of the chosen scenario, and difference in success of the three scenarios depending on the MT approach used (PBMT or NMT) with regards to improving translation fluency and post-editing effort.', 'fr': "Dans ce travail, nous étudions la possibilité d'utiliser un système de simplification de texte entièrement automatique sur la source anglaise en traduction automatique (MT) pour améliorer sa traduction dans une langue sous-financée. Nous utilisons le système de simplification automatique de texte (ATS) de pointe pour simplifier lexiquement et syntaxiquement les phrases sources, qui sont ensuite traduites avec deux systèmes de traduction automatique de l'anglais vers le serbe de pointe, le MT basé sur les phrases (PBMT) et le MT neuronal (NMT). Nous explorons trois scénarios différents d'utilisation de l'ATS dans la MT\xa0: (1) en utilisant la sortie brute de l'ATS\xa0; (2) en filtrant automatiquement les phrases dont la grammaticalité et les scores de préservation de la signification sont faibles\xa0; et (3) en effectuant une correction manuelle minimale de la sortie ATS. Nos résultats montrent une amélioration de la fluidité de la traduction quel que soit le scénario choisi, et une différence de succès entre les trois scénarios en fonction de l'approche de traduction automatique utilisée (PBMT ou NMT) en ce qui concerne l'amélioration de la fluidité de la traduction et de l'effort de post-édition.", 'es': 'En este trabajo, investigamos la posibilidad de utilizar un sistema de simplificación de texto totalmente automático en la traducción automática (MT) en inglés para mejorar su traducción a un idioma con pocos recursos. Utilizamos el sistema de simplificación automática de textos (ATS) de última generación para simplificar léxica y sintácticamente las oraciones originales, que luego se traducen con dos sistemas de traducción automática de inglés a serbio de última generación, la MT basada en frases (PBMT) y la MT neuronal (NMT). Exploramos tres escenarios diferentes para usar la ATS en MT: (1) usar la salida bruta de la ATS; (2) filtrar automáticamente las oraciones con puntuaciones bajas de gramaticalidad y preservación del significado; y (3) realizar una corrección manual mínima de la salida de ATS. Nuestros resultados muestran una mejora en la fluidez de la traducción independientemente del escenario elegido, y una diferencia en el éxito de los tres escenarios según el enfoque de MT utilizado (PBMT o NMT) con respecto a la mejora de la fluidez de la traducción y el esfuerzo posterior a la edición.', 'ja': '本研究では、機械翻訳（ MT ）における英文ソースの全自動テキスト簡略化システムを、資源不足の言語への翻訳を改善するために使用する可能性について検討した。 私たちは、最先端の自動テキスト簡素化（ ATS ）システムを使用して、ソース文を語彙的および構文的に簡素化し、その後、フレーズベースのMT （ PBMT ）とニューラルMT （ NMT ）の2つの最先端の英語からセルビア語のMTシステムで翻訳します。 MTでATSを使用するための3つの異なるシナリオを探索します。（ 1 ） ATSの生の出力を使用します。（ 2 ）文法性と意味保存スコアが低い文章を自動的にフィルタリングします。（ 3 ） ATS出力の最小限の手動補正を実行します。 私たちの結果は、選択されたシナリオに関係なく、翻訳の流暢性が改善され、使用されたMTアプローチ（ PBMTまたはNMT ）に応じて3つのシナリオの成功の差があることを示しています。', 'zh': '于此之事,究于机器翻译(MT)之英语源全自动文本简统之可能,以改善其对资源不足言之译。 用最先进自简(ATS)系于词汇、语法,然后简化源句于词汇、语法,然后用二最先进之英语于塞尔维亚语MT统,即基于短语之MT(PBMT)、神经MT(NMT)译也。 论机器翻译用 ATS 三异:(1) 用 ATS 始输。 (2)自漉语法义存分数; 与 (3) ATS 输最小手动校正。 臣等之的结果表明,无所选择,译者流畅皆有所提高,且随所用机器翻译法(PBMT或NMT)高译流译后辑事,三方成功率异。', 'ar': 'في هذا العمل ، نتحرى إمكانية استخدام نظام تبسيط تلقائي كامل للنص على المصدر الإنجليزي في الترجمة الآلية (MT) لتحسين ترجمته إلى لغة قليلة الموارد. نستخدم أحدث نظام آلي لتبسيط النص (ATS) لتبسيط جمل المصدر معجميًا وتركيبيًا ، والتي تُترجم بعد ذلك باستخدام أحدث أنظمة الترجمة الآلية من الإنجليزية إلى الصربية ، والتي تعتمد على العبارة MT (PBMT) و MT العصبية (NMT). نستكشف ثلاثة سيناريوهات مختلفة لاستخدام ATS في MT: (1) استخدام الناتج الخام لـ ATS ؛ (2) تصفية الجمل ذات القواعد النحوية المنخفضة وتعني درجات الحفظ تلقائيًا ؛ و (3) إجراء تصحيح يدوي أدنى لمخرج ATS. تظهر نتائجنا تحسنًا في طلاقة الترجمة بغض النظر عن السيناريو المختار ، والاختلاف في نجاح السيناريوهات الثلاثة اعتمادًا على نهج الترجمة الآلية المستخدم (PBMT أو NMT) فيما يتعلق بتحسين طلاقة الترجمة وجهود التحرير اللاحقة.', 'hi': 'इस काम में, हम एक अंडर-रिसोर्स्ड भाषा में इसके अनुवाद में सुधार के लिए मशीन अनुवाद (एमटी) में अंग्रेजी स्रोत पर पूरी तरह से स्वचालित पाठ सरलीकरण प्रणाली का उपयोग करने की संभावना की जांच करते हैं। हम लेक्सिकली और वाक्यात्मक रूप से स्रोत वाक्यों को सरल बनाने के लिए अत्याधुनिक स्वचालित पाठ सरलीकरण (एटीएस) प्रणाली का उपयोग करते हैं, जो तब दो अत्याधुनिक अंग्रेजी-से-सर्बियाई एमटी सिस्टम, वाक्यांश-आधारित एमटी (पीबीएमटी) और तंत्रिका एमटी (एनएमटी) के साथ अनुवादित होते हैं। हम एमटी में एटीएस का उपयोग करने के लिए तीन अलग-अलग परिदृश्यों का पता लगाते हैं: (1) एटीएस के कच्चे आउटपुट का उपयोग करना; (2) स्वचालित रूप से कम व्याकरणिकता और अर्थ संरक्षण स्कोर के साथ वाक्यों को फ़िल्टर करना; और (3) एटीएस आउटपुट का एक न्यूनतम मैनुअल सुधार कर रहा है। हमारे परिणाम चुने गए परिदृश्य की परवाह किए बिना अनुवाद के प्रवाह में सुधार दिखाते हैं, और अनुवाद प्रवाह और पोस्ट-संपादन प्रयास में सुधार के संबंध में उपयोग किए जाने वाले एमटी दृष्टिकोण (पीबीएमटी या एनएमटी) के आधार पर तीन परिदृश्यों की सफलता में अंतर दिखाते हैं।', 'pt': 'Neste trabalho, investigamos a possibilidade de usar um sistema de simplificação de texto totalmente automático na fonte em inglês na tradução automática (TA) para melhorar sua tradução para um idioma com poucos recursos. Usamos o sistema de simplificação automática de texto (ATS) de última geração para simplificar sentenças de origem lexical e sintaticamente, que são então traduzidas com dois sistemas de tradução automática de inglês para sérvio de última geração, o sistema baseado em frase MT (PBMT) e o MT neural (NMT). Exploramos três cenários diferentes para usar o ATS em MT: (1) usando a saída bruta do ATS; (2) filtrar automaticamente as frases com baixa gramaticalidade e baixa pontuação de preservação de significado; e (3) realizar uma correção manual mínima da saída ATS. Nossos resultados mostram melhora na fluência da tradução, independentemente do cenário escolhido, e diferença no sucesso dos três cenários, dependendo da abordagem de TA usada (PBMT ou NMT) no que diz respeito à melhoria da fluência da tradução e esforço de pós-edição.', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы исследуем возможность использования полностью автоматизированной системы упрощения текста на английском языке в машинном переводе (МТ) для улучшения его перевода на язык, не обеспеченный достаточными ресурсами. Мы используем современную автоматическую систему упрощения текста (ATS) для лексического и синтаксического упрощения исходных предложений, которые затем переводятся с помощью двух современных англо-сербских систем MT, основанной на фразе MT (PBMT) и нейронной MT (NMT). Мы исследуем три различных сценария использования ATS в MT: (1) использование необработанного выхода ATS; (2) автоматическая фильтрация предложений с низкой грамматичностью и оценкой сохранения смысла; и (3) выполнение минимальной ручной коррекции выхода ATS. Наши результаты показывают улучшение беглости перевода независимо от выбранного сценария и разницу в успехе трех сценариев в зависимости от используемого подхода MT (PBMT или NMT) в отношении улучшения беглости перевода и усилий после редактирования.', 'ga': 'San obair seo, déanaimid imscrúdú ar an bhféidearthacht go n-úsáidfí córas simplithe téacs atá go hiomlán uathoibríoch ar an bhfoinse Béarla in aistriúchán meaisín (MT) chun a aistriúchán go teanga tearc-acmhainní a fheabhsú. Úsáidimid an córas úrscothach um shimpliú téacs uathoibríoch (ATS) le haghaidh abairtí foinse a shimpliú go foclóiriúil agus go comhréire, a aistrítear ansin le dhá chóras MT Béarla-go-Seirbia den scoth, an frása-bhunaithe. MT (PBMT) agus an MT néarúil (NMT). Déanaimid iniúchadh ar thrí chás dhifriúla maidir le húsáid an ATS in MT: (1) ag baint úsáide as aschur amh an ATS; (2) go huathoibríoch scagadh amach na habairtí le gramadaí íseal agus brí scóir caomhnú; agus (3) ceartú íosta láimhe a dhéanamh ar an aschur ATS. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí feabhas ar líofacht an aistriúcháin beag beann ar an gcás roghnaithe, agus difríocht i rathúlacht na dtrí chás ag brath ar an gcur chuige MT a úsáideadh (PBMT nó NMT) maidir le líofacht aistriúcháin agus iarracht iar-eagarthóireachta a fheabhsú.', 'ka': 'ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ყველაფერად ავტომატური ტექსტის გამოყენება სისტემის გამოყენება ინგლისური მსოფლიოში მაქსინური გაგრძელებაში (MT) მაქსინური გაგრძელებაში თა ჩვენ ვიყენებთ სინტექტიკურად და სინტექტიკურად გამოყენებული სისტემის განსხვავება სისტემის განსხვავება, რომელიც შემდეგ ორი განსხვავებული ინგლისურად-სერბული MT სისტემის განსხვავებული სისტემის განსხვავება, ფრაზების განსაზღვრული MT (PBMT) და ნეიროლურ ჩვენ სამი განსხვავებული სენარიო, რომელიც ATS-ის გამოყენება MT-ში (1) გამოყენება ATS-ის წყალი გამოყენება; (2) ავტომატურად გამოფილტრირება სიტყვები, რომელიც დამატებული გრამიკალურობა და ნიშნავს შეცვალობა სიტყვები; და (3) ATS გამოსახულების მინიმალური ხელსაწყოთა კონფიგურაცია. ჩვენი წარმოდგენები გამოყენებული წარმოდგენისთვის უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენისთვის და სამი სენარიოს წარმოდგენისთვის განსხვავებას, რომელიც გამოყენებული MT პროგენტიდან (PBMT ან NMT) გამოყენებული წარმოდგენისთვის შე', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, διερευνούμε τη δυνατότητα χρήσης πλήρως αυτόματου συστήματος απλοποίησης κειμένου στην αγγλική πηγή σε μηχανική μετάφραση (ΜΤ) για τη βελτίωση της μετάφρασής του σε μια γλώσσα που δεν διαθέτει πόρους. Χρησιμοποιούμε το υπερσύγχρονο σύστημα αυτόματης απλοποίησης κειμένου (ΑΤS) για λεξική και συντακτική απλοποίηση των προτάσεων πηγής, οι οποίες στη συνέχεια μεταφράζονται με δύο υπερσύγχρονα συστήματα ΜΤ από Αγγλικά προς Σερβικά, το ΜΤ με βάση τις φράσεις (PBMT) και το νευρωνικό ΜΤ (NMT). Εξετάζουμε τρία διαφορετικά σενάρια για τη χρήση του ATS σε MT: (1) χρησιμοποιώντας την ακατέργαστη παραγωγή του ATS. (2) αυτόματα φιλτράροντας τις προτάσεις με χαμηλή γραμματικότητα και βαθμολογία διατήρησης νοήματος· και (3) εκτέλεση ελάχιστης χειροκίνητης διόρθωσης της εξόδου ATS. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν βελτίωση στην ευχέρεια της μετάφρασης ανεξάρτητα από το επιλεγμένο σενάριο, και διαφορά στην επιτυχία των τριών σεναρίων ανάλογα με την προσέγγιση που χρησιμοποιείται (PBMT ή NMT) όσον αφορά τη βελτίωση της ρευστότητας της μετάφρασης και την προσπάθεια μετεκφρασής.', 'hu': 'Ebben a munkában annak lehetőségét vizsgáljuk, hogy teljesen automatikus szövegegyszerűsítő rendszert használjunk az angol forrásban gépi fordításban (MT) annak javítása érdekében, hogy javítsuk annak lehetőségét egy kevésbé forrásos nyelvre történő fordítását. A legkorszerűbb automatikus szövegegyszerűsítő (ATS) rendszert használjuk lexikailag és szintaktikailag egyszerűsítő forrásszövegek lexikai és szintaktikai egyszerűsítésére, amelyeket két korszerű angol-szerb MT rendszerrel fordítunk le, a kifejezésen alapuló MT (PBMT) és a neurális MT (NMT). Három különböző forgatókönyvet vizsgálunk az ATS MT-ben történő használatára: (1) az ATS nyers kimenetének felhasználásával; (2) automatikusan kiszűri az alacsony nyelvtanitású és jelentésű megőrzési pontszámokkal rendelkező mondatokat; és (3) az ATS kimenet minimális manuális korrekciójának elvégzése. Eredményeink a kiválasztott forgatókönyvtől függetlenül javulást mutatnak a fordítás folyékonyságában, valamint a három forgatókönyv sikerességének különbségét az alkalmazott MT megközelítéstől (PBMT vagy NMT) függően a fordítás folyékonyságának javítása és utószerkesztési erőfeszítések tekintetében.', 'it': "In questo lavoro, esaminiamo la possibilità di utilizzare un sistema di semplificazione del testo completamente automatico sulla fonte inglese nella traduzione automatica (MT) per migliorare la sua traduzione in una lingua poco dotata di risorse. Utilizziamo il sistema di semplificazione automatica del testo (ATS) all'avanguardia per semplificare lessicamente e sintatticamente le frasi sorgente, che vengono poi tradotte con due sistemi MT dall'inglese all'serbo all'avanguardia, il MT basato sulle frasi (PBMT) e il MT neurale (NMT). Esploriamo tre diversi scenari per l'utilizzo dell'ATS in MT: (1) utilizzando l'output grezzo dell'ATS; (2) filtrando automaticamente le frasi con bassi punteggi grammaticali e di conservazione del significato; e (3) eseguire una correzione manuale minima dell'uscita ATS. I nostri risultati mostrano un miglioramento nella fluidità della traduzione indipendentemente dallo scenario scelto, e una differenza nel successo dei tre scenari a seconda dell'approccio MT utilizzato (PBMT o NMT) per quanto riguarda il miglioramento della fluidità della traduzione e lo sforzo post-editing.", 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыс ішінде, компьютердің аудармасының (MT) аудармасын төмен тіліне жақсарту үшін ағылшын тілінің көзінде автоматты түрде жаңарту жүйесін қолдануға мүмкіндік береді. Біз тексті автоматты мәтін қарапайымдастыру (ATS) жүйесін лексикалық және синтактикалық түрде көздеген сөздерді қарапайымдастыру үшін қолданамыз. Содан кейін екі күй- жай ағылшын- серб MT жүйелерімен, сөздерді негіздеген MT (PBMT) және невралдық MT (NMT Біз MT-де ATS қолданатын үш түрлі сценарий зерттеп: (1) ATS-нің сызық шығысын қолданатын. (2) сөздерді автоматты түрде грамматикалық және мәліметті сақтау нөмірлерімен сүзгілеу; мәліметі және (3) ATS шығысының минимал қолмен түзетуін орындайды. Біздің нәтижелеріміз таңдалған сценариодан қарамастан аудармасының жылдамдығын жақсы көрсетеді, және соңғы аудармасының жылдамдығын жақсарту және өзгерту және өзгерту жұмысын жақсарту үш сценариодан тәуелді MT қасиетіне т', 'lt': 'Šiame darbe tiriame galimybę naudoti visiškai automatinę teksto supaprastinimo sistemą anglų kalbos šaltinio vertimui mašinomis (MT) gerinti vertimą į nepakankamai išteklių turinčią kalbą. Naudojame naujausią automatinio teksto supaprastinimo sistemą (ATS) tekstams lexiškai ir sintetiškai supaprastinti išorinius sakinius, kurie vėliau vertami dviem naujausiomis anglų-serbų MT sistemomis, frazėmis grindžiamu MT (PBMT) ir neuraliniu MT (NMT). Tiriame tris skirtingus ATS naudojimo MT scenarijus: 1) naudojant ATS žaliavinę produkciją; (2) automatiškai filtruojant frazes mažu gramatiškumu ir prasme išsaugojant reikšmę; ir (3) atlikti minimal ų rankinį ATS išėjimo koregavimą. Mūsų rezultatai rodo geresnį vertimo lankstumą, nepriklausomai nuo pasirinkto scenarijaus, ir trijų scenarijų sėkmės skirtumą, priklausomai nuo MT metodo (PBMT arba NMT), siekiant pagerinti vertimo lankstumą ir pastangas po redakcijos.', 'mk': 'Во оваа работа ја истражуваме можноста да се користи целосно автоматски систем за поедноставување на текстот на англискиот извор во машински превод (МТ) за подобрување на неговиот превод на јазик со недостаток на ресурси. Ние го користиме најсовремениот автоматски систем за поедноставување на текстот (АТС) за лексикално и синтактичко поедноставување на изворните реченици, кои потоа се преведуваат со два најсовремени англиски до српски мет системи, MT (ПБМТ) базиран на фрази и невралниот мет (НМТ). Истражуваме три различни сценарија за користење на АТС во МТ: (1) користење на суровиот излез на АТС; (2) автоматски филтрирање на речениците со ниска граматичност и значење резултати за зачувување; и (3) спроведуваат минимална рачна корекција на излезот на АТС. Our results show improvement in fluency of the translation regardless of the chosen scenario, and difference in success of the three scenarios depending on the MT approach used (PBMT or NMT) with regards to improving translation fluency and post-editing effort.', 'ms': 'Dalam kerja ini, kami menyelidiki kemungkinan menggunakan sistem pemudahan teks secara automatik sepenuhnya pada sumber Inggeris dalam terjemahan mesin (MT) untuk memperbaiki terjemahannya ke dalam bahasa yang tidak mempunyai sumber-sumber. Kami menggunakan sistem pemadaman teks automatik (ATS) yang terbaik untuk pemadaman kalimat sumber secara leksikal dan sintaktik, yang kemudian diterjemahkan dengan dua sistem MT bahasa Inggeris-ke-Serbia, MT (PBMT) berdasarkan frasa dan MT saraf (NMT). Kami mengeksplorasi tiga skenario yang berbeza untuk menggunakan ATS dalam MT: (1) menggunakan output mentah ATS; (2) secara automatik penapisan kalimat dengan skor penjagaan gramatikal rendah dan maknanya; and (3) performing a minimal manual correction of the ATS output.  Our results show improvement in fluency of the translation regardless of the chosen scenario, and difference in success of the three scenarios depending on the MT approach used (PBMT or NMT) with regards to improving translation fluency and post-editing effort.', 'mt': 'F’dan ix-xogħol, ninvestigaw il-possibbiltà li tintuża sistema ta’ semplifikazzjoni tat-test kompletament awtomatika dwar is-sors Ingliż fit-traduzzjoni bil-magna (MT) għat-titjib tat-traduzzjoni tagħha f’lingwa li ma għandhiex riżorsi biżżejjed. Aħna nużaw is-sistema ta’ simplifikazzjoni awtomatika tat-test (ATS) l-aktar avvanzata għas-semplifikazzjoni lexikali u sintetika tas-sentenzi tas-sors, li mbagħad jiġu tradotti b’żewġ sistemi MT bl-Ingliż l-aktar avvanzati għas-Serbja, MT ibbażat fuq il-frażi (PBMT) u MT newrali (NMT). Aħna nesploraw tliet xenarji differenti għall-użu tal-ATS f’MT: (1) bl-użu tal-produzzjoni mhux ipproċessata tal-ATS; (2) il-filtrazzjoni awtomatika tas-sentenzi b’punteġġi baxxi ta’ grammatika u ta’ konservazzjoni tat-tifsira; u (3) twettaq korrezzjoni manwali minima tal-ħruġ tal-ATS. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru titjib fil-fluwenza tat-traduzzjoni irrispettivament mix-xenarju magħżul, u d-differenza fis-suċċess tat-tliet xenarji skont l-approċċ MT użat (PBMT jew NMT) fir-rigward tat-titjib tal-fluwenza tat-traduzzjoni u l-isforz ta’ wara l-edizzjoni.', 'ml': 'ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്നത് മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷയില്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് സ്രോതസ്സില്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും എളുപ്പമുള്ള പദാവലിയുടെ സാധ്യതയ ആർട്ടിന്റെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് - ഓട്ടോമിക്ക് ടെക്സ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d എട്ടി (ATS) സിസ്റ്റം നാം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. സ്രോതസ്സിലേക്കും സിന്റാക്കിക MT-ല്\u200d ATS ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്നു വ്യത്യസ്ത സിനേറിയോസ് പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു: (1) ATS-ന്റെ വെളുപ (2) automatically filtering out the sentences with low grammaticality and meaning preservation scores;  (3) ATS പുറപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെ ചെറിയ കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതാണ്. തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട സിനേരിയോ എങ്കിലും വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷയില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. മൂന്നു സിനേരിയോകളുട', 'mn': 'Энэ ажлын хувьд бид англи хэлний хөрөнгө оруулалт (MT) дээр автоматжуулалттай текст хялбарчлалын системийг ашиглах боломжтой байдлыг судалж байна. Бид автоматик текст хялбарчлалын байр суурь системийг лексик болон синтактик хэлбэрүүдийг хялбарчлахын тулд ашиглаж байна. Тэгээд хоёр урлагийн Англи болон Серб MT системээр, өгүүлбэртэй MT (PBMT) болон мэдрэлийн MT (NMT) гэх мэт орчуулагддаг. Бид ATS-г MT-д ашиглах гурван өөр хувилбарыг судалж байна: (1) ATS-ийн цэвэр гаргалтыг ашиглаж байна. (2) өгүүлбэрийг бага грамматик болон хадгалах оноо гэсэн утгатай автоматаар шинжилгээ хийдэг; (3) АТС гарын гарын бага зэрэгцүүлэлт хийдэг. Бидний үр дүн нь сонгогдсон хувилбараас ч хамаагүй орчуулалтын шингэн хөгжлийг сайжруулж, MT (PBMT, NMT) хэрэглэгдсэн тухай 3 хувилбарын амжилтын ялгааг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'I dette arbeidet undersøker vi muligheten for å bruka fullstendig automatisk tekstforenklingssystem på engelsk kjelde i maskineomsetjinga (MT) for å forbetra omsetjinga til ein underressursert språk. Vi bruker systemet for automatisk forenkling av tekst i kunsten for leksisk og syntaksisk forenkling av kjeldesetningar, som så vert omsett med to tilstandar av kunsten engelsk-til-Serbisk MT-systemet, frasebasert MT (PBMT) og neuralMT (NMT). Vi utforskar tre ulike scenarioar for å bruka ATS i MT: (1) med råutdata av ATS. (2) automatisk filtrer setningane med låg grammatisk og betyr konserveringspoeng; og (3) utfører ein minimal manuelretting av ATS-utdata. Resultatet våra viser forbetringa i flukten av omsetjinga uavhengig av den valde scenarioen, og forskjellen i suksess av dei tre scenarioane avhengig av MT-tilnærminga som er brukt (PBMT eller NMT) for å forbetra omsetjingskvittet og post-redigeringsforsøk.', 'pl': 'W niniejszej pracy badamy możliwość zastosowania w pełni automatycznego systemu uproszczenia tekstu na angielskim źródłu w tłumaczeniu maszynowym (MT) w celu poprawy jego tłumaczenia na niewyposażony język. Używamy najnowocześniejszego systemu automatycznego uproszczenia tekstu (ATS) do leksycznego i składniowego upraszczania zdań źródłowych, które następnie są tłumaczone za pomocą dwóch najnowocześniejszych systemów MT angielsko-serbskich, MT opartych na frazach (PBMT) i neuronalnego MT (NMT). Badamy trzy różne scenariusze wykorzystania ATS w MT: (1) wykorzystując surowe wyjście ATS; (2) automatycznie filtrowanie zdań o niskiej gramatyczności i wynikach zachowania znaczenia; i (3) wykonywanie minimalnej ręcznej korekty wyjścia ATS. Nasze wyniki pokazują poprawę płynności tłumaczenia niezależnie od wybranego scenariusza oraz różnicę w sukcesie trzech scenariuszy w zależności od zastosowanego podejścia MT (PBMT lub NMT) w zakresie poprawy płynności tłumaczeń i wysiłku post-edycyjnego.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, investigăm posibilitatea utilizării sistemului complet automat de simplificare a textului pe sursa engleză în traducere automată (MT) pentru îmbunătățirea traducerii sale într-o limbă insuficientă de resurse. Utilizăm sistemul de simplificare automată a textului de ultimă generație (ATS) pentru simplificarea lexicală și sintactică a propozițiilor sursă, care sunt apoi traduse cu două sisteme MT de ultimă generație din engleză în sârbă, MT bazată pe fraze (PBMT) și MT neural (NMT). Explorăm trei scenarii diferite pentru utilizarea ATS în MT: (1) utilizând ieșirea brută a ATS; (2) filtrarea automată a propozițiilor cu o gramaticalitate scăzută și punctaje de conservare a semnificației; și (3) efectuarea unei corecții manuale minime a ieșirii ATS. Rezultatele noastre arată îmbunătățirea fluenței traducerii indiferent de scenariul ales și diferența de succes a celor trei scenarii în funcție de abordarea MT utilizată (PBMT sau NMT) în ceea ce privește îmbunătățirea fluenței traducerii și efortul post-editare.', 'sr': 'U ovom poslu istražujemo mogućnost upotrebe potpuno automatskog sustava pojednostavljanja teksta na engleskom izvoru u prevodu mašine (MT) za poboljšanje prevoda na jezik pod resursom. Koristimo sistem automatskog pojednostavljanja teksta (ATS) za leksički i sintaktički pojednostavljanje izvorskih rečenica, koji se onda prevode sa dva stanja umjetnih engleskih na srpskih MT-sistema, na frazi baziranog MT (PBMT) i neuralnog MT (NMT). Istražujemo tri različita scenarija za upotrebu ATS u MT: (1) korištenje sirovog izlaza ATS-a; (2) automatski filtriranje rečenica sa niskom gramatičnom i značenjem rezultata očuvanja; i (3) izvršavajući minimalnu manualnu korekciju ATS izlaza. Naši rezultati pokazuju poboljšanje tečnosti prevoda bez obzira na izabran scenario, i razliku u uspjehu tri scenarija ovisnosti o korištenom MT pristupu (PBMT ili NMT) u vezi poboljšanja tečnosti prevoda i napora nakon editiranja.', 'so': 'Markaas waxan, waxaynu baaraynaa suurtagalka isticmaalka nidaamka sahlisashada qoraalka ee afka Ingiriiska oo ku qoran turjumista machine (MT) si aan u horumarinno turjumaankiisa oo u dhigno luuqad hoos-resourceed. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa nidaamka qoraalka ee qoraalka oo ah qoraalka u fududeynta (ATS) si lexic ah iyo syntactically u fududayno fursad, taasoo dabadeedna lagu turjumaa laba state-of-the-art Ingiriis-to-Serbian MT systems, the phrase-based MT (PBMT) and the neural MT (NMT). Waxaynu baaraynaa saddex muusiko oo kala duduwan si aan ugu isticmaalno ATS (MT): (2) Si automatic ah u baaraandegista xukunka lagu qorayo lambarka gaaban iyo micneheeda qiimaha ilaalinta; iyo sameynta hagitaanka midhaha ee ATS ee ugu yaraan. Our results show improvement in fluency of the translation regardless of the chosen scenario, and difference in success of the three scenarios depending on the MT approach used (PBMT or NMT) with regards to improving translation fluency and post-editing effort.', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ අපි පරීක්ෂා කරන්න පුළුවන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය පාළුවන් පද්ධතිය සඳහා ඇන්ග්\u200dරේෂිය ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය පද්ධතිය භාෂාවිත කරන්න,  අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක පණිවිඩය (ATS) පද්ධතිය භාවිත කරනවා ලෙක්සිකාලික සහ සංක්\u200dරියාත්මක වාර්තාවක් සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා, ඒ පස්සේ ඉංග්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරවිද්ධතිය දෙකක්  අපි වෙනස් සිනේරියෝ තුනක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා ATS එක MT වලින් භාවිත කරන්න: (1) ATS වලින් ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර (2) ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් වාක්ය අඩුම ග්\u200dරාමාටිකාරය සහ අදහස් ආරක්ෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ (3) ATS ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියේ අඩුම පුද්ගලික පුද්ගලයක් කරන්න. අපේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප', 'sv': 'I detta arbete undersöker vi möjligheten att använda helautomatiskt textförenklingssystem på den engelska källan i maskinöversättning (MT) för att förbättra översättningen till ett underresursspråk. Vi använder det senaste automatiska textförenklingssystemet (ATS) för lexiskt och syntaktiskt förenklande källmeningar, som sedan översätts med två toppmoderna engelsk-serbiska MT-system, det frasbaserade MT (PBMT) och det neurala MT (NMT). Vi undersöker tre olika scenarier för att använda ATS i MT: (1) använda råproduktionen av ATS; (2) automatiskt filtrera ut meningar med låg grammatik och betydelsebevarande poäng. och (3) utföra en minimal manuell korrigering av ATS-utgången. Våra resultat visar en förbättring av översättningens flytbarhet oavsett vilket scenario som valts, och skillnader i framgång för de tre scenarierna beroende på den MT-metod som använts (PBMT eller NMT) när det gäller att förbättra översättningsflytande och efterredigeringsarbete.', 'ta': 'இந்த வேலையில், நாம் முழுமையாக தானாகவே உரை எளிதாக்குதல் அமைப்பை பயன்படுத்தி கணினி மொழிமொழியில் (MT) மொழிமொழிமாற்றியில் மொழிமாற நாம் மூலத்தின் வாக்கியங்களை ஒழுங்குபடுத்தும் மூல வாக்கியங்களுக்கு தானாகவே உரை எளிதாக்கும் முறைமையை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், அது பின்னர் மொழியில் இரு நிலை- ஆங்கிலத்தில் இருந்து செர்பியன்  மூன்று வேறு வித்தியாசமான காட்சிகளை MT-ல் ATS பயன்படுத்துவதற்காக நாம் தேடு (2) automatically filtering out the sentences with low grammaticality and meaning preservation scores;  (3) ATS வெளியீட்டின் சிறிய கையேட்டு திருத்தம் செய்யும். தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட காட்சியில் இல்லாமல் மொழிபெயர்ப்பின் வெற்றியில் மேம்படுத்தப்படும், மூன்று காட்சியின் வெற்றியிலும் வெற்றிப்பெடுக்கப்பட்ட MT செயல', 'ur': 'ہم اس کام میں تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ مشین ترجمہ (MT) کے مطابق اس کی ترجمہ کو کم رسسورٹ زبان میں استعمال کرنے کے لئے پورے طور پر آٹوٹی ٹکسٹ سازونی سیسٹم کی استعمال کریں۔ ہم اسٹیٹ کے ساتھ استعمال کرتے ہیں آٹیٹ کی آٹیٹ کی سادگی (ATS) سیسٹم کو لکسیکی اور سینٹیکٹی طور پر سورج جماعتیں سادگی کرنے کے لئے، پھر دوسری حالت انگلیسی سے سربی MT سیسٹم کے ساتھ ترجمہ کیا جاتا ہے، فریز کی بنیادی MT (PBMT) اور نیورال MT (NMT) کے ساتھ۔ ہم تین مختلف سناریوں کو MT میں ATS کے استعمال کرنے کے لئے تحقیق کرتے ہیں: (1) ATS کے raw output کے استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ (2) کلمات کو کم گراماتیکی کے ساتھ فالٹر کرتا ہے اور یعنی حفاظت کا ذریعہ ہے۔ اور (3) ATS آوٹ پیٹ کے ذریعہ ذریعہ مہمانی اصلاح کر رہے ہیں۔ ہمارے نتیجے منتخب سینارییو کے بغیر انتخاب کئے ہوئے ترجمہ کی سینارییو کی پاکیزگی میں بہترین ترجمہ کرتی ہیں اور تین سینارییوں کی موفقیت کے بغیر متفاوت کے مطابق MT طریقے پر (PBMT یا NMT) استعمال کئے گئے ہیں ترجمہ سینارییوں اور پیچھے سمجھنے کی تلاش', 'uz': "Bu ishda biz ingliz manbasiga tarjima tarjima (MT) tilida butun avtomatik matn soddalash tizimidan foydalanish imkoniyatini o'rganamiz. Biz to ʻgʻri yordamchi soʻzni avtomatik matn soʻzlashtirish (ATS) tizimdan foydalanamiz, bu soʻzni toʻgʻri so'zlar bilan bir xil ingliz-shaxsiy MT tizimi bilan tarjima qilamiz, bir so'zlar asosida MT (PBMT) va neural MT (NMT) bilan tarjima qilamiz. Biz MT'da ATS'ni foydalanish uchun uchta boshqa scenarini qidirimiz: (1) ATS'ning kichkina natijasi yordamida foydalanamiz; (2) Maxfiy soʻzlarni avtomatik grammatik va saqlash imkoniyatini moslash. va ATS natijasini minimal qoʻlbola tizimini bajarish mumkin. Our results show improvement in fluency of the translation regardless of the chosen scenario, and difference in success of the three scenarios depending on the MT approach used (PBMT or NMT) with regards to improving translation fluency and post-editing effort.", 'vi': 'Trong công việc này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu khả năng sử dụng một hệ thống đơn giản văn bản hoàn toàn tự động về nguồn dịch chuyển tiếng Anh (MTV) để cải tiến nó thành một ngôn ngữ thiếu nguồn lực. Chúng tôi sử dụng hệ thống truy cập văn bản tự động tiên tiến nhất (ATP) cho câu văn học dễ dàng và dễ dàng hơn các câu từ, sau đó được dịch ra bằng hai hệ thống truyền thống kênh Trung Quốc, truyền thống MTV từ điển (PBMT) và cục bộ thần kinh NMB (NMB). Chúng ta sẽ tìm hiểu ba viễn cảnh khác nhau để sử dụng ATF trong MTV: 1) với sự cung cấp gốc của ATF; (2) tự động lọc các câu với tỉ lệ thấp và ý nghĩa của các điểm bảo tồn; và (3) thực hiện một chỉnh sửa tay tối thiểu của kết xuất ATS. Những kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy sự cải thiện trong khả năng dịch chuyển bất kể kịch bản đã chọn, và sự khác biệt về thành công của ba viễn cảnh phụ thuộc vào phương pháp MTV (PBMT hay công ty NMT) để nâng cao khả năng dịch chuyển và chế biến sau đó.', 'bg': 'В тази работа се изследва възможността за използване на напълно автоматична система за опростяване на текста на английски език в машинния превод (МТ) за подобряване на превода му на език с недостатъчни ресурси. Използваме най-съвременната система за автоматично опростяване на текста (АТС) за лексично и синтактично опростяване на изходните изречения, които след това се превеждат с две най-съвременни английски-сръбски системи за МТ, фразовата МТ (ПБМТ) и невронната МТ (НМТ). Изследваме три различни сценария за използване на ОВД в МТ: (1) използване на суровата продукция на ОВД; (2) автоматично филтриране на изреченията с ниска граматичност и резултати за запазване на значението; и (3) извършване на минимална ръчна корекция на изхода от АВД. Нашите резултати показват подобрение в плавността на превода независимо от избрания сценарий, както и разлика в успеха на трите сценария в зависимост от използвания МТ подход (по отношение на подобряване на плавността на превода и следредакцията усилия.', 'hr': 'U ovom poslu istražujemo mogućnost upotrebe potpuno automatskog sustava pojednostavljanja teksta na engleskom izvoru u prevodu strojeva (MT) za poboljšanje prevoda na jezik pod resursom. Koristimo sistem automatskog pojednostavljanja teksta (ATS) stanja umjetnosti za leksički i sintaktički pojednostavljanje izvornih rečenica, koji se onda prevode sa dva stanja umjetnih engleskih na srpskih MT sustava, na frazi temeljenog MT (PBMT) i neuralnog MT (NMT). Istražujemo tri različita scenarija za upotrebu ATS-a u MT-u: (1) koristeći sirovu izlaz ATS-a; (2) automatski filtriranje rečenica s niskim gramatičkim rezultatima i značenjem očuvanja; i (3) izvršavajući minimalnu manualnu korekciju izlaza ATS-a. Naši rezultati pokazuju poboljšanje tečnosti prevoda bez obzira na odabrani scenario, i razliku uspjeha tri scenarija ovisno o pristupu MT-a koji se koristi (PBMT ili NMT) u pogledu poboljšanja tečnosti prevoda i posturednog napora.', 'nl': "In dit werk onderzoeken we de mogelijkheid om volautomatisch tekstvereenvoudigingssysteem te gebruiken op de Engelse bron in machine translation (MT) voor het verbeteren van de vertaling naar een taal met weinig middelen. We gebruiken het state-of-the-art automatische tekstvereenvoudiging (ATS) systeem voor lexicaal en syntactisch vereenvoudigen van bronzinnen, die vervolgens worden vertaald met twee state-of-the-art Engels-Servisch MT-systemen, het phrase-based MT (PBMT) en het neurale MT (NMT). We onderzoeken drie verschillende scenario's voor het gebruik van de ATS in MT: (1) met behulp van de ruwe output van de ATS; (2) automatisch filteren van zinnen met lage grammaticaliteit en betekenisbehoud scores; en (3) het uitvoeren van een minimale handmatige correctie van de ATS output. Onze resultaten tonen een verbetering van de vloeiende vertaling, ongeacht het gekozen scenario, en verschil in succes van de drie scenario's afhankelijk van de gebruikte MT-aanpak (PBMT of NMT) met betrekking tot het verbeteren van de vertaalvloeiende en post-editing inspanning.", 'da': 'I dette arbejde undersøger vi muligheden for at bruge fuldautomatisk tekstforenklingssystem på den engelske kilde i maskinoversættelse (MT) til at forbedre dens oversættelse til et underressourcesprog. Vi bruger det avancerede automatiske tekstforenklingssystem (ATS) til leksikisk og syntaktisk forenkling af kildesætninger, som derefter oversættes med to avancerede engelsk-serbiske MT-systemer, det sætningsbaserede MT (PBMT) og det neurale MT (NMT). Vi undersøger tre forskellige scenarier for brug af ATS i MT: (1) ved hjælp af den rå output af ATS; (2) automatisk filtrering af sætninger med lav grammaticalitet og betydning bevarelse scores og (3) udføre en minimal manuel korrektion af ATS-udgangen. Vores resultater viser en forbedring af oversættelsens flydende oversættelse uanset det valgte scenario, og forskel i succes for de tre scenarier afhængigt af den anvendte MT-tilgang (PBMT eller NMT) med hensyn til at forbedre oversættelsens flydende oversættelse og efterredigeringsindsatsen.', 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir die Möglichkeit der Verwendung eines vollautomatischen Textvereinfachungssystems auf der englischen Quelle in maschineller Übersetzung (MT) zur Verbesserung der Übersetzung in eine unzureichende Sprache. Zur lexikalischen und syntaktischen Vereinfachung von Ausgangssätzen verwenden wir das hochmoderne automatische Textvereinfachungssystem (ATS), das mit zwei hochmodernen Englisch-Serbisch-MT-Systemen übersetzt wird, dem phrasenbasierten MT (PBMT) und dem neuronalen MT (NMT). Wir untersuchen drei verschiedene Szenarien für die Verwendung des ATS in MT: (1) Verwendung der Rohausgabe des ATS; (2) automatisch die Sätze mit geringer Grammatik und Bedeutungserhaltung herausfiltern; und (3) eine minimale manuelle Korrektur des ATS-Ausgangs durchführen. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen eine Verbesserung der Übersetzungsflüssigkeit unabhängig vom gewählten Szenario und einen Unterschied im Erfolg der drei Szenarien abhängig vom verwendeten MT-Ansatz (PBMT oder NMT) hinsichtlich der Verbesserung der Übersetzungsflüssigkeit und des Nachbearbeitungsaufwands.', 'id': 'Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menyelidiki kemungkinan menggunakan sistem penyimplifikasi teks sepenuhnya otomatis pada sumber Inggris dalam terjemahan mesin (MT) untuk meningkatkan terjemahannya ke bahasa yang tidak memiliki sumber daya. Kami menggunakan sistem penyimplifikasi teks otomatis (ATS) yang terbaik untuk menyederhanakan kalimat sumber secara lexik dan sintaks, yang kemudian diterjemahkan dengan dua sistem MT bahasa Inggris yang terbaik ke Serbia, MT yang berdasarkan frasa (PBMT) dan MT saraf (NMT). Kami mengeksplorasi tiga skenario yang berbeda untuk menggunakan ATS dalam MT: (1) menggunakan output raw dari ATS; (2) secara otomatis mengusir kalimat dengan gramatikal rendah dan artinya skor penyimpanan; dan (3) melakukan koreksi manual minimal dari keluaran ATS. Hasil kami menunjukkan peningkatan dalam keseluruhan terjemahan tidak peduli dari skenario yang dipilih, dan perbedaan dalam kesuksesan dari tiga skenario tergantung pada pendekatan MT yang digunakan (PBMT atau NMT) berkaitan dengan peningkatan keseluruhan terjemahan dan usaha post-edisi.', 'fa': 'در این کار، ما احتمال استفاده از سیستم ساده\u200cسازی متن کاملاً از منبع انگلیسی در ترجمه ماشین (MT) برای توسعه ترجمه\u200cاش به زبان زیر منابع تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما از سیستم ساده\u200cسازی متن اتوماتیک (ATS) استفاده می\u200cکنیم برای جمله\u200cهای منبع الکتریکی و سنتاکتریکی ساده\u200cسازی، که بعدش با دو سیستم\u200cهای MT انگلیسی به سربی، MT (PBMT) و MT عصبی (NMT) ترجمه می\u200cشوند. ما سه سناریو متفاوت را برای استفاده از ATS در MT تحقیق می کنیم: (۱) از استفاده از نتیجه خاکستری ATS استفاده می کنیم. (2) به طور خودکار جمله\u200cها با نمونه\u200cهای گراماتیکی پایین و معنی حفاظت پایین را فیلتر می\u200cدهد. و (۳) یک اصلاح دستی کمینه از نتیجه ATS انجام می\u200cدهد. نتیجه\u200cهایمان به تغییر نحوه ترجمه\u200cای از سیناریو انتخاب شده، و تغییر در موفقیت سه سیناریو بستگی به طریق MT استفاده شده (PBMT یا NMT) در مورد تغییر فعالیت ترجمه و تلاش بعد از ویرایش را نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'ko': '이 작업에서 우리는 기계번역(MT)에서 영어 원본에 대해 전자동 텍스트 간소화 시스템을 사용할 가능성을 연구하여 자원이 부족한 언어로 번역하는 것을 개선했다.우리는 가장 선진적인 자동 텍스트 간소화(ATS) 시스템을 이용하여 원본 문장에 대해 어휘와 문법을 간소화한 다음에 두 가지 가장 선진적인 영어로 세르비아어 기계 번역 시스템, 즉 단어를 바탕으로 하는 기계 번역(PBMT)과 신경 기계 번역(NMT)을 번역한다.우리는 기계 번역에서 자동 테스트 시스템을 사용하는 세 가지 서로 다른 장면을 연구했다. (1) 자동 테스트 시스템의 원시 출력을 사용한다.(2) 문법과 의미 보존 점수가 낮은 문장을 자동으로 필터한다.(3) ATS 출력을 최소한의 수동으로 교정한다.우리의 연구 결과에 따르면 어떤 상황을 선택하든 번역의 유창성이 향상되었다. 세 가지 상황이 번역의 유창성과 후기 편집 작업의 성공률은 사용하는 기계 번역 방법(PBMT 또는 NMT)에 달려 있다.', 'sw': 'Katika kazi hii, tunachunguza uwezekano wa kutumia mfumo wa urahisi wa simu za mkononi katika vyanzo vya Kiingereza kwa kutafsiri mashine (MT) kwa kuboresha tafsiri yake kuwa lugha isiyo na rasilimali. Tunatumia mfumo wa urahisi wa maandishi ya sanaa (ATS) kwa lengo la lexico na kwa ushirikiano wa kuwezesha sentensi za vyanzo, ambazo zinatafsiriwa kwa hali mbili ya aina ya Kiingereza-hadi-Serbia MT, mfumo wa maneno anayeishi MT (PBMT) na MT (NMT). Tunapata mitazamo mitatu tofauti kwa kutumia ATS katika MT: (1) kwa kutumia matokeo mabaya ya ATS; (2) Kuchapisha kwa kujitegemea maneno hayo kwa ubora wa chini na maana ya vituo vya usalama; na kufanya uharibifu wa vifaa vidogo vya vifaa vya ATS. Our results show improvement in fluency of the translation regardless of the chosen scenario, and difference in success of the three scenarios depending on the MT approach used (PBMT or NMT) with regards to improving translation fluency and post-editing effort.', 'sq': 'Në këtë punë, ne hetojmë mundësinë e përdorimit të sistemit plotësisht automatik të thjeshtësimit të tekstit në burimin anglez në përkthimin e makinave (MT) për përmirësimin e përkthimit të tij në një gjuhë të pakufishme. Ne përdorim sistemin e thjeshtimit automatik të tekstit (ATS) në mënyrë lexike dhe sintaktike për thjeshtimin e fjalëve burimore, të cilat më pas përkthehen me dy sisteme MT të lartë angleze në serbe, MT të bazuar në fraza (PBMT) dhe MT neural (NMT). Ne eksplorojmë tre skenarë të ndryshme për përdorimin e ATS në MT: (1) përdorimin e prodhimit të papërdorur të ATS; (2) automatikisht filtrimin e fjalëve me pikë të ulëta grammatike dhe me kuptim të ruajtjes; and (3) performing a minimal manual correction of the ATS output.  Rezultatet tona tregojnë përmirësim në fluencën e përkthimit pavarësisht nga skenari i zgjedhur dhe dallimin në suksesin e tre skenarëve në varësi të metodës MT të përdorur (PBMT apo NMT) lidhur me përmirësimin e fluencës së përkthimit dhe përpjekjeve pas-editimit.', 'am': 'በዚህ ስራ፣ በንግግሊዝኛ ቋንቋ ላይ የጽሑፍ ቀላል ስርዓት በሙሉ ለመጠቀም እና ትርጓሜውን ወደ ታች-resource ቋንቋ ለመጠቀም እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የ-Art-state-of-art text simplification (ATS) system for lexically and syntactically simplified source sentences, which then translates with two state-of-the-art-to-Serbian MT systems, the phrase-based MT (PBMT) and the neural MT (NMT). በMT ውስጥ ATS ለመጠቀም ሦስት የተለየ ባሕላዊ ስናይኖች እንፈልጋለን:(1) የATS ጥሩ ውጤት በመጠቀም ነው:: (2) የውይይት ክፍሎች በጥቂት ግራማርነት እና ማህበረሰቢያ መጠቀሚያ መጠቀሚያ አጣራ (3) የATS ውጤት ማቀናጃ በጣም ትንሽ እጃን ማድረግ ነው፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን በተመረጠው ስዕይት ቢሆን ትርጓሜችን ማድረግ ያሳያል፣ የሦስቱ ስናታሪዮችን የድል ግንኙነት በማድረግ (PBMT ወይም NMT) በተጠቃሚ ትርጓሜ ፍላጎት እና በኋላ አስተካክል ፍላጎት በማድረግ ይታያል፡፡', 'tr': "Biz bu işde, maşynyň terjimesini (MT) iňlisçe çeşmelerinde (tekst) üstine ýeterlik diline geliştirmek üçin doly awtomatik metin esaslaşdyrma sistemasyny barlaýarys. Biz öz ýagtylygyň durumynda awtomatik metin bejermelerini (ATS) sistemini leksifik we sintaktik şekilde çeşmeleri ýeňlemek üçin ullanýarys. Sonra diňe iki möhüm iňlisçe-serbçe MT sistemleri bilen terjime edilýärler, frazede tabanly MT (PBMT) we neural MT (NMT). ATS'i MT'de ulanmak üçin üç dürli senaryony keşfetýäris: (1) ATS'iň setir çizgisini ulanarak; (2) sözleri düşük gramatik derejesi we maýyp goramak noktalary bilen otomatik süýşirýär; (3) ATS çizgisiniň iň kiçijek elimden düzeldirmek üçin ullanýar. Biziň netijelerimiz saýlanan senaryoň ýüzüne seredeniň terjime edilişiniň akyllygynyň ýokarylygyny görkezýär we üç senaryoň başarylygynyň (PBMT ýa NMT) golaýynyň (terjime edilişi) ýokarynda terjime edilişinde we ýene-de düzenlemek kynçylygynyň üstünligi barada", 'af': "In hierdie werk, ons ondersoek die moontlik om volledig outomatiese teks vereenvoudiging stelsel te gebruik op die Engelske bron in masjien vertaling (MT) vir die verbetering van sy vertaling in 'n ondersteunde taal. Ons gebruik die state-of-the-art automatiese teks vereenvoudiging (ATS) stelsel vir leksies en sintaksies vereenvoudiging bron setings, wat dan vertaal word met twee state-of-the-art Engels-to-Serbian MT stelsels, die frase-gebaseerde MT (PBMT) en die neurale MT (NMT). Ons exploreer drie verskillende scenarios vir gebruik van die ATS in MT: (1) gebruik die raai uitvoer van die ATS; (2) outomatiese filtering van die setnings met lae grammatiese en betekening van beveiligingspoeiers; en en (3) die uitvoer van 'n minimale hand korreksie van die ATS uitvoer. Ons resultate wys verbetering in fluiditeit van die vertaling ongeag van die gekose scenario en verskil in sukses van die drie scenarios afhang van die MT-toegang gebruik (PBMT of NMT) met betrekking na verbetering van vertaling fluiditeit en post-redigeering verskaf.", 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք հնարավորությունը օգտագործել ամբողջովին ավտոմատիկ տեքստի պարզաբանման համակարգը անգլերենի աղբյուրի մեքենայի թարգմանման (MT) համար, որպեսզի բարելավենք թարգմանությունը թերռեսու Մենք օգտագործում ենք ամենահետաքրքիր ավտոմատիկ տեքստի պարզաբանման (ATS) համակարգը լեքսիկական և սինտատիկ պարզաբանելու աղբյուրների նախադասությունների համար, որոնք հետո թարգմանվում են երկու ամենահետաքրքիր անգլերեն-սրբական MT համակարգով, արտահայտությամբ հիմնված MT (PBMT) և նյարդային MT (NMT). Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք MT-ում ATS-ի օգտագործման երեք տարբեր սցենարներ: (1) օգտագործելով ATS-ի արտադրությունը: (2) ավտոմատ ֆիլտրելով նախադասությունները ցածր գրամատիկականությամբ և իմաստով պահպանող գնահատականներով: և (3) ATS-ի արտադրության միմինալ ձեռքի ուղղություն կատարելու համար: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս թարգմանության ճկունության բարելավումը անկախ ընտրված սցենարից և հաջողության տարբերությունը, կախված MT մոտեցումից (PBMT կամ NMT), թարգմանության ճկունության բարելավման և խմբագրման հետագա ջանքերի հետ:', 'bn': 'এই কাজে আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয় টেক্সট স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ব্যবহার করার সম্ভাবনা অনুসন্ধান করি মেশিন অনুবাদ (এমটি) এর অনুবাদ অনুবাদের অনুবাদের অনুবাদ আমরা লেক্সিক্যালিকভাবে এবং সংস্কার করে সোর্সের শাস্তি সহজ করার জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে শিল্প-শিল্প-ইংরেজী থেকে সার্বিয়ান এমটি সিস্টেম, শব্দভিত্তিক এমটি(পিবিএমটি) এবং নিউরেল এম এমটি-এ ATS ব্যবহার করার জন্য আমরা তিনটি ভিন্ন ভিন্ন সিনেমা খুঁজে বের করি: (1) ATS এর ক্ষুদ্র আউটপুট ব্যবহার করে; (2) স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সংরক্ষণের সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত স্কোর দ্বারা বাণীগুলোকে ফিল্টার করা হবে; এবং (৩) ATS আউটপুটের নিম্নলিখিত সংশোধন করার জন্য। Our results show improvement in fluency of the translation regardless of the chosen scenario, and difference in success of the three scenarios depending on the MT approach used (PBMT or NMT) with regards to improving translation fluency and post-editing effort.', 'bs': 'U ovom poslu istražujemo mogućnost upotrebe potpuno automatskog sustava pojednostavljanja teksta na engleskom izvoru u prevodu mašine (MT) za poboljšanje prevoda na jezik pod resursom. Koristimo sistem automatskog pojednostavljanja teksta (ATS) stanja umjetnosti za leksički i sintaktički pojednostavljanje izvornih rečenica, koji se onda prevode sa dva stanja umjetnog engleskog na srpskog MT-a, na frazi baziranog MT (PBMT) i neuralnog MT (NMT). Istražujemo tri različita scenarija za korištenje ATS u MT: (1) korištenje sirovog izlaza ATS-a; (2) automatski filtriranje rečenica sa niskom gramatičnom i značenjem rezultata očuvanja; i (3) izvršavajući minimalnu manualnu korekciju izlaza ATS-a. Naši rezultati pokazuju poboljšanje tečnosti prevoda bez obzira na izabran scenario, i razliku u uspjehu tri scenarija ovisnosti o pristupu MT-a koji se koristi (PBMT ili NMT) u pogledu poboljšanja tečnosti prevoda i napora nakon editiranja.', 'az': 'Bu işdə, maşın çevirindəki İngiliz mənbəsinin (MT) məlumatını aşağı-qüsusiyyətli dilə təhsil etmək üçün tamamilə avtomatik metin təhsil sistemini istifadə etmək mümkünlüyünü incidirik. Biz sanatın vəziyyəti olaraq avtomatik metin oxuması (ATS) sistemini leksifik və sintaktik olaraq cümlələri oxumaq üçün istifadə edirik. Sonra bu cümlələri iki məlumat İngilizə-Serb MT sistemi ilə, fraza-tabanlı MT (PBMT) və neural MT (NMT) ilə çevirilir. MT-də ATS istifadə etmək üçün üç fərqli scenario keşif edirik: (2) cümlələri düşük qrammatik və məsələləri təhlükəsizliklə avtomatik filtrləyir; (3) ATS çıxışının minimal əlavə düzəltməsini təqdim edir. Sonuçlarımız seçilmiş senaryoya baxmayaraq, tercümə təsirlərinin təsirlərinin təsirlərini yaxşılaşdırmağını göstərir, və üç senaryoya müvəffəqiyyəti MT təsiri ilə (PBMT və NMT) istifadə edilən təsirlərin təsirlərini yaxşılaşdırmaq və post-editing çabalarına bağlı olaraq.', 'ca': "En aquest treball investigam la possibilitat d'utilitzar un sistema de simplificació completament automàtica del text sobre la font anglesa en traducció màquina (MT) per millorar la seva traducció a un llenguatge amb menys recursos. Utilitzem el sistema de simplificació automàtica del text (ATS) d'última generació per a simplificar lècsicament i sinàcticament les frases de font, que després es traduisen amb dos sistemes MT d'última generació anglesa a sèrbia, MT basat en frases (PBMT) i MT neural (NMT). Explorem tres escenaris diferents per utilitzar l'ATS en MT: (1) utilitzant la producció bruta del ATS; (2) filtrar automàticament les frases amb baixa gramàtica i significat de puntuació de conservació; i (3) fent una correcció manual mínima de la producció ATS. Els nostres resultats mostren millor la fluïtat de la traducció independentment de l'escenari escollit, i diferència en l'èxit de les tres escenaris segons l'enfocament MT utilitzat (PBMT o NMT) en relació a millorar la fluïtat de traducció i l'esforç post-edició.", 'cs': 'V této práci zkoumáme možnost využití plně automatického systému zjednodušení textu na anglickém zdroji v strojovém překladu (MT) pro zlepšení jeho překladu do nedostatečně vybaveného jazyka. Pro lexické a syntaktické zjednodušení zdrojových vět používáme nejmodernější systém automatického zjednodušení textu (ATS), které jsou následně přeloženy dvěma nejmodernějšími MT systémy z angličtiny do srbštiny, frázovým MT (PBMT) a neuronovým MT (NMT). Prozkoumáme tři různé scénáře pro použití ATS v MT: (1) pomocí surového výstupu ATS; (2) automatické odfiltrování vět s nízkou gramatičností a skóre zachování významu; a (3) provedení minimální ruční korekce ATS výstupu. Naše výsledky ukazují zlepšení plynulosti překladu bez ohledu na zvolený scénář a rozdíl v úspěchu tří scénářů v závislosti na použitém MT přístupu (PBMT nebo NMT) s ohledem na zlepšení plynulosti překladu a post editační úsilí.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös uurime võimalust kasutada täisautomaatset teksti lihtsustamise süsteemi inglise keeles masintõlkes (MT), et parandada selle tõlkimist vähese ressursiga keelde. Me kasutame kaasaegset automaatset teksti lihtsustamise süsteemi (ATS) leksikaalselt ja süntaktiliselt lihtsustamiseks alglauseid, mis tõlgitakse kahe kaasaegse inglise-serbia MT süsteemiga, fraasipõhise MT (PBMT) ja neuraalse MT (NMT). Me uurime kolme erinevat stsenaariumi lennuliiklussüsteemi kasutamiseks MTs: 1) lennuliiklussüsteemi toortoodangu kasutamine; (2) madala grammatilisuse ja tähenduse säilitamise skooriga lausete automaatne filtreerimine; ja 3) lennuliiklussüsteemi väljundi minimaalse käsitsi korrigeerimise teostamine. Meie tulemused näitavad tõlke sujuvuse paranemist olenemata valitud stsenaariumist ning kolme stsenaariumi edukuse erinevust sõltuvalt kasutatavast MT lähenemisviisist (PBMT või NMT) seoses tõlke sujuvuse parandamisega ja toimetamise järgse jõupingutusega.', 'fi': 'T채ss채 ty철ss채 tutkitaan mahdollisuutta k채ytt채채 t채ysin automaattista tekstin yksinkertaistamisj채rjestelm채채 englanninkielisess채 l채hdekoodissa konek채채nn철ksess채 (MT) k채채nn철ksen parantamiseksi vajaak채ytt철iselle kielelle. K채yt채mme viimeisint채 automaattista tekstin yksinkertaistamisj채rjestelm채채 (ATS) l채hdelauseiden lexikaaliseen ja syntaktiseen yksinkertaistamiseen, jotka k채채nnet채채n kahdella uusimmalla englannin-serbialaisella MT-j채rjestelm채ll채, fraasipohjaisella MT:ll채 (PBMT) ja neuraalisella MT:ll채 (NMT). Tutkimme kolmea eri skenaariota ATS:n k채ytt채miseksi MT:ss채: (1) ATS:n raakatuotannon k채ytt채minen; (2) suodattaa automaattisesti lauseet, joilla on alhainen kielioppisuus ja merkityksen s채ilyminen pisteet; ja (3) ATS-ulostulon manuaalisen korjauksen tekeminen mahdollisimman v채h채iseksi. Tuloksemme osoittavat, ett채 k채채nn철ksen sujuvuus paranee valitusta skenaariosta riippumatta, ja kolmen skenaarion onnistuminen riippuu k채ytetyst채 MT-l채hestymistavasta (PBMT tai NMT) k채채nn철ksen sujuvuuden parantamisessa ja j채lkimuokkauksessa.', 'jv': 'Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné ujian kapan kanggo nyenggap sistem Teks kang automatik kanggo nggawe Sistem Perancis kanggo tarjamahan (MT) kanggo nggawe tarjamahan kaya sistem sing nesaturan kanggo na langa sing bisa nesaturan. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem perusahaan seneng kalah-karo akeh gunakake gambar luwih lan seneng dipun-seneng kabèh seneng pisan, dadi wis dipolerané karo duruh sistem sing sampeyan ingles-karo-san MT, MT (PPNT) lan NMT. Awak dhéwé éntukno telu seneng sampeyan kanggo nggawe ATS nang MT (1) nggawe ngubah njeneng output ATS; (2) Ngawe Perintah sing dikondasar kelas nang nggambar kelas kuwi nggawe gerakan sing nyimpen;  Display routing Rejalaké awak dhéwé menyang dipuluhayo kanggo ngilanggar aturan anyar ing pancenar anyar tentang gak, lan mungkin langgar sampek karo hal sampek karo telu scenaro sing dipunangé karo hal dadi MT sing nambah (PPM T karo NMT) sing berarti piyé kanggo ngerasai kapan tanggal nggap tarjamahan lan ujak i cah-ujak.', 'he': 'בעבודה הזאת, אנו חוקרים את האפשרות להשתמש במערכת הפשטות טקסט אוטומטית לחלוטין על המקור האנגלית בתרגום מכונות (MT) כדי לשפר את התרגום שלה לשפה מתחת לשיעורים. אנו משתמשים במערכת ההפשטה הטקסטית האוטומטית המאוחרת (ATS) למשפטים המקורים הפשוטים באופן מלקסי וסינטקטי, אשר מתרגמים בעזרת שתי מערכות MT אנגלית-לסרבית המאוחרת, MT (PBMT) המבוססת על ביטויים והMT העצבית (NMT). אנו חוקרים שלושה תרחישים שונים להשתמש באטי.טי.אס. באטי.טי: (1) בשימוש בתוצאה ראשונה של האטי.טי.אס; (2) מסנן באופן אוטומטי את המשפטים עם נקודות גרמטיקה נמוכות ומשמרת משמעות; (3) לבצע תיקון ידני מינימלי של יציאת ATS. התוצאות שלנו מראות שיפור בשקט של התרגום ללא קשר לתרחיש הנבחר, וההבדל בהצלחה של שלושת התרחשים בהתאם לגישה MT השתמשת (PBMT או NMT) בנוגע לשיפור בשקט התרגום ומאמץ לאחר העורה.', 'ha': "Daga wannan aikin, munã ƙidãya ana iya amfani da shiryoyin matsayin farat ɗaya a kan sourcen Ingiriya cikin fassarar mashine (MT) dõmin ya ƙara fassararsa zuwa wata harshen-resource. Tuna amfani da halin-da-kunyar rubutun rubutu farat ɗaya (ATS) na yi amfani da shiryarwa na kwanan kwanan kwance da ke daidaita kwanan kwance, da kuma za'a fassara da su da biyu-state-of-the-art-the-art-English-to-Sarbiyan MT, da kalma-based MT (PBMT) da neural MT (NMT). Yana yin amfani da ATS cikin MT: (1) da zartar da ƙaramin ATS; @ action: button da ke samun shiryarwa da hannun da ke ƙaranci na ATS. Our results show improvement in fluency of the translation regardless of the chosen scenario, and difference in success of the three scenarios depending on the MT approach used (PBMT or NMT) with regards to improving translation fluency and post-editing effort.", 'sk': 'V tem delu raziskujemo možnost uporabe popolnoma avtomatskega sistema za poenostavitev besedila na angleškem viru v strojnem prevodu (MT) za izboljšanje njegovega prevoda v jezik s premalo virov. Uporabljamo najsodobnejši sistem avtomatske poenostavitve besedila (ATS) za leksikalno in sintaktično poenostavitev izvornih stavkov, ki jih nato prevedemo z dvema najsodobnejšima angleško-srbskima MT sistemoma, fraznim MT (PBMT) in nevronskim MT (NMT). Proučujemo tri različne scenarije za uporabo ATS v MT: (1) uporaba surove proizvodnje ATS; (2) samodejno filtriranje stavkov z nizko slovničnostjo in rezultati ohranitve pomena; in (3) izvajanje minimalnega ročnega popravka izhoda ATS. Naši rezultati kažejo izboljšanje tekočega prevajanja ne glede na izbrani scenarij, razliko v uspehu treh scenarijev pa je odvisno od uporabljenega pristopa MT (PBMT ali NMT) v zvezi z izboljšanjem tekočega prevajanja in napora po urejanju.', 'bo': 'In this work, we investigate the possibility of using fully automatic text simplification system on the English source in machine translation (MT) to improve its translation into a under-resourced language. ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་ཡིག་གི་སྔོན་ལ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པ་ཡིན། We explore three different scenarios for using the ATS in MT: (1) using the raw output of the ATS; using the raw output of the ATS; (2) ཚིག་རྐང་ཕུད་ཀྱི་ཚིག and (3) performing a minimal manual correction of the ATS output. ང་ཚོའི་མཐོང་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་འདིའི་སྔོན་རྗེས་སུ་གཏན་ཟིན་པའི་དཔེ་གཞི་མེད་དུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་དང་གྲུབ་སྐྱོང་འདི་གསུམ་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཞི་ཚོགས་གསུམ་དག་གི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་མཐུ'}
{'en': 'Investigating Multilingual Abusive Language Detection : A Cautionary Tale', 'ar': 'التحقيق في اكتشاف اللغة المسيئة متعددة اللغات: قصة تحذيرية', 'fr': 'Enquête sur la détection des langues abusives dans plusieurs langues\xa0: une mise en garde', 'es': 'Investigación de la detección multilingüe del lenguaje abusivo: un cuento con moraleja', 'pt': 'Investigando a detecção de linguagem abusiva multilíngue: um conto de advertência', 'ja': '多言語虐待言語検出の調査：注意喚起', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी अपमानजनक भाषा का पता लगाने की जांच: एक चेतावनी की कहानी', 'zh': '勘多语言检测:一警示故事', 'ru': 'Изучение многоязычного оскорбительного языка: предостерегающий рассказ', 'ga': 'Ag Fiosrú Ilteangach Aimsithe Teanga Brath: Scéal Aireach', 'el': 'Διερεύνηση της πολύγλωσσης κατάχρησης γλωσσών ανίχνευσης: Μια προειδοποιητική ιστορία', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű visszaélő nyelv felismerése: egy óvatos mese', 'ka': 'Multilingual Abusive Language Detection: A Cautionary Tale', 'it': 'Indagine sul rilevamento multilingue di lingue abusive: un racconto cautelare', 'kk': 'Көптеген тілдерді табу: Ескерту журналы', 'mk': 'Истражување на мултијазични злоупотребни јазици: претпазлива приказна', 'lt': 'Daugiakalbio piktnaudžiavimo kalba nustatymo tyrimas: atsargus pasakojimas', 'ms': 'Menyelidiki Pengesanan Bahasa Abusif Berbahasa: Sebuah Kisah Awas', 'ml': 'പല ഭാഷ അബുസിവ് ഭാഷ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Investigating Multilingual Abusive Language Detection: A Cautionary Tale', 'mn': 'Ихэнх хэлний зөрчилдөөн хэл олон судалгаа: Хэрэглэгч түүх', 'no': 'Oppdaging av fleirspråk abosive språk: ein varslingstale', 'pl': 'Badanie wielojęzycznego nadużywania języka wykrywania: opowieść ostrożna', 'ro': 'Investigarea detectării limbajului abuziv multilingv: o poveste de precauție', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් අවශ්\u200dය භාෂාව හොයාගන්න', 'sr': 'Istraživanje višejezičkog nadmašivanja jezika: oprezna priča', 'so': 'Baaritaanka luqada ee noocyada badan: Hadal kalsooni ah', 'sv': 'Utredning av flerspråkigt missbruk av språk upptäckt: En försiktig berättelse', 'ta': 'பல மொழி குறிப்பு மொழி கண்டுபிடிப்பு: ஒரு எச்சரிக்கையான பேச்சு', 'ur': 'Multilingual Abusive Language Detection: A Cautionary Tale', 'uz': 'Investigating Multilingual Abusive Language Detection: A Cautionary Tale', 'vi': 'Điều tra ngôn ngữ lạm dụng đa ngôn ngữ: Một câu chuyện bí ẩn', 'nl': 'Onderzoek naar meertalige misbruikende taaldetectie: een waarschuwingsverhaal', 'hr': 'Istraživanje višejezičkog otkrivanja abuzivnog jezika: oprezna priča', 'de': 'Untersuchung mehrsprachiger missbräuchlicher Spracherkennung: Eine Warnung', 'id': 'Menyelidiki Bahasa Abusif Berbahasa Deteksi: Sebuah Kisah Perawatan', 'da': 'Undersøgelse af flersproget misbrug af sprogregistrering: En advarselsfortælling', 'bg': 'Разследване на многоезични злоупотреби с езика: предупредителна приказка', 'sw': 'Kuchunguza Utafiti wa Lugha za Kilugha za Kihisia: Hotuba ya Kitahadhari', 'fa': 'تحقیق کشف زبانهای زیادی زبان: یک داستان محافظت', 'tr': 'Çoklu dillerden boýunça diller gözleme', 'ko': '다중 언어 남용 언어 탐지 조사: 경고 이야기', 'am': 'ቋንቋዎች', 'hy': 'Հետազոտությունը բազմալեզվով բռնելի լեզվի հայտնաբերումը. զգուշական պատմություն', 'az': '√áoxlu dil istifad…ô edil…ôn dil keŇüfini araŇüdńĪrma: Qoruyan hekay…ôsi', 'af': 'Voorskou van Multilingual Abusive Taal Opdekking: √¢¬Ä¬ôn Waarskuwingstorie', 'bn': 'অনেক ভাষার অভিভাষা সনাক্ত করা হচ্ছে: সাবধানী কথা', 'sq': 'Hetimi i gjuhës shumëgjuhësore abuzive: një tregim i kujdesshëm', 'bs': 'Istraživanje višejezičkog otkrivanja abuzivnog jezika: oprezna priča', 'ca': 'Investigating Multilingual Abusive Language Detection: A Cautionary Tale', 'cs': 'Vyšetřování vícejazyčného zneužívání jazyka detekce: varovný příběh', 'et': 'Mitmekeelse kuritarvitava keele tuvastamise uurimine: ettevaatlik lugu', 'fi': 'Monikielisen väärinkäytöksen tutkiminen: Varovainen tarina', 'jv': 'Multiple language', 'sk': 'Raziskovanje večjezičnega zlorabljanja jezika: previdna zgodba', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'חוקר שפת מועללת רבות שפות: סיפור זהירות', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་གཙང་ཅན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་བལྟས་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་། སྨྲ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་Tale'}
{'en': 'Abusive language detection has received much attention in the last years, and recent approaches perform the task in a number of different languages. We investigate which factors have an effect on multilingual settings, focusing on the compatibility of data and annotations. In the current paper, we focus on English and German. Our findings show large differences in performance between the two languages. We find that the best performance is achieved by different classification algorithms. Sampling to address class imbalance issues is detrimental for German and beneficial for English. The only similarity that we find is that neither data set shows clear topics when we compare the results of topic modeling to the gold standard. Based on our findings, we can conclude that a multilingual optimization of classifiers is not possible even in settings where comparable data sets are used.', 'ar': 'حظي اكتشاف اللغة المسيئة باهتمام كبير في السنوات الماضية ، وتؤدي الأساليب الحديثة المهمة بعدد من اللغات المختلفة. نحن نحقق في العوامل التي لها تأثير على الإعدادات متعددة اللغات ، مع التركيز على توافق البيانات والتعليقات التوضيحية. في الورقة الحالية ، نركز على اللغة الإنجليزية والألمانية. تظهر النتائج التي توصلنا إليها اختلافات كبيرة في الأداء بين اللغتين. نجد أن أفضل أداء يتم تحقيقه من خلال خوارزميات التصنيف المختلفة. أخذ العينات لمعالجة مشاكل عدم التوازن الطبقي ضار باللغة الألمانية ومفيد للغة الإنجليزية. التشابه الوحيد الذي نجده هو أنه لا توجد مجموعة بيانات تعرض موضوعات واضحة عندما نقارن نتائج نمذجة الموضوع بالمعيار الذهبي. بناءً على النتائج التي توصلنا إليها ، يمكننا أن نستنتج أن تحسين المصنفات بلغات متعددة غير ممكن حتى في الإعدادات التي يتم فيها استخدام مجموعات البيانات القابلة للمقارنة.', 'pt': 'A detecção de linguagem abusiva tem recebido muita atenção nos últimos anos, e abordagens recentes realizam a tarefa em vários idiomas diferentes. Investigamos quais fatores afetam as configurações multilíngues, com foco na compatibilidade de dados e anotações. No artigo atual, focamos em inglês e alemão. Nossos resultados mostram grandes diferenças no desempenho entre as duas línguas. Descobrimos que o melhor desempenho é alcançado por diferentes algoritmos de classificação. A amostragem para resolver problemas de desequilíbrio de classe é prejudicial para o alemão e benéfica para o inglês. A única semelhança que encontramos é que nenhum dos conjuntos de dados mostra tópicos claros quando comparamos os resultados da modelagem de tópicos com o padrão-ouro. Com base em nossas descobertas, podemos concluir que uma otimização multilíngue de classificadores não é possível mesmo em ambientes onde são usados conjuntos de dados comparáveis.', 'es': 'La detección de lenguaje abusivo ha recibido mucha atención en los últimos años, y los enfoques recientes realizan la tarea en varios idiomas diferentes. Investigamos qué factores tienen un efecto en la configuración multilingüe, centrándonos en la compatibilidad de los datos y las anotaciones. En el documento actual, nos centramos en el inglés y el alemán. Nuestros hallazgos muestran grandes diferencias en el rendimiento entre los dos idiomas. Encontramos que el mejor rendimiento se logra mediante diferentes algoritmos de clasificación. El muestreo para abordar los problemas de desequilibrio de clases es perjudicial para el alemán y beneficioso para el inglés. La única similitud que encontramos es que ninguno de los conjuntos de datos muestra temas claros cuando comparamos los resultados del modelado de temas con el patrón oro. Basándonos en nuestros hallazgos, podemos concluir que una optimización multilingüe de los clasificadores no es posible ni siquiera en entornos en los que se utilizan conjuntos de datos comparables.', 'fr': "La détection de langage abusif a fait l'objet d'une grande attention ces dernières années, et les approches récentes permettent de réaliser cette tâche dans un certain nombre de langues différentes. Nous étudions quels facteurs ont une incidence sur les paramètres multilingues, en nous concentrant sur la compatibilité des données et des annotations. Dans le présent article, nous nous concentrons sur l'anglais et l'allemand. Nos résultats montrent de grandes différences de performance entre les deux langues. Nous constatons que les meilleures performances sont obtenues par différents algorithmes de classification. L'échantillonnage pour résoudre les problèmes de déséquilibre des classes est préjudiciable pour l'allemand et bénéfique pour l'anglais. La seule similitude que nous trouvons est qu'aucun des ensembles de données ne montre de sujets clairs lorsque nous comparons les résultats de la modélisation thématique à l'étalon-or. Sur la base de nos résultats, nous pouvons conclure qu'une optimisation multilingue des classificateurs n'est pas possible même dans des environnements où des ensembles de données comparables sont utilisés.", 'ja': '乱用言語検出は、過去数年間に多くの注目を浴びており、最近のアプローチでは、いくつかの異なる言語でタスクが実行されます。データと注釈の互換性に焦点を当てて、どの要因が多言語設定に影響を及ぼすかを調査します。現在の論文では、英語とドイツ語に焦点を当てている。私たちの調査結果は、2つの言語間のパフォーマンスの大きな違いを示しています。最高のパフォーマンスは、異なる分類アルゴリズムによって達成されることがわかります。クラスの不均衡問題に対処するためのサンプリングは、ドイツ語にとって有害であり、英語にとって有益である。唯一の類似点は、トピックモデリングの結果をゴールドスタンダードと比較すると、どちらのデータセットも明確なトピックを示さないことです。我々の調査結果に基づき、比較可能なデータセットが使用されている状況でも、分類子の多言語最適化は不可能であると結論づけることができる。', 'zh': '在昔数年,妄以语检见关注,近法以多种不同言行事。 按哪些因素多所损益,重点注数注之兼容性。 在本文中,专注英语德语。 臣等考结果表明,二语殊异。 我们看见,最佳性能是因不同的分类算法。 以抽样决之班级不平则害于德语,有益于英语。 所见唯一相似处,当以题建模较之黄金,二数集都无显题。 以吾观之,可得而论也,虽用可比数集,不可多言优化。', 'hi': 'अपमानजनक भाषा का पता लगाने ने पिछले वर्षों में बहुत ध्यान आकर्षित किया है, और हाल के दृष्टिकोण कई अलग-अलग भाषाओं में कार्य करते हैं। हम जांच करते हैं कि कौन से कारकों का बहुभाषी सेटिंग्स पर प्रभाव पड़ता है, जो डेटा और एनोटेशन की संगतता पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। वर्तमान पेपर में, हम अंग्रेजी और जर्मन पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हमारे निष्कर्ष दो भाषाओं के बीच प्रदर्शन में बड़े अंतर दिखाते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन विभिन्न वर्गीकरण एल्गोरिदम द्वारा प्राप्त किया जाता है। वर्ग असंतुलन के मुद्दों को संबोधित करने के लिए नमूनाकरण जर्मन के लिए हानिकारक है और अंग्रेजी के लिए फायदेमंद है। एकमात्र समानता जो हम पाते हैं वह यह है कि जब हम विषय मॉडलिंग के परिणामों की तुलना सोने के मानक से करते हैं तो न तो डेटा सेट स्पष्ट विषय दिखाता है। हमारे निष्कर्षों के आधार पर, हम यह निष्कर्ष निकाल सकते हैं कि क्लासिफायरका एक बहुभाषी अनुकूलन उन सेटिंग्स में भी संभव नहीं है जहां तुलनीय डेटा सेट का उपयोग किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'В последние годы большое внимание уделялось выявлению злоупотреблений языком, и последние подходы выполняют эту задачу на ряде различных языков. Мы исследуем, какие факторы влияют на многоязычные настройки, уделяя особое внимание совместимости данных и аннотаций. В настоящем документе мы сосредоточимся на английском и немецком языках. Наши выводы свидетельствуют о значительных различиях в производительности между двумя языками. Мы находим, что наилучшая производительность достигается различными алгоритмами классификации. Выборка для решения проблем классового дисбаланса вредна для немецкого языка и выгодна для английского. Единственное сходство, которое мы обнаруживаем, заключается в том, что ни один из наборов данных не показывает четких тем, когда мы сравниваем результаты моделирования тем с золотым стандартом. На основе наших выводов можно сделать вывод о том, что многоязычная оптимизация классификаторов невозможна даже в условиях, когда используются сопоставимые наборы данных.', 'ga': 'Tá go leor airde á tabhairt ar bhrath teanga anabaí le blianta beaga anuas, agus cuireann cuir chuige le déanaí an tasc i gcrích i roinnt teangacha éagsúla. Déanaimid imscrúdú ar na fachtóirí a mbíonn tionchar acu ar shuíomhanna ilteangacha, ag díriú ar chomhoiriúnacht sonraí agus nótaí. Sa pháipéar reatha, dírímid ar an mBéarla agus ar an nGearmáinis. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí difríochtaí móra i bhfeidhmíocht an dá theanga. Faighimid go mbaintear an fheidhmíocht is fearr amach trí halgartaim aicmithe éagsúla. Tá sampláil chun dul i ngleic le saincheisteanna éagothroime ranga díobhálach don Ghearmáinis agus tairbheach don Bhéarla. Is é an t-aon chosúlacht a fhaighimid ná nach léiríonn ceachtar den dá thacar sonraí topaicí soiléire nuair a dhéanaimid comparáid idir torthaí na samhaltú topaicí agus an caighdeán óir. Bunaithe ar ár dtorthaí, is féidir linn a thabhairt ar an tátal nach féidir leas iomlán a bhaint as aicmitheoirí ilteangacha fiú i suíomhanna ina n-úsáidtear tacair sonraí inchomparáide.', 'ka': 'აბუციური ენის განახლება ბოლო წლის განახლებაში მნიშვნელოვანია, და ბოლო მიღებები განსხვავებული ენების რაოდენობით დავაკეთებენ. ჩვენ განსხვავებთ, რომელიც ფაქტორები მრავალენგური პარამეტრებზე ეფექტი აქვს, რომელიც მონაცემების და ანოტაციების კონფიგურაციას დაყენება. მიმდინარე დოკუნეში ჩვენ ინგლისური და გერმანური დავუყენებთ. ჩვენი შესაძლებლობები გამოჩვენებენ ძალიან განსხვავებულება სამუშაო ენების შორის. ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ საუკეთესო პარამეტრები განსხვავებული კლასიფიკაციის ალგორიტებით მიიღება. გამოსახულება კლასის განმავლობის პრობლემების განმავლობისთვის გერმანეთისთვის და ბენექტიურად ინგლისურად დაკავშირებელია. ერთადერთი განსხვავებულობა, რომელიც ჩვენ აღმოვაჩინეთ, არის რომ არა მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია წარმოიდგინს თემები, როდესაც ჩვენ ტემისტის მოდელების შემდეგის და ჩვენი შესაძლებებიდან, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია დავწეროთ, რომ კლასიფიკაციის მრავალური ოპტიმიზაცია არ შესაძლებელია კონფიგურაციის შესაძლებელად კონფიგურაციაში, სადაც და', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση καταχρηστικών γλωσσών έχει λάβει μεγάλη προσοχή τα τελευταία χρόνια και οι πρόσφατες προσεγγίσεις εκτελούν το έργο σε διάφορες γλώσσες. Ερευνούμε ποιοι παράγοντες επηρεάζουν τις πολυγλωσσικές ρυθμίσεις, εστιάζοντας στη συμβατότητα των δεδομένων και των σχολίων. Στην παρούσα εργασία εστιάζουμε στην αγγλική και γερμανική γλώσσα. Τα ευρήματά μας δείχνουν μεγάλες διαφορές στην απόδοση μεταξύ των δύο γλωσσών. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι η καλύτερη απόδοση επιτυγχάνεται με διαφορετικούς αλγόριθμους ταξινόμησης. Η δειγματοληψία για την αντιμετώπιση προβλημάτων ταξικής ανισορροπίας είναι επιζήμια για τα γερμανικά και ευεργετική για τα αγγλικά. Η μόνη ομοιότητα που διαπιστώνουμε είναι ότι κανένα από τα δεδομένα δεν εμφανίζει σαφή θέματα όταν συγκρίνουμε τα αποτελέσματα της μοντελοποίησης θεμάτων με το χρυσό πρότυπο. Με βάση τα πορίσματά μας, μπορούμε να συμπεράνουμε ότι η πολύγλωσση βελτιστοποίηση των ταξινομητών δεν είναι δυνατή ακόμη και σε ρυθμίσεις όπου χρησιμοποιούνται συγκρίσιμα σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'hu': 'Az elmúlt években nagy figyelmet kapott a visszaélések felismerése, és a közelmúltbeli megközelítések számos különböző nyelven végzik el a feladatot. Vizsgáljuk, hogy mely tényezők befolyásolják a többnyelvű beállításokat, összpontosítva az adatok és a jegyzetek kompatibilitását. Jelen tanulmányban az angol és a német nyelvre összpontosítunk. Eredményeink nagy különbségeket mutatnak a két nyelv teljesítményében. Úgy találjuk, hogy a legjobb teljesítményt különböző osztályozási algoritmusokkal érjük el. Az osztályok egyensúlyhiánya problémáinak kezelésére szolgáló mintavétel káros a német számára és előnyös az angol nyelvre. Az egyetlen hasonlóság, amit találunk, hogy egyik adatkészlet sem mutat világos témákat, amikor összehasonlítjuk a téma modellezés eredményeit az arany szabvánnyal. Eredményeink alapján arra a következtetésre juthatunk, hogy az osztályozók többnyelvű optimalizálása még olyan beállításokban sem lehetséges, ahol hasonló adatkészleteket használnak.', 'it': "Il rilevamento abusivo del linguaggio ha ricevuto molta attenzione negli ultimi anni, e approcci recenti svolgono il compito in una serie di lingue diverse. Investighiamo quali fattori hanno un effetto sulle impostazioni multilingue, concentrandoci sulla compatibilità di dati e annotazioni. Nel presente articolo, ci concentriamo su inglese e tedesco. I nostri risultati mostrano grandi differenze di prestazioni tra le due lingue. Troviamo che le migliori prestazioni sono ottenute da diversi algoritmi di classificazione. Il campionamento per affrontare problemi di squilibrio di classe è dannoso per il tedesco e vantaggioso per l'inglese. L'unica somiglianza che troviamo è che nessuno dei due set di dati mostra argomenti chiari quando confrontiamo i risultati della modellazione degli argomenti con lo standard gold. Sulla base dei nostri risultati, possiamo concludere che un'ottimizzazione multilingue dei classificatori non è possibile anche in contesti in cui vengono utilizzati set di dati comparabili.", 'kk': 'Соңғы жылдарда бұл тілді табуға көп қызықты болды, және соңғы жағдайлар тапсырманы бірнеше тілде орындайды. Біз көптеген тіл параметрлерінің қай факторының әсері бар екенін зерттеп, деректер мен жазбалардың үйлесімділігіне көздеген. Қазіргі қағазда ағылшын және неміс тілдеріне назар аударып тұрмыз. Біздің іздегеніміз екі тіл арасындағы көп айырмашылығын көрсетеді. Басқа классификациялау алгоритмдерінің ең жақсы әрекеттері бар деп ойлаймыз. Класс дисбаланс мәселелерін шешу үшін үлгілеу неміс және ағылшынша үшін пайдаланушы қиын. Біз табуға жалғыз ұқсастығы - мәлімет баптауларының нәтижесін алтын стандарттың нәтижесіне салыстырып көрсетілмегені. Біздің табуымыздың негізінде, біз классификаторлардың көп тілді оптимизациясы қолданылатын деректер баптауларында да да мүмкін емес деп ойлаймыз.', 'lt': 'Per pastaruosius metus daug dėmesio buvo skiriama piktnaudžiavimo kalbomis nustatymui, o pastaruoju metu užduotis atliekama įvairiomis kalbomis. Mes tiriame, kurie veiksniai daro poveikį daugiakalbiams nustatymams, daugiausia dėmesio skiriant duomenų ir pastabų suderinamumui. Dabartiniame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriama anglų ir vokiečių kalboms. Mūsų išvados rodo didelius dviejų kalbų veiklos skirtumus. Matome, kad geriausias rezultatas pasiektas naudojant skirtingus klasifikavimo algoritmus. Bandinių ėmimas klasės disbalanso klausimams spręsti yra žalingas Vokietijai ir naudingas anglų kalbai. Vienintelis panašumas yra tas, kad nei duomenų rinkinyje nėra aiškių temų, palyginant temų modeliavimo rezultatus su aukso standartu. Remiantis mūsų išvadomis, galime daryti išvadą, kad klasifikatorių optimizavimas daugiakalbiu būdu neįmanomas net tais atvejais, kai naudojami palyginami duomenų rinkiniai.', 'mk': 'Abusive language detection has received much attention in the last years, and recent approaches perform the task in a number of different languages.  Истражуваме кои фактори имаат влијание на мултијазичните поставувања, фокусирајќи се на компатибилноста на податоците и анотациите. Во сегашниот весник, се фокусираме на англиски и германски. Нашите откритија покажуваат големи разлики во изведувањето помеѓу двата јазици. Најдобрата резултат е постигната со различни класификациски алгоритми. Sampling to address class imbalance issues is detrimental for German and beneficial for English.  Единствената сличност која ја пронајдовме е дека ниту пакетот на податоци не покажува јасни теми кога ги споредуваме резултатите од моделирањето на темата со златниот стандард. На основа на нашите откритија, можеме да заклучиме дека мултијазичката оптимизација на класификаторите не е можна дури и во поставувања каде се користат споредливи податоци.', 'mt': 'L-iskoperta abbużiva tal-lingwi rċeviet ħafna attenzjoni f’dawn l-a ħħar snin, u approċċi reċenti jwettqu l-kompitu f’għadd ta’ lingwi differenti. Aħna ninvestigaw liema fatturi għandhom effett fuq l-ambjenti multilingwi, b’enfasi fuq il-kompatibbiltà tad-dejta u l-annotazzjonijiet. Fid-dokument attwali, niffokaw fuq l-Ingliż u l-Ġermaniż. Is-sejbiet tagħna juru differenzi kbar fil-prestazzjoni bejn iż-żewġ lingwi. Issibu li l-aħjar prestazzjoni tinkiseb permezz ta’ algoritmi ta’ klassifikazzjoni differenti. It-teħid ta’ kampjuni biex jiġu indirizzati kwistjonijiet ta’ żbilanċ tal-klassi huwa ta’ detriment għall-Ġermaniż u ta’ benefiċċju għall-Ingliż. L-unika similarità li nsibu hija li l-ebda sett ta’ dejta ma juri suġġetti ċari meta nqabblu r-riżultati tal-mudellar ta’ suġġetti mal-istandard tad-deheb. Based on our findings, we can conclude that a multilingual optimization of classifiers is not possible even in settings where comparable data sets are used.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan bahasa yang mengganggu telah menerima banyak perhatian dalam tahun-tahun terakhir, dan pendekatan baru-baru ini melakukan tugas dalam beberapa bahasa yang berbeza. Kami menyelidiki faktor mana yang mempunyai kesan pada tetapan berbilang bahasa, fokus pada kompatibilitas data dan anotasi. Dalam kertas semasa, kita fokus pada bahasa Inggeris dan Jerman. Kesemuan kita menunjukkan perbezaan besar dalam prestasi antara dua bahasa. We find that the best performance is achieved by different classification algorithms.  Sampel untuk mengatasi masalah ketidakseimbangan kelas merugikan bagi Jerman dan bermanfaat bagi bahasa Inggeris. Satu-satunya persamaan yang kita jumpa ialah tiada set data menunjukkan topik yang jelas apabila kita membandingkan hasil pemodelan topik dengan piawai emas. Berdasarkan penemuan kita, kita boleh mengakhiri bahawa pemoptimasi berbilang bahasa bagi pengklasifikasi tidak mungkin walaupun dalam tetapan di mana set data yang boleh dibandingkan digunakan.', 'ml': 'കഴിഞ്ഞ വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d അബുസിവ് ഭാഷ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് വളരെ ശ്രദ്ധ കൈക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അടുത്ത സമ്മാനങ്ങള്\u200d പല ഭ പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രഭാവം നമ്മള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. വിവരങ്ങളുടെയും അഭിപ്രായത്തിന്റെയും  ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലും ജര്\u200dമ്മനിലും ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ കണ്ടുപിടികള്\u200d രണ്ടു ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d പ്രകടനത്തില്\u200d വലിയ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കും. വ്യത്യസ്ത ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d എത്തിയെന്ന് നമുക്ക്  ക്ലാസ്സിന്റെ അസാധുവില്ലാത്ത പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ഉദാഹരണമാണ് ജര്\u200dമ്മനിലേക്ക് പ്രയോജനമുള നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് ഒരേയൊരു പോലെയാണെന്നാല്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ സെറ്റ് വ്യക്തമായ പ്രമേയങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നില്ല. പ്രധാനപ്പ നമ്മുടെ കണ്ടുപിടികള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയരുടെ പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ മാന്ത്രികമാക്കുന', 'mn': 'Өнгөрсөн жилийн турш хүчирхийллийн хэлний оношлолт маш их анхаарал авсан. Сүүлийн арга баримтууд олон хэл дээр ажил хийдэг. Бид олон хэлний тохиолдолд ямар хүчин зүйлсийг нөлөөлдөг вэ гэдгийг судалж, өгөгдлийн болон нотолгоо холбоотой байдлыг анхаарч байна. Одоогийн цаасан дээр бид Англи, Герман дээр анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Бидний ололтууд хоёр хэл хоорондын үйл ажиллагаанд маш их ялгааг харуулдаг. Бид хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагааг өөр хэлбэрийн алгоритмын хувьд гаргадаг. Ангийнхээ тэгш байдлын асуудлыг зохицуулахын тулд жишээ нь Герман, Англи хэл дээр ашигтай. Бидний олж мэдсэн цорын ганц төстэй нь бид сэдвийн загварын үр дүнг алтын стандарттай харьцуулахад тодорхой сэдвүүд харагдахгүй. Бидний олж мэдсэн зүйлээс үндсэн нь олон хэлний хувьд хэлэлцэгчдийн эерэг үзүүлэлт хэрэглэгддэг тохиромжтой тохиромжтой тохиромжтой тохиромжтой байдлаар ч боломжгүй гэдгийг бид ит', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie nadużyć języków cieszyło się dużą uwagą w ostatnich latach, a ostatnie podejścia wykonują zadanie w wielu różnych językach. Badamy, jakie czynniki mają wpływ na ustawienia wielojęzyczne, koncentrując się na kompatybilności danych i adnotacji. W niniejszej pracy skupiamy się na angielskim i niemieckim. Nasze wyniki wskazują na duże różnice w wydajności między dwoma językami. Stwierdzamy, że najlepszą wydajność osiąga różne algorytmy klasyfikacji. Pobieranie próbek w celu rozwiązania problemów nierównowagi klasowej jest szkodliwe dla niemieckiego i korzystne dla angielskiego. Jedynym podobieństwem, jakie stwierdzimy, jest to, że żaden zbiór danych nie pokazuje jasnych tematów, gdy porównujemy wyniki modelowania tematów ze złotym standardem. Na podstawie naszych ustaleń możemy stwierdzić, że wielojęzyczna optymalizacja klasyfikatorów nie jest możliwa nawet w warunkach, w których stosuje się porównywalne zbiory danych.', 'no': 'Oppdaging av abusive språk har fått mykje oppmerksomhet i siste år, og nyleg tilnærmingar gjer oppgåva i mange ulike språk. Vi undersøker kva faktorer har ein effekt på fleirspråk innstillingar, som fokuserer på kompatibiliteten av data og notasjonar. I denne papiren fokuserer vi på engelsk og tysk. Finningane våre viser store forskjeller i utviklinga mellom dei to språka. Vi finn at det beste utviklinga er oppnådd av ulike klassifikasjonsgoritme. Sampling for å adressera klasseulingsproblemet er vanskeleg for tysk og nyttig for engelsk. Den eneste liknande som vi finn er at ingen data set viser klare emne når vi sammenliknar resultatet av temamodellering med gullstandaren. Basert på finningane våre kan vi avslutta at ein fleirspråk optimalisering av klassifikatorar er ikkje mulig sjølv i innstillingar der sammenlignbare datasett vert bruka.', 'ro': 'Detectarea abuzivă a limbajului a primit multă atenție în ultimii ani, iar abordările recente îndeplinesc sarcina într-o serie de limbi diferite. Investigăm care factori au un efect asupra setărilor multilingve, concentrându-ne pe compatibilitatea datelor și adnotărilor. În lucrarea actuală, ne concentrăm pe engleză și germană. Rezultatele noastre arată diferențe mari în performanță între cele două limbi. Considerăm că cea mai bună performanță este obținută prin diferiți algoritmi de clasificare. Eșantionarea pentru abordarea problemelor de dezechilibru de clasă este dăunătoare pentru germană și benefică pentru engleză. Singura asemănare pe care o găsim este că nici un set de date nu prezintă subiecte clare atunci când comparăm rezultatele modelării subiectelor cu standardul aur. Pe baza constatărilor noastre, putem concluziona că o optimizare multilingvă a clasificatorilor nu este posibilă chiar și în setările în care sunt utilizate seturi de date comparabile.', 'sr': 'Prošle godine je otkrivanje ugroženog jezika dobilo mnogo pažnje, i nedavni pristupi obavljaju zadatak na broju različitih jezika. Istražujemo koji faktori imaju uticaj na multijezičke postavke, fokusirajući se na kompatibilnost podataka i annotacija. U sadašnjoj novinama, fokusiramo se na engleski i nemački. Naši nalazi pokazuju velike razlike u izvedbi između dva jezika. Najbolji izvod je postignut različitim algoritmima klasifikacije. Uzorak za rješavanje problema sa klasom neravnoteža šteta je njemačkom i korisnom za engleski. Jedina sličnost koju pronađemo je da nijedan set podataka ne pokazuje jasne teme kada usporedimo rezultate modela teme sa zlatnim standardom. Na osnovu naših nalaza, možemo zaključiti da multijezička optimizacija klasifikatora nije moguća čak i u postavkama gde se koriste usporedbene sete podataka.', 'si': 'අන්තිම අවුරුද්දු වලින් භාෂාව හොයාගන්න ගොඩක් අවධානය ලැබුණා, අන්තිම අවධානයක් වෙනස් භාෂාව අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කොච්චර ප්\u200dරශ්ණයක් වගේ භාෂාවික සැකසුම් වලට ප්\u200dරශ්ණයක් තියෙන්නේ කියලා, දත්ත දැන් පැත්තේ අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ජර්මන් වල අවධානය කරනවා. අපේ හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් භාෂාවක් දෙකක් අතර විශාල වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන්. අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් විශේෂ අල්ගෝරිතම් වලින් හොඳම ප්\u200dරමාණය ලැබෙනවා කියලා. ප්\u200dරශ්ණ අන්තිමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට සැම්ප්ලිස් කරන්න ජර්මන් වලට අනතුරු වෙනවා ඇන්ග්\u200dරීසිය වලට අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් එකම වගේම තේරුම් සෙට් පැහැදිලි විදිහට පැහැදිලි විදිහට පැහැදිලි නැති විදිහට අපි විද අපේ හොයාගන්න පුළුවන්, අපිට පුළුවන් පුළුවන් විශේෂකයන් ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා තේරු', 'so': 'Sannadihii ugu dambeeyey waxaa la hubsaday baaritaanka luuqada ee rasmiga ah, waxaana soo dhowaaday inay shaqada ku sameeyaan luuqado kala duduwan. Waxaynu baaraynaa sababaha ay saameyn ku leeyihiin heerarka luuqadaha kala duduwan, oo ku kalsoonaynaa ku habboonaanta macluumaadka iyo dhibaatooyinka. Warqada hada ah, waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa Ingiriis iyo Jarmal. Faahritaankeenu waxay muujiyaan kala duwan oo ku saabsan tababarka labada luqadood dhexdooda. Waxaynu ognahay in tababarka ugu wanaagsan la soo gaadho kooxo kala duduwan. Tusaale ahaan loo isticmaalo dhibaatooyinka aan la qiimo karin fasalka waa wax dhibaato leh Jarmalka iyo faa’iido ku leh ingiriisiga. Isu eg marka aan helno waa in laguma muujiyo maadooyin caddaan markaynu isbarbardhigno resultinta mada tusaale ahaan standardka dahabka ah. Sida lagu saleyn karo arimahayaga, waxaynu ku dhameyn karnaa in qaabilaad luqad kala duduwan looma suurtogayn karo xittaa marka lagu isticmaalo koobabka macluumaadka u eg.', 'ta': 'Abusive language detection has received much attention in the last years, and recent approaches perform the task in a number of different languages.  நாம் எந்த காரணிகள் பல மொழி அமைப்புகளுக்கு விளைவுகள் இருக்கிறது, தகவல் மற்றும் குறிப்புகளுக்கு ஒப்புக்கொள்வதை கவனம தற்போதைய காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் ஜெர்மன் மீது கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம். எங்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்புகள் இரண்டு மொழிகளுக்கிடையில் பெரிய வேறுபாடுகளை காட்டுகிறது. வித்தியாசமான வகுப்பு படிப்புகளால் சிறந்த செயல்பாடு பெறுவதை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம். வகுப்பு சமமான பிரச்சனைகளை முகவரிப்பது ஜெர்மன் மற்றும் ஆங்கிலத்துக்கு பயனுள்ளது. நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கும் ஒரே சமம் என்னவென்றால் தகவல் அமைப்பு தெளிவான தலைப்பு எங்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்புகளை அடிப்படையில், நாங்கள் முடிவு செய்யலாம் பல வகுப்பாளர்களின் மேம்படுத்தல் அமைப்புகளில் ஒப்பிடும் தரவு அம', 'sv': 'Upptäckt av missbruksspråk har uppmärksammats mycket de senaste åren, och de senaste metoderna utför uppgiften på ett antal olika språk. Vi undersöker vilka faktorer som påverkar flerspråkiga inställningar, med fokus på kompatibiliteten mellan data och anteckningar. I den aktuella uppsatsen fokuserar vi på engelska och tyska. Våra resultat visar på stora skillnader i prestanda mellan de två språken. Vi finner att bästa prestanda uppnås genom olika klassificeringsalgoritmer. Provtagning för att hantera klassobalanser är skadligt för tyska och fördelaktigt för engelska. Den enda likheten som vi finner är att ingen av datauppsättningarna visar tydliga ämnen när vi jämför resultaten av ämnesmodellering med guldstandarden. Utifrån våra resultat kan vi dra slutsatsen att en flerspråkig optimering av klassificerare inte är möjlig ens i miljöer där jämförbara datauppsättningar används.', 'ur': 'پچھلے سالوں میں زیادہ توجه حاصل کی گئی ہے، اور اچھے طریقے سے کام کئی مختلف زبانوں میں کر رہے ہیں. ہم تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ کس فاکتوروں کو بہت سی زبان تنظیمات پر اثر دیتا ہے، ڈاکٹیوں اور انٹیٹیوں کی تعلقات پر تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے۔ ہم انگلیسی اور جرمنی پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں. ہماری پیدا کرنا دو زبانوں کے درمیان بہت بڑی اختلاف دکھاتا ہے۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ بہترین عملکرد مختلف قسمت الگوریتم سے پہنچ جاتی ہے۔ کلاس نابرالنس مسئلہ کے بارے میں نمونہ ڈالنے کے لئے جرمن اور انگلیسی کے لئے فائدہ اٹھانے والی ہے. ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ نہ ڈیٹ سٹ صاف موضوع دکھاتے ہیں جب ہم موضوع موڈلینگ کے نتیجے سونے استاندارد سے مقایسہ کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارے نتیجے پر بنیاد ہے، ہمیں معلوم ہو سکتا ہے کہ کلیسٹر کے متعدد زبان کی اچھی مثال بھی امکان نہیں ہے جہاں مقایسہ ڈیٹ سٹ استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Oxirgi yil ichida foydalanuvchi tilni ko'p paydo qiladi, va yaqinda ishni boshqa bir necha tillarda bajaradi. Biz ko'pchilik tili moslamalariga qo'llanmalar, maʼlumot va tadbirkorlik moslamalariga foydalanishni foydalanamiz. Joriy hujjatda, biz ingliz va Olmonchaga foydalanamiz. Bizning natijalarimiz ikki tillar orasidagi jarayonlarni ko'rsatadi. Biz o'ylaymiz, bir necha darajadagi darajalar orqali eng yaxshi bajarishni o'rganamiz. Sinfning balandligi muammolarini boshqarish uchun misol Olmoncha va ingliz tilidan foydali. Biz o'rganish uchun faqat huddi, ma'lumotlar mavzularni to ʻgʻri koʻrsatilmagan emas. Mavzuning natijalarini yuqori standardga kamaytirish mumkin. Biz natijalarimizga asoslangan, biz bir necha tildagi darajalarning ko'plab o'zgarishga imkoniyatlash imkoniyatini bajarishimiz mumkin. Agar bir xil maʼlumot moslamalari ishlatiladigan moslamalarda ham o'xshash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Phát hiện ngôn ngữ lạm dụng đã được chú ý nhiều trong những năm gần đây, và các phương pháp gần đây thực hiện nhiệm vụ này bằng nhiều ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Chúng tôi điều tra các yếu tố có tác động đến thiết lập đa dạng, tập trung vào sự tương hợp của dữ liệu và chú thích. Chúng tôi tập trung vào tiếng Anh và Đức. Những kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy sự khác biệt lớn trong khả năng hai ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi tìm thấy hiệu quả tốt nhất được đạt bằng các thuật toán phân loại khác nhau. Lấy mẫu để giải quyết vấn đề mất cân bằng lớp học là bất lợi cho người Đức và có lợi cho người Anh. Sự giống nhau duy nhất mà chúng tôi tìm thấy là cả hai bộ dữ liệu đều không cho thấy chủ đề rõ ràng khi chúng tôi so sánh kết quả của việc tạo mẫu về chủ đề với tiêu chuẩn vàng. Dựa trên những phát hiện của chúng tôi, chúng tôi có thể kết luận rằng tỉ mỉ phân loại không thể sử dụng được ngay cả trong các thiết lập có dữ liệu tương ứng.', 'bg': 'Откриването на злоупотреби с езика е получило голямо внимание през последните години и последните подходи изпълняват задачата на редица различни езици. Проучваме кои фактори оказват влияние върху многоезичните настройки, като се фокусираме върху съвместимостта на данните и анотациите. В настоящата статия се фокусираме върху английски и немски език. Нашите констатации показват големи разлики в ефективността между двата езика. Установяваме, че най-доброто представяне се постига чрез различни класификационни алгоритми. Вземането на проби за решаване на проблемите с дисбаланса на класовете е вредно за немския език и полезно за английския език. Единственото сходство, което откриваме е, че нито един набор от данни не показва ясни теми, когато сравняваме резултатите от моделирането на теми със златния стандарт. Въз основа на нашите констатации можем да заключим, че многоезична оптимизация на класификаторите не е възможна дори в настройки, където се използват сравними набори от данни.', 'nl': 'Misbruikelijke taaldetectie heeft de afgelopen jaren veel aandacht gekregen en recente benaderingen voeren de taak uit in een aantal verschillende talen. We onderzoeken welke factoren invloed hebben op meertalige instellingen, waarbij we ons richten op de compatibiliteit van data en annotaties. In dit artikel richten we ons op Engels en Duits. Onze bevindingen tonen grote verschillen in prestaties tussen de twee talen aan. We vinden dat de beste prestaties worden bereikt door verschillende classificatiealgoritmes. Sampling om problemen met het onevenwicht van klassen aan te pakken is schadelijk voor het Duits en gunstig voor het Engels. De enige overeenkomst die we vinden is dat geen enkele gegevensset duidelijke onderwerpen toont wanneer we de resultaten van topic modellering vergelijken met de gouden standaard. Op basis van onze bevindingen kunnen we concluderen dat een meertalige optimalisatie van classificatoren zelfs niet mogelijk is in omgevingen waar vergelijkbare datasets worden gebruikt.', 'da': 'Afsløring af misbrug af sprog har fået stor opmærksomhed i de seneste år, og de seneste tilgange udfører opgaven på en række forskellige sprog. Vi undersøger, hvilke faktorer der påvirker flersprogede indstillinger, med fokus på kompatibiliteten af data og annotationer. I den aktuelle artikel fokuserer vi på engelsk og tysk. Vores resultater viser store forskelle i ydeevne mellem de to sprog. Vi finder ud af, at den bedste ydeevne opnås ved hjælp af forskellige klassificeringsalgoritmer. Prøveudtagning for at løse problemer med klassebalancer er skadeligt for tysk og gavnligt for engelsk. Den eneste lighed, vi finder, er, at ingen af datasættene viser klare emner, når vi sammenligner resultaterne af emnemodellering med guldstandarden. På baggrund af vores resultater kan vi konkludere, at en flersproget optimering af klassificerere ikke er mulig selv i indstillinger, hvor sammenlignelige datasæt anvendes.', 'hr': 'Prošle godine je otkrivanje nadmažnog jezika dobilo mnogo pažnje, a nedavni pristupi obavljaju zadatak na broju različitih jezika. Istražujemo koji faktori imaju učinak na višejezičke postavke, fokusirajući se na kompatibilnost podataka i annotacija. U sadašnjoj novinama, fokusiramo se na engleski i njemački. Naši nalazi pokazuju velike razlike u provedbi između dva jezika. Najbolji učinkoviti postignu različiti klasifikacijski algoritmi. Uzorak za rješavanje pitanja razrednog neravnoteža štetan je njemačkim i korisnim za engleski. Jedina sličnost koju nađemo je da nijedan sastav podataka ne pokazuje jasne teme kada usporedimo rezultate modela teme sa zlatnim standardom. Na temelju naših nalaza, možemo zaključiti da multijezička optimizacija klasifikatora nije moguća čak i u postavkama gdje se koriste usporedbene sete podataka.', 'de': 'Die Erkennung missbräuchlicher Sprachen hat in den letzten Jahren viel Aufmerksamkeit erfahren, und neuere Ansätze erfüllen die Aufgabe in einer Reihe von verschiedenen Sprachen. Wir untersuchen, welche Faktoren Einfluss auf mehrsprachige Einstellungen haben, wobei wir uns auf die Kompatibilität von Daten und Anmerkungen konzentrieren. In der aktuellen Arbeit konzentrieren wir uns auf Englisch und Deutsch. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen große Leistungsunterschiede zwischen den beiden Sprachen. Wir stellen fest, dass die beste Leistung durch verschiedene Klassifizierungsalgorithmen erreicht wird. Sampling zur Behebung von Klassenungleichgewichten ist schädlich für Deutsch und vorteilhaft für Englisch. Die einzige Ähnlichkeit, die wir feststellen, ist, dass keiner der Datensätze klare Themen zeigt, wenn wir die Ergebnisse der Themenmodellierung mit dem Goldstandard vergleichen. Basierend auf unseren Erkenntnissen können wir schlussfolgern, dass eine mehrsprachige Optimierung von Klassifikatoren selbst in Umgebungen, in denen vergleichbare Datensätze verwendet werden, nicht möglich ist.', 'id': 'Deteksi bahasa abusif telah menerima banyak perhatian dalam tahun-tahun terakhir, dan pendekatan baru-baru ini melakukan tugas dalam beberapa bahasa yang berbeda. We investigate which factors have an effect on multilingual settings, focusing on the compatibility of data and annotations.  Dalam koran saat ini, kita fokus pada bahasa Inggris dan Jerman. Penemuan kami menunjukkan perbedaan besar dalam prestasi antara dua bahasa. Kami menemukan bahwa prestasi terbaik dicapai dengan algoritma klasifikasi yang berbeda. Sampel untuk mengatasi masalah ketidakseimbangan kelas merugikan Jerman dan berguna untuk Inggris. Satu-satunya persamaan yang kita temukan adalah bahwa tidak satupun set data menunjukkan topik yang jelas ketika kita membandingkan hasil dari model topik dengan standar emas. Berdasarkan penemuan kita, kita dapat menyimpulkan bahwa optimisasi multibahasa dari klasifikasi tidak mungkin bahkan dalam pengaturan di mana set data yang dibandingkan digunakan.', 'sw': 'Abusive language detection has received much attention in the last years, and recent approaches perform the task in a number of different languages.  Tunafanya uchunguzi ni sababu gani zina madhara ya mazingira ya lugha mbalimbali, wakijikita kwenye upatikanaji wa data na matatizo. Katika gazeti la sasa, tunalenga katika lugha ya Kiingereza na Kijerumani. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha tofauti kubwa katika utendaji kati ya lugha mbili. Tunafikiri kwamba utendaji bora unafanikiwa na vipengele tofauti vya usambazaji. Mfano wa kuelezea masuala ya usawa wa darasa ni madhara kwa Ujerumani na manufaa kwa Kiingereza. Jambo pekee tunalofanana ni kwamba hakuna seti ya taarifa zinaonyesha mada zilizo wazi pale tunapofananisha matokeo ya mada inayolinganisha na kiwango cha dhahabu. Kutokana na matokeo yetu, tunaweza kuhitimisha kuwa uwezekano wa lugha mbalimbali wa wataalamu hauwezekani hata katika mazingira ambayo seti za data zinazofanana hutumika.', 'ko': '과거 몇 년 동안 남용 언어 검출은 광범위한 관심을 받았고, 최근의 몇 가지 방법은 많은 다른 언어에서 이 임무를 완수했다.우리는 어떤 요소가 다중 언어 설정에 영향을 미치는지 조사했는데, 중점은 데이터와 주석의 호환성이다.현재의 논문에서 우리는 주로 영어와 독일어를 주목한다.우리의 연구 결과에 따르면 두 언어는 표현에 있어서 매우 큰 차이가 있다.우리는 서로 다른 분류 알고리즘을 통해 가장 좋은 성능을 얻을 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.계급 불균형 문제를 해결하기 위해 표본을 추출하는 것은 독일어에 해롭고 영어에 유익하다.우리가 발견한 유일한 유사점은 우리가 주제 모델링의 결과를 황금 표준과 비교했을 때 두 데이터 집합에 명확한 주제가 나타나지 않았다는 것이다.우리의 발견에 의하면 비교 가능한 데이터 집합을 사용하는 환경에서도 분류기를 다국어로 최적화할 수 없다는 결론을 얻을 수 있다.', 'fa': 'شناسایی زبانهای زیادی در سال گذشته توجه زیادی را دریافت کرده است و دسترسی اخیراً این کار را در تعداد زبانهای مختلف انجام می دهد. ما تحقیق می کنیم که کدام فعالیت بر تنظیمات های زیادی زبان تاثیر دارند، تمرکز می کنند بر تعامل داده ها و اظهار داده ها. در کاغذ فعلی، ما روی انگلیسی و آلمانی تمرکز می کنیم. پیدا کردن ما تفاوت های بزرگی بین دو زبان نشان می دهد. ما فهمیدیم که بهترین عملکرد توسط الگوریتم های مختلف به دست آورده می شود. نمونه\u200cبندی برای مشکلات نابرابری کلاس برای آلمانی و سودمندی برای انگلیسی است. تنها شبیه\u200cای که پیدا می\u200cکنیم این است که هیچ مجموعه داده\u200cای موضوع روشنی را نمایش نمی\u200cدهد وقتی نتایج مدل\u200cسازی موضوع را با استاندارد طلا مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. بر اساس نتیجه\u200cهایمان، می\u200cتوانیم تصمیم بگیریم که بهترین کردن چند زبان\u200cهای مختصات حتی در تنظیمات که مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای قابل مقایسه استفاده می\u200cشوند ممکن نیست.', 'af': "In die laaste jaar het Abusive taal-opdekking baie aandag ontvang, en onlangse toegang het die taak in 'n aantal verskillende tale uitvoer. Ons ondersoek watter faktore 'n effek het op veelvuldige instellings, fokus op die versoenbaarheid van data en notasies. In die huidige papier, fokus ons op Engels en Duits. Ons vindings vertoon groot verskil in uitvoering tussen die twee tale. Ons vind dat die beste prestasie deur verskillende klassifikasiealgoritme bereik word. Versteling om klas onbalanse probleme te adres is verkeerd vir Duits en voordeel vir Engels. Die enigste gelykenis wat ons vind is dat geen data stel duidelik onderwerpe vertoon nie wanneer ons die resultate van onderwerp modeling vergelyk word met die goue standaard. Ons kan uitsluit dat 'n veelvuldige optimalisasie van klassifiseerders nie moontlik is selfs in instellings waar vergelykbare data stelle gebruik word nie.", 'sq': 'Zbulimi i gjuhës abuzive ka marrë shumë vëmendje në vitet e fundit dhe qasjet e fundit kryejnë detyrën në një numër gjuhësh të ndryshme. Ne hetojmë se cilat faktorë kanë një ndikim në rregullimet shumëgjuhësore, duke u përqëndruar në kompatibilitetin e të dhënave dhe anotacioneve. Në gazetën aktuale, ne përqëndrohemi në anglisht dhe gjermanisht. Gjetjet tona tregojnë dallime të mëdha në performancën midis dy gjuhëve. Ne zbulojmë se performanca më e mirë arrihet me algoritme të ndryshme klasifikimi. Shembulli për të trajtuar çështjet e paekuilibrit të klasës është i dëmshëm për gjermanin dhe i dobishëm për anglishtin. E vetmja ngjashmëri që gjejmë është se asnjë grup i të dhënave nuk tregon temat e qarta kur i krahasojmë rezultatet e modelimit të temave me standartin e artë. Based on our findings, we can conclude that a multilingual optimization of classifiers is not possible even in settings where comparable data sets are used.', 'tr': 'Soňky ýyllarda dowam edilen diller tapylýar, we soňky golaýlary başga dillerde bu işi ýerine ýetirýär. Biz multi dil düzümleriniň üstine nähili faktörlerniň etkisi bar diýip soruşýarys. Maglumatlar we täzelikler üçin üns berýärler. Häzirki gazetde, iňlisçe we Almança diline üns berýäris. Biziň tapylyklarymyz iki dil arasynda etmäge dürli üýtgeşikleri görkeýär. Biz beýleki klasifikasiýa algoritmalary tarapyndan iň gowy ukyplygy tapýarys. Tägleriň imbalansyzlyk meselelerini çözmek nemesçe üçin örän nusgatly we iňlis dilinde kynçylykly. Tapdygymız diňe meňzeşlik bolsa, hiç hili maglumat takyky temalaryň netijesini altyn standarty bilen gurlaşdyryp bilmez. Çözgülerimize görä, klasifikatyň bir köp dilli optimizasy hem daýlar düzümlerinde mümkin däldir.', 'am': 'ባለፉት ዓመታት የቋንቋ ግጭት ብዙ ትኩረት ተቀብሎአል፣ የቀድሞው ደረጃዎች በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ ሥራውን እንዲያደርጉ ነው፡፡ ማንኛውም ምክንያት በብዙ ቋንቋ አካባቢዎች ላይ ጥያቄን እና የዳታ እና ማስታወቂያውን በመጠንቀቅ ላይ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በአሁኑ ገጾች ውስጥ እንግሊዘኛ እና ጀርመን ላይ እናቆማለን፡፡ ፍጥረታችን በሁለቱ ቋንቋዎች መካከል ብዙ ልዩነት ያሳያል፡፡ የበለጠ የሥርዓት ትርጉም በተለያዩ የክፍል አሌጎርት እንዲደርስ እናገኛለን፡፡ የክፍለ ዕውላቱን ለማቀናቀል ምሳሌ በጀርመን እና ለእንግሊዝኛ ጥቅም ነው፡፡ አንድ ምሳሌ ማግኘታችን ብቻ ነው፤ የዳታ ጉዳዮችን ማንም አይገልጥም፤ የመሬት ውጤቶችን ወደ ወርቅ standard ባስተካከል ነው፡፡ Based on our findings, we can conclude that a multilingual optimization of classifiers is not possible even in settings where comparable data sets are used.', 'az': 'Son il içində abusive dil keşfetməsi çox dikkati alındı, və son tərzlərin işləri müxtəlif dillərdə yerinə yetirirlər. Biz kimin faktörlərin çoxlu dil ayarlarına etkisi var, məlumatların və bildirişlərin uyğunluğuna odaqlanır. Şimdiki kağızda İngilizce və Almanca danışırıq. İki dil arasında böyük fərqli görünür. Biz ən yaxşı performans müxtəlif klasifikasiya algoritmi ilə başa düşər. Sınıf müəyyən etmə məsələlərini çəkmək üçün nümunə almaq Almanca və İngilizə faydalı olar. Gördüyümüz təkcə məlumat qurğuları altın standartlarına qarşılaşdırdığımız zaman, məlumat modelinin sonuçlarını açıq məlumatları göstərməlidir. Bizim tapındıqlarımıza görə, bir çoxlu dil klasifikatçıların optimizasiyası mümkün deyildir, hətta müəyyən edilən məlumat qurğularının istifadə ediləcəyi yerlərdə.', 'bn': 'গত বছরে বিভিন্ন ভাষার আবিষ্কারের প্রতি অনেক মনোযোগ পেয়েছে এবং সাম্প্রতিক ক্ষেত্রে বিভিন্ন ভাষায় কাজ করা হয়েছে। আমরা অনুসন্ধান করি কোন কারণে বহুভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর প্রভাব ফেলেছে, তথ্য এবং বিপর্যয়ের প্রতি মনোযোগ প্রদান করেছে। বর্তমান কাগজে আমরা ইংরেজি এবং জার্মানের উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি। আমাদের আবিস্কার দুই ভাষার মধ্যে প্রদর্শনের বিশাল পার্থক্য দেখায়। আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে ভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন শ্রেণীবিভাগ অ্যালগোরিদমের দ্বারা সবচেয়ে ভালো প্ ক্লাসের বৈষম্য নিয়ে কথা বলার উদাহরণ হচ্ছে জার্মান এবং ইংরেজীর জন্য সুবিধাজনক। একমাত্র সমতা যা আমরা খুঁজে পাই তা হলো যে তথ্য সেট পরিষ্কার বিষয়গুলো দেখায় না যখন আমরা সোনার স্ট্যান্ডারের সাথে বিষয়ের মডে আমাদের আবিস্কারের ভিত্তিতে আমরা উপসংহার করতে পারি যে বিভিন্ন ভাষায় বিভিন্ন ভাষায় ক্লাশিফারদের ক্ষেত্রে একটি বিশেষ সুবিধা', 'bs': 'Prošle godine je otkrivanje zlostavljenog jezika dobilo mnogo pažnje, a nedavni pristupi obavljaju zadatak na broju različitih jezika. Istražujemo koji faktori imaju utjecaj na multijezičke postavke, fokusirajući se na kompatibilnost podataka i annotacija. U sadašnjoj novinama, fokusiramo se na engleski i njemački. Naši nalazi pokazuju velike razlike u izvedbi između dva jezika. Najbolji izvod postigne različiti klasifikacijski algoritmi. Uzorak za rješavanje pitanja klase nelegalnosti štetan je njemačkim i korisnim za engleski. Jedina sličnost koju pronalazimo je da nijedan set podataka ne pokazuje jasne teme kada usporedimo rezultate modela teme sa zlatnim standardom. Na temelju naših nalaza, možemo zaključiti da multijezička optimizacija klasifikatora nije moguća čak i u postavkama gdje se koriste usporedbene sete podataka.', 'cs': 'Detekce zneužívajících jazyků získala v posledních letech velkou pozornost a nedávné přístupy plní tento úkol v řadě různých jazyků. Zkoumáme, které faktory mají vliv na vícejazyčná nastavení, se zaměřením na kompatibilitu dat a anotací. V aktuálním článku se zaměřujeme na angličtinu a němčinu. Naše zjištění ukazují velké rozdíly ve výkonu mezi oběma jazyky. Zjišťujeme, že nejlepšího výkonu dosahují různé klasifikační algoritmy. Výběr vzorků pro řešení problémů nerovnováhy tříd je škodlivý pro němčinu a přínosný pro angličtinu. Jedinou podobností, kterou zjišťujeme, je, že žádná datová sada neukazuje jasná témata, když porovnáme výsledky modelování témat se zlatým standardem. Na základě našich zjištění můžeme dojít k závěru, že vícejazyčná optimalizace klasifikátorů není možná ani v prostředí, kde se používají srovnatelné datové sady.', 'ca': "La detecció abusiva de llengües ha rebut molta atenció en els últims anys, i els enfocaments recents realitzen la tasca en moltes llengües diferents. Investiguem quins factors tenen efecte en les configuracions multilingües, centrant-nos en la compatibilitat de les dades i les anotacions. En el paper actual, ens centrem en anglès i alemany. Els nostres descobriments mostren grans diferències en el rendiment entre les dues llengües. We find that the best performance is achieved by different classification algorithms.  El recolliment de mostres per abordar problemes d'desequilibri de classe és perjudicial per a l'alemany i beneficiós per a l'anglès. L'única similitud que trobem és que cap conjunt de dades mostra temes clars quan comparem els resultats de la modelació de temes amb l'estàndard d'or. Sobre la base dels nostres descobriments, podem concluir que una optimització multilingüe dels classificadors no és possible fins i tot en entorns on s'utilitzen conjunts de dades comparables.", 'fi': 'Väärinkäytöksen havaitseminen on saanut paljon huomiota viime vuosina, ja viimeaikaiset lähestymistavat suorittavat tehtävän useilla eri kielillä. Tutkimme, mitkä tekijät vaikuttavat monikielisiin asetuksiin, keskittyen tietojen ja merkintöjen yhteensopivuuteen. Tässä artikkelissa keskitytään englanniksi ja saksaksi. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että näiden kahden kielen suorituskyvyssä on suuria eroja. Havaitsemme, että paras suorituskyky saavutetaan erilaisilla luokitusalgoritmeilla. Näytteenotto luokkaepätasapainoongelmien ratkaisemiseksi on haitallista saksalle ja hyödyllistä englannille. Ainoa samankaltaisuus on se, että kumpikaan aineisto ei näytä selkeitä aiheita vertailtaessa aihemallinnuksen tuloksia kultaiseen standardiin. Tulostemme perusteella voidaan päätellä, että luokittelijoiden monikielinen optimointi ei ole mahdollista edes tilanteissa, joissa käytetään vertailukelpoisia datakokonaisuuksia.', 'hy': 'Abusive language detection has received much attention in the last years, and recent approaches perform the task in a number of different languages.  Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե որոնք գործոնները ազդում են բազլեզու միջավայրին, կենտրոնացնելով տվյալների և annoտացիաների համատեղելիության վրա: Այսօրվա թղթի մեջ մենք կենտրոնանում ենք անգլերենի և գերմաներենի վրա: Մեր հայտնաբերությունները ցույց են տալիս երկու լեզուների միջև արտադրողության մեծ տարբերությունները: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ լավագույն արդյունքը հասնում է տարբեր դասակարգման ալգորիթմների միջոցով: Դասերի անհավասարակշռության խնդիրների լուծման նմուշները վնասավոր են գերմանացիներին և օգտակար են անգլերենին: Մենք պարզեցինք միակ նմանությունը այն է, որ ոչ մի տվյալների համակարգ չի ցույց տալիս պարզ թեմաներ, երբ մենք համեմատում ենք թեման մոդելավորման արդյունքները ոսկու ստանդարտի հետ: Հիմնվելով մեր հայտնաբերությունների վրա, մենք կարող ենք եզրակացնել, որ բազլեզվով օպտիմացման հնարավոր չէ դասակարգում նույնիսկ այն միջավայրում, որտեղ օգտագործվում են համեմատական տվյալների համակարգեր:', 'et': 'Kuritarvitav keele avastamine on viimastel aastatel pälvinud palju tähelepanu ja hiljutised lähenemisviisid täidavad seda ülesannet mitmes erinevas keeles. Uurime, millised tegurid mõjutavad mitmekeelseid sätteid, keskendudes andmete ja märkuste ühilduvusele. Käesolevas dokumendis keskendume inglise ja saksa keelele. Meie tulemused näitavad suurt erinevust nende kahe keele jõudluses. Leiame, et parim tulemus saavutatakse erinevate klassifitseerimisalgoritmide abil. Klasside tasakaalustamatuse probleemide lahendamiseks võetav valim on saksa keele jaoks kahjulik ja inglise keele jaoks kasulik. Ainus sarnasus, mida leiame, on see, et kumbki andmekogum ei näita selgeid teemasid, kui me võrdleme teemade modelleerimise tulemusi kuldstandardiga. Meie tulemuste põhjal võime järeldada, et klassifitseerijate mitmekeelne optimeerimine ei ole võimalik isegi seadistustes, kus kasutatakse võrreldavaid andmekogumeid.', 'ha': "Abusi na gane harshen na ƙayyade aiki mai yawa a cikin shekara na ƙarshe, kuma masu kwanan da suka sami aikin aiki a cikin wasu harshe dabam-daban. We investigate which factors have an effect on multilingual settings, focusing on the compatibility of data and annotations.  Ga karatun yanzu, munã fokus a kan Ingiriya da Jarmaya. FantayinMu na nuna diffaniki mai girma a tsakanin harshen biyu. Tuna gane cewa mafiya kyakkyawan aikin da ke sãmun algorisi dabam-dabam. Idan an yi misali da wa'adin matsayin balanci na fasalar, yana da wata cuta wa jeruman kuma yana da amfani wa Ingiriya. Tsarawa kawai da Muke sãmu, shi ne cẽwa ba za'a nuna madaidaita ba masu bayyanawa ba idan an sammenliki matsalan madaidaici da daidaita na zĩnãriya. Bai bincike da shiryoyinmu, za mu iya ƙara cewa, ko da wasu na'ura masu fasalin mulki-nau'i ba za'a iya iya ba, kõ dã a cikin daidaita masu daidaita danahan da za'a yi amfani da shi.", 'jv': 'deep Awak dhéwé ujaran karo pernik sing nggawe efek karo aturan luwih-luwih, ingkang dipoleh kanggo awak dhéwé karo ngono nggawe Nanging papat saiki, kéné dipontaké Inggris lan German. FindOK Anyone Sampling kanggo nganggep kuwi bareng-toleng kanggo kelas kuwi alaman kuwi nggawe Inggris barang apik. Pethuk sampeyan sing nggoleki ngono kuwi iki dadi ora bisa ditambah sing bisa pernik tema sing nyimpen winih Ngawe nang akeh-akeh sing dibutuhke, kita iso diwubah ngono perusahaan langkung sampeyan anyar tentang kanggo sampeyan data sing bisa nggawe', 'he': 'גילוי שפות מועללות קיבל תשומת לב רבה בשנים האחרונות, והגישות האחרונות מבצעות את המשימה במספר שפות שונות. אנו חוקרים איזה גורמים משפיעים על התקנות רבות שפות, מתמקדים בהתאימות של נתונים והציונים. בעיתון הנוכחי, אנחנו מתמקדים באנגלית וגרמנית. הממצאים שלנו מראים הבדלים גדולים בהופעה בין שתי השפות. אנחנו מוצאים שהביצועים הטובים ביותר מושגים על ידי אלגוריתמים מסווגים שונים. דוגמא כדי להתמודד עם בעיות אי-איזון בכיתה היא פגיעה לגרמנית ויעילה לאנגלית. The only similarity that we find is that neither data set shows clear topics when we compare the results of topic modeling to the gold standard.  בהתבסס על הממצאים שלנו, אנחנו יכולים להסכם כי אופטימיזציה רבת-שפותית של מסווגים אינה אפשרית אפילו במסדרות שבהן משתמשים קבוצות נתונים שווים.', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje zlorab jezika je v zadnjih letih prejelo veliko pozornosti, nedavni pristopi pa opravljajo nalogo v številnih različnih jezikih. Raziskujemo, kateri dejavniki vplivajo na večjezične nastavitve, s poudarkom na združljivosti podatkov in opomb. V tem članku se osredotočamo na angleščino in nemščino. Naše ugotovitve kažejo velike razlike v učinkovitosti med obema jezikoma. Ugotavljamo, da je najboljša zmogljivost dosežena z različnimi algoritmi klasifikacije. Vzorčenje za reševanje vprašanj neravnovesja razredov je škodljivo za nemščino in koristno za angleščino. Edina podobnost, ki jo ugotavljamo, je, da noben nabor podatkov ne kaže jasnih tem, ko primerjamo rezultate modeliranja teme z zlatim standardom. Na podlagi naših ugotovitev lahko sklepamo, da večjezična optimizacija klasifikatorjev ni mogoča niti v nastavitvah, kjer se uporabljajo primerljivi nabori podatkov.', 'bo': 'འདས་བའི་ལོ་ངོ་ནང་དུ་Abusive language detection་ནི་ལྟ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་དང་ཉེ་ཆར་ཡོད་པའི་approaches ང་ཚོས་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱས་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་སུ་དབུགས་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་ལ་གཏོང་ཞིབ་བྱེད། ང་ཚོས་ད་ལྟོའི་ཤོག་བུ་ནང་དུ་དབུལ་ཡིག་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེད། ང་ཚོའི་རྟོགས་པར་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་ཁྱད་པར་ཆེ་བའི་ཁྱད་པར་རེ་བ་མངོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་བ་སྟངས་དགའ་ཤོས་ཡོད་ཚད་མ་འདྲ་བ་དང་། དཔེ་དབྱིབས་དབྱེ་རིགས་དང་མི་རྐྱེན་ངང་ལེན་བྱེད་ནི་ཇར་མན་གྱི་ཉེན་བརྡན་དང་ དབྱིན་ཡིག་ལ་ཕན་ཚུལ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་ནུས་མེད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་མངོན་གསལ་བ་མིན་ན། ང་ཚོའི་བསམ་ཚུལ་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་དེ། དབྱེ་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྣ་མང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱས་མེད་པའི་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'SenZi : A Sentiment Analysis Lexicon for the Latinised Arabic (Arabizi)', 'ar': 'سنزي: معجم تحليل المشاعر للغة العربية اللاتينية (أرابيزي)', 'fr': "SenZi\xa0: Un lexique d'analyse des sentiments pour l'arabe latinisé (Arabizi)", 'es': 'SenZi: un léxico de análisis de sentimientos para el árabe latinizado (Arabizi)', 'pt': 'SenZi: Um Léxico de Análise de Sentimentos para o Árabe Latinizado (Arabizi)', 'ja': 'SenZi: A Sentiment Analysis Lexicon for the Latinized Arabic (Arabizi)', 'zh': 'SenZi:拉丁化阿拉伯语(Arabizi)析词典', 'hi': 'SenZi: लैटिनीकृत अरबी (Arabizi) के लिए एक भावना विश्लेषण शब्दकोश', 'ru': 'SenZi: A Sentiment Analysis Lexicon for the Latinized Arabic (Arabizi)', 'ga': 'SenZi: Foclóir Anailíse Mothúcháin don Araibis Laidineach (Arabais)', 'ka': 'SenZi: ლატინიზებული აპაბიური (აპაბიზი) სენტიმენტი ანალიზი ლექსიკონი', 'hu': 'SenZi: A Sentiment Analysis Lexikon for the Latinized Arabic (Arabizi)', 'el': 'Ένα λεξικό ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων για τα λατινικά Αραβικά (Αραμπίζι)', 'it': "SenZi: un lessico di analisi dei sentimenti per l'arabo latinizzato (Arabizi)", 'lt': 'SenZi: Sentiment Analysis Lexicon for Latin Arabic (Arabizi)', 'mk': 'Сензи: Лексикон за анализа на чувствата за латинизираниот арапски (арабизи)', 'kk': 'SenZi: Латиндиялық араб (Араб) синтиментті анализ лексикасы', 'ms': 'SenZi: A Sentiment Analysis Lexicon for the Latin Arabic (Arabizi)', 'mt': 'SenZi: Lexicon of Sentiment Analysis for the Latinised Arabic (Arabizi)', 'mn': 'SenZi: Латины Араб (Араб)', 'no': 'SenZi: Ein sentimentær analysesleksjon for latinisert arabisk (Arabisk)', 'ml': 'സെന്\u200dസി: ലാറ്റിനീസ് അറബിക്കുവേണ്ടി ഒരു സെന്റിമെന്റ് അന്യായം ലെക്സിക്കോണ്\u200d', 'pl': 'SenZi: Leksykon analizy sentymentów dla łacińskiego arabskiego (Arabizi)', 'ro': 'SenZi: Un Lexicon de analiză a sentimentelor pentru arabă latinizată (Arabizi)', 'si': 'SenZi: ලැටිනිස් අරාබියාව (අරාබිසි)', 'sr': 'SenZi: Leksion za sentimentnu analizu latinskog arapskog (Arapskog)', 'so': 'SenZi: A Sentiment Analysis Lexicon for the Latin Carabi (Arabic)', 'sv': 'SenZi: En känsloanalys Lexikon för latiniserade arabiska (Arabizi)', 'ur': 'سنزی: لاتینیڈ عربی (عربی) کے لئے ایک سنتیمنٹ تحلیل لکسیسون', 'ta': 'சென்சி: லெக்சிக்சியனுக்கான ஒரு உணர்வு விளக்கம் (அரபிய)', 'uz': 'SenZi: Latinik arab (Arabcha) uchun Sentiment Analysis Lekson (Sentiment Analysis)', 'vi': 'SenZi: Một bản đồ phân tích Lexicon cho người Ả Rập do thái (Ả Rập)', 'bg': 'Сензи: Лексикон за анализ на чувствата за латинизирания арабски (арабици)', 'nl': 'SenZi: Een Sentiment Analysis Lexicon voor het Latijnse Arabisch (Arabizi)', 'da': 'SenZi: En følelsesanalyse Lexikon for latiniseret arabisk (Arabizi)', 'hr': 'SenZi: Leksika sentimentalne analize za latinski arapski (Arabizi)', 'de': 'SenZi: Ein Sentiment Analysis Lexikon für das latinisierte Arabisch (Arabizi)', 'id': 'SenZi: A Sentiment Analysis Lexicon for the Latin Arabic (Arabizi)', 'ko': 'SenZi: 라틴 아랍어(Arabizi)의 감정 분석 어휘', 'fa': 'سنزی: یک تحلیل مجموعه برای عربی لاتینی (عربی)', 'sw': 'SenZi: Uchambuzi wa Seneti wa Lexico kwa Kiarabu cha Latini (Kiarabu)', 'tr': 'SenZi: Latinçe Arabça (Arabça)', 'af': "SenZi: 'n Sentiment Analysis Lexicon vir die Latiniseerde Arabiese (Arabiese)", 'sq': 'SenZi: Një leksikon për analizën e ndjenjave për arabishtin latinizuar (Arabizi)', 'am': 'ሲንዚ: ላቲንኛ ዐረብኛ (አረብኛ)', 'hy': 'Սենզի. Լատինիզացված արաբերենի (արաբիզի) զգացմունքների վերլուծության լեքսիկոնն է', 'bn': 'সেনজি: ল্যাটিনিশ আরবীর (আরবী) জন্য একটি সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণ লেক্সিকোন', 'az': 'SenZi: Latinçi Arapçalar üçün Sentiment Analysis Lexicon', 'bs': 'SenZi: Leksion sentimentalne analize za latinski arapski (Arabski)', 'et': 'SenZi: Sentimentide analüüsi leksikon latiniseeritud araabia keele jaoks (Arabizi)', 'cs': 'SenZi: Lexikon analýzy sentimentů pro latinizovanou arabštinu (Arabizi)', 'ca': "SenZi: Un Lexicó d'Anàlisi de Sentiments per l'àrab llatinitzat", 'fi': 'SenZi: Tunteanalyysi Lexicon latinalaisarabialle (Arabizi)', 'jv': 'SenSih: Sentiment', 'he': 'SenZi: לקסיקון ניתוח רגשות עבור הערבית הלטינית (Arabizi)', 'sk': 'SenZi: leksikon analize čustev za latinizirano arabščino (Arabizi)', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'SenZi:ལྷན་ཊིན་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐད་ཆེན་མཁན་གྱི་དབྱེ་སེལ་འཛིན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་ཅིག།'}
{'en': 'Arabizi is an informal written form of dialectal Arabic transcribed in Latin alphanumeric characters. It has a proven popularity on chat platforms and social media, yet it suffers from a severe lack of natural language processing (NLP) resources. As such, texts written in Arabizi are often disregarded in sentiment analysis tasks for Arabic. In this paper we describe the creation of a sentiment lexicon for Arabizi that was enriched with word embeddings. The result is a new Arabizi lexicon consisting of 11.3 K positive and 13.3 K negative words. We evaluated this lexicon by classifying the sentiment of Arabizi tweets achieving an F1-score of 0.72. We provide a detailed error analysis to present the challenges that impact the sentiment analysis of Arabizi.', 'ar': 'العربيزي هو شكل مكتوب غير رسمي للغة العربية اللهجة مكتوب بأحرف أبجدية رقمية لاتينية. أثبتت شعبيتها على منصات الدردشة ووسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ، لكنها تعاني من نقص حاد في موارد معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP). على هذا النحو ، غالبًا ما يتم تجاهل النصوص المكتوبة باللغة العربية في مهام تحليل المشاعر للغة العربية. في هذه الورقة نصف إنشاء معجم المشاعر للأرابيزي الذي تم إثرائه بالكلمات المزخرفة. وكانت النتيجة معجم عربيزي جديد يتكون من 11.3 ألف كلمة إيجابية و 13.3 ألف كلمة سلبية. قمنا بتقييم هذا المعجم من خلال تصنيف المشاعر في تغريدات أرابيزي وحققنا درجة F1 قدرها 0.72. نقدم تحليلاً مفصلاً للخطأ لعرض التحديات التي تؤثر على تحليل المشاعر في Arabizi.', 'fr': "L'arabizi est une forme écrite informelle de l'arabe dialectal transcrit en caractères alphanumériques latins. Il a fait ses preuves sur les plateformes de chat et les réseaux sociaux, mais il souffre d'un grave manque de ressources de traitement du langage naturel (NLP). Ainsi, les textes écrits en arabizi sont souvent ignorés dans les tâches d'analyse des sentiments en arabe. Dans cet article, nous décrivons la création d'un lexique des sentiments pour Arabizi qui a été enrichi par l'intégration de mots. Le résultat est un nouveau lexique Arabizi composé de 11,3 000 mots positifs et 13,3 000 mots négatifs. Nous avons évalué ce lexique en classant le sentiment des tweets d'Arabizi obtenant un score F1 de 0,72. Nous fournissons une analyse d'erreur détaillée pour présenter les défis qui ont un impact sur l'analyse des sentiments d'Arabizi.", 'es': 'Arabizi es una forma escrita informal del árabe dialectal transcrito en caracteres alfanuméricos latinos. Tiene una popularidad comprobada en las plataformas de chat y las redes sociales, pero sufre una grave falta de recursos de procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP). Como tal, los textos escritos en Arabizi a menudo no se tienen en cuenta en las tareas de análisis de sentimientos para el árabe. En este artículo describimos la creación de un léxico de sentimientos para Arabizi que se enriqueció con incrustaciones de palabras. El resultado es un nuevo léxico Arabizi que consta de 11,3 mil palabras positivas y 13,3 mil negativas. Evaluamos este léxico clasificando el sentimiento de los tuits de Arabizi con una puntuación de F1 de 0.72. Proporcionamos un análisis detallado de errores para presentar los desafíos que afectan el análisis de sentimientos de Arabizi.', 'pt': 'Arabizi é uma forma escrita informal de árabe dialetal transcrita em caracteres alfanuméricos latinos. Tem uma popularidade comprovada em plataformas de bate-papo e mídias sociais, mas sofre com uma grave falta de recursos de processamento de linguagem natural (NLP). Como tal, os textos escritos em arabizi são frequentemente desconsiderados nas tarefas de análise de sentimentos para o árabe. Neste artigo descrevemos a criação de um léxico de sentimentos para Arabizi que foi enriquecido com incorporação de palavras. O resultado é um novo léxico arabizi composto por 11,3 mil palavras positivas e 13,3 mil palavras negativas. Avaliamos esse léxico classificando o sentimento dos tweets Arabizi alcançando um F1-score de 0,72. Fornecemos uma análise detalhada de erros para apresentar os desafios que impactam a análise de sentimento de Arabizi.', 'ja': 'アラビジ（ Arabizi ）は、ラテン語の英数字で転写された方言アラビア語の非公式な書かれた形式である。チャットプラットフォームやソーシャルメディアで人気がありますが、自然言語処理（ NLP ）リソースが深刻に不足しています。そのため、アラビジ語で書かれた文章は、アラビア語の感情分析タスクでは無視されることが多い。この論文では、単語埋め込みで豊かになったアラビジのためのセンチメント辞書の作成について説明します。その結果、11.3Kの肯定的な単語と13.3Kの否定的な単語からなる新しいArabizi辞書が生まれました。私たちは、アラビジのツイートの感情を分類し、0.72のF 1スコアを達成することで、この語彙を評価しました。アラビジのセンチメント分析に影響を与える課題を提示するための詳細なエラー分析を提供します。', 'hi': 'अरबी लैटिन अल्फ़ान्यूमेरिक वर्णों में लिप्यंतरणित बोलचाल अरबी का एक अनौपचारिक लिखित रूप है। यह चैट प्लेटफार्मों और सोशल मीडिया पर एक सिद्ध लोकप्रियता है, फिर भी यह प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) संसाधनों की गंभीर कमी से ग्रस्त है। इस प्रकार, अरबीज़ी में लिखे गए ग्रंथों को अक्सर अरबी के लिए भावना विश्लेषण कार्यों में अनदेखा किया जाता है। इस पत्र में हम Arabizi के लिए एक भावना शब्दकोश के निर्माण का वर्णन करते हैं जो शब्द एम्बेडिंग के साथ समृद्ध था। परिणाम एक नया Arabizi शब्दकोश 11.3K सकारात्मक और 13.3K नकारात्मक शब्दों से मिलकर है। हमने 0.72 के एफ 1-स्कोर को प्राप्त करने वाले अरबिज़ी ट्वीट्स की भावना को वर्गीकृत करके इस शब्दकोश का मूल्यांकन किया। हम उन चुनौतियों को प्रस्तुत करने के लिए एक विस्तृत त्रुटि विश्लेषण प्रदान करते हैं जो अरबिज़ी की भावना विश्लेषण को प्रभावित करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Arabizi - это неформальная письменная форма диалектного арабского языка, транскрибируемая латинскими буквенно-цифровыми символами. Он имеет доказанную популярность на чат-платформах и в социальных сетях, но страдает от острой нехватки ресурсов для обработки естественного языка (NLP). Как таковые, тексты, написанные на арабском языке, часто игнорируются в задачах анализа настроений для арабского языка. В этой статье мы описываем создание лексикона настроений для арабизи, который был обогащен вложениями слов. Результатом является новый лексикон Arabizi, состоящий из 11,3 тыс. положительных и 13,3 тыс. отрицательных слов. Мы оценили этот лексикон, классифицировав настроения твитов Arabizi, достигнув показателя F1 0,72. Мы предоставляем подробный анализ ошибок, чтобы представить проблемы, которые влияют на анализ настроений Арабизи.', 'zh': 'Arabizi者,妄言阿拉伯语书面形式,以拉丁字母数字字符转录。 事实证明,甚受欢迎于聊天台社交媒体,而甚乏自然语言(NLP)资。 是以阿拉伯语情析任,阿拉比兹语文常忽。 本文中,述Arabizi创情词典,当词典嵌富。 一新之Arabizi词典,11.3K正词13.3K负字成之。 以Arabizi推文情质词典,推文F1为0.72。 臣等详之,以动Arabizi情。', 'ga': 'Is foirm scríofa neamhfhoirmiúil den Araibis chanúinteach é Arabizi a thras-scríobhtar i gcarachtar alfa-uimhriúla Laidine. Tá an-tóir air ar ardáin chomhrá agus ar na meáin shóisialta, ach tá fíor-easpa acmhainní próiseála teanga nádúrtha (NLP) aige. Mar sin, is minic a thugtar neamhaird ar théacsanna a scríobhtar in Arabizi i dtascanna anailíse meon don Araibis. Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid cur síos ar chruthú foclóir meon do Arabizi a bhí saibhrithe le leabaithe focal. Is é an toradh ná foclóir Arabizi nua comhdhéanta de 11.3K dearfach agus 13.3K focail diúltach. Rinneamar measúnú ar an bhfoclóir seo trí dhearcadh na dtvuíteanna Arabizi a bhain amach scór F1 de 0.72 a rangú. Cuirimid anailís mhionsonraithe earráide ar fáil chun na dúshláin a chuireann isteach ar an anailís dhearcadh ar Arabizi a chur i láthair.', 'el': 'Το Αραμπιζί είναι μια άτυπη γραπτή μορφή διαλεκτικής αραβικής μεταγραφής με λατινικούς αλφαριθμητικούς χαρακτήρες. Έχει αποδεδειγμένη δημοτικότητα στις πλατφόρμες συνομιλίας και στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης, ωστόσο πάσχει από σοβαρή έλλειψη πόρων επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Ως εκ τούτου, κείμενα γραμμένα στα αραβικά συχνά αγνοούνται στις εργασίες ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων για τα αραβικά. Στην παρούσα εργασία περιγράφουμε τη δημιουργία ενός λεξικού συναισθημάτων για το Αραμπίζι που εμπλουτίστηκε με ενσωμάτωση λέξεων. Το αποτέλεσμα είναι ένα νέο λεξικό που αποτελείται από 11.3Κ θετικές και 13.3Κ αρνητικές λέξεις. Αξιολογήσαμε αυτό το λεξικό ταξινομώντας το συναίσθημα των tweets Arabizi επιτυγχάνοντας βαθμολογία F1 0.72. Παρέχουμε μια λεπτομερή ανάλυση σφαλμάτων για να παρουσιάσουμε τις προκλήσεις που επηρεάζουν την ανάλυση συναισθημάτων του Arabizi.', 'hu': 'Az arabizi latin alfanumerikus karakterekkel átírt dialektuális arab formája. Bizonyított népszerűséggel rendelkezik a chat platformokon és a közösségi médiákon, mégis súlyos hiányában szenved a természetes nyelvi feldolgozás (NLP) erőforrások. Ilyen módon az arabizi nyelvű szövegeket gyakran figyelmen kívül hagyják az arab érzelmek elemzése során. Ebben a tanulmányban leírjuk az arabizi érzelmek lexikonjának létrehozását, amelyet szóbeágyazásokkal gazdagítottak. Az eredmény egy új arabizi lexikon, amely 11,3K pozitív és 13,3K negatív szavakból áll. Ezt a lexikont úgy értékeltük, hogy az Arabizi tweetek hangulatát osztályoztuk, és F1 pontszámot értünk el 0,72-re. Részletes hibaelemzést készítünk, hogy bemutassuk azokat a kihívásokat, amelyek hatással vannak az Arabizi hangulatelemzésére.', 'ka': 'აპაბიზი არის ინფორმალური დაწერული აპაბიური დიალექტალური ფორმა, რომელიც ლატინური ალტანუმერიური სიმბოლოებით დატანკრიბულია. ის მოწმებული პოლუბარიტება ფარატიური პლატატურები და სოციალური მედიაში, მაგრამ მას ძალიან ძალიან ნაირადი ენის პროცესის (NLP) რესურსიდან არსებობს. როგორც ასეთი, აპაბიზში წერილი ტექსტები ბევრად არაბიზიან სენტიმენტის ანალიზიციის დავალებაში. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ აღწერეთ აპაბიზისთვის სენტიმენტური ლექსიკონის შექმნა, რომელიც სიტყვებით შექმნა. Rezultāt არის ახალი აპაბიზი ლექსიკონი, რომელიც 11.3K პოტიფიკაციული და 13.3K-ის მინუს სიტყვებით შექმნა. ჩვენ ამ ლექსიკონის განსაზღვრებით, რომელიც აპაბიზის ტვიტების სენტიმენტი, რომელიც 0.72 წლის F1 წლის მიღებს. ჩვენ განვითავსებთ განსაზღვრებული შეცდომის ანალიზი, რომელიც აპაბიზის სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციას გააკეთებს.', 'it': "Arabizi è una forma scritta informale di arabo dialettale trascritta in caratteri alfanumerici latini. Ha una comprovata popolarità sulle piattaforme di chat e sui social media, ma soffre di una grave mancanza di risorse di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (NLP). Come tale, i testi scritti in Arabizi sono spesso trascurati nei compiti di analisi sentimentale per l'arabo. In questo articolo descriviamo la creazione di un lessico sentimentale per Arabizi che è stato arricchito con embedding di parole. Il risultato è un nuovo lessico Arabizi composto da 11.3K parole positive e 13.3K negative. Abbiamo valutato questo lessico classificando il sentiment dei tweet Arabizi ottenendo un punteggio F1 di 0,72. Forniamo un'analisi dettagliata degli errori per presentare le sfide che influenzano l'analisi del sentiment di Arabizi.", 'lt': 'Arabizi yra neoficiali parašyta dialektinės arabų forma, transkripta lotynų raidiniais raidiniais simboliais. Įrodyta, kad ji yra populiari pokalbių platformose ir socialinėje žiniasklaidoje, tačiau ji patiria didelį gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo (NLP) išteklių trūkumą. Todėl arabiškai parašyti tekstai dažnai neatsižvelgiami į arabiškai atliekamas jausmų analizės užduotis. Šiame dokumente apibūdiname jausmų lexikono kūrimą arabizui, kuris buvo praturtintas žodžių įdėjimu. Rezultatas yra naujas arabizų leksikonas, kurį sudaro 11,3K teigiami ir 13,3K neigiami žodžiai. Mes įvertinome šį tekstikoną klasifikuodami Arabizi tweetų jausmą, siekdami F1 taško 0,72. Mes pateikiame išsamią klaidų analizę, kad pristatytume iššūkius, kurie daro poveikį arabizi jausmų analizei.', 'mk': 'Арабизи е неформална напишана форма на дијалектална арапска транспишана на латински алфанумерички знаци. It has a proven popularity on chat platforms and social media, yet it suffers from a severe lack of natural language processing (NLP) resources.  Како такви, текстовите напишани на арабизи честопати се неземаат предвид во задачите за анализа на чувствата на арапскиот јазик. Во овој весник го опишуваме создавањето на лексикон за чувства за Арабизи кој беше богат со зборови вградени. The result is a new Arabizi lexicon consisting of 11.3K positive and 13.3K negative words.  Го проценивме овој лексикон класификувајќи го чувството на Арабизи твитови постигнувајќи резултат F1 од 0,72. Ние обезбедуваме детална анализа на грешките за да ги претставиме предизвиците кои влијаат на анализата на чувствата на Арабизи.', 'kk': 'Арабиз - латын алфанумерикалық таңбалармен аударылған диалекталық араб түрі. Бұл шарт платформасында және социалдық медиаға деген мәлімет бар, бірақ бұл табиғи тілдерді өңдеу (NLP) ресурстардың қиын жоқ. Бұл үшін Арабзида жазылған мәтіндер әдетте арабша сезімдік анализ тапсырмаларында байланысты болады. Бұл қағазда Араб үшін көңіл лексиканың құрылуын түсіндіреміз. Бұл сөздерді ендіру үшін бағатталған. Нәтижесі 11, 3K оң және 13, 3K негативті сөздердің жаңа Араб лексикасы. Біз бұл лексиканы 0,72 жылдық F1-нұсқасына жеткізген Арабизіңіздің түсініктерін классификациялау арқылы бағаладық. Біз Арабзияның сезімдік анализациясының әсерін көрсету үшін егжей- тегжейі қатені анализ береміз.', 'ms': 'ArabizName It has a proven popularity on chat platforms and social media, yet it suffers from a severe lack of natural language processing (NLP) resources.  Sebagai demikian, teks yang ditulis dalam bahasa Arabi sering diabaikan dalam tugas analisis perasaan untuk bahasa Arab. Dalam kertas ini kami menggambarkan ciptaan sebuah leksikon perasaan untuk Arabizi yang diperiksa dengan penyelesaian perkataan. Hasilnya ialah leksikon Arabizi baru yang terdiri dari perkataan positif 11.3K dan negatif 13.3K. Kami menilai leksikon ini dengan mengklasifikasi perasaan tweet Arabizi mencapai skor F1 0.72. We provide a detailed error analysis to present the challenges that impact the sentiment analysis of Arabizi.', 'ml': 'അറബിക്ക് ലാറ്റിന്\u200d ആല്\u200dഫായുടിക്കങ്ങളില്\u200d എഴുതിയിരിക്കുന്ന ഡയലക്ടല്\u200d അറബിയുടെ രീതിയാണ്. It has a proven popularity on chat platforms and social media, yet it suffers from a severe lack of natural language processing (NLP) resources.  അതുപോലെ, അറബിയില്\u200d എഴുതിയ വാചകങ്ങള്\u200d എപ്പോഴും അറബിക്ക് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള വിശ്വാസത്തിന്റെ ജോലികളില്\u200d അഗ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിവരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു, അറബിക്കാര്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നത് വാക് അതിന്റെ ഫലം 11.3K പോസിറ്റിവും 13.3K നെഗറേറ്റീവ് വാക്കുകളുമാണ്. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ ലെക്സിക്ഷനെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുകയാണ് അറബീസിയിലെ ടൂട്ടുകളുടെ വിചാരം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നത്. എഫ്1. 72 സ്കോര്\u200d പ അറബിസിയുടെ വിചാരണയെ പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്ന വിലപാടുകള്\u200d കാണിക്കാന്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പിശക് വിശദീകരിക്', 'mt': 'L-Arabiżi hija forma informali miktuba ta’ dijalektali Arabika traskritta f’karattri alfanumeriċi Latini. Għandha popolarità ppruvata fuq pjattaformi ta’ chat u midja soċjali, iżda tbati minn nuqqas serju ta’ riżorsi ta’ pproċessar naturali tal-lingwi (NLP). Bħala tali, it-testi miktuba bl-Arabiżi spiss jiġu injorati fil-kompiti ta’ analiżi tas-sentimenti għall-Arabiku. F’dan id-dokument niddeskrivu l-ħolqien ta’ lexicon ta’ sensazzjoni għall-Arabizi li kien arrikkit b’inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kelma. Ir-riżultat huwa lexicon ġdid Arabizi li jikkonsisti minn kliem pożittiv ta’ 11.3K u 13.3K negattiv. Ivvalutajna dan il-lexicon billi kklassifikajna s-sentiment ta’ tweets Arabizi li kisbu punteġġ F1 ta’ 0.72. Aħna nipprovdu analiżi dettaljata tal-iżbalji biex nippreżentaw l-isfidi li jaffettwaw l-analiżi tas-sentimenti tal-Arabizi.', 'no': 'Arabisk er eit informalt skriven form av dialektisk arabisk transkript i latinsk alfanumeriske teikn. Det har ein bevisert popularitet på prateplattformar og sosiale media, men det går frå ein kraftig mangling av naturspråk-handlingar (NLP) ressursar. Som slik er tekstar skrevene i Arabisk ofte forstått i sentimentanalyseoppgåver for arabisk. I denne papiret beskriver vi opprettinga av ein sentimentleksikon for Arabisisk som var røyd med ordinnbygging. Resultatet er ein ny arabisk leksikon som inneheld 11,3K positive og 13,3K negative ord. Vi evaluerte denne leksikona ved å klassifisera sentimenten av arabiske tweeter som oppnår ein F1- score av 0,72. Vi gjev ein detaljert feilanalyse for å gjere utfordringane som påvirkar sentimentanalisen av Arabisisk.', 'pl': 'Arabizi jest nieformalną formą pisemną dialektalnego arabskiego przepisywaną łacińskimi znakami alfanumerycznymi. Ma udowodnioną popularność na platformach czatów i mediach społecznościowych, ale cierpi z powodu poważnego braku zasobów przetwarzania języka naturalnego (NLP). W związku z tym teksty napisane w języku arabskim są często lekceważone w zadaniach analizy sentymentów w języku arabskim. W artykule opisujemy stworzenie leksykonu sentymentów dla Arabizi, który został wzbogacony o osadzenia słów. Rezultatem jest nowy leksykon arabski składający się z 11.3K dodatnich i 13.3K negatywnych słów. Oceniliśmy ten leksykon klasyfikując sentyment tweetów Arabizi osiągających wynik F1 0,72. Zapewniamy szczegółową analizę błędów, aby przedstawić wyzwania, które mają wpływ na analizę sentymentów Arabizi.', 'mn': 'Арабзи бол Латин алфаномерик дүрсийн диалектал араб хэлбэртэй бичигдсэн хэлбэртэй. Энэ нь ярианы платформ болон нийгмийн мэдээлэл дээр нэр хүндтэй байдаг. Гэхдээ байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн (NLP) нөөц баялаг байдаг. Арабид бичигдсэн текст ихэвчлэн Араб-ын сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээ хийх үйлдлийн даалгавраас анхаарна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Арабын сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийг бий болгож тайлбарладаг. Үүний үр дүнд 11.3K эерэг, 13.3K сөрөг үгнүүдийн шинэ Араб лексикон юм. Бид энэ лексиконы үнэ цэнэтэй байлаа. Арабизийн tweets нь 0.72 тооны F1 оноо хүртэл мэдрэмжийг хэлж байна. Бид Арабын сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээнд нөлөөлдөг сорилтуудыг тайлбарлахын тулд нарийвчлан алдаа шинжилгээ өгдөг.', 'ro': 'Arabizi este o formă scrisă informală de arabă dialectală transcrisă în caractere alfanumerice latine. Are o popularitate dovedită pe platformele de chat și social media, dar suferă de o lipsă severă de resurse de procesare a limbajului natural (PNL). Ca atare, textele scrise în arabizi sunt adesea ignorate în sarcinile de analiză a sentimentelor pentru arabă. În această lucrare descriem crearea unui lexicon sentimental pentru arabizi care a fost îmbogățit cu încorporări de cuvinte. Rezultatul este un nou lexicon arabizi format din 11.3K cuvinte pozitive și 13.3K negative. Am evaluat acest lexicon clasificând sentimentul tweeturilor Arabizi obținând un scor F1 de 0.72. Oferim o analiză detaliată a erorilor pentru a prezenta provocările care afectează analiza sentimentului Arabizi.', 'sr': 'Arapsi je neformalni napisan oblik dijalektalnog arapskog prepisanog na latinskim alfanumerijskim likovima. Ima dokazanu popularnost na razgovornim platformama i društvenim medijima, ali pati od teškog nedostatka prirodnog obradivanja jezika (NLP) resursa. Kao takav, teksti napisani na Arapskoj često se ne smatraju zadacima za analizu sentimenta za arapski. U ovom papiru opisujemo stvorenje sentimentalnog leksikona za Arabije koje je bogatstvo riječima ugrađenim. Rezultat je novi arapski leksikon koji se sastoji od 11,3K pozitivnih i 13,3K negativnih reči. Procjenjivali smo ovaj leksikon sa klasifikacijom osjećanja Arapskih tweeta koji postignu F1 rezultat od 0,72. Mi pružamo detaljnu analizu greške kako bi predstavili izazove koje utiču na analizu sentiment a Arabija.', 'so': 'Carabi waa qoraal aan rasmi ah oo qoran qoraal af Carabi ah oo lagu qoray qoraalka alphanumeric ee Latin. Waxay leedahay dad loo caddeeyey jardiinada chat iyo macluumaadka bulshada, laakiin waxay ka dhibaataysaa manfac aad u daran baaraandegista afka dabiiciga (NLP). Sida darteed qoraalka Carabiga lagu qoro marmarka badan waxaa loo jeedaa wax lagu baadho arimaha fikirka ee Carabiga. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa abuuridda fekerka leksiga ee Carabiga, taasoo lagu hodaneeyay hadal ku qoran. Abaalku waa leksikan cusub ee Carabiga ah oo ka mid ah 11,3K waxqabad iyo 13,3K erayo negative ah. Waxaannu qiimeynay leksikankan si aan u fasaxno fikrada labada tweeteed ee Carabi oo gaadhaya koox F1 oo 0,72 ah. Anaalbaarinta qaladka ee gaarka ah ayaannu siinaynaa si aan u keenno dhibaatooyin saameyn ku yeelanaya baaritaanka maanka Carabiga.', 'si': 'අරාබිසි තමයි ලැටින් ඇල්ෆානුමෙරික් අක්ෂරේත්රයෙන් ලියපු අරාබික් වර්ගයක්. ඒකට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කතා කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක් සහ සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයාන්\u200dය වලට, ඒත් ඒකට ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවේශනය ඒ වගේම, අරාබිසි වල ලියපු පණිවිඩය සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයක් අරාබිය වලින් අවශ්\u200dය වි අපි මේ පත්තරයේ අරාබිසි වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ කියලා. ප්\u200dරතිචාරය තමයි අලුත් අරාබිසි ලෙක්සිකෝන් එකක් 11.3K විශේෂ වචන සහ 13.3K විශේෂ වචන. අපි මේ ලෙක්සිකෝන් විශ්වාස කරනවා අරාබිසි ට්විට් වලින් F1-ස්කෝර් 0.72 වලින් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා. අපි විස්තර විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණයක් දෙන්නේ අභ්\u200dයාජීගේ විශේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිකාර කරනවා අ', 'sv': 'Arabizi är en informell skriftlig form av dialektisk arabiska transkriberad med latinska alfanumeriska tecken. Den har en beprövad popularitet på chattplattformar och sociala medier, men lider ändå av en allvarlig brist på resurser för naturlig språkbehandling (NLP). Texter skrivna på arabizi ignoreras ofta i känsloanalysuppgifter för arabiska. I denna uppsats beskriver vi skapandet av ett sentiment lexikon för arabizi som berikats med ord inbäddningar. Resultatet är ett nytt arabizi lexikon bestående av 11,3K positiva och 13,3K negativa ord. Vi utvärderade detta lexikon genom att klassificera sentimenten i Arabizi tweets och uppnå en F1-poäng på 0,72. Vi tillhandahåller en detaljerad felanalys för att presentera de utmaningar som påverkar sentimentalanalysen av Arabizi.', 'ta': 'அராபிசி ஒரு தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட வடிவத்தில் லாத்தின் ஆல்பாதிரிய எழுதப்பட்ட வடிவம். இது அரட்டை தளங்கள் மற்றும் சமூக ஊடகங்கள் மீது ஒரு பிரபலம் தெளிவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, ஆனாலும் அது இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் மூலம அப்படியானால், அரேபியில் எழுதப்பட்ட உரைகள் பெரும்பாலும் அரபிக்கான உணர்வு ஆய்வு பணிகளில் புறக்கணிக்கப்படுக இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் ஒரு உணர்வு லெக்சிக்சியன் உருவாக்க விவரிக்கிறோம். அது வார்த்தைகள் மூலம் வளர்ந்தது. The result is a new Arabizi lexicon consisting of 11.3K positive and 13.3K negative words.  நாம் இந்த லெக்சியனை புரிந்து கொண்டு அரபி தொடர்புகளின் உணர்வை வகைப்படுத்துகிறோம். நாம் ஒரு விவரமான பிழை ஆய்வு வழங்குகிறோம் அரபி உணர்வு ஆய்வு பாதிக்கும் சவால்களை கொண்டு வருவதற்கு.', 'ur': 'عربی لاتین الفانومیریک شخصتوں میں لکھی ہوئی ڈیلکتل عربی کی ایک غیر معمول لکھی ہوئی فرم ہے۔ اس کے پاس چاٹ پٹرومٹ اور سوسیل میڈیا میں ایک ثابت قدم ہے، لیکن اس کے لئے طبیعی زبان پردازی (NLP) رسولوں کی سخت ناکامی ہے۔ اسی طرح عربی میں لکھی ہوئی پیغام اکثر عربی کے لئے احساسات تحلیل کے کاموں میں غفلت کی جاتی ہیں۔ ہم اس کاغذ میں عربی کے لئے ایک احساس لکسون کی پیدائش کررہے ہیں جو کلمات انڈینگ سے ثروت رکھا گیا تھا۔ نتیجہ 11.3K مثبت اور 13.3K منفی کلمات کا ایک نئی عربی لکسون ہے ہم نے اس لکسون کا ارزش کیا کہ عربی ٹویٹ کا احساس 0.72 کی F1-score کو پہنچ سکتے ہیں۔ ہم نے عربی کے احساسات تحلیل پر تأثیر دینے کے لئے ایک تفصیل تفصیل دی ہے۔', 'uz': "Арабча Лотиний алфаадаги аломатлар асосида ёзилган маълумот арабча формат. Bu suhbat platformlari va jamiyat media dasturlari haqida ko'rsatilgan জনlik bor, ammo u asl tilni boshqarish (NLP) manbalari yoʻq emas. Шундай қилиб, Arabdagi matnlar ko'pincha o'xshash o'zida o'anaviy vazifalar arab bo'ladi. Bu takarda biz Arabiya hisob-leksini yaratishni anglatamiz. Bu so'zlar bilan o'zlari bilan ko'payishi mumkin. Natijo esa 11.3K positive va 13.3K negativ so'zlar bo'lgan yangi Arabiya leksiya. Biz bu leksizni 0.72 dan foydalanish uchun Arab Twitterlarning g'oyligini o'rganish orqali qiymatimiz. Biz Arabiya hisob-aniqlarini tasavvur qiladigan muammolarni anglatuvchi muammolarni anglatuvchi bo'ladimiz.", 'vi': 'Ả rập là chữ viết không chính thức của ngôn ngữ Á Rập được ghi lại bằng chữ số. Nó được chứng minh là rất phổ biến trên các bục chat và các phương tiện xã hội, nhưng nó lại bị thiếu các nguồn tài nguyên ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Như vậy, văn bản viết ở Ả Rập thường bị phớt lờ trong các nhiệm vụ phân tích cảm xúc cho người Ả Rập. Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi mô tả sự phát triển ngôn ngữ ủy mị của Arab, có những từ mới tham gia. Kết quả là ngôn ngữ Ba Tư có thể gồm từ âm tính 11.3K và 13.3K. Chúng ta đánh giá từ này bằng cách liệt kê cảm nghĩ của tweet của Arabella đạt được điểm F1 của 0.72. Chúng tôi cung cấp một phân tích sai lầm chi tiết để đưa ra thử thách tác động đến phân tích cảm xúc của Arabella.', 'bg': 'Арабици е неформална писмена форма на диалектален арабски език, преписана на латински буквено-цифрови знаци. Той има доказана популярност в чат платформите и социалните медии, но страда от сериозна липса на ресурси за обработка на естествен език (НЛП). Като такива текстовете, написани на арабици, често се пренебрегват в задачите за анализ на сантименталността на арабския. В настоящата статия описваме създаването на сантиментален лексикон за арабици, обогатен с вграждания на думи. Резултатът е нов арабийски лексикон, състоящ се от 11.3К положителни и 13.3К отрицателни думи. Оценихме този лексикон, като класифицирахме сентимента на туитовете на Арабици, постигайки резултат от 0,72. Предлагаме подробен анализ на грешките, за да представим предизвикателствата, които оказват влияние върху сентименталния анализ на Арабици.', 'hr': 'Arabizi je neformalni napisan oblik dijalektalnog arapskog prepisanog na latinskim alfanumerijskim likovima. Ima dokazanu popularnost na razgovornim platformama i društvenim medijima, ali pati od teškog nedostatka prirodnog obradivanja jezika (NLP) resursa. Kao što je takvo, teksti napisani na Arabskoj često se odbacuju u zadatke analize osjećaja za arapske. U ovom papiru opisujemo stvaranje sentimentalnog leksikona za Arabize koja je bogata riječima ugrađena. Rezultat je novi arapski leksikon koji se sastoji od 11,3K pozitivnih i 13,3K negativnih riječi. Procjenjivali smo ovaj leksikon klasifikacijom osjećaja Arabizijskih tweets postizajući F1 rezultat od 0,72. Mi pružamo detaljnu analizu greške kako bi predstavili izazove koje utjecaju na analizu osjećaja Arabiza.', 'da': 'Arabizi er en uformel skriftlig form for dialektisk arabisk transkriberat med latinske alfanumeriske tegn. Det har en dokumenteret popularitet på chat platforme og sociale medier, men det lider af en alvorlig mangel på naturlige sprogbehandlingsressourcer (NLP). Som sådan bliver tekster skrevet på arabizi ofte ignoreret i følelsesanalyseopgaver for arabisk. I denne artikel beskriver vi skabelsen af et sentiment leksikon for arabizi, der blev beriget med ord embeddings. Resultatet er et nyt arabizi leksikon bestående af 11,3K positive og 13,3K negative ord. Vi evaluerede dette leksikon ved at klassificere følelsen af Arabizi tweets og opnå en F1-score på 0,72. Vi leverer en detaljeret fejlanalyse for at præsentere de udfordringer, der påvirker sentimentalanalysen af Arabizi.', 'nl': 'Arabizi is een informele geschreven vorm van dialectisch Arabisch, transcribeerd in Latijnse alfanumerieke karakters. Het heeft een bewezen populariteit op chatplatforms en sociale media, maar het lijdt aan een ernstig gebrek aan natuurlijke taalverwerking (NLP) bronnen. Als zodanig worden teksten geschreven in Arabizi vaak genegeerd bij sentimentanalysetaken voor het Arabisch. In dit artikel beschrijven we de creatie van een sentimentlexicon voor Arabizi dat is verrijkt met woord embeddings. Het resultaat is een nieuw Arabisch lexicon bestaande uit 11.3K positieve en 13.3K negatieve woorden. We hebben dit lexicon geëvalueerd door het sentiment van Arabizi tweets te classificeren met een F1-score van 0.72. We bieden een gedetailleerde foutanalyse om de uitdagingen te presenteren die van invloed zijn op de sentimentanalyse van Arabizi.', 'de': 'Arabizi ist eine informelle schriftliche Form des dialektalen Arabischen, die in lateinischen alphanumerischen Zeichen transkribiert wird. Es hat eine nachgewiesene Popularität auf Chat-Plattformen und sozialen Medien, leidet jedoch unter einem starken Mangel an natürlichen Sprachverarbeitungsressourcen (NLP). Daher werden in Arabizi geschriebene Texte bei Stimmungsanalyseaufgaben für Arabisch oft vernachlässigt. In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir die Erstellung eines Sentiment Lexikons für Arabizi, das mit Worteinbettungen angereichert wurde. Das Ergebnis ist ein neues Arabizi Lexikon bestehend aus 11.3K positiven und 13.3K negativen Wörtern. Wir bewerteten dieses Lexikon, indem wir die Stimmung von Arabizi-Tweets klassifizierten, die einen F1-Score von 0.72 erreichten. Wir bieten eine detaillierte Fehleranalyse, um die Herausforderungen zu präsentieren, die sich auf die Sentimentanalyse von Arabizi auswirken.', 'id': 'Arabizi adalah bentuk tertulis informal dari dialektal Arab transkrip dalam aksara alfanumerik Latin. Ini memiliki popularitas terbukti pada platform chat dan media sosial, namun menderita dari kekurangan besar sumber daya proses bahasa alam (NLP). Sebagai seperti itu, teks yang ditulis dalam bahasa Arabis sering diabaikan dalam tugas analisis sentimen untuk bahasa Arab. Dalam kertas ini kami menggambarkan penciptaan sebuah leksikon perasaan untuk Arabizi yang diperiksa dengan penyampaian kata. Hasilnya adalah leksikon Arabizi baru yang terdiri dari 11,3K positif dan 13,3K kata negatif. Kami mengevaluasi lexikon ini dengan mengklasifikasi perasaan tweet Arabizi mencapai nilai F1 0,72. Kami menyediakan analisis kesalahan terperinci untuk memperlihatkan tantangan yang mempengaruhi analisis sentimen Arabizi.', 'ko': '아랍어는 아랍어 방언의 비공식적인 서면 형식으로 라틴 자모의 숫자 문자로 기록된다.그것은 채팅방과 소셜미디어에서 인기가 많지만 자연언어처리(NLP) 자원이 심각하게 부족하다.따라서 아랍어의 정서 분석 임무에서 아랍어로 쓴 텍스트는 흔히 무시된다.이 글에서 우리는 아랍어를 위해 만들어진 감정 어휘를 묘사했는데 이 어휘는 단어의 삽입을 풍부하게 했다.그 결과 긍정어 11.3K, 부정어 13.3K로 구성된 새로운 아랍어 어휘가 나왔다.우리는 아랍어 트윗의 감정을 분류하여 이 어휘를 평가했는데 F1은 0.72로 나뉘었다.Arabizi 정서 분석에 영향을 미치는 도전을 보여주기 위해 상세한 오류 분석을 제공했습니다.', 'sw': 'Kiarabu ni aina isiyo rasmi ya kuandikwa kwa lugha ya Kiarabu iliyoandikwa kwa wahusika wa alphanumeri wa Kilatini. Inathibitishwa umaarufu katika majukwaa ya mazungumzo na mitandao ya kijamii, lakini bado inaumia kutokana na ukosefu wa upasuaji wa lugha asili (NLP). Kwa mfano, maandishi yaliyoandikwa katika Kiarabu mara nyingi huchukuliwa katika kazi za uchambuzi wa hisia kwa ajili ya Kiarabu. Katika gazeti hili tunaelezea kutengeneza hisia za lexico kwa ajili ya Kiarabu ambalo lilikuwa tajiri kwa maneno yanayotumiwa. Matokeo yake ni lexico mpya ya Kiarabu inayojumuisha maneno yenye nafuu 11.3K na 3.3K hasi. Tumetathmini lexico hili kwa kutangaza hisia za twiti za Kiarabu zinazofikia score za F1 0.72. We provide a detailed error analysis to present the challenges that impact the sentiment analysis of Arabizi.', 'fa': 'عربی یک شکل نامحدود نوشته شده از الفانومیک عربی الفانومیک است. این یک شهرت ثابت شده در پتام\u200cهای صحبت و رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی دارد، ولی از ناتوانی شدیدی از محصولات پردازش زبان طبیعی (NLP) رنج می\u200cبرد. به عنوان این، texts written in Arabizi are often ignored in sentiment analysis tasks for Arabic. در این کاغذ ما آفرینش یک لکسیون احساس برای عربی را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که با کلمه\u200cهای انجمن ثروتمند شده است. نتیجه یک لکسیون جدید عربی است که از کلمات مثبت 11.3K و 13.3K است. ما این زبان را با کلاس کردن احساسات توئیت عربی با رسیدن یک نمونه F1 از 0.72 ارزیابی کردیم. ما تحلیل خطای جزئیات را برای نشان دادن چالش\u200cهایی که تحلیل احساسات عربی را تأثیر می\u200cدهند، پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم.', 'tr': 'Arabça, latin alfanumeriň karakterlerde ýazylýan dialektaly arabça hasaplanýan bir nusgatdyr. Çatyş platformlarynda we sosial mediýalarynda bir meşhurlik bar, ýöne bu ýerde tebigy dil işlemeginiň (NLP) çeşmegi ýok. Şol ýaly, Arabçada ýazylan metinler köplenç arapça duýgular çözümleriniň görkezilişinde boýun gaçyrýar. Biz bu kagyzda aräbi üçin sözleriň baglanmasy bilen baýlayan duýgym lezikon bejerilmegi tassyýarys. netijede 11.3K pozitif we 13.3K negatif sözleriň bar. Biz bu leksiýany 0.72 अंतर f1 hasaplanja çarpan Arabça tweets duýgularyny saplamak bilen deňledik. Biz Arabsiň duýgular analyzasyny täsirleýän kynçylyklary görkezmek üçin detayly ýalňyşlyk analyzasyny bererik.', 'af': "Arabiese is 'n onformeel geskrywe vorm van dialektiese Arabiese transkripteer in Latynse alfanumeriese karakters. Dit het 'n bevestige populariteit op praatsplatforme en sosiale media, maar dit lyf van 'n swaar mislukking van natuurlike taal verwerking (NLP) hulpbronne. Soos so, teks geskrywe in Arabiese word dikwels in sentimentanaliseerde taak vir Arabiese onthou. In hierdie papier beskrywe ons die skepping van 'n sentimentele leksikoon vir Arabiese wat ryk was met woord inbêding. Die resultaat is 'n nuwe Arabiese lexikon wat bestaan van 11.3K positiewe en 13.3K negatiewe woorde. Ons het hierdie leksikon evalueer deur die sentiment van Arabiese tweets te klassifiseer wat 'n F1-telling van 0.72 bereik het. Ons verskaf 'n gedetale fout analisie om die uitdagings te voorsien wat die sentimentanalisie van Arabise invloek het.", 'sq': 'Arabizi is an informal written form of dialectal Arabic transcribed in Latin alphanumeric characters.  Ajo ka një popullaritet të vërtetuar në platforma chat dhe media sociale, megjithatë vuan nga një mungesë e rëndë e burimeve të përdorimit natyror të gjuhës (NLP). Si e tillë, tekstet e shkruara në arabizi shpesh nuk konsiderohen në detyrat e analizës së ndjenjave për arabisht. Në këtë letër ne përshkruajmë krijimin e një lexikoni të ndjenjave për arabizin që u pasurua me fjalë të përfshira. Rezultati është një lexikon i ri arabizi që përbëhet nga 11.3K fjalë pozitive dhe 13.3K negative. Ne vlerësuam këtë lexikon duke klasifikuar ndjesinë e tweeteve arabizi duke arritur një rezultat F1 0.72. Ne ofrojmë një analizë të detajuar gabimi për të paraqitur sfidat që ndikojnë në analizën e ndjenjave të Arabizit.', 'hy': 'Արաբիզին անտեղյակ գրված արաբական դիալեկտալ ձև է, որը գրված է լատիներեն ալֆանյումերիկ հիերոգլիֆներով: Այն ապացուցել է, որ խոսակցության պլատֆորմներում և սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում հայտնի է, սակայն այն տառապում է բնական լեզվի վերլուծության (ՆԼՊ) ռեսուրսների խիստ բացակայության պատճառով: Արաբիզի լեզվով գրված տեքստերը հաճախ անհաշվի են առնում արաբերենի զգացմունքների վերլուծության խնդիրներում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք արաբիզի համար հարստացած զգացմունքային լեքսիկոնի ստեղծումը: Արդյունքը նոր արաբիզի լեքսիկոն է, որը կազմված է 11.3K դրական և 13.3K բացասական բառերից: Մենք գնահատեցինք այս լեքսիկոնը դասավորելով արաբիզի թվիթերի զգացմունքները, որոնք հասնում են F1-ի 0.72 գնահատականի: Մենք կատարում ենք մանրամասն սխալների վերլուծություն, որպեսզի ներկայացնենք մարտահրավերները, որոնք ազդում են արաբերիզի զգացմունքների վերլուծության վրա:', 'am': 'አረቢያ በLatin alphanumeric characters የተጻፈ የቋንቋ ዐረብኛ መልክ ነው፡፡ በአካባቢው ቋንቋ ማህበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ የተፈጸመ ውጤት አለበት፣ ነገር ግን የፍጥረቱ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል (NLP) ሀብት ግጭት ነው፡፡ እንደዚህም፣ በአረብኛ የተጻፉት ጽሑፎች ብዙ ጊዜም በአረብኛ ላይ በሚያስተማሩ ስራዎችን ተሳሳትተዋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም ለአረቢያ የስሜት ሊክሲን መፍጠር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፍጻሜው 11.3K positive እና 13.3K negative ቃላት የተመሳሳይ አዲስ አረቢያ ሊክሲክ ነው፡፡ አረቢያዊ ትዊተሮችን በ0.72 የደረሰውን የአፍ1 ነጥብ በመግለጥ የዚህን ሌክሲኮን አስተያየን፡፡ የዓረባዊን አስተያየት የሚያደርገውን የስህተት ግንኙነቶችን ለማሳየት የጠለቀ የስህተትን አስተያየት እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'az': 'Arabsidir, Latinc…ô alfanumeric karakterl…ôrd…ô yazńĪlmńĪŇü dialektal …ôr…ôbc…ô yazńĪlmńĪŇü formudur. Onun sohbet platformlarńĪnda v…ô sosyal media vasit…ôsind…ô bir m…ôŇühurluńüu var, amma bu t…ôbi…ôtli dil iŇül…ôm…ôsi (NLP) q√ľvv…ôtli s…ôb…ôbi yoxdur. B…ôlk…ô, …ôr…ôbc…ô yazńĪlmńĪŇü m…ôktublar √ßox zaman …ôr…ôbc…ô hiss analizi iŇül…ôri bar…ôsind…ô t…ôhl√ľk…ôsizl…ônir. Bu kańüńĪzda …ôr…ôbi √ľ√ß√ľn duygularńĪn yaradńĪlmasńĪnńĪ t…ôsdiql…ôyirik ki, s√∂zl…ôrl…ô d√∂vl…ôtli idi. N√∂vb…ôti 11.3K pozitif v…ô 13.3K negatif s√∂zl…ôrd…ôn oluŇüan yeni …ôr…ôbc…ô layih…ôsidir. Biz bu leksiyonu 0,72 d…ôf…ô F1-d…ôf…ô g…ôl…ôn T√∂vtl…ôrin hissini t…ôsdiql…ôyib t…ôsdiql…ôyici olaraq t…ôsdiql…ôdik. Biz ArabsńĪzlarńĪn hissl…ôrin analizin…ô t…ôsir ed…ôn √ß…ôtinl…ôri g√∂st…ôrm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn detaylńĪ x…ôta analizi t…ômin edirik.', 'bs': 'Arapsi je neformalni napisan oblik dijalektalnog arapskog prepisanog na latinskim alfanumerijskim likovima. Ima dokazanu popularnost na razgovornim platformama i društvenim medijima, ali pati od teškog nedostatka resursa prirodnog obrade jezika (NLP). Kao što je tako, teksti napisani na Arapskom često se ne računaju na zadatke analize osjećaja za arapski. U ovom papiru opisujemo stvaranje sentimentalnog leksikona za Arabije koja je bogata riječima ugrađenim. Rezultat je novi arapski leksikon koji se sastoji od 11,3K pozitivnih i 13,3K negativnih riječi. Procjenjivali smo ovaj leksikon sa klasifikacijom osjećaja Arabizijskih tweets postizanjem F1 rezultata od 0,72. Mi pružamo detaljnu analizu greške kako bi predstavili izazove koje utjecaju na analizu osjećaja Arabiza.', 'bn': 'আরবী ল্যাটিন আলফাসামিক চরিত্রে লেখা ডায়ালেক্টাল আরবীর একটি অবৈধ ফর্ম। এটি চ্যাট প্লাটফর্ম এবং সামাজিক মিডিয়া সম্পর্কে জনপ্রিয় জনপ্রিয়, কিন্তু এটা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ার (এনএলপি) সম্পদ যেমন, আরবীতে লেখা লেখা লেখাগুলো প্রায়শই অনুভূতি বিশ্লেষণের কাজে অবহেলা করা হয়। এই পত্রিকায় আমরা আরবের জন্য একটি অনুভূতিপূর্ণ লেক্সিকোর সৃষ্টি বর্ণনা করেছি যা শব্দের প্রতি সমৃদ্ধ ছিল। ফলাফল হচ্ছে ১১. ৩০০০ পজিটিভ এবং ১৩. ৩০০০ নেতিবাচক শব্দ। আমরা এই লেক্সিকোর মূল্য দিয়েছি আরবের টুইটের অনুভূতিকে শ্রেণীভাবে বিস্তারিত করে যা এফ১ স্কোরে পৌঁছে যায়। আমরা বিস্তারিত ভুল বিশ্লেষণ দিয়েছি আরবীদের অনুভূতির বিশ্লেষণের প্রভাব ফেলে যাচ্ছে।', 'ca': "L'arabizi és una forma escrita informal d'àrab dialectal transcrita en caràcters alfanumèrics llatí. Ha demostrat una popularitat en plataformes de conversa i mitjans socials, però pateix una gran falta de recursos naturals de processament de llenguatges (NLP). Com a tal, els textos escrits en àrabís sovint s'ignoren en tasques d'anàlisi de sentiments en àrab. En aquest article descrivim la creació d'un lexicó de sentiments per a l'àrabís enriquegut amb la integració de paraules. The result is a new Arabizi lexicon consisting of 11.3K positive and 13.3K negative words.  Vam evaluar aquest lexicó classificant el sentiment dels tweets d'Arabizi aconseguint una puntuació F1 de 0,72. Oferecem una anàlisi detallada d'errors per presentar els reptes que afecten l'anàlisi de sentiments de l'àrabís.", 'cs': 'Arabizi je neformální písemná forma dialektální arabštiny přepisovaná latinskými alfanumerickými znaky. Má prokázanou popularitu na chatovacích platformách a sociálních médiích, přesto trpí vážným nedostatkem zdrojů pro zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP). Texty psané v arabštině jsou proto často ignorovány při analýze sentimentů pro arabštinu. V tomto článku popisujeme vytvoření sentimentového lexikonu pro Arabizi, který byl obohacen o slovní vložení. Výsledkem je nový arabský lexikon sestávající z 11.3K kladných a 13.3K negativních slov. Tento slovník jsme hodnotili klasifikací sentimentu Arabizi tweetů dosahujících F1 skóre 0,72. Poskytujeme podrobnou analýzu chyb, abychom prezentovali výzvy, které ovlivňují sentimentovou analýzu společnosti Arabizi.', 'fi': 'Arabizi on epävirallinen kirjallinen muoto dialektisesta arabiasta, joka on kirjoitettu latinalaisilla aakkosnumeerisilla kirjaimilla. Se on todistetusti suosittu chat-alustoissa ja sosiaalisessa mediassa, mutta se kärsii vakavasta luonnollisen kielen käsittelyresurssien (NLP) puutteesta. Arabiziksi kirjoitetut tekstit jätetään usein huomiotta arabiankielisten tunteiden analyysitehtävissä. Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme Arabizin tunteiden sanaston luomista, jota rikastettiin sanaupotuksilla. Tuloksena on uusi arabizin sanasto, joka koostuu 11,3K positiivisista ja 13,3K negatiivisista sanoista. Arvioimme tätä sanastoa luokittelemalla Arabizi tweettien tunteen saavuttaen F1-pisteen 0,72. Tarjoamme yksityiskohtaisen virheanalyysin esittääksemme Arabizin tunteiden analyysiin vaikuttavia haasteita.', 'et': 'Arabizi on mitteametlik kirjalik dialektiline araabia vorm, mis on transkribeeritud ladina tähtnumbrilistesse tähtedesse. See on tõestatud populaarsust vestlusplatvormides ja sotsiaalmeedias, kuid see kannatab tõsise loodusliku keele töötlemise (NLP) ressursside puudumise all. Seetõttu jäetakse arabizi keeles kirjutatud tekstid sageli araabia keele tundeanalüüsi ülesannetes arvesse. Käesolevas töös kirjeldame loomist sentimentaalne leksikon Arabizi, mis oli rikastatud sõna manustamine. Tulemuseks on uus Arabizi leksikon, mis koosneb 11,3K positiivsetest ja 13,3K negatiivsetest sõnadest. Me hindasime seda sõnavara klassifitseerides Arabizi säutsude tundeid, saavutades F1-skoori 0,72. Pakume üksikasjalikku veaanalüüsi, et esitada väljakutseid, mis mõjutavad Arabizi sentimentaalüüsi.', 'he': "ערביזי היא צורה לא רשמית כתבה של ערבית דיאלקטאלית שנכתבה בדמויות אלפנומריות לטינית. יש לה פופולריות מווכחה על פלטפורמות צ'אט ומדיה חברתית, אך היא סובלת מחסור רציני של משאבי עיבוד שפה טבעית (NLP). ככה, טקסטים שנכתבים בארביזי לעתים קרובות מתעלמים במשימות ניתוח רגשות עבור ערבית. בעיתון הזה אנחנו מתארים את יצירת לקסיקון רגשות עבור ערביזי שהיה עשיר באמצעות מילים. התוצאה היא מלקסיקון ערביזי חדש שמכיל 11.3K מילים חיוביות ו-13.3K מילים שליליות. We evaluated this lexicon by classifying the sentiment of Arabizi tweets achieving an F1-score of 0.72.  אנחנו מספקים ניתוח שגיאות מפורט כדי להציג את האתגרים שמשפיעים על ניתוח הרגשות של ערביזי.", 'jv': 'tab-style Rasané durung malah sabanjuré kaya perangkat-sabanjuré karo perangkat luwih karo media sotiki, gayet kuwi mau durung-warni akeh on é nggawe nguasakno sing nggawe idiwang (NLP). Opo kuwi koyo, kelas rambarang lan arabsi kuwi dikondas nang pancening alamat seneng pisan karo Rasak. Nang pepulan iki kita pirsak nyimpen kelakon Seneng Panjenengan kanggo nyumbang awak dhéwé garing awak dhéwé. Rejali kanggo kelakon arajih sing isiné 11.3 K luwih basa lan 13.3 K luwih sing katêpakan. Awak dhéwé éntuk luwih nggawe lexèké iki dadi dipluhaan Seneng Rasi kuwi tau matat kanggo ngerawak dhéwé F1 luwih 0.75. Awak dhéwé ngewehke ndhelik kesempatan kanggo nyengkuyung nggawe ngubah ujak karo hal-ujak seneng nggawe barang arabé.', 'ha': "QFontDatabase It has a proven popularity on chat platforms and social media, yet it suffers from a severe lack of natural language processing (NLP) resources.  Kamar haka, rubũtun littattafai da aka rubũta a arabu ko da yawa ana ƙyãma a cikin aikin yin anayyar da littattafani na Larabci. A cikin wannan karatun, Munã bayyana ko an halitta wani hisãbi na la'ani na Larabci wanda aka wadãtar da shi da kalmõmin. Mataimakin ta zama wata shekara na Larabci mai ƙunsa da 11.3 K masu shirya da 13.3 K negative words. Mun ƙaddara wannan leksin da muka fasasa hisia'in littattafani na arabu ta sami F1-score 0.42. Tuna samar da rabon ɓata daki-daki dõmin Mu halatta masu kansala waɗanda ke yin zartar da haske na'anar littãfin arabu.", 'sk': 'Arabici je neformalna pisana oblika dialektualne arabščine, ki je prepisana v latinskih alfanumeričnih znakih. Ima dokazano priljubljenost na klepetalnih platformah in družbenih omrežjih, vendar trpi zaradi resnega pomanjkanja virov za obdelavo naravnega jezika (NLP). Besedila, napisana v arabiškem jeziku, se tako pogosto zanemarijo pri analizi čustva za arabščino. V prispevku opisujemo ustvarjanje sentimentalnega leksikona za Arabice, ki je bil obogaten z vgradnjo besed. Rezultat je nov arabiški leksikon, sestavljen iz 11,3K pozitivnih in 13,3K negativnih besed. Ta leksikon smo ocenili z razvrstitvijo občutka Arabizijevih tweetov, ki so dosegli rezultat F1 0,72. Zagotavljamo podrobno analizo napak za predstavitev izzivov, ki vplivajo na sentimentalno analizo Arabizija.', 'bo': 'ཨ་རབ་ཁི་དེམ་ནི་རྣམ་གྲངས་མིན་དུ་ཡིག་གི་སྒྲ་ཚིགས་ཀྱི་ཨ་རབ་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་ཅིག་རེད། གླེང་མོལ་གླེང་མོལ་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཐོག་ཏུ་ཆེ་མཐོང་མངོན་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་ནི་སྤྱི་ཁྱད་པར་མཐོང་ནུ དཔེར་ན། ཨ་རེ་བིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་གེ་ཚིག་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་སེམས་ཚོར་གྱི་དབུགས་ཆ་ལྟ་སྟངས་ལ་སྣང་མེད་པར། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཨ་རབ་ཡི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་ཚོར་བ་ཅིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་འབད་ནི་ གྲུབ་འབྲས་འདི་ཨ་རབ་ཁི་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་ཨ་རབ་གི་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དུས་རྟགས་འདི་གིས་ཐག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཤིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཨ་རེ་བིའི་སེམས་ཚོར་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པར་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཞིབ་གསལ་བཤད་ཞིབ'}
{'en': 'Cross-Lingual Word Embeddings for Morphologically Rich Languages', 'ar': 'تطعيمات الكلمات عبر اللغات للغات الغنية شكليًا', 'es': 'Incrustaciones de palabras en varios idiomas para lenguajes ricos morfológicamente', 'fr': 'Intégration de mots multilingues pour des langues morphologiquement riches', 'pt': 'Incorporações de palavras entre idiomas para idiomas morfologicamente ricos', 'ja': '形態的に豊かな言語のためのクロスリンガルワード埋め込み', 'ru': 'Встраивание кросс-лингвальных слов для морфологически насыщенных языков', 'zh': '形容富言语,语言嵌入', 'hi': 'रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भाषाओं के लिए क्रॉस-लिंगुअल वर्ड एम्बेडिंग', 'ga': 'Leabú Focal Trastheangach do Theangacha atá Saibhir Moirfeolaíoch', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Nyelvközi szóbeágyazások morfológiailag gazdag nyelvekhez', 'el': 'Διασγλωσσικές Ενσωματώσεις λέξεων για Μορφολογικά Πλούσιες Γλώσσες', 'kk': 'Name', 'mk': 'Вклучување на меѓујазички зборови за морфолошки богати јазици', 'ms': 'Cross-Lingual Word Embeddings for Morphologically Rich Languages', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്ഗല്\u200d വാക്ക് മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d റിച്ച് ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d', 'it': 'Incorporazioni di parole cross-linguali per lingue morfologicamente ricche', 'no': 'Name', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem translingwi għal-lingwi morfoloġikament rikki', 'lt': 'Morfologiškai turtingų kalbų tarpkalbiniai žodžiai', 'mn': 'Morphologically Rich Languages-д олон-Lingual Word Embeddings', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczne osadzenia słów dla języków bogatych morfologicznie', 'sr': 'KrozLingualne reèi ukljuèene za morfološki bogate jezike', 'ro': 'Încorporări de cuvinte interlingvistice pentru limbi bogate din punct de vedere morfologic', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Soo diraha luuqadaha Morphologically Rich Languages', 'sv': 'Flerspråkiga ordinbäddningar för morfologiskt rika språk', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'கிராஸ்- Lingual Word Embeddings for Morphologically Rich Languages', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Междулингвистични словни вграждания за морфологично богати езици', 'hr': 'KrozLingualne riječi za morfološki bogate jezike', 'nl': 'Cross-Lingual Word Embeddings voor morfologisch rijke talen', 'da': 'Flersprogede ordindlejringer til morfologisk rige sprog', 'de': 'Sprachübergreifende Word-Einbettungen für morphologisch reiche Sprachen', 'ko': '형태가 풍부한 언어의 다중 언어 단어 삽입', 'id': 'Penampilan Perkataan Selata-Bahasa untuk Bahasa Morfologis Kaya', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Lugha za Kiingereza', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Marfonolojik Zaý Diller üçin Gatnaş Diller', 'sq': 'Përfshirje fjalësh ndërgjuhësore për gjuhë morfologjikisht të pasura', 'hy': 'Մորֆոլոգիապես հարուստ լեզուների բառերի խաչլեզվով ներգրավումները', 'bn': 'ক্রস-লিঙ্গুয়াল শব্দটি মরোফোলজিক্যালি সমৃদ্ধ ভাষার জন্য এমবেডিং', 'bs': 'KrozLingualne riječi za morfološki bogate jezike', 'cs': 'Vkládání slov mezi jazyky pro morfologicky bohaté jazyky', 'ca': 'Incorporacions de paraules translingües per llengües morfològicament rics', 'fi': 'Kieltenväliset sanaupotukset morfologisesti rikkaille kielille', 'et': 'Keeleülesed sõnade manustamised morfoloogiliselt rikkatele keeltele', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'az': 'Morphologically Zengin Dill톛r 칲칞칲n X톛rcLingual Kelimi 캻fad톛l톛ri', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Medjezikovne besedne vdelave za morfološko bogate jezike', 'he': 'תוכניות מילים צלולות לשפות עשירות מורפולוגית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Morphologically Rich Languages için Cross-Lingual Word Embeddings for Morphologically Rich Languages'}
{'en': 'Cross-lingual word embedding models learn a shared vector space for two or more languages so that words with similar meaning are represented by similar vectors regardless of their language. Although the existing models achieve high performance on pairs of morphologically simple languages, they perform very poorly on morphologically rich languages such as Turkish and Finnish. In this paper, we propose a morpheme-based model in order to increase the performance of cross-lingual word embeddings on morphologically rich languages. Our model includes a simple extension which enables us to exploit morphemes for cross-lingual mapping. We applied our model for the Turkish-Finnish language pair on the bilingual word translation task. Results show that our model outperforms the baseline models by 2 % in the nearest neighbour ranking.', 'ar': 'تتعلم نماذج تضمين الكلمات عبر اللغات مساحة متجه مشتركة لغتين أو أكثر بحيث يتم تمثيل الكلمات ذات المعنى المتشابه بواسطة ناقلات متشابهة بغض النظر عن لغتها. على الرغم من أن النماذج الحالية تحقق أداءً عاليًا على أزواج من اللغات البسيطة شكليًا ، إلا أنها تعمل بشكل ضعيف جدًا في اللغات الغنية شكليًا مثل التركية والفنلندية. في هذا البحث ، نقترح نموذجًا مبنيًا على مورفيم من أجل زيادة أداء تضمين الكلمات عبر اللغات في اللغات الغنية شكليًا. يتضمن نموذجنا امتدادًا بسيطًا يمكننا من استغلال المورفيمات لرسم الخرائط عبر اللغات. طبقنا نموذجنا للزوج اللغوي التركي-الفنلندي في مهمة ترجمة الكلمات ثنائية اللغة. تظهر النتائج أن نموذجنا يتفوق على النماذج الأساسية بنسبة 2٪ في ترتيب الجيران الأقرب.', 'pt': 'Os modelos de incorporação de palavras em vários idiomas aprendem um espaço vetorial compartilhado para dois ou mais idiomas, de modo que palavras com significado semelhante são representadas por vetores semelhantes, independentemente do idioma. Embora os modelos existentes alcancem alto desempenho em pares de línguas morfologicamente simples, eles têm um desempenho muito ruim em línguas morfologicamente ricas, como turco e finlandês. Neste artigo, propomos um modelo baseado em morfemas para aumentar o desempenho de embeddings de palavras multilíngues em línguas morfologicamente ricas. Nosso modelo inclui uma extensão simples que nos permite explorar morfemas para mapeamento entre línguas. Aplicamos nosso modelo para o par de idiomas turco-finlandês na tarefa de tradução bilíngue de palavras. Os resultados mostram que nosso modelo supera os modelos de linha de base em 2% no ranking do vizinho mais próximo.', 'fr': "Les modèles d'intégration de mots multilingues apprennent un espace vectoriel partagé pour deux langues ou plus, de sorte que les mots ayant une signification similaire soient représentés par des vecteurs similaires quelle que soit leur langue. Bien que les modèles existants obtiennent de hautes performances sur des paires de langues morphologiquement simples, ils fonctionnent très mal sur des langues riches en morphologie telles que le turc et le finnois. Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle basé sur des morphèmes afin d'augmenter les performances de l'intégration de mots multilingues sur des langues riches en morphologie. Notre modèle inclut une extension simple qui nous permet d'exploiter des morphèmes pour le mappage multilingue. Nous avons appliqué notre modèle pour la paire de langues turc-finnois à la tâche de traduction de mots bilingue. Les résultats montrent que notre modèle surpasse les modèles de base de 2\xa0% dans le classement du plus proche voisin.", 'es': 'Los modelos de incrustación de palabras en varios idiomas aprenden un espacio vectorial compartido para dos o más idiomas, de modo que las palabras con un significado similar se representan mediante vectores similares independientemente de su idioma. Si bien los modelos existentes logran un alto rendimiento en pares de idiomas morfológicamente simples, tienen un rendimiento muy bajo en idiomas ricos morfológicamente, como el turco y el finlandés. En este artículo, proponemos un modelo basado en morfemas para aumentar el rendimiento de la incrustación de palabras en varios idiomas en lenguajes morfológicamente ricos. Nuestro modelo incluye una extensión simple que nos permite aprovechar los morfemas para el mapeo multilingüe. Aplicamos nuestro modelo para la combinación de idiomas turco-finlandés en la tarea de traducción bilingüe de palabras. Los resultados muestran que nuestro modelo supera en un 2% a los modelos de referencia en la clasificación de vecinos más cercanos.', 'ja': 'クロスリンガルな単語埋め込みモデルは、２つ以上の言語の共有ベクトル空間を学習し、同様の意味を有する単語が言語に関係なく同様のベクトルによって表されるようにする。既存のモデルは、形態的に単純な言語のペアで高いパフォーマンスを達成しますが、トルコ語やフィンランド語などの形態的に豊富な言語では非常にパフォーマンスが低いです。本稿では、形態豊かな言語におけるクロスリンガルワード埋め込みのパフォーマンスを向上させるために、モルフェムベースのモデルを提案する。私たちのモデルには、クロスリンガルマッピングのためのモルフェームを利用できるようにする単純な拡張機能が含まれています。トルコ語とフィンランド語のペアのモデルをバイリンガルの単語翻訳タスクに適用しました。結果は、当社のモデルが最も近い隣接ランキングでベースラインモデルを2%上回っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '跨语言词嵌模两多种语言共享向量间,以有似义者单词由相似之向量,而不论其言语。 虽形约言高性能,形富言语(土耳其语芬兰语)甚劣。 于本文中,立一语素模形,以崇跨语言词嵌于形容之性。 吾模一简广,使吾语素跨语。 宜土耳其语-芬兰语双语单词译。 结果表明近邻比基线高出2%。', 'ru': 'Межъязычные модели встраивания слов изучают общее векторное пространство для двух или более языков, так что слова со схожим значением представлены одинаковыми векторами независимо от их языка. Хотя существующие модели достигают высокой производительности на парах морфологически простых языков, они работают очень плохо на морфологически богатых языках, таких как турецкий и финский. В этой статье мы предлагаем модель на основе морфем, чтобы увеличить производительность межязычных вложений слов на морфологически богатых языках. Наша модель включает в себя простое расширение, которое позволяет нам использовать морфемы для межъязыкового отображения. Мы применили нашу модель для турецко-финской языковой пары на двуязычной задаче перевода слов. Результаты показывают, что наша модель превосходит базовые модели на 2% в рейтинге ближайших соседей.', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-भाषी शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल दो या दो से अधिक भाषाओं के लिए एक साझा वेक्टर स्थान सीखते हैं ताकि समान अर्थ वाले शब्दों को उनकी भाषा की परवाह किए बिना समान वैक्टर द्वारा दर्शाया जा सके। यद्यपि मौजूदा मॉडल रूपात्मक रूप से सरल भाषाओं के जोड़े पर उच्च प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं, वे तुर्की और फिनिश जैसी रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भाषाओं पर बहुत खराब प्रदर्शन करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भाषाओं पर क्रॉस-लिंगुअल शब्द एम्बेडिंग के प्रदर्शन को बढ़ाने के लिए एक मॉर्फीम-आधारित मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारे मॉडल में एक सरल विस्तार शामिल है जो हमें क्रॉस-लिंगुअल मैपिंग के लिए मॉर्फेम्स का शोषण करने में सक्षम बनाता है। हमने द्विभाषी शब्द अनुवाद कार्य पर तुर्की-फिनिश भाषा जोड़ी के लिए अपना मॉडल लागू किया। परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल निकटतम पड़ोसी रैंकिंग में बेसलाइन मॉडल को 2% से बेहतर बनाता है।', 'ga': 'Foghlaimíonn samhlacha tras-teangacha um leabú focal spás veicteora roinnte do dhá theanga nó níos mó sa chaoi is go ndéanann veicteoirí cosúla ionadaíocht ar fhocail a bhfuil an bhrí chéanna acu beag beann ar a dteanga. Cé go n-éiríonn leis na samhlacha atá ann faoi láthair ardfheidhmíocht ar phéirí de theangacha atá simplí ó thaobh moirfeolaíochta de, is an-íseal a fheidhmíonn siad ar theangacha moirfeolaíocha ar nós an Tuircis agus an Fhionlainnis. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla atá bunaithe ar mhoirféim chun feidhmíocht leabaithe focal tras-teangacha ar theangacha atá saibhir ó thaobh moirfeolaíochta a mhéadú. Cuimsíonn ár múnla síneadh simplí a chuireann ar ár gcumas leas a bhaint as moirféisí le haghaidh mapála tras-teangacha. Chuireamar ár múnla don phéire teanga Tuircis-Fionlainne i bhfeidhm ar an tasc dátheangach aistriúcháin focal. Léiríonn torthaí go sáraíonn ár samhail na samhlacha bonnlíne 2% i rangú na gcomharsan is gaire.', 'el': 'Τα διγλωσσικά μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων μαθαίνουν έναν κοινόχρηστο διανυσματικό χώρο για δύο ή περισσότερες γλώσσες, έτσι ώστε οι λέξεις με παρόμοια έννοια να αντιπροσωπεύονται από παρόμοια διανύσματα ανεξάρτητα από τη γλώσσα τους. Αν και τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα επιτυγχάνουν υψηλή απόδοση σε ζεύγη μορφολογικά απλών γλωσσών, αποδίδουν πολύ άσχημα σε μορφολογικά πλούσιες γλώσσες όπως τα τουρκικά και τα φινλανδικά. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο με βάση το μορφέμιο, προκειμένου να αυξηθεί η απόδοση των γλωσσικών ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων σε μορφολογικά πλούσιες γλώσσες. Το μοντέλο μας περιλαμβάνει μια απλή επέκταση που μας επιτρέπει να εκμεταλλευτούμε μορφώματα για διασταυρούμενη χαρτογράφηση. Εφαρμόσαμε το μοντέλο μας για το ζεύγος Τουρκικών-Φινλανδικών γλωσσών στο δίγλωσσο έργο μετάφρασης λέξεων. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά τα μοντέλα βάσης κατά 2% στην κατάταξη πλησιέστερων γειτόνων.', 'ka': 'მრავალური სიტყვების მოდელები შესწავლობენ გაყოფილი გვქტორის სივრცე ორი ან მეტი ენათებისთვის, რადგან სიტყვები სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა გვქტორიების მაგრამ არსებობს მოდელები, როგორც მორპოლოგიურად მარტივი ენების ზოგი მუშაობით გავაკეთებენ, მათ მუშაობით მორპოლოგიურად ბედნიერი ენების შესახებ, როგორც ამ დომებში, ჩვენ მოვიწყებთ მორფემების მოდელი, რომელიც უფრო სიტყვების კონფიგურაციას მორფემებურად ბედნიერებული ენაზე. ჩვენი მოდელეში ერთადერთი განზომილება, რომელიც ჩვენ შეგვიძლია მოპროფემების გამოყენება კრისი ენგური მაპოვტირებისთვის. ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელის შესახებ რუქური-ფინური ენის ზოგებისთვის ორიენგური სიტყვების შესახებ. შემდეგ ჩვენი მოდელი 2% უფრო გავაკეთებს ბაზლინის მოდელზე.', 'hu': 'A többnyelvű szóbeágyazási modellek két vagy több nyelv számára megosztott vektorterületet tanulnak, így a hasonló jelentésű szavakat hasonló vektorok képviselik nyelvüktől függetlenül. Bár a meglévő modellek nagy teljesítményt érnek el morfológiailag egyszerű nyelvpárokban, nagyon rosszul teljesítenek morfológiailag gazdag nyelveken, mint például a török és a finn. Jelen tanulmányban egy morféma alapú modellt javasolunk annak érdekében, hogy növeljük a nyelvek közötti szóbeágyazások teljesítményét morfológiailag gazdag nyelveken. Modellünk egy egyszerű kiterjesztést tartalmaz, amely lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy kihasználjuk a morfémeket a keresztnyelvű leképezéshez. A kétnyelvű szófordítási feladat során a török-finn nyelvpárra alkalmaztuk modellünket. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk a legközelebbi szomszédok rangsorában 2%-kal felülmúlja a kiindulási modelleket.', 'mk': 'Многу јазички модели за вградување на зборови научуваат заеднички векторен простор за два или повеќе јазици за зборовите со слично значење да бидат претставени од слични вектори без оглед на нивниот јазик. Иако постојните модели постигнуваат висока резултат на парови морфолошки едноставни јазици, тие резултати се многу лоши на морфолошки богати јазици како што се турски и фински. Во овој весник предложуваме модел базиран на морфеми со цел да се зголеми изведувањето на меѓујазичните зборови на морфолошки богати јазици. Нашиот модел вклучува едноставно продолжување кое ни овозможува да ги искористиме морфемите за крстојазично мапирање. Го применивме нашиот модел за парот на турско-фински јазик на задачата за двојјазичен превод на зборови. Резултатите покажуваат дека нашиот модел ги надминува основните модели за 2 отсто во најблискиот соседски ранг.', 'it': 'I modelli di incorporazione di parole cross-lingual imparano uno spazio vettoriale condiviso per due o più lingue in modo che le parole con significato simile siano rappresentate da vettori simili indipendentemente dalla loro lingua. Sebbene i modelli esistenti raggiungano elevate prestazioni su coppie di lingue morfologicamente semplici, essi hanno prestazioni molto scarse su lingue morfologicamente ricche come il turco e il finlandese. In questo articolo, proponiamo un modello basato sul morfema al fine di aumentare le prestazioni delle incorporazioni di parole cross-lingual su linguaggi morfologicamente ricchi. Il nostro modello include una semplice estensione che ci permette di sfruttare i morfemi per la mappatura cross-lingual. Abbiamo applicato il nostro modello per la coppia di lingue turco-finlandese nel compito di traduzione bilingue di parole. I risultati mostrano che il nostro modello supera i modelli di base del 2% nella classifica dei vicini più vicini.', 'kk': 'Екі не бірнеше тілдер үшін ортақтастырылған вектор бос орын үйрену үшін сөздердің ұқсас мазмұнымен ұқсас векторлар тіліне қарамастан ұқсас болады. Бұл үлгілер морфологиялық қарапайым тілдерде жоғары істеу үшін, олар Түрк мен Финляндық секілді морфологиялық баян тілдерде өте жаман істейді. Бұл қағазда морфем негіздеген модель үлгісін морфологиялық бағатты тілдерге ендіру үшін көптеген сөздерді көтеру үшін қолданамыз. Өзіміздің үлгісімізде көпшілік кеңейтуі бар. Бұл көпшілік тіл картасының морфемдерін қолдануға мүмкіндік береді. Біз үлгімізді екі тілді аудару тапсырмасына Түрк-Финляндық тіл екі тілді үшін қолдандық. Нәтижелер біздің моделіміздің негізгі үлгілерін 2% деп көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ഭാഷ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഇങ്ങോട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d രണ്ടോ കൂടുതല്\u200d ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക് പങ്കിട്ട വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സ്ഥലം പഠിക്കുന്നു. അതുക നിലവിലുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d സാധാരണ ഭാഷകളിലൂടെ വളരെ പ്രദര്\u200dശിദ്ധമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കിലും അവര്\u200d മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d സമ്പന്നഭാ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു മോര്\u200dഫെമില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രാദോഷിക്കുന്നു. അതിനാല്\u200d മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d സമ്പത്തുള്ള ഭാഷകളില്\u200d വാക്കു നമ്മുടെ മോഡലില്\u200d ഒരു എളുപ്പമായ വികസിപ്പിയുണ്ട്. അത് നമ്മള്\u200dക്ക് ക്രിസ്ലിങ്കുള്ള മോര്\u200dഫീമുകള്\u200d മാപ്പിങ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d തുര്\u200dക്കിഷ്-ഫിനിഷ്യന്\u200d ഭാഷ ജോട്ടികള്\u200dക്ക് ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രയോഗിച്ചു. രണ്ടു ഭാഷ വാക്കുകളുടെ വ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d അടുത്ത അടുത്ത അയല്\u200dക്കാരുടെ റാങ്ങിങ്ങില്\u200d 2% മോഡല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക', 'mn': 'Хоёр эсвэл олон хэл дээр хуваалцах векторын орон зай суралцдаг. Тиймээс адилхан утгатай үг нь тэдний хэл болохгүй төстэй векторууд илэрхийлэгддэг. Хэдийгээр суурилсан загварууд морфологийн энгийн хэл дээр өндөр үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг ч тэд Турк болон Финляндын зэрэг морфологийн баян хэл дээр маш муу байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид морфем суурилсан загварыг морфем суурилуулахын тулд олон хэл хэлний хөрөнгө оруулалтын үйл ажиллагааг нэмэгдүүлэх болно. Бидний загвар нь олон хэлний зураг зураг дээр морфим ашиглаж чадна. Бид өөрсдийн загварыг Турк-Финляндын хэл хоёр хэл хэлний орчуулах ажлын тухай ашигласан. Үүний үр дүнд бидний загвар хамгийн ойрхон хөрш дүрмийн суурь шугам загварыг 2%-аар үржүүлдэг.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni ta’ kliem translingwi jitgħallmu spazju ta’ vetturi komuni għal żewġ lingwi jew aktar sabiex il-kliem b’tifsira simili jkunu rappreżentati minn vetturi simili irrispettivament mil-lingwa tagħhom. Għalkemm il-mudelli eżistenti jiksbu prestazzjoni għolja fuq pari ta’ lingwi morfoloġikament sempliċi, huma jwettqu prestazzjoni ħażina ħafna fuq lingwi morfoloġikament rikki bħat-Turkiż u l-Finlandiż. F’dan id-dokument, nipproponu mudell ibbażat fuq il-morfoloġija sabiex tiżdied il-prestazzjoni tal-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem translingwi f’lingwi morfoloġikament rikki. Il-mudell tagħna jinkludi estensjoni sempliċi li tippermettilna nesfruttaw il-morfi għall-immappjar translingwi. Applikajna l-mudell tagħna għall-par tal-lingwa Torka-Finlandiża fuq il-kompitu tat-traduzzjoni tal-kelma billingwi. Ir-riżultati juru li l-mudell tagħna jaqbeż il-mudelli tal-linja bażi bi 2% fl-eqreb klassifikazzjoni tal-ġirien.', 'no': 'Krysspråk ord innebæringsmodeller lærer ein delt vektorrom for to eller fleire språk slik at ord med liknande mening vert representert av liknande vektorar uansett språket deres. Selv om dei eksisterande modelane oppnår høg utvikling på par av morfologisk enkle språk, utfører dei veldig dårlig på morfologisk rike språk som tyrkisk og finsk. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit morfebasert modell for å auka utviklinga av krysspråk- ordinnbygging på morfologisk rike språk. Modellen vårt inneheld ei enkel utviding som gjer oss mogleg å ekspluatera morphemer for cross-language mapping. Vi brukte modellen vårt for den tyrkiske-finnske språkopla på oppgåva for omsetjinga av ordet. Resultatet viser at modellen vårt utfører baseline-modellen med 2 % i nærmeste naboren.', 'lt': 'Tarpkalbiniai žodžių įterpimo modeliai mokosi bendro vektoriaus erdvės dviem ar daugiau kalbų, kad panašios reikšmės žodžiai būtų atstovaujami panašiais vektoriais, nepriklausomai nuo jų kalbos. Nors esami modeliai pasiekia didelį rezultatą porose morfologiškai paprastų kalbų, jos labai blogai veikia morfologiškai turtingomis kalbomis, pvz., turkų ir suomių kalbomis. Šiame dokumente siūlome model į, pagrįstą morfomis, siekiant padidinti tarpkalbinių žodžių įtraukimo į morfologiškai turtingas kalbas veiksmingumą. Mūsų modelis apima paprastą išplėtimą, kuris leidžia mums naudotis tarpkalbiniam žemėlapiavimui skirtomis formomis. Taikėme savo model į Turkijos ir Suomijos kalbų porai dvikalbio žodžio vertimo užduotyje. Rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis yra 2 proc. didesnis už pradinius modelius artimiausių kaimynų grupėse.', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczne modele osadzania słów uczą się wspólnej przestrzeni wektorowej dla dwóch lub więcej języków, dzięki czemu słowa o podobnym znaczeniu są reprezentowane przez podobne wektory niezależnie od ich języka. Chociaż istniejące modele osiągają wysoką wydajność na parach języków prostych morfologicznie, sprawdzają się one bardzo słabo w językach bogatych morfologicznie, takich jak turecki i fiński. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy model oparty na morfemie w celu zwiększenia wydajności osadzeń słów wielojęzycznych w językach bogatych morfologicznie. Nasz model zawiera proste rozszerzenie, które pozwala nam wykorzystać morfemy do mapowania wielojęzycznego. Zastosowaliśmy nasz model dla pary językowej turecko-fińskiej do dwujęzycznego tłumaczenia słów. Wyniki pokazują, że nasz model przewyższa modele bazowe o 2% w rankingu najbliższych sąsiadów.', 'ro': 'Modelele de încorporare a cuvintelor interlingve învață un spațiu vectorial comun pentru două sau mai multe limbi, astfel încât cuvintele cu semnificație similară să fie reprezentate de vectori similari indiferent de limba lor. Deși modelele existente ating performanțe ridicate pe perechi de limbi morfologic simple, acestea funcționează foarte slab pe limbi bogate din punct de vedere morfologic, cum ar fi turca și finlandeza. În această lucrare, propunem un model bazat pe morfem pentru a crește performanța încorporărilor de cuvinte cross-lingual pe limbi bogate din punct de vedere morfologic. Modelul nostru include o extensie simplă care ne permite să exploatăm morfemele pentru cartografierea între limbi. Am aplicat modelul nostru pentru perechea de limbi turcă-finlandeză în sarcina de traducere bilingvă a cuvintelor. Rezultatele arată că modelul nostru depășește modelele de bază cu 2% în clasamentul cel mai apropiat vecin.', 'ms': 'Model penyembelihan perkataan salib-bahasa belajar ruang vektor berkongsi untuk dua atau lebih bahasa sehingga perkataan dengan makna yang sama diwakili oleh vektor yang sama tidak kira-kira bahasa mereka. Walaupun model yang ada mencapai prestasi tinggi pada pasangan bahasa yang mudah secara morfologik, mereka mencapai prestasi yang sangat buruk pada bahasa yang kaya secara morfologik seperti Turki dan Finlandia. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model berasaskan morfen untuk meningkatkan prestasi dalam bahasa salib dalam bahasa yang kaya. Model kita termasuk sambungan sederhana yang membolehkan kita mengeksploitasi morfen untuk pemetaan salib bahasa. Kami menerapkan model kami untuk pasangan bahasa Turki-Finlandia pada tugas terjemahan perkataan dua bahasa. Hasil menunjukkan bahawa model kita melebihi model dasar dengan 2% dalam rangkaian tetangga terdekat.', 'so': 'Tusaale ku qoran afka iskuulka ah waxay bartaan goob qeyb ah oo ku saabsan laba luuqadood ama ka badan, si hadal ku qoran waxyaabaha la mid ah ay u representaan vector isku mid ah, haba kastoo ay ku qoran afkooda. In kastoo ay samooyin heystaan uu si fiican u sameeyo luuqado fudud oo si fudud ah, waxay si aad u baahan ugu sameeyaan luuqadaha hodanka ah sida Turki iyo Finnishka. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model ku saleysan morpheem si aan u kordhiyo muuqashada hadalka afka kala duwan ee ku qoran luqadaha hooyo-maal ah. Tusaalkayaga waxaa ku jira sahli dheeraad ah oo inagu awoodaa inaan u baaraano karto sawirka luuqadaha kala duwan. Tusaale ahaan baannu noocyaday labo luqada Turkish-Finnishka ah oo ku qoran shaqo turjumista luuqadaha labaad. Midhaha resultadu waxay muuqataa in qaababkayagu uu sameynayo qaababka aasaasiga ah 2% ku sameeyaa safarka deriskaaga u dhow.', 'sr': 'Krozjezičke reči uključujući modele uče zajednički vektorski prostor za dva ili više jezika tako da reči sa sličnim značenjem predstavljaju slični vektori bez obzira na njihov jezik. Iako postojeći modeli postižu visoke funkcije na par morfološki jednostavnih jezika, vrlo loše izvode na morfološki bogatim jezicima poput turske i finske. U ovom papiru predlažemo model na morfofiji kako bi povećali učinkovitost međujezičkih reèi ugrađenja na morfološki bogatim jezicima. Naš model uključuje jednostavnu produženost koja nam omogućava da iskoristimo morfove za prejezičnu mapu. Prijavili smo naš model za turski-finski par jezika na zadatak prevođenja dva jezika. Rezultati pokazuju da naš model iznosi početne modele za 2% u najbližem stanju susjeda.', 'si': 'Name ඒ වගේම තියෙන්න තියෙන්නේ මොඩල් එක්ක උත්සන්ධ විදියට සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවල් දෙන්න, ඔවුන් ගොඩක් නරක භාෂාවල් වලින මේ පැත්තේ, අපි මොර්ෆෙම් අධාරිත විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා මොර්ෆෙම් භාෂාවික භාෂාවික විශ අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dය විස්තරයක් තියෙනවා, ඒකෙන් අපිට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් අපි තර්කිෂ්-ෆින්නිෂ් භාෂා ජෝඩාවට අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක භාවිත කරනවා දෙවල් භාෂාවක් වාර්තා ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අධාරණ මොඩේල් එක 2% විතරයි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ව', 'ta': 'கிராஸ்- மொழி மொழி உள்ளிடப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் இரண்டு அல்லது அதற்கு மேற்பட்ட மொழிகளுக்கு பகிர்ந்த நெக்கர் வெக்டார் இடத்தை கற்றுக் கொள்கிற இருக்கும் மாதிரிகள் உயர்ந்த செயல்பாடு செய்யும் போதும் இலக்கு சுலபமான மொழிகளில் இருந்தாலும், அவர்கள் துருக்கி மற்றும் பினிஷ்  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு மர்ப்பெம் அடிப்படையிலான மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் மொழி மொழியில் உள்ள செயல்பாட்டை அதிகரிக்க மு எங்கள் மாதிரி ஒரு சுலபமான விரிவாக்கம் உள்ளது, அது நமக்கு மாதிரி மொழி வரைப்படத்திற்கான மொழிகளை பயன்படுத்தும். நாங்கள் துருக்கி- பின்னிஷ் மொழி ஜோடிக்கு எங்கள் மாதிரி பயன்படுத்தினோம் இரு மொழி மொழி மொழிமாற்று முடிவுகள் நமது மாதிரி அடிப்படையின் மாதிரிகளை 2% வெளியேற்றுகிறது என்பதை காட்டுகிறது அருகில் அண்மையில் உள', 'sv': 'Flerspråkiga ordinbäddningsmodeller lär sig ett delat vektorutrymme för två eller flera språk så att ord med liknande betydelse representeras av liknande vektorer oavsett språk. Även om de befintliga modellerna uppnår hög prestanda på par av morfologiskt enkla språk, presterar de mycket dåligt på morfologiskt rika språk som turkiska och finska. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en morfembaserad modell för att öka prestandan hos korsspråkliga ordinbäddningar på morfologiskt rika språk. Vår modell innehåller en enkel förlängning som gör det möjligt för oss att utnyttja morfemen för korsspråklig kartläggning. Vi tillämpade vår modell för det turkisk-finska språkparet på tvåspråkiga ordöversättningsuppgiften. Resultaten visar att vår modell överträffar basmodellerna med 2% i närmaste grannrankning.', 'ur': 'کروس زبان کی کلمات مہینڈنگ موڈل دو یا زیادہ زبانوں کے لئے ایک شریک ویکتور جگہ سیکھتے ہیں تاکہ کلمات جیسی معنی کے ساتھ ویکتروں کے ذریعے ان کی زبان کے بغیر کسی طرح کی نمایش کی جاتی ہیں. اگرچہ موجود موجود موجود موجودات موجود سادہ زبانوں کے جوڑوں پر اچھی فعالیت حاصل کرتی ہیں، وہ موجود موجود زبانوں پر بہت برا عمل کرتے ہیں جیسے ترکیش اور فنلاندی. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک مورفیم بنیادی موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں تاکہ کروس زبان کی کلمات کے مطابقت بڑھائے ہمارے مدل میں ایک ساده اضافہ شامل ہے جو ہمیں کروس زبان نقشه کے لئے morphemes کا استعمال کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے. ہم نے اپنے مدل کو ترکیش-فنلاندی زبان جوڑے کے لئے دو زبان ترجمہ کے کام پر لازم کیا۔ نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل بنیاس لین موڈل کو 2% سے زیادہ قریب ترین مسافر رینگ میں انجام دیتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Các mô- đun tổ chức chữ chữ xuyên ngôn ngữ học một khoảng vector cho hai hoặc nhiều ngôn ngữ để từ có cùng nghĩa được đại diện bởi véc- tơ tương tự, bất kể ngôn ngữ nào. Mặc dù các mô hình hiện tại đạt hiệu suất cao trên các cặp ngôn ngữ có độ sơ sài, nhưng chúng không thể thực hiện tốt được nhiều ngôn ngữ phong tục, như ngôn ngữ Thổ và Phần Lan. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình hoá hoá hoá theo kiểu "morphismo" để tăng hiệu suất của sự nhúng từ ngữ khác nhau vào ngôn ngữ giàu có. Trong mô hình của chúng tôi có một phần mở rộng đơn giản giúp chúng tôi khai thác morphine cho bản đồ ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Chúng tôi đã áp dụng mẫu của chúng tôi cho cặp ngôn ngữ Thổ-Phần Lan để giải mã hai chữ. Kết quả cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta vượt trội so với mô hình cơ sở dựa trên 2=$trong hàng xóm gần nhất.', 'uz': "Name Agar mavjud modellar oddiy tillarda fofologik ko'plab ishlab chiqaradi, ular Turkish va Finnchalik kabi hovflik tillarda juda ko'p ishlaydi. Bu qogʻozda, biz morpheme asosiy modelini ko'rsatumiz, har xil tildagi so'zlarning natijasini o'zgartirish uchun fofofologik o'zgarishni o'zgartiradi. Bizning modelimizda oddiy kengaytmasi bor. Bu bizni bir necha tillar diagrammasini ishlab chiqarishga imkoniyat beradi. Biz Turkish-Finnish tili ikkita so'z tarjima vazifasi uchun modelimizni qo'lladik. Natijalar hodisa ko'rsatadi, bizning modelmiz asosiy modellarini 2% yordamida ko'rib chiqaradi.", 'bg': 'Моделите за вграждане на междуезични думи научават споделено векторно пространство за два или повече езика, така че думите със сходно значение да бъдат представени от подобни вектори независимо от техния език. Въпреки че съществуващите модели постигат висока производителност на двойки морфологично прости езици, те се представят много слабо на морфологично богати езици като турски и финландски. В настоящата статия предлагаме модел, базиран на морфеми, за да се повиши ефективността на многоезични словни вграждания на морфологично богати езици. Нашият модел включва просто разширение, което ни позволява да използваме морфеми за междуезично картографиране. Ние приложихме нашия модел за двойката турско-финландски език в задачата за двуезичен превод на думи. Резултатите показват, че нашият модел надминава базовите модели с 2% в класацията на най-близките съседи.', 'nl': 'Meertalige woordinbeddingsmodellen leren een gedeelde vectorruimte voor twee of meer talen, zodat woorden met dezelfde betekenis worden vertegenwoordigd door vergelijkbare vectoren, ongeacht hun taal. Hoewel de bestaande modellen hoge prestaties behalen op paren van morfologisch eenvoudige talen, presteren ze zeer slecht op morfologisch rijke talen zoals Turks en Fins. In dit artikel stellen we een morfeme-gebaseerd model voor om de prestaties van cross-lingual woord embeddings op morfologisch rijke talen te verhogen. Ons model bevat een eenvoudige extensie waarmee we morfemen kunnen gebruiken voor cross-lingual mapping. We pasten ons model voor het Turks-Finse taalpaar toe op de tweetalige woordvertaaltaak. De resultaten tonen aan dat ons model de basismodellen met 2% overtreft in de dichtstbijzijnde buurlank.', 'da': 'Flersprogede ordindlejringsmodeller lærer et fælles vektorrum for to eller flere sprog, så ord med lignende betydning repræsenteres af lignende vektorer uanset deres sprog. Selv om de eksisterende modeller opnår høj ydeevne på par af morfologisk enkle sprog, fungerer de meget dårligt på morfologisk rige sprog som tyrkisk og finsk. I denne artikel foreslår vi en morfem-baseret model for at øge ydeevnen af tværsprogede ordindlejringer på morfologisk rige sprog. Vores model indeholder en enkel udvidelse, som gør det muligt for os at udnytte morfemer til tværsproget kortlægning. Vi anvendte vores model for det tyrkisk-finske sprogpar på den tosprogede ordoversættelsesopgave. Resultaterne viser, at vores model overgår basismodellerne med 2% i den nærmeste naboskranking.', 'hr': 'Prejezički modeli ugrađenih riječi uče zajednički vektorski prostor za dva ili više jezika tako da riječi s sličnim značenjem predstavljaju slični vektori bez obzira na njihov jezik. Iako postojeći modeli postignu visoke učinke na par morfološki jednostavnih jezika, vrlo loše izvode na morfološki bogatim jezicima poput turske i finske. U ovom papiru predlažemo model na morfofiji kako bi povećali učinkovitost međujezičkih riječi ugrađenja na morfološki bogatim jezicima. Naš model uključuje jednostavnu produženost koja nam omogućava iskoristiti morfove za transjezičku mapu. Prijavili smo naš model za turski-finski par jezika na zadatak prevođenja dva jezika. Rezultati pokazuju da naš model iznosi početne modele za 2% u najbližem stanju susjeda.', 'de': 'Mehrsprachige Worteinbettungsmodelle lernen einen gemeinsamen Vektorraum für zwei oder mehr Sprachen, so dass Wörter mit ähnlicher Bedeutung unabhängig von ihrer Sprache durch ähnliche Vektoren dargestellt werden. Obwohl die bestehenden Modelle eine hohe Leistung bei Paaren morphologisch einfacher Sprachen erzielen, schneiden sie in morphologisch reichen Sprachen wie Türkisch und Finnisch sehr schlecht ab. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein morphem-basiertes Modell vor, um die Leistung von crosslingualen Worteinbettungen in morphologisch reichen Sprachen zu erhöhen. Unser Modell enthält eine einfache Erweiterung, die es uns ermöglicht, Morpheme für das sprachübergreifende Mapping zu nutzen. Wir haben unser Modell für das türkisch-finnische Sprachpaar auf die zweisprachige Wortübersetzungsaufgabe angewendet. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell die Basismodelle um 2% im nächsten Nachbarranking übertrifft.', 'ko': '다중 언어 단어가 모델에 삽입되어 두 가지 또는 두 가지 이상의 언어의 공유 벡터 공간을 학습함으로써 비슷한 의미를 가진 단어는 언어가 어떻게 되든지 유사 벡터로 표시된다.기존 모델은 형태가 간단한 언어 대조에서 고성능을 실현했지만 형태가 풍부한 언어(예를 들어 터키어와 핀란드어)에서의 성능은 매우 떨어진다.본고에서 우리는 형태가 풍부한 언어에 다중 언어 단어가 삽입되는 성능을 향상시키기 위해 어소를 바탕으로 하는 모델을 제시했다.우리의 모델은 우리가 어소를 이용하여 다중 언어를 비추는 간단한 확장을 포함한다.우리는 터키어-핀란드어 쌍의 모델을 이중 언어 단어 번역 임무에 응용할 것이다.그 결과 우리 모델은 최근 인접 정렬에서 기선 모델보다 2% 높았다.', 'id': 'Model penyembedding kata saling bahasa belajar ruang vektor berbagi untuk dua atau lebih bahasa sehingga kata-kata dengan arti yang sama diwakili oleh vektor yang sama tidak peduli bahasa mereka. Meskipun model yang ada mencapai prestasi tinggi pada sepasang bahasa morfologis sederhana, mereka sangat buruk pada bahasa morfologis kaya seperti Turki dan Finlandia. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model yang berdasarkan morfen untuk meningkatkan prestasi kata saling bahasa dalam bahasa morfologis kaya. Model kita termasuk ekstensi sederhana yang memungkinkan kita untuk mengeksploitasi morfen untuk pemetaan saling bahasa. Kami menerapkan model kami untuk pasangan bahasa Turki-Finlandia pada tugas terjemahan kata dua bahasa. Hasil menunjukkan bahwa model kita melebihi model dasar dengan 2% dalam rangkaian tetangga terdekat.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa maneno ya lugha yenye lugha ya kutangaza hujifunza nafasi ya kusambazwa kwa lugha mbili au zaidi ili maneno yenye maana yanayofanana yanawakilishwa na vector sawa bila kujali lugha yao. Ingawa mifano ya sasa yanapata ufanisi mkubwa katika lugha mbili rahisi za kifolojia, wanafanya vibaya sana katika lugha matajiri kama vile Uturuki na Kifinni. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza muundo wa msingi wa kifo ili kuongeza ufanisi wa maneno yanayoingia lugha mbalimbali katika lugha zenye utajiri wa kimorphologically. Mfano wetu unajumuisha maendeleo rahisi ambayo inatuwezesha kututumia vifo kwa ajili ya ramani ya lugha mbalimbali. Tulimtumia muundo wetu kwa ajili ya wawili wa lugha ya Kituruki-Kifinni katika kazi ya kutafsiri maneno ya lugha mbili. Matokeo yanaonyesha kwamba mifano yetu inaonyesha mitindo ya msingi kwa asilimia 2 katika eneo la karibu la jirani.', 'tr': 'Çoklu dilli kelime içeren modeller iki veya daha fazla diller için paylaşılan vektör alanını öğrenmek üçin aynı ifade olan kelimeler, dillerine hiç bir şekilde benzer vektörler tarafından ifade edilir. Öň bar modeller morfologik basit dillerde ýokary ukyp başarmaýan bolsa hem, Türk we Finlandiýa ýaly morfologik baý dillerde örän ýaman edip bilýärler. Bu kagyzda morfolojik baý dillerde çoklu diller içeren eserleşmeleri artmak üçin morfomaly tabanly bir nusga teklip edip görýäris Biziň modelimiz cross-lingual mapping üçin morfümleri ulanmaga mümkin edýän basit bir uzantyk bar. Biz türkçe-Finçe diller üçin öränimizi iki dil terjime täblisasynda uygulapdyk. Netijenler biziň modelimiz en yakın goňşularyň derejesinde 2%-den üssün hatlaryny üstün edendigini gösteriyor.', 'fa': 'کلمه\u200cهای متفاوت زبانی که مدل\u200cهای متصل شده\u200cاند یک فضای ویکتور مشترک برای دو یا بیشتر زبان یاد می\u200cگیرند تا کلمه\u200cهای مشترک با معنی مشترک توسط ویکتورهای مشترک به هر حال از زبانشان نمایش داده شود. اگرچه مدل\u200cهای موجود در جفت زبان\u200cهای ساده مورفولوژیکی به ارتفاع می\u200cرسند، آنها در زبان\u200cهای ثروتمند مورفولوژیکی مثل ترکیه و فنلاندی خیلی بد انجام می\u200cدهند. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل بر اساس مورفیم پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا عملکرد کلمه\u200cهای متوسط زبان در زبان\u200cهای پولدار مورفی افزایش دهیم. مدل ما شامل یک استفاده ساده است که به ما اجازه می دهد مورفیم\u200cها را برای نقشه\u200cهای مختلف زبان استفاده کنیم. ما مدل خود را برای جفت زبان ترکیه و فنلاندی روی کار ترجمه کلمه دو زبان استفاده کردیم. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل\u200cمون مدل\u200cهای پایین\u200cخط را با 2% در نزدیکترین رقابت همسایه\u200cها انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sq': 'Cross-lingual word embedding models learn a shared vector space for two or more languages so that words with similar meaning are represented by similar vectors regardless of their language.  Megjithëse modelet ekzistuese arrijnë performancë të lartë në çifte gjuhësh morfologjikisht të thjeshta, ato funksionojnë shumë keq në gjuhë morfologjikisht të pasura si turke dhe finlandeze. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një model bazuar në morfemë me qëllim që të rritet performanca e përmbajtjeve të fjalëve ndërgjuhësore në gjuhët morfologjikisht të pasura. Modeli ynë përfshin një zgjerim të thjeshtë që na lejon të shfrytëzojmë morfemet për hartimin ndërgjuhësor. Kemi aplikuar modelin tonë për çiftin e gjuhës turke-finlandeze në detyrën e përkthimit të fjalëve dygjuhëse. Rezultatet tregojnë se modeli ynë përmirëson modelet bazë me 2% në renditjen më të afërt fqinjë.', 'am': 'ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ቃላት በቋንቋቸው ውስጥ የተካፈሉ ምሳሌዎች ለሁለት ወይም የበለጠ ቋንቋዎች የሚተካክሉ ቦታ ይማራሉ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የአሁኑ ዓይነቶች በሞሮፎሎጂ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ከፍተኛ የድምፅ ውጤት አግኝተዋል፣ እንደቱርክ እና ፊንስዊ ቋንቋዎች በሞፎሎጂ ባለ ጠጎች ቋንቋዎች ላይ እጅግ ችግር ያደርጋሉ፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም የቋንቋ ቃላትን በሞፎሎጂ ባለ ሀብታሞች ቋንቋዎች ላይ የሚደረገውን እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ መዘርጋት የሚችል ቀላል ስፋት ነው፡፡ በሁለት ቋንቋ ቃላት ትርጉም ስራ ላይ የቱርክ-ፊንቋ ቋንቋ ሁለት ዓይነታችንን ምሳሌ አቀረብን፡፡ Results show that our model outperforms the baseline models by 2% in the nearest neighbour ranking.', 'hy': 'Երկու կամ ավելի լեզուների համար փոխլեզվով բառերի ներառման մոդելները սովորում են երկու կամ ավելի լեզուների համար ընդհանուր վեկտորի տարածք, որպեսզի նման իմաստով բառերը ներկայացված են նման վեկտորներով անկախ լեզվից: Չնայած, որ գոյություն ունեցող մոդելները բարձր արդյունք են ստանում մի զույգ մորֆոլոգիապես պարզ լեզուների վրա, նրանք շատ վատ արդյունք են ստանում այնպիսի մորֆոլոգիապես հարուստ լեզուներում, ինչպիսիք են թուրքերը և ֆինլա Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք մոդել, որը հիմնված է մոֆեմայի վրա, որպեսզի բարձրացնենք լեզուների փոխլեզվով ներդրված բառերի արտադրողությունը մոֆոլոգիապես հարուստ լեզուներում: Մեր մոդելը ներառում է պարզ ընդլայնումը, որը մեզ հնարավորություն է տալիս օգտագործել փոխլեզվով քարտեզագրման մորֆեմները: Մենք կիրառեցինք մեր մոդելը թուրք-ֆինլական լեզվի զույգի համար երկլեզու բառերի թարգմանման խնդրի վրա: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը գերազանցում է հիմնական մոդելները 2 տոկոսով ամենամոտ հարևանների դասակարգում:', 'af': "Name Alhoewel die bestaande modele hoë prestasie op paar morfologiese eenvoudige tale bereik word, doen hulle baie sleg op morfologiese ryk tale soos Turks en Finnish. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n morfome-gebaseerde model om die prestasie van kruistale woord inbêding op morfologiese ryk tale te vermeerder. Ons model het 'n eenvoudige uitbreiding wat ons kan uitbrei morphemes vir kruistale kaart. Ons het ons model aangewend vir die Turks-Finnish taal paar op die tweedelinglike woord vertaling taak. Resultate wys dat ons model die basisline modele deur 2% in die nabieste naaste rangering uitvoer.", 'bn': 'ক্রস-ভাষাভাষী শব্দের ভিত্তিক ভেক্টরের স্থান শিখে দুই বা বেশী ভাষার জন্য একটি ভেক্টর স্থান শিখে যায় যাতে একই ধরনের মানে শব্দের যদিও বিদ্যমান মডেলগুলো নির্বাচনের সাধারণ ভাষায় উচ্চভাবে প্রদর্শন করতে পারে, তবুও তুরস্ক এবং ফিনিশের মতো অনেক ধনী ভাষায় তারা খুব খারাপ ভ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি মর্ফেম ভিত্তিক মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে ক্রিশ ভাষাভাষায় ভাষাভাষায় সমৃদ্ধ ভাষায় বাড়াতে পারি। আমাদের মডেলের মধ্যে একটি সাধারণ বিস্তৃতি রয়েছে যা আমাদের মৃত্যু ব্যবহার করতে সক্ষম হয়েছে ক্রিশ ভাষাভাষায় ম্যাপেজ আমরা তুরস্ক-ফিনিশ ভাষার জোড়ার জন্য আমাদের মডেল প্রয়োগ করেছি দুই ভাষার ভাষার অনুবাদ কাজের উপর। ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল বেস্লাইনের মডেল দুই% প্রতিবেশী রেঙ্কিং-এ প্রদর্শন করে।', 'bs': 'Međujezički modeli ugrađenih riječi uče zajednički vektorski prostor za dva ili više jezika tako da riječi sa sličnim značenjem predstavljaju slični vektori bez obzira na njihov jezik. Iako postojeći modeli postignu visoke funkcije na par morfološki jednostavnih jezika, vrlo loše izvode na morfološki bogatim jezicima poput turske i finske. U ovom papiru predlažemo model na morfofiji kako bi povećali učinkovitost međujezičkih riječi ugrađenja na morfološki bogatim jezicima. Naš model uključuje jednostavnu produženost koja nam omogućava da iskoristimo morfove za cross-lingual mapping. Prijavili smo naš model za paru turskog-finskog jezika na zadatak prevođenja dva jezika. Rezultati pokazuju da naš model iznosi početne modele za 2% u najbližim redovima susjeda.', 'ca': "Els models d'incorporació de paraules translingües aprenen un espai vector compartit per dues o més llengües de manera que les paraules amb significat similar siguin representades per vectors similars, independentment de la seva llengua. Although the existing models achieve high performance on pairs of morphologically simple languages, they perform very poorly on morphologically rich languages such as Turkish and Finnish.  En aquest paper, proposem un model basat en morfèmes per augmentar el rendiment de les integracions de paraules translingües en llengües morfològicament rics. El nostre model inclou una extensió simple que ens permet explotar els mòrfemes per al mapatge translingüístic. Vam aplicar el nostre model per al parell de llenguatge turco-finlandès en la tasca de traducció bilingüe de paraules. Els resultats mostren que el nostre model supera els models de base en un 2% en la classe de veïns més proper.", 'az': 'İki ya da çox dillərə paylaşılmış vektor alanını öyrənmək üçün, bənzər anlama ilə sözlər eyni vektörlər ilə onların dillərinə baxmayaraq ifadə edilir. Halbuki mövcud modellər morfolojik basit dillərin çift tərzlərində yüksək performansı yetirsə də, onlar Türk və Finnish kimi morfolojik zəngin dillərində çox pis davranırlar. Bu kağızda, morfolojik zəngin dillərdə çox dilli sözlərin istifadəsini artırmaq üçün morfümə tabanlı modeli təklif edirik. Modelimiz bizə çoxlu dil maplaması üçün morfümləri istifadə edə bilən basit bir uzaqlaşdırma içindədir. İki dil çeviri işində Türk-Finlandiya dil çift modelini uyguladıq. Sonuçlarımız modellərin ən yaxın qonşuların səviyyəsində 2%-dən baseline modellərini göstərməsini göstərir.', 'cs': 'Modely vkládání slov mezi jazyky se učí sdílený vektorový prostor pro dva nebo více jazyků, takže slova s podobným významem jsou reprezentována podobnými vektory bez ohledu na jejich jazyk. Přestože existující modely dosahují vysokého výkonu na párech morfologicky jednoduchých jazyků, mají velmi špatný výkon na morfologicky bohatých jazycích, jako je turečtina a finština. V tomto článku navrhujeme model založený na morfemu s cílem zvýšit výkonnost vkládání slov mezi jazyky v morfologicky bohatých jazycích. Náš model obsahuje jednoduché rozšíření, které nám umožňuje využít morfémy pro cross-jazyčné mapování. Náš model pro turecko-finský jazykový pár jsme aplikovali na dvojjazyčný překlad slov. Výsledky ukazují, že náš model překonává základní modely o 2% v hodnocení nejbližších sousedů.', 'fi': 'Monikieliset sanaupotusmallit oppivat jaettua vektoritilaa kahdelle tai useammalle kielelle siten, että sanat, joilla on samanlainen merkitys, edustavat samankaltaisia vektoreita niiden kielestä riippumatta. Vaikka nykyiset mallit saavuttavatkin korkean suorituskyvyn morfologisesti yksinkertaisilla kielipareilla, ne toimivat hyvin huonosti morfologisesti rikkailla kielillä, kuten turkissa ja suomissa. Tässä työssä ehdotamme morfeemipohjaista mallia monikielisten sanaupotusten suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi morfologisesti rikkailla kielillä. Mallimme sisältää yksinkertaisen laajennuksen, jonka avulla voimme hyödyntää morfeemeja monikielisessä kartoituksessa. Sovellimme turkki-suomi-kieliparia koskevaa malliamme kaksikielisessä sanakäännöstyössä. Tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu 2% lähimmän naapurin sijoituksessa perusmalleista.', 'et': 'Keeleülesed sõnade manustamise mudelid õpivad kahe või enama keele jaoks jagatud vektoriruumi, nii et sarnase tähendusega sõnu esindavad sarnased vektorid olenemata nende keelest. Kuigi olemasolevad mudelid saavutavad suure jõudluse morfoloogiliselt lihtsate keelte paaridel, toimivad need väga halvasti morfoloogiliselt rikkalikes keeltes, nagu türgi ja soome keel. Käesolevas töös pakume välja morfeemipõhise mudeli, et suurendada keeleüleste sõnade manustamise jõudlust morfoloogiliselt rikkalikes keeltes. Meie mudel sisaldab lihtsat laiendust, mis võimaldab meil kasutada morfeeme keeleülese kaardistamise jaoks. Me rakendasime türgi-soome keele paari mudelit kahekeelse sõnatõlke ülesandel. Tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel ületab baasmudeleid 2% lähima naabri järjekorras.', 'he': 'דוגמנים מלכים בין שפתיים ללמוד מרחב ווקטורים משותף לשתי שפות או יותר כך שמילים עם משמעות דומה מייצגות על ידי ווקטורים דומים ללא קשר לשפה שלהם. למרות שהדוגמנים הנוכחים משיגים ביצועים גבוהים על זוגות שפות פשוטות מבחינה מורפולוגית, הם משיגים ביצועים גרועים מאוד בשפות עשירות מבחינה מורפולוגית כמו טורקית ופינית. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מודל מבוסס על מורפומה כדי להעלות את ההופעה של מילים דרך שפות על שפות עשירות מורפולוגית. המודל שלנו כולל התרחבות פשוטה שמאפשרת לנו לנצל מורפמות למיפה דרך שפה. שימשנו את המודל שלנו לזוג השפה הטורקית-פינית על משימה התרגום של מילים שתיים. התוצאות מראות שהמודל שלנו מוביל את המודלים הבסיסיים ב-2% ברמה השכנה הקרובה ביותר.', 'ha': '@ action: button Ingawa da misãlai da ke jiran su sami mafiya sauri a cikin wasu harshen mutfologi masu sauƙi, sai su yi aiki da abu kaɗan a kan harshen mutfologi da matajiri kamar turki da Finnish. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata misãlin da aka samu a kan morfeme dõmin ya ƙara cikakken maganar da ke cikin lugha-tarafu. Misalinmu na ƙunsa da wani shimfiɗa mai sauƙi wanda ke iya amfani da mu kan yin amfani da wasu mutane na karwati-harshen. We applied our model for the Turkish-Finnish language pair on the bilingual word translation task.  Mataimakin ya nuna cewa misalinmu yana ƙaranci motel-layin basuɓa da 2% a danne mafi kusa.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Saying Nang kuwi iki, kita supoyo model sing basa nang modèl, supoyo nggawe gerakan kanggo nyebute kanggo langgar banter Monday Awak dhéwé ngejaraké model kanggo masara urip-Finis kuwi nganggo pawaran langgar tarjamahan. Ngomongé wong-wong kuwi modellu kuwi nggawe model sing bisa diantel iki% ning halaman sing nêmên bangsane bisa diantel sing nêmêr.', 'sk': 'Medjezični modeli za vdelavo besed se učijo skupnega vektorskega prostora za dva ali več jezikov, tako da so besede s podobnim pomenom predstavljene s podobnimi vektorji ne glede na njihov jezik. Čeprav obstoječi modeli dosegajo visoko učinkovitost pri parih morfološko preprostih jezikih, so zelo slabi pri morfološko bogatih jezikih, kot sta turščina in finščina. V prispevku predlagamo morfemski model z namenom povečanja učinkovitosti medjezičnih besednih vdelav v morfološko bogate jezike. Naš model vključuje preprosto razširitev, ki nam omogoča izkoriščanje morfemov za medjezično kartiranje. Naš model za turško-finski jezikovni par smo uporabili pri dvojezičnem prevajanju besed. Rezultati kažejo, da naš model presega osnovne modele za 2% v najbližji sosedski lestvici.', 'bo': 'Cross-lingual word embedding models learn a shared vector space for two or more languages so that words with similar meaning are represented by similar vectors regardless of their language. གནས་ཡུལ་པའི་མིག ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བརྗོད་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལྟར་བསམ་བྱས་པར། དེ་ནི་སྔར་སྒྲིག་ཐབས་ལམ་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་ ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྟབས་བདེ་འཇགས་རིས་གཅིག་གི་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པས། ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་མིག་དབྱིབས་གཅིག་རྩིས་བྱས་ན་Turkish-Finnish་སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་གནང་བ་དང་། གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཟུགས་ཁྱིམ་གྱི་སྒྲིག་གཟུགས་རིས་དཔེ་གཞི་རྣམ་པ་དེ་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Deep learning contextual models for prediction of sport event outcome from sportsman’s interviews', 'ar': 'نماذج سياقية التعلم العميق للتنبؤ بنتائج الأحداث الرياضية من مقابلات الرياضيين', 'es': 'Modelos contextuales de aprendizaje profundo para predecir el resultado de eventos deportivos a partir de entrevistas con deportistas', 'pt': 'Modelos contextuais de aprendizado profundo para previsão do resultado de eventos esportivos a partir de entrevistas com desportistas', 'fr': "Modèles contextuels d'apprentissage profond pour la prédiction des résultats d'événements sportifs à partir d'entretiens avec des sportifs", 'zh': '深学上下文模,用于运动员访谈体育赛事', 'ja': 'スポーツマンのインタビューからスポーツイベントの結果を予測するための深い学習の文脈モデル', 'hi': 'खिलाड़ी के साक्षात्कार से खेल घटना के परिणाम की भविष्यवाणी के लिए गहरी सीखने के प्रासंगिक मॉडल', 'ru': 'Контекстные модели глубокого обучения для прогнозирования исхода спортивного события на основе интервью со спортсменом', 'ga': 'Samhlacha comhthéacsúla foghlama domhain chun toradh imeachtaí spóirt ó agallaimh le fear spóirt a thuar', 'hu': 'Mélytanulási kontextusmodellek a sportesemények kimenetelének előrejelzésére a sportolói interjúkból', 'el': 'Μοντέλα βαθιάς μάθησης για την πρόβλεψη του αποτελέσματος αθλητικών γεγονότων από συνεντεύξεις αθλητή', 'ka': 'სკენტექსტური მოდელები სპორტის ინტერუფუტების შემდეგ სპორტის მოვლენისთვის', 'it': 'Modelli contestuali di deep learning per la previsione dei risultati degli eventi sportivi dalle interviste degli sportivi', 'kk': 'Спорттың сұрақтарынан спорт оқиғаларының нәтижесін көрсету үшін тәртіпсіздік моделдері', 'lt': 'Išsamaus mokymosi kontekstiniai modeliai, pagal kuriuos galima prognozuoti sporto renginių rezultatus iš sportininkų interviu', 'mk': 'Длабоко учење контекстуални модели за предвидување на исходите од спортски настани од интервјуата на спортистите', 'ms': 'Model kontekstual pembelajaran dalam untuk ramalan hasil peristiwa sukan dari temuduga sukan', 'ml': 'കളിയുടെ സംഭാഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്ട്രോക്ട്മാന്റെ അവസാനം പ്രവചിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന', 'mt': "Deep learning contextual models for prediction of sport event outcome from sportsman's interviews", 'mn': 'Спорт үйл явдлын үр дүнг спортын ярилцлагаанаас гарч ирсэн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн загвар', 'pl': 'Modele kontekstowe głębokiego uczenia służące do przewidywania wyników wydarzeń sportowych z wywiadów sportowych', 'no': 'Deep learning contextual models for forhåndsvising av sporthendingar frå intervjuane av sportsmenyen', 'ro': 'Modele contextuale de învățare profundă pentru predicția rezultatelor evenimentelor sportive din interviurile sportivului', 'sr': 'Duboko učenje kontekstualnih modela za predviđanje sportskih događaja iz intervjua sporta', 'si': 'ස්පෝර්ටස්මාන්ගේ සංවේදනයෙන් ගොඩක් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට', 'so': 'Tusaale hoos u ah barashada qaababka iskuulka ah oo laga hor jeedo qaababka dhacdooyinka jimicsiga ee wareysiga isboortiga', 'sv': 'Deep learning kontextuella modeller för prediktion av idrottshändelseutfall från idrottsmännens intervjuer', 'ta': "Deep learning contextual models for prediction of sport event outcome from sportsman's interviews", 'ur': 'کھیل کے انٹوریوں سے کھیل پڑھنے کے نتائج کی پیش بینی کے لئے عمیق سیکھنے کی کنٹکسٹ موڈل', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Các mô hình ngữ học s âu sắc cho dự đoán các sự kiện thể thao từ các phỏng vấn thể thao', 'bg': 'Дълбоко обучение контекстуални модели за прогнозиране на резултатите от спортни събития от интервюта на спортисти', 'nl': 'Deep learning contextuele modellen voor voorspelling van de uitkomst van sportevenementen uit sportinterviews', 'de': 'Deep Learning Kontextmodelle zur Vorhersage von Sportereignisergebnissen aus Sportlerinterviews', 'da': 'Deep learning kontekstuelle modeller til forudsigelse af sportsbegivenhedens resultater fra sportsinterviews', 'ko': '운동선수 인터뷰에서 체육 경기 결과를 예측하는 심도 있는 학습 상황 모델', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای متقابل یادگیری عمیق برای پیش\u200cبینی از نتیجه رویداد ورزشی از مصاحبه\u200cهای ورزشی', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kwa kina mifano ya kisasa kwa kutabiri matokeo ya tukio la michezo kutoka kwa mahojiano ya mchezo', 'hr': 'Duboko učenje contextualnih modela za predviđanje rezultata sportskih događaja iz intervjua sporta', 'af': 'Deep leer contextual modele vir voorskou van sportgebeurtenis uit sportsman s intervjuis', 'am': 'የስፖርት ግንኙነት ፍጻሜ ከስፖርት ግንኙነት ለመቀበል ጥልቅ ተማርቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Սպորտամենի հարցազրույցների արդյունքները սպորտամենի իրադարձությունների կանխատեսելու խորը սովորելու կոնտեքստալ մոդելներ', 'id': 'Model kontekstual pembelajaran dalam untuk prediksi hasil acara olahraga dari wawancara olahraga', 'az': 'Spor olaraq t톛dbirl톛rinin sonu칞lar캼n캼 칬yr톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n 칞톛tin 칬yr톛nm톛 m칲xt톛lif modell톛r', 'bn': "Deep learning contextual models for prediction of sport event outcome from sportsman's interviews", 'tr': 'Sporty taryşmalarynyň netijesi önlemek üçin derin öwrenmek contextual modelleri', 'ca': "Deep learning contextual models for prediction of sport event outcome from sportsman's interviews", 'sq': 'Modele kontekstuale të mësimit të thellë për parashikimin e rezultatit të veprimtarisë sportive nga intervistat e sportivëve', 'et': 'Sügavõppe kontekstimudelid spordiürituste tulemuste prognoosimiseks sportlaste intervjuudest', 'fi': 'Syväoppimisen kontekstuaaliset mallit urheilutapahtumien tulosten ennustamiseen urheilijoiden haastatteluista', 'bs': 'Duboko učenje contextualnih modela za predviđanje sportskog događaja iz intervjua sporta', 'cs': 'Kontextové modely hlubokého učení pro predikci výsledků sportovních událostí z rozhovorů se sportovcem', 'sk': 'Globoko učenje kontekstualnih modelov za napoved izida športnih dogodkov iz športnih intervjujev', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'he': "Deep learning contextual models for prediction of sport event outcome from sportsman's interviews", 'jv': 'deep', 'bo': 'གླེང་སྡེར་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཚོགས་ལས་རྗེས་སུ་འབྱུང་བའི་སྔོན་བསམ་གྱི་contextual Model'}
{'en': 'This paper presents an approach for prediction of results for sport events. Usually the sport forecasting approaches are based on structured data. We test the hypothesis that the sports results can be predicted by using natural language processing and machine learning techniques applied over interviews with the players shortly before the sport events. The proposed method uses deep learning contextual models, applied over unstructured textual documents. Several experiments were performed for interviews with players in individual sports like boxing, martial arts, and tennis. The results from the conducted experiment confirmed our initial assumption that an interview from a sportsman before a match contains information that can be used for prediction the outcome from it. Furthermore, the results provide strong evidence in support of our research hypothesis, that is, we can predict the outcome from a sport match analyzing an interview, given before it.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta uma abordagem para previsão de resultados para eventos esportivos. Normalmente, as abordagens de previsão esportiva são baseadas em dados estruturados. Testamos a hipótese de que os resultados esportivos podem ser previstos usando processamento de linguagem natural e técnicas de aprendizado de máquina aplicadas em entrevistas com os jogadores pouco antes dos eventos esportivos. O método proposto utiliza modelos contextuais de aprendizado profundo, aplicados sobre documentos textuais não estruturados. Vários experimentos foram realizados para entrevistas com jogadores de esportes individuais como boxe, artes marciais e tênis. Os resultados do experimento realizado confirmaram nossa suposição inicial de que uma entrevista de um esportista antes de uma partida contém informações que podem ser usadas para prever o resultado da mesma. Além disso, os resultados fornecem fortes evidências em apoio à nossa hipótese de pesquisa, ou seja, podemos prever o resultado de uma partida esportiva analisando uma entrevista, dada antes dela.', 'fr': "Cet article présente une approche pour la prédiction des résultats d'événements sportifs. Les approches de prévision sportive sont généralement basées sur des données structurées. Nous testons l'hypothèse selon laquelle les résultats sportifs peuvent être prédits en utilisant le traitement du langage naturel et des techniques d'apprentissage automatique appliquées lors d'entretiens avec les joueurs peu de temps avant les événements sportifs. La méthode proposée utilise des modèles contextuels d'apprentissage profond, appliqués à des documents textuels non structurés. Plusieurs expériences ont été réalisées pour des entrevues avec des joueurs de sports individuels tels que la boxe, les arts martiaux et le tennis. Les résultats de l'expérience menée ont confirmé notre hypothèse initiale selon laquelle un entretien avec un sportif avant un match contient des informations pouvant être utilisées pour en prédire le résultat. De plus, les résultats fournissent des preuves solides à l'appui de notre hypothèse de recherche, c'est-à-dire que nous pouvons prédire le résultat d'un match sportif en analysant un entretien, donné avant celui-ci.", 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة نهجا للتنبؤ بنتائج الأحداث الرياضية. عادة ما تعتمد أساليب التنبؤ الرياضي على البيانات المنظمة. نحن نختبر الفرضية القائلة بأنه يمكن توقع النتائج الرياضية باستخدام تقنيات معالجة اللغة الطبيعية والتعلم الآلي المطبقة على المقابلات مع اللاعبين قبل فترة وجيزة من الأحداث الرياضية. الطريقة المقترحة تستخدم نماذج سياقية التعلم العميق ، مطبقة على الوثائق النصية غير المهيكلة. تم إجراء العديد من التجارب لإجراء مقابلات مع لاعبين في الرياضات الفردية مثل الملاكمة وفنون الدفاع عن النفس والتنس. أكدت نتائج التجربة التي تم إجراؤها افتراضنا الأولي بأن المقابلة التي أجراها رياضي قبل المباراة تحتوي على معلومات يمكن استخدامها للتنبؤ بنتائجها. علاوة على ذلك ، تقدم النتائج دليلًا قويًا يدعم فرضيتنا البحثية ، أي أنه يمكننا التنبؤ بنتيجة مباراة رياضية تحلل مقابلة معروضة قبلها.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un enfoque para la predicción de resultados de eventos deportivos. Por lo general, los enfoques de predicción deportiva se basan en datos estructurados. Probamos la hipótesis de que los resultados deportivos se pueden predecir mediante el uso de técnicas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural y aprendizaje automático aplicadas en entrevistas con los jugadores poco antes de los eventos deportivos. El método propuesto utiliza modelos contextuales de aprendizaje profundo, aplicados sobre documentos textuales no estructurados. Se realizaron varios experimentos para entrevistas con jugadores de deportes individuales como el boxeo, las artes marciales y el tenis. Los resultados del experimento realizado confirmaron nuestra suposición inicial de que una entrevista con un deportista antes de un partido contiene información que se puede utilizar para predecir el resultado del mismo. Además, los resultados proporcionan pruebas sólidas que respaldan nuestra hipótesis de investigación, es decir, podemos predecir el resultado de un partido deportivo analizando una entrevista, dada antes.', 'ja': '本稿では、スポーツ種目の結果を予測するためのアプローチを提示する。通常、スポーツ予測アプローチは構造化されたデータに基づいています。私たちは、スポーツイベントの直前にプレイヤーとのインタビューで適用された自然言語処理と機械学習技術を使用して、スポーツの結果を予測できるという仮説をテストします。提案された方法は、非構造化テキスト文書に適用されるディープラーニングコンテキストモデルを使用する。ボクシング、格闘技、テニスなどの個人競技の選手へのインタビューのためにいくつかの実験が行われた。実施した実験の結果は、試合前のスポーツマンからのインタビューに、その結果を予測するために使用できる情報が含まれているという当初の仮定を確認した。さらに、結果は、私たちの研究仮説を裏付ける強力な証拠を提供します。つまり、その前に与えられたインタビューを分析するスポーツマッチから結果を予測することができます。', 'zh': '本文有占体育赛事之术。 常体育测术,结构化数也。 试一假设,即体育比赛得体育赛事前日于球员采访中应用自然语言处机器学术以测之。 所立法用深度学上下文模形,宜于非结构化本文档。 拳击,武术及网球等所运球员采访数实验。 实验实吾初设,前运动员采访包。 此外,所以助我者强证,亦谓我可以测体育比赛析之前采也。', 'ru': 'В данной работе представлен подход к прогнозированию результатов спортивных мероприятий. Обычно подходы к прогнозированию спорта основаны на структурированных данных. Мы проверяем гипотезу о том, что спортивные результаты могут быть предсказаны с помощью обработки естественного языка и методов машинного обучения, применяемых в ходе интервью с игроками незадолго до спортивных событий. Предложенный метод использует контекстные модели глубокого обучения, применяемые над неструктурированными текстовыми документами. Несколько экспериментов были проведены для интервью с игроками в отдельных видах спорта, таких как бокс, боевые искусства и теннис. Результаты проведенного эксперимента подтвердили наше первоначальное предположение о том, что интервью спортсмена перед матчем содержит информацию, которая может быть использована для прогнозирования его исхода. Кроме того, результаты дают веские доказательства в поддержку нашей исследовательской гипотезы, то есть мы можем предсказать результат спортивного матча, анализируя интервью, данное до него.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo cur chuige i láthair chun torthaí imeachtaí spóirt a thuar. De ghnáth bíonn na cineálacha cur chuige réamhaisnéise spóirt bunaithe ar shonraí struchtúrtha. Déanaimid tástáil ar an hipitéis gur féidir na torthaí spóirt a thuar trí theicnící próiseála teanga nádúrtha agus meaisínfhoghlama a úsáid a chuirtear i bhfeidhm thar agallaimh leis na himreoirí go gairid roimh na himeachtaí spóirt. Úsáideann an modh atá beartaithe samhlacha comhthéacsúla foghlama domhain, a chuirtear i bhfeidhm thar dhoiciméid neamhstruchtúrtha téacs. Rinneadh roinnt turgnamh le haghaidh agallaimh le himreoirí aonair i spóirt mar dornálaíocht, healaíona comhraic, agus leadóg. Dhearbhaigh torthaí an turgnaimh a rinneamar ár dtoimhde tosaigh go bhfuil faisnéis in agallamh le fear spóirt roimh chluiche is féidir a úsáid chun an toradh a thuar. Ina theannta sin, cuireann na torthaí fianaise láidir ar fáil a thacaíonn lenár hipitéis taighde, is é sin, is féidir linn toradh a thuar ó chluiche spóirt agus anailís á déanamh ar agallamh, a tugadh roimhe.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर खेल की घटनाओं के लिए परिणामों की भविष्यवाणी के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करता है। आमतौर पर खेल पूर्वानुमान दृष्टिकोण संरचित डेटा पर आधारित होते हैं। हम इस परिकल्पना का परीक्षण करते हैं कि खेल के परिणामों को खेल की घटनाओं से कुछ समय पहले खिलाड़ियों के साथ साक्षात्कार पर लागू प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण और मशीन सीखने की तकनीकों का उपयोग करके भविष्यवाणी की जा सकती है। प्रस्तावित विधि गहरी सीखने के प्रासंगिक मॉडल का उपयोग करती है, जो असंरचित पाठ्य दस्तावेजों पर लागू होती है। मुक्केबाजी, मार्शल आर्ट और टेनिस जैसे व्यक्तिगत खेलों में खिलाड़ियों के साथ साक्षात्कार के लिए कई प्रयोग किए गए थे। आयोजित प्रयोग के परिणामों ने हमारी प्रारंभिक धारणा की पुष्टि की कि एक मैच से पहले एक खिलाड़ी से एक साक्षात्कार में ऐसी जानकारी होती है जिसका उपयोग इसके परिणाम की भविष्यवाणी के लिए किया जा सकता है। इसके अलावा, परिणाम हमारे शोध परिकल्पना के समर्थन में मजबूत सबूत प्रदान करते हैं, अर्थात, हम एक साक्षात्कार का विश्लेषण करने वाले खेल मैच से परिणाम की भविष्यवाणी कर सकते हैं, जो इससे पहले दिया गया था।', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια προσέγγιση για την πρόβλεψη των αποτελεσμάτων για αθλητικές εκδηλώσεις. Συνήθως οι προσεγγίσεις πρόβλεψης του αθλητισμού βασίζονται σε δομημένα δεδομένα. Εξετάζουμε την υπόθεση ότι τα αθλητικά αποτελέσματα μπορούν να προβλεφθούν χρησιμοποιώντας τεχνικές επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας και μηχανικής μάθησης που εφαρμόζονται σε συνεντεύξεις με τους παίκτες λίγο πριν από τις αθλητικές εκδηλώσεις. Η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος χρησιμοποιεί μοντέλα βαθιάς μάθησης που εφαρμόζονται πάνω σε μη δομημένα κείμενα. Αρκετά πειράματα πραγματοποιήθηκαν για συνεντεύξεις με παίκτες σε μεμονωμένα αθλήματα όπως πυγμαχία, πολεμικές τέχνες και τένις. Τα αποτελέσματα του πειράματος επιβεβαίωσαν την αρχική μας υπόθεση ότι μια συνέντευξη από έναν αθλητή πριν από έναν αγώνα περιέχει πληροφορίες που μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για την πρόβλεψη του αποτελέσματος από αυτό. Επιπλέον, τα αποτελέσματα παρέχουν ισχυρά στοιχεία που υποστηρίζουν την ερευνητική μας υπόθεση, δηλαδή μπορούμε να προβλέψουμε το αποτέλεσμα ενός αθλητικού αγώνα αναλύοντας μια συνέντευξη που δόθηκε πριν από αυτόν.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a sportrendezvények eredményeinek előrejelzésére szolgáló megközelítést. A sportelőrejelzési megközelítések általában strukturált adatokon alapulnak. Teszteljük azt a hipotézist, hogy a sporteredmények előrejelzése természetes nyelvfeldolgozással és gépi tanulási technikákkal történő alkalmazással történik, röviddel a sportrendezvények előtt folytatott interjúk során. A javasolt módszer mélytanulási kontextusmodelleket használ, amelyeket strukturálatlan szöveges dokumentumokon alkalmaznak. Számos kísérletet végeztünk az egyéni sportok, mint például a boksz, a harcművészet és a tenisz játékosaival való interjúkhoz. Az elvégzett kísérlet eredményei megerősítették a kezdeti feltételezésünket, hogy egy sportoló interjúja mérkőzés előtt olyan információkat tartalmaz, amelyek felhasználhatók az eredmény előrejelzésére. Továbbá az eredmények erőteljes bizonyítékot szolgáltatnak kutatási hipotézisünk alátámasztására, azaz előre adott interjú elemzésével meg tudjuk jósolni egy sportmérkőzés eredményét.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აჩვენებს სპორტის მოვლენებისთვის წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენისთვის. სტრუქტურებული მონაცემების დასაბაზია. ჩვენ შევცვალოთ ჰიპოტეზას, რომ სპორტის შედეგები შეიძლება იყენება, რომლებიც გამოყენებული ნეიროლური ენის პროცესი და მაქსინური სწავლების ტექნოგიები, რომლებიც ინტერ პროგრამის გამოყენება ძალიან სწავლის კონტექსტური მოდელების გამოყენება, რომელიც არ შექმნილი ტექსტურული დოკუმენტებზე გამოყენებული. ბევრი ექსპერიმენტები იყო ინტერუქტურებისთვის თამაშვებისთვის ინტერუქტირებისთვის, როგორც ბოქსირება, ბოქსირება და ტენისთვის. გავაკეთებული ექსპერიმენტის შედეგები დარწმუნება ჩვენი პირველ წარმოდგენისთვის, რომ სპორტისმენტის ინტერუქტური იყოს ინფორმაცია, რომელიც შეიძლება გამოიყენება მას შედე დამატებით, შედეგი შემდეგ ძალიან წარმოდგენება ჩვენი სწავლობის ჰიპოტეზეზაზე, ეს არის, რომ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია წარმოდგენოთ სპორტის მაგალითიდან ანალიზაციას, რომელიც ინტე', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un approccio per la previsione dei risultati degli eventi sportivi. Di solito gli approcci di previsione sportiva si basano su dati strutturati. Testiamo l'ipotesi che i risultati sportivi possano essere previsti utilizzando tecniche di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale e machine learning applicate su interviste con i giocatori poco prima degli eventi sportivi. Il metodo proposto utilizza modelli contestuali di deep learning, applicati su documenti testuali non strutturati. Diversi esperimenti sono stati eseguiti per interviste con giocatori in singoli sport come la boxe, le arti marziali e il tennis. I risultati dell'esperimento condotto hanno confermato la nostra ipotesi iniziale che un colloquio di uno sportivo prima di una partita contiene informazioni che possono essere utilizzate per predire il risultato da esso. Inoltre, i risultati forniscono solide prove a sostegno della nostra ipotesi di ricerca, cioè possiamo prevedere l'esito di una partita sportiva analizzando un'intervista, data prima di essa.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas sporto renginių rezultatų prognozavimo metodas. Paprastai sporto prognozavimo metodai grindžiami struktūriniais duomenimis. Bandome hipotezę, kad sporto rezultatus galima prognozuoti naudojant natūralius kalbų apdorojimo ir mašininio mokymosi metodus, taikomus per pokalbius su žaidėjais netrukus prieš sporto renginius. Siūlomas metodas naudoja gilaus mokymosi kontekstinius modelius, taikomus netruktūrizuotiems tekstiniams dokumentams. Keletas eksperimentų buvo atlikta interviu su asmeniniais sporto žaidėjais, pavyzdžiui, boksu, kovos meno ir teniso. Eksperimento rezultatai patvirtino mūsų pradinę prielaidą, kad sportininko interviu prieš žaidimą pateikiama informacija, kuri gali būti naudojama jo rezultatams prognozuoti. Be to, rezultatai suteikia tvirtų įrodymų, patvirtinančių mūsų mokslinių tyrimų hipotezę, t. y. galime prognozuoti sporto žaidimo rezultatus analizuojant prieš tai atliktą pokalbį.', 'mk': 'Овој весник претставува пристап за предвидување на резултатите на спортските настани. Обично спортските прогнози се засновани на структурирани податоци. Ние ја тестираме хипотезата дека спортските резултати може да се предвидат со употреба на природни техники за процес на јазик и машинско учење применети за време на интервјуата со играчите наскоро пред спортските настани. Предложениот метод користи контекстни модели за длабоко учење, применети врз неструктурираните текстуални документи. Неколку експерименти беа спроведени за интервјуа со играчи во индивидуални спортови како бокс, воени уметности и тенис. Резултатите од спроведениот експеримент ја потврдија нашата првична претпоставка дека интервјуто од спортист пред натпреварот содржи информации кои може да се користат за предвидување на исходот од него. Furthermore, the results provide strong evidence in support of our research hypothesis, that is, we can predict the outcome from a sport match analyzing an interview, given before it.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз спорт оқиғаларының нәтижелерін көрсетеді. Әдетте спорт бағдарламалары құрылған деректеріне негізделген. Спорттың нәтижелерін табиғи тіл процессорын және машиналық оқыту техникаларын спорт оқиғаларының алдында жақын сұрақтар үшін қолданып қолданылатын спорттың нәтижелерін тексереміз. Келтірілген әдіс, құрылмаған мәтін құжаттары арқылы қолданылатын терең оқыту контексті үлгілерін қолданады. Көптеген тәжірибелер бокс, бокс және теннис секілді әрбір спорттан ойнатушылармен сұрақтар үшін орындалды. Орындалған тәжірибенің нәтижелері біздің бастапқы тәжірибеміздің спортсмен сұрақ алдында оның нәтижесін бақылау үшін қолданылатын мәліметті бар деп ойладық. Сонымен қатар, зерттеулердің гипотезиясын қолдау үшін күшті құқықтар береді, мысалы, біз оның алдында келтірілген сұрақ анализациялау спорттың нәтижесін бақылай аламыз.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan pendekatan untuk ramalan keputusan untuk peristiwa sukan. Biasanya pendekatan ramalan sukan berdasarkan data struktur. Kami menguji hipotesis bahawa hasil sukan boleh dijangka dengan menggunakan teknik pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi dan pembelajaran mesin yang dilaksanakan melalui temuduga dengan pemain segera sebelum peristiwa sukan. Kaedah yang diusulkan menggunakan model kontekstual pembelajaran dalam, dilaksanakan atas dokumen teks tidak terstruktur. Beberapa eksperimen dilakukan untuk temuduga dengan pemain sukan individu seperti tinju, seni bela diri, dan tenis. Hasil eksperimen yang dilakukan mengesahkan asumsi awal kita bahawa temuduga dari seorang ahli sukan sebelum pertandingan mengandungi maklumat yang boleh digunakan untuk ramalan hasilnya. Selain itu, hasilnya memberikan bukti yang kuat untuk menyokong hipotesis kajian kita, iaitu, kita boleh meramalkan hasil dari pertandingan sukan menganalisis temuduga, diberikan sebelum itu.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta approċċ għat-tbassir tar-riżultati għall-avvenimenti sportivi. Ġeneralment l-approċċi tat-tbassir sportiv huma bbażati fuq dejta strutturata. We test the hypothesis that the sports results can be predicted by using natural language processing and machine learning techniques applied over interviews with the players shortly before the sport events.  Il-metodu propost juża mudelli kuntestwali ta’ tagħlim profond, applikati fuq dokumenti testwali mhux strutturati. Saru diversi esperimenti għal intervisti ma’ parteċipanti fl-isports individwali bħall-boxing, l-arti martjali, u t-tenis. Ir-riżultati tal-esperiment imwettaq ikkonfermaw is-suppożizzjoni inizjali tagħna li intervista minn isportista qabel logħba fiha informazzjoni li tista’ tintuża għat-tbassir tar-riżultat tagħha. Barra minn hekk, ir-riżultati jipprovdu evidenza qawwija b’appoġġ għall-ipoteżi tagħna tar-riċerka, jiġifieri, nistgħu nipprovaw ir-riżultat minn partita sportiva li tanalizza intervista, mogħtija qabel.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d കളിയുടെ അനുഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു വഴികാട്ടിയാണ സാധാരണയായി ഈ സ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് മുന്നോട്ട് നടപടികള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിച്ച വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്നു. സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതും യന്ത്ര പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകളുടെ കൂടെയുള്ള വ്യാഭാഷയ്ക്കുകള പ്രൊദേശിച്ച രീതി ബോക്സിംഗ്, മാര്\u200dട്ടിയില്\u200d ആര്\u200dട്ടികള്\u200d, ടെനിസ് നടപ്പില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ആദ്യമായ ഊഹിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു കളിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ഒരു ഇന്റ്രിവ്യൂര്\u200dവ്യൂ ഉണ്ടാക്കു അതുകൊണ്ടും, ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പഠിക്കുന്ന ഹൈപ്പിയറ്റിയെ പിന്തുണക്കുന്നതിന് ശക്തിയുള്ള തെളിവുകള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. അതിനു മുമ്പ് നല്\u200dകപ്പെ', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас спортын үйл явдлын үр дүнг таамаглах арга замыг харуулдаг. Ихэнхдээ спортын таамаглах арга баримтууд бүтээгдэхүүн өгөгдлийн үндсэн. Бид спортын үр дүн нь байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэл болон машин суралцах техникуудыг спортын үйлдвэрлэлийн өмнө ярилцлаганд хэрэглэгдсэн гэдгийг судалж болно. Өөрчлөлтийн арга нь гүн суралцах орчин үеийн загварыг ашигладаг, бүтээгдэхүүнгүй текст баримт дээр хэрэглэгдсэн. Олон туршилтууд бокс, дайны урлаг, теннис зэрэг тоглогчидтай ярилцлага хийгдсэн. Дасгал хийсэн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний эхний талаар спортсманы ярилцлагын дараа тоглоомоос өмнө хэрэглэгдэх мэдээллийг тодорхойлдог. Үүний үр дүнд бидний судалгааны талаар дэмжиж байгаа хүчтэй баталгаа өгнө гэсэн үг. Энэ бол бид үүнээс өмнө өгсөн ярилцлагын талаар спортын тоглоомын үр дүнг таамаглаж чадна.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea prezintă o abordare pentru predicția rezultatelor evenimentelor sportive. De obicei, abordările de prognoză sportivă se bazează pe date structurate. Testăm ipoteza că rezultatele sportive pot fi prezise folosind tehnici de procesare a limbajului natural și de învățare automată aplicate în interviuri cu jucătorii cu puțin timp înainte de evenimentele sportive. Metoda propusă utilizează modele contextuale de învățare profundă, aplicate peste documente textuale nestructurate. Au fost efectuate mai multe experimente pentru interviuri cu jucători din sporturi individuale precum box, arte marțiale și tenis. Rezultatele experimentului efectuat au confirmat presupunerea noastră inițială că un interviu de la un sportiv înainte de un meci conține informații care pot fi folosite pentru a predice rezultatul acestuia. Mai mult decât atât, rezultatele oferă dovezi puternice în sprijinul ipotezei noastre de cercetare, adică putem prezice rezultatul unui meci sportiv analizând un interviu dat înainte de acesta.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono podejście do przewidywania wyników wydarzeń sportowych. Zazwyczaj podejścia do prognozowania sportu opierają się na danych ustrukturyzowanych. Testujemy hipotezę, że wyniki sportowe można przewidzieć za pomocą technik przetwarzania języka naturalnego i uczenia maszynowego stosowanych w wywiadach z zawodnikami krótko przed wydarzeniami sportowymi. Proponowana metoda wykorzystuje modele kontekstowe głębokiego uczenia, stosowane na nieustrukturyzowanych dokumentach tekstowych. Przeprowadzono kilka eksperymentów dla wywiadów z graczami w poszczególnych sportach, takich jak boks, sztuki walki i tenis. Wyniki przeprowadzonego eksperymentu potwierdziły nasze wstępne założenie, że wywiad sportowca przed meczem zawiera informacje, które można wykorzystać do przewidywania wyników z niego. Ponadto wyniki dostarczają mocnych dowodów na poparcie naszej hipotezy badawczej, czyli możemy przewidzieć wynik meczu sportowego analizując dany wcześniej wywiad.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja pristup predviđanju rezultata sportskih događaja. Obično su pristupi predviđanja sporta zasnovani na strukturiranim podacima. Testiramo hipotezu da se sportski rezultati mogu predviđati koristeći prirodne tehnike obrađivanja jezika i tehnike učenja mašina primjene na intervjue sa igračima uskoro prije sportskih događaja. Predložena metoda koristi duboke kontekstske modele učenja, primjenjene na neostrukturovanim tekstualnim dokumentima. Nekoliko eksperimenata je provedeno za intervjue sa igračima u individualnom sportu poput boksa, vojne umjetnosti i tenisa. Rezultati provođenog eksperimenta potvrdili su naše početne pretpostavke da intervju od sportista pre nego što se meč sadrži informacije koje mogu koristiti za predviđanje ishoda od njega. Nadalje, rezultati pružaju jake dokaze u podršci naše istraživačke hipoteze, to je da možemo predvidjeti rezultat sportskog meča koji analizira intervju, određen prije njega.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ස්පෝර්ට් සැරැස්මක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ස්පෝර්ට් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සංවිධානය කරපු දත්තේ අධාරණය කරනවා. අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා ස්ථානික භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ස්ථානයක් සෙල්ලම් එක්ක සංවේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විධානය භාවිතා කරනවා ගොඩක් සාමාන්තික විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, නිර්මාණය කළු  කිසිම පරීක්ෂණයක් කරලා තියෙන්නේ සෙල්ලම් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතිකාරියෝ ස්ථානයක් වගේ බොක්ස් එක, මාර්ටියල් කලාව පරීක්ෂණයේ පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අපේ පටන් ගත්ත විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙනවා අපේ පටන් ගත්ත විශ්වාස කරලා කියලා ස්පෝර්ට ඉතින්, ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අපේ පරීක්ෂණ සිද්ධ විශ්වාස සහයෙන් ශක්තිමත් සාක්ෂි දෙන්න පුළුවන්, අපිට පුළුව', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa qaabab ka hor dhigista dhacdooyinka jimicsiga. Inta badan horumarinta jimicsigu waxay ku saleysan yihiin macluumaad dhisan. Waxaynu tijaabinaynaa fikrada isboortiga si dhaqso ah ugu hor inta aysan dhaqso isboortiga isboortiga lagu sameyn karo baaritaanka afka dabiicadda ah iyo iskuulka waxbarashada maskaxda. Midabka la soo jeeday wuxuu isticmaalaa tusaalooyin aad u dheer oo waxbarashada, kaas oo lagu codsaday dukumentiyada qoraalka ee aan la dhisin. Isboortiga gaarka ah waxaa lagu sameeyay baaritaano badan oo lagu wareysiyo ciyaaraha, sida boxinta, farshaxanka martiga iyo tennis. Midhihii jirrabka lagu sameeyay waxay xaqiijiyeen malaha ugu horeeya in wareysiga laga helay ciyaaraha ka hor inta aysan ciyaartu wax ka helin macluumaad lagu isticmaali karo si uu uga hor tago matokejkiisa. Intaas waxaa dheer, arimaha la siiyaa caddeynta xoogga leh oo ku caawinaya fikirkeena cilmiga ah, taas oo ah, waxaynu ka horrayn karnaa dhamaadka ciyaaraha jimicsiga si a an u baariteyno wareysiga horay loo qoray.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar ett tillvägagångssätt för prediktion av resultat för idrottsevenemang. Vanligtvis baseras idrottsprognoserna på strukturerade data. Vi testar hypotesen att idrottsresultaten kan förutsägas med hjälp av naturliga språkbearbetnings- och maskininlärningstekniker som tillämpas över intervjuer med spelarna strax före sportevenemangen. Den föreslagna metoden använder djupinlärningsmodeller som tillämpas över ostrukturerade textdokument. Flera experiment utfördes för intervjuer med spelare inom individuella sporter som boxning, kampsport och tennis. Resultaten från det utförda experimentet bekräftade vårt ursprungliga antagande att en intervju från en idrottsman före en match innehåller information som kan användas för att förutsäga resultatet av den. Vidare ger resultaten starka bevis till stöd för vår forskningshypotes, det vill säga att vi kan förutsäga resultatet av en idrottsmatch genom att analysera en intervju, som ges före den.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் விளையாட்டு நிகழ்வுகளுக்கு முன்னோட்டத்தை கொடுக்கும் முன்னோட்டம் அளிக்கிறது. வழக்கமாக விளையாட்டு முன்னோட்டு முறைமைகள் அமைப்பு தகவல்களை அடிப்படையாக இருக்கிறது. We test the hypothesis that the sports results can be predicted by using natural language processing and machine learning techniques applied over interviews with the players shortly before the sport events.  பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் உள்ள நிலையான மாதிரிகளை ஆழமாக கற்றுக் கொள்கிறது, உருவாக்கப்படாத நிரல் ஆவணங விளையாடுபவர்களுடன் விளையாடுபவர்களுடன் விளையாட்டுக்களுடன் பல பரிசோதனைகள் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது. பெட்டிங், சட்ட கலைகள், மற்று செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட சோதனையின் முடிவு மேலும், முடிவு', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ کھیل حادثوں کے نتائج کی پیش بینی کے لئے ایک طریقہ پیش بینی کرتا ہے۔ معمولاً اسپارٹ ڈیٹ پر اسپارٹ کی پیش بینی کے طریقے بنے جاتے ہیں. ہم نے اس فرضی کو امتحان کر لیا ہے کہ اسپارٹ نتیجے کو سطح زبان پردازی اور ماشین تعلیم تکنیک کے استعمال کے ذریعے کھیل کرنے والوں کے ساتھ مصاحبات کے ذریعے سریع آگے مصاحبات کے ذریعے استعمال کیا جائے گا۔ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ عمیق سیکھنے کی کنٹکسٹیول موڈل کا استعمال کرتا ہے، جو غیر ساختہ ٹکسٹیول دکھانوں پر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. بہت سی آزمائش کی گئی تھی کہ باکسنگ، جنگل هنر اور تنیس کے مطابق پھیلانے والوں کے ساتھ انٹوریوں کے لئے کیا گیا۔ آزمائش کے نتیجے ہمارے آغاز فرض کی تصدیق کررہے ہیں کہ ایک کھیلنے والے سے پہلے ایک انٹوریو معلوم ہوتا ہے جو اس کے نتیجے کی پیش بینی کے لئے استعمال کر سکتی ہے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، نتائج ہمارے تحقیق فرضی کی مدد کے لئے مضبوط ثابت قدم رکھتے ہیں، یعنی، ہم اس سے پہلے ایک انٹوریو کی تحقیق کرنے کے لئے ایک کھیل کے مطابق کے نتائج کو پیش بینی کر سکتے ہیں۔', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser ein tilnærming for forhåndsvising av resultat for sporthendingar. Vanlegvis tilnærmingane for sport forecasting er basert på strukturerte data. Vi testar hypotesien at sportresultatet kan foregå ved å bruka naturspråk- handsaming og maskinelæringsteknikk som er brukt over intervjuar med spelarane kort lenge før sporthendingane. Den foreslåde metoden brukar dypt læringskontekstmodeller som er brukt over ikkje strukturerte tekstdokument. Fleire eksperimenter ble utført for intervjuar med spelarar i individuelle sport som boks, målskunst og tenis. Resultatet frå den gjeldande eksperimentet stadfestig vår første antar at ein intervju frå ein sportsman før ein treff inneheld informasjon som kan brukast for å foregå resultatet frå den. I tillegg kan resultatet gjere sterke beviser i støtte for forskningshipotesen våre, som er at vi kan foregå resultatet frå ein sport-treff som analyserer eit intervjuet, gitt før det.', 'uz': "Name Odatda, sport oldingan usullar yaratilgan maʼlumot asosida. We test the hypothesis that the sports results can be predicted by using natural language processing and machine learning techniques applied over interviews with the players shortly before the sport events.  Name Ko'pchilik tajribalari boshqa sportlar bilan o'quvchilar bilan interview qilindi, boxing, marta artlar va tennis soni kabi. Name Ko'rsatganda, natijalar taʼminlovchi hypotheyasiyamizni qo'llab beradi. Bu esa, biz avval berilgan intervju qilishni o'ylab, sport o'yincha natijalarini o'ylab olamiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đưa ra một phương pháp dự đoán kết quả cho các sự kiện thể thao. Thông thường phương pháp dự đoán thể thao dựa trên dữ liệu cơ cấu. Chúng tôi thử nghiệm giả thuyết kết quả thể thao có thể được dự đoán bằng cách sử dụng kỹ thuật ngôn ngữ tự nhiên và kỹ thuật học máy trong các cuộc phỏng vấn với các cầu thủ ngay trước các sự kiện thể thao. Dùng phương pháp đề nghị sử dụng các mô hình nền tập luyện sâu, áp dụng trên các tài liệu cấu trúc. Vài thí nghiệm được thực hiện để phỏng vấn các cầu thủ về thể thao cá nhân như đấm bốc, võ thuật và tennis. Kết quả của thí nghiệm đã xác nhận giả thiết ban đầu của chúng tôi rằng cuộc phỏng vấn của một người thể thao trước trận đấu chứa thông tin có thể dùng để dự đoán kết quả từ nó. Hơn nữa, kết quả cung cấp chứng cứ mạnh mẽ ủng hộ giả thuyết nghiên cứu của chúng ta, tức là, chúng ta có thể dự đoán kết quả từ một cuộc thi thể thao phân tích một cuộc phỏng vấn, được đưa ra trước nó.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя подход за прогнозиране на резултатите за спортни събития. Обикновено подходите за прогнозиране на спорта се основават на структурирани данни. Тестваме хипотезата, че спортните резултати могат да бъдат прогнозирани чрез използване на техники за обработка на естествен език и машинно обучение, приложени върху интервюта с играчите малко преди спортните събития. Предложеният метод използва контекстуални модели за дълбоко обучение, приложени върху неструктурирани текстови документи. Извършени са няколко експеримента за интервюта с играчи в индивидуални спортове като бокс, бойни изкуства и тенис. Резултатите от проведения експеримент потвърдиха първоначалното ни предположение, че интервю от спортист преди мач съдържа информация, която може да се използва за прогнозиране на резултата от него. Освен това резултатите предоставят силни доказателства в подкрепа на нашата изследователска хипотеза, т.е. можем да предвидим резултата от спортен мач, анализирайки дадено преди него интервю.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en tilgang til forudsigelse af resultater for sportsbegivenheder. Normalt er sportsprognoserne baseret på strukturerede data. Vi tester hypotesen om, at sportsresultaterne kan forudsiges ved hjælp af naturlig sprogbehandling og maskinlæringsteknikker anvendt over interviews med spillerne kort før sportsbegivenhederne. Den foreslåede metode bruger deep learning kontekstuelle modeller, der anvendes over ustrukturerede tekstdokumenter. Flere eksperimenter blev udført til interviews med spillere i individuelle sportsgrene som boksning, kampsport og tennis. Resultaterne fra det gennemførte eksperiment bekræftede vores oprindelige antagelse om, at et interview fra en sportsmand før en kamp indeholder oplysninger, der kan bruges til at forudsige resultatet af det. Desuden giver resultaterne stærke beviser til støtte for vores forskningshypotese, det vil sige, at vi kan forudsige resultatet af en sportskamp ved at analysere et interview, givet før det.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een benadering voor voorspelling van resultaten voor sportevenementen. Meestal zijn de sportvoorspellingen gebaseerd op gestructureerde data. We testen de hypothese dat de sportresultaten voorspeld kunnen worden door gebruik te maken van natuurlijke taalverwerking en machine learning technieken toegepast in interviews met de spelers kort voor de sportevenementen. De voorgestelde methode maakt gebruik van deep learning contextuele modellen, toegepast op ongestructureerde tekstuele documenten. Verschillende experimenten werden uitgevoerd voor interviews met spelers in individuele sporten zoals boksen, vechtsporten en tennis. De resultaten van het uitgevoerde experiment bevestigden onze eerste veronderstelling dat een interview van een sporter voorafgaand aan een wedstrijd informatie bevat die gebruikt kan worden om de uitkomst ervan te voorspellen. Bovendien leveren de resultaten sterk bewijs ter ondersteuning van onze onderzoekshypothese, dat wil zeggen dat we de uitkomst van een sportwedstrijd kunnen voorspellen die een interview voorafgaand analyseert.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag stellt einen Ansatz zur Vorhersage von Ergebnissen für Sportereignisse vor. In der Regel basieren die Sportprognoseansätze auf strukturierten Daten. Wir testen die Hypothese, dass die Sportergebnisse mittels natürlicher Sprachverarbeitung und maschinellem Lernen in Interviews mit den Spielern kurz vor den Sportereignissen vorhergesagt werden können. Die vorgeschlagene Methode verwendet Deep Learning Kontextmodelle, die auf unstrukturierte Textdokumente angewendet werden. Mehrere Experimente wurden für Interviews mit Spielern in einzelnen Sportarten wie Boxen, Kampfsport und Tennis durchgeführt. Die Ergebnisse des durchgeführten Experiments bestätigten unsere anfängliche Annahme, dass ein Interview mit einem Sportler vor einem Spiel Informationen enthält, die zur Vorhersage des Ergebnisses herangezogen werden können. Darüber hinaus liefern die Ergebnisse starke Beweise für unsere Forschungshypothese, das heißt, wir können das Ergebnis eines Sportmatches vorhersagen, indem wir ein Interview analysieren, das vor ihm gegeben wurde.', 'ko': '본고는 스포츠 경기의 성적을 예측하는 방법을 제시했다.일반적으로 스포츠 예측 방법은 구조화된 데이터를 바탕으로 한다.우리는 운동 성적이 자연 언어 처리와 기계 학습 기술을 사용하여 예측할 수 있다는 가설을 검증했다. 이런 기술은 운동 종목 얼마 전에 운동선수에 대한 인터뷰에 응용되었다.이 방법은 상하문 모델을 깊이 있게 학습하여 비구조화된 텍스트 문서에 응용한다.권투, 무술, 테니스 등 단일 종목의 운동선수에 대해 몇 가지 실험을 진행하였다.진행된 실험 결과는 우리의 최초의 가설, 즉 경기 전 선수들의 인터뷰가 결과를 예측할 수 있는 정보를 포함하고 있다는 것을 증명했다.또한 연구 결과는 우리의 연구 가설에 유력한 증거를 제공했다. 즉, 이전의 인터뷰를 분석함으로써 우리는 스포츠 경기의 결과를 예측할 수 있다는 것이다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaleta mbinu ya kutabiri matokeo ya matukio ya michezo. Mara nyingi mbinu za kutabiri michezo zinatumiwa na taarifa zilizotengenezwa. Tunajaribu dhana hiyo kwamba matokeo ya michezo yanaweza kutabiriwa kwa kutumia michezo ya asili na mbinu za kujifunza mashine zilizotumika kwa mahojiano na wachezaji kabla ya matukio ya michezo. The proposed method uses deep learning contextual models, applied over unstructured textual documents.  Majaribio kadhaa yalifanyika kwa ajili ya mahojiano na wachezaji katika michezo binafsi kama vile boksi, sanaa za kijeshi na tennis. Matokeo ya majaribio yaliyoendeshwa yalithibitisha dhana yetu ya mwanzo kwamba mahojiano kutoka kwa mchezo wa michezo kabla ya mechi hiyo ina taarifa ambazo zinaweza kutumika kwa kutabiri matokeo yake. Furthermore, the results provide strong evidence in support of our research hypothesis, that is, we can predict the outcome from a sport match analyzing an interview, given before it.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja pristup predviđanju rezultata sportskih događaja. Obično su pristupi predviđanja sporta temeljeni na strukturiranim podacima. Testiramo hipotezu da se sportski rezultati mogu predvidjeti koristeći prirodne tehnike obrade jezika i tehnike učenja strojeva primjenjene na intervjuima s igračima uskoro prije sportskih događaja. Predložena metoda koristi duboke kontekstske modele učenja, primjenjene na neostrukturovanim tekstualnim dokumentima. Nekoliko eksperimenata je provedeno za intervjue s igračima u individualnom sportu poput boksa, borbenih umjetnosti i tenisa. Rezultati provođenog eksperimenta potvrdili su naše početne pretpostavke da intervju od sportista prije nego što se utakmica sadrži informacije koje se mogu koristiti za predviđanje ishoda od njega. Nadalje, rezultati pružaju jake dokaze podrške našoj istraživačkoj hipotezi, to je, možemo predvidjeti ishod sportskog meča koji analizira intervju, predstavljen prije njega.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک روش برای پیش بینی نتایج برای اتفاقات ورزشی نشان می دهد. معمولاً تقریبا پیش\u200cبینی ورزش بر روی داده\u200cهای ساخته شده\u200cاند. ما فرضیه\u200cای را امتحان می\u200cکنیم که نتیجه\u200cهای ورزش می\u200cتوانند با استفاده از فناوری\u200cهای پردازش زبان طبیعی و آموزش ماشین\u200cها بر مصاحبه\u200cها با بازیکنان پیش از رویدادهای ورزش پیش\u200cبینی کنند. این روش پیشنهاد از مدل\u200cهای متوسط عمیق یادگیری استفاده می\u200cکند که بر اساس مدارک متوسط ساخته نشده است. چندتا آزمایش برای مصاحبه با بازیگران در ورزشهای شخصی مثل بوکس، هنر جنگی و تنیس انجام شد. نتیجه\u200cهای آزمایش انجام شده تصدیق کردند فرضیه اولیه ما را که یک مصاحبه از یک ورزشکار قبل از اینکه یک مسابقه شامل اطلاعات است که می\u200cتواند برای پیش\u200cبینی نتیجه از آن استفاده شود. علاوه بر این، نتیجه\u200cها مدرک قوی را در پشتیبانی از فرضیه تحقیقات ما می\u200cدهند، یعنی، ما می\u200cتوانیم نتیجه\u200cای از یک مسابقه ورزشی را پیش بینی کنیم که تحلیل یک مصاحبه، قبل از آن داده شده است.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n toegang voor voorskou van resultate vir sportgebeurtenis. Gewoonlik word die sportvoorskou toegang gebaseer op struktureerde data. Ons probeer die hipotesis dat die sportresultate kan voorskou word deur die gebruik van natuurlike taal verwerking en masjien leer teknike wat op intervjuis met die spelers kort voor die sportgebeurtenis aangepas word. Die voorgestelde metode gebruik diep onderwerp contextual modele wat aangepas word oor ongestruktureerde teksdokumente. Verskeie eksperimente is uitgevoer vir intervjuis met spelers in individuele sporte soos boks, martial kunste en tenis. Die resultate van die gedoende eksperiment het ons aanvanklike aanvaar bevestig dat 'n intervjuis van 'n sportsman voor' n ooreenstemming bevat inligting wat kan gebruik word vir voorskou van die uitgaande daarvan. Ook, die resultate verskaf sterk getuienis in ondersteun van ons ondersoek hipotees, dit is, ons kan voorskou die resultaat van 'n sportooreenkoms wat 'n intervjuis analiseer, gegee voor dit.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz sport wajyplaryň netijelerini tahmin etmek üçin bir golaýy görkezýär. Adatça sport önlenme golaýlary strukturly maglumatlara daýanýar. Biz sportyň netijelerini tebigy dil işlemegi we maşynyň öwrenmesi tekniklerini oýunçylar bilen gysga wagtdan öň görüşmeleri bilen tapawutlandyrylýandyr. Ýaglaýyn metin däpli derin öwrenmek modinden ullanýar Birnäçe sportlarda boks, döwlet sanatlar we tenis ýaly oýunçylar bilen görüşmeler üçin birnäçe deneyler edildi. Testiň netijesi biziň başlangyç çarpylygymyzyň sportsmanyň görüşmeginiň oňünden öň olaryň netijesini çaklamak üçin ulanylar maglumaty bardygyny tassyklady. Munuň üçin netijelerimiz, araştyrymyzyň hipotesiýasyna kömekleýän güýçli kanlag getirip bileris, şol diýipdir, biz sport maşynyň netijelerini intervjuýusiýa çykyp, munyň öňünden berilen netijelerini tahmin edip bileris.', 'am': 'This paper presents an approach for prediction of results for sport events.  በዕድሜው የጨዋታ አካባቢ ሀብት የተመሳሳይ የጨዋታ ደረጃዎች ናቸው፡፡ የጨዋታውን ውጤቶች የፍጥረቱ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ እና የመሳሪያውን ማስተማር እውቀት ከጨዋታው ጉዳይ በፊት ከሚጠያየቁት ጋር ለመጠየቅ እናስፈትናለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት የጥልቅ ትምህርት ምሳሌዎችን ይጠቅማል፣ በተገኘው የጽሑፍ ሰነዶች ላይ ይጠቅማል፡፡ ብዙዎች ፈተናዎች እንደቦክስ፣ ማርታዊ አርእስት እና ከቴንኒስ ጋር በጨዋታ ጨዋታዎች ጋር ለማጠቃቀሚያ ይደረጋሉ፡፡ The results from the conducted experiment confirmed our initial assumption that an interview from a sportsman before a match contains information that can be used for prediction the outcome from it.  ከዚህም በላይ ፍሬዎቹ በተምርመራ ጉዳይ ላይ የኃይለኛ ማስረጃዎችን ይሰጡናል፤ ይህ በፊት የተሰጠውን የጨዋታውን የጨዋታ መጫወቻ ፍጻሜውን ለመፍጠር እንችላለን፡፡', 'id': 'Kertas ini menunjukkan pendekatan untuk prediksi hasil untuk acara olahraga. Usually the sport forecasting approaches are based on structured data.  We test the hypothesis that the sports results can be predicted by using natural language processing and machine learning techniques applied over interviews with the players shortly before the sport events.  Metode yang diusulkan menggunakan model kontekstual belajar dalam, diterapkan atas dokumen teks yang tidak terstruktur. Beberapa eksperimen dilakukan untuk wawancara dengan pemain olahraga individu seperti tinju, seni bela diri, dan tenis. Hasil dari eksperimen yang dilakukan mengkonfirmasi asumsi awal kita bahwa wawancara dari seorang olahraga sebelum pertandingan mengandung informasi yang dapat digunakan untuk prediksi hasilnya. Selain itu, hasilnya memberikan bukti yang kuat untuk mendukung hipotesis penelitian kita, yaitu, kita dapat memprediksi hasil dari pertandingan olahraga yang menganalisis wawancara, diberikan sebelumnya.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է սպորտային իրադարձությունների արդյունքների կանխատեսման մոտեցում: Սպորտային կանխատեսման մոտեցումները սովորաբար հիմնված են կառուցվածքային տվյալների վրա: Մենք ստուգում ենք այն հիպոթեզը, որ սպորտային արդյունքները կարելի է կանխատեսել օգտագործելով բնական լեզվի վերամշակման և մեքենային ուսումնասիրության մեթոդներ, որոնք կիրառվում են խաղացողների հետ հարցազրույցների ժամանակ, շու Պատրաստված մեթոդը օգտագործում է խորը ուսումնասիրության կոնտեքստալ մոդելներ, որոնք կիրառվում են անկառուցված տեքստալ փաստաթղթերի վրա: Շատ փորձեր էին կատարվել անհատական սպորտային խաղացողների հետ հարցազրույցների համար, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ պայքարը, ռազմական արվեստները և տենիսը: The results from the conducted experiment confirmed our initial assumption that an interview from a sportsman before a match contains information that can be used for prediction the outcome from it.  Ավելին, արդյունքները հզոր ապացույցներ են տալիս մեր ուսումնասիրության հիպոթեզի աջակցությամբ, այսինքն, մենք կարող ենք կանխատեսել սպորտային մրցակցության արդյունքը, որը վերլուծում է հարցազրույցի արդյունքը, որը առաջ է տրվել', 'az': 'Bu kağıt sport olaraqlarının sonuçlarını təmin etmək üçün bir yol göstərir. Həmçinin spor tədbirlərinin yaxınlıqları strukturlı verilər üzərində dayanılır. Biz sport sonuçlarını təbiətli dil işləməsi və maşın öyrənməsi teknikləri istifadə etməklə təmin edirik ki, oyuncularla sport olaraqlarından əvvəl müxtəlif görüşmələrdə istifadə edilmişdir. Bu təbliğ metodu dərin öyrənmə müxtəlif modelləri istifadə edir, qurulmadığı məktub belələri üzərində istifadə edilir. Bir neçə təcrübələr boks, döyüş sanatlar və tenis kimi oyuncularla birlikdə müşahidə edildi. İşləndirilən təcrübənin sonuçları bizim ilk təcrübəmizdən əvvəl bir sportsman ın mühbətindən bir məlumat içərisində istifadə ediləcək məlumatları barəsində təsdiqlədi. Daha sonra, sonuçlar araştırma hipotezini dəstəkləndirmək üçün güclü dəlillər təyin edir, bu da, ondan əvvəl verilən bir intervjuya analizə edilən sport maçının sonuçlarını təmin edirik.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা ক্রীড়া অনুষ্ঠানের ফলাফলের ভবিষ্যতের জন্য একটি উপায় উপস্থাপন করেছে। সাধারণত খেলার প্রতিক্রিয়ার উপায় তৈরি করা তথ্যের উপর ভিত্তিক। ক্রীড়া অনুষ্ঠানের আগে খেলোয়াড়দের সাথে সাক্ষাৎকারের মাধ্যমে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া এবং মেশিন শিক্ষা প্রযুক্তি ব্যবহার করে আমরা এই প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি গভীর শিক্ষার মোডেল ব্যবহার করে, অক্ষরিত টেক্সুয়াল নথির উপর প্রয়োগ করে। বেশ কিছু পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে ব্যক্তিগত খেলোয়াড়দের সাথে সাক্ষাৎকারের জন্য যেমন বক্সিং, মার্শিল্প আর টেনিস। এই পরীক্ষার ফলাফল আমাদের প্রথম ধারণা নিশ্চিত করেছে যে একটি খেলার সাক্ষাৎকারের আগে একটি খেলার সাক্ষাৎকার রয়েছে তথ্য আছে যা এর ফলাফল ভবিষ্যৎের তাছাড়াও, ফলাফল আমাদের গবেষণা হিপাইটসির সমর্থনে শক্তিশালী প্রমাণ প্রদান করে, যা আগে দেয়া হয়েছে একটি সাক্ষাৎকার বিশ্লেষণ করার ফলাফল আমরা ভবিষ্য', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta un enfocament per a predir els resultats dels events esportius. Normalment els enfocaments de previsió esportiva es basan en dades estructuradas. Testem la hipòtesi de que els resultats esportius es poden predir utilitzant tècniques naturals d'aprenentatge de llenguatges i màquines aplicades durant entrevistes amb els jugadors poc abans dels events esportius. El mètode proposat utilitza models contextuals d'aprenentatge profund, aplicats sobre documents textuals no estructurats. Es van fer molts experiments per entrevistes amb jugadors en esports individuals com boxar, arts marcials i tenis. Els resultats de l'experiment conduït van confirmar la nostra suposició inicial de que una entrevista d'un esportista abans d'una partida conté informació que pot ser utilitzada per predir el resultat. A més, els resultats proporcionen fortes evidències en suport a la nostra hipòtesi de recerca, és a dir, podem predir el resultat d'una partida esportiva analitzant una entrevista, dada abans.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje přístup k predikci výsledků sportovních událostí. Přístupy sportovního prognózování jsou obvykle založeny na strukturovaných datech. Testujeme hypotézu, že sportovní výsledky lze předpovědět pomocí technik zpracování přirozeného jazyka a strojového učení aplikovaných v rozhovorech s hráči krátce před sportovními událostmi. Navržená metoda využívá kontextové modely hlubokého učení aplikované na nestrukturované textové dokumenty. Několik experimentů bylo provedeno pro rozhovory s hráči v jednotlivých sportech, jako je box, bojová umění a tenis. Výsledky provedeného experimentu potvrdily náš počáteční předpoklad, že rozhovor se sportovcem před zápasem obsahuje informace, které lze použít k predikci výsledku z něj. Dále výsledky poskytují silný důkaz na podporu naší výzkumné hypotézy, tj. dokážeme předpovědět výsledek sportovního zápasu analyzujícího rozhovor, který byl udělen před ním.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään lähestymistapa urheilutapahtumien tulosten ennustamiseen. Yleensä urheiluennusteet perustuvat strukturoituun dataan. Testaamme hypoteesia siitä, että urheilutulokset voidaan ennustaa käyttämällä luonnollista kielen prosessointia ja koneoppimista, joita sovelletaan pelaajien haastatteluissa vähän ennen urheilutapahtumia. Ehdotetussa menetelmässä käytetään syväoppimisen kontekstimalleja, joita sovelletaan strukturoimattomiin tekstidokumentteihin. Useita kokeiluja tehtiin haastattelemaan pelaajia yksittäisissä urheilulajeissa kuten nyrkkeilyssä, kamppailulajeissa ja tenniksessä. Kokeen tulokset vahvistivat alustavan olettamuksemme, että urheilijan haastattelu ennen ottelua sisältää tietoa, jota voidaan käyttää sen tuloksen ennustamiseen. Lisäksi tulokset antavat vahvaa näyttöä tutkimushypoteesimme tueksi, eli voimme ennustaa urheiluottelun tuloksen analysoimalla haastattelua, joka on annettu ennen sitä.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja pristup predviđanju rezultata sportskih događaja. Obično su pristupi predviđanja sporta temeljeni na strukturiranim podacima. Testiramo hipotezu da se sportski rezultati mogu predvidjeti koristeći prirodne tehnike obrade jezika i tehnike učenja mašina primjenjene na intervjuima sa igračima uskoro prije sportskih događaja. Predložena metoda koristi duboke kontekstske modele učenja, primjenjene na neostrukturovanim tekstualnim dokumentima. Nekoliko eksperimenata je provedeno za intervjue sa igračima u individualnim sportovima poput boksa, borbenih umjetnosti i tenisa. Rezultati provođenog eksperimenta potvrdili su naše početne pretpostavke da intervju od sportista prije nego što se meč sadrži informacije koje mogu koristiti za predviđanje ishoda od njega. Nadalje, rezultati pružaju jake dokaze u podršci naše istraživačke hipoteze, to je, možemo predvidjeti ishod sportskog meča koji analizira intervju, predstavljen prije njega.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitatakse lähenemisviis spordiürituste tulemuste prognoosimiseks. Tavaliselt põhinevad spordiprognooside lähenemisviisid struktureeritud andmetel. Testime hüpoteesi, et sporditulemusi saab prognoosida loodusliku keele töötlemise ja masinõppe meetodite abil, mida rakendatakse intervjuudel mängijatega vahetult enne spordiüritusi. Kavandatud meetod kasutab sügavõppe kontekstimudeli mudeleid, mida rakendatakse struktureerimata tekstidokumentidele. Mitmed eksperimendid viidi läbi intervjuudeks mängijatega individuaalsetes spordialades nagu poks, võitluskunstid ja tennis. Teostatud eksperimendi tulemused kinnitasid meie esialgset eeldust, et sportlase intervjuu enne mängu sisaldab informatsiooni, mida saab kasutada tulemuse prognoosimiseks. Lisaks annavad tulemused tugevaid tõendeid meie uurimishüpoteesi toetuseks, st saame ennustada spordimängu tulemusi analüüsides enne seda antud intervjuud.', 'sq': 'This paper presents an approach for prediction of results for sport events.  Usually the sport forecasting approaches are based on structured data.  Ne testojmë hipotezën se rezultatet sportive mund të parashikohen duke përdorur teknikat natyrore të procesimit të gjuhës dhe mësimit të makinave të aplikuara gjatë intervistave me lojtarët pak përpara ngjarjeve sportive. Metoda e propozuar përdor modele kontekstuale të mësimit të thellë, të aplikuar mbi dokumente tekstuale të pastrukturuar. Disa eksperimente u kryen për intervista me lojtarët në sporte individuale si boksi, arti luftarak dhe tenis. Rezultatet e eksperimentit të kryer konfirmuan supozimin tonë fillestar se një intervistë nga një sportiv përpara një ndeshje përmban informacion që mund të përdoret për parashikimin e rezultatit nga ai. Përveç kësaj, rezultatet ofrojnë prova të forta në mbështetje të hipotezës sonë të kërkimit, që do të thotë, ne mund të parashikojmë rezultatin nga një ndeshje sportive që analizon një intervistë, dhënë përpara saj.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan aiki na bãyar da wata hanyoyi wa gabanin matsayin farat-idãnun firam. Koda yaushe, an sami matsayin gabanin firam masu bassi ne a kan data wanda aka samar da shi. Munã jarraba zato da musamman za'a iya gabatar da fassarar idãnun-idãnun su yi amfani da shiryoyin ayuka da masu bara da mashine da aka yi amfani da su kafo-garwaya don a kusa bayan filayen firam. @ action: button An sami wasu jarrabo don su yi samun su yi samun su cikin masu firam guda kamar boksing, sanar martar da kungiya da tannis. Faramata daga jarrabin da aka yi ta gaskata zaurin na farko ya yi zaton an yi wani shiri daga mai shagala gaba ga wani gyare yana da maɓalli wanda za'a iya amfani da shi dõmin ka gabatar ƙaramata daga gare shi. Da haka, matsala za ta bãyar da shaidar tabbatacce a ƙarfafa ga hanyarmu na lafuta, wannan ne, tuna iya gaba da matsala daga ma'anar idãnun-idãnun da aka bai shi a gaba da shi.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen pristop za napovedovanje rezultatov za športne dogodke. Običajno pristopi za napovedovanje športa temeljijo na strukturiranih podatkih. Preizkušamo hipotezo, da je športne rezultate mogoče predvideti z uporabo tehnik obdelave naravnega jezika in strojnega učenja, ki se uporabljajo v intervjujih z igralci tik pred športnimi dogodki. Predlagana metoda uporablja kontekstualne modele globokega učenja, ki se uporabljajo na nestrukturiranih besedilnih dokumentih. Izvedenih je bilo več eksperimentov za intervjuje z igralci v posameznih športih, kot so boks, borilne veščine in tenis. Rezultati izvedenega eksperimenta so potrdili našo prvotno domnevo, da intervju športnika pred tekmo vsebuje informacije, ki jih je mogoče uporabiti za napoved izida. Poleg tega rezultati zagotavljajo močne dokaze v podporo naši raziskovalni hipotezi, torej lahko napovemo izid športne tekme, ki analizira intervju, ki ga je dal pred njim.', 'jv': 'Awak iki nggawe barang akeh tarjamahan kanggo ngerasahan barang nggawe events olah surat. Hak dhéwé, hal-hal nganggo dolanan surat sing bisa nguasai dadi nggawe Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerti suposipun suposipun sing mbutuhak sawar neng ijol-ijol sing perusahaan anyar tentang karo perusahaan kelas kuwi wis dipolet karo perusahaan karo perusahaan lan kelas sing wis ngupakan ben nguasai perusahaan anyar Ngawe Perintah sing digawe usul akeh model contextual Ana sing perusahaan sing nyengkuyung kanggo tukang tarjamahan karo perusahaan bangsane, karo boxing, san martian lan tenis. Rejalaké sing nggawe geranggunaké nggawe tarjamahan sing rumangmu nang ingkang diportun sing dumadhingan karo informasi sing isa nggawe geranggunaké kejahatan winih dhéwé. Ngerti tambah, barang nggawe nggawe sapa-suku sing nggawe ngerasakno ngertuakake tualah, iki dadi, kéné iso ngerasakno kanggo kowé nggawe dolanan sing perbudhakan kanggo ujian winih sing bisa tarjamahan, ngomong sak wis an a.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་རྩེད་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་གྱི་རྐྱེན་འབྱུང་རྐྱེན་སྔོན་སྒྲིག རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་སྣ་ཚུལ་གྱི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ལ་གཞི་བཙུགས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་གླེང་སྡོམ་གྱི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྟར་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་པར་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་མཐུན་རྩེད་པ་ཚོ་དང་མཉམ་རྩེད་ དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་སྦྱོར་བའི་ཁྱིམ་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཞི་སྒྲིག་མེད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ལ་སྤྱོད་སྤྱ སྒེར་གྱི་རྩེད་མོ་སོ་སོ་སོའི་ནང་གི་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བྱེད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ངལ་ཚོགས་བྱས་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་ལས་ང་ཚོའི་འགོ་གླེང་སྔོན་གྱི་རྩོལ་བ་ཐོག་ལས་གཏོང་ཞུགས་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་ཆ་མཐོང་བ་ གྲུབ་འབྲས་ཀྱིས་ང་ཚོའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་རྗེས་སུ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་ཡོད་པའི་ལྟ་བ་མངོན་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'he': 'This paper presents an approach for prediction of results for sport events.  בדרך כלל גישות התחזויות הספורטיות מבוססות על נתונים מבוססים. אנו בודקים את ההיפתוזיה שהתוצאות הספורט יכולות לחזות על ידי השימוש באמצעות שימוש בשפה טבעית וטכניקות לימוד מכונות שמשתמשות במהלך ראיונות עם השחקנים בקרוב לפני אירועי הספורט. השיטה המוצעת משתמשת בדוגמנים קונטקסטיים של למידה עמוקה, שמשתמשים על מסמכים טקסטיים לא מבושלים. Several experiments were performed for interviews with players in individual sports like boxing, martial arts, and tennis.  התוצאות מהניסוי המבצע אישרו את ההנחה הראשונית שלנו שראיון מספורטמן לפני משחק מכיל מידע שיכול להשתמש כדי לחזות את התוצאה ממנו. Furthermore, the results provide strong evidence in support of our research hypothesis, that is, we can predict the outcome from a sport match analyzing an interview, given before it.'}
{'en': 'Exploiting Open IE for Deriving Multiple Premises Entailment Corpus', 'ar': 'استغلال Open IE لاشتقاق مجموعة استحواذ المباني المتعددة', 'pt': 'Explorando o Open IE para derivar o corpus de vinculação de múltiplas premissas', 'fr': "Exploiter Open IE pour dériver un corpus d'implication dans plusieurs locaux", 'es': 'Aprovechamiento de Open IE para derivar el corpus de implicación de múltiples premisas', 'ja': '複数の施設のエンテイメントコーパスを引き出すためのオープンIEの悪用', 'zh': '因开 IE 以遣生数前提蕴涵语料库', 'hi': 'एकाधिक परिसर अनिवार्यता कोष व्युत्पन्न करने के लिए ओपन आईई का शोषण करना', 'ru': 'Эксплуатация открытых ИС для производства нескольких помещений', 'ga': 'Ag baint leasa as IE Oscailte chun Corpas Saothair Iolráití a Dhíorthú', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Nyílt IE kihasználása több helyiség kiterjesztésére', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση του Ανοικτού ΙΕ για την Παράγωγη Σώματος Διευκόλυνσης Πολλαπλών Υποθέσεων', 'it': 'Sfruttare Open IE per Derivare Multiple Premises Entailment Corpus', 'lt': 'Atviros IE eksploatavimas kelių patalpų ligos korpusui gauti', 'mk': 'Exploiting Open IE for Deriving Multiple Premises Entailment Corpus', 'kk': 'Бірнеше премизацияларды толтыру үшін ашылған IE эксплуатациясы', 'ml': 'ഡെറിങ്ങിങ് പല പ്രിമിസുകളുടെ എന്\u200dറെല്\u200dമെന്\u200dറ് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനുവേണ്ടി IE തുറക്കുന്നു', 'no': 'Name', 'ms': 'Penggunaan IE terbuka untuk Deriving Multiple Premises Entailment Corpus', 'mt': 'Exploiting Open IE for Deriving Multiple Premises Entailment Corpus', 'mn': 'Олон төлөвлөгөөний төлөвлөгөөний төлөвлөгөөний нээлттэй IE-г ашиглах', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරීමිස් ඉන්ටේල්ම් කොර්පුස් වෙනුවෙන් විවෘත IE විස්තර කරන්න', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie otwartego IE do pozyskania wielu lokali Entail Corpus', 'ro': 'Exploatarea IE deschisă pentru a Deriva mai multe Premise Entailment Corpus', 'sv': 'Utnyttja öppen IE för att härleda flera lokaler Entailment Corpus', 'sr': 'Eksplozirajući otvoreni IE za dobivanje višestrukih predmeta kompletnih korpusa', 'so': 'Exploiting Open IE for Deriving Multiple Premises Entailment Corpus', 'ta': 'டெர்விங் பல்லா முன்னுரிமைகளுக்கான IE வெளியிடுகிறது', 'ur': 'بہت سی پیشمایز کامل کورپوس کے لئے کھولا ہوا IE پھیلاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Nổ tung Iễ cho phát hiện ra nhiều khuôn mặt tử thi.', 'hr': 'Ispitivanje otvorenog IE-a za uzimanje višestrukih primjena kompletnih korpusa', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af Open IE til at aflede flere lokaler Entailment Corpus', 'de': 'Nutzung von Open IE für die Ableitung mehrerer Räumlichkeiten Entailment Corpus', 'id': 'Mengeksploitasi IE terbuka untuk Deriving Multiple Premises Entailment Corpus', 'nl': 'Exploiteren van Open IE voor het afleiden van meerdere panden Entailment Corpus', 'fa': 'Exploiting Open IE for obtaining multiple Premises Entailment Corpus', 'ko': '개방식 IE를 이용하여 다전제적 함축 어료 라이브러리 생성', 'bg': 'Използване на отворен ИЕ за извличане на корпус за многобройни помещения', 'sq': 'Shfrytëzimi i IE të hapur për të marrë Korpus të Mjaftueshëm', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': "Aç IE'i Derlemek üçin Açmak", 'az': 'Açıq IE-ni çoxlu Premise Entailment Corpus üçün istifadə edir', 'sw': 'Imechunguza IE kwa ajili ya Shirika la Ujumbe', 'bs': 'Eksplozirajući otvorenu IE za dobivanje višestrukih predmeta kompletnih korpusa', 'am': 'email-action', 'hy': 'Բաց ինտերնետային ինտերնետ օգտագործելը բազմաթիվ բնակարանների հիվանդության կորպոսի ստանալու համար', 'cs': 'Využití otevřeného IE pro odvození více prostor Entailment Corpus', 'bn': 'ডেরিভিং বহুগুণ প্রেমিস ইনটেলেমেন্ট কোর্পাসের জন্য প্রস্থান করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Exploiting Open IE for Deriving Multiple Premises Entailment Corpus', 'et': 'Avatud IE kasutamine mitme ruumi Entailment Corpuse tuletamiseks', 'fi': 'Avoimen IE:n hyödyntäminen useiden tilojen Entailment Corpuksen johtamiseen', 'jv': 'Gak Isotolo Open SE kanggo Kebebasan Mulalah Bajilan Entayment', 'he': 'ניצל IE פתוח כדי להוציא גוף מחלה מרובים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje odprtega IE za izpeljanje več prostorov Entailment Corpus', 'bo': 'ཕན་ཚུལ་ལེན་པའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཀྱི་ཚོང་ཚང་ལ་ཁ་ཕྱེད་པའི་IE'}
{'en': 'Natural language inference (NLI) is a key part of natural language understanding. The NLI task is defined as a decision problem whether a given sentence   hypothesis   can be inferred from a given text. Typically, we deal with a text consisting of just a single premise / single sentence, which is called a single premise entailment (SPE) task. Recently, a derived task of NLI from multiple premises (MPE) was introduced together with the first annotated corpus and corresponding several strong baselines. Nevertheless, the further development in MPE field requires accessibility of huge amounts of annotated data. In this paper we introduce a novel method for rapid deriving of MPE corpora from an existing NLI (SPE) annotated data that does not require any additional annotation work. This proposed approach is based on using an open information extraction system. We demonstrate the application of the method on a well known SNLI corpus. Over the obtained corpus, we provide the first evaluations as well as we state a strong baseline.', 'pt': 'A inferência de linguagem natural (NLI) é uma parte fundamental da compreensão da linguagem natural. A tarefa NLI é definida como um problema de decisão se uma determinada sentença – hipótese – pode ser inferida de um determinado texto. Normalmente, lidamos com um texto que consiste em apenas uma única premissa/frase única, que é chamada de tarefa de implicação de premissa única (SPE). Recentemente, uma tarefa derivada de NLI de múltiplas premissas (MPE) foi introduzida juntamente com o primeiro corpus anotado e correspondentes várias linhas de base fortes. No entanto, o desenvolvimento adicional no campo MPE requer acessibilidade de grandes quantidades de dados anotados. Neste artigo, apresentamos um novo método para derivação rápida de corpora MPE a partir de dados anotados NLI (SPE) existentes que não requerem nenhum trabalho de anotação adicional. Esta abordagem proposta é baseada no uso de um sistema aberto de extração de informações. Demonstramos a aplicação do método em um corpus SNLI bem conhecido. Sobre o corpus obtido, fornecemos as primeiras avaliações, bem como estabelecemos uma linha de base forte.', 'ar': 'يعد الاستدلال اللغوي الطبيعي (NLI) جزءًا أساسيًا من فهم اللغة الطبيعية. يتم تعريف مهمة NLI على أنها مشكلة قرار فيما إذا كان يمكن استنتاج جملة معينة - فرضية - من نص معين. عادة ، نتعامل مع نص يتكون من فرضية واحدة / جملة واحدة فقط ، والتي تسمى مهمة تستلزم فرضية واحدة (SPE). في الآونة الأخيرة ، تم تقديم مهمة مشتقة من NLI من أماكن متعددة (MPE) مع أول مجموعة مشروحة وما يقابلها من عدة خطوط أساسية قوية. ومع ذلك ، فإن التطوير الإضافي في مجال MPE يتطلب إمكانية الوصول إلى كميات ضخمة من البيانات المشروحة. في هذا البحث ، نقدم طريقة جديدة للاشتقاق السريع لـ MPE corpora من البيانات المشروحة NLI (SPE) الحالية التي لا تتطلب أي أعمال توضيحية إضافية. يعتمد هذا النهج المقترح على استخدام نظام استخراج معلومات مفتوح. نوضح تطبيق الطريقة على مجموعة SNLI معروفة جيدًا. خلال المجموعة التي تم الحصول عليها ، نقدم التقييمات الأولى وكذلك نذكر خط أساس قوي.', 'es': 'La inferencia del lenguaje natural (NLI) es una parte clave de la comprensión del lenguaje natural. La tarea NLI se define como un problema de decisión sobre si una oración dada (hipótesis) puede inferirse de un texto determinado. Por lo general, tratamos con un texto que consiste en una sola premisa/oración única, que se denomina tarea de implicación de premisa única (SPE). Recientemente, se introdujo una tarea derivada de NLI de múltiples premisas (MPE) junto con el primer corpus anotado y varias líneas de base sólidas correspondientes. Sin embargo, el desarrollo posterior en el campo de MPE requiere la accesibilidad de enormes cantidades de datos anotados. En este artículo presentamos un método novedoso para la derivación rápida de cuerpos de MPE a partir de datos anotados de NLI (SPE) existentes que no requieren ningún trabajo de anotación adicional. Este enfoque propuesto se basa en el uso de un sistema abierto de extracción de información. Demostramos la aplicación del método en un corpus SNLI bien conocido. Sobre el corpus obtenido, proporcionamos las primeras evaluaciones y establecemos una base sólida.', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान (एनएलआई) प्राकृतिक भाषा समझ का एक महत्वपूर्ण हिस्सा है। एनएलआई कार्य को एक निर्णय समस्या के रूप में परिभाषित किया गया है कि क्या किसी दिए गए वाक्य - परिकल्पना - को किसी दिए गए पाठ से अनुमान लगाया जा सकता है। आमतौर पर, हम एक पाठ से निपटते हैं जिसमें केवल एक ही आधार / एकल वाक्य होता है, जिसे एकल आधार (एसपीई) कार्य कहा जाता है। हाल ही में, एकाधिक परिसरों (एमपीई) से एनएलआई का एक व्युत्पन्न कार्य पहले एनोटेटेड कॉर्पस और इसी तरह के कई मजबूत बेसलाइन के साथ पेश किया गया था। फिर भी, एमपीई क्षेत्र में आगे के विकास के लिए बड़ी मात्रा में एनोटेटेड डेटा की पहुंच की आवश्यकता होती है। इस पेपर में हम एक मौजूदा एनएलआई (एसपीई) एनोटेट डेटा से एमपीई कार्पोरा की तेजी से व्युत्पन्न के लिए एक उपन्यास विधि पेश करते हैं जिसे किसी भी अतिरिक्त एनोटेशन कार्य की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है। यह प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण एक खुली जानकारी निष्कर्षण प्रणाली का उपयोग करने पर आधारित है। हम एक प्रसिद्ध SNLI कॉर्पस पर विधि के आवेदन का प्रदर्शन करते हैं। प्राप्त कॉर्पस पर, हम पहले मूल्यांकन प्रदान करते हैं और साथ ही साथ हम एक मजबूत आधार रेखा भी बताते हैं।', 'ja': '自然言語推論（ NLI ）は、自然言語理解の重要な部分です。 NLIタスクは、与えられた文章（仮説）が与えられたテキストから推論できるかどうかの決定問題として定義される。 典型的には、単一の前提/単一の文からなるテキストを扱います。これは単一の前提エンテイメント（ SPE ）タスクと呼ばれます。 最近、複数の施設（ MPE ）からのNLIの派生タスクが、最初の注釈付きコーパスおよび対応するいくつかの強力なベースラインと共に導入されました。 それにもかかわらず、MPE分野のさらなる発展には、膨大な量の注釈付きデータのアクセシビリティが必要です。 本稿では、追加の注釈作業を必要としない既存のNLI （ SPE ）注釈付きデータからMPEコーパスを迅速に導出するための新たな方法を紹介する。 この提案されたアプローチは、オープン情報抽出システムを使用することに基づいています。 我々は、よく知られているSNLIコーパスへの方法の適用を実証した。 得られたコーパスにわたって、最初の評価と強力なベースラインを提供します。', 'zh': '自然语言推理者(NLI)自然语言解之要也。 NLI定义为一决策问题,即给定文推断出给定句(假)。 凡治只由单前提/单句成文本,谓之单个前提蕴涵(SPE)务。 近引入数场(MPE)NLI差生,及第一带注语料库相应者数强基线。 然MPE域益广,多所注数可访问性。 在本文中,我们说了一种从不要额外注事的现在NLI(SPE)注数中迅速导出MPE语料库的新法。 其法基于用开放式信息提取系统。 我们演示该法在众所周知的SNLI语料库上的应用。 得语料库中,供一评估,并陈强力之基线。', 'fr': "L'inférence du langage naturel (NLI) est un élément clé de la compréhension du langage naturel. La tâche NLI est définie comme un problème de décision quant à savoir si une phrase donnée — hypothèse — peut être déduite d'un texte donné. En général, nous traitons un texte composé d'une seule prémisse/phrase unique, ce que l'on appelle une tâche d'implication sur une seule prémisse (SPE). Récemment, une tâche dérivée de NLI à partir de locaux multiples (MPE) a été introduite avec le premier corpus annoté et plusieurs bases de référence solides correspondantes. Néanmoins, le développement ultérieur dans le domaine des MPE nécessite l'accessibilité d'énormes quantités de données annotées. Dans cet article, nous présentons une nouvelle méthode de dérivation rapide de corpus MPE à partir de données annotées NLI (SPE) existantes qui ne nécessite aucun travail d'annotation supplémentaire. Cette approche proposée est basée sur l'utilisation d'un système ouvert d'extraction d'informations. Nous démontrons l'application de la méthode sur un corpus SNLI bien connu. Sur le corpus obtenu, nous fournissons les premières évaluations et nous établissons une base de référence solide.", 'ru': 'Вывод естественного языка (NLI) является ключевой частью понимания естественного языка. Задача NLI определяется как проблема принятия решения о том, может ли данное предложение – гипотеза – быть выведено из данного текста. Как правило, мы имеем дело с текстом, состоящим только из одной предпосылки/одного предложения, которое называется задачей с одной предпосылкой (SPE). Недавно была введена производная задача NLI из множественных предпосылок (MPE) вместе с первым аннотированным корпусом и соответствующими несколькими сильными базовыми линиями. Тем не менее, дальнейшее развитие в области ПДВ требует доступности огромных объемов аннотированных данных. В этой статье мы вводим новый метод быстрого извлечения корпусов MPE из существующих аннотированных данных NLI (SPE), который не требует какой-либо дополнительной работы по аннотации. Этот предлагаемый подход основан на использовании открытой системы извлечения информации. Продемонстрировано применение метода на хорошо известном корпусе SNLI. По полученному корпусу мы предоставляем первые оценки, а также констатируем сильную базовую линию.', 'ga': 'Is cuid lárnach de thuiscint teanga nádúrtha í tátal teanga nádúrtha (NLI). Sainmhínítear tasc LNÉ mar fhadhb cinnidh cibé an féidir tátal a bhaint as abairt tugtha – hipitéis – ó théacs ar leith. Go hiondúil, déileálaimid le téacs nach bhfuil ann ach bunáit amháin/abairt shingil, ar a dtugtar tasc gabháil le hionad amháin (SPE). Le déanaí, tugadh isteach tasc díorthaithe de chuid LNÉ ó áitribh iolracha (MPE) mar aon leis an gcéad chorpas anótáilte agus roinnt bonnlínte láidre comhfhreagracha. Mar sin féin, éilíonn forbairt bhreise sa réimse MPE inrochtaineacht méideanna ollmhóra sonraí anótáilte. Sa pháipéar seo tugaimid isteach modh nua chun corpora MPE a dhíorthú go gasta ó shonraí anótáilte de chuid LNÉ (SPE) atá ann cheana nach bhfuil aon obair nótaí breise ag teastáil uathu. Tá an cur chuige molta seo bunaithe ar úsáid a bhaint as córas oscailte asbhainte faisnéise. Léirímid cur i bhfeidhm an mhodha ar chorpas aitheanta SNLI. Thar an gcorpas faighte, cuirimid na chéad mheastóireachtaí ar fáil agus luaimid bonnlíne láidir.', 'ka': 'ნაირადი ენის ინფრენცია (NLI) არის ნაირადი ენის განსხვავების გასაკუთარი ნაწილი ნაწილი. Name ჩვენ ვიყენებთ ტექსტის შესახებ, რომელიც მხოლოდ ერთი პრემიზი/ერთი წესტის შესახებ, რომელიც ერთი პრემიზის შესახებ (SPE) დავალება. მიმდინარე, NLI-ის მრავალ პრომენტებიდან (MPE) დაიყენება პირველი ანოტირებული კორპუსთან და შემდეგ მრავალ ძალიან ფესტური ხაზებით. მაგრამ, მეტი განვითარება MPE ფორმაში უნდა უფრო დიდი მონაცემების შესაძლებლობა. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ პრომენტის მეტი MPE კოპორადან წარმოიდგინეთ NLI (SPE) წარმოიდგინეთ მონაცემებისგან, რომელიც არ უნდა დამატებული ანტორაციის მუშაობა. ეს პროგრამა გახსნა ინფორმაციის გამოყენება სისტემის გამოყენებაზე. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ მეტის გამოყენებას ძალიან უცნობილი SNLI კორპუსზე. ოპვჱ ოჲლსფთლთრვ კჲპოსჟ, ღვ ოპვეჟრაგთმ ოყპგთრვ ჲценკთ, ა თ ღვ კაზვმ ჟთლნა ოჲჟლვენა ჟრპანა.', 'el': "Το συμπέρασμα φυσικής γλώσσας (NLI) αποτελεί βασικό μέρος της κατανόησης της φυσικής γλώσσας. Η εργασία ορίζεται ως ένα πρόβλημα απόφασης κατά πόσον μια δεδομένη πρόταση με υπόθεση μπορεί να συναχθεί από ένα δεδομένο κείμενο. Συνήθως, ασχολούμαστε με ένα κείμενο που αποτελείται από μία μόνο προϋπόθεση/μία πρόταση, η οποία ονομάζεται εργασία ενιαίας προϋπόθεσης (SPE). Πρόσφατα, εισήχθη μια παράγωγη εργασία του από πολλαπλές εγκαταστάσεις (MPE) μαζί με το πρώτο σχολιασμένο σώμα και αντίστοιχες αρκετές ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης. Παρ 'όλα αυτά, η περαιτέρω ανάπτυξη στον τομέα των MPE απαιτεί πρόσβαση σε τεράστιες ποσότητες σχολιασμένων δεδομένων. Στην παρούσα εργασία εισάγουμε μια νέα μέθοδο για την ταχεία εξαγωγή των σωμάτων από υπάρχοντα σχολιασμένα δεδομένα που δεν απαιτούν πρόσθετη εργασία σχολιασμού. Η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση βασίζεται στη χρήση ενός ανοικτού συστήματος εξαγωγής πληροφοριών. Επιδεικνύουμε την εφαρμογή της μεθόδου σε ένα γνωστό σώμα SNLI. Πάνω από το ληφθέν σώμα, παρέχουμε τις πρώτες αξιολογήσεις καθώς και αναφέρουμε μια ισχυρή βάση αναφοράς.", 'hu': 'A természetes nyelvi következtetés (NLI) kulcsfontosságú része a természetes nyelv megértésének. Az NLI feladatot döntési problémaként definiáljuk, hogy egy adott mondat - hipotézis - következtethető-e egy adott szövegből. Általában egy olyan szöveggel foglalkozunk, amely csak egyetlen előfeltételből/egyetlen mondatból áll, amit egyetlen előfeltételből álló (SPE) feladatnak nevezünk. A közelmúltban bevezették az NLI több helyiségből származó feladatát (MPE), az első jegyzetelt korpuszt és a megfelelő több erős alapvonalat. Mindazonáltal az MPE területen történő további fejlesztés hatalmas mennyiségű jegyzetelt adat hozzáférhetőségét igényli. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy új módszert, amely lehetővé teszi az MPE-korpuszok gyors származtatását egy meglévő NLI (SPE) jegyzetelt adatból, amely nem igényel további jegyzetelési munkát. Ez a javasolt megközelítés nyílt információkinyerő rendszer alkalmazásán alapul. A módszer alkalmazását egy jól ismert SNLI korpuszon mutatjuk be. Az első értékeléseket a megszerzett korpusz felett végezzük, valamint erős alapot állapítunk meg.', 'lt': 'Gamtinė kalbų išvada (NLI) yra pagrindinė gamtinės kalbos supratimo dalis. NLI užduotis apibrėžiama kaip sprendimo problem a, ar tam tikrą sakinį - hipotezę - galima daryti iš tam tikro teksto. Paprastai kalbame apie tekstą, kurį sudaro tik viena pataisa ir (arba) vienas sakinys, vadinamas viena pataisa ir (arba) užduotis. Pastaruoju metu buvo įdiegta NLI užduotis iš kelių patalpų (MPE) kartu su pirmuoju užrašytu korpusu ir atitinkamomis keliomis stipriomis bazinėmis linijomis. Vis dėlto tolesniam vystymuisi MPE srityje reikalingas didelis užrašytų duomenų kiekis. Šiame dokumente įvedame naują metodą greitai gauti MPE corpora iš esamų NLI (SPE) anotuotų duomenų, kuriems nereikia jokių papildomų anotacijų. Šis siūlomas požiūris grindžiamas atviros informacijos gavimo sistemos naudojimu. We demonstrate the application of the method on a well known SNLI corpus.  Per gautą korpusą teikiame pirmuosius vertinimus ir patvirtiname tvirtą pagrindą.', 'kk': 'Табиғлық тілдердің инференциясы (NLI) табиғлық тілдердің түсініктерінің негізгі бөлігі. NLI тапсырмасы келтірілген сөз - гипотезасы - келтірілген мәтіннен шешім мәселесі ретінде анықталды. Әдетте, біз тек бір премиз/ бір сөйлеменің тұратын мәтіннен қатынаймыз, бұл бір премиз (SPE) тапсырмасы деп аталады. Жуырда NLI бірнеше премиялардан (MPE) келтірілген тапсырмасы бірінші белгіленген корпус мен біріктірілген және бірнеше күшті негізгі жолдармен сәйкес келеді. Әйтпесе, MPE өрісінде жалғастыру үлкен мәліметтердің қатынау мүмкіндігін талап етеді. Бұл қағазда MPE корпорасының тез түрлендіру әдісін, бар NLI (SPE) деген жазбалардан жазылған деректерді таңдап береміз. Бұл жазбалардың қосымша жазбалардың жұмысы керек емес. Бұл жағдай ашылған мәліметті тарқату жүйесіне негізделген. Біз SNLI корпус арқылы таңдалған әдістерді көрсетедік. Қабылдаған корпус бойынша бірінші оқиғаларды және біз күшті негізгі жолды жазып береміз.', 'it': "L'inferenza del linguaggio naturale (NLI) è una parte chiave della comprensione del linguaggio naturale. L'attività NLI è definita come un problema decisionale se una data frase - ipotesi - può essere dedotta da un dato testo. Tipicamente, abbiamo a che fare con un testo composto da una singola premessa/singola frase, che è chiamata un'operazione di implicazione di una singola premessa (SPE). Recentemente, un compito derivato di NLI da multiple premises (MPE) è stato introdotto insieme al primo corpus annotato e corrispondenti diverse linee di base forti. Tuttavia, l'ulteriore sviluppo nel campo MPE richiede l'accessibilità di enormi quantità di dati annotati. In questo articolo introduciamo un nuovo metodo per la rapida derivazione di corpi MPE da un dato annotato NLI (SPE) esistente che non richiede alcun ulteriore lavoro di annotazione. Questo approccio proposto si basa sull'utilizzo di un sistema aperto di estrazione delle informazioni. Dimostriamo l'applicazione del metodo su un noto corpus SNLI. Nel corpo ottenuto, forniamo le prime valutazioni e stabiliamo una base di riferimento forte.", 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ അപരിഹാരം (NLI) സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ വിവാദത്തിന്റെ താക്കോല്\u200d ഭാഷയാണ്. കൊടുത്ത വാക്ക്- ഹൈപ്പിറ്റീസ്- കൊടുത്ത വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന NLI ജോലി സാധാരണ, ഒരു വാക്ക് മാത്രമേ ഉള്ളൂ ഒരു മുന്\u200dഗണന/ഒരു വാക്ക് ഉള്ള ഒരു പദാവലിയുമായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്നുള്ളൂ, അതിനെ ഒര അടുത്തുകഴിഞ്ഞപ്പോള്\u200d, പല പ്രദേശങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും NLI-ന്റെ ജോലിയുണ്ടായിരുന്നു. ആദ്യത്തെ വിഷമിപ്പിച്ച കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനോടൊപ്പം പര Nevertheless, the further development in MPE field requires accessibility of huge amounts of annotated data.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നാം ഒരു നോവല്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഇപ്പോള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള NLI (SPE) നില്\u200dക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള ഒരു തുറന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന് അടിസ്ഥാനമാണിത്. നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെട്ട ഒരു SNLI കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ രീതിയുടെ പ്രയോഗം കാണിക്കുന്നു. കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ മേല്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ശക്തമായ ഒരു ബെസ്റ്റ്ലൈന്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശിക്', 'mt': "Natural language inference (NLI) is a key part of natural language understanding.  Il-kompitu NLI huwa definit bħala problem a ta’ deċiżjoni jekk sentenza partikolari - ipoteżi - tistax tiġi inferita minn test partikolari. Typically, we deal with a text consisting of just a single premise/single sentence, which is called a single premise entailment (SPE) task. Dan l-a ħħar, kompitu derivat ta’ NLI minn diversi postijiet (MPE) ġie introdott flimkien mal-ewwel korpus annotat u jikkorrispondi għal diversi linji bażi b’saħħithom. Madankollu, l-iżvilupp ulterjuri fil-qasam tal-MPE jeħtieġ l-aċċessibbiltà ta’ ammonti kbar ta’ dejta annotata. In this paper we introduce a novel method for rapid deriving of MPE corpora from an existing NLI (SPE) annotated data that does not require any additional annotation work.  Dan l-approċċ propost huwa bbażat fuq l-użu ta’ sistema miftuħa ta’ estrazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni. We demonstrate the application of the method on a well known SNLI corpus.  Matul il-korpus miksub, nagħtu l-ewwel evalwazzjonijiet kif ukoll niddikjaraw linja bażi b'saħħitha.", 'mk': 'Natural language inference (NLI) is a key part of natural language understanding.  The NLI task is defined as a decision problem whether a given sentence - hypothesis - can be inferred from a given text.  Обично, ние се справуваме со текст кој се состои од само една претпоставка/една реченица, која се нарекува единствена претпоставка (СПЕ) задача. Recently, a derived task of NLI from multiple premises (MPE) was introduced together with the first annotated corpus and corresponding several strong baselines.  Nevertheless, the further development in MPE field requires accessibility of huge amounts of annotated data.  In this paper we introduce a novel method for rapid deriving of MPE corpora from an existing NLI (SPE) annotated data that does not require any additional annotation work.  This proposed approach is based on using an open information extraction system.  We demonstrate the application of the method on a well known SNLI corpus.  Over the obtained corpus, we provide the first evaluations as well as we state a strong baseline.', 'ms': 'Keputusan bahasa semulajadi (NLI) adalah bahagian utama pemahaman bahasa semulajadi. The NLI task is defined as a decision problem whether a given sentence - hypothesis - can be inferred from a given text.  Biasanya, kita berurusan dengan teks yang terdiri dari satu premis/satu kalimat, yang dipanggil satu premis entailment (SPE) tugas. Recently, a derived task of NLI from multiple premises (MPE) was introduced together with the first annotated corpus and corresponding several strong baselines.  Nevertheless, the further development in MPE field requires accessibility of huge amounts of annotated data.  Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan kaedah baru untuk mengeluarkan cepat korpra MPE dari data yang ada yang ditandai NLI (SPE) yang tidak memerlukan sebarang kerja tambahan annotasi. This proposed approach is based on using an open information extraction system.  Kami menunjukkan aplikasi kaedah pada korpus SNLI yang terkenal. Over the obtained corpus, we provide the first evaluations as well as we state a strong baseline.', 'no': 'Naturspråk-infeksjon (NLI) er ein nøkkeldel av naturspråk-forståking. NLI- oppgåva er definert som eit avgjøringsproblem om eit gitt setning - hipotese - kan sendast frå eit gitt tekst. Vanlegvis har vi eit tekst som inneheld berre eit enkelt premise/enkelt setning, som kalles ei enkelt premise-innføring (SPE) oppgåve. Nyleg vart det introdusert eit oppgåve av NLI frå fleire område (MPE) saman med den første merkte korpusen og tilsvarande fleire sterke baselinjer. Det er likevel at framtidige utviklinga i MPE-feltet krev tilgjengelighet til store mengdar oppmerkte data. I denne papiret introduserer vi eit nytt metode for rask avhengig av MPE-korpora frå eit eksisterande NLI-notasjon (SPE) som ikkje krev nokon ekstra notasjonsarbeid. Dette foreslått tilnærming er basert på bruk av eit opna informasjonspakkingssystem. Vi viser programmet på metoden på ein godt kjent SNLI corpus. Over den opptekte korpusen, har vi første evalueringa, og vi tilbyr ein sterk baseline.', 'pl': 'Inferencja języka naturalnego (NLI) jest kluczową częścią rozumienia języka naturalnego. Zadanie NLI definiowane jest jako problem decyzji, czy dane zdanie hipotezy są wywnioskowane z danego tekstu. Zazwyczaj mamy do czynienia z tekstem składającym się tylko z jednego założenia/pojedynczego zdania, które nazywa się zadaniem single premise implication (SPE). Ostatnio wprowadzono zadanie pochodne NLI from multiple premises (MPE) wraz z pierwszym adnotacją korpusu i odpowiadającymi kilkoma silnymi liniami bazowymi. Niemniej jednak dalszy rozwój w dziedzinie MPE wymaga dostępności ogromnych ilości adnotacji danych. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nowatorską metodę szybkiego pobierania korpusów MPE z istniejących danych adnotacyjnych NLI (SPE), które nie wymagają dodatkowych prac adnotacyjnych. Proponowane podejście opiera się na zastosowaniu otwartego systemu ekstrakcji informacji. Pokazujemy zastosowanie metody na dobrze znanym korpusie SNLI. Na uzyskanym korpusie przeprowadzamy pierwsze oceny oraz określamy silną bazę wyjściową.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл халдвар (NLI) нь байгалийн хэл ойлголтын чухал хэсэг юм. NLI даалгавар нь өгөгдсөн өгүүлбэр - гипотез - өгөгдсөн текстээс халдварлах эсэхийг шийдвэрлэх асуудал гэж тодорхойлдог. Олон хэлбэрээр бид ганц өрөөсгөл/ганц өгүүлбэрээс бүрддэг текст дээр ажилладаг. Энэ нь ганц өрөөсгөл өрөөсгөл (SPE) ажиллагаа гэж нэрлэгддэг. Сүүлийн үед NLI-ын олон орон зайнаас гарсан нэгэн ажил нь анхны анхаарсан корпус болон олон хүчтэй суурь шугам холбоотой байдаг. Гэвч MPE салбарт нэмэлт хөгжлийн талаар маш их хэмжээний мэдээллийн тусламж хэрэгтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид MPE корпора-ын хурдан гаргах шинэ арга зам илэрхийлж байна. Энэ санал дэвшүүлсэн арга нь нээлттэй мэдээллийн гаргах системийг ашиглаж байдаг. Бид сайн мэддэг SNLI корпус дээр аргын хэрэглээ харуулж байна. Эхлээд авсан корпус дээр бид анхны үнэлгээ, хүчтэй суурь шугам хэлнэ.', 'ro': 'Inferența limbajului natural (NLI) este o parte cheie a înțelegerii limbajului natural. Activitatea NLI este definită ca o problemă de decizie dacă o anumită propoziție - ipoteză - poate fi dedusă dintr-un anumit text. De obicei, ne ocupăm de un text care constă dintr-o singură premisă/o singură propoziție, care se numește sarcină de implicare a premisei unice (SPE). Recent, a fost introdusă o sarcină derivată a NLI din multiple premise (MPE) împreună cu primul corpus adnotat și corespunzătoare mai multor linii de bază puternice. Cu toate acestea, dezvoltarea ulterioară în domeniul erorilor MPE necesită accesibilitatea unor cantități uriașe de date adnotate. În această lucrare introducem o metodă nouă pentru obținerea rapidă a corporelor MPE dintr-o dată adnotată NLI (SPE) existentă care nu necesită nicio lucrare suplimentară de adnotare. Această abordare propusă se bazează pe utilizarea unui sistem deschis de extragere a informațiilor. Demonstrăm aplicarea metodei pe un corpus SNLI bine cunoscut. Pe parcursul corpului obținut, oferim primele evaluări, precum și stabilim o bază de referință puternică.', 'sr': 'Prirodna jezička infekcija (NLI) je ključni deo razumevanja prirodnog jezika. NLI zadatak je definisan kao problem odluke da li se određena rečenica - hipoteza - može zaraziti iz određenog teksta. Obično se bavimo tekstom koji se sastoji od samo jedne premise/jedinstvene rečenice, koja se zove jedinstveni zadatak za pristanak premise (SPE). Nedavno je uveden izveden zadatak NLI iz višestrukih prostora (MPE) zajedno sa prvim annotiranim korpusom i odgovarajući nekoliko jakih osnovnih linija. Ipak, daljnji razvoj u oblasti MPE zahteva pristupnost ogromnih količina annotiranih podataka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu metodu za brzo izvlačenje MPE corpora iz postojećih NLI (SPE) annotiranih podataka koji ne zahtevaju nikakve dodatne annotacije. Ovaj predloženi pristup se temelji na korištenju otvorenog sustava izvlačenja informacija. Pokazujemo primjenu metode na poznatom SNLI korpusu. Preko nabavljenog korpusa pružamo prve procjene, kao i tvrdimo jaku osnovnu liniju.', 'so': 'Cawinaada afka asalka ah (NLI) waa qayb ka muhiim ah waxgarashada afka asalka ah. The NLI task is defined as a decision problem whether a given sentence - hypothesis - can be inferred from a given text.  Sida caadiga ah waxaynu kala macaamiloonnaa qoraal kaliya oo ka mid ah hal hore/hal eray, kaas oo lagu magacaabaa shaqo hal cilmi leh (SPE). Muddii ugu dhowayd waxaa la soo bandhigay shaqada NLI oo ka soo baxay meelo kala duduwan (MPE) waxaana la soo bandhigay koofiyadda ugu horraysay oo la mid ah korpus. Nevertheless, the further development in MPE field requires accessibility of huge amounts of annotated data.  Qoraalkan waxaan ku qornaa qaab warqad ah oo dhaqso ah oo ka soo qaadashada shirkadda MPE ee ka soo baxaya macluumaad ku saabsan (SPE) oo a an u baahnayn shaqo dheeraad ah. Dhaqaalahan la soo jeeday waxay ku saleysan tahay isticmaalka nidaamka soo bixinta macluumaadka furan. Waxaynu muujinnaa codsiga qaababka lagu magacaabay SNLI corpus. Waxaynu ka sarraynaa kaartaynta ugu horeeya iyo sidoo kale waxaynu isticmaalnaa qoraal xoog leh.', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி புரியாத (NLI) என்பது இயல்பான மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ளும் விசை பகுதியாகும். கொடுக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கு - கொடுக்கப்பட்ட உரையிலிருந்து பாதிக்கப்படுமா என்று NLI செயல் ஒரு தீர்ப்பு பிரச்சினைய பொதுவாக, ஒரே முன்னோக்கு/ஒரு வாக்கியத்தில் இருக்கும் ஒரு உரையை நாம் ஒதுங்கிக் கொள்கிறோம், அது ஒரு முன்னோக்கு அறியாத செ சமீபத்தில், பல முக்கியங்களிலிருந்து NLI ஒரு கொண்ட செயல் முதல் அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட கோப்புகளுடன் முதலில் குறிப்பிடப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் பல வலி Nevertheless, the further development in MPE field requires accessibility of huge amounts of annotated data.  இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் எம்பி நிறுவனத்திலிருந்து வேகமாக கொண்டு வருவதற்கான ஒரு புதிய முறைமையை அறிவிக்கிறோம். அது எந்த கூடுதல் அறிவிப்பு வ திறந்த தகவல் வெளியீட்டு அமைப்பை பயன்படுத்தி இந்த முன்நோக்கம் அடிப்படையாக உள்ளது. நாம் ஒரு நன்றாக அறியப்பட்ட SNLI கார்ப்ஸ் முறைமையின் பயன்பாட்டை காட்டுகிறோம். பெற்ற கோர்பாஸ் மீது, நாம் முதல் மதிப்புகளை வழங்குகிறோம் மற்றும் நாம் ஒரு வலிமை அடிப்படைக்கோடு நிலை', 'sv': 'Naturligt språk inferens (NLI) är en viktig del av naturlig språkförståelse. NLI-uppgiften definieras som ett beslutsproblem om en given mening - hypotes - kan härledas från en given text. Typiskt handlar vi om en text som bara består av en enda premiss/en enda mening, vilket kallas en enkel premiss involvering (SPE) uppgift. Nyligen infördes en härledd uppgift av NLI från flera lokaler (MPE) tillsammans med den första kommenterade korpusen och motsvarande flera starka baslinjer. Den fortsatta utvecklingen inom MPE-området kräver dock tillgång till enorma mängder kommenterade data. I denna uppsats introducerar vi en ny metod för att snabbt härleda MPE-korpora från en befintlig NLI (SPE) kommenterad data som inte kräver något ytterligare annotationsarbete. Detta föreslagna tillvägagångssätt grundar sig på att använda ett öppet system för informationsutvinning. Vi visar hur metoden tillämpas på en välkänd SNLI-korpus. Över den erhållna korpusen ger vi de första utvärderingarna samt anger en stark baslinje.', 'si': 'ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණය (NLI) තමයි ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව තේරුම්ගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක්. @ info සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට, අපි පාළුවක් එක්ක ප්\u200dරධාන/එක්ක වාක්යෙක් වලින් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, ඒකෙන් එක්ක ප්\u200dරධාන ක්\u200dරියාව අලුත් වෙලාවෙන්, NLI වලින් ප්\u200dරධානය (MPE) වලින් ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙන්නේ පළමු ප්\u200dරධානය කරුපස් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වුනා  ඒත් MPE ක්ෂේත්\u200dරයේ විශාල ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා විශාල දත්ත ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්නේ MPE කොර්පෝරාව ඉක්මනින් පිළිගන්න විධානයක් තියෙන්නේ තියෙන්නේ NLI (SPE) වලින් තොරතුරු දත් මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ විවෘත තොරතුරු නිර්මාණ පද්ධතියක් භාවිත කරන්න. අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා විදියට පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා දැනගත්ත SNLI කොර්පුස් එකක්. අපි පළමු විශ්ලේෂණයක් දෙන්නම්, අපි ශක්තිමත් පළමු විශ්ලේෂණයක් දෙන්නම්.', 'ur': 'طبیعی زبان کے ایفارنس (NLI) طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کی کلید حصہ ہے۔ NLI کا کام ایک فیصلہ مسئلہ کے طور پر مقرر کیا گیا ہے کہ کیا ایک فیصلہ کیا گیا ہے - فرضی - ایک مقرر متن سے نازل ہو سکتا ہے. معمولاً ہم ایک ایسی پیغام کے ساتھ کررہے ہیں جو صرف ایک پیغام/ایک کلمہ کے سامنے ہے، جس کا نام ایک پیغام تحمل (SPE) کا کام ہے. اچھے وقت، NLI کے بہت سی محل (MPE) سے ایک کام پہنچایا گیا تھا جو پہلی دکھائی کرپوس کے ساتھ اور بہت سی قوی بنسس لینوں کے مطابق ہے۔ لیکن MPE فیلڈ میں اضافہ کی توسعہ کی ضرورت ہے کہ بہت سی اندازے دکھائے ہوئے ڈاکٹوں کی دسترسی حاصل کرے۔ ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک نو طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ MPE corpora کو ایک موجود NLI (SPE) کے ذریعہ سے پہنچا سکتا ہے جو کوئی اضافہ اضافہ کے کام کی ضرورت نہیں ہے۔ یہ پیشنهاد کی تقریبا کھلی معلومات اخراج سیسٹم کے استعمال پر بنیاد ہے. ہم ایک خوب معلوم SNLI کورپوس پر اس طریقے کا کاروبار دکھاتے ہیں۔ ہم پہلی ارزیابی کو پہنچاتے ہیں اور ایک طاقتور بنسٹلین کو ادا کرتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Natalik til murakkablik (NLI) asl tilni tushunish uchun muhim qismi. Name Odatda, biz faqat bir prezifa/bir bir bir so'z bilan bir so'z bilan boshqaramiz. Bu bir bir prefix (SPE) vazifa deb nomlangan. Recently, a derived task of NLI from multiple premises (MPE) was introduced together with the first annotated corpus and corresponding several strong baselines.  Lekin, MPE maydondagi koʻproq taʼminlovchisi juda katta taʼminlovchi maʼlumotga murojaat qilish kerak. Bu qogʻozda biz mavjud NLI (SPE) bilan tez keladigan MPE kompaniyalaridan foydalanish uchun qoʻshimcha taʼminot kerak emas. Name Biz yaxshi notoʻgʻri SNLI corpusning usulini ko'rsatdik. Qabul qilingan korpus orqali biz birinchi qiymatni anglatamiz va biz birinchi qiymatni tasavvur qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Liên kết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLl) là một phần then chốt của sự hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Việc này được định nghĩa là một vấn đề quyết định có phải do một chữ "giả thuyết" được viết ra hay không. Thông thường, chúng tôi giải quyết một văn bản chỉ có một tiền đề/một câu duy nhất, được gọi là một nhiệm vụ đảm bảo tiêu chuẩn duy nhất (SPE). Gần đây, một công việc bắt nguồn của NLI từ nhiều cơ sở khác nhau (MPE) được nhập vào cùng với một tập thể được ghi chú đầu tiên và mô phỏng nhiều bản nền mạnh. Tuy nhiên, sự phát triển tiếp theo trong trường MPE yêu cầu sự giúp đỡ của rất nhiều dữ liệu được ghi chú. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp mới để thu hồi nhanh tập thể MPE từ một dữ liệu ghi chú đã có, không cần thêm ghi chú. Kế hoạch này dựa trên việc sử dụng một hệ thống khai thác thông tin mở. Chúng tôi chứng minh phương pháp được áp dụng cho một tập đoàn người quen. Chúng tôi cung cấp những bản đánh giá đầu tiên cũng như một cơ sở cơ bản vững chắc.', 'da': 'Naturligt sprog inference (NLI) er en vigtig del af naturlig sprogforståelse. NLI-opgaven defineres som et beslutningsproblem, hvorvidt en given sætning - hypotese - kan udledes af en given tekst. Typisk beskæftiger vi os med en tekst bestående af blot en enkelt præmis/enkelt sætning, som kaldes en enkelt præmis involvering (SPE) opgave. For nylig blev en afledt opgave af NLI fra flere lokaler (MPE) introduceret sammen med den første kommenterede korpus og tilsvarende flere stærke basislinjer. Ikke desto mindre kræver den videre udvikling inden for MPE-feltet adgang til enorme mængder kommenterede data. I denne artikel introducerer vi en ny metode til hurtig udledning af MPE-korpora fra en eksisterende NLI (SPE) annotated data, der ikke kræver yderligere annotation arbejde. Denne foreslåede fremgangsmåde er baseret på anvendelse af et åbent informationsudvindingssystem. Vi demonstrerer anvendelsen af metoden på et velkendt SNLI korpus. Over det opnåede korpus giver vi de første evalueringer samt vi angiver en stærk baseline.', 'hr': 'Prirodna jezička infekcija (NLI) je ključni dio razumijevanja prirodnog jezika. NLI zadatak je definiran kao problem odluke da li se predviđena rečenica - hipoteza - može zaraziti iz određenog teksta. Obično se bavimo tekstom koji se sastoji samo jedna premisa/jedinstvena rečenica, koja se zove jedinstveni zadatak za zadržavanje premisa (SPE). Nedavno je uveden izveden zadatak NLI iz višestrukih prostora (MPE) zajedno s prvim annotiranim korpusom i odgovarajućim nekoliko jakih osnovnih linija. Ipak, daljnji razvoj u oblasti MPE zahtijeva pristupnost ogromnih količina annotiranih podataka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu metodu brzog izvlačenja MPE korporacije iz postojećih NLI (SPE) annotiranih podataka koji ne zahtijevaju dodatne annotacije. Ovaj predloženi pristup se temelji na upotrebi otvorenog sustava izvlačenja informacija. Pokazujemo primjenu metode na poznatom SNLI korpusu. Preko nabavljenog korpusa pružamo prve procjene, kao i tvrdimo jaku početnu liniju.', 'nl': 'Natural language inference (NLI) is een belangrijk onderdeel van het begrijpen van natuurlijke taal. De NLI-taak wordt gedefinieerd als een beslissingsprobleem of een bepaalde zin-hypothese proper kan worden afgeleid uit een bepaalde tekst. Meestal hebben we te maken met een tekst die bestaat uit slechts één premise/enkele zin, wat een single premise implication (SPE) taak wordt genoemd. Onlangs werd een afgeleide taak van NLI from multiple premises (MPE) geïntroduceerd samen met het eerste geannoteerde corpus en bijbehorende verschillende sterke baselines. Niettemin vereist de verdere ontwikkeling op het gebied van MPE toegang tot enorme hoeveelheden geannoteerde gegevens. In dit artikel introduceren we een nieuwe methode voor het snel afleiden van MPE corpora van bestaande NLI (SPE) geanotateerde gegevens die geen extra annotatie werk vereisen. Deze voorgestelde aanpak is gebaseerd op het gebruik van een open informatieextractiesysteem. We demonstreren de toepassing van de methode op een bekend SNLI corpus. Over het verkregen corpus geven we de eerste evaluaties en geven we een sterke baseline aan.', 'de': 'Natural Language Inference (NLI) ist ein wichtiger Bestandteil des Verständnisses natürlicher Sprache. Die NLI-Aufgabe wird als Entscheidungsproblem definiert, ob aus einem gegebenen Text ein gegebener Satz-Hypothese-1 abgeleitet werden kann. Typischerweise handelt es sich um einen Text, der nur aus einer einzigen Prämisse/einem einzigen Satz besteht, der als Single Premise Implementment (SPE)-Aufgabe bezeichnet wird. Kürzlich wurde eine abgeleitete Aufgabe von NLI aus mehreren Prämissen (MPE) zusammen mit dem ersten annotierten Korpus und entsprechenden mehreren starken Baselines eingeführt. Dennoch erfordert die Weiterentwicklung im MPE-Bereich die Zugänglichkeit großer Mengen annotierter Daten. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine neuartige Methode vor, um MPE-Korpora aus vorhandenen NLI (SPE) annotierten Daten schnell abzuleiten, die keine zusätzlichen Annotationsarbeiten erfordern. Dieser vorgeschlagene Ansatz basiert auf einem offenen Informationsextraktionssystem. Wir demonstrieren die Anwendung der Methode auf einem bekannten SNLI-Korpus. Über den erhaltenen Korpus liefern wir die ersten Auswertungen und stellen eine starke Basis dar.', 'bg': 'Природният език е ключова част от разбирането на естествения език. Задачата НЛИ се дефинира като решаващ проблем дали дадено изречение - хипотеза - може да бъде изведено от даден текст. Обикновено се занимаваме с текст, състоящ се само от една предпоставка/едно изречение, което се нарича задача за едновременно включване (СПЕ). Наскоро бе въведена задача на НЛИ от множество помещения (МСП), заедно с първия анотиран корпус и съответните няколко силни базови линии. Въпреки това, по-нататъшното развитие в областта на МДГ изисква достъпност на огромни количества анотирани данни. В тази статия въвеждаме нов метод за бързо извличане на корпуси от съществуващи анотирани данни, които не изискват допълнителна анотация. Този предложен подход се основава на използването на отворена система за извличане на информация. Демонстрираме прилагането на метода върху добре познат корпус на СНЛИ. Над получения корпус предоставяме първите оценки, както и посочваме силна база.', 'id': 'Keputusan bahasa alam (NLI) adalah bagian kunci dari pemahaman bahasa alam. The NLI task is defined as a decision problem whether a given sentence - hypothesis - can be inferred from a given text.  Typically, we deal with a text consisting of just a single premise/single sentence, which is called a single premise entailment (SPE) task.  Baru-baru ini, tugas berasal dari NLI dari banyak ruang (MPE) diperkenalkan bersama dengan mayat yang pertama yang dicatat dan sesuai dengan beberapa garis dasar yang kuat. Namun, perkembangan lanjut di lapangan MPE membutuhkan aksesibilitas jumlah besar data yang dicatat. Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan metode baru untuk mendatangkan cepat dari korpora MPE dari data annotasi NLI (SPE) yang ada yang tidak membutuhkan pekerjaan annotasi tambahan. pendekatan yang diusulkan ini berdasarkan menggunakan sistem ekstraksi informasi terbuka. Kami menunjukkan aplikasi metode pada korpus SNLI yang terkenal. Di atas tubuh yang diperoleh, kami menyediakan evaluasi pertama dan kami menyatakan dasar dasar yang kuat.', 'ko': '자연 언어 추리는 자연 언어 이해의 중요한 구성 부분이다.NLI 작업은 주어진 문장인 가설을 주어진 텍스트에서 추정할 수 있는지의 결정 문제로 정의된다.일반적으로 우리가 처리하는 텍스트는 하나의 전제/문장만 포함하는데 이것은 단일 전제함축(SPE) 임무라고 부른다.최근에 파생된 다전제 NLI 작업(MPE)이 첫 번째 주석 자료 라이브러리와 상응하는 몇 개의 강력한 기선과 함께 도입되었다.그러나 MPE 분야의 진일보한 발전은 대량의 주석 데이터의 접근성을 필요로 한다.본고에서 우리는 기존의 NLI(SPE) 주석 데이터로부터 MPE 어료 라이브러리를 신속하게 파생시키는 새로운 방법을 소개했는데 이 방법은 어떠한 추가 주석 작업도 필요하지 않다.이 방법은 개방된 정보 추출 시스템을 바탕으로 한다.우리는 유명한 SNLI 자료 라이브러리에서 이 방법의 응용을 보여 주었다.얻은 자료 라이브러리에서 우리는 첫 번째 평가를 제공했고 강력한 기선을 설명했다.', 'fa': 'آلودگی زبان طبیعی (NLI) یک بخش کلید از درک زبان طبیعی است. وظیفه NLI به عنوان یک مشکل تصمیم تعریف می\u200cشود که آیا یک جمله - فرضیه - می\u200cتواند از یک متن داده آلوده شود. معمولاً ما با یک متن معرفی می کنیم که تنها یک مجموعه/یک مجموعه معرفی می کنیم، که به عنوان یک مجموعه مجموعه (SPE) نامیده می شود. اخیراً یک وظیفه\u200cای از NLI از تعداد زیادی (MPE) با اولین شرکت آشکار شده و با چندین خطوط پایگاه\u200cهای قوی معرفی شد. با این حال، توسعه بیشتری در زمینه MPE نیاز به دسترسی دسترسی از مقدار زیادی از داده های نوشته شده است. در این کاغذ ما یک روش نویسی برای سریع تولید از شرکت MPE از داده های نوشته شده NLI (SPE) را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که هیچ کار اضافه\u200cای لازم ندارد. این روش پیشنهاد بر اساس استفاده از سیستم استخراج اطلاعات باز است. ما کاربرد روش را در یک کورپوس SNLI شناخته می کنیم. ما اولین ارزیابی را به عنوان یک پایین قوی ارزیابی می دهیم.', 'af': "Natuurlike taal inferensie (NLI) is 'n sleutel deel van natuurlike taal verstanding. Die NLI taak is gedefinieerd as 'n besluit probleem of 'n gegewe seting - hypotese - kan van' n gegewe teks uitgelei word. Tipe, ons behandel met 'n teks wat bestaan van net 'n enkele premise/enkele seting, wat genoem word 'n enkele premise houding (SPE) taak. Onlangs was 'n afgeleide taak van NLI van veelvuldige premisies (MPE) ingevoer saam met die eerste aangetelde korpus en ooreenstemmende verskeie sterke basisline. Maar die verdere ontwikkeling in MPE veld benodig toeganklikheid van groot hoeveelheid aangekies data. In hierdie papier introduseer ons 'n roman metode vir vinnige afgeleide van MPE korpora van' n bestaande NLI (SPE) aangetekende data wat nie nodig enige addisionele annotasie werk nie. Hierdie voorgestelde toegang is gebaseer op gebruik van 'n oop inligting uittrekking stelsel. Ons wys die toepassing van die metode op 'n goed bekend SNLI corpus. Ons verskaf die eerste evaluasies, en ons stel 'n sterk basisline.", 'tr': "Täbiýal dil azalyşyk (NLI) tebigat dillerin düşünmesiniň esasy bölegi. NLI zady berilen sözlem - hipotez - berilen metin tarapyndan çykyp biler diýip soraglanýar. Adatça, biz diňe ýeke bir premise/ýeke sözläniň bar bir metin bilen çykýarys. Bu ýeke premise taýýarlama işi diýip atlandyrylýar. Son zamanlarda, birden çok alandan NLI'nin (MPE) işi ilkinji hasaplanmış korpus ve birden güçlü temel hatlarla birlikte tanıştırdı. Yöne MPE sahypasynda öňki gelişmek üçin täze bir şekilde täze bilgili maglumatlaryň elýeterlişligi gerek. Bu kagyzda MPE corpora'dan çalt taýýarlanan hasaplanýan hasaplanýan hasaplanýan hasaplanyşyň (SPE) täze bir täze täze täze üýtgedigini tanyşdyrýarys. Bu teklip etmek üçin açyk maglumat gaýşartma sistemasyny ullanýar. Biz SNLI corpus bilen bilinen yöntemiň uygulamasyny görkeýäris. Kaçylyk korpusyň üstünde birinji çykyşymyzy we güýçli çykyşymyzy berýäris.", 'sw': 'Ugonjwa wa lugha ya asili (NLI) ni sehemu ya msingi ya kuelewa lugha ya asili. Kazi ya NLI inaelezea kama tatizo la uamuzi kama hukumu iliyotolewa - dhana ya imani - inaweza kuathiriwa na maandishi yaliyopewa. Kwa kawaida, tunakabiliana na maandishi yanayojumuisha moja tu ya awamu/hukumu moja, ambayo inaitwa kazi moja ya mjuzi (SPE). Hivi karibuni, jukumu lililotokana na NLI kutoka maeneo mbalimbali (MPE) lilianzishwa pamoja na makampuni ya kwanza yaliyotajwa na kuanganisha misingi kadhaa yenye nguvu. Hata hivyo, maendeleo zaidi katika uwanja wa chama cha MPE yanahitaji upatikanaji wa taarifa kubwa zilizotajwa. Katika karatasi hii tunaonyesha njia ya riwaya kwa haraka kuanzia kampuni ya MPE kutoka kwenye taarifa za NLI (SPE) ambazo hazihitaji kazi yoyote ya kuchangaza. Mfumo huu unapendekezwa unategemea kwa kutumia mfumo wa kujitoa taarifa wazi. Tunaonyesha matumizi ya mbinu kwa mashine maarufu ya SNLI. Kuhusu makampuni yaliyopatikana, tunatoa tathmini za kwanza kama vile tunavyoeleza msingi mkali.', 'sq': 'Natural language inference (NLI) is a key part of natural language understanding.  The NLI task is defined as a decision problem whether a given sentence - hypothesis - can be inferred from a given text.  Zakonisht, ne merremi me një tekst që përbëhet nga vetëm një premtesë e vetme/një fjalë e vetme, e cila quhet një detyrë e vetme premtesë përfshirje (SPE). Recently, a derived task of NLI from multiple premises (MPE) was introduced together with the first annotated corpus and corresponding several strong baselines.  Megjithatë, zhvillimi i mëtejshëm në fushën MPE kërkon aksesibilitetin e sasive të mëdha të të dhënave të shënuara. Në këtë letër ne futim një metodë të re për nxjerrjen e shpejtë të korprës MPE nga të dhënat ekzistuese të anotuara NLI (SPE) që nuk kërkojnë ndonjë punë shtesë anotacioni. Ky metodë i propozuar bazohet në përdorimin e një sistemi të hapur të nxjerrjes së informacionit. Ne demonstrojmë aplikimin e metodës në një korpus SNLI të njohur. Over the obtained corpus, we provide the first evaluations as well as we state a strong baseline.', 'am': 'የአዳባዊ ቋንቋ ግጭት (NLI) የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማስተዋል መክፈቻ ነው፡፡ የNLI ስራ የተሰጠው ፍርድ - hypothesis - ከተሰጠው ጽሑፍ እንዲወስድ የፍርድ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ በተለመደው፣ አንዲት ብጤት/አንዲት ብሔራዊ ጽሑፍ እናስቸጋጅላለን፣ የተባለው አንድ ብሔራዊ ጉዳይ (SPE) ስራ የሚባል፡፡ በቅርቢቱ ዘመን፣ ከብዙ ቤቶች (MPE) የNLI ስራ በተለየ የመጀመሪያው የቆርፓስ ክሮፕስ እና በብዙ ብርቱ መደገፊያዎች ተደጋግሞአል፡፡ ነገር ግን የፓርላማ አካባቢ መሬት ግንኙነት ብዙ ዳታዎችን ለመግኘት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም ውስጥ የአሁኑ የኢንሊ (SPE) ዳታዎችን ከፈጥኖ የፓርላማ ኮርፖር (የኢሜይል ኮርፖር) ለማግኘት የጠቅላላ አቅራቢያ ሥርዓት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ይህ የተዘጋጀ ሥርዓት የተከፈተ መረጃ ምርጫው ሲስተም በመጠቀም ላይ ነው፡፡ የSNLI ኮፕስ በሚታወቀው የሥርዓት ጥናት እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በተገኘው ቆርፓስ ላይ የፊተኛውን ማስታወቂያ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի եզրակացությունը բնական լեզվի հասկացության կարևոր մասն է: The NLI task is defined as a decision problem whether a given sentence - hypothesis - can be inferred from a given text.  Typically, we deal with a text consisting of just a single premise/single sentence, which is called a single premise entailment (SPE) task.  Վերջերս, բազմաթիվ միջավայրերից (MPE) հանդիսացած ՆԼԻ-ի առաջին խնդիրը ներկայացվեց միասին առաջին նկարագրված մարմինի հետ և համապատասխանում են որոշ ուժեղ հիմքերին: Այնուամենայնիվ, MPE ոլորտում զարգացումը պահանջում է գրված տվյալների հսկայական քանակությամբ հասանելիության: In this paper we introduce a novel method for rapid deriving of MPE corpora from an existing NLI (SPE) annotated data that does not require any additional annotation work.  Այս առաջարկած մոտեցումը հիմնված է բաց տեղեկատվական ստացման համակարգի օգտագործման վրա: We demonstrate the application of the method on a well known SNLI corpus.  Over the obtained corpus, we provide the first evaluations as well as we state a strong baseline.', 'az': "Təbiətli dil infeksiyonu (NLI) təbiətli dil anlayışının düzgün bir parçasıdır. NLI işləri verilən sözlər - hipotezi - verilən mətndən dəyişdirilməsi mümkün olmadığını karar vermək problemi olaraq tanımlanar. Biz yalnız bir premise/tək cümlədən oluşan bir mətn ilə çəkirik, ki bu tək premise tutulması (SPE) işidir. Son zamanlarda, NLI'nin çoxlu alanlardan (MPE) təşkil edilən bir işi ilk təşkil edilmiş korpus ilə birlikdə təşkil edildi və çoxlu qüvvətli sətirlərə uyuşdu. Yinə də, MPE sahəsindəki daha artıq tədbirlik böyük nümunə verilən məlumatların faydalanması lazımdır. Bu kağızda MPE corpora'nın hızlı çıxarılması üçün yeni bir yol göstəririk ki, həmin NLI (SPE) məlumatlarından heç bir əlavə məlumatlarına ehtiyacı olmayan məlumatlardan istifadə edilməz. Bu təbliğ edilən tərzim açıq məlumat çıxarma sistemini istifadə etməyə dayanır. Biz bu metodların uygulamasını tanıdıq SNLI korpusu. Qazanmış korpus üstündə ilk değerlendirmələri və güclü səhifələri təyin edirik.", 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক ভাষার আক্রান্ত (NLI) হচ্ছে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা বুঝার একটি প্রধান অংশ। নির্দিষ্ট বাক্য - হিপাথিসিস্ট- একটি প্রদত্ত লেখা থেকে আক্রান্ত হতে পারে কিনা এনলির কাজ একটি সিদ্ধান্ত সমস্যা  সাধারণত, আমরা একটি টেক্সটের সাথে চুক্তি করি শুধুমাত্র একটি মূল্য/একাধিক শাস্তির মধ্যে রয়েছে, যার নামে একটি প্রেমিজেন্ট (এসপ সম্প্রতি প্রথম বিরক্তিকর কোর্পাসের সাথে এনলির একটি কাজের সাথে পরিচালনা করা হয় এবং বেশ কয়েকটি শক্তিশালী বেসেলাইনের সাথে সংশ্লিষ্ট। তবে এমপিই ক্ষেত্রে আরো উন্নয়নের জন্য বিশাল পরিমাণ তথ্য প্রবেশের প্রয়োজন। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নোভেল পদ্ধতি চিহ্নিত করে দেখাচ্ছি যা বিদ্যমান একটি এনলি(এসপি) থেকে দ্রুত কোর্পোরা প্রদান করার জন্য দ্রুত তথ্য উল্লেখ এই প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি একটি উন্মুক্ত তথ্য বের করা সিস্টেম ব্যবহার করে ভিত্তিক। আমরা একটি ভালো পরিচিত SNLI কোর্পাসের উপর এই পদ্ধতির প্রয়োগ প্রদর্শন করি। পেয়েছিলাম কোর্পাসের উপর, আমরা প্রথম মূল্য প্রদান করি এবং আমরা একটি শক্তিশালী বেসাইলাইনের কথা বলি।', 'bs': 'Prirodna jezička infekcija (NLI) je ključni dio razumijevanja prirodnog jezika. NLI zadatak je definisan kao problem odluke da li se predata rečenica - hipoteza - može zaraziti iz određenog teksta. Obično se bavimo tekstom koji se sastoji od samo jedne premise/jedinstvene rečenice, koja se zove jedinstveni zadatak za zadržavanje premise (SPE). Nedavno je uveden izveden zadatak NLI iz višestrukih prostora (MPE) zajedno s prvim annotiranim korpusom i odgovarajući nekoliko jakih osnovnih linija. Ipak, daljnji razvoj u oblasti MPE zahtijeva pristupnost ogromnih količina annotiranih podataka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu metodu za brzo izvlačenje MPE corpora iz postojećih NLI (SPE) annotiranih podataka koji ne zahtijevaju nikakve dodatne annotacije. Ovaj predloženi pristup se temelji na upotrebi otvorenog sustava izvlačenja informacija. Pokazujemo primjenu metode na poznatom SNLI korpusu. Preko nabavljenog korpusa pružamo prve procjene, kao i tvrdimo jaku početnu liniju.', 'et': 'Looduskeele järeldus (NLI) on looduskeele mõistmise oluline osa. NLI ülesanne on määratletud kui otsustamisprobleem, kas antud lauset - hüpoteesi - saab konkreetsest tekstist järeldada. Tavaliselt tegeleme tekstiga, mis koosneb vaid ühest eeldusest / ühest lausest, mida nimetatakse ühe eelduse kaasamise ülesandeks (SPE). Hiljuti tutvustati NLI tuletatud ülesannet mitmest ruumist (MPE) koos esimese annoteeritud korpuse ja vastava mitme tugeva lähtejoonega. Sellegipoolest nõuab lubatud piirväärtuste valdkonna edasine areng ligipääsu tohututele märgitud andmetele. Käesolevas töös tutvustame uut meetodit MPE korpuste kiireks tuletamiseks olemasolevatest NLI (SPE) annoteeritud andmetest, mis ei vaja täiendavat annoteerimistööd. Kavandatud lähenemisviis põhineb avatud teabekaevandamise süsteemi kasutamisel. Näitame meetodi rakendamist tuntud SNLI korpusel. Saadud korpuse üle anname esimesed hinnangud ja esitame tugeva aluse.', 'cs': 'Inference přirozeného jazyka (NLI) je klíčovou součástí porozumění přirozenému jazyku. Úloha NLI je definována jako rozhodovací problém, zda lze z daného textu odvodit danou větu pro hypotézu a pro většinu. Typicky se zabýváme textem skládajícím se pouze z jednoho předpokladu/jedné věty, který se nazývá úlohou jednoho předpokladu (SPE). Nedávno byl představen odvozený úkol NLI z multiple premises (MPE) společně s prvním anotovaným korpusem a odpovídajícími několika silným základním liniím. Nicméně, další vývoj v oblasti MPE vyžaduje dostupnost obrovského množství anotovaných dat. V tomto článku představujeme novou metodu rychlého odvození MPE korpusů z existujících NLI (SPE) anotovaných dat, která nevyžaduje žádnou další anotaci. Tento navrhovaný přístup je založen na použití otevřeného systému extrakce informací. Ukážeme aplikaci metody na známém SNLI korpusu. Nad získaným korpusem poskytujeme první hodnocení a uvádíme silnou základnu.', 'fi': 'Luonnonkielen päättely (NLI) on keskeinen osa luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämistä. NLI-tehtävä määritellään päätösongelmaksi, voidaanko tietty lause - hypoteesi - päätellä tietystä tekstistä. Tyypillisesti käsittelemme tekstiä, joka koostuu vain yhdestä premissasta / yhdestä lauseesta, jota kutsutaan yhden premissan implement (SPE) -tehtäväksi. Äskettäin esiteltiin NLI:n johdettu tehtävä useista tiloista (MPE) yhdessä ensimmäisen annotoidun korpusen ja vastaavien useiden vahvojen lähtölinjojen kanssa. MPE-alan jatkokehitys edellyttää kuitenkin valtavien merkintöihin merkittyjen tietojen saatavuutta. Tässä työssä esittelemme uuden menetelmän MPE-korpusten nopeaan johtamiseen olemassa olevasta NLI (SPE) -annotoidusta datasta, joka ei vaadi lisäannotointityötä. Ehdotettu lähestymistapa perustuu avoimen tiedonhankintajärjestelmän käyttöön. Esittelemme menetelmän soveltamisen tunnettuun SNLI-korpuseen. Saadun korpusen yli annamme ensimmäiset arvioinnit ja vahvistamme vahvan lähtökohdan.', 'ca': "La inferència del llenguatge natural (NLI) és una part clau de l'enteniment natural del llenguatge. La tasca NLI és definida com un problem a de decisió si una frase determinada - hipòtesi - pot ser inferida d'un text determinat. Normalment, ens ocupem d'un text que consisteix en una sola premisa/una sola frase, que es diu una tasca d'implicació de premisa única (SPE). Recentment, es va introduir una tasca derivada de NLI de múltiples premis (MPE) juntament amb el primer cos anotat i corresponent a diverses línies de base fortes. Nevertheless, the further development in MPE field requires accessibility of huge amounts of annotated data.  En aquest paper introduïm un mètode nou per a obtenir ràpidament MPE corpora d'una informació anotata existent en NLI (SPE) que no requereix cap treball adicional d'anotació. Aquest enfocament proposat està basat en l'ús d'un sistema obert d'extracció d'informació. Demonstrem l'aplicació del mètode en un cos SNLI ben conegut. Over the obtained corpus, we provide the first evaluations as well as we state a strong baseline.", 'jv': 'Teratan kanggo kelas Normal NLI tasks dipoleh barang kelas mungkun kesemplo sing dianggap dadi - suputes - iso dianggap kelas teks sing bisa dianggap Ok, Ok Ok biasane karo hal-hal, dadi NLI luwih akeh tanggal asai multi-preiane (mpE) dumadhi karo perusahaan tanggal sing sampeyan mripat lan tambahan nganggo perusahaan langkung sampeyan. Slackfree Nang paper iki, kita nambah un dadi sing nguasakno kanggo ngilanggar mpE ora nggawe barang kelas NLI (SpaE) dadi sing dadi ora ono nggawe akeh nyong nyong. Ndoleh sing supoyo nggunakake sistem kang nggawe informasi wis mbukak Awakdhéwé éntuk aplikasi kanggo ngerasakno ngono babagan sNLI luwih dumadhi. Awak dhéwé kawit karo hal-hal kanggo awak dhéwé, awak dhéwé ngewehke kanggo awak dhéwé kuwi tindakan sing wis ana.', 'sk': 'Sklepanje naravnega jezika (NLI) je ključni del razumevanja naravnega jezika. Naloga NLI je opredeljena kot problem odločanja, ali je mogoče določen stavek - hipoteza - sklepati iz določenega besedila. Običajno se ukvarjamo z besedilom, ki ga sestavlja samo ena premisa/en stavek, ki se imenuje naloga enotnega premisa (SPE). Pred kratkim je bila uvedena izpeljana naloga NLI iz več prostorov (MPE) skupaj s prvim označenim korpusom in ustreznimi več močnimi osnovnimi črtami. Vendar pa nadaljnji razvoj na področju MPE zahteva dostopnost ogromnih količin podatkov z oznakami. V prispevku predstavljamo novo metodo za hitro izpeljanje korpusov MPE iz obstoječih podatkov z oznakami NLI (SPE), ki ne zahteva nobenega dodatnega dela z oznakami. Ta predlagani pristop temelji na uporabi odprtega sistema za pridobivanje informacij. Prikazujemo uporabo metode na znanem korpusu SNLI. Na pridobljenem korpusu zagotavljamo prve ocene in navajamo močno osnovo.', 'ha': "@ item license (short name) An ƙayyade aikin NLI kamar wata matsayi na hukunta ko an cire wani cewa - za'a iya zartar da shi daga wani matsayin da aka ba. Typically, we deal with a text consisting of just a single premise/single sentence, which is called a single premise entailment (SPE) task.  A yanzu, an introduce wani aikin NLI daga multi-premises (MME) da na farkon da aka yi taƙaita nau'in kuma yana daidai da wasu fassaran ƙarfi. A lokacin da, ƙarami masu ƙaranci cikin shirin Parameter na ƙayyade accessibili yawan mutane mai girma. Ga wannan takardan, za mu introduce wata hanyor noveli wa mai gaugãwa da za'a iya samun makampuni na parse daga wani NALI wanda ya yanzu (SLE) da ba ta ƙayyade wani aikin zartarwa ba. @ info: whatsthis Yana nuna shirin ayukan ayuka a kan wata shirin SNLI da aka sani. Ko da aka samu karatun, za mu sami muhimmada na farko da kuma za mu faɗa salon mai ƙarfi.", 'he': 'התוצאה בשפה טבעית (NLI) היא חלק מפתח של הבנה שפה טבעית. המשימה של NLI מוגדרת כבעיית החלטה אם משפט מסוים - היפותזה - יכול להוציא מתוך טקסט מסוים. בדרך כלל, אנו מתמודדים עם טקסט שמכיל רק משפט אחד/משפט אחד, שנקרא משימה של התערבות משפטית אחת (SPE). לאחרונה, משימה נוצרת של NLI ממקום רבים (MPE) הוצגה יחד עם הגופה הראשונה המכתבת ומתאימה לכמה קווים בסיסיים חזקים. למרות זאת, התפתחות נוספת בשדה MPE דורשת גישה לכמות עצומות של נתונים מצוינים. In this paper we introduce a novel method for rapid deriving of MPE corpora from an existing NLI (SPE) annotated data that does not require any additional annotation work.  הגישה המוצעת הזו מבוססת על השימוש במערכת חיפוש מידע פתוחה. אנחנו מראים את שימוש השיטה על קורפוס SNLI ידוע היטב. Over the obtained corpus, we provide the first evaluations as well as we state a strong baseline.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་ནུས་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ཕན་ཚུན་ནི་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་ཤིག་རེད། NLI ལས་ཀ་ནི་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྗེས་སུ་འཇུག་པའི་ཚིག་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་གསལ་བཀོད་ཐུབ་མིན་འདུག རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱིས་ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་གཅིག་ལས་རྣམས་པའི་ཚིག་ཁག་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་རེད། ཉེ་ཆར་བརྗོད་ཀྱིས། ཁང་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་གཙོ་རིམ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བཏུབ་པའི་ཚོང་ཁང་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གཏོང་། ཡིན་ནའང་། MPE་སྒེར་གྱི་གླེང་སྡུད་ནང་ན་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་ཚད་ཆེ་བ་ཡིན་པས། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་འབྱུང་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྟོན་ཐུབ། ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་འཆར་བཤེར་མ་ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་གྲོས་འཆར་འདི་གཞི་རྟེན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་པའི་SNLI མཐུང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཐོག་ལས་ལག་རྟགས་ཀྱི་བྱ་རིམ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། སྐྱེས་པ་འདུག་གི་མཐུང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་བྱས་པར་བཟོས་དང་པོ་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྩ་གཞི་ཤིག་དང་མཐ'}
{'en': 'ETNLP : A Visual-Aided Systematic Approach to Select Pre-Trained Embeddings for a Downstream Task', 'ar': 'ETNLP: نهج منهجي بمساعدة بصرية لتحديد عمليات التضمين التي تم تدريبها مسبقًا لمهمة المصب', 'pt': 'ETNLP: uma abordagem sistemática com auxílio visual para selecionar incorporações pré-treinadas para uma tarefa downstream', 'fr': 'ETNLP\xa0: une approche systématique assistée par la visualisation pour sélectionner des intégrations pré-entraînées pour une tâche en aval', 'es': 'ETNLP: Un enfoque sistemático con ayuda visual para seleccionar incrustaciones previamente capacitadas para una tarea posterior', 'zh': 'ETNLP曰:视佐统者,所以为下流也', 'hi': 'ETNLP: एक डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्य के लिए पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित एम्बेडिंग का चयन करने के लिए एक दृश्य-सहायता प्राप्त व्यवस्थित दृष्टिकोण', 'ja': 'ETNLP ：下流タスクの事前にトレーニングを受けた埋め込みを選択するための視覚的支援のシステム的アプローチ', 'ru': 'ETNLP: Визуальный систематический подход к выбору предварительно обученных вложений для задачи последующего этапа', 'ga': 'ETNLP: Cur Chuige Córasach Amharcchúnta chun Leabaithe Réamhoilte a Roghnú le haghaidh Tasc Iartheachtach', 'ka': 'ETNLP', 'el': 'Μια οπτική-ενισχυμένη συστηματική προσέγγιση για την επιλογή προ-εκπαιδευμένων ενσωματώσεων για μια μεταγενέστερη εργασία', 'hu': 'ETNLP: Vizuálisan támogatott szisztematikus megközelítés az előképzett beágyazások kiválasztására egy downstream feladathoz', 'it': "ETNLP: un approccio sistematico assistito visivo per selezionare incorporazioni pre-addestrate per un'attività a valle", 'kk': 'ETNLP: Төменгі тапсырма үшін алдындағы оқылған ендірулерді таңдау үшін көрінетін жүйелік көмектесетін систематикалық жағдай', 'mk': 'ЕТНЛП: Систематски пристап со визуелна помош за избирање на предобучени вградувања за задача на низ текот', 'lt': 'ETNLP: Sisteminis vizualinis metodas pasirenkant iš anksto apmokytas įrangas, skirtas žemesniam srautui atlikti', 'ms': 'ETNLP: Pendekatan Sistematik Bantuan-Visual untuk Pilih Embedding Pra-Latihan untuk Tugas Turun', 'ml': 'ETNLP: മുമ്പ് പരിശീലനം തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനുവേണ്ടി ഒരു കാഴ്ചയുള്ള സഹായിക്കപ്പെട്ട സിസ്റ്റീമാറ്റിക്കുള്ള അ', 'mt': 'ETNLP: Approċċ Sistematiku Għajnun Viżwali biex jintgħa żel l-Embeddings imħarrġa minn qabel għal Kompitu Downstream', 'mn': 'ETNLP: Төмнөх үйл ажиллагааны өмнө дасгал хөгжүүлэх системийн тусламжтай ойлголт сонгох', 'pl': 'ETNLP: systematyczne podejście wspomagane wizualnie do wyboru wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń do dalszego zadania', 'no': 'ETNLP: Eit visuelt støtta systemtilgang for å velja føreøvinga innbygging for ei nedstrekkoppgåve', 'ro': 'ETNLP: O abordare sistematică asistată vizual pentru selectarea încorporărilor pre-instruite pentru o activitate în aval', 'sr': 'ETNLP: Visualni sistemski pristup izabrati predobučene integracije za potpuni zadatak', 'so': 'ETNLP: A Visual-aided Systematic Approach to Select Embedding Pre-Trained Task Downstream', 'sv': 'ETNLP: Ett visuellt stödt systematiskt tillvägagångssätt för att välja förberedda inbäddningar för en nedströmsuppgift', 'si': 'ETNLP: ප්\u200dරදේශය සහාය පද්ධතික පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරවේශනය තෝරාගන්න', 'ta': 'ETNLP: கீழ்நோக்கி பணிக்கு முன்பு பயிற்சியான உடைவுகளை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க ஒரு பார்வையும் உதவியுள்ள அமைப்புத் தொடர்', 'ur': 'ETNLP: ایک دھونٹرائیم ٹاکس کے لئے پیش ترین ایمبڈینگ کا انتخاب کرنے کے لئے Visual-Aid سیستمیٹ تقرب', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tổ chức liên lạc: tiếp cận hệ thống trợ hình ảnh để đặt nền bắt đầu học cho nhiệm vụ Downey.', 'bg': 'Визуално подпомаган систематичен подход за избор на предварително обучавани вграждания за задача надолу по веригата', 'nl': 'ETNLP: Een visueel ondersteunde systematische aanpak om vooraf getrainde embeddings te selecteren voor een downstream taak', 'da': 'ETNLP: En visuelt støttet systematisk tilgang til at vælge forududdannede indlejringer til en downstream opgave', 'hr': 'ETNLP: Visualno-pomoćni sistemski pristup za izabranje predobučenih uključenih uključenja za potpuni zadatak', 'de': 'ETNLP: Ein visuell unterstützter systematischer Ansatz zur Auswahl von vorgetrainierten Embeddings für eine nachgelagerte Aufgabe', 'id': 'ETNLP: Sebuah Pendekatan Sistematik Bantuan Visual untuk memilih Embeddings Terlatih Sebelum Tugas Downstream', 'ko': 'ETNLP: 다운스트림 작업에 대해 미리 훈련된 내장 부품을 선택하는 시각 보조 시스템 방법', 'sw': 'ETNLP: Mtandao wa Mfumo wenye misaada wa kuonyesha Kuchagua Mazingira yaliyojifunza', 'fa': 'ETNLP: یک دستیابی سیستماتیک با کمک دیدگانی برای انتخاب پیدا کردن پیش آموزش برای یک کار پایین\u200cترین', 'tr': 'ETNLP: Bir indiki täblisaň üçin Visual-Aided Sistem Approach', 'af': 'ETNLP: 芒聙聶n Visuele-ondersteunde sistemiese toegang na Kies voor-oefening ingesluit vir 芒聙聶n Onderstremde taak', 'sq': 'ETNLP: Një metodë sistemike me ndihmë vizuale për të zgjedhur përfshirjet e paratrajnuara për një detyrë', 'am': 'ETNLP:', 'hy': 'ԵԹՆԼՊ. Վիզուալ օգնությամբ համակարգչային մոտեցում, որպեսզի ընտրենք նախապատրաստված ներգրավումներ ներքև գործի համար', 'az': 'ETNLP: A şa ğı Görünür-Yardımcı Sistem Yaxınlığı Ön-Eğitimli Yaxınlıqları seçmək üçün Görünür-Yardımcı Sistem Yaxınlığı', 'bn': 'ETNLP: ডাউস্ট্রীম কাজের জন্য পূর্ব-প্রশিক্ষিত অবস্থান নির্বাচনের জন্য একটি দৃশ্যমান-সহযোগিতা সিস্টেমিক আগমন', 'bs': 'ETNLP: Visualno-pomoćni sistemski pristup izabrati predobučene integracije za potpuni zadatak', 'ca': 'ETNLP: Un enfocament sistemàtic amb ajuda visual per seleccionar implantacions pré-capacitades per una tasca descendent', 'et': 'ETNLP: visuaalse abiga süstemaatiline lähenemisviis eelõpetatud manustamiste valimiseks allvooluülesande jaoks', 'fi': 'ETNLP: Visuaalisesti avustettu järjestelmällinen lähestymistapa esikoulutettujen upotusten valintaan jatkovaiheen tehtävään', 'cs': 'ETNLP: Vizuálně podporovaný systematický přístup k výběru předškolených vložení pro následnou úlohu', 'jv': 'ETNLP', 'ha': 'ETNLP: A Ƙaramiwa wanda aka Aiki na Faso na Systematic', 'sk': 'ETNLP: Vizualno podprt sistemski pristop za izbiro vnaprej usposobljenih vdelav za opravilo navzdol', 'bo': 'ETNLP：ལྟ་བུའི་རིམ་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བའི་འགྲོ་སྟངས་ལ་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་པ་ཞིག་གདམ་པ་Pre-Trained Embeddings for a Downstream Task', 'he': 'ETNLP: A Visual-Aided Systematic Approach to Select Pre-Trained Embeddings for a Downstream Task'}
{'en': 'Given many recent advanced embedding models, selecting pre-trained word representation (i.e., word embedding) models best fit for a specific downstream NLP task is non-trivial. In this paper, we propose a systematic approach to extracting, evaluating, and visualizing multiple sets of pre-trained word embed- dings to determine which embeddings should be used in a downstream task. First, for extraction, we provide a method to extract a subset of the embeddings to be used in the downstream NLP tasks. Second, for evaluation, we analyse the quality of pre-trained embeddings using an input word analogy list. Finally, we visualize the embedding space to explore the embedded words interactively. We demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed approach on our pre-trained word embedding models in Vietnamese to select which models are suitable for a named entity recogni- tion (NER) task. Specifically, we create a large Vietnamese word analogy list to evaluate and select the pre-trained embedding models for the task. We then utilize the selected embed- dings for the NER task and achieve the new state-of-the-art results on the task benchmark dataset. We also apply the approach to another downstream task of privacy-guaranteed embedding selection, and show that it helps users quickly select the most suitable embeddings. In addition, we create an open-source system using the proposed systematic approach to facilitate similar studies on other NLP tasks. The source code and data are available at https : //github.com / vietnlp / etnlp.', 'es': 'Teniendo en cuenta muchos modelos de incrustación avanzados recientes, la selección de modelos de representación de palabras previamente entrenados (es decir, incrustación de palabras) que mejor se ajusten a una tarea específica de PNL posterior no es trivial. En este artículo, proponemos un enfoque sistemático para extraer, evaluar y visualizar múltiples conjuntos de incrustaciones de palabras previamente entrenadas para determinar qué incrustaciones deben usarse en una tarea posterior. En primer lugar, para la extracción, proporcionamos un método para extraer un subconjunto de las incrustaciones que se utilizarán en las tareas de NLP posteriores. En segundo lugar, para la evaluación, analizamos la calidad de las incrustaciones previamente entrenadas mediante una lista de analogías de palabras de entrada. Finalmente, visualizamos el espacio de incrustación para explorar las palabras incrustadas de forma interactiva. Demostramos la eficacia del enfoque propuesto en nuestros modelos de incrustación de palabras previamente entrenados en vietnamita para seleccionar qué modelos son adecuados para una tarea de reconocimiento de entidad nombrada (NER). Específicamente, creamos una gran lista de analogías de palabras vietnamitas para evaluar y seleccionar los modelos de incrustación previamente entrenados para la tarea. Luego utilizamos las incorporaciones seleccionadas para la tarea NER y logramos los nuevos resultados de vanguardia en el conjunto de datos de referencia de tareas. También aplicamos el enfoque a otra tarea posterior de la selección de incrustaciones con garantía de privacidad y demostramos que ayuda a los usuarios a seleccionar rápidamente las incrustaciones más adecuadas. Además, creamos un sistema de código abierto utilizando el enfoque sistemático propuesto para facilitar estudios similares sobre otras tareas de PNL. El código fuente y los datos son\ndisponible en https: //github.com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'pt': 'Dados muitos modelos avançados de incorporação recentes, selecionar modelos de representação de palavras pré-treinados (ou seja, incorporação de palavras) que melhor se ajustem a uma tarefa específica de PNL downstream não é trivial. Neste artigo, propomos uma abordagem sistemática para extrair, avaliar e visualizar vários conjuntos de incorporações de palavras pré-treinadas para determinar quais incorporações devem ser usadas em uma tarefa posterior. Primeiro, para extração, fornecemos um método para extrair um subconjunto dos embeddings a serem usados nas tarefas de NLP downstream. Em segundo lugar, para avaliação, analisamos a qualidade de embeddings pré-treinados usando uma lista de analogias de palavras de entrada. Por fim, visualizamos o espaço de incorporação para explorar as palavras incorporadas de forma interativa. Demonstramos a eficácia da abordagem proposta em nossos modelos de incorporação de palavras pré-treinados em vietnamita para selecionar quais modelos são adequados para uma tarefa de reconhecimento de entidade nomeada (NER). Especificamente, criamos uma grande lista de analogias de palavras vietnamitas para avaliar e selecionar os modelos de incorporação pré-treinados para a tarefa. Em seguida, utilizamos as incorporações selecionadas para a tarefa NER e alcançamos os novos resultados de última geração no conjunto de dados de referência da tarefa. Também aplicamos a abordagem a outra tarefa downstream de seleção de incorporação com garantia de privacidade e mostramos que ela ajuda os usuários a selecionar rapidamente as incorporações mais adequadas. Além disso, criamos um sistema de código aberto usando a abordagem sistemática proposta para facilitar estudos semelhantes em outras tarefas de PNL. O código-fonte e os dados são\ndisponível em https: //github.com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'ar': 'بالنظر إلى العديد من نماذج التضمين المتقدمة الحديثة ، فإن اختيار نماذج تمثيل الكلمات المُدرَّبة مسبقًا (أي تضمين الكلمات) الأنسب لمهمة معالجة اللغات الطبيعية المحددة في المصب ليس بالأمر السهل. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهجًا منهجيًا لاستخراج وتقييم وتصور مجموعات متعددة من تضمين الكلمات المُدرَّبة مسبقًا لتحديد حفلات الزفاف التي يجب استخدامها في مهمة المصب. أولاً ، للاستخراج ، نقدم طريقة لاستخراج مجموعة فرعية من الزخارف لاستخدامها في مهام معالجة اللغات الطبيعية. ثانيًا ، من أجل التقييم ، نقوم بتحليل جودة حفلات الزفاف المدربة مسبقًا باستخدام قائمة تماثل الكلمات المدخلة. أخيرًا ، نتخيل مساحة التضمين لاستكشاف الكلمات المضمنة بشكل تفاعلي. نبرهن على فعالية النهج المقترح على نماذج تضمين الكلمات المدربة مسبقًا باللغة الفيتنامية لاختيار النماذج المناسبة لمهمة التعرف على الكيانات المسماة (NER). على وجه التحديد ، نقوم بإنشاء قائمة تشابه كبيرة للكلمات الفيتنامية لتقييم واختيار نماذج التضمين المدربة مسبقًا للمهمة. ثم نستخدم التضمينات المختارة لمهمة NER ونحقق أحدث النتائج الجديدة في مجموعة البيانات المعيارية للمهمة. نطبق أيضًا هذا النهج على مهمة أخرى في المراحل النهائية تتمثل في اختيار التضمين المضمون بالخصوصية ، ونوضح أنه يساعد المستخدمين على تحديد أنسب حفلات الزفاف بسرعة. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقوم بإنشاء نظام مفتوح المصدر باستخدام النهج المنهجي المقترح لتسهيل إجراء دراسات مماثلة حول مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية الأخرى. شفرة المصدر والبيانات\nمتاح على https: //github.com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'hi': 'कई हाल के उन्नत एम्बेडिंग मॉडल को देखते हुए, पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व (यानी, शब्द एम्बेडिंग) मॉडल का चयन करना एक विशिष्ट डाउनस्ट्रीम एनएलपी कार्य के लिए सबसे अच्छा फिट गैर-तुच्छ है। इस पेपर में, हम यह निर्धारित करने के लिए पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेड-डिंग्स के कई सेटों को निकालने, मूल्यांकन करने और विज़ुअलाइज़ करने के लिए एक व्यवस्थित दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं कि डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्य में किन एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग किया जाना चाहिए। सबसे पहले, निष्कर्षण के लिए, हम डाउनस्ट्रीम एनएलपी कार्यों में उपयोग किए जाने वाले एम्बेडिंग का सबसेट निकालने के लिए एक विधि प्रदान करते हैं। दूसरा, मूल्यांकन के लिए, हम एक इनपुट शब्द सादृश्य सूची का उपयोग करके पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित एम्बेडिंग की गुणवत्ता का विश्लेषण करते हैं। अंत में, हम एम्बेडेड शब्दों को इंटरैक्टिव रूप से एक्सप्लोर करने के लिए एम्बेडिंग स्पेस की कल्पना करते हैं। हम वियतनामी में हमारे पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल पर प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं ताकि यह पता लगाया जा सके कि कौन से मॉडल एक नामित इकाई (एनईआर) कार्य के लिए उपयुक्त हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम कार्य के लिए पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित एम्बेडिंग मॉडल का मूल्यांकन और चयन करने के लिए एक बड़ी वियतनामी शब्द सादृश्य सूची बनाते हैं। फिर हम एनईआर कार्य के लिए चयनित एम्बेड-डिंग्स का उपयोग करते हैं और कार्य बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर नए अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं। हम गोपनीयता-गारंटीकृत एम्बेडिंग चयन के एक अन्य डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्य के लिए भी दृष्टिकोण लागू करते हैं, और दिखाते हैं कि यह उपयोगकर्ताओं को जल्दी से सबसे उपयुक्त एम्बेडिंग का चयन करने में मदद करता है। इसके अलावा, हम अन्य एनएलपी कार्यों पर समान अध्ययन की सुविधा के लिए प्रस्तावित व्यवस्थित दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करके एक ओपन-सोर्स सिस्टम बनाते हैं। स्रोत कोड और डेटा हैं\nhttps पर उपलब्ध है: //github.com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'fr': "Compte tenu de nombreux modèles d'intégration avancés récents, la sélection de modèles de représentation de mots pré-entraînés (c'est-à-dire l'incorporation de mots) les mieux adaptés à une tâche de PNL spécifique en aval n'est pas triviale. Dans cet article, nous proposons une approche systématique pour extraire, évaluer et visualiser plusieurs ensembles d'incorporations de mots pré-entraînés afin de déterminer quelles intégrations doivent être utilisées dans une tâche en aval. Tout d'abord, pour l'extraction, nous fournissons une méthode pour extraire un sous-ensemble des intégrations à utiliser dans les tâches NLP en aval. Ensuite, pour l'évaluation, nous analysons la qualité des intégrations pré-entraînées à l'aide d'une liste d'analogies de mots d'entrée. Enfin, nous visualisons l'espace d'intégration pour explorer les mots intégrés de manière interactive. Nous démontrons l'efficacité de l'approche proposée sur nos modèles d'intégration de mots pré-entraînés en vietnamien afin de sélectionner les modèles qui conviennent à une tâche de reconnaissance d'entité nommée (NER). Plus précisément, nous créons une grande liste d'analogies de mots vietnamiens pour évaluer et sélectionner les modèles d'intégration pré-entraînés pour la tâche. Nous utilisons ensuite les intégrations sélectionnées pour la tâche NER et obtenons les nouveaux résultats de pointe sur l'ensemble de données de référence des tâches. Nous appliquons également cette approche à une autre tâche en aval de sélection d'intégration garantie de confidentialité, et montrons qu'elle aide les utilisateurs à sélectionner rapidement les intégrations les plus appropriées. En outre, nous créons un système open source utilisant l'approche systématique proposée pour faciliter des études similaires sur d'autres tâches de PNL. Le code source et les données sont\ndisponible sur https://github.com/vietnlp/etnlp.", 'ja': '最近の多くの高度な埋め込みモデルを考えると、特定の下流NLPタスクに最適な事前にトレーニングされた単語表現（すなわち、単語埋め込み）モデルを選択することは重要ではありません。 本稿では、下流のタスクでどの埋め込みを使用すべきかを決定するために、事前に訓練された単語埋め込みの複数のセットを抽出、評価、視覚化するための体系的なアプローチを提案する。 まず、抽出のために、下流のNLPタスクで使用する埋め込みのサブセットを抽出する方法を提供します。 第二に、評価のために、入力された単語の類似リストを使用して、事前にトレーニングされた埋め込みの品質を分析します。 最後に、埋め込まれた単語をインタラクティブに探索するための埋め込みスペースを視覚化します。 私たちは、名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）タスクに適したモデルを選択するために、ベトナム語の事前トレーニングされた単語埋め込みモデルで提案されたアプローチの有効性を実証します。 具体的には、タスクの事前にトレーニングされた埋め込みモデルを評価して選択するために、大きなベトナム語の単語アナロジーリストを作成します。 次に、NERタスクのために選択された埋め込みを利用し、タスクベンチマークデータセットの最新の結果を達成します。 また、このアプローチをプライバシー保証の埋め込み選択の別のダウンストリームタスクに適用し、ユーザーが最も適した埋め込みを迅速に選択するのに役立つことを示します。 さらに、提案された体系的アプローチを使用してオープンソースシステムを作成し、他のNLPタスクの同様の研究を容易にします。 ソースコードとデータは\nhttps :// github.com/vietnlp/etnlpから入手できます。', 'zh': '鉴诸近级嵌模,择其最宜特定下流NLP务者预练单词示(即单词嵌)模并非易事。 于本文中,立一系统化之法以取之,评估与可视化多组预练之词嵌之,以定下流之用。 先之于提取,供一法以下NLP之嵌子集。 其次,为评估,用输入词类比列表析预练嵌之质。 最后嵌空可视化,以交互方式探嵌单词。 臣等于豫练越南语词嵌模示有效性,以择其宜名实体识(NER)。 具体来说,创大越南语单词之表,以质其预练。 然后嵌号 NER 事,准集上新最新。 宜用于私,明可以助用户速。 此外用所建统法创立一开源系统,以趣他NLP之类。 源代码数也\n可 https: //github.com/vietnlp/etnlp。', 'ru': 'Учитывая многие последние расширенные модели встраивания, выбор предварительно обученных моделей представления слов (т.е. встраивания слов), наиболее подходящих для конкретной задачи NLP ниже по потоку, является нетривиальным. В этой статье мы предлагаем систематический подход к извлечению, оценке и визуализации множества наборов предварительно обученных вложений слов, чтобы определить, какие вложения следует использовать в задаче ниже по потоку. Во-первых, для извлечения мы предоставляем метод извлечения подмножества вложений, которые будут использоваться в последующих задачах NLP. Во-вторых, для оценки мы анализируем качество предварительно обученных вложений с помощью списка аналогов входного слова. Наконец, мы визуализируем пространство вложений для интерактивного изучения вложенных слов. Мы демонстрируем эффективность предлагаемого подхода к нашим предварительно обученным моделям встраивания слов на вьетнамском языке, чтобы выбрать, какие модели подходят для задачи распознавания именованных сущностей (NER). В частности, мы создаем большой список вьетнамских слов-аналогов для оценки и выбора предварительно обученных моделей встраивания для задачи. Затем мы используем выбранные встраивания для задачи NER и достигаем новых современных результатов в наборе данных эталона задачи. Мы также применяем подход к другой последующей задаче выбора встраивания с гарантией конфиденциальности и показываем, что он помогает пользователям быстро выбрать наиболее подходящие встраивания. Кроме того, мы создаем систему с открытым исходным кодом, используя предлагаемый системный подход, чтобы облегчить аналогичные исследования по другим задачам NLP. Исходный код и данные\nдоступен по адресу https: //github.com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'ga': 'I bhfianaise go leor samhlacha leabaithe chun cinn le déanaí, níl sé fánach samhlacha ionadaíochta focal réamhoilte (i.e., leabú focal) a roghnú is fearr a oireann do thasc NLP ar leith iartheachtacha. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige córasach chun tacair iolracha de leabaithe focal réamh-oilte a bhaint amach, a mheas agus a shamhlú chun a chinneadh cé na leabú ba cheart a úsáid i dtasc iartheachtacha. Ar an gcéad dul síos, maidir le heastóscadh, cuirimid modh ar fáil chun fo-thacar de na leabaithe a bheidh le húsáid i dtascanna NLP iartheachtacha a bhaint as. Ar an dara dul síos, le haghaidh meastóireachta, déanaimid anailís ar cháilíocht na leabaithe réamhoilte ag baint úsáide as liosta analaí focal ionchuir. Ar deireadh, déanaimid amharc ar an spás neadaithe chun na focail leabaithe a iniúchadh go hidirghníomhach. Léirímid éifeachtacht an chur chuige atá beartaithe maidir lenár múnlaí réamhoilte um leabú focal i Vítneamais chun na múnlaí a roghnú atá oiriúnach do thasc aitheantais aonáin ainmnithe (NER). Go sonrach, cruthaímid liosta mór analaí focal Vítneaimis chun na samhlacha leabaithe réamhoilte don tasc a mheas agus a roghnú. Bainimid úsáid ansin as na leabaithe roghnaithe do thasc NER agus bainimid amach na torthaí nua den scoth ar thacar sonraí tagarmhairc an taisc. Cuirimid an cur chuige i bhfeidhm freisin ar thasc iartheachtach eile de roghnú leabaithe atá ráthaithe ag príobháideacht, agus léirímid go gcabhraíonn sé le húsáideoirí na leabaithe is oiriúnaí a roghnú go tapa. Ina theannta sin, cruthaímid córas foinse oscailte ag baint úsáide as an gcur chuige córasach atá beartaithe chun staidéir chomhchosúla ar thascanna NLP eile a éascú. Tá an cód foinse agus na sonraí\nar fáil ag https://github.com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'ka': 'შემდეგ ბევრი წინაღალდე მოდელების შესაძლებლობად, მონიშნეთ წინაღალდებული სიტყვების გამოსაყენება (მაგალითად სიტყვების შესაძლებლობა) მოდელები, რომლებიც კონფიგური downstream NLP დავალების ამ დომენტში ჩვენ გამოყენებთ სისტემატიკური პროგრამის გამოყენება, განსაზღვრება და ვიზუალურება რამდენიმე პროგრამის უნდა გამოყენება სტრიქტურებული სიტყვების ინბ- დინდს, რომ განსაზღვრება პირველად, გამოყენებისთვის, ჩვენ მივიღეთ სექსბენტის სექსბენტის გამოყენება, რომელიც NLP დავალებში გამოყენება. მეორე, განსაზღვრებისთვის, ჩვენ წინასწარმოადგილებული ინბედინგიების კაalitეტის ანალოგიის სია გამოყენებთ. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ ვიუზუალურებთ ინტერექტიგურად ინტერექტიგურად ინტერექტიგურად ინტერექტიგურად ინტერექტიგურად ინტერექტიგურად ინტე ჩვენ ვიდენტრამიური მოდელეების ეფექტიურობა, რომელიც მოდელეები სახელსაწინო ინტერტიკური მოცემებისთვის გამოყენებული სიტყვის, რომელიც გვეტანამიური მოდელეების შესაძლებელია სახელსა განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ ვიეტენმამიური სიტყვების ანალოგიური სიტყვების შექმნა, რომელიც დავამუშაოთ და ამოირჩევთ პრე განაკუთრებული ინბექტირების მოდელები შემდეგ ჩვენ გამოიყენებთ მონიშნული ინბედინდს NER დავალებისთვის და მივიღებთ ახალი მონაცემების შესახებ დავალების მონაცემების მონაცემების შესახებ. ჩვენ ასევე პროგრამის შესაძლებლობა სხვა დაკავშირებული პარამეტრებისთვის გადავყენებთ პროგრამიტების შესაძლებლობა, და გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ეს მომხმარებელი ძალიან შესაძლებელი შე დამატებით, ჩვენ გახსნა ფორმა სისტემის შექმნა, რომელიც გამოყენებული სისტემატიკური პროგრამის გამოყენება, რომელიც სხვა NLP დავალების განმავლებაში განსა გამოსახულების კოდი და მონაცემები არის\nhttp: //github com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'it': "Dati molti recenti modelli avanzati di incorporazione, selezionare modelli pre-addestrati di rappresentazione delle parole (cioè incorporazione di parole) più adatti per una specifica attività NLP a valle non è banale. In questo articolo, proponiamo un approccio sistematico per estrarre, valutare e visualizzare più insiemi di embedding di parole pre-addestrati per determinare quali embedding dovrebbero essere utilizzati in un'attività downstream. In primo luogo, per l'estrazione, forniamo un metodo per estrarre un sottoinsieme delle incorporazioni da utilizzare nelle attività NLP a valle. In secondo luogo, per la valutazione, analizziamo la qualità delle incorporazioni pre-addestrate utilizzando un elenco di analogie di parole di input. Infine, visualizziamo lo spazio di incorporazione per esplorare le parole incorporate in modo interattivo. Dimostriamo l'efficacia dell'approccio proposto sui nostri modelli pre-addestrati di incorporazione di parole in vietnamita per selezionare quali modelli sono adatti per un compito di riconoscimento di entità con nome (NER). Nello specifico, creiamo un ampio elenco di analogie di parole vietnamite per valutare e selezionare i modelli di embedding pre-addestrati per l'attività. Utilizziamo quindi gli embedding selezionati per il compito NER e otteniamo i nuovi risultati all'avanguardia sul set di dati di benchmark delle attività. Applichiamo l'approccio anche ad un altro compito a valle della selezione dell'embedding garantita dalla privacy e mostriamo che aiuta gli utenti a selezionare rapidamente gli embedding più adatti. Inoltre, creiamo un sistema open source utilizzando l'approccio sistematico proposto per facilitare studi simili su altri compiti del PNL. Il codice sorgente e i dati sono\ndisponibile su https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.", 'hu': 'Számos újabb fejlett beágyazási modellt figyelembe véve, az előre képzett szóreprezentációs modellek (azaz szóbeágyazás) kiválasztása nem triviális. Ebben a tanulmányban egy szisztematikus megközelítést javasolunk az előre képzett szóbeágyazások több halmazának kinyerésére, értékelésére és megjelenítésére annak meghatározására, hogy mely beágyazásokat kell használni egy downstream feladatban. Először is, a kitermeléshez egy módszert biztosítunk a beágyazások egy részhalmazának kivonására, amelyet a downstream NLP feladatokban használnak. Másodszor, az értékeléshez az előképzett beágyazások minőségét elemezzük egy beviteli szó analógia listával. Végül megjelenítjük a beágyazott területet, hogy interaktívan felfedezzük a beágyazott szavakat. A javasolt megközelítés hatékonyságát előre képzett vietnami nyelvű szóbeágyazási modelleinken mutatjuk be, hogy kiválasztjuk, mely modellek alkalmasak egy megnevezett entitás felismerésére (NER). Konkrétan létrehozunk egy nagy vietnámi szó analógia listát, hogy értékeljük és kiválasszuk az előre képzett beágyazási modelleket a feladathoz. Ezt követően a kiválasztott beágyazásokat használjuk fel a NER feladathoz, és elérjük az új, korszerű eredményeket a feladat-benchmark adatkészleten. A megközelítést az adatvédelmi garantált beágyazási kiválasztás egy másik downstream feladatára is alkalmazzuk, és megmutatjuk, hogy segít a felhasználóknak gyorsan kiválasztani a legmegfelelőbb beágyazásokat. Ezenkívül a javasolt szisztematikus megközelítéssel nyílt forráskódú rendszert hozunk létre, hogy megkönnyítsük a hasonló tanulmányokat más NLP feladatokról. A forráskód és az adatok:\nelérhető a https: //github címen. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'el': 'Δεδομένου πολλών πρόσφατων προηγμένων μοντέλων ενσωμάτωσης, η επιλογή προ-εκπαιδευμένων μοντέλων αναπαράστασης λέξεων (δηλ., ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων) που ταιριάζουν καλύτερα για μια συγκεκριμένη μεταγενέστερη εργασία δεν είναι ασήμαντη. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε μια συστηματική προσέγγιση για την εξαγωγή, την αξιολόγηση και την απεικόνιση πολλαπλών συνόλων προ-εκπαιδευμένων ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων για να προσδιορίσουμε ποια ενσωμάτωση θα πρέπει να χρησιμοποιηθούν σε μια μεταγενέστερη εργασία. Πρώτον, για εξαγωγή, παρέχουμε μια μέθοδο για την εξαγωγή ενός υποσύνολου των ενσωματώσεων που θα χρησιμοποιηθούν στις επόμενες εργασίες. Δεύτερον, για αξιολόγηση αναλύουμε την ποιότητα των προ-εκπαιδευμένων ενσωματώσεων χρησιμοποιώντας μια λίστα αναλογιών λέξεων εισαγωγής. Τέλος, οραματιζόμαστε το χώρο ενσωμάτωσης για να εξερευνήσουμε τις ενσωματωμένες λέξεις αλληλεπιδραστικά. Επιδεικνύουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης προσέγγισης στα προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων στα βιετναμέζικα για να επιλέξουμε ποια μοντέλα είναι κατάλληλα για μια εργασία αναγνώρισης ονομαστικής οντότητας (ΝΕΡ). Συγκεκριμένα, δημιουργούμε μια μεγάλη λίστα αναλογιών λέξεων Βιετναμέζικα για να αξιολογήσουμε και να επιλέξουμε τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης για την εργασία. Στη συνέχεια, χρησιμοποιούμε τις επιλεγμένες ενσωματώσεις για την εργασία και επιτυγχάνουμε τα νέα αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στο σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς εργασίας. Εφαρμόζουμε επίσης την προσέγγιση σε μια άλλη μεταγενέστερη εργασία της επιλογής ενσωμάτωσης με εγγύηση απορρήτου και δείχνουμε ότι βοηθά τους χρήστες γρήγορα να επιλέξουν τις καταλληλότερες ενσωμάτωσης. Επιπλέον, δημιουργούμε ένα σύστημα ανοικτού κώδικα χρησιμοποιώντας την προτεινόμενη συστηματική προσέγγιση για τη διευκόλυνση παρόμοιων μελετών σε άλλα καθήκοντα NLP. Ο πηγαίος κώδικας και τα δεδομένα είναι\nδιαθέσιμο στο https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы кеңейтілген ендіру үлгілерін көрсету үшін, алдыңғы кеңейтілген сөздерді (мысалы, ендіру үлгілері) үлгілерін таңдау керек NLP тапсырмасының артықшылығы жоқ. Бұл қағазда біз жүйелік түрде қай ендіруді төменгі тапсырмада қолдану, бағалау және көрсету үшін бірнеше алдын- оқылған сөздерді ендіру үшін жүйелік тәртібін таңдаймыз. Біріншіден, тарқату үшін, NLP тапсырмаларында қолданылатын ендіру бөлшегін тарқату әдісін келтіреміз. Екіншіден, бағалау үшін, біз алдын- ала оқылған ендіру тізімінен келтірілген сөздер аналогиялық тізімінің сапатын анализ етік. Соңында ендірілген сөздерді интерактивті іздеу үшін ендіру орынды көрсету үшін. Біз Вьетнамдағы алдын- оқылған сөздерді ендіру үлгілеріміздің әсер етілігін көрсетедік. Қай үлгілерді аталған нысандарды анықтау (NER) тапсырмасына қандай үлгілерді таңдау үшін. Сәйкес, біз тапсырманың алдын- оқылған ендіру үлгілерін бағалау және таңдау үшін үлкен Вьетнам сөздер аналогиялық тізімін құрамыз. Содан кейін, NER тапсырмасының таңдалған ендіру құрылғыларын пайдалану және тапсырма белгісінің деректер жиынының жаңа күйінің нәтижесін жеткіземіз. Мұндай-ақ бұл әдістерді басқа жеке қауіпсіздік таңдау тапсырмасына қолданып, пайдаланушылардың ең жақсы ендіруді тез таңдауға көмектеседі. Қосымша, біз басқа NLP тапсырмаларында ұқсас зерттеулерді көмектесу үшін жүйелік көзі қолданатын ашық көзі жүйесін құрамыз. Бастапқы код мен деректер\nhttp: //github дегенде бар. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'lt': 'Atsižvelgiant į daugelį naujausių pažangių įterpimo modelių, i š anksto parengtų žodžių atstovavimo (t. y. žodžių įterpimo) modelių, tinkamiausių konkreči a i tolesnei NLP užduotims, pasirinkimas nėra trivialus. Šiame dokumente siūlome sistemingą požiūrį į kelių iš anksto parengtų žodžių įterpimo rinkinių išgavimą, vertinimą ir vizualizavimą, siekiant nustatyti, kurie įterpimai turėtų būti naudojami tolesnėje užduotyje. Pirma, gavybai mes siūlome metodą ištraukti sudedamųjų dalių, naudojamų tolesnėse NLP užduotyse, pogrupį. Antra, vertindami analizuojame iš anksto parengtų įdėjimų kokybę naudojant įdėjimo žodžių analogijos sąrašą. Finally, we visualize the embedding space to explore the embedded words interactively.  Mes parodome siūlomo požiūrio veiksmingumą mūsų iš anksto apmokytiems žodžių įterpimo modeliams vietnamų kalba, kad pasirinktume, kurie modeliai yra tinkami paskirtam subjekto pripažinimo uždaviniui (NER). Konkrečiai sukuriame didelį vietnamų žodžių analogijos sąrašą, kad įvertintume ir pasirinktume iš anksto parengtus įterpimo modelius užduoties vykdymui. Tuomet pasinaudosime pasirinktomis įterptomis įrangomis NER užduotims ir pasiektume naujus naujausius rezultatus užduočių lyginamojo rodiklio duomenų rinkinyje. Mes taip pat taikome metodą kitai tolesnei užduotims, susijusiai su privatumo užtikrintu įterpimo pasirinkimu, ir parodysime, kad jis padeda vartotojams greitai pasirinkti tinkamiausius įterpimus. Be to, sukuriame atvirojo kodo sistemą, naudojančią siūlomą sisteminį požiūrį, kad būtų lengviau atlikti panašius tyrimus dėl kitų NLP užduočių. Šaltinis kodas ir duomenys yra:\navailable at https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'ms': 'Given many recent advanced embedding models, selecting pre-trained word representation (i.e., word embedding) models best fit for a specific downstream NLP task is non-trivial.  In this paper, we propose a systematic approach to extracting, evaluating, and visualizing multiple sets of pre-trained word embed- dings to determine which embeddings should be used in a downstream task.  Pertama, untuk pengekstrakan, kami menyediakan kaedah untuk mengekstrak subset penyembedding untuk digunakan dalam tugas NLP turun. Kedua, untuk penilaian, kami menganalisis kualiti penyambungan terlatih sebelum menggunakan senarai analogi kata input. Akhirnya, kita membayangkan ruang penyembedding untuk mengeksplorasi perkataan penyembedding secara interaktif. Kami menunjukkan keefektivitas pendekatan yang diusulkan pada model penyembedding kata-kata kami terlatih-terlatih dalam Vietnam untuk memilih model mana yang sesuai untuk tugas pengenalan entiti bernama (NER). Secara khusus, kami mencipta senarai analogi perkataan Vietnam yang besar untuk menilai dan memilih model penyambungan terlatih-terlatih untuk tugas ini. Kemudian kita menggunakan pembangkit terpilih untuk tugas NER dan mencapai keputusan baru-state-of-the-art pada set data benchmark tugas. Kami juga melaksanakan pendekatan kepada tugas turun lain pemilihan penyembedding yang dijamin-privasi, dan menunjukkan bahawa ia membantu pengguna dengan cepat memilih penyembedding yang paling sesuai. Selain itu, kami mencipta sistem sumber terbuka menggunakan pendekatan sistemik yang diusulkan untuk memudahkan kajian yang sama pada tugas NLP lain. Kod sumber dan data adalah\navailable at https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'mk': 'Со оглед на многу неодамнешни напредни модели на вградување, изборот на предобучено претставување на зборови (т.е., вградување на зборови) модели кои најдобро се соодветни за специфична понатамошна задача на НЛП не е тривијален. Во овој документ, предложуваме систематски пристап до извлекување, евалуирање и визуелизација на многуте сетови на предобучени зборови вмешани- вмешани за да се одреди кои вмешани треба да се користат во понатамошна задача. Прво, за извлекување, обезбедуваме метод за извлекување на подгрупа од внатрешностите кои ќе бидат употребени во долните NLP задачи. Second, for evaluation, we analyse the quality of pre-trained embeddings using an input word analogy list.  Конечно, го визуелизираме внатрешниот простор за интерактивно да ги истражуваме внатрешните зборови. Ние ја демонстрираме ефикасноста на предложениот пристап на нашите предобучени модели на вградување на зборови во Виетнамски за да избереме кои модели се соодветни за задача на именувано препознавање на ентитетот (NER). Специфично, создаваме голема виетнамска аналошка листа на зборови за да ги процениме и избереме предобучените модели за внесување на задачата. Потоа ги искористуваме избраните внатрешни резултати за NER задачата и ги постигнуваме новите најдобри резултати на групата на податоци. Ние, исто така, го применуваме пристапот до друга понатамошна задача на избор на вградување гарантиран со приватност, и покажуваме дека тоа им помага на корисниците брзо да ги изберат најсоодветните вградувања. Покрај тоа, ние создаваме систем на отворен код користејќи го предложениот систематски пристап за олеснување на слични студии за други НЛП задачи. Изворниот код и податоците се\nдостапни на https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'ml': 'ഏറ്റവും അടുത്തുതന്നെ മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്ന മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട്, മുന്\u200dപരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്ക് പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനാ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റീമിക്കേറ്റിക്ക് പുറത്തെടുക്കുവാനും, വിലയിക്കുവാനും, മുമ്പ് പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d കൂട ആദ്യം, പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും എംഎല്\u200dപി ജോലികളില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കേണ്ട ഒരു സബ്ബിഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടു രണ്ടാമത്, വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട അംഗീകരണങ്ങളുടെ ഗുണമെന്ന് നമ്മള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. Finally, we visualize the embedding space to explore the embedded words interactively.  വിയറ്റ്നാമീസിലെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാന്\u200d വിയറ്റ്നാമിലെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട പ്രാദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സാധനങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവർത്തികമാണ്  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിയറ്റ്നാമീസ് വാക്ക് അനാളജി പട്ടികയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുകയും, ജോലിക്ക് മുമ്പ് പരിശീലനം നല്\u200dകപ്പെട്ട മ പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d നെആര്\u200d ജോലിക്ക് തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത പ്രവൃത്തികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയും ജോലിയിലെ ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡ സ്വകാര്യ സുരക്ഷിതമായ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ സ്വകാര്യത്തിലേക്കുള്ള മറ്റൊരു പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഉപയോക്ത കൂടാതെ, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സിസ്റ്റീമിക്കങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഒരു തുറന്ന ഉറവിട സിസ്റ്റം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. മറ ഉറവിട കോഡും ഡേറ്റായും\nhttps: // github-ല്\u200d ലഭ്യമാണ്. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'mn': 'Саяхан олон хөгжсөн хөгжсөн загваруудыг харуулсан учраас, өмнө сургалтын үг үзүүлэлтийг сонгох (яг л үг нэмж) загварууд нь тодорхой доорх NLP даалгаварын ажлын тулд хамгийн сайн тодорхой байдаг нь үг биш Энэ цаасан дээр бид систематик арга замыг хадгалах, үнэлэх, олон арга хэмжээний сургалтын хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээнд хэрэглэгдэхийг зориулахын тулд санал өгдөг. Эхлээд, хадгалахын тулд бид NLP ажлын доорх хэмжээнд хэрэглэгдэх зам гаргадаг. Хоёрдугаар, үнэлэхэд бид өмнө сургалтын хэмжээсүүдийн качестыг харуулж өгөгдлийн үг аналогикийн жагсаалт ашиглаж байна. Эцэст нь бид нэвтрүүлэгдсэн үгийг интерактив судлах зорилготой орон зайг харуулж байна. Бид Вьетнамчуудын аль загварыг сонгохын тулд санал өгсөн арга загварын үр дүнг үзүүлдэг. Ялангуяа бид Вьетнамын үг аналогикийн жагсаалт бий болгож ажлын тулд урд сургалтын оролцох загварыг сонгох боломжтой. Тэгээд бид NER ажлын хувьд сонгогдсон инб-дингүүдийг ашиглаж, ажлын багц өгөгдлийн сангийн шинэ нөлөөлөлт гаргаж чадна. Мөн бид хувийн байр суурь байдлын сонголтын өөр нэг давхар давхар давхар давхар үйлдлийг ашиглаж, хэрэглэгчиддээ хурдан хамгийн зөвхөн тохируулах үйлдлийг ашиглаж чадна. Мөн бид өөр НLP даалгаварын талаар ижил судалгааг нээлттэй эх үүсвэрийн системийг ашиглаж байна. Гэхдээ эх үүсвэр код болон өгөгдлийн\nhttps: //github com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'mt': 'Minħabba ħafna mudelli avvanzati ta’ inkorporazzjoni reċenti, l-għa żla ta’ mudelli ta’ rappreżentazzjoni tal-kliem imħarrġa minn qabel (jiġifieri inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem) li huma l-aħjar adattati għal kompitu speċifiku downstream NLP mhijiex trivjali. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu approċċ sistematiku għall-estrazzjoni, l-evalwazzjoni u l-viżwalizzazzjoni ta’ settijiet multipli ta’ kliem inkorporati mħarrġa minn qabel biex niddeterminaw liema inkorporati għandhom jintużaw f’kompitu downstream. L-ewwel nett, għall-estrazzjoni, nagħtu metodu għall-estrazzjoni ta’ sottosett tal-inkorporazzjonijiet li għandhom jintużaw fil-kompiti downstream NLP. It-tieni nett, għall-evalwazzjoni, nagħmlu analiżi tal-kwalità tal-inkorporazzjonijiet imħarrġa minn qabel bl-użu ta’ lista ta’ analoġija tal-kliem input. Fl-aħħar nett, aħna niviżwalizzaw l-ispazju ta’ inkorporazzjoni biex nesploraw il-kliem inkorporati b’mod interattiv. We demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed approach on our pre-trained word embedding models in Vietnamese to select which models are suitable for a named entity recogni- tion (NER) task.  B’mod speċifiku, a ħna nħolqu list a kbira ta’ analoġija tal-kliem Vjetnami biex tivvaluta u tagħżel il-mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni mħarrġa minn qabel għall-kompitu. Imbagħad aħna nużaw l-inkorporazzjonijiet magħżula għall-kompitu NER u niksbu r-riżultati l-ġodda l-aktar avvanzati dwar is-sett ta’ dejta ta’ referenza tal-kompitu. Aħna napplikaw ukoll l-approċċ għal kompitu downstream ieħor ta’ għażla ta’ inkorporazzjoni garantita mill-privatezza, u nuru li dan jgħin lill-utenti jagħżlu malajr l-inkorporazzjonijiet l-aktar xierqa. Barra minn hekk, aħna nħolqu sistema open-source li tuża l-approċċ sistematiku propost biex tiffaċilita studji simili dwar kompiti oħra tal-NLP. Il-kodiċi tas-sors u d-dejta huma\ndisponibbli fuq https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'pl': 'Biorąc pod uwagę wiele ostatnich zaawansowanych modeli osadzania, wybór wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli reprezentacji słów (tj. osadzania słów) najlepiej pasujących do konkretnego zadania NLP jest nietrywialny. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy systematyczne podejście do ekstrakcji, oceny i wizualizacji wielu zestawów wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń słów w celu określenia, które osadzenia powinny być użyte w dalszym zadaniu. Po pierwsze, do ekstrakcji, dostarczamy metodę wyodrębniania podzbioru osadzeń, które mają być użyte w dalszych zadaniach NLP. Po drugie, do oceny analizujemy jakość wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń za pomocą listy analogii słów wejściowych. Wreszcie wizualizujemy przestrzeń osadzenia, aby interaktywnie eksplorować osadzone słowa. Wykazujemy skuteczność proponowanego podejścia na naszych wstępnie przeszkolonych modelach osadzania słów w języku wietnamskim, aby wybrać, które modele nadają się do zadania rozpoznawania nazwanych jednostek (NER). W szczególności tworzymy dużą wietnamską listę analogii słów, aby ocenić i wybrać wstępnie przeszkolone modele osadzania do zadania. Następnie wykorzystujemy wybrane osadzenia dla zadania NER i uzyskujemy nowe wyniki najnowocześniejszego zestawu danych referencyjnego zadania. Stosujemy również podejście do innego dalszego zadania zapewniającego gwarantowanie prywatności osadzenia i pokazujemy, że pomaga to użytkownikom szybko wybrać najbardziej odpowiednie osadzenia. Ponadto tworzymy system open-source wykorzystując proponowane systematyczne podejście do ułatwienia podobnych badań nad innymi zadaniami NLP. Kod źródłowy i dane są\ndostępne pod adresem https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'no': 'Gjennomsiktig mange nyleg avanserte innbyggingsmodeller, er det best e å velja først trengte ordrepresentasjon (t.d. ordinnbygging) for eit spesifikke nedstreking NLP- oppgåve ikkje trivial. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit systematisk tilnærming til å pakka ut, evaluera og visualisera fleire sett før- trengte ord- innebygging for å bestemme kva innbygging skal brukast i ei nedstrekkoppgåve. Først, for utpakking, gir vi ein metode for å pakka ut ein undergruppe av innbyggingane som skal brukast i NLP- oppgåvene nedstraum. Andre, for evaluering, analyserer vi kvaliteten til føretrainerte innbygging ved å bruka ei liste over innbyggingsord. I slutt visualiserer vi innbyggingsrommet for å utforska innbygde ord interaktivt. Vi demonstrerer effektiviteten av den foreslåde tilnærminga på våre føretrainerte ordinnbyggingsmodeller i Vietnamsk for å velja kva modeller som er passande for eit oppgåve med namnet entitetskjenning (NER). Spesielt lager vi ei stor Vietnamsk ordanalogisk liste for å evaluera og velja dei først trengte innbyggingsmodelane for oppgåva. Vi bruker derfor dei valde innleggingane for NER- oppgåva og oppnår det nye tilstanden av kunsten i oppgåvebenchmarkdatasettet. Vi bruker også tilnærminga til ein annan nedstrekkoppgåve for privat-garantert innbygging, og viser at det hjelper brukarar raskt å velja dei mest passande innbygginga. I tillegg lager vi eit opna kjeldesystemet med den foreslåde systematiske tilnærming for å gjere tilgjengelege studiar på andre NLP-oppgåver. Kjeldekode og data er\ntilgjengeleg på https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'ro': 'Având în vedere multe modele avansate recente de încorporare, selectarea modelelor pre-instruite de reprezentare a cuvintelor (adică încorporarea cuvintelor) potrivite cel mai bine pentru o anumită activitate PNL din aval nu este trivială. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare sistematică a extragerii, evaluării și vizualizării mai multor seturi de încorporări de cuvinte pre-instruite pentru a determina ce încorporări ar trebui utilizate într-o sarcină din aval. În primul rând, pentru extracție, oferim o metodă de extragere a unui subset al încorporărilor care urmează să fie utilizate în activitățile din aval NLP. În al doilea rând, pentru evaluare, analizăm calitatea încorporărilor pre-instruite folosind o listă de analogie cu cuvintele introduse. În cele din urmă, vizualizăm spațiul de încorporare pentru a explora cuvintele încorporate interactiv. Demonstrăm eficacitatea abordării propuse pe modelele noastre pre-instruite de încorporare a cuvintelor în vietnameză pentru a selecta care modele sunt potrivite pentru o sarcină de recunoaștere a entităților denumite (NER). Mai exact, creăm o listă largă de analogii cuvintelor vietnameze pentru a evalua și selecta modelele de încorporare pre-instruite pentru sarcină. Apoi utilizăm încorporările selectate pentru sarcina NER și obținem noile rezultate de ultimă oră pe setul de date de referință pentru sarcini. Aplicăm, de asemenea, abordarea la o altă sarcină din aval de selecție a încorporării garantate de confidențialitate și arătăm că ajută utilizatorii să selecteze rapid cele mai potrivite încorporări. În plus, creăm un sistem open-source folosind abordarea sistematică propusă pentru a facilita studii similare cu privire la alte sarcini PNL. Codul sursă și datele sunt\ndisponibil la https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'si': 'අලුත් විසින් ප්\u200dරධානය සම්බන්ධ විධානය විදිහට, ප්\u200dරධානය සම්බන්ධ විධානය (ඉතින්, වචන සම්බන්ධ විධානය) විශේෂ අඩුත්  මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න, විශ්ණය කරන්න, වර්ණය කරන්න, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ක මුලින්ම, පිළිගන්න, අපි පිළිගන්න විධානයක් සම්බන්ඩින්ග් සම්බන්ධයක් පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් NLP වැඩේ භා දෙවනිය, විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරව අන්තිමේදි, අපි සංවිධානය කරනවා ඇතුළත් වචන් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න සංවිධානය කරන්න. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ වියට්නාමිස් වල ඉන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ මොඩේල් තෝරාගන්න විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ලොකු වියට්නාම් වචන විශේෂ ලැයිස්තුවක් හදන්නේ විශේෂිත වචන විශේෂ ලැයිස්තුව විශ ඊට පස්සේ අපි තෝරාගෙන ඉන්බ් ඩින්ග්ව NER වැඩ සඳහා භාවිත කරන්න සහ අළුත් ස්ථිතිය- of- the- art ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d අපි පුද්ගලිකතාවක් විශේෂතාවක් තෝරාගන්න අනිත් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරයෝජනක ඒ වගේම, අපි විවෘත ප්\u200dරවෘත පද්ධතියක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා අනිත් NLP වැඩසටහන් විසින් සමාන ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය ප මූල කෝඩ සහ දත්ත\nhttps: //guitub වල පිළිබඳින්. com/Vietnlp/etnlp.', 'sr': 'S obzirom na mnoge nedavne napredne modele uključenih, odabranje predobučenih reèi predstavljanja (tj. ugrađenje reèi) najbolje odgovarajućih modela za određeni zadatak NLP-a koji je najbolji za određeni dole nije trivialni. U ovom papiru predlažemo sistematski pristup izvlačenju, procjenjivanju i vizualizaciji višestrukih seta predobučenih reči o integraciji reči kako bi se utvrdilo kojim uključenjima treba da se koristi u zadatku. Prvo, za izvlačenje, pružamo metodu da izvučemo podskup ugrađenja koji se koristi u poslovima NLP. Drugo, za procjenu, analiziramo kvalitet predobučenih integracija koristeći listu analogije unutarnjih reèi. Konaèno, vizualiziramo ugraðeni prostor da istražimo ugraðene reèi interaktivno. Pokazujemo učinkovitost predloženog pristupa našim predobučenim rečima uključujućim modelima u Vijetnamski da izaberemo koji su modeli odgovarajući za zadatak priznanja entiteta (NER). Posebno, stvorili smo veliku vijetnamsku listu analogije reèi za procjenu i izabrati predobučene modele integracije za zadatak. Onda iskoristimo odabrane integracije za NER zadatak i postignemo nove rezultate stanja umjetnosti na setu podataka o skloništima zadataka. Također primjenjujemo pristup drugim spuštenim zadatkom izbora ugrađenog za privatnost i pokažemo da pomaže korisnicima brzo izabrati najprikladnije ugrađenje. Osim toga, stvaramo sistem otvorenog izvora koristeći predloženi sistemski pristup da olakšamo slične studije o drugim zadacima NLP-a. Izvorni kod i podaci su\ndostupno na https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'so': 'Sidii aad samooyin badan oo ugu dambeysay oo la doortay noocyo horay loo tababaray hadal representation (tusaale ahaan hadal embedding) samooyin ugu habboon sameynta shuqul gaar ah oo hoosstream NLP ah waa mid aan suurtogal ahayn. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab systemic ah oo aan ka soo bixino, qiimeynayno, oo aan soo bandhignayno qoraal badan oo la bartay-si aan u cadeynno in lagu isticmaalo qasabka hoose-socodka. Marka ugu horeysa, waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaab ay ka soo saaraan koox ka mid ah wadamada lagu isticmaali karo hawlaha hoose ee NLP. Second, si aan loo qiimeeyo, waxaynu u baaraynaa qiimeynta habka hore ee wax lagu baray, waxaynu isticmaalaynaa liiska sawir-qoraalka. Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu fiirinaynaa meesha uu ku hoydo si aan u baarayno hadalka uu ku qoray si habboon ah. Waxaynu muujinnaa faa’iidada qaababka la soo jeeday oo ku saabsan qaababka hadalkayagii hore oo lagu baray ee Vietnam ku qoran, si aan u dooranno qaababka ay u eg yihiin shaqada aqoonsashada (NER). Si gaar ah, waxaynu abuurnaa liiska kalluumeysiga ee Fietnaam oo weyn si aan u qiimeyno oo aan u dooranno modellada horay loo tababaray sameynta shaqada. Markaas waxaynu isticmaalnaa meelaha la doortay ee NER-da, waxaynu dhameynaynaa arimaha cusub ee xaaladda-art ku saabsan taariikhda shaqada. Sidoo kale waxaynu u codsanaynaa shaqada kale oo hoos u soo dejiya ee doorashada khaaska ah ee gaarka loo leeyahay, waxaana tusinaynaa inay isticmaalayaasha dhaqso u caawinaysaa in ay u doorato meelaha ugu haboon. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu abuurnaa nidaam furan ah oo lagu isticmaalayo qaababka la soo jeeday nidaamka si aan u fududayno waxbarasho u eg shaqooyinka kale ee NLP. Qorada asalka iyo macluumaadku waa\nhttps: / /github com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'sv': 'Med tanke på många senaste avancerade inbäddningsmodeller är det inte trivialt att välja förintränade ordrepresentationsmodeller (dvs. ordinbäddning) som passar bäst för en specifik NLP-aktivitet nedströms. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett systematiskt tillvägagångssätt för att extrahera, utvärdera och visualisera flera uppsättningar av förklädda ord inbäddningar för att avgöra vilka inbäddningar som ska användas i en nedströmsuppgift. För det första, för extraktion, tillhandahåller vi en metod för att extrahera en delmängd av inbäddningar som ska användas i nedströms NLP-uppgifter. För det andra, för utvärdering, analyserar vi kvaliteten på pre-utbildade inbäddningar med hjälp av en inmataord analoglista. Slutligen visualiserar vi inbäddningsutrymmet för att utforska de inbäddade orden interaktivt. Vi visar hur effektivt det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet är på våra förberedda ordinbäddningsmodeller på vietnamesiska för att välja vilka modeller som är lämpliga för en namngiven entitetsigenkänningsuppgift (NER). Specifikt skapar vi en stor lista över vietnamesiska ordanalogier för att utvärdera och välja de förintränade inbäddningsmodellerna för uppgiften. Vi använder sedan de valda inbäddningarna för NER-uppgiften och uppnår de nya toppmoderna resultaten på uppgiftens benchmark-dataset. Vi tillämpar också tillvägagångssättet på en annan nedströmsuppgift med sekretessgaranterad inbäddningsval, och visar att det hjälper användare att snabbt välja de lämpligaste inbäddningarna. Dessutom skapar vi ett system med öppen källkod med hjälp av det föreslagna systematiska tillvägagångssättet för att underlätta liknande studier av andra NLP-uppgifter. Källkoden och uppgifterna är\ntillgänglig på https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் நிறைய முன்னேற்றப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் கொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, முன்னேற்றப்பட்ட வார்த்தை குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட NLP பணிக்கு சிறந்த பாத இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு அமைப்பு வழியை வெளியேற்ற, மதிப்பிட, மற்றும் பார்க்க முன் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட பல வார்த்தை பொருத்தப்பட்டிருக்கும் சொல முதலில், பிரித்தலுக்கு, நாம் NLP பணிகளில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட வேண்டிய உட்பொதிகளை வெளியேற்ற ஒரு முறையை வழங்குகிறோம். இரண்டாவது, மதிப்பீட்டிற்கு, நாம் முன் பயிற்சி முன் உள்ளீட்டு வார்த்தை ஆராய்ச்சி பட்டியலை பயன்படுத்தி முன் பயிற் இறுதியில், நாம் உள்ளடக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகளை இடைவெளியில் கண்டறியும். We demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed approach on our pre-trained word embedding models in Vietnamese to select which models are suitable for a named entity recogni- tion (NER) task.  குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் வியட்நாம்வார்த்தை ஆராய்ச்சி பட்டியலை உருவாக்கி பணிக்கு முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளை மதிப் பின்னர் நாம் NER பணிக்கான தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட குறிப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி பணி பென்க்மார்க் தகவல் அமைப்பில் புதிய நிலையின் ம மற்றொரு கீழே தள்ளும் செயலுக்கு நாம் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் மற்றொரு தனிப்பட்ட-பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்பட்ட தேர்வுகளின் செயலை மற்றொரு செயல் மேலும், நாம் ஒரு திறந்த மூலம் அமைப்பை உருவாக்குகிறோம் மற்ற NLP பணிகளில் போன்ற படிப்பியலை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கான முறைம மூல குறியீடு மற்றும் தரவு\nhttps: // github கிடைக்கும். com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'ur': 'بہت سی اگلے اپنا انڈینگ موڈل کے ذریعہ، پہلے تدریس کی لفظ کی تصویر (یعنی لفظ انڈینگ) موڈل کے لئے بہترین مطابق نیٹ سٹریم NLP ٹاکس کے لئے مطابق مطابق مطابق ہے۔ ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک سیستم طریقہ پیش آموزش کی کلمات embed- dings کی تعلیم کے لئے کس طریقے کا استعمال کرنا چاہیے، ارزش کرنا اور تصویق کرنا چاہیے۔ پہلے، اٹھانے کے لئے، ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ نیچے نلپ ٹاکس میں استعمال کیے جانے والی ایمبڈینگ کے ایک سوسٹ کو اٹھانے کے لئے۔ دوسرا، ارزیابی کے لئے، ہم پہلے ترسین کی ایمبڈینگ کی کیفیت کا تحلیل کرتے ہیں ایک ایمبٹ لکھ آنلالوژی لکھ کے مطابق۔ آخر میں، ہم انڈینگ جگہ کو دیکھ رہے ہیں کہ انڈیڈ لغات کو اپنا انتشار کریں۔ ہم نے ویتنامی میں پیش آموزش دیئے ہوئے کلمات کے مطابق پیش آموزش دیئے ہوئے مدل کے مطابق دکھائے ہیں کہ کس مدل کو انتخاب کرنے کے لئے ایک نام entity recogni tion (NER) کام کے لئے مناسب ہیں۔ خاص طور پر، ہم ایک بڑی ویتنامی کلمات آنالولوژی لکھ بناتے ہیں تاکہ اس کام کے لئے پیش آموزش کی ابڈینگ موڈل کو انتخاب کریں۔ پھر ہم نیر کام کے لئے انتخاب کئے ہوئے انڈ دینگ کو استعمال کرتے ہیں اور تابع بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ کے نو موقع کا نتیجہ پہنچاتے ہیں. ہم نے بھی ایک دوسرے نیچے پاؤنٹریم کام کے لئے تقویم کرلیا ہے جو خصوصی امانت دار انتخاب کرنے والی ہے اور دکھا دیتے ہیں کہ یہ کارساز کو بہت جلد انتخاب کرنے کے لئے مدد کرتا ہے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ ہم ایک اوپن سورس سیسٹم بناتے ہیں جس کے مطابق پیش کیا گیا ہے سیسٹم طریقہ کے مطابق دوسرے NLP کے کاموں کے بارے میں برابر تحقیقات آسان کرنے کے لئے۔ سورس کوڈ اور ڈیٹا\nhttps: //github میں موجود ہے. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'uz': "Yaqinda ko'pchilik kengaytirilgan modellar bilan birinchi taʼminlovchi soʻzni tahrirlash (m. g. word embedding) modellarini tanlangan. NLP vazifasi notoʻgʻri emas. Bu qogʻozda, biz bir nechta o'rganilgan so'zlarni chiqarish, qiymatlashni va ko'pchilikni ko'rsatish mumkin. Bu qogʻozdagi qoʻllanmalarni quyidagi vazifani ishlatish uchun bir nechta bir nechta narsalarni koʻrsatish. Birinchi so'zni chiqarish uchun biz NLP vazifalarida ishlatiladigan tub qismni chiqarish usulini yaratishimiz mumkin. Ikkinchi so'zning qiymati uchun, biz kiritish soʻzning analog roʻyxati bilan birinchi o'rganilgan ketlikning sifatini aniqlamiz. Endi, biz ichki so'zlarni interaktiv o'rganish uchun katta joyni ko'rinamiz. Biz Vietnamdagi oldin o'rganilgan so'zning qiymati modellarimizning effektini ko'rsatamiz va qanday modellarni tanlash uchun nomli obʼekt (NER) vazifasi qiymatiga yetarli. Koʻrsatilgan, biz vazifa uchun oldingi o'qidirish va tanlash uchun katta Vietnam soʻzning analog roʻyxatini yaratimiz. Keyin biz NER vazifani tanlangan quyidagi joʻnatuvchilardan foydalanamiz va vazifa benchmark maʼlumotlarining yangi holatini bajaramiz. We also apply the approach to another downstream task of privacy-guaranteed embedding selection, and show that it helps users quickly select the most suitable embeddings.  Ko'pchilik, biz boshqa NLP vazifalarda o'xshash o'qituvchilarni foydalanish uchun ochiq- soul tizimini yaramiz. Manba kodi va maʼlumot\nhttp: // github' da mavjud. com/vietnlp/etnlp.", 'vi': 'Dựa vào nhiều mẫu mới đây, chọn các mô- đun tổ hợp từ được huấn luyện trước (v.d., sự nhúng từ) phù hợp nhất cho một nhiệm vụ kiểu xuôi dòng Njala không phải là vô giá trị. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp có hệ thống để khai thác, đánh giá, và hình dung nhiều bộ bẫy từ được huấn luyện để xác định sự nhúng tay nào trong một nhiệm vụ xuôi dòng. Đầu tiên, trong việc khai thác, chúng tôi cung cấp một phương pháp để trích xuất một nhóm các sự nhúng vào các công việc kiểu xuôi dòng. Thứ hai, để đánh giá, chúng tôi phân tích chất lượng những sự tham gia được rèn luyện bằng một danh sách tương tự. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi hình dung không gian tác bộ để khám phá các từ nhúng tương tác. Chúng tôi chứng minh hiệu quả của phương pháp được đề nghị về những mô hình ghép từ từ được đào tạo trong Việt để chọn những mẫu thích hợp cho nhiệm vụ nhận diện thực thể có tên gọi. Cụ thể, chúng tôi tạo ra một danh sách dài ngôn ngữ Việt để đánh giá và chọn các mô hình ghép sẵn sàng cho nhiệm vụ. Sau đó, chúng tôi sử dụng các công trình nhận tác đã chọn cho các công việc nằm trong giao kèo.......và đạt được kết quả hiện đại trên bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn nhiệm vụ. Chúng tôi cũng áp dụng phương pháp cho một công việc cấy ghép bảo mật theo dòng cuối khác, và cho thấy nó giúp người dùng nhanh chóng chọn sự nhúng vào phù hợp nhất. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi tạo ra một hệ thống nguồn mở dựa trên phương pháp có hệ thống đã đề nghị giúp việc nghiên cứu tương tự về các công việc khác. Nguồn và dữ liệu là\ncó sẵn ở https: it/git. com/viettorrent.net', 'bg': 'Предвид много съвременни модели за вграждане, изборът на предварително обучени модели за представяне на думи (т.е. вграждане на думи), които най-добре отговарят на конкретна задача надолу по веригата, не е тривиален. В настоящата статия предлагаме систематичен подход за извличане, оценяване и визуализиране на множество набори предварително обучени вграждания на думи, за да се определи кои вграждания трябва да се използват в задача надолу по веригата. Първо, за извличане, ние предлагаме метод за извличане на поднабор от вграждания, които да се използват в задачите надолу по веригата на НЛО. Второ, за оценка, анализираме качеството на предварително обучените вграждания, като използваме списък с входни думи за аналогия. Накрая визуализираме пространството за вграждане, за да изследваме вградените думи интерактивно. Ние демонстрираме ефективността на предложения подход върху нашите предварително обучени модели за вграждане на думи на виетнамски език, за да изберем кои модели са подходящи за задача за разпознаване на наименувани обекти (НЕР). По-конкретно, ние създаваме голям списък с виетнамски думи аналогия, за да оценим и изберем предварително обучените модели за вграждане за задачата. След това използваме избраните вграждания за задачата и постигаме новите най-съвременни резултати в набора от данни за еталона на задачите. Също така прилагаме подхода към друга задача надолу по веригата за избор на вграждане с гарантирана поверителност и показваме, че той помага на потребителите бързо да изберат най-подходящите вграждания. Освен това създаваме система с отворен код, използвайки предложения систематичен подход, за да улесним подобни проучвания по други задачи на НЛП. Изходният код и данните са\nна https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'de': 'Angesichts vieler neuerer fortgeschrittener Einbettungsmodelle ist es nicht trivial, vortrainierte Wortdarstellungsmodelle (d. h. Worteinbettungsmodelle) auszuwählen, die am besten für eine bestimmte nachgelagerte NLP-Aufgabe geeignet sind. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen systematischen Ansatz zur Extraktion, Bewertung und Visualisierung mehrerer Sätze vortrainierter Worteinbettungen vor, um festzustellen, welche Einbettungen in einer nachgelagerten Aufgabe verwendet werden sollten. Zunächst stellen wir für die Extraktion eine Methode zur Verfügung, um eine Teilmenge der Einbettungen zu extrahieren, die in den nachgeschalteten NLP-Aufgaben verwendet werden sollen. Zweitens analysieren wir zur Auswertung die Qualität von vorgetrainierten Einbettungen anhand einer Eingabewortanalogieliste. Schließlich visualisieren wir den Einbettungsraum, um die eingebetteten Wörter interaktiv zu erkunden. Wir demonstrieren die Effektivität des vorgeschlagenen Ansatzes an unseren vortrainierten Wort-Einbettungsmodellen in Vietnamesisch, um auszuwählen, welche Modelle für eine Named Entity Recognition (NER)-Aufgabe geeignet sind. Konkret erstellen wir eine große vietnamesische Wortanalogie-Liste, um die vortrainierten Einbettungsmodelle für die Aufgabe auszuwerten und auszuwählen. Anschließend nutzen wir die ausgewählten Einbettungen für die NER-Aufgabe und erzielen die neuen State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse auf dem Task Benchmark Dataset. Wir wenden den Ansatz auch auf eine weitere nachgelagerte Aufgabe der datenschutzgarantierten Einbettungsauswahl an und zeigen, dass es Benutzern hilft, schnell die am besten geeigneten Einbettungen auszuwählen. Darüber hinaus erstellen wir ein Open-Source-System mit dem vorgeschlagenen systematischen Ansatz, um ähnliche Studien zu anderen NLP-Aufgaben zu ermöglichen. Der Quellcode und die Daten sind\nverfügbar unter https: //github. de/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'da': 'I betragtning af mange nylige avancerede indlejringsmodeller er det ikke trivielt at vælge præ-trænede ordrepræsentationsmodeller (dvs. ordindlejring) som passer bedst til en bestemt downstream NLP-opgave. I denne artikel foreslår vi en systematisk tilgang til at udtrække, evaluere og visualisere flere sæt af præ-trænede ordindlejringer for at bestemme, hvilke indlejringer der skal bruges i en downstream opgave. For det første giver vi til ekstraktion en metode til at udtrække en delmængde af de indlejringer, der skal bruges i downstream NLP-opgaver. For det andet analyserer vi kvaliteten af præ-trænede indlejringer ved hjælp af en liste over input word analogi. Endelig visualiserer vi indlejringsrummet for at udforske de indlejrede ord interaktivt. Vi demonstrerer effektiviteten af den foreslåede tilgang på vores forududdannede ordindlejringsmodeller på vietnamesisk for at vælge, hvilke modeller der er egnede til en navngivet entitetsanerkendelse (NER) opgave. Specielt opretter vi en stor vietnamesisk ordanalogiliste for at evaluere og vælge de forududdannede indlejringsmodeller til opgaven. Derefter anvender vi de valgte indlejringer til NER-opgaven og opnår de nye state-of-the-art resultater på opgavens benchmark datasæt. Vi anvender også tilgangen til en anden downstream opgave med privatlivsgaranteret indlejring valg, og viser, at det hjælper brugerne hurtigt med at vælge de mest egnede indlejringer. Derudover skaber vi et open source-system ved hjælp af den foreslåede systematiske tilgang til at lette lignende undersøgelser af andre NLP-opgaver. Kildekoden og dataene er\ntilgængelig på https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'nl': 'Gezien veel recente geavanceerde inbeddingsmodellen is het selecteren van vooraf getrainde woordrepresentatiemodellen (d.w.z. woordinbedding) die het best geschikt zijn voor een specifieke downstream NLP-taak niet triviaal. In dit artikel stellen we een systematische aanpak voor voor het extraheren, evalueren en visualiseren van meerdere sets van vooraf getrainde woord embeddings om te bepalen welke embeddings moeten worden gebruikt in een downstream taak. Ten eerste, voor extractie, bieden we een methode om een subset van de embeddings te extraheren die worden gebruikt in de downstream NLP taken. Ten tweede analyseren we voor evaluatie de kwaliteit van voorgetrainde embeddings met behulp van een invoerwoordanalogie lijst. Tot slot visualiseren we de insluitruimte om de ingesloten woorden interactief te verkennen. We demonstreren de effectiviteit van de voorgestelde aanpak op onze vooraf getrainde woord embedding modellen in het Vietnamees om te selecteren welke modellen geschikt zijn voor een named entity herkenning (NER) taak. Specifiek maken we een grote Vietnamese woordanalogie lijst om de vooraf getrainde inbeddingsmodellen voor de taak te evalueren en te selecteren. Vervolgens maken we gebruik van de geselecteerde embeddings voor de NER-taak en bereiken we de nieuwe state-of-the-art resultaten op de task benchmark dataset. We passen de aanpak ook toe op een andere downstream taak van privacygegarandeerde embedding selectie, en laten zien dat het gebruikers helpt snel de meest geschikte embeddings te selecteren. Daarnaast creëren we een open-source systeem met behulp van de voorgestelde systematische aanpak om soortgelijke studies over andere NLP taken mogelijk te maken. De broncode en gegevens zijn\nbeschikbaar op https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'hr': 'S obzirom na mnoge nedavne napredne modele uključenih, odabranje predobučenih riječi predstavljanja (tj. ugrađenje riječi) modela najbolje odgovarajućih za određeni zadatak NLP-a u donjem nivou nije trivialna. U ovom papiru predlažemo sistematski pristup izvlačenju, procjenjivanju i vizualizaciji višestrukih seta predobučenih riječi za utvrđivanje kojih uključenja treba koristiti u zadatku. Prvo, za izvlačenje, pružamo metodu da izvučemo podskup ugrađenja koji se koristi u donjim zadacima NLP-a. Drugo, za procjenu, analiziramo kvalitet predobučenih integracija koristeći listu analogije ulaznih riječi. Napokon, vizualiziramo ugrađeni prostor da istražimo ugrađene riječi interaktivno. Mi pokazujemo učinkovitost predloženog pristupa na naše predobučene riječi uključujući modele u vijetnamsku zemlju kako bi izabrali koji su modeli odgovarajući za zadatak priznanje imena entiteta (NER). Posebno, stvaramo veliku vijetnamsku listu analogije riječi kako bi procijenili i odabrali predobučene model integracije za zadatak. Onda upotrebimo odabrane integracije za zadatak NER-a i postićemo nove rezultate stanja umjetnosti na setu podataka o kriteriji zadataka. Također primjenjujemo pristup drugim donjem zadatku ugrađenog izbora za privatnost i pokazujemo da pomaže korisnicima brzo izabrati najprikladnije ugrađenje. Osim toga, stvaramo sustav otvorenog izvora koristeći predloženi sistemski pristup kako bi olakšali slične ispitivanja o drugim zadacima NLP-a. Izvorni kod i podaci su\ndostupno na https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'ko': '가장 최근의 고급 포함 모델을 고려할 때 특정 다운스트림 NLP 임무에 가장 적합한 사전 트레이닝 단어 표현(즉 단어 삽입) 모델을 선택하는 것은 쉽지 않다.본고에서 우리는 여러 그룹이 미리 훈련한 단어를 추출하고 평가하며 시각화하는 체계적인 방법을 제시하여 하위 임무에서 어떤 삽입을 사용해야 하는지를 확정했다.우선 추출의 경우 다운스트림 NLP 작업에 대한 포함된 하위 세트를 추출하는 방법을 제공합니다.둘째, 평가를 위해 우리는 입력 어류 비교 목록을 사용하여 미리 훈련된 삽입의 질을 분석한다.마지막으로 우리는 삽입된 공간을 시각화하여 상호작용으로 삽입된 단어를 탐색할 것이다.우리는 실체 식별(NER) 임무에 적합한 모델을 선택하기 위해 미리 훈련된 베트남어 단어 삽입 모델에 이 방법의 유효성을 보여 주었다.구체적으로 말하자면, 우리는 임무에서 미리 훈련한 삽입 모델을 평가하고 선택하기 위해 대형 베트남어 단어 비교 목록을 만들었다.그런 다음 NER 작업을 위해 선택한 삽입을 사용하고 작업 기준 데이터 세트에서 최신 결과를 얻습니다.프라이버시 보증 삽입 선택, 즉 사용자가 가장 적합한 삽입을 신속하게 선택할 수 있도록 도와주는 또 다른 하위 작업에도 이 방법을 적용할 것입니다.또한 제안된 시스템 방법을 사용하여 다른 NLP 작업에 대한 유사한 연구를 촉진하기 위해 오픈 소스 시스템을 만들었습니다.소스 코드와 데이터는 다음과 같습니다.\nhttps://github에 액세스할 수 있습니다.com/vietnlp/etnlp。', 'sw': 'Kutokana na mifano mingi ya maendeleo ya hivi karibuni, kuchagua uwakilishi wa neno lililojifunza kabla (yaani, maneno yanayoingizwa) mifano yanafaa kwa kazi fulani ya NLP haina vizuri. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mbinu za mfumo wa kutengeneza, kutathmini, na kuonyesha mfululizo wa maneno kadhaa yaliyofunzwa kabla- ili kutambua ni njia zipi ambazo zinapaswa kutumika katika kazi ya mto wa chini. Kwanza, kwa ajili ya kuchaguliwa, tunatoa njia ya kutengeneza mfumo wa maduka yanayotumiwa katika kazi za NLP za chini. Second, for evaluation, we analyse the quality of pre-trained embeddings using an input word analogy list.  Mwisho, tunaonyesha nafasi ya kuingia ili kutafuta maneno yaliyoandikwa kwa moja. Tunaonyesha ufanisi wa hatua hiyo inayopendekezwa juu ya mitindo yetu ya maneno yaliyofunzwa kabla ya kujifunza nchini Vietnam kuchagua mifano gani yanafaa kwa kazi inayoitwa kutambua entity (NER). Kwa ujumla, tunatengeneza orodha kubwa ya uchambuzi wa neno la Kivietnam ili kutathmini na kuchagua mifano ya vifaa vya awali kwa ajili ya kazi hiyo. Kisha tunatumia mabango yaliyochaguliwa kwa ajili ya kazi ya NER na kupata matokeo mapya ya sanaa kwenye seti ya benchmark data. Kadhalika tunatumia mbinu za kazi nyingine za mkononi za faragha zinazohakikishwa katika uchaguzi wa faragha, na tunaonyesha kwamba inawasaidia watumiaji kuchagua vifaa vinavyofaa kwa haraka. Zaidi ya hayo, tunatengeneza mfumo wa vyanzo vya wazi kwa kutumia mbinu zilizopendekezwa kwa mfumo wa mfumo ili kuwezesha tafiti kama hizo kwenye kazi nyingine za NLP. Kodi na taarifa za vyanzo ni\nzinapatikana kwenye https: / /github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'id': 'Mengingat banyak model embedding lanjut-baru ini, memilih representasi kata pre-terlatih (i.e., embedding kata) model yang paling cocok untuk tugas NLP tertentu turun tidak trivial. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan sistematis untuk mengekstraksi, mengevaluasi, dan membayangkan banyak set kata-kata yang terlatih-terlatih embed- dings untuk menentukan embedding mana yang harus digunakan dalam tugas turun. Pertama, untuk ekstraksi, kami menyediakan metode untuk ekstraksi subset dari penyembedding yang digunakan dalam tugas NLP turun. Kedua, untuk evaluasi, kami menganalisis kualitas penerbangan yang dilatih-dilatih menggunakan daftar analogi kata input. Akhirnya, kita membayangkan ruang penerbangan untuk mengeksplorasi kata-kata penerbangan secara interaktif. Kami menunjukkan efektivitas pendekatan yang direncanakan pada kata-kata yang terlatih kami memasukkan model dalam Vietnam untuk memilih model mana yang cocok untuk tugas pengenalan entitas bernama (NER). Secara spesifik, kami menciptakan daftar analogi kata Vietnam yang besar untuk mengevaluasi dan memilih model embedding pra-terlatih untuk tugas ini. Kemudian kita menggunakan embed- dings yang dipilih untuk tugas NER dan mencapai hasil terbaru pada set data benchmark tugas. Kami juga menerapkan pendekatan untuk tugas turun lainnya dari seleksi penerbangan yang dijamin privasi, dan menunjukkan bahwa itu membantu pengguna dengan cepat memilih penerbangan yang paling cocok. Selain itu, kami menciptakan sistem sumber terbuka menggunakan pendekatan sistematis yang diusulkan untuk memudahkan studi yang sama pada tugas NLP lainnya. The source code and data are\navailable at https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'fa': 'با توجه به بسیاری از مدل\u200cهای پیوستن پیشرفته\u200cای، انتخاب نمایش کلمه پیش آموزش\u200cشده (یعنی نمایش\u200cهای پیوستن کلمه) بهترین مناسب برای یک کار NLP پایین\u200cترین پایین\u200cترین نیست. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش سیستم برای اخراج, ارزیابی و تصویر کردن مجموعه\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای پیش آموزش آموزش\u200cشده برای تعیین کردن که کدام ورود باید در یک کار پایین استفاده شود. اول، برای استخراج، ما یک روش برای استخراج یک قسمتی از استخراج\u200cها را برای استفاده از کار NLP پایین استفاده می\u200cکنیم. دوم، برای ارزیابی، ما کیفیت ابتدایی پیش آموزش شده را با استفاده از لیست ابتدایی کلمه انالوژی تحلیل می کنیم. بالاخره، ما فضای وارد شدن را تصور می کنیم تا کلمات وارد شدن را به طور مختلف کشف کنیم. ما فعالیت روش پیشنهاد را نشان می\u200cدهیم که مدل\u200cهایی که در ویتنامی وارد می\u200cشوند برای انتخاب کردن کدام مدل\u200cهایی برای یک کار شناسایی (NER) نامیده شده\u200cاند. به طور خاص، ما یک لیست شبیه\u200cشناسی کلمه\u200cهای ویتنامی بزرگ برای ارزیابی و انتخاب مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش آموزش برای این کار ایجاد می\u200cکنیم. سپس از طریق استفاده از انبوه\u200cهای انتخاب برای کار NER استفاده می\u200cکنیم و نتیجه\u200cهای جدید موقعیت هنری در مجموعه داده\u200cهای نقشه\u200cبندی کار را رسیدیم. ما همچنین روش را برای یک کار پایین پایین دیگر از انتخاب محرمانه\u200cی محرمانه\u200cی خصوصی استفاده می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که به سرعت به کاربران کمک می\u200cکند برای انتخاب کردن بهترین وسیله\u200cهای مناسب. در addition, we create a open-source system using the proposed system approach to facilitate similar studies on other NLP tasks. کد منبع و داده\u200cها\nدر https: //github موجود است. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'sq': 'Duke marrë parasysh shumë modele të avancuara të përfshirjes së fundit, zgjedhja e paratrajnuar e modeleve të përfshirjes së fjalëve (pra, përfshirje e fjalëve) më e përshtatshme për një detyrë të veçantë të poshtme NLP është jo e vogël. In this paper, we propose a systematic approach to extracting, evaluating, and visualizing multiple sets of pre-trained word embed- dings to determine which embeddings should be used in a downstream task.  Së pari, për nxjerrje, ne ofrojmë një metodë për të nxjerrë një nëngrup të përfshirjeve që do të përdoren në detyrat e NLP-së. Së dyti, për vlerësim, ne analizojmë cilësinë e përfshirjeve të paratrajnuara duke përdorur një list ë analogjike fjalësh. Më në fund, ne vizualizojmë hapësirën e përfshirjes për të eksploruar fjalët e përfshira interaktivisht. Ne demonstrojmë efektshmërinë e qasjes së propozuar në modelet tona të paratrajnuara për përfshirjen e fjalëve në Vietnamez për të zgjedhur cilat modele janë të përshtatshme për një detyrë të emëruar njohje të njësisë (NER). Veçanërisht, ne krijojmë një list ë të madhe analogjike fjalësh vietnameze për të vlerësuar dhe zgjedhur modelet e paratrajnuara të përfshirjes për detyrën. Pastaj përdorim të zgjedhurat e përfshira për detyrën NER dhe arrijmë rezultatet e reja të state-of-the-art në bazën e të dhënave për detyrat. Ne gjithashtu aplikojmë qasjen për një tjetër detyrë poshtë të zgjedhjes së përfshirjes së garantuar nga privatësia dhe tregojmë se ndihmon përdoruesit të zgjedhin shpejt përfshirjet më të përshtatshme. Përveç kësaj, ne krijojmë një sistem burimi të hapur duke përdorur metodën sistematike të propozuar për të lehtësuar studime të ngjashme mbi detyra të tjera të NLP. Kodi burimi dhe të dhënat janë\nnë dispozicion në https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'af': "Gien baie onlangse gevorderde inbêerde modele, kies voor-gevorderde woord verteenwoording (bv. woord inbêding) modele best e pas vir 'n spesifieke onderstreem NLP taak is nie-triviaal. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n sistematiese toegang om te uitpak, evalueer en te visualiseer veelvuldige stelle van voorafgevorderde woord inbetting- dings om te bepaal wat inbetting gebruik moet word in 'n onderstreem taak. Eerste, vir uitpakking, verskaf ons 'n metode om 'n subartikel van die inbêding te uitpak wat in die onderstreem NLP taak gebruik word. Tweede, vir evaluering, ons analyseer die kwaliteit van vooraf-opgelei inbêdings met 'n invoer woord analogies lys. Eindelik, ons visualiseer die inbêderspasie om die inbêderde woorde interaktief te ondersoek. Ons wys die effektiviteit van die voorgestelde toegang op ons voorafgevorderde woord inbetering modele in Viëtnamees om te kies wat modele is geskik vir 'n genoem entiteit herken- kenning (NER) taak. Spesifieke, ons skep 'n groot Viëtnamese woord analogies lys om te evalueer en kies die voorafgevorderde inbinneste modele vir die taak. Ons gebruik dan die gekose embed- dings vir die NER taak en bereik die nuwe state- of- the- art resultate op die taak benchmark datastel. Ons het ook die toegang tot 'n ander onderstreem taak van privateit-garanteerde inbinneste keuse aanwend, en wys dat dit hulp gebruikers vinnig die mees geskikte inbinneste te kies. In addition, we create an open-source system using the proposed systematic approach to facilitate similar studies on other NLP tasks. Die bronkode en data is\nbeskikbaar by https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.", 'tr': 'Ýakynda birnäçe gelişmiş esaslary görkezilýän nusgalary görkez, öň-bilinmiş söz temsillemesini saýlamak (mysal. söz embedding) nusgalary belli downstream NLP täblisasy üçin i ň gowy ýa şaýan nusgalary däl. Bu kagyzda, indiki a şakda nähili guramlary ulanmalydygyny çykmak, deňlemek we görkezmek üçin sistematik bir metod teklip edýäris. Ilkinji gezek, a şmak üçin biz NLP goýulmuşynda ulanylan içeri girişimlerin bir toparyny açmak üçin bir yöntemi temin edýäris Ikinji gezek, çözümlenmek üçin ön bilim taýýarlanmasynda giriş sözleriň analogi listesini ullanýarys. Soňunda integral sözleri keşfedmek üçin girişik alanyny görkez. Biz Vjetnamdaky öňündeki bilim taýýarlanan sözlerimizde nähili nusgalar diýip kabul etmek üçin teklif edilen yaklaýyşyň etkinliğini görkeýäris. Adatça, biz ýetnamlaryň baýramçylmak üçin uly bir söz analogi listi bejerdik we bu işiň üçin öňünden eğlenen düzümlerni saýlaýrys. Sonra saýlanan embed-dings işi NER zady üçin ullanýarys we täze bir stat-of-the-art netijesini gören benchmark verileri üçin ýetip bileris. Biz hem gizli baglanylyk saýlawynyň ýene bir aşaky taýýarlanan zadyna uygulapdyk we onuň ullançylaryň iň gowy taýýarlanmagyna kömek edip bilýändigini görkez. Munuň üçin, başga NLP görevlerinde meňzeş öwrenmeleri üçin sistematik ýagdaýy ulanarak açyk kaynakly sistemi bejerdik. Çeşme kody we maglumat\nmeýilleşdir https: //github com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'am': "የአሁኑን ቀድሞ የተማረከ ቃላት መልዕክት (ምሳሌ ቃላት ስብስብ) ሞዴላዎችን ለመምረጥ የተሻለ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ማንኛውም ውጤት እንዲጠቀም፣ ማስታወቂያ እና ማንኛውን የውይይት አካባቢ ቃላት እንዲጠቀም እናሳውቃለን፡፡ መጀመሪያ፣ ለመውጣት የNLP ስራ ውስጥ የሚጠቀሙትን አካባቢዎችን ለማውጣት እናስችላለን፡፡ Second, for evaluation, pre-trained embedding quality is analyzed by an input word analog list. በመጨረሻውም የደረሰውን ቃላት በመፍጠር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በቪትናምኛ ውስጥ ያሉት የፊተኛውን የቃላችን አካባቢ አካባቢ ማውቀትን (NER) ስራ ለመምረጥ የሚቃወሙትን እናሳይናለን፡፡ በተለያይነት፣ የቪትናምኛ ቃላት አናሎጂ ዝርዝር መግለጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር ደግሞም የግልፅ ምርጫ ወደሌላው ውኃ ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ በተዘጋጀው የስርዓት ሥርዓት በመጠቀም በብዙ NLP ስርዓቶች ላይ የተመሳሰለውን ትምህርት ለማግኘት የክፈት-source ስርዓት እናደርጋለን፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s\nhttp: // github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.", 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক অগ্রগতির মডেল দিয়ে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব নির্বাচন করা হয়েছে (যেমন শব্দ প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা হয়েছে) একটি নির্দিষ্ট ডাউনস এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি সিস্টেমিক উপায় প্রস্তাব করছি পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দের বের করার, মূল্যায়ন এবং দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি করার জন্য- যাতে আমরা নির্ধারণ করতে পারি কোন বি প্রথমত, বের করার জন্য আমরা একটি পদ্ধতি প্রদান করি নিচের নীচে এনএলপি কাজে ব্যবহার করার জন্য একটি বিভাগ বিভাগ বের করার জন্য। দ্বিতীয়, মূল্যায়নের জন্য, আমরা পূর্ববর্তী প্রশিক্ষিত প্রবেশের মান বিশ্লেষণ করি ইনপুট শব্দ বিশ্লেষণের তালিকা ব্যবহ শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা বিভিন্ন স্থানের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি দেখতে পাচ্ছি যাতে বিভিন্ন শব্দগুলো প্রবেশ করার জন্য। আমরা ভিয়েতনামের প্রাক্তন প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দের প্রতি প্রস্তাবিত পদক্ষেপের কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করি যাতে কোন মডেল নির্বাচন করা যায় নামের একটি বস্তুর স্ বিশেষ করে, আমরা ভিয়েতনামী শব্দ বিশাল বিশ্লেষণ তালিকা তৈরি করি কাজের জন্য পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত এমডেডিং মডেল মূল্য মূল্যায়ন এবং  We then utilize the selected embed- dings for the NER task and achieve the new state-of-the-art results on the task benchmark dataset.  আমরা প্রাইভেট নির্বাচনের নিশ্চিত ব্যক্তিগত নিশ্চিত ব্যক্তিগত নির্বাচনের জন্য আরেকটি নিচের কাজের প্রয়োগ করি এবং দেখাই যে এটি ব্যবহারকার এছাড়াও আমরা একটি উন্মুক্ত সোর্স সিস্টেম তৈরি করি অন্যান্য এনএলপি কাজের উপর একই ধরনের গবেষণা সহায়তা করার জন্য প্রস্তাবি উৎস কোড এবং তথ্য\navailable at https: //github. কম/ভিয়েতন্লিপ/এটনল্প।', 'az': "Əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş söz göstəricisini seçmək üçün çox yeni ileri gəlmiş inkişaf modellərinə görə, növbənöv təhsil edilmiş söz göstəricisini seçmək üçün ən yaxşı növbənöv modellərdir. Bu kağızda sistematik bir yol təklif edirik ki, a şağıdaki işlərdə hansı in şalların istifadə ediləcəyini belə təhsil edilmiş bir çoxlu əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş söz inşallarını çıxartmaq, değerlənmək və vizualizasyon üçün sistematik təklif edirik. Əvvəlcə, çıxartmaq üçün NLP işlərində istifadə ediləcək inbinglərin bir subgrupunu çıxartmaq üçün bir yol təmin edirik. İkincisi, değerlendirmək üçün, əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş inbinglərin keyfiyyətini analojik listesini kullanarak analojik sözlərini analojik edirik. Sonunda, içərisində olan sözləri interaktif olaraq keşfetmek üçün içərisində olan yer görünür. Biz Vjetnamdakı əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş sözlərimizin modellərini seçmək üçün hansı modellərin adı ilə təhsil edilən təhsil edilməsini göstəririk. Özellikle, biz bu işin əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş imzalama modellerini değerləşdirmək və seçmək üçün böyük Vjetnamlı sözlər analogi listesini yaratdıq. Sonra seçilmiş embed-dingləri NER işi üçün istifadə edirik və iş benchmark veri qutusundakı yeni stat-of-the-art sonuçlarını başa düşürük. Biz də gizli təhlükəsizlik təhlükəsizliyi seçimlərin başqa bir aşağı təhlükəsizlik işinə istifadə edirik, və bu istifadəçilərin ən yaxşı təhlükəsizlikləri seçməsinə kömək edir. Əvvəlcə, başqa NLP işləri barəsində bənzər təhsil edilmək üçün sistematik tərzini istifadə etmək üçün açıq mənbə sistemi yaradırıq. Kaynak kodu və verilər\nhttps: //github'da faydalanır. com/vietnlp/etnlp.", 'bs': 'S obzirom na mnoge nedavne napredne modele uključenih, odabranje predobučenih riječi predstavljanja (tj. ugrađenje riječi) najbolje odgovarajućih modela za određeni zadatak NLP-a koji je najbolji za određeni dolje nije trivialni. U ovom papiru predlažemo sistemski pristup izvlačenju, procjenjivanju i vizualizaciji višestrukih seta predobučenih riječi za utvrđivanje kojih uključenja treba koristiti u zadatku. Prvo, za izvlačenje, pružamo metodu da izvučemo podskup ugrađenja koji se koristi u donjim zadacima NLP-a. Drugo, za procjenu, analiziramo kvalitetu predobučenih integracija koristeći listu analogije ulaznih riječi. Konačno, vizualiziramo ugrađeni prostor da istražimo ugrađene riječi interaktivno. Mi pokazujemo učinkovitost predloženog pristupa na naše predobučene riječi uključujući modele u vijetnamsku zemlju kako bi izabrali koji su modeli odgovarajući za zadatak priznanja entiteta (NER). Posebno, stvaramo veliku vijetnamsku listu analogije riječi kako bi procijenili i odabrali predobučene model integracije za taj zadatak. Onda iskoristimo odabrane integracije za zadatak NER-a i postićemo nove rezultate stanja umjetnosti na setu podataka o skloništima zadataka. Također primjenjujemo pristup drugim spuštenim zadatkom izbora ugrađenog za privatnost i pokazujemo da pomaže korisnicima brzo izabrati najprikladnije ugrađenje. Osim toga, mi stvaramo sistem otvorenog izvora koristeći predloženi sistemski pristup kako bi olakšali slične studije o drugim zadacima NLP-a. Izvorni kod i podaci su\ndostupno na https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'hy': 'Եթե հաշվի առնենք վերջերս շատ զարգացած ներգրավման մոդելներ, նախապատրաստված բառերի ներկայացման (այսինքն՝ բառերի ներգրավման) մոդելների ընտրությունը, որոնք լավագույնն են համապատասխանում որոշակի հետագա ՆԼՊ-ի խնդիրների համար, ոչ փոքր Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք սիստեմատիկ մոտեցում վերցնելու, գնահատելու և վիզուալիզացիայի համար նախապատրաստված բառերի բազմաթիվ հավաքածուներ ներգրավելու համար, որպեսզի որոշենք, թե որպիսի ներգրավումներ պետք է օգտագործվի հետագա գործում: Նախ և առաջ, հանելու համար մենք տրամադրում ենք մեթոդ, որպեսզի հանենք ներդրումների մի ենթախումբ, որը պետք է օգտագործվի ՆԼՊ-ի հետագա խնդիրներում: Երկրորդ, գնահատելու համար մենք վերլուծում ենք նախապատրաստված ներդրումների որակը օգտագործելով ներդրված բառերի նմանատիպ ցուցակ: Վերջապես, մենք տեսնում ենք ներգրավված տարածքը, որպեսզի ինտերակտիվ ուսումնասիրենք ներգրավված բառերը: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս առաջարկված մոտեցության արդյունավետությունը մեր նախապատրաստված բառերի ներգրավման մոդելների վերաբերյալ վիետնամերենում, որպեսզի ընտրենք, թե որպիսի մոդելներ են համապատասխան կոչված անհատականության ճանաչելու (ՆԵՌ) խնդիրը: Specifically, we create a large Vietnamese word analogy list to evaluate and select the pre-trained embedding models for the task.  Այնուհետև մենք օգտագործում ենք ընտրված ներգրավված տեղադրումները ՆԵՌ-ի առաջադրանքի համար և հասնում ենք նոր վերջին արդյունքներին առաջադրանքների համեմատային տվյալների համակարգում: Մենք նաև կիրառում ենք մեկ ուրիշ հետագա խնդիր՝ մասնավորության պաշտպանությամբ ներգրավված ընտրությունը, և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այն օգնում է օգտագործողներին արագ ընտրել ամենահարմար ներգրավումները: Ավելին, մենք ստեղծում ենք բաց աղբյուր համակարգ, օգտագործելով առաջարկված սիստեմատիկ մոտեցումը, որպեսզի հեշտացնենք նման ուսումնասիրություններ այլ ՆԼՊ-ի վերաբերյալ: Առաջին կոդը և տվյալները\nհասանելի է com', 'cs': 'Vzhledem k mnoha nedávným pokročilým modelům vkládání je výběr předškolených modelů reprezentace slov (tj. vložení slov) modelů, které nejlépe vyhovují konkrétnímu následnému úkolu NLP, netriviální. V tomto článku navrhujeme systematický přístup k extrakci, vyhodnocování a vizualizaci více sad předškolených vložení slov pro určení, které vložení by měly být použity v následném úkolu. Za prvé, pro extrakci, poskytujeme metodu extrakce podmnožiny vložení, které mají být použity v následných úlohách NLP. Za druhé pro vyhodnocení analyzujeme kvalitu předškolených vložení pomocí seznamu analogie vstupních slov. Nakonec vizualizujeme vkládací prostor pro interaktivní prozkoumání vložených slov. Účinnost navrženého přístupu demonstrujeme na našich předškolených modelech vložení slov ve vietnamštině, abychom vybrali, které modely jsou vhodné pro úlohu rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit (NER). Konkrétně vytvoříme velký seznam analogie vietnamských slov pro vyhodnocení a výběr předškolených modelů vložení pro daný úkol. Následně využijeme vybrané vložení pro úlohu NER a dosáhneme nových nejmodernějších výsledků na datové sadě benchmarku úloh. Tento přístup aplikujeme také na další následný úkol výběru vložení zaručeného ochranou soukromí a ukazujeme, že pomáhá uživatelům rychle vybrat nejvhodnější vložení. Kromě toho vytváříme open-source systém s využitím navrženého systematického přístupu k usnadnění podobných studií na dalších úkolech NLP. Zdrojový kód a data jsou\nk dispozici na https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'et': 'Arvestades paljusid hiljutisi täiustatud manustamismudeleid, ei ole eelnevalt koolitatud sõnade esitamise (st sõnade manustamise) mudelite valimine, mis sobivad kõige paremini konkreetse järgneva uue tööprogrammi ülesande jaoks, triviaalne. Käesolevas töös pakume välja süstemaatilise lähenemisviisi mitmete eelõpetatud sõnade manustamise komplektide ekstraheerimisele, hindamisele ja visualiseerimisele, et määrata kindlaks, milliseid manustamisi tuleks kasutada järgnevas töös. Esiteks pakume ekstraheerimiseks meetodit uue tööprogrammi ülesannetes kasutatavate manustamiste alamhulga ekstraheerimiseks. Teiseks analüüsime hindamiseks eelkoolitud manustamise kvaliteeti sisendsõna analoogia nimekirja abil. Lõpuks visualiseerime manustamisruumi, et uurida manustatud sõnu interaktiivselt. Näitame väljapakutud lähenemisviisi efektiivsust meie eelnevalt väljaõpetatud sõnade manustamise mudelitel vietnami keeles, et valida, millised mudelid sobivad nimetatud olemi tunnustamise (NER) ülesandeks. Täpsemalt loome suure vietnami sõnaloogia loendi, et hinnata ja valida eelnevalt koolitatud manustamismudelid ülesande jaoks. Seejärel kasutame NER-ülesande jaoks valitud manustamist ja saavutame ülesande võrdlusandmekogumi uued kaasaegsed tulemused. Samuti rakendame lähenemisviisi veel ühele järgmisele privaatsusega tagatud manustamise ülesandele ja näitame, et see aitab kasutajatel kiiresti valida kõige sobivamad manustamised. Lisaks loome avatud lähtekoodiga süsteemi, kasutades kavandatud süstemaatilist lähenemisviisi, et hõlbustada sarnaseid uuringuid teiste uue uue õppekava ülesannete kohta. Lähtekood ja andmed on\nsaadaval aadressil https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'fi': 'Kun otetaan huomioon monet viimeaikaiset kehittyneet upotusmallit, ennalta koulutettujen sanaesitysmallien valitseminen (eli sanan upotus) sopii parhaiten tiettyyn jatkojalostuksen NLP-tehtävään, ei ole triviaalia. Tässä työssä ehdotamme systemaattista lähestymistapaa useiden esikoulutettujen sanaupotusten poimimiseen, arviointiin ja visualisointiin määrittääksemme, mitä upotuksia tulisi käyttää loppupään tehtävässä. Ensinnäkin, uuttamista varten tarjoamme menetelmän, jolla poimitaan osa upotuksista, joita käytetään jatkojalostuksen NLP-tehtävissä. Toiseksi analysoimme esikoulutettujen upotusten laatua syöttösanaanalogialuettelon avulla. Lopuksi visualisoimme upotustilan tutkiaksemme upotettuja sanoja vuorovaikutteisesti. Esittelemme ehdotetun lähestymistavan tehokkuuden esikoulutetuissa sanaupotusmalleissamme vietnamiksi valitaksemme, mitkä mallit soveltuvat nimettyyn entity recognition (NER) -tehtävään. Erityisesti luomme suuren vietnamilaisen sanaanalogialuettelon arvioimaan ja valitsemaan tehtävään valmiiksi koulutetut upotusmallit. Tämän jälkeen hyödynnämme NER-tehtävään valittuja upotuksia ja saavutamme tehtävävertailuaineistoon uusimmat tulokset. Sovellamme lähestymistapaa myös toiseen loppukäyttäjän tehtävään yksityisyyden takaamaan upotusten valintaan ja osoitamme, että se auttaa käyttäjiä valitsemaan nopeasti sopivimmat upotukset. Lisäksi luomme avoimen lähdekoodin järjestelmän käyttäen ehdotettua systemaattista lähestymistapaa helpottaaksemme vastaavia tutkimuksia muista NLP-tehtävistä. Lähtökoodi ja tiedot ovat\nsaatavilla osoitteessa https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'ca': "Tenint en compte molts models avançats d'incorporació recents, la selecció de models de representació de paraules pré-entrenats (i.e., incorporació de paraules) millor adaptats a una tasca específica de NLP a avall no és trivial. En aquest paper, proposem un enfocament sistemàtic a l'extracció, l'evaluació i la visualització de múltiples conjunts d'incorporacions de paraules pré-entrenades per determinar quines incorporacions haurien d'utilitzar en una tasca avall. Primer, per a l'extracció, proporcionem un mètode d'extracció d'un subconjunt d'integracions que s'utilitzen en les tasques de NLP avall. Segon, per a l'evaluació, analitzem la qualitat d'incorporacions pré-entrenades utilitzant una llista d'analògia de paraules d'entrada. Finalment, visualitzem l'espai d'incorporació per explorar les paraules incorporades interactivament. Demonstrem l'eficacia de l'enfocament proposat en els nostres models d'incorporació de paraules pré-entrenats en vietnamita per seleccionar quins models són adequats per a una tasca de reconeixement d'una entitat anomenada (NER). En concret, creem una gran llista de paraules analògiques vietnamites per avaluar i seleccionar els models d'incorporació pré-entrenats per a la tasca. Després utilitzem les integracions seleccionadas per a la tasca NER i aconseguem els resultats més avançats del conjunt de dades de referència de les tasques. També aplicam l'enfocament a una altra tasca avall de selecció d'integració garantida per la privacitat, i demostram que ajuda els usuaris a seleccionar ràpidament les integracions més adequades. A més, creem un sistema de codi obert utilitzant l'enfocament sistemàtic proposat per facilitar estudis similars sobre altres tasques del NLP. El codi fonti les dades són\ndisponible a https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.", 'jv': 'connected mode com/www.', 'ha': 'dictionary variant com/vievievietl/etnlp.', 'sk': 'Na voljo na spletni strani https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'bo': 'https: //github ནང་དུ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ com/vietnlp/etnlp.', 'he': 'available at https: //github. com/vietnlp/etnlp.'}
{'en': 'Bigger versus Similar : Selecting a Background Corpus for First Story Detection Based on Distributional Similarity', 'fr': "Plus grand ou similaire\xa0: sélection d'un corpus d'arrière-plan pour la détection de la première histoire en fonction de la similarité distributionnelle", 'ar': 'أكبر مقابل مماثل: اختيار مجموعة الخلفية لاكتشاف القصة الأولى بناءً على التشابه التوزيعي', 'pt': 'Maior versus semelhante: selecionando um corpus de fundo para a detecção da primeira história com base na similaridade de distribuição', 'es': 'Más grande frente a similar: selección de un corpus de fondo para la detección de la primera historia según la similitud distributiva', 'ja': '大型対類似：分布の類似性に基づいて最初の階層検出のための背景コーパスを選択する', 'ru': 'Более крупный по сравнению с аналогичным: выбор фонового корпуса для обнаружения первой истории на основе сходства распределения', 'zh': '更大与相似:基于分布相似性为故事检择背景语料库', 'hi': 'बड़ा बनाम समान: वितरण समानता के आधार पर पहली कहानी का पता लगाने के लिए एक पृष्ठभूमि कॉर्पस का चयन', 'ga': 'Bigger versus Similar: Corpas Cúlra a Roghnú chun Céad Scéal a Bhrath Bunaithe ar Chosúlacht Dháileacháin', 'ka': 'უფრო დიდი versus Similar: პირველი ისტორიის განსახულებისთვის ფონური კოპოსს არჩევა', 'hu': 'Nagyobb kontra hasonló: Háttér Corpus kiválasztása az első történet felismeréséhez eloszlási hasonlóság alapján', 'el': 'Μεγαλύτερο έναντι παρόμοιου: Επιλογή ενός Σώματος φόντου για την ανίχνευση πρώτης ιστορίας με βάση την ομοιότητα διανομής', 'it': 'Più grande contro simile: selezione di un corpo di sfondo per il rilevamento della prima storia in base alla somiglianza distributiva', 'kk': 'Үлкен және ұқсас: Бірінші оқиғаны анықтау үшін аясының бұрышын таңдау', 'lt': 'Didesnis, palyginti su panašiu: pirmosios istorijos nustatymo fono korpuso parinkimas pagal paskirstymo panašumą', 'mk': 'Поголем против сличен: избор на корпус од позадина за детекција на прва приказна врз основа на дистрибуционална сличност', 'ms': 'Lebih besar melawan yang Sama: Memilih Korpus Latar Belakang untuk Pengesanan Stori Pertama Berdasarkan Kesamaan Pembahagian', 'mt': 'Iktar kontra simili: L-għa żla ta’ Korp ta’ Sfond għad-Detezzjoni tal-Ewwel Storja bbażata fuq Similarità Distribuzzjonali', 'mn': 'Илүү том эсвэл төстэй: Хувьслалтын төстэй төстэй байдлыг сонгох', 'no': 'Større mot liknande: Vel ein bakgrunnskorpus for første oppdaging av historiar basert på distribusjonslinjeliknande', 'ro': 'Mai mare versus similar: Selectarea unui corpus de fundal pentru detectarea primei povești pe baza identității distribuționale', 'pl': 'Większy niż podobny: wybór korpusu tła do wykrywania pierwszej historii w oparciu o podobieństwo dystrybucyjne', 'sr': 'Veći protiv sličnosti: odabranje pozadinskog korpusa za otkrivanje prve priče na osnovu distribucijske sličnosti', 'so': 'Bigger versus Similar: Selecting a Background Corpus for First Story Detection Based on Distribution Similarity', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරථම කතාවක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් කතාවක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් සිද්ධිය සඳහා පිටිපසුම් කොර්පුස් තෝර', 'sv': 'Större jämfört med liknande: Välja en bakgrundskorpus för första berättelsens upptäckt baserat på distributionsliknande', 'ur': 'بہت بڑی نسبت Similar: پردازی سیمالیاتی پر بنیاد رکھنے کے لئے ایک پچھلے کلام کا کرپوس انتخاب کرنا', 'ta': 'பெரிய எதிர்பார்க்கப்பட்டது', 'ml': 'ആദ്യ സ്റ്റോറി ഡിറ്റരിഷന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനപ്പെടുത്തിയ ഒരു പശ്ചാത്തല കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന് വേണ്ടി വലുതായ', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'To hơn tương tự: chọn một tập thể nền cho phát hiện truyện đầu dựa trên khả năng chia sẻ tương đồng', 'bg': 'По-голям срещу подобен: Избор на фонов корпус за откриване на първа история въз основа на разпространението на сходство', 'hr': 'Veći protiv sličnosti: Izabranje pozadinskog korpusa za otkrivanje prve priče na temelju distribucijske sličnosti', 'nl': 'Groter versus Vergelijkbaar: het selecteren van een achtergrondkorpus voor eerste verhaaldetectie op basis van distributiegelijkenis', 'da': 'Større versus lignende: Valg af et baggrundskorpus til registrering af første historie baseret på distributionsmæssig lighed', 'de': 'Größer versus Ähnlich: Auswahl eines Hintergrundkorpus für die erste Story-Erkennung basierend auf Verteilungsgleichheit', 'ko': '더 크든 비슷하든: 분포 유사성을 바탕으로 배경 자료 라이브러리를 선택하여 첫 번째 이야기 검사를 실시한다.', 'id': 'Lebih besar melawan yang Sama: Memilih Korpus Latar Belakang untuk Deteksi Kisah Pertama Berdasarkan Simulasi Distributional', 'sw': 'Makubwa zaidi na vile: Kuchagua Makosa ya Background kwa ajili ya Kuchunguza Habari ya kwanza kwa Kutokana na Usalama', 'tr': 'Daha b체y체k ve benzeri:Bir Arkaplan K철rp체s체 캅lk Hikaye Tan캇mas캇na dayanan', 'af': "Grootter teen gelykbaar: Kies 'n Agtergrond Korpus vir eerste storie Opdekking Baseer op Verspreidionale Likveldigheid", 'fa': 'بزرگتر نسبت به شبیه: انتخاب یک جسد زمینه برای کشف اولین داستان بر اساس شبیه توزیع', 'sq': 'Më i madh kundër të ngjashme: Zgjidhja e një korpusi të sfondit për zbulimin e historisë së parë bazuar në ngjashmëri shpërndarëse', 'hy': 'Bigger versus Similar: Selecting a Background Corpus for First Story Detection Based on Distributional Similarity', 'az': 'Daha böyük və bənzər: İlk hekayə keşif üçün Arxa Plan Corpusu seçin', 'bn': 'প্রথম গল্প সনাক্তির জন্য একটি পটভূমির কোর্পাস নির্বাচন করুন', 'bs': 'Veći protiv sličnosti: biranje pozadinskog korpusa za otkrivanje prve priče na temelju distribucijske sličnosti', 'ca': 'Bigger versus Similar: Selecting a Background Corpus for First Story Detection Based on Distributional Similarity', 'et': 'Suurem versus sarnane: taustakorpuse valimine esimese loo tuvastamiseks jaotussarnasuse põhjal', 'cs': 'Větší versus podobné: Výběr korpusu pozadí pro detekci prvního příběhu na základě distribuční podobnosti', 'fi': 'Suurempi vs. samankaltainen: Taustakorpuksen valitseminen ensimmäisen tarinan tunnistamiseen jakelun samankaltaisuuden perusteella', 'am': 'መደብ', 'jv': 'Bigger Versus Similr: Select a background corpus for First Song detection basa on Distribution Similrity', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Večji v primerjavi s podobnim: izbira korpusa ozadja za zaznavanje prve zgodbe na podlagi distribucijske podobnosti', 'he': 'Bigger versus Similar: Selecting a Background Corpus for First Story Detection Based on Distributional Similarity', 'bo': 'Bigger versus Similar: Selecting a Background Corpus for First Story Detection Based on Distributional Similarity'}
{'en': 'The current state of the art for First Story Detection (FSD) are nearest neighbour-based models with traditional term vector representations ; however, one challenge faced by FSD models is that the document representation is usually defined by the vocabulary and term frequency from a background corpus. Consequently, the ideal background corpus should arguably be both large-scale to ensure adequate term coverage, and similar to the target domain in terms of the language distribution. However, given these two factors can not always be mutually satisfied, in this paper we examine whether the distributional similarity of common terms is more important than the scale of common terms for FSD. As a basis for our analysis we propose a set of metrics to quantitatively measure the scale of common terms and the distributional similarity between corpora. Using these metrics we rank different background corpora relative to a target corpus. We also apply models based on different background corpora to the FSD task. Our results show that term distributional similarity is more predictive of good FSD performance than the scale of common terms ; and, thus we demonstrate that a smaller recent domain-related corpus will be more suitable than a very large-scale general corpus for FSD.', 'fr': "L'état actuel de l'art en matière de détection de première histoire (FSD) est constitué de modèles basés sur le plus proche voisin avec des représentations vectorielles de termes traditionnels\xa0; cependant, l'un des défis rencontrés par les modèles FSD est que la représentation du document est généralement définie par le vocabulaire et la fréquence des termes d'un corpus d'arrière-plan. Par conséquent, le corpus de référence idéal devrait être à la fois à grande échelle pour garantir une couverture à terme adéquate et similaire au domaine cible en termes de distribution linguistique. Toutefois, étant donné que ces deux facteurs ne peuvent pas toujours être satisfaits mutuellement, nous examinons dans cet article si la similitude distributionnelle des termes communs est plus importante que l'échelle des termes communs pour la DSE. Comme base pour notre analyse, nous proposons un ensemble de mesures permettant de mesurer quantitativement l'échelle des termes courants et la similitude distributionnelle entre les corpus. À l'aide de ces mesures, nous classons différents corpus d'arrière-plan par rapport à un corpus cible. Nous appliquons également des modèles basés sur différents corpus de fond à la tâche FSD. Nos résultats montrent que la similarité distributionnelle des termes est plus prédictive d'une bonne performance FSD que l'échelle des termes courants\xa0; nous démontrons donc qu'un corpus récent plus petit lié au domaine conviendra mieux qu'un corpus général à très grande échelle pour la FSD.", 'ar': 'تعتبر الحالة الفنية الحالية لاكتشاف القصة الأولى (FSD) أقرب النماذج المستندة إلى الجوار مع تمثيلات ناقلات المصطلح التقليدي ؛ ومع ذلك ، فإن أحد التحديات التي تواجهها نماذج FSD هو أن تمثيل المستند يتم تحديده عادةً من خلال المفردات وتكرار المصطلح من مجموعة الخلفية. وبالتالي ، يمكن القول إن مجموعة الخلفية المثالية يجب أن تكون واسعة النطاق لضمان تغطية مصطلح مناسبة ، ومماثلة للمجال الهدف من حيث توزيع اللغة. ومع ذلك ، نظرًا لأنه لا يمكن دائمًا تلبية هذين العاملين بشكل متبادل ، فإننا في هذه الورقة ندرس ما إذا كان التشابه التوزيعي للمصطلحات الشائعة أكثر أهمية من مقياس المصطلحات الشائعة لـ FSD. كأساس لتحليلنا ، نقترح مجموعة من المقاييس للقياس الكمي لمقياس المصطلحات الشائعة والتشابه التوزيعي بين المؤسسات. باستخدام هذه المقاييس ، نقوم بتصنيف مجموعة خلفية مختلفة بالنسبة للمجموعة المستهدفة. نطبق أيضًا نماذج تستند إلى خلفيات مختلفة لمهمة FSD. تظهر نتائجنا أن مصطلح التشابه التوزيعي هو أكثر تنبؤًا بأداء FSD الجيد من مقياس المصطلحات الشائعة ؛ وبالتالي ، فإننا نثبت أن مجموعة أصغر مرتبطة بالمجال ستكون أكثر ملاءمة من مجموعة عامة كبيرة الحجم لـ FSD.', 'pt': 'O estado da arte atual para Detecção de Primeira História (FSD) são modelos baseados no vizinho mais próximo com representações tradicionais de vetores de termos; no entanto, um desafio enfrentado pelos modelos FSD é que a representação do documento é geralmente definida pelo vocabulário e frequência de termos de um corpus de fundo. Consequentemente, o corpus de fundo ideal deve ser tanto de grande escala para garantir uma cobertura de termo adequada quanto semelhante ao domínio de destino em termos de distribuição de idiomas. No entanto, dado que esses dois fatores nem sempre podem ser mutuamente satisfeitos, neste artigo examinamos se a similaridade distributiva de termos comuns é mais importante do que a escala de termos comuns para FSD. Como base para nossa análise propomos um conjunto de métricas para medir quantitativamente a escala de termos comuns e a similaridade distributiva entre corpora. Usando essas métricas, classificamos diferentes corpus de fundo em relação a um corpus de destino. Também aplicamos modelos baseados em diferentes corpora de fundo para a tarefa FSD. Nossos resultados mostram que a similaridade de distribuição de termos é mais preditiva de bom desempenho do FSD do que a escala de termos comuns; e, assim, demonstramos que um corpus relacionado ao domínio recente menor será mais adequado do que um corpus geral de grande escala para FSD.', 'es': 'El estado actual de la técnica para la detección de la primera historia (FSD) son modelos basados en el vecino más cercano con representaciones vectoriales de términos tradicionales; sin embargo, un desafío al que se enfrentan los modelos FSD es que la representación del documento generalmente se define por el vocabulario y la frecuencia de los términos de un corpus de antecedentes. En consecuencia, podría decirse que el corpus de antecedentes ideal debería ser a gran escala para garantizar una cobertura adecuada de los términos, y similar al dominio objetivo en términos de distribución del idioma. Sin embargo, dado que estos dos factores no siempre pueden satisfacerse mutuamente, en este artículo examinamos si la similitud distributiva de los términos comunes es más importante que la escala de términos comunes para la FSD. Como base para nuestro análisis, proponemos un conjunto de métricas para medir cuantitativamente la escala de los términos comunes y la similitud distributiva entre los cuerpos. Usando estas métricas, clasificamos los diferentes cuerpos de fondo en relación con un corpus objetivo. También aplicamos modelos basados en diferentes corpus de antecedentes a la tarea de FSD. Nuestros resultados muestran que la similitud distributiva de términos es más predictiva del buen desempeño de la FSD que la escala de términos comunes; y, por lo tanto, demostramos que un corpus relacionado con el dominio reciente más pequeño será más adecuado que un corpus general a gran escala para la FSD.', 'zh': '检(FSD)之今技术水平盖近邻之象,有故事之术语向量。 然FSD临一挑战,文档示常由背景语料库词汇、术语频率定义。 是以背景语料库宜大保足术语覆盖率,又言语布置,与趋向相似。 然鉴此二者,非常足也,在本文中,究其同项之布相似性较FSD通用之规模为重。 为我论其本,立其部伍指标量量常用项规模、语料库之间布相似性。 用此指标者,相对语料库背景语料异名也。 吾将异背景语料库之用于 FSD 也。 吾之的结果表明,术语布相似性胜常用术语之尺FSD。 故验其近与领域相关者语料库将大于通用语料库尤宜FSD。', 'ru': 'Современное состояние системы обнаружения первого рассказа (FSD) является ближайшей соседней моделью с традиционным представлением вектора терминов; однако одна из проблем, с которой сталкиваются модели FSD, заключается в том, что представление документа обычно определяется словарным запасом и частотой терминов из фонового корпуса. Следовательно, идеальный фоновый корпус, возможно, должен быть как крупномасштабным, чтобы обеспечить адекватный охват терминов, так и аналогичным целевому домену с точки зрения распространения языка. Однако, учитывая, что эти два фактора не всегда могут быть взаимно удовлетворены, в этой статье мы исследуем, является ли распределение сходства общих терминов более важным, чем масштаб общих терминов для FSD. В качестве основы для нашего анализа мы предлагаем набор метрик для количественного измерения масштаба общих терминов и распределения сходства между телами. Используя эти показатели, мы ранжируем различные фоновые тела относительно целевого тела. Мы также применяем модели, основанные на различных фоновых телах, к задаче FSD. Наши результаты показывают, что терминологическое сходство распределения в большей степени предсказывает хорошую производительность FSD, чем масштаб общих терминов; и, таким образом, мы демонстрируем, что меньший недавний корпус, связанный с доменом, будет более подходящим, чем очень крупномасштабный общий корпус для FSD.', 'hi': 'फर्स्ट स्टोरी डिटेक्शन (एफएसडी) के लिए कला की वर्तमान स्थिति पारंपरिक शब्द वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ निकटतम पड़ोसी-आधारित मॉडल हैं; हालांकि, FSD मॉडल द्वारा सामना की जाने वाली एक चुनौती यह है कि दस्तावेज़ प्रतिनिधित्व आमतौर पर पृष्ठभूमि कॉर्पस से शब्दावली और शब्द आवृत्ति द्वारा परिभाषित किया जाता है। नतीजतन, आदर्श पृष्ठभूमि कॉर्पस यकीनन पर्याप्त अवधि कवरेज सुनिश्चित करने के लिए बड़े पैमाने पर दोनों होना चाहिए, और भाषा वितरण के संदर्भ में लक्ष्य डोमेन के समान होना चाहिए। हालांकि, इन दो कारकों को हमेशा पारस्परिक रूप से संतुष्ट नहीं किया जा सकता है, इस पेपर में हम जांच करते हैं कि क्या सामान्य शब्दों की वितरण समानता एफएसडी के लिए सामान्य शब्दों के पैमाने की तुलना में अधिक महत्वपूर्ण है। हमारे विश्लेषण के लिए एक आधार के रूप में हम सामान्य शब्दों के पैमाने और कॉर्पोरेट के बीच वितरण समानता को मात्रात्मक रूप से मापने के लिए मीट्रिक के एक सेट का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इन मैट्रिक्स का उपयोग करके हम एक लक्ष्य कॉर्पस के सापेक्ष विभिन्न पृष्ठभूमि कॉर्पोरेट को रैंक करते हैं। हम एफएसडी कार्य के लिए विभिन्न पृष्ठभूमि निगम के आधार पर मॉडल भी लागू करते हैं। हमारे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि शब्द वितरण समानता आम शब्दों के पैमाने की तुलना में अच्छे एफएसडी प्रदर्शन की अधिक भविष्यवाणी है; और, इस प्रकार हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि एक छोटा हालिया डोमेन-संबंधित कॉर्पस एफएसडी के लिए एक बहुत बड़े पैमाने पर सामान्य कॉर्पस की तुलना में अधिक उपयुक्त होगा।', 'ja': '第１の物語検出（ ＦＳ Ｄ ）のための現在の最先端の技術は、従来の用語ベクトル表現を有する最も近い近隣ベースのモデルである。しかしながら、ＦＳ Ｄモデルが直面する課題の１つは、文書表現が通常、バックグラウンドコーパスからの語彙及び用語頻度によって定義されることである。 したがって、理想的なバックグラウンドコーパスは、適切な用語カバレッジを確保するために大規模であり、言語分布の観点からターゲットドメインと同様であるべきである。 しかしながら、これら2つの要因が必ずしも相互に満たされるとは限らないことから、本稿では共通項の分布的類似性がFSDの共通項の規模よりも重要であるかどうかを検討する。 分析の基礎として、共通項の規模とコーパス間の分布の類似性を定量的に測定するための指標のセットを提案します。 これらの指標を使用して、ターゲットコーパスに対して異なる背景コーパスをランク付けします。 FSDタスクには、さまざまなバックグラウンドコーパスに基づくモデルも適用します。 我々の結果は、用語の分布の類似性が、一般的な用語のスケールよりもFSDの良好なパフォーマンスを予測することであることを示している。したがって、我々は、より小さな最近のドメイン関連コーパスが、非常に大規模な一般コーパスよりもFSDに適していることを実証する。', 'ga': 'Is samhlacha comharsan-bhunaithe is gaire iad an úrscothacht faoi láthair maidir le Brath Céad Scéal (FSD) le léirithe veicteoireach téarma traidisiúnta; Dúshlán amháin a bhíonn le sárú ag samhlacha FSD, áfach, ná go sainmhínítear an léiriú doiciméad de ghnáth ag an stór focal agus ag minicíocht na dtéarmaí ó chorpas cúlra. Dá bhrí sin, d’fhéadfaí a mhaíomh go mbeadh an corpas cúlra idéalach ar scála mór le clúdach leordhóthanach téarma a chinntiú, agus cosúil leis an spriocfhearann i dtéarmaí dáileadh na teanga. Mar sin féin, i bhfianaise an dá fhachtóir seo nach féidir a bheith sásta le chéile i gcónaí, sa pháipéar seo scrúdaímid an bhfuil cosúlacht dáilte na dtéarmaí coitianta níos tábhachtaí ná scála na dtéarmaí coitianta don FSD. Mar bhonn dár n-anailís molaimid tacar méadrachta chun scála na dtéarmaí comónta agus an chosúlacht dáileacháin idir corpora a thomhas go cainníochtúil. Agus na méadrachtaí seo á n-úsáid againn, déanaimid corpas cúlra éagsúil a rangú i gcoibhneas le spriocchorpas. Cuirimid i bhfeidhm freisin samhlacha atá bunaithe ar chorpora chúlra éagsúla don tasc FSD. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go bhfuil cosúlachtaí dáileacháin téarma níos tuar ar fheidhmíocht mhaith FSD ná ar scála na dtéarmaí coitianta; agus, mar sin léirímid go mbeidh corpas níos lú a bhaineann le fearann le déanaí níos oiriúnaí ná corpas ginearálta ar mhórscála don FSD.', 'hu': 'Az első történet detektálásának (FSD) jelenlegi korszerű állása a legközelebbi szomszéd alapú modellek, hagyományos kifejezések vektorábrázolásával; Az FSD modellek egyik kihívása azonban az, hogy a dokumentumok ábrázolását általában a háttérkorpusz szókincse és kifejezési gyakorisága határozza meg. Következésképpen az ideális háttérkorpusznak vitathatóan nagyszabásúnak kell lennie a megfelelő kifejezési lefedettség biztosítása érdekében, és hasonlónak kell lennie a céltartományhoz a nyelvi elosztás tekintetében. Mivel azonban e két tényezőt nem lehet mindig kölcsönösen kielégíteni, ebben a tanulmányban azt vizsgáljuk, hogy a közös kifejezések elosztási hasonlósága fontosabb-e, mint az FSD közös kifejezéseinek mértéke. Elemzésünk alapjaként olyan mérőszámokat javasolunk, amelyek mennyiségileg mérik a közös kifejezések skáláját és a corporák eloszlási hasonlóságát. Ezeket a mutatókat használva különböző háttérvizsgálatokat rangsorolunk egy célkorpuszhoz viszonyítva. Az FSD feladathoz különböző háttér corpora alapú modelleket is alkalmazunk. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a disztribúciós hasonlóság kifejezések sokkal előrejelzőbbek a jó FSD teljesítményre, mint a közös kifejezések skálája; Ezért bebizonyítjuk, hogy egy kisebb, közelmúltbeli tartományhoz kapcsolódó korpusz alkalmasabb lesz, mint egy nagyon nagyszabású általános korpusz az FSD-re.', 'el': 'Η τρέχουσα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας για την ανίχνευση πρώτης ιστορίας (FSD) είναι μοντέλα κοντινότερων γειτόνων με παραδοσιακές διανυσματικές αναπαραστάσεις όρων. Ωστόσο, μια πρόκληση που αντιμετωπίζουν τα μοντέλα είναι ότι η αναπαράσταση του εγγράφου ορίζεται συνήθως από το λεξιλόγιο και τη συχνότητα των όρων από ένα σώμα υποβάθρου. Κατά συνέπεια, το ιδανικό υπόβαθρο θα πρέπει αναμφίβολα να είναι τόσο μεγάλης κλίμακας για να εξασφαλιστεί επαρκής κάλυψη όρων, όσο και παρόμοιο με τον τομέα προορισμού όσον αφορά τη γλωσσική κατανομή. Ωστόσο, δεδομένου ότι οι δύο αυτοί παράγοντες δεν μπορούν πάντα να ικανοποιηθούν αμοιβαία, στην παρούσα εργασία εξετάζουμε αν η ομοιότητα κατανομής των κοινών όρων είναι πιο σημαντική από την κλίμακα των κοινών όρων για την FSD. Ως βάση για την ανάλυσή μας προτείνουμε ένα σύνολο μετρήσεων για την ποσοτική μέτρηση της κλίμακας των κοινών όρων και της κατανεμητικής ομοιότητας μεταξύ των σωμάτων. Χρησιμοποιώντας αυτές τις μετρήσεις ταξινομούμε διαφορετικά σώματα φόντου σε σχέση με ένα σώμα προορισμού. Εφαρμόζουμε επίσης μοντέλα βασισμένα σε διαφορετικά σώματα φόντου στην εργασία. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι η ομοιότητα κατανομής των όρων είναι πιο προβλέψιμη για την καλή απόδοση από την κλίμακα των κοινών όρων. Και έτσι αποδεικνύουμε ότι ένα μικρότερο πρόσφατο σώμα που σχετίζεται με τον τομέα θα είναι πιο κατάλληλο από ένα πολύ μεγάλης κλίμακας γενικό σώμα για την FSD.', 'ka': 'პირველი ისტორიის განსაკუთრებისთვის (FSD) მიმდინარე სურათის მდგომარეობა არის საკუთარი მზობელი მოდელები, რომლებიც ტრადიციონალური ტერმინული გვქტორის გამოსა მაგრამ ერთი გამოცდილება, რომლებიც FSD მოდელების განმავლობაში იქნება, რომ დოკუმენტის გამოსახულება უფრო განსახულებულია სიტყვალური და ტერმინის ფორკუმენტის ფორკუმე შემდეგ იდეალური ფონის კორპუსი უნდა იყოს ძალიან დიდი მაგალითი, რომ დაახლოებით საჭირო ტერმის კონფიგურაციას და სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა დონის გაყო მაგრამ, ამ ორი ფაქტორის შესაძლებელია ყოველთვის ერთადერთად დასრულებული, ჩვენ ამოცნობით, თუ განსაზღვრული სიმბოლოების განსხვავება უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, ვიდრე ერთადერთი სიმბოლოები როგორც ჩვენი ანალიზაციისთვის ბაზი, ჩვენ მინდომა მეტრიკის კონტაქტიურად განზომილება საერთო სიტყვების და განზომილებული სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადას ამ მეტრიკის გამოყენებას ჩვენ განსხვავებული ფონდონის კოპორაზე გადავიყენებთ მიზეზი კოპორაზე. ჩვენ ასევე განსხვავებული ფონდონის კოპორაზე მოდელების გამოყენება FSD დავალებისთვის. ჩვენი წარმოდგენების შემდეგ ჩვენი ტერმისტრიბუციალური განსხვავება უფრო წარმოდგენებელია FSD-ის გამოსახულებას, ვიდრე საერთო წარმოდგენების მა და ამიტომ ჩვენ მოვიდენსებთ, რომ ახლა კოპპუსი, რომელიც ახლა კოპუსი დაკავშირებულია, უფრო საჭირო იქნება, ვიდრე ძალიან დიდი განმავლობაში საერთ', 'kk': 'Бірінші оқиға табуының (FSD) орындағы суретінің күйі - әдетті термин вектордың түсініктемелері бар ең жақын қосымша негіздеген үлгілер. Бірақ FSD үлгілеріне қарсы бір жағдай - құжатты көрсету әдетте сөздер мен термин жиілігі аясының корпусынан анықталады. Сондықтан идеалдық аясының корпус, тіл үлестіріміне сәйкес келтірілген терминдерді қамтамасыз ету үшін үлкен масштабының екі масштабына ұқсас болу керек. Бірақ бұл екі факторлар әрқашан бір-біріне қатынауға болмайды, бұл қағазда біз бөлімдеу жалпы терминдердің ұқсастығының FSD үшін жалпы терминдердің масштабынан артық екенін тексереміз Анализациямыздың негізінде біз корпора арасындағы жалпы терминдердің масштабын және үлестіріміздің ұқсастығын санатты түрлендіру үшін метрикалық жиынын ұсынамыз. Бұл метрикаларды қолдану үшін біз басқа аясының корпорасын мақсатты корпорасына қатынасыз. Сонымен қатар, FSD тапсырмасына басқа аясының корпорасына негізделген үлгілерді қолдануға болады. Біздің нәтижелеріміз терминдің үлестіріміздің ұқсастығы жалпы терминдің масштабынан артық FSD әрекеттерінің ұқсастығын көрсетеді. Сонымен біз соңғы доменге қатынастырылған корпус FSD үшін үлкен масштабтағы жалпы корпус болады дегенді көрсетедік.', 'it': "Lo stato attuale dell'arte per la First Story Detection (FSD) sono modelli basati sui vicini più vicini con rappresentazioni vettoriali tradizionali; Tuttavia, una delle sfide affrontate dai modelli FSD è che la rappresentazione del documento è solitamente definita dal vocabolario e dalla frequenza dei termini da un corpus di sfondo. Di conseguenza, il corpus di base ideale dovrebbe essere sia su larga scala per garantire un'adeguata copertura dei termini, sia simile al dominio target in termini di distribuzione linguistica. Tuttavia, dato che questi due fattori non possono sempre essere soddisfatti reciprocamente, in questo articolo esaminiamo se la somiglianza distributiva dei termini comuni sia più importante della scala dei termini comuni per FSD. Come base per la nostra analisi proponiamo un insieme di metriche per misurare quantitativamente la scala dei termini comuni e la somiglianza distributiva tra corpora. Utilizzando queste metriche classifichiamo diversi corpi di sfondo rispetto a un corpo bersaglio. Applichiamo anche modelli basati su diversi corpi di sfondo al compito FSD. I nostri risultati mostrano che la somiglianza distributiva dei termini è più predittiva di buone prestazioni FSD rispetto alla scala dei termini comuni; e, quindi, dimostriamo che un corpus recente più piccolo relativo al dominio sarà più adatto di un corpus generale su larga scala per FSD.", 'lt': 'Dabartinė pirmosios istorijos aptikimo (FSD) pažanga yra artimiausių kaimyninių modelių su tradiciniais užkrečiamųjų medžiagų požymiais; tačiau vienas iššūkis, su kuriuo susiduria FSD modeliai, yra tas, kad dokumentų atstovavimas paprastai apibrėžiamas žodyno ir termino dažnumu iš foninio korpuso. Todėl idealus foninis korpusas turėtų būti didelis, siekiant užtikrinti tinkamą term in ų aprėptį, ir panašus į tikslinę sritį kalbų paskirstymo požiūriu. Tačiau atsižvelgiant į šiuos du veiksnius ne visada galima patenkinti vienas kitą, šiame dokumente nagrinėjame, ar bendrų terminų paskirstymo panašumas yra svarbesnis už bendrų FSD terminų mastą. Kaip pagrindas mūsų analizei mes siūlome kiekybiškai išmatuoti bendrų terminų skalę ir paskirstymo panašumą tarp korpora. Taikant šiuos rodiklius, klasifikuojame skirtingą foninę korporą, palyginti su tiksliniu korpusu. FSD užduotims taip pat taikome modelius, pagrįstus skirtingais foniniais korporais. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad termino paskirstymo panašumas yra labiau prognozuojamas dėl gerų FSD rezultatų nei bendrų terminų mastas; and, thus we demonstrate that a smaller recent domain-related corpus will be more suitable than a very large-scale general corpus for FSD.', 'mk': 'Сегашната техничка состојба за Детектирање на Првата Приказна (FSD) се најблиски соседски модели со традиционални представувања на вектори; Сепак, еден предизвик со кој се соочуваат моделите на ФСД е дека претставувањето на документот е обично дефинирано од речникот и фреквенцијата на терминот од корпусот на позадина. Consequently, the ideal background corpus should arguably be both large-scale to ensure adequate term coverage, and similar to the target domain in terms of the language distribution.  Сепак, со оглед на овие два фактори не можат секогаш да се задоволни меѓусебно, во овој документ ние испитуваме дали дистрибуционалната сличност на заедничките услови е поважна од скалата на заедничките услови за ФСД. Како основа за нашата анализа предложуваме множина метрики за квантитивно мерење на скалата на заедничките термини и дистрибуционалната сличност помеѓу корпората. Користејќи ги овие метрики, ги рангираме различните тела од позадина во однос на цел корпус. Ние, исто така, применуваме модели базирани на различни тела на позадина на задачата на ФСД. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека терминот дистрибуционална сличност е попредвидлива за добра фСД перформанса отколку за скалата на заеднички термини; и така демонстрираме дека помал неодамнешни корпус поврзан со доменот ќе биде посоодветен од многу голем генерален корпус за ФСД.', 'mt': 'L-aħħar avvanz attwali għad-Detezzjoni tal-Ewwel Story (FSD) huma l-eqreb mudelli bbażati fuq il-ġirien b’rappreżentazzjonijiet tradizzjonali ta’ vetturi; madankollu, sfida waħda ffaċċjata mill-mudelli FSD hija li r-rappreżentanza tad-dokument hija normalment definita mill-vokabulari u l-frekwenza tat-terminu minn korpus tal-isfond. Konsegwentement, il-korpus ta’ sfond ideali għandu jkun kemm fuq skala kbira biex jiżgura kopertura adegwata fit-terminu, kif ukoll simili għad-dominju fil-mira f’termini tad-distribuzzjoni tal-lingwi. Madankollu, minħabba dawn iż-żewġ fatturi ma jistgħux dejjem ikunu sodisfatti reċiprokament, f’dan id-dokument jeżaminaw jekk is-similarità distributtiva ta’ termini komuni hijiex aktar importanti mill-iskala ta’ termini komuni għall-FSD. Bħala bażi għall-analiżi tagħna nipproponu sett ta’ metriċi biex tkejjel kwantitattivament l-iskala tat-termini komuni u s-similarità distribuzzjonali bejn il-korpora. Bl-użu ta’ dawn il-metriċi nikklassifikaw korpra ta’ sfond differenti meta mqabbla ma’ korpus fil-mira. Aħna napplikaw ukoll mudelli bbażati fuq korpra ta’ sfond differenti għall-kompitu FSD. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li s-similarità tad-distribuzzjoni tat-terminu hija aktar prevedibbli ta’ prestazzjoni tajba tal-FSD mill-iskala ta’ termini komuni; u għalhekk nagħmlu xhieda li korpus reċenti iżgħar relatat mad-dominju se jkun aktar adattat minn korpus ġenerali fuq skala kbira ħafna għall-FSD.', 'ms': 'The current state of the art for First Story Detection (FSD) are nearest neighbour-based models with traditional term vector representations;  however, one challenge faced by FSD models is that the document representation is usually defined by the vocabulary and term frequency from a background corpus.  Oleh itu, korpus latar belakang ideal sepatutnya mungkin kedua-dua skala besar untuk memastikan penyamaran jangka yang sesuai, dan sama dengan domain sasaran dalam terma distribusi bahasa. Namun, mengingat dua faktor ini tidak boleh sentiasa puas sama lain, dalam kertas ini kita memeriksa sama ada persamaan distribusi terma umum lebih penting daripada skala terma umum untuk FSD. Sebagai dasar untuk analisis kami kami melamar set metrik untuk mengukur secara kuantitatif skala terma umum dan persamaan distribusi antara corpora. Menggunakan metrik ini kita mengikut rangkaian korpra latar belakang yang berbeza relatif kepada korpus sasaran. Kami juga melaksanakan model berdasarkan korpra latar belakang yang berbeza untuk tugas FSD. Hasil kita menunjukkan bahawa persamaan distribusi terma lebih ramalan prestasi FSD yang baik daripada skala terma umum; dan, demikian, kami menunjukkan bahawa korpus terkait dengan domain yang lebih kecil baru-baru ini akan lebih sesuai daripada korpus umum skala yang sangat besar untuk FSD.', 'ml': 'ആദ്യ സ്റ്റോറി ഡിറ്റിക്റ്റീവ്ഷന്\u200dറെ (എഫ്എസ്ഡി) ന്റെ ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d അടുത്ത അയല്\u200dക്കാരുടെ അടുത്തുള്ള മ എന്നാലും FSD മോഡലുകളുടെ മുന്നില്\u200d ഒരു വ്യാല്\u200dച്ചല്\u200d എന്താണെന്നാലും രേഖപ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് പദവിഷയത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും വാക്ക അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഭാഷയുടെ വിതരണ വ്യവസ്ഥയില്\u200d മതിയായ വാക്ക് കറയും ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ ഡൊമെയിനില്\u200d പോലെയും നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കാന്\u200d ആശയക്കാരുടെ പശ്ച എന്നാലും ഈ രണ്ടു കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d എപ്പോഴും പരസ്പരം തൃപ്തിപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d കഴിയില്ല, ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, സാധാരണ വാക്കുകളുട നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു കൂട്ടം മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. സാധാരണ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ  ഈ മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത പശ്ചാത്തല കോര്\u200dപ്പോരയില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത പശ്ചാത്തലപ്പെ We also apply models based on different background corpora to the FSD task.  നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു വാക്ക് വിതരണം തുല്യമാണെന്ന്. സാധാരണ വാക്കുകളുടെ തൂക്കത്തെക്കാള്\u200d നല്ല എഫ്എസ് അതുകൊണ്ട് നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, അടുത്തൊരു ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെക്കാള്\u200d വളരെ ചെറുതായ ഒരു ജനറല്\u200d ക', 'mn': 'Одоогийн үед анхны түүх тайлбарын урлагийн байр суурь (FSD) нь хөрш нутгийн хамгийн ойрхон загварууд нь уламжлалтай томъёоны вектор илэрхийлэлтэй байдаг. Гэхдээ FSD загварын тухай нэг сорилт бол баримтын үзүүлэлтийг хэд хэдий ч хэлбэрээр хэвлэгддэг үг болон хэлбэрээс илэрхийлэгддэг. Үүний дараа, идеал фон корпус нь хэл хуваарилалтын тухай зорилготой зорилготой хоёулаа том хэмжээтэй байх ёстой. Гэвч эдгээр хоёр хүчин зүйлсийг үргэлж нийгмийн хангалттай байж чадахгүй учир энэ цаасан дээр бид нийгмийн хуваарилалтын тэнцүү байдлыг FSD-ийн нийгмийн хэмжээс илүү чухал эсэхийг шалгаж байна. Бидний шинжилгээний суурь болон корпора хоорондын хуваарилалтын хэмжээг тооны хэмжээнд хэмжээтэй хэмжээний метрик хэмжээгээр санал болно. Эдгээр метрикийг ашиглан бид өөр хөрсөн корпора зорилготой корпус-тай харьцуулдаг. Мөн бид өөр фон корпора дээр FSD ажил дээр загварыг ашигладаг. Бидний үр дүнд хуваарилцааны төстэй тэнцүү гэдгийг харуулж байгаа нь FSD үйл ажиллагааны ерөнхий хэлбэрээс илүү сайн үйл ажиллагааны төсөөлөл байдал юм. Иймээс бид саяхан холбоотой жижиг корпус FSD-д маш том хэмжээний ерөнхий корпус илүү зөв байх болно.', 'no': 'Den gjeldande tilstanden til kunsten for første historie- oppdaging (FSD) er næraste nabebaserte modeller med tradisjonelle uttrykk- vektorrepresentasjonar. Ein utfordring med FSD-modeller er imidlertid at dokumentrepresentasjonen er vanlegvis definert av ordbokstaven og terminofrekvensen frå ein bakgrunnsfarge. Derfor bør ideelle bakgrunnsbrukkorpusen argumentert vera både stor for å sikre at det er tilgjengelege utgåva, og liknande med måldområdet i forhold til språkdevisningen. Men, given these two factors cannot always be mutually satisfied, in this paper we examine whether the distribution similarity of common terms is more important than the scale of common terms for FSD. Som grunnlag for analysen vårt, foreslår vi eit sett metrikar for kvantitativ mål skala på felles vilkår og den distribusjonelle liknande mellom korpora. Bruk desse metrikane rankerer vi forskjellige bakgrunnsbrukkorporar relativt til eit målkorpus. Vi bruker også modeller basert på forskjellige bakgrunnsfarge til FSD-oppgåva. Resultatet våre viser at uttrykket distribusjonelle liknande er meir foregåande av god FSD-uttrykk enn skala av vanlege uttrykk. Og derfor viser vi at ein mindre nyleg domenerelatert korpus vil vera meir passande enn ein veldig stor generell korpus for FSD.', 'pl': 'Aktualny stan techniki w zakresie wykrywania pierwszej historii (FSD) to modele oparte na najbliższych sąsiadach z tradycyjnymi reprezentacjami wektorowymi terminów; Jednym z wyzwań stojących przed modelami FSD jest to, że reprezentacja dokumentu jest zwykle definiowana przez słownictwo i częstotliwość terminów z korpusu tła. W związku z tym idealny korpus tła powinien być prawdopodobnie zarówno na dużą skalę, aby zapewnić odpowiedni zakres terminów, jak i pod względem dystrybucji językowej podobny do domeny docelowej. Biorąc jednak pod uwagę te dwa czynniki nie zawsze mogą być wzajemnie spełnione, w niniejszym artykule badamy, czy podobieństwo dystrybucyjne wspólnych terminów jest ważniejsze niż skala wspólnych terminów dla FSD. Jako podstawę naszej analizy proponujemy zestaw wskaźników do ilościowego mierzenia skali wspólnych terminów i podobieństwa dystrybucyjnego między korpusami. Korzystając z tych wskaźników rankingujemy różne korpusy tła w stosunku do korpusu docelowego. Do zadania FSD stosujemy również modele oparte na różnych korpusach tła. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że podobieństwo rozkładu terminów jest bardziej predykcyjne dobrej wydajności FSD niż skala wspólnych terminów; W ten sposób wykazujemy, że mniejszy ostatni korpus związany z domeną będzie bardziej odpowiedni niż bardzo duży korpus ogólny dla FSD.', 'ro': 'Starea actuală a tehnicii pentru detectarea primei povești (FSD) sunt cele mai apropiate modele bazate pe vecini cu reprezentări vectoriale tradiționale; Cu toate acestea, o provocare cu care se confruntă modelele FSD este că reprezentarea documentelor este de obicei definită de vocabularul și frecvența termenilor dintr-un corpus de fundal. În consecință, corpul ideal de fundal ar trebui, fără îndoială, să fie atât la scară largă pentru a asigura o acoperire adecvată a termenilor, cât și similar domeniului țintă în ceea ce privește distribuția lingvistică. Cu toate acestea, având în vedere că acești doi factori nu pot fi întotdeauna satisfăcuți reciproc, în această lucrare examinăm dacă similitudinea distribuțională a termenilor comuni este mai importantă decât scara termenilor comuni pentru FSD. Ca bază pentru analiza noastră propunem un set de metrici pentru a măsura cantitativ scara termenilor comuni și similaritatea distribuțională dintre corpore. Folosind aceste măsurători, clasificăm diferite corpuri de fundal în raport cu corpul țintă. De asemenea, aplicăm modele bazate pe corpuri de fundal diferite la sarcina FSD. Rezultatele noastre arată că similaritatea distribuțională a termenilor este mai predictivă a performanțelor FSD bune decât scara termenilor obișnuiți; și, astfel, demonstrăm că un corpus recent mai mic legat de domenii va fi mai potrivit decât un corpus general la scară foarte mare pentru FSD.', 'sr': 'Trenutno stanje umetnosti za otkrivanje prve priče (FSD) su najbliži modeli na susjedstvu sa tradicionalnim terminovim predstavljanjem vektora; Međutim, jedan izazov sa kojim se suočavaju modeli FSD-a je da predstavljanje dokumenta obično definiše rečnik i terminalna frekvencija iz pozadinskog korpusa. Stoga bi idealni korpus pozadine trebalo da bude velika skala kako bi osigurao odgovarajući terminski pokrivač i sličan ciljnom domenu u smislu distribucije jezika. Međutim, s obzirom na te dve faktore ne mogu uvek biti zajednički zadovoljni, u ovom papiru ispitujemo da li je distribucijska sličnost zajedničkih uslova važnija od skale zajedničkih uslova za FSD. Kao osnovu naše analize predlažemo gomilu metrika da kvantitativno mjerimo skalu zajedničkih uslova i distribucijske sličnosti između korpore. Koristeći ove metrike, postavljamo različite pozadinske korporacije u odnosu na metnu korporaciju. Takođe primjenjujemo modele na temelju različitih korporacija pozadine na zadatak FSD-a. Naši rezultati pokazuju da je izraz distribucijske sličnosti predvidljiviji od dobrog izvođenja FSD-a nego skala zajedničkih uslova; I tako pokazujemo da će manji korpus povezan s domenom biti prikladniji od veoma velike generalne korpuse za FSD.', 'si': 'මුලින් කතාව හොයාගන්න (FSD) වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිද්\u200dයාත්මක වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිද්\u200dයාත්මක විදියට නමුත්, FSD මොඩල් එකෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ලිපින්තුර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම භාෂාවාද සහ පසු ඉතින්, අදහස් පසුබිම කොර්පස් දෙන්නම් ලොකු ස්කල් වෙන්න ඕනේ විශාල විශාල විශාල කරගන්න, සහ භාෂාව විතරය සඳහා ලක් නමුත්, මේ විශේෂ දෙකක් හැමවෙලේම සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න බෑ, අපි පරීක්ෂා කරන්නේ මේ පැත්තේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ ක්\u200dරමයක් FSD සඳහා සාමාන අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය විදිහට අධාර්\u200dයය විදිහට අපි මෙට්\u200dරික් සීමාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කොර්පෝරා අතර ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ විදිහට මේ මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් එක පාවිච්චි කරන්න අපි වෙනස් පිටිපස්සේ කොර්පෝරා එක්ක ඉලක්ක කොර්පුස් එක් අපි වෙනස් පිටිපස්සේ කොර්පෝරාවට අධාරිත විදිහට පස්සේ කොර්පෝරාවට අනුවෙන් මොඩේල් අ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ කියලා වර්තනය විතරයි වර්තනය සමාන වර්තනය වඩා හොඳ FSD ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ගැන හොඳ ඒ වගේම අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අලුත් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පොඩි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් FSD වෙනුවෙන් ලොකු සාමාන්\u200dය කොර්පුස්', 'so': 'Xiliga farshaxanka ee ugu horraysa qiimeynta hore (FSD) waa qaabab u dhow deriska ah oo ku qoran qaab qaabilsan oo ku qoran karo qoraal ah; Si kastaba ha ahaatee, mid qalabka FSD ka hor jeeda waa in xuquuqda dukumentiga sida caadiga ah waxaa lagu qeybeeyaa hadalka iyo frequencada luqada ah oo ka soo baxa korpuska gadaasha. Sababtaas darteed waxaa haboon in qofka asalka ah uu ahaado mid aad u weyn si uu u xaqiijiyo daboolka xilliga ku filan iyo sidoo kale goobaha la jeedo oo ku saabsan qaybinta luqada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, haddii labadaas waxyaabood ay marwalba ku dhergi waayaan, warqadan ayaannu ka baaraynaa in qaybinta isku qiimaha ah ay ka muhiimsan yihiin qaybaha guud ee FSD. Analyadeenna waxaan u soo jeedaynaa in koox metrito ah si qiyaasta loo qiyaaso heerka caadiga ah iyo qaybinta isku mid ah ee shirkadaha u dhexeeya. Isku isticmaalka metriciyadan waxaan kala duwan nahay shirkado bakhtiga ah oo la xiriira korpuska goalka ah. Sidoo kale waxaynu sameynaa samooyin ku saleysan shirkad asagoon kala duduwan ee FSD. Abaalkayaga waxaa tusinaya in si siman u qaybsashada xiliga ah waa wax ka sii sheegi kara sameynta wanaagga FSD oo ka mid ah qiyaastii sharciga caadiga ah; and, thus we demonstrate that a smaller recent domain-related corpus will be more suitable than a very large-scale general corpus for FSD.', 'sv': 'Det aktuella läget för First Story Detection (FSD) är närmaste grannbaserade modeller med traditionella termvektorrepresentationer. En utmaning för FSD-modeller är dock att dokumentrepresentationen vanligtvis definieras av ordförråd och termfrekvens från en bakgrundskorpus. Följaktligen bör den idealiska bakgrundskorpussen vara både storskalig för att säkerställa tillräcklig termtäckning och liknande måldomänen när det gäller språkdistribution. Med tanke på att dessa två faktorer inte alltid kan tillfredsställas ömsesidigt undersöker vi i denna uppsats om fördelningen av gemensamma termer är viktigare än storleken på gemensamma termer för FSD. Som grund för vår analys föreslår vi en uppsättning mätvärden för att kvantitativt mäta skalan av gemensamma termer och fördelningen av likheter mellan korpor. Med hjälp av dessa mätvärden rangordnar vi olika bakgrundskorpor i förhållande till en målkorpus. Vi tillämpar även modeller baserade på olika bakgrundskorpor till FSD-uppgiften. Våra resultat visar att termfördelningsmässig likhet är mer prediktiv för god FSD-prestanda än skalan av vanliga termer; och därmed visar vi att en mindre ny domänrelaterad korpus kommer att vara lämpligare än en mycket storskalig allmän korpus för FSD.', 'ta': 'முதல் கதை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான தற்போதைய கலைப்பு நிலை எப்படியும், FSD மாதிரிகள் முகம் ஒரு சவால் என்னவென்றால் ஆவணத்தின் குறிப்பு வழக்கமாக சொல்வளத்தின் மற்றும் வார்த்தை சரத்தை பின ஆகையால், யோசனையான பின்னணி குறியீடு இருவரும் பெரிய அளவாக இருக்க வேண்டும் பொருத்தமான வார்த்தை மற்றும் மொழி பங்கீட்டில் இலக்கு க However, given these two factors cannot always be mutually satisfied, in this paper we examine whether the distributional similarity of common terms is more important than the scale of common terms for FSD.  எங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு அடிப்படையாக நாம் ஒரு கூட்டு மீட்ரிக்களை அளவிற்கு முன்நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம் பொது வார்த்தைகளின் அளவை மற் இந்த மெட்ரிக்களைப் பயன்படுத்தி நாம் வேறு பின்னணி நிறுவனத்தை கொண்டு இலக்கு கோர்பாஸ் சார்ந்தது. நாம் வேறு பின்னணி நிறுவனத்தை FSD பணிக்கு அடிப்படையாக மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். முடிவு இப்படியே நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் ஒரு சமீபத்தில் களம் தொடர்புடைய கோர்ப்புஸ் FSD க்கு ஒரு மிகவும் பெரிய அளவு பொது கோர்புஸ் விட ச', 'ur': 'The current state of the art for First Story Detection (FSD) is the nearest neighbor-based models with traditional term vector representations; لیکن ایک چال جو FSD موڈل کے سامنے مواجہ ہوتی ہے یہ ہے کہ دفتر کی نمایش معمولاً ایک پچھلی کورپوس سے لکھی جاتی ہے اور کلمات کی فرکانس سے تعریف کی جاتی ہے. لہٰذا، ایڈیل بنیادی کورپوس دونوں بڑی اسکیل ہونا چاہیے کہ ان کے لئے مناسب ترمیم کورپور کی اطمینان کرے، اور زبان تقسیم کے مطابق موجود ڈومین کے مطابق موجود ہونا چاہیے۔ However, given these two factors cannot always be mutually satisfied, in this paper we examine whether the distribution of common terms similarity is more important than the scale of common terms for FSD. ہمارے تحلیل کے لئے بنیاد ہے کہ ہم ایک مجموعہ متریک کی مقدار کے مطابق مشترک شرایط اور تقسیم کے مطابق قانون کے درمیان مطابق اندازے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. یہ متریک استعمال کرتے ہیں ہم مختلف پشتیبانی کورپورا کو ایک موجود کورپوس کے مقابلہ میں درجہ دیتے ہیں. ہم نے بھی مدلکوں کو FSD کے کام پر متفاوت بنیاد رکھا ہے۔ ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ مقررہ تقسیم کی مثال اچھی فائدہ کی عمدگی کے مطابق مشترک ترمیم سے زیادہ پیش بینی ہے۔ اور اسی طرح ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک چھوٹا دامین رابطہ دار کورپوس FSD کے لئے بہت بڑے مقدار عمومی کورپوس سے زیادہ مناسب ہوگا۔', 'uz': "Birinchi tarixi aniqlash (FSD) sananing joriy holati esa oddiy vaqt vektor representlari bilan murakkab asosiy modellari; Шундай қилиб, FSD modellari томонидан bir challeng, hujjatning representi oddiy so'zlar va soʻzning frequenci orqa fon corpusdan aniqlanadi. Consequently, the ideal background corpus should arguably be both large-scale to ensure adequate term coverage, and similar to the target domain in terms of the language distribution.  Shunday qilib, bu ikkita factori hamisha bir necha murakkab bo'lmaydi, bu hujjatda biz bir necha darajada o'zgarishni o'rganamiz FSD'ning umumiy darajadagi darajadan ham muhim. Analysimizning asosida, biz bir necha metriklarni ko'paytirishni tasavvur qilamiz, bu kompaniya orasidagi ko'paytirishni ko'paytirish uchun. Ushbu metriklardan foydalanishda biz shaxsiy korpusning boshqa orqa fon kompaniyasini o'rganamiz. Biz boshqa orqa fon kompaniyasi asosida modellarni FSD vazifasiga qoʻllamiz. Bizning natijalarimiz bir xil tarqatish soʻzni bir necha bog'liq soʻzlardan yaxshi bajarish bajarishini ko'rsatadi. Va shunday qilamiz, biz yaqin domen bilan bog'liq kompyuter FSD uchun juda katta umumiy korpusdan juda qulay bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Hiện thời trạng nghệ thuật phát hiện Việc Điều tra First Story (FSP) là các mô hình láng giềng gần nhất với các biểu tượng vector truyền thống. Tuy nhiên, một thử thách đối mặt với các mô hình của FSB là sự đại diện tài liệu thường được xác định bằng ngôn ngữ và tần số từ một tập thể nền. Do đó, cơ sở lý tưởng của tập đoàn nên được cả trên quy mô lớn để đảm bảo một trường hợp lâu dài thích hợp và tương tự với lĩnh vực đích trong việc phân phối ngôn ngữ. Tuy nhiên, vì hai nhân tố này không thể luôn thoả mãn lẫn nhau, trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi xem xét liệu sự giống nhau phân phát của các thuật ngữ chung quan trọng hơn quy mô của các thuật ngữ chung về FSB. Để làm căn cứ cho phân tích của chúng ta, chúng ta đề xuất một hệ thống đo lường để đo mức lượng của các điều khoản chung và sự giống nhau phân phát giữa cơ thể. Sử dụng âm lượng này, chúng ta phân loại bằng hạ sĩ quan khác nhau. Chúng tôi cũng áp dụng các mẫu dựa trên cơ thể nền khác nhau trong nhiệm vụ FSB. Kết quả cho thấy rằng khả năng phân phát của thuật ngữ có khả năng dự đoán khả năng tốt hơn so với mức độ của các thuật ngữ chung. và, bằng cách đó, chúng tôi chứng minh rằng một tập thể nhỏ hơn thuộc loại miền gần đây sẽ phù hợp hơn một tập thể toàn diện lớn cho FSB.', 'da': 'Den aktuelle state of te art for First Story Detection (FSD) er nærmeste nabobaserede modeller med traditionelle termvektorrepræsentationer; Men en udfordring for FSD-modeller er, at dokumentrepræsentationen normalt defineres af ordforrådet og termhyppigheden fra et baggrundskorpus. Det ideelle baggrundskorpus bør derfor uden tvivl være både omfattende for at sikre tilstrækkelig termdækning og ligne måldomænet med hensyn til sprogfordelingen. Men da disse to faktorer ikke altid kan tilfredsstilles gensidigt, undersøger vi i denne artikel, om den fordelingsmæssige lighed mellem fælles udtryk er vigtigere end omfanget af fælles udtryk for FSD. Som grundlag for vores analyse foreslår vi et sæt metrics til kvantitativt at måle omfanget af almindelige termer og den fordelingsmæssige lighed mellem corpora. Ved hjælp af disse metrics rangerer vi forskellige baggrundskorpuser i forhold til et målkorpus. Vi anvender også modeller baseret på forskellige baggrundskorpora til FSD-opgaven. Vores resultater viser, at termernes distributionsmæssige lighed er mere forudsigende for god FSD-ydeevne end omfanget af almindelige termer; og dermed viser vi, at et mindre nyligt domænerelateret korpus vil være mere egnet end et meget stort generelt korpus til FSD.', 'bg': 'Настоящото състояние на изкуството за откриване на първи разказ (ФСД) са най-близките съседски модели с традиционни векторни изображения на наименованията; Въпреки това, едно от предизвикателствата пред моделите на ФСД е, че представянето на документа обикновено се определя от речника и честотата на термините от фонов корпус. Следователно идеалният фонов корпус би трябвало да бъде както широкомащабен, за да се осигури адекватно покритие на срока, така и подобен на целевия домейн по отношение на езиковото разпределение. Въпреки това, предвид тези два фактора не винаги могат да бъдат взаимно удовлетворени, в настоящата статия разглеждаме дали разпределителната прилика на общите термини е по-важна от мащаба на общите термини за ФСД. Като основа за нашия анализ предлагаме набор от показатели за количествено измерване на мащаба на общите термини и разпределителната прилика между корпусите. Използвайки тези показатели ние класираме различни фонови корпуси спрямо целевия корпус. Също така прилагаме модели, базирани на различни фонови корпуси към задачата на ФСД. Нашите резултати показват, че терминът разпределителна прилика е по-предсказуем за доброто представяне на ФСД, отколкото скалата на общите термини; и по този начин демонстрираме, че по-малък скорошен корпус, свързан с домейна, ще бъде по-подходящ от много мащабен общ корпус за ФСД.', 'hr': 'Trenutno stanje umjetnosti za pronalaženje prve priče (FSD) su najbliži modeli na susjedstvu s tradicionalnim terminovim predstavljanjem vektora; Međutim, jedan izazov s kojim se suočavaju modeli FSD-a je da se predstavljanje dokumenta obično definira riječnik i terminalna frekvencija iz pozadinskog korpusa. Stoga, idealni korpus pozadine mora biti obje velike mjere kako bi osigurao odgovarajući terminski pokrivač i sličan ciljnom domenu u smislu distribucije jezika. Međutim, s obzirom na te dvije faktore ne mogu uvijek biti zajednički zadovoljni, u ovom papiru pregledavamo je li distribucijska sličnost zajedničkih uvjeta važnija od skale zajedničkih uvjeta za FSD. Kao osnovu naše analize predlažemo gomilu metrika da kvantitativno mjere skalu zajedničkih uvjeta i distribucijske sličnosti između tijela. Koristeći ove metrike, postavljamo različite pozadinske korporacije u odnosu na metnu korporaciju. Također primjenjujemo modele na temelju različitih pozadinskih korporacija na zadatak FSD-a. Naši rezultati pokazuju da je izraz distribucijskog sličnosti predvidljiviji od dobrih činjenica FSD-a nego mjera zajedničkih uvjeta; Dakle, pokazujemo da će manji korpus povezan s domenom biti prikladniji od veoma velike generalne korpuse za FSD.', 'nl': "De huidige stand van de techniek voor First Story Detection (FSD) zijn dichtstbijzijnde buurmodellen met traditionele termvectorrepresentaties; Een uitdaging voor FSD-modellen is echter dat de documentweergave meestal wordt gedefinieerd door de woordenschat en termfrequentie van een achtergrondcorpus. Bijgevolg zou het ideale achtergrondcorpus zowel grootschalig moeten zijn om een adequate termdekking te garanderen als qua taaldistributie vergelijkbaar met het doeldomein. Aangezien deze twee factoren echter niet altijd onderling kunnen worden bevredigd, onderzoeken we in dit artikel of de distributiegelijkenis van gemeenschappelijke termen belangrijker is dan de schaal van gemeenschappelijke termen voor FSD. Als basis voor onze analyse stellen we een reeks metrics voor om kwantitatief de schaal van algemene termen en de distributiegelijkenis tussen corpora's te meten. Met behulp van deze statistieken rangschikken we verschillende achtergrondcorpora ten opzichte van een doelcorpus. We passen ook modellen toe op basis van verschillende achtergrondcorpora's op de FSD-taak. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat term distributional similarity voorspeller is voor goede FSD prestaties dan de schaal van gemeenschappelijke termen; Zo laten we zien dat een kleiner recent domein gerelateerd corpus geschikter is dan een zeer grootschalig algemeen corpus voor FSD.", 'id': 'Kecanggihan saat ini untuk Deteksi Kisah Pertama (FSD) adalah model tetangga terdekat dengan wakil vektor tradisional; namun, satu tantangan yang dihadapi oleh model FSD adalah bahwa representation dokumen biasanya didefinisikan oleh vokabular dan frekuensi istilah dari korpus latar belakang. Oleh karena itu, korpus latar belakang ideal seharusnya berdua skala besar untuk memastikan penyamaran istilah yang cukup, dan mirip dengan domain target dalam terma distribusi bahasa. Namun, mengingat dua faktor ini tidak selalu puas satu sama lain, dalam kertas ini kami memeriksa apakah persamaan distribusi dari istilah umum lebih penting daripada skala istilah umum untuk FSD. Sebagai dasar untuk analisis kami kami mengusulkan set metrik untuk mengukur kuantitatif skala istilah umum dan perbedaan distribusi antara corpora. Menggunakan metrik ini kita mempertimbangkan korpra latar belakang yang berbeda dengan korpus sasaran. Kami juga menerapkan model berdasarkan korpra latar belakang yang berbeda untuk tugas FSD. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa istilah distribusi similaritas lebih prediksif prestasi FSD yang baik daripada skala istilah umum; dan, sehingga kita menunjukkan bahwa korpus terkait dengan domain baru-baru ini lebih cocok daripada korpus umum yang sangat besar untuk FSD.', 'ko': 'Tier 1 체크(FSD)의 최신 기술은 가장 가까운 이웃 모델을 기반으로 하는 것으로 전통적인 용어인 벡터 표현이 있습니다.그러나 FSD 모델이 직면한 도전은 문서 표현이 일반적으로 배경 자료 라이브러리의 어휘와 용어 주파수에 의해 정의된다는 것이다.따라서 이상적인 배경 자료 라이브러리는 대규모로 충분한 용어 범위를 확보하고 언어 분포에 있어 목표 분야와 비슷해야 한다.그러나 이 두 가지 요소가 항상 서로 만족하지 않는 것을 감안하여 본고에서 우리는 공공항의 분포 유사성이 FSD의 공공항 규모보다 더 중요한지 연구했다.우리가 분석한 기초로 우리는 상용 용어의 규모와 어료 라이브러리 간의 분포 유사성을 측정하는 데 사용되는 도량 기준을 제시했다.이러한 지표를 사용하면 우리는 서로 다른 배경 자료 라이브러리를 목표 자료 라이브러리에 비해 정렬할 것이다.또한 FSD 작업에 다양한 배경 자료 라이브러리 모델을 적용합니다.결과적으로 용어 분포 유사성은 일반 용어의 규모보다 양호한 FSD 성능을 예측할 수 있다.따라서 우리는 비교적 작은 최근 분야의 관련 자료 라이브러리가 매우 대규모의 FSD 통용 자료 라이브러리보다 더 적합하다는 것을 증명했다.', 'fa': 'موقعیت فعلی هنر برای شناسایی اولین داستان (FSD) نزدیکترین مدل\u200cهای بنیاد همسایه با نمایش\u200cهای ویکتور سنتی است. با این حال، یک چالش با مدل\u200cهای FSD روبرو می\u200cشوند این است که نمایش سند معمولاً توسط فرکانس کلمات و ترمیم از یک کورپوس پشتیبانی تعریف می\u200cشود. بنابراین، شرکت پشتیبانی ایده باید به طور توضیح هر دو مقدار بزرگ باشد تا از محافظت کردن کلمه\u200cهای مناسب و شبیه به دامنه هدف در مورد توزیع زبان باشد. با این وجود، با وجود این دو عوامل همیشه نمی\u200cتوانند با هم راضی شوند، در این کاغذ ما تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که آیا شباهت تقسیم شرایط معمولی مهمتر از مقیاس شرایط معمولی برای FSD است. به عنوان بنیادی برای تحلیل ما یک مجموعه متریک را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا مقیاس شرایط مشترک و شباهت تقسیم بین شرایط مقیاس کنیم. با استفاده از این متریک، ما شرکت پشتیبانی متفاوت را نسبت به یک کورپوس هدف قرار می دهیم. ما همچنین مدل\u200cها را بر اساس شرکت پشتیبانی متفاوت برای کار FSD استفاده می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که شبیه توزیع\u200cکننده\u200cای از عملکرد FSD خوب بیشتر از مقیاس شرایط معمولی است. و به همین دلیل نشان می دهیم که یک کورپوس کوچکتر رابطه به دامنه اخیر از یک کورپوس ژنرال بسیار بزرگ برای FSD مناسب تر خواهد بود.', 'sw': 'Hali ya sasa ya sanaa kwa ajili ya Kuchunguza Simulizi ya Kwanza (FSD) ni mifano ya karibu ya jirani yenye uwakilishi wa muhula wa kitamaduni; Hata hivyo, changamoto moja linalokabiliwa na modeli za FSD ni kwamba uwakilishi wa nyaraka mara nyingi huelezwa na kiwango cha lugha na muhula kutoka kwenye makampuni ya nyuma. Kwa hiyo, makampuni ya kiitikadi yanapaswa kuwa kiasi kikubwa ili kuhakikisha habari za muhula wa kutosha, na yanayofanana na maeneo yanayofanana na lengo kwa ajili ya usambazaji wa lugha. Hata hivyo, kwa sababu hizi mbili hazijaweza kuvutiwa, katika karatasi hii tunachunguza kama usambazaji wa vipengele vya kawaida ni muhimu zaidi ya kiwango cha vipengele vya kawaida kwa FSD. Kama msingi wa uchambuzi wetu tunapendekeza mfululizo wa metiria kwa kiasi cha kupima kiwango cha matumizi ya kawaida na usawa wa usambazaji kati ya makampuni. Using these metrics we rank different background corpora relative to a target corpus.  Pia tunatumia mifano kwa kutumia kampuni tofauti ya background kwa kazi ya FSD. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa usambazaji wa term ni utabiri wa utendaji mzuri wa FSD kuliko kiwango cha vipengele vya kawaida; na kwa hiyo tunaonyesha kuwa makampuni madogo yanayohusiana na ndani ya hivi karibuni yatakuwa sahihi zaidi ya makampuni makubwa kwa ajili ya FSD.', 'af': "Die huidige staat van die kuns vir Eerste Gestorie Opdekking (FSD) is nabiese naby-gebaseerde modele met tradisionele term vektor voorstellings; en maar een uitdrukking wat deur FSD-modeller aangesig is is dat die dokument-voorstelling gewoonlik gedefinieer word deur die woordeboek en term frekwensie van 'n agtergrond korpus. Daarom moet die ideale agtergrond korpus argumente wees beide groot-skaal om adequate term omdekking te verseker, en gelyk aan die doel domein in terms van die taal verspreiding. Maar gegee hierdie twee faktore kan altyd gemeenskaplik versadig word nie, in hierdie papier ondersoek ons of die verspreidingsgelykenis van gemeenskaplike terme meer belangrik is as die skaal van gemeenskaplike terme vir FSD. As 'n basis vir ons analisie voorstel ons 'n stel metrike om kvantitatiewe die skaal van gemeenskaplike bedrywe en die verspreiding gelykenis tussen korpora te maak. Die gebruik van hierdie metries rank ons verskillende agtergrond korpora relatief tot 'n doel korporus. Ons het ook model gebaseer op verskillende agtergrond korpora na die FSD taak. Ons resultate wys dat term verspreiding gelykenis is meer voorskoubaar van goeie FSD-prestasie as die skaal van gemeenskaplike bedrywe; en daarom wys ons dat 'n kleiner onlangse domein-verwante korpus meer geskikbaar sal wees as 'n baie groot-skaal algemene korpus vir FSD.", 'sq': 'Gjendja aktuale e teknologjisë për zbulimin e historisë së parë (FSD) janë modelet më të afërt me bazë fqinjë me përfaqësime tradicionale të vektorit; megjithatë, një sfidë me të cilën përballen modelet FSD është se përfaqësimi i dokumentit zakonisht përcaktohet nga fjalori dhe frekuenca termore nga një korpus sfond. Për shkak të kësaj, korpusi ideal i sfondit duhet të jetë me siguri në shkallë të madhe për të siguruar mbulim të përshtatshëm afatit dhe të ngjashëm me domenin objektiv lidhur me shpërndarjen e gjuhës. Megjithatë, duke marrë parasysh këto dy faktorë nuk mund të jenë gjithmonë të kënaqur reciprokisht, në këtë letër ne shqyrtojmë nëse ngjashmëria shpërndarëse e kushteve të përbashkëta është më e rëndësishme se shkalla e kushteve të përbashkëta për FSD. Si bazë për analizën tonë ne propozojmë një sërë metrike për të matur në mënyrë kuantitative shkallën e termave të përbashkëta dhe ngjashmërinë shpërndarëse midis corporës. Duke përdorur këto metrika ne renditet korpra të ndryshme të sfondit në krahasim me një korpus objektiv. We also apply models based on different background corpora to the FSD task.  Rezultatet tona tregojnë se ngjashmëria e termit shpërndarës është më parashikuese e performancës së mirë FSD sesa shkalla e termave të përbashkëta; dhe kështu ne demonstrojmë se një korpus më i vogël i fundit lidhur me domenën do të jetë më i përshtatshëm se një korpus i përgjithshëm në shkallë shumë të madhe për FSD.', 'tr': 'The current state of the art for First Story Detection (FSD) is the nearest neighbor-based models with traditional term vector representations; this is the current state of the art for First Story Detection (FSD) that is near-based models with traditional term vector representations; and Ýöne FSD nusgalarynyň üstüne gelen bir kynçylyk şol senediň üýtgetmesi adatça bir sözlük we arkada korpusyň süren bilen tanalýar. Şol sebäpli, ideal arkaplan korpus ikisi de ýeterli terjime üýtgetmek üçin uly ölçüde bolmaly däl, we dil daýlamagyna meňzeş domena meňzeş bolmaly. Ýöne bu iki faktör hemişe bir-birimizden hoşal bolup bilmeýär, we bu kagyzda bölüm şartlaryň meňzeşlikleriniň FSD-iň orta şartlaryň ölçekinden has möhümdigini çözýäris. Analizimiz için bir temel olarak, korpora arasındaki ortak şartlar ve dağıtım benzerini sayısal ölçüde metrik takımını öneririz. Bu metrikleri kullanarak farklı arkaplan korporasyna eşit bir maksime bağlı bir şekilde düzenliyoruz. Biz hem farklı arkaplan korporasyna FSD işine daýanýan nusgalary uygulapdyk. Biziň netijelerimiz üýtgetmeli termynyň meňzeşlikleriniň FSD ukyplarynyň umumy şertleriň ölçekinden has gowy ukyplarynyň öňünden has öňünden aýdyşyny görkezýär; Şol sebäpli biz iň azyndan hem domena baglanylan korpus FSD üçin örän uly ölçekli korpusdan has gowurak bolar.', 'am': 'The current state of the art for First Story Detection (FSD) are nearest neighbour-based models with traditional term vector representations;  ምንም እንኳን፣ FSD ሞዴል የሚቀበል አንዲት የድምፅ መልዕክት፣ የሰነዱ መልዕክት በአሁኑ ጊዜ በአልባዊ እና በቋንቋ ቁጥጥር ከጀርባ ካርፓስ የተዘጋጀ ነው፡፡ ስለዚህም የመደቡን አካባቢ ኮርፓስ በቋንቋው ክፍተት እና በቋንቋው ክፍተት የሚመስል የአካባቢው ክፍል ደግሞ ትልቅ ክፍል ሊሆን ይገባዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ እነዚህን ሁለት ውጤቶች ሁልጊዜ እርስ በርሳቸው ደስ አይለውም፣ በዚህ ገጽ የሁኔታዊ ግንኙነት ከFSD ትክክል ትክክል ይልቅ ትልቅ እንደሆነ እናውቃለን፡፡ በትምህርታችን መሠረት የኮርፖርት መካከለኛውን ትክክል እና ትክክል በሚያካክል ሚትሪቶችን ለመለካት እናስፈቅዳለን፡፡ እነዚህን ማተሚያዎች በመጠቀም የተለየ የኮርፓስ ኮርፖር የተለየን የመደቡን ኮርፖር እናደርጋለን፡፡ የመደቡን ኮርፖርት በተለየ የFSD ስራ ላይ እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን የሥርዓት ትክክል እንደሚመስል የFSD ውጤት ከመጠቀም ትክክለኛ ክፍል የበለጠ ነው፡፡ ስለዚህም አነስተኛይቱ የዶሜን አካባቢ አካባቢ ለFSD በጣም ትልቅ የኮርፓስ ትልቅ ሆኖ ይሻላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Առաջին պատմությունը հայտնաբերելու (ՖՍԴ) ներկայիս լավագույն տերմինները ամենամոտ հարևաններով հիմնված մոդելներ են, որոնք ունեն ավանդական տերմինային վեկտորների ներկայացումներ: այնուամենայնիվ, մի մարտահրավեր, որին հանդիպում են ՖՍԴ մոդելները, այն է, որ փաստաթղթի ներկայացումը սովորաբար սահմանվում է բառարանի և տերմինի հաճախականության կողմից: Հետևաբար, իդեալական ետնային կորպուսը, հավանաբար, պետք է լինի և մեծ մասշտաբ, որպեսզի ապահովեն բավարար տերմինային ծածկում, և նման է նպատակային բնագավառին լեզվի տարածման առումով: Այնուամենայնիվ, հաշվի առնելով այս երկու գործոնները միշտ չեն կարող բավարարվել միմյանց հետ, այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, արդյոք ընդհանուր տերմինների բաշխման նմանությունը ավելի կարևոր է, քան ընդհանուր տերմինների սանդղակը: Որպես հիմք մեր վերլուծության համար մենք առաջարկում ենք մի շարք մետրիկներ, որպեսզի քանակությամբ չափենք ընդհանուր տերմինների քանակը և մարմնի միջև տարածման նմանությունը: Օգտագործելով այս մետրիկները մենք դասակարգում ենք տարբեր ֆոնային մարմնի համեմատած նպատակի մարմնի: Մենք նաև կիրառում ենք տարբեր ֆոնդի կորպորանների հիմնված մոդելներ ՖՍԴ-ի հանձնարարության համար: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ տերմինը բաշխման նմանությունը ավելի կանխատեսելի է լավ ՖՍԴ-ի արդյունքների, քան ընդհանուր տերմինների սանդղակը: և այսպես մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ վերջերս ավելի փոքր բնագավառներով կապված կորպուսը ավելի համապատասխան կլինի քան շատ մեծ գլխավոր կորպուսը ՖՍԴ-ի համար:', 'de': 'Der aktuelle Stand der Technik für First Story Detection (FSD) sind nearest neighbor-basierte Modelle mit traditionellen Termvektordarstellungen; Eine Herausforderung für FSD-Modelle besteht jedoch darin, dass die Dokumentdarstellung in der Regel durch das Vokabular und die Termfrequenz eines Hintergrundkorpus definiert wird. Daher sollte der ideale Hintergrundkorpus sowohl großflächig sein, um eine ausreichende Termabdeckung zu gewährleisten, als auch hinsichtlich der Sprachverteilung dem Zielbereich ähnlich sein. Da diese beiden Faktoren jedoch nicht immer gegenseitig befriedigt werden können, untersuchen wir in diesem Beitrag, ob die Verteilungsähnlichkeit gemeinsamer Begriffe wichtiger ist als die Skala gemeinsamer Begriffe für FSD. Als Grundlage für unsere Analyse schlagen wir eine Reihe von Metriken vor, um die Skala gängiger Begriffe und die Verteilungsähnlichkeit zwischen Korpora quantitativ zu messen. Anhand dieser Metriken ranken wir verschiedene Hintergrundkorpora relativ zu einem Zielkorpus. Wir wenden auch Modelle auf Basis verschiedener Hintergrundkorpora auf die FSD-Aufgabe an. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die Verteilungsähnlichkeit von Begriffen eine bessere Vorhersage für eine gute FSD-Leistung ist als die Skala gängiger Begriffe; Damit zeigen wir, dass ein kleinerer neuerer domänenbezogener Korpus besser geeignet ist als ein sehr großer allgemeiner Korpus für FSD.', 'bn': 'প্রথম স্টোরি ডিটেক্টরির বর্তমান শিল্পের অবস্থা (এফএসডি) প্রতিবেশী ভিত্তিক মডেল, যাদের ঐতিহ্যবাহী মেয়াদের ভেক্ তবে এফএসডি মডেলের মুখোমুখি একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ হচ্ছে যে নথিপত্রের প্রতিনিধিত্ব সাধারণত শব্দভাণ্ডার এবং মেয়াদ ফ্রায়েন্সের ম Consequently, the ideal background corpus should arguably be both large-scale to ensure adequate term coverage, and similar to the target domain in terms of the language distribution.  তবে এই দুটি কারখানাগুলো সবসময় একে অপরের প্রতি সন্তুষ্ট হতে পারে না, এই কাগজে আমরা পরীক্ষা করি যে সাধারণ শর্তের বিতরণের সমতুল্য কি এফএসডির সাধারণ আমাদের বিশ্লেষণের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক হিসেবে আমরা প্রস্তাব করি সাধারণ শর্তের পরিমাপ এবং কর্পোরার মধ্যে বিতরণের সমতুল্যের জন্য। এই মেট্রিক ব্যবহার করে আমরা টার্গেট কর্পুসের সাথে ভিন্ন ভিন্ন পটভূমির কোর্পোরার প্রতিনিধিত্ব করি। এফএসডির কাজে আমরা ভিন্ন পটভূমির কোর্পোরা ভিত্তিক মডেল প্রয়োগ করি। আমাদের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে মেয়াদ বিতরণ সাধারণ শর্তের পরিমাণ থেকে ভাল এফএসডি প্রদর্শনের বেশী ভবিষ্যৎবাণী; এবং তাই আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে সাম্প্রতিক ডোমেইন-সম্পর্কিত কোর্পাস এফএসডির জন্য একটি বিশাল পরিমাণ সাধারণ কোর্পাসের চেয়ে ছোট।', 'az': 'İlk hekayət keşfinin (FSD) sanatının hökmünün ən yaxın qonşu-tabanlı modellərdir. Dəstəliyi termin vektör göstəricisi ilə. Ancaq FSD modellərinin qarşısındaki bir səbəbi belədir ki, belədir göstəricisi sıralıq arxa plan korpusundan sözlük və termin frekvenci təyin edilir. Beləliklə, ideal arxa plan korpusu, dil dağıtımı ilə məqsədilə müəyyən edilmək üçün hər ikisi böyük ölçüdə olmalıdır. Ancaq bu iki faktör həmişə bir-birindən təmizlənməz, bu kağızda biz müxtəlif şəkillərin dağıtılma məsələsinin FSD üçün müxtəlif şəkillərin ölçüsündən daha vacibdir. Bizim analizimizin basi olaraq, ortaq şəkillərin ölçülərini və bölüşünün bənzərisini ölçüyə qədər metrik toplamını təklif edirik. Bu metriklərdən istifadə edirək, biz müxtəlif arxa plan korporasını hedef korporasına qovuşdururuq. Biz də fərqli arxa plan korporasına dayanan modelləri FSD işinə uygulayıq. Növbətimizin sonuçlarımız, dağıtım məsələlərinin bənzəriliyinin yaxşı FSD performansının ortaq şəkillərin ölçüsündən daha tədbir olduğunu göstərir. Beləliklə, biz də göstəririk ki, yeni bir domena bağlı korpus FSD üçün çox böyük ölçüdə genel korpusdan daha uyğun olacaq.', 'bs': 'Trenutno stanje umjetnosti za pronalaženje prve priče (FSD) su najbliži modeli na susjedstvu s tradicionalnim terminalnim predstavljanjem vektora; Međutim, jedan izazov sa kojim se suočavaju modeli FSD-a je da se predstavljanje dokumenta obično definira riječnik i terminalna frekvencija iz pozadinskog korpusa. Stoga bi idealni korpus pozadine trebalo biti velika skala kako bi osigurao odgovarajući terminski pokrivač i sličan ciljnom domenu u smislu distribucije jezika. Međutim, s obzirom na to dvoje faktora ne mogu uvijek biti zajedno zadovoljni, u ovom papiru pregledavamo da li je distribucijska sličnost zajedničkih uslova važnija od skale zajedničkih uslova za FSD. Kao osnovu naše analize predlažemo gomilu metrika da kvantitativno mjerimo skalu zajedničkih uslova i distribucijske sličnosti između korpore. Koristeći ove metrike, činimo različite pozadinske korporacije u odnosu na metnog korpusa. Također primjenjujemo modele na temelju različitih pozadinskih korporacija na zadatak FSD-a. Naši rezultati pokazuju da je izraz distribucijske sličnosti predvidljiviji od dobrih FSD-a nego skala zajedničkih uslova; I tako pokazujemo da će manji korpus povezan s domenom biti prikladniji od veoma velike generalne korpuse za FSD.', 'ca': "L'actualitat de la detecció de la primera història (FSD) són els models més propers basats en veïns amb representacions de vectors tradicionals; però un repte que enfronten els models FSD és que la representació del document és normalment definida pel vocabulari i la freqüència del terme d'un cos de fons. Com a conseqüència, el cos de fons ideal hauria de ser a gran escala per assegurar una cobertura adequada del terme, i semblant al domini d'objectiu en termes de distribució del llenguatge. Però, tenint en compte aquests dos factors no sempre poden ser satisfets mutuament, en aquest paper examinem si la similitud distribucional de termes comuns és més important que l'escala de termes comuns per FSD. Com a base de la nostra anàlisi proposem un conjunt de mètriques per mesurar quantitativament l'escala de termes comuns i la similitud distribucional entre corpora. Utilitzant aquestes mètriques, classifiquem diferents corpores de fons en comparació amb un cos d'objectiu. També aplicam models basats en diferents corporesde fons a la tasca FSD. Els nostres resultats demostren que la similitud distribucional del terme és més preditiva del bon rendiment FSD que l'escala de termes comuns; i, així, demostram que un cos més petit recent relacionat amb dominis serà més adequat que un cos general de gran escala per FSD.", 'cs': 'Současným stavem techniky pro detekci prvního příběhu (FSD) jsou nejbližší sousedské modely s tradičními výrazy vektorové reprezentace; Jednou z výzev, které FSD modely čelí, je však, že reprezentace dokumentu je obvykle definována slovní zásobou a frekvencí termínů z korpusu pozadí. V důsledku toho by ideální korpus pozadí měl být pravděpodobně rozsáhlý pro zajištění adekvátního pokrytí termínů a podobný cílové doméně, pokud jde o jazykovou distribuci. Nicméně vzhledem k tomu, že tyto dva faktory nemohou být vždy vzájemně uspokojeny, v tomto článku zkoumáme, zda je distribuční podobnost společných termínů důležitější než rozsah společných termínů pro FSD. Jako základ pro naši analýzu navrhujeme sadu metrik pro kvantitativní měření měřítka běžných termínů a distribuční podobnosti mezi korpusy. Pomocí těchto metrik hodnotíme různé korpusy pozadí vzhledem k cílovému korpusu. Na FSD úlohu také aplikujeme modely založené na různých korpusech pozadí. Naše výsledky ukazují, že distribuční podobnost termínů je více prediktivní o dobré FSD výkonnosti než rozsah běžných termínů; A tak ukazujeme, že menší nedávný korpus související s doménou bude vhodnější než velmi rozsáhlý obecný korpus pro FSD.', 'et': 'Esimese loo tuvastamise (FSD) praegune tehnika tase on lähima naaberpõhised mudelid, millel on traditsioonilised terminid vektorikujutised; FSD mudelite üks väljakutse seisneb aga selles, et dokumentide esitamist määratletakse tavaliselt taustakorpuse sõnavara ja terminite sageduse järgi. Sellest tulenevalt peaks ideaalne taustkorpus olema väidetavalt nii ulatuslik, et tagada piisav tähtajaline katvus, kui ka sarnane sihtdomeeniga keelejaotuse osas. Kuid arvestades neid kahte tegurit ei saa alati vastastikku rahuldada, uurime käesolevas raamatus, kas jaotuslik sarnasus ühiste terminite on olulisem kui skaala ühiste terminite FSD. Analüüsi aluseks pakume välja mõõdikute kogumi, et kvantitatiivselt mõõta ühiste terminite skaalat ja korpuste jaotuslikku sarnasust. Nende mõõdikute abil järjestame erinevad taustakorpused sihtkorpuse suhtes. Samuti rakendame FSD ülesandele erinevatel taustakorpustel põhinevaid mudeleid. Meie tulemused näitavad, et termin jaotuslik sarnasus ennustab paremini FSD tulemusi kui ühisterminite skaala; Seega näitame, et väiksem hiljutine domeeniga seotud korpus on sobivam kui väga suur üldkorpus FSD jaoks.', 'fi': 'First Story Detection (FSD) nykytekniikka on lähinaapureihin perustuvia malleja, joissa on perinteiset termit vektoriesitykset. FSD-mallien haasteena on kuitenkin se, että dokumenttien esittäminen määritellään yleensä taustakorpusen sanaston ja termien taajuuden perusteella. Näin ollen ihanteellisen tausta-aineiston tulisi olla sekä laaja-alainen, jotta termien kattavuus olisi riittävä, että kielijakauman osalta samankaltainen kuin kohdealue. Koska näitä kahta tekijää ei kuitenkaan aina voida tyydyttää keskenään, tässä artikkelissa selvitämme, onko yhteisten termien jakautumisen samankaltaisuus tärkeämpi kuin FSD:n yhteisten termien asteikko. Analyysimme pohjaksi ehdotamme joukon mittareita, joilla mitataan määrällisesti yhteisten termien asteikkoa ja korpusten jakauman samankaltaisuutta. Näiden mittareiden avulla sijoitamme eri taustakorpusia kohdekorpusiin verrattuna. Sovellamme FSD:n tehtävään myös eri taustakorpusiin perustuvia malleja. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että termijakauman samankaltaisuus ennustaa FSD:n hyvää suorituskykyä paremmin kuin yleisten termien asteikko. Tämän vuoksi osoitamme, että pienempi lähin verkkotunnukseen liittyvä korpus sopii paremmin kuin hyvin laajamittainen yleinen korpus FSD:lle.', 'jv': 'The current state of the arts for First Generation politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Erekalom, the idial background Body should argument to be durung-scale to garangkat adalah term Coverage, and Simulate to the goal domain in terms of the language Distribution. Nanging, nambah iki lak kowé nggawe nik kabeh wektu nggawe sapa-sapa ngono cara sing pernik nik awak dhéwé titik dhéwé, nganggep kuwi kesempatan sistem butuhan iki terus sing luwih apik sing luwih apik sing luwih apik dhéwé ning cara sistem sing gawe ngga Genjer dhéwé nggunakake karo hal-hal kita supoyo nggawe sistem Metik kanggo meh dadi, nik kuwi nggawe kalagayut terus diuntingi podho kebutuhan karo perusahaan Ngawe Perintah-perintah sing dipunangé awak dhéwé wis dipunangé perusahaan karo perusahaan Awak dhéwé ngerasakno model sing basa ning cara-cara sing berlanjut kanggo ngilangno cara-cara sing luwih dumateng. Rejalaké awak dhéwé ngertuk sistem iso disenyarno kuné sampeyan luwih dumadhi karo hal-hal ngono nggawe barang Punika, kita maneh menehi, perusahaan nyong hukum sistem sing gak adhil karo perusahaan anyar tentang karo ngono akeh sistem sing luwih akeh podho akeh opera-perusahaan kanggo lagi ketahanan winih.', 'ha': "Halin da ake kai yanzu wa Kwamfyuta na farko (FSD) su zama masu kusantar misãlai masu ƙasan jiran (wanda aka rubũta shi a yanzu) sunã da shiryarwa na ƙidãya wa durowa; A lokacin da, wata tsãwa ta haɗi da misalin FSD-na-gaba ne cẽwa an ƙayyade shaidar duk takardar a ɗabi'a ana ƙayyade misali da durowa daga wata nau'in bango. Saboda haka, korumar bangon kafin da aka so, ya kamata duka girma dõmin ya yi tsari ga tsarin muhimma da kuma ya kamata da wanda ke cikin shirin ayuka da aka yi amfani da shi. A lokacin da aka bã su yarda da waɗannan factori biyu a lokacin, kuma a cikin wannan takardan, Munã jarraba ko da rabon da daidaita wa rubutun da ɗayan ayuka ne mafi muhimmi ko kuma ma'anar maganar jama'a wa FSD. Kama bincike ga analyyinmu, Munã buɗa wani misali ko da za'a iya cika ma'aunin rubutu ko kuma da rabon da daidaita tsakanin makampuni. Yi amfani da waɗannan metrica, ko na danganta dabam-daban na danganta ko wani nauyi na daban-daban. Yana amfani da misãlai kan shirin bangon dabam-daban zuwa aikin FSD. Our results show that term distributional similarity is more predictive of good FSD performance than the scale of common terms;  kuma kamar haka, Muke nũna cewa, wata ƙarami da aka yi wa danganta a yanzu zai zama mafi daidai ko wani nauyi mai girma na FSD.", 'sk': 'Trenutno stanje tehnike za odkrivanje prve zgodbe (FSD) so najbližji sosedski modeli s tradicionalnimi vektorskimi predstavitvami izrazov; Eden od izzivov modelov FSD pa je, da je predstavitev dokumentov običajno opredeljena z besediščem in pogostostjo izrazov iz ozadja korpusa. Zato bi moral biti idealni osnovni korpus brez dvoma obsežen, da bi zagotovili ustrezno pokritost terminov, in podoben ciljni domeni glede razporeditve jezika. Glede na to, da teh dveh dejavnikov ni mogoče vedno medsebojno zadovoljiti, v tem prispevku preučujemo, ali je distribucijska podobnost skupnih izrazov pomembnejša od lestvice skupnih izrazov za FSD. Kot osnova za analizo predlagamo niz meritev za kvantitativno merjenje lestvice skupnih izrazov in distribucijske podobnosti med korpusi. S temi meritvami razvrstimo različne korpuse ozadja glede na ciljni korpus. Za nalogo FSD uporabljamo tudi modele, ki temeljijo na različnih korpusih ozadja. Naši rezultati kažejo, da izraz distribucijska podobnost bolj napoveduje dobro delovanje FSD kot lestvica skupnih izrazov; S tem dokazujemo, da bo manjši nedavni domenski korpus primernejši od zelo obsežnega splošnega korpusa za FSD.', 'he': 'המצב האמנותי הנוכחי לגילוי הסיפור הראשון (FSD) הם דוגמנים שכנים קרובים ביותר עם מייצגים ווקטורים מסורתיים. עם זאת, אתגר אחד שנמצא על ידי דוגמנים FSD הוא שהמייצג המסמכים בדרך כלל מוגדר על ידי המילים והתדירות המונח ממקורפוס רקע. ככל הנראה, הקורפוס הרקע האידיאלי צריך להיות גם בקנה מידה גדולה כדי להבטיח כיסוי מונח מתאים, ודומה לתחום המטרה במונחים של פיצול השפה. בכל אופן, בהתחשב בשני הגורמים האלה לא תמיד יכולים להיות מרוצים אחד לשני, בעיתון הזה אנחנו בודקים אם הדמיון ההפצה של תנאים משותפים הוא חשוב יותר ממערכת תנאים משותפים עבור FSD. כבסיס לניתוח שלנו אנו מציעים קבוצה של מטריקה כדי למדוד באופן כמוני את גודל התנאים המשותפים והדומות המפיצה בין הקופורה. באמצעות המטריקות האלה אנחנו מדרגים גופות רקע שונות בהשוואה לקורפוס המטרה. We also apply models based on different background corpora to the FSD task.  התוצאות שלנו מראות שדמיון פיצוי המונח יותר צפוי של ביצועים טובים של FSD מאשר סקל של תנאים משותפים; וכך אנו מוכיחים שקורפוס קטן יותר לאחרונה בקשר לתחום יהיה יותר מתאים מקורפוס גנרלי בקנה מידה גדולה מאוד עבור FSD.', 'bo': 'The current state of the art for First Story Detection (FSD) are nearest neighbour-based models with traditional term vector representations; this is the current state of the art for First Story Detection (FSD) are nearest neighbour-based models with traditional term vector representations; and ཡིན་ནའང་ཡོད་ཀྱང་། FSD མ་དབྱིབས་ཀྱིས་གདོང་ལེན་པའི་དཀའ་གདོང་ལེན་གཅིག་ནི་ཡིག་གེ་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་ཡང་རྒྱབ་གཞུང་ཚབ་ཀ Consequently, the ideal background corpus should arguably be both large-scale to ensure adequate term coverage, and similar to the target domain in terms of the language distribution. ཡིན་ནའང་། ཆ་རྐྱེན་འདི་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་རྟག་པར་སྤྱིར་བཏང་མི་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་། ང་ཚོའི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་དབྱིབས་རྩིས་མཐུན་རྣམ་གྲངས ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་རྨས་གཞི་ལ་སྔོན་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་ཡོད་ཚད་དང་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དབར་གྱི་དབར་གྱི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་གྲངས་སུ་འཇུག ང་ཚོས་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་འདི་དག་སྤྱད་ནས་དབུས་མཐུད་དང་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་FSD ལས་ཀ་ལ་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་ཀྱི་སྒེར་སྡུད་མིན་འདུག ང་ཚོའི་འབྲུག་འབྲས་བྱ་ཚིག་རྩིས་བཏོན་པའི་དབྱེ་བ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་འདྲ་ཡིན་པ་ལས་སྔོན་ཚོད། དེར་བརྟེན། འུ་ཅག་གིས་གསར་དུ་འབྱུང་བའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྐྱེས་པའི་མཐུད་མཁན་པ་ཞིག་ནི་ཉེ་ཆར་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིན་པའི་ཁོང་ཡུལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞ'}
{'en': 'Predicting Sentiment of Polish Language Short Texts', 'ar': 'توقع المشاعر من نصوص اللغة البولندية القصيرة', 'es': 'Predicción del sentimiento de textos cortos en polaco', 'pt': 'Prevendo o sentimento de textos curtos em polonês', 'fr': 'Prédire le sentiment des textes courts en polonais', 'ja': 'ポーランド語短文の感情を予測する', 'zh': '占波兰语短文本情', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование настроений польского языка коротких текстов', 'hi': 'पोलिश भाषा लघु ग्रंथों की भावना की भविष्यवाणी', 'ga': 'Meon na bPolannais Gearr-théacsanna a Thuar', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A lengyel nyelv érzelmeinek előrejelzése rövid szövegek', 'el': 'Προβλέποντας την αίσθηση των κοντών κειμένων της πολωνικής γλώσσας', 'kk': 'Польша тілдің қысқа мәтіндерінің жіберу уақыты', 'it': 'Predire il sentimento della lingua polacca Testi brevi', 'lt': 'Lenkijos kalbos trumpų tekstų jausmas', 'mk': 'Предвидување на чувство на кратки тексти на полски јазик', 'ms': 'Menimbas Pengesanan Teks pendek Bahasa Polandia', 'ml': 'പോളിഷ് ഭാഷ കുറഞ്ഞ പദാവലി', 'mt': 'It-Tbassir tas-Sentiment tat-Testijiet Qasira tal-lingwa Pollakka', 'mn': 'Польшийн хэл богино текст Sentiment', 'no': 'Forhåndsvising av kort tekst på polsk språk', 'pl': 'Przewidywanie sentymentu języka polskiego Krótkie teksty', 'ro': 'Predicând sentimentul limbii poloneze texte scurte', 'sr': 'Predviðavajuæi Sentiment poljskog jezika kratkih tekstova', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Didiyaarinta Xiliga Polish Luqada Short Texts', 'sv': 'Förutsägning av känslor av polska språket korta texter', 'ta': 'முன்னேற்றப்படுகிறது', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Tayyorlanmoqda', 'vi': 'Đang dự đoán tình trạng ngôn ngữ ngắn', 'bg': 'Прогнозиране на сентимента на кратките текстове на полски език', 'da': 'Forudsigelse af følelse af polsk sprog korte tekster', 'nl': 'Voorspelling Sentiment van korte teksten in de Poolse taal', 'hr': 'Predviđanje Sentimenta kratkih tekstova poljskog jezika', 'de': 'Vorhersage des Sentiments der polnischen Sprache Kurztexte', 'id': 'Memprediksi Sentimen Bahasa Polandia Teks pendek', 'ko': '폴란드어 단문의 감정 예측', 'fa': 'پیش\u200cبینی فرستادن پیام کوتاه زبان لهستان', 'sw': 'Wakati wa Polish Lugha Short Text', 'af': 'Voorskou Sentiment van Poolse Taal Kort Teks', 'tr': 'Polonýaça Diliň gysga Metinlerin öňden gelen Senedişi', 'sq': 'Duke parashikuar ndjenjat e teksteve të shkurtra të gjuhës polake', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Պոլլանդական լեզվի կարճ տեքստների պատկերացումը', 'az': 'Polonyalı Dilin Qısa Metinlərin Sentiment', 'bn': 'পোলিশ ভাষার সংক্ষিপ্ত টেক্সটের সেন্টেমেন্ট প্রেরণ করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Predicting Sentiment of Polish Language Short Texts', 'bs': 'Predviđanje Sentimenta kratkih tekstova poljskog jezika', 'cs': 'Předpověď vnímání polského jazyka Krátké texty', 'et': 'Poola keele lühikeste tekstide tunnetuse prognoosimine', 'fi': 'Puolan kielen lyhyiden tekstien ennustaminen', 'jv': 'Cut Begincut', 'he': 'צפוי תחושה של טקסטים קצרים בשפה פולנית', 'ha': 'Predictionary variant', 'sk': 'Predvidevanje čustva kratkih besedil poljskega jezika', 'bo': 'སྔོན་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་ཆུ་ཚོད་རིམ'}
{'en': 'The goal of this paper is to use all available Polish language data sets to seek the best possible performance in supervised sentiment analysis of short texts. We use text collections with labelled sentiment such as tweets, movie reviews and a sentiment treebank, in three comparison modes. In the first, we examine the performance of models trained and tested on the same text collection using standard cross-validation (in-domain). In the second we train models on all available data except the given test collection, which we use for testing (one vs rest cross-domain). In the third, we train a model on one data set and apply it to another one (one vs one cross-domain). We compare wide range of methods including machine learning on bag-of-words representation, bidirectional recurrent neural networks as well as the most recent pre-trained architectures ELMO and BERT. We formulate conclusions as to cross-domain and in-domain performance of each method. Unsurprisingly, BERT turned out to be a strong performer, especially in the cross-domain setting. What is surprising however, is solid performance of the relatively simple multinomial Naive Bayes classifier, which performed equally well as BERT on several data sets.', 'ar': 'الهدف من هذه الورقة هو استخدام جميع مجموعات بيانات اللغة البولندية المتاحة للبحث عن أفضل أداء ممكن في تحليل المشاعر الخاضعة للإشراف للنصوص القصيرة. نحن نستخدم مجموعات نصية ذات مشاعر مصنفة مثل التغريدات ومراجعات الأفلام وبنك شجرة المشاعر ، في ثلاثة أوضاع للمقارنة. في الأول ، نفحص أداء النماذج التي تم تدريبها واختبارها على نفس مجموعة النصوص باستخدام التحقق القياسي المتقاطع (في المجال). في الثانية ، نقوم بتدريب النماذج على جميع البيانات المتاحة باستثناء مجموعة الاختبار المحددة ، والتي نستخدمها للاختبار (واحد مقابل بقية المجال عبر المجال). في المجموعة الثالثة ، نقوم بتدريب نموذج على مجموعة بيانات واحدة وتطبيقه على مجموعة أخرى (مجال مقابل واحد عبر نطاق واحد). نحن نقارن مجموعة واسعة من الأساليب بما في ذلك التعلم الآلي على تمثيل كيس الكلمات والشبكات العصبية المتكررة ثنائية الاتجاه بالإضافة إلى أحدث البنيات المدربة مسبقًا ELMO و BERT. نقوم بصياغة استنتاجات فيما يتعلق بالأداء عبر المجال وداخل المجال لكل طريقة. مما لا يثير الدهشة ، تحولت BERT إلى أداء قوي ، خاصة في الإعداد عبر المجال. ومع ذلك ، فإن الأمر المثير للدهشة هو الأداء القوي لمصنف Naive Bayes متعدد الحدود البسيط نسبيًا ، والذي كان يعمل بنفس جودة BERT في العديد من مجموعات البيانات.', 'fr': "L'objectif de cet article est d'utiliser tous les ensembles de données disponibles sur la langue polonaise afin de rechercher les meilleures performances possibles dans l'analyse supervisée des sentiments de textes courts. Nous utilisons des collections de textes avec des sentiments étiquetés tels que des tweets, des critiques de films et une banque d'arbres de sentiments, dans trois modes de comparaison. Dans le premier, nous examinons les performances des modèles formés et testés sur la même collection de texte à l'aide de la validation croisée standard (dans le domaine). Dans le second, nous entraînons des modèles sur toutes les données disponibles, à l'exception de la collection de tests donnée, que nous utilisons pour les tests (un par rapport au reste entre domaines). Dans le troisième, nous entraînons un modèle sur un ensemble de données et l'appliquons à un autre (un par rapport à un autre domaine). Nous comparons un large éventail de méthodes, y compris l'apprentissage automatique sur la représentation en sac de mots, les réseaux neuronaux récurrents bidirectionnels ainsi que les architectures pré-entraînées les plus récentes ELMO et BERT. Nous formulons des conclusions quant aux performances inter-domaines et dans le domaine de chaque méthode. Sans surprise, BERT s'est avéré très performant, en particulier dans le contexte interdomaines. Ce qui est surprenant cependant, c'est la bonne performance du classificateur naïf bayésien multinomial relativement simple, qui a obtenu les mêmes résultats que le BERT sur plusieurs ensembles de données.", 'es': 'El objetivo de este artículo es utilizar todos los conjuntos de datos disponibles en polaco para buscar el mejor rendimiento posible en el análisis supervisado de sentimientos de textos cortos. Utilizamos colecciones de texto con opiniones etiquetadas, como tuits, reseñas de películas y un banco de opiniones, en tres modos de comparación. En la primera, examinamos el rendimiento de los modelos entrenados y probados en la misma colección de texto mediante validación cruzada estándar (en el dominio). En el segundo, entrenamos modelos con todos los datos disponibles, excepto la colección de pruebas dada, que utilizamos para las pruebas (uno frente a resto entre dominios). En el tercero, entrenamos un modelo en un conjunto de datos y lo aplicamos a otro (uno contra uno entre dominios). Comparamos una amplia gama de métodos, incluido el aprendizaje automático en la representación de bolsas de palabras, las redes neuronales recurrentes bidireccionales, así como las arquitecturas preentrenadas más recientes ELMO y BERT. Formulamos conclusiones sobre el rendimiento entre dominios y dentro del dominio de cada método. Como era de esperar, BERT resultó tener un buen desempeño, especialmente en el entorno multidominio. Sin embargo, lo sorprendente es el sólido rendimiento del relativamente simple clasificador multinomial Naive Bayes, que tuvo un rendimiento igual de bueno que BERT en varios conjuntos de datos.', 'pt': 'O objetivo deste artigo é usar todos os conjuntos de dados disponíveis no idioma polonês para buscar o melhor desempenho possível na análise supervisionada de sentimentos de textos curtos. Usamos coleções de texto com sentimentos rotulados, como tweets, resenhas de filmes e um banco de sentimentos, em três modos de comparação. Na primeira, examinamos o desempenho de modelos treinados e testados na mesma coleção de texto usando validação cruzada padrão (no domínio). No segundo, treinamos modelos em todos os dados disponíveis, exceto na coleção de teste fornecida, que usamos para teste (um vs resto de domínio cruzado). No terceiro, treinamos um modelo em um conjunto de dados e o aplicamos a outro (um vs um domínio cruzado). Comparamos uma ampla gama de métodos, incluindo aprendizado de máquina na representação de sacos de palavras, redes neurais recorrentes bidirecionais, bem como as arquiteturas pré-treinadas mais recentes ELMO e BERT. Formulamos conclusões quanto ao desempenho entre domínios e domínios de cada método. Sem surpresa, o BERT acabou tendo um desempenho forte, especialmente no cenário de vários domínios. O que é surpreendente, no entanto, é o desempenho sólido do classificador multinomial Naive Bayes relativamente simples, que teve um desempenho tão bom quanto o BERT em vários conjuntos de dados.', 'ja': 'この論文の目標は、利用可能なすべてのポーランド語データセットを使用して、短い文章の感情分析を監督して可能な限り最高のパフォーマンスを求めることである。 3つの比較モードで、ツイート、映画レビュー、センチメントツリーバンクなどのセンチメントをラベル付けしたテキストコレクションを使用します。 最初に、標準的なクロスバリデーション（ドメイン内）を使用して、同じテキストコレクションで訓練されテストされたモデルのパフォーマンスを検討します。 2番目のトレーニングでは、テストに使用する指定されたテストコレクションを除くすべての利用可能なデータについてモデルをトレーニングします（ 1つのクロスドメインと休止ドメイン）。 3つ目は、1つのデータセット上でモデルをトレーニングし、別のデータセット（ 1つのクロスドメインと1つのクロスドメイン）に適用します。 私たちは、言葉のバッグ表現に関する機械学習、双方向の再帰的ニューラルネットワーク、そして最新の事前トレーニングされたエルモとバートのアーキテクチャなど、幅広い方法を比較しています。 各メソッドのクロスドメインとインドメインのパフォーマンスについて結論を策定します。 意外なことに、バートは特にクロスドメインの場面で強力なパフォーマーであることが判明しました。 しかし、驚くべきことは、いくつかのデータセットでBERTと同等に良好なパフォーマンスを発揮した、比較的単純な多項式ナイーブベイズ分類子の確かなパフォーマンスである。', 'zh': '本文者,用所有可用之波兰语数据集,于短文本督情析中求最佳。 三者合文本,如推文,电影论情树库。 先之以准验(域内)同文而合之。 二者,除给定试合之外,可以数练形,合而试之(一与余跨域)。 第三数集,于一数集上练一模形,并应用于别数集(一与一跨域)。 臣等校其广法,单词囊机器学,双向递归神经网络及最新预训练架构ELMOBERT。 吾以每法之跨域,与域内之性得而论之。 不出所料,BERT强大表现者,特置跨领中。 然令人讶之,相对简易多端贝叶斯类器之稳定性,其在数集上,与BERT等。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर का लक्ष्य सभी उपलब्ध पोलिश भाषा डेटा सेट का उपयोग करना है ताकि छोटे ग्रंथों के पर्यवेक्षित भावना विश्लेषण में सर्वोत्तम संभव प्रदर्शन की तलाश की जा सके। हम तीन तुलना मोड में, ट्वीट्स, मूवी समीक्षा और एक भावना ट्रीबैंक जैसे लेबल भावनाओं के साथ पाठ संग्रह का उपयोग करते हैं। पहले में, हम मानक क्रॉस-सत्यापन (इन-डोमेन) का उपयोग करके एक ही पाठ संग्रह पर प्रशिक्षित और परीक्षण किए गए मॉडल के प्रदर्शन की जांच करते हैं। दूसरे में हम दिए गए परीक्षण संग्रह को छोड़कर सभी उपलब्ध डेटा पर मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं, जिसका उपयोग हम परीक्षण के लिए करते हैं (एक बनाम शेष क्रॉस-डोमेन)। तीसरे में, हम एक डेटा सेट पर एक मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं और इसे दूसरे पर लागू करते हैं (एक बनाम एक क्रॉस-डोमेन)। हम बैग-ऑफ-वर्ड्स प्रतिनिधित्व, द्विदिश आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ-साथ सबसे हाल ही में पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित आर्किटेक्चर ELMO और BERT पर मशीन लर्निंग सहित तरीकों की विस्तृत श्रृंखला की तुलना करते हैं। हम प्रत्येक विधि के क्रॉस-डोमेन और इन-डोमेन प्रदर्शन के रूप में निष्कर्ष तैयार करते हैं। आश्चर्यजनक रूप से, BERT एक मजबूत कलाकार बन गया, विशेष रूप से क्रॉस-डोमेन सेटिंग में। हालांकि, आश्चर्य की बात यह है कि अपेक्षाकृत सरल मल्टीनोमियल भोले बेयस क्लासिफायर का ठोस प्रदर्शन है, जिसने कई डेटा सेटों पर BERT के रूप में समान रूप से अच्छी तरह से प्रदर्शन किया।', 'ru': 'Целью настоящего документа является использование всех имеющихся наборов данных на польском языке для поиска наилучшей возможной производительности при контролируемом анализе настроений коротких текстов. Мы используем текстовые подборки с обозначенными настроениями, такими как твиты, обзоры фильмов и банк настроений, в трех режимах сравнения. В первом мы рассматриваем производительность моделей, обученных и протестированных на одной и той же текстовой подборке, используя стандартную перекрестную валидацию (внутридоменную). Во втором мы обучаем модели на всех доступных данных, за исключением данной тестовой коллекции, которую мы используем для тестирования (один в сравнении с междоменной областью REST). В третьем мы обучаем модель на одном наборе данных и применяем ее к другому (один против одного кросс-домена). Мы сравниваем широкий спектр методов, включая машинное обучение на основе представления мешков слов, двунаправленные рекуррентные нейронные сети, а также самые последние предварительно обученные архитектуры ELMO и BERT. Формулируем выводы о кросс-доменной и внутридоменной эффективности каждого метода. Неудивительно, что БЕРТ оказался сильным исполнителем, особенно в междоменной среде. Что удивительно, однако, является твердой производительности относительно простой мультиномиальный Наив Байес классификатор, который работает так же хорошо, как БЕРТА на нескольких наборов данных.', 'ga': "Is é sprioc an pháipéir seo na tacair sonraí Polainnise go léir atá ar fáil a úsáid chun an fheidhmíocht is fearr is féidir a lorg in anailís dhearcadh maoirsithe ar théacsanna gearra. Bainimid úsáid as bailiúcháin téacs le meon lipéadaithe ar nós tvuíteanna, léirmheasanna ar scannáin agus crann meon meon, i dtrí mhodh comparáide. Ar an gcéad dul síos, scrúdaímid feidhmíocht na múnlaí atá oilte agus tástáladh ar an mbailiúchán téacs céanna ag baint úsáide as tras-bhailíochtú caighdeánach (i-fearainn). Sa dara ceann déanaimid oiliúint ar mhúnlaí ar na sonraí go léir atá ar fáil ach amháin an bailiúchán tástála a thugtar, a úsáidimid le haghaidh tástála (trasfhearann amháin vs an chuid eile). Sa tríú háit, déanaimid oiliúint ar mhúnla ar thacar sonraí amháin agus cuirimid i bhfeidhm é ar cheann eile (ceann amháin vs ceann amháin trasfhearann). Déanaimid comparáid idir raon leathan modhanna lena n-áirítear meaisínfhoghlaim ar léiriú mála focal, líonraí néaracha athfhillteacha déthreocha chomh maith leis na hailtireachtaí réamhoilte is déanaí ELMO agus BERT. Déanaimid conclúidí maidir le feidhmíocht tras-fearainn agus in-fearainn gach modha. Ní nach ionadh, d'éirigh le BERT a bheith ina oirfideach láidir, go háirithe sa suíomh tras-fearainn. Is ábhar iontais é, áfach, feidhmíocht dhaingean an aicmitheora ilbhliantúil Naive Bayes sách simplí, a d’fheidhmigh chomh maith céanna le BERT ar roinnt tacair sonraí.", 'el': 'Στόχος της παρούσας εργασίας είναι να χρησιμοποιήσει όλα τα διαθέσιμα σύνολα δεδομένων της πολωνικής γλώσσας για να αναζητήσει την καλύτερη δυνατή απόδοση στην εποπτευόμενη ανάλυση συναισθημάτων σύντομων κειμένων. Χρησιμοποιούμε συλλογές κειμένου με επισήμανση συναισθημάτων όπως σχόλια ταινιών και μια βάση συναισθημάτων, σε τρεις τρόπους σύγκρισης. Στην πρώτη, εξετάζουμε την απόδοση των μοντέλων που εκπαιδεύονται και ελέγχονται στην ίδια συλλογή κειμένου χρησιμοποιώντας την τυποποιημένη διασταυρούμενη επικύρωση (εντός τομέα). Στο δεύτερο εκπαιδεύουμε μοντέλα σε όλα τα διαθέσιμα δεδομένα εκτός από τη δεδομένη συλλογή δοκιμών, την οποία χρησιμοποιούμε για δοκιμές (ένα versus υπόλοιπο cross-domain). Στο τρίτο, εκπαιδεύουμε ένα μοντέλο σε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων και το εφαρμόζουμε σε ένα άλλο (ένα versus ένα cross-domain). Συγκρίνουμε ευρύ φάσμα μεθόδων συμπεριλαμβανομένης της μηχανικής μάθησης στην αναπαράσταση σάκου λέξεων, των αμφίδρομης επαναλαμβανόμενων νευρωνικών δικτύων καθώς και των πιο πρόσφατων προ-εκπαιδευμένων αρχιτεκτονικών ΕΛΜΟ και BERT. Διαμορφώνουμε συμπεράσματα σχετικά με την απόδοση κάθε μεθόδου μεταξύ των τομέων και εντός του τομέα. Δεν είναι περίεργο, ο BERT αποδείχθηκε ισχυρός ερμηνευτής, ειδικά στο πλαίσιο των διαφόρων τομέων. Αυτό που προκαλεί έκπληξη, ωστόσο, είναι η σταθερή απόδοση του σχετικά απλού πολυωνυμού ταξινομητή Naive Bayes, ο οποίος λειτούργησε εξίσου καλά με το BERT σε διάφορα σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány célja, hogy minden rendelkezésre álló lengyel nyelvű adatkészletet felhasználjon a lehető legjobb teljesítményre a rövid szövegek felügyelt hangulatelemzésében. Három összehasonlítási módban használjuk az érzelmekkel ellátott szöveggyűjteményeket, például tweeteket, filmkritikákat és egy érzelmekkel ellátott fát. Az elsőben ugyanazon szöveggyűjteményen képzett és tesztelt modellek teljesítményét vizsgáljuk szabványos keresztvalidálás (domain) segítségével. A másodikban modelleket képzünk az összes rendelkezésre álló adatról, kivéve az adott tesztgyűjteményt, amelyet teszteléshez használunk (one vs rest cross-domain). A harmadik esetben egy modellt képzünk egy adatkészletre, és alkalmazzuk egy másikra (egy vs egy cross-domain). A módszerek széles skáláját hasonlítjuk össze, beleértve a zsák-of-word reprezentációs gépi tanulást, a kétirányú visszatérő neurális hálózatokat, valamint a legújabb előképzett ELMO és BERT architektúrákat. Következtetéseket fogalmazunk meg az egyes módszerek területeken átnyúló és területeken belüli teljesítményéről. Nem meglepő módon a BERT erős teljesítménynek bizonyult, különösen a tartományok közötti környezetben. Ami azonban meglepő, az a viszonylag egyszerű multinóm Naive Bayes osztályozó szilárd teljesítménye, amely ugyanolyan jól teljesített, mint a BERT több adatkészleten.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნტის მიზეზი არის ყველა ხელმისაწყისი პოლიქური ენის მონაცემების შესაძლებლობის გამოყენება, რომ ძირითადი შესაძლებელი გამოყენება კონტაქტის ანალიზაცია ჩვენ ტექსტის კოლექციების გამოყენება, როგორც ტექსტი, ფილმის განახლებები და სენტიმენტის კოლექცია, სამი შემდგომარებული რეზიმენტებში. პირველად, ჩვენ მოდელების გამოყენებას შევხედავთ და შევცვალოთ იგივე ტექსტის კოლექციაში, რომელიც გამოყენება სტანდარტური კრესგალიდეციის გამოყენება (დიო მეორეში ჩვენ მოდელები ყველა შესაძლებელი მონაცემების შესახებ, მაგრამ მივიღეთ ტესტის კოლექციაში, რომელიც ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ტესტის შესახებ (ერთი vs კ მესამე, ჩვენ ერთი მონაცემების შესახებ მოდელის შესახებ და ამას სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვ ჩვენ განსაკუთრებით სიტყვების განსაკუთრებით სიტყვების მასწავლებას, ბუდირექციონალური განსაკუთრებით ნეიროლური ქსელების განსაკუთრებით და ბუპტის უბრალოდ განსაკუთრებით განსაკ ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ გადასრულებები, რომელიც ყოველ პროცემის გადასრულება და დიომინის გავაკეთება. ბერტი იყო ძალიან გამოყენებელი, განსაკუთრებით კრესომინის დასაწყებაში. მაგრამ იცის, რომ მარტინომიურად მულტინომიული ნაიგ ბეიზის კლასიფიკაციის კონფიკაცია, რომელიც განსაკუთრებულად გავაკეთეთეთ BERT-ს რამდენიმე მონაცემების კონფიკაციაში', 'lt': 'Šio dokumento tikslas – panaudoti visus turimus Lenkijos kalbos duomenų rinkinius siekti geriausių rezultatų atliekant trumpų tekstų stebėtą jausmų analizę. Mes naudojame teksto rinkinius su etiketėmis pažymėtu jausmu, pvz., tweetus, filmų apžvalgas ir jausmų medžio pagrindą, trijuose palyginimo režimuose. Pirma, mes išnagrinėjame modelių, parengtų ir išbandytų tuo pačiu tekstų rinkimu, rezultatus naudojant standartinį kryžminį patvirtinimą (domene). Antrojoje sekundėje mes mokome modelius iš visų turimų duomenų, išskyrus nurodytą bandymų rinkimą, kuris naudojamas bandymui (vienas ir poilsio kryžminis sritis). Trečiajame etape mes rengiame model į viename duomenų rinkinyje ir jį taikome kitame (viename ir viename kryžminiame domene). We compare wide range of methods including machine learning on bag-of-words representation, bidirectional recurrent neural networks as well as the most recent pre-trained architectures ELMO and BERT.  Mes parengiame išvadas dėl kiekvieno metodo veiklos įvairiose srityse ir srityse. Nenuostabu, kad BERT pasirodė stiprus atlikėjas, ypač tarpšakinėje srityje. Vis dėlto stebina, kad palyginti paprastas daugianominis Naive Bayes klasifikatorius, kuris taip pat atliko BERT keliuose duomenų rinkiniuose, atliko tvirtus rezultatus.', 'it': "L'obiettivo di questo articolo è quello di utilizzare tutti i set di dati disponibili in lingua polacca per cercare le migliori prestazioni possibili nell'analisi supervisionata dei sentimenti di testi brevi. Usiamo raccolte di testi con sentiment etichettati come tweet, recensioni di film e un sentiment treebank, in tre modalità di confronto. Nel primo, esaminiamo le prestazioni di modelli addestrati e testati sulla stessa raccolta di testo utilizzando la convalida incrociata standard (in-domain). Nel secondo formiamo modelli su tutti i dati disponibili tranne la raccolta di test, che utilizziamo per i test (uno vs resto cross-domain). Nel terzo, addestriamo un modello su un set di dati e lo applichiamo ad un altro (uno contro uno cross-domain). Confrontiamo un'ampia gamma di metodi tra cui il machine learning sulla rappresentazione bag-of-words, le reti neurali bidirezionali ricorrenti e le più recenti architetture pre-addestrate ELMO e BERT. Formuliamo conclusioni sulle prestazioni cross-domain e in-domain di ciascun metodo. Non sorprende che BERT si sia rivelato un forte interprete, soprattutto nell'ambito cross-domain. Ciò che sorprende, tuttavia, è la solida prestazione del relativamente semplice classificatore multinomiale Naive Bayes, che ha funzionato altrettanto bene come BERT su diversi set di dati.", 'mk': 'Целта на овој документ е да се користат сите достапни податоци на полски јазик за да се бара најдобра можна резултат во надгледуваната сентиментална анализа на кратките тексти. Користиме текстови колекции со означени чувства како што се твитови, филмски рецензии и дрвја на чувства, во три режими на споредба. Прво, ги испитуваме изведувањата на моделите обучени и тестирани на истата колекција на текст користејќи стандардна крстовалидација (во домен). Во секунда тренираме модели на сите достапни податоци освен дадената тестова колекција, која ја користиме за тестирање (еден против одмор крстодомен). Во третото, тренираме модел на еден податок и го применуваме на друг (еден против еден крстодомен). Ги споредуваме широките методи, вклучувајќи го и машинското учење на претставувањето на вреќата со зборови, дворечните рецидентни нервни мрежи, како и најновите предобучени архитектури ЕЛМО и БЕРТ. Ние формулираме заклучоци во врска со крстодомените и во домените резултати на секој метод. Неизненадувачки, БЕРТ се покажа дека е силен изведувач, особено во седиштето на крстодомените. Сепак, она што е изненадувачко е цврста перформанса на релативно едноставниот мултиномален класификатор на Најв Бејс, кој изведуваше исто како и БЕРТ на неколку податоци.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаздың мақсаты - қысқа мәтіндерді бақылау үшін қол жеткізетін Польша тіл деректер жиындарын қолдану. Мәтін жинақтарын үш салыстыру режимінде қолданамыз, мысалы tweets, фильм редакциялары және сезімдік тізімі. Біріншіден біз оқылған мәтін жинақтағы үлгілердің істеуін тексереміз. Стандартты көпшілікті тексеру (доменде). Екіншіден біз барлық мәліметтерді тексеру үшін қолданатын сынақтар жинағынан басқа үлгілерді үйренеміз. Үшіншіден бір деректер жиынында үлгі ұстап, оны басқа біріне қолдану үшін қолданамыз (бірінің бірінің бірінің көлшек доменге қарсы). Біз машинаның оқыту әдістерін қайталанатын невралдық желілерді және ең жаңа алдындағы архитектураларды ELMO және BERT деп салыстырамыз. Біз әрбір әдісінің доменге және доменге арналған әрекеттерді түсіндіреміз. Бірақ келмейді, BERT күшті орындаушы болды, осылай-ақ көлшек доменнің параметрлерінде. Бірақ, сонымен қарапайым, қарапайым көпшілікті Naive Bayes классификациясының, бірнеше деректер жинақтарында бірдей және BERT жұмыс істеген қарапайым істеу.', 'ms': 'Tujuan kertas ini ialah menggunakan semua set data bahasa Polandia yang tersedia untuk mencari prestasi terbaik yang mungkin dalam analisis sentimen terjaga teks pendek. Kami menggunakan koleksi teks dengan perasaan yang ditabel seperti tweet, ulasan filem dan batang pokok perasaan, dalam tiga mod perbandingan. Dalam yang pertama, kami memeriksa prestasi model yang dilatih dan diuji pada koleksi teks yang sama menggunakan penyewalan silang piawai (dalam domain). Pada saat kedua kita melatih model pada semua data yang tersedia kecuali koleksi ujian yang diberikan, yang kita gunakan untuk ujian (satu vs lain cross-domain). Dalam yang ketiga, kita melatih model pada satu set data dan laksanakan pada satu lagi (satu vs satu cross-domain). Kami membandingkan julat luas kaedah termasuk pembelajaran mesin pada perwakilan beg-perkataan, rangkaian saraf berkurang bidireksi serta arkitektur terdahulu ELMO dan BERT. Kami membentuk kesimpulan untuk melalui domain dan prestasi dalam domain setiap kaedah. Tidak mengejutkan, BERT ternyata menjadi pelakon yang kuat, terutama dalam tetapan cross-domain. Apa yang mengejutkan bagaimanapun, adalah prestasi yang kuat bagi pengklasifikasi Naive Bayes yang relatif sederhana, yang dilakukan sama dengan BERT pada beberapa set data.', 'mt': "L-għan ta’ dan id-dokument huwa li jintużaw is-settijiet tad-dejta kollha disponibbli bil-Pollakk biex ifittxu l-aħjar prestazzjoni possibbli fl-analiżi tas-sentimenti sorveljata ta’ testi qosra. Aħna nużaw kollezzjonijiet ta’ testi b’sensazzjoni ttikkettata bħal tweets, reviżjonijiet tal-films u treebank tas-sensazzjoni, fi tliet modi ta’ paragun. Fl-ewwel nett, nagħmlu eżami tal-prestazzjoni ta’ mudelli mħarrġa u ttestjati fuq l-istess ġbir ta’ testi bl-użu ta’ cross-validation standard (fid-dominju). Fit-tieni nett aħna nħarrġu mudelli fuq id-dejta disponibbli kollha ħlief il-ġbir tat-testijiet mogħti, li aħna nużaw għall-ittestjar (wieħed kontra mistrieħ cross-domain). Fit-tielet, a ħna nħarrġu mudell fuq sett wieħed ta’ dejta u napplikawh għal sett ieħor (wieħed kontra wieħed bejn id-dominji). Aħna nqabblu firxa wiesgħa ta' metodi inkluż it-tagħlim bil-magni dwar ir-rappreżentazzjoni tal-borża tal-kliem, netwerks newrali rikorrenti bidirezzjonali kif ukoll l-arkitetturi l-aktar reċenti mħarrġa minn qabel ELMO u BERT. Aħna nagħmlu konklużjonijiet dwar il-prestazzjoni transdomestika u intradomestika ta’ kull metodu. Unsurprisingly, BERT turned out to be a strong performer, especially in the cross-domain setting.  Madankollu, dak li huwa sorprendenti huwa l-prestazzjoni solida tal-klassifikatur multinomiku relattivament sempliċi ta’ Naive Bayes, li wettaq bl-istess mod kif ukoll il-BERT fuq diversi settijiet ta’ dejta.", 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം കുറഞ്ഞ പദാവലികളുടെ വിശദീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഏറ്റവും സാധ്യതയുള്ള പ്രകടനത്തിനുള്ള എല ടൂട്ടിറ്റുകള്\u200d, സിനിമയുടെ രീതിയിലും വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d മൂന്ന് തുല്യമായ രീതിയില്\u200d വെച്ച് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് സംഘങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യം നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെടുത്തിയ മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രഭാവം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, ഒരേ ടെക്സ്റ്റ് സംഘടിപ്പില്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക് രണ്ടാമത്തേതില്\u200d നാം എല്ലാ ലഭ്യമായ വിവരങ്ങളിലും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണത്തിനുള്ള ശേഖരം ഒഴിക മൂന്നാമത്തെ സമയത്ത്, ഒരു ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണത്തില്\u200d നാം ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുകയും മറ്റൊരു കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക We compare wide range of methods including machine learning on bag-of-words representation, bidirectional recurrent neural networks as well as the most recent pre-trained architectures ELMO and BERT.  എല്ലാ രീതിയിലുമുള്ള ഡൊമെയിനും ഡൊമെയിനിലുമുള്ള പ്രദര്\u200dശനവും നാം അവസാനിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത്ഭുതപ്പെട്ടില്ല, ബെര്\u200dട്ടി ഒരു ശക്തിയുള്ള പ്രദര്\u200dശകനായിരുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ക്രിസ്റ്റോമെന എന്നാലും അത്ഭുതപ്പെടുന്നതെന്താണെങ്കിലും വളരെ ലളിതമായ മുള്\u200dട്ടിനോമിയല്\u200d നാവ് ബെയ്സ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയരുടെ സ്ഥിതിയാണ്, അത് ഒരുപോലെയ', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасны зорилго бол богино текстүүдийн мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээний хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагааг олох бүх Польшийн хэл өгөгдлийн сангуудыг ашиглах юм. Бид тэмдэглэгдсэн мэдрэмжтэй текст цуглуулга, жишээ нь tweets, кино шинжилгээ, сэтгэл хөдлөл дээр гурван харьцуулах зам дээр ашигладаг. Эхлээд бид сургалтын загварын үйл ажиллагааг шалгаж, мөн адилхан текст цуглуулалт дээр шалгаж, стандарт гишүүн шалгалтыг ашиглан шалгаж байна. Хоёрдугаарт бид бүх хэрэглэгддэг өгөгдлийн загваруудыг шалгахад ашиглаж байгаа шалгалтын цуглуулга бусад бүх мэдээллийн загваруудыг суралцдаг. Гуравдагч дахь, бид нэг өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээр загвар суралцаж нөгөө хэлбэрээр (нэг нь нэг хязгаарлагдмал хэлбэрээр харьцуулна). Бид машин суралцах үйл ажиллагаа, хоёр дахин дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээг, хамгийн сүүлийн өмнө сургалтын архитектуруудыг харьцуулсан. Бид нэг арга бүрт холбоотой болон дотоод давхар үйл ажиллагааг тодорхойлдог. Гайхалтай нь, BERT хүчтэй үйлдвэрлэгч болсон. Ялангуяа хэмжээний хэмжээнд. Гэхдээ гайхалтай зүйл бол харьцангуй энгийн олон арга хэмжээний Naive Bayes-ын хуваалцагчийн үйл ажиллагаа юм. Энэ нь хэдэн өгөгдлийн хэмжээнд BERT-тай адилхан үйл ажиллагаа хийсэн.', 'ro': 'Scopul acestei lucrări este de a utiliza toate seturile de date disponibile în limba poloneză pentru a căuta cele mai bune performanțe posibile în analiza supravegheată a sentimentelor textelor scurte. Folosim colecții de text cu sentiment etichetat, cum ar fi tweet-uri, recenzii de filme și un sentiment treebank, în trei moduri de comparație. În primul rând, examinăm performanța modelelor instruite și testate pe aceeași colecție de text folosind validarea încrucișată standard (in-domain). În al doilea rând instruim modele pe toate datele disponibile, cu excepția colecției de teste date, pe care o folosim pentru testare (unu vs rest cross-domain). În al treilea rând, pregătim un model pe un set de date și îl aplicăm pe altul (unul vs un cross-domeniu). Comparăm o gamă largă de metode, inclusiv învățarea automată pe reprezentarea sacului de cuvinte, rețelele neurale recurente bidirecționale, precum și cele mai recente arhitecturi pre-instruite ELMO și BERT. Formulăm concluzii cu privire la performanța cross-domeniu și in-domeniu a fiecărei metode. Nu este surprinzător, BERT s-a dovedit a fi un performer puternic, mai ales în cadrul cross-domeniu. Ceea ce este surprinzător, totuși, este performanța solidă a clasificatorului multinom Naive Bayes relativ simplu, care a performat la fel de bine ca BERT pe mai multe seturi de date.', 'pl': 'Celem niniejszego artykułu jest wykorzystanie wszystkich dostępnych zbiorów danych językowych w celu osiągnięcia jak najlepszej wydajności w nadzorowanej analizie sentymentów krótkich tekstów. Używamy kolekcji tekstów z oznaczonymi sentymentami, takich jak tweety, recenzje filmów i bank sentymentów, w trzech trybach porównywania. W pierwszym badamy wydajność modeli przeszkolonych i testowanych na tej samej kolekcji tekstów przy użyciu standardowej walidacji krzyżowej (in-domain). W drugiej szkolimy modele na wszystkich dostępnych danych z wyjątkiem danej kolekcji testów, którą wykorzystujemy do testowania (jedna vs reszta cross-domena). W trzecim szkolimy model na jednym zbiorze danych i stosujemy go do innego (jeden vs. jeden cross-domain). Porównujemy szeroki zakres metod, w tym uczenie maszynowe na reprezentacji worka-of-words, dwukierunkowe powtarzające się sieci neuronowe oraz najnowsze wstępnie przeszkolone architektury ELMO i BERT. Formułujemy wnioski dotyczące wydajności między domenami i w domenie każdej metody. Nic dziwnego, BERT okazał się silnym wykonawcą, zwłaszcza w kontekście cross-domain. Zaskakujące jest jednak solidne działanie stosunkowo prostego wielomianowego klasyfikatora Naive Bayesa, który sprawdził się równie dobrze jak BERT na kilku zbiorach danych.', 'no': 'Målet til denne papiret er å bruka alle tilgjengelege polsk språk- datasett for å søkja etter den beste mulige utviklinga i oversikte sentimentanalysen av korte tekstar. Vi bruker tekstsamlingar med merkelige sentiment, som tweets, film-reviews og ein sentiment treebank, i tre sammenlikningsmodus. I det første undersøker vi utføringen av modeller som trengte og testerte på samme tekstsamling med standard kryssverding (i domene). I den andre trengen vi modeller på alle tilgjengelege data, unntatt den oppgjevne testsamlinga, som vi brukar for testing (ein vs rest cross-domain). I tredje treng vi eit modell på ein datasett og bruk det til ein annan (ein mot ein krysdomene). Vi samanliknar brei område metodar, inkludert maskinelæring på bagen av ord- representasjon, bidireksjonal rekursjonal neuralnettverk, og dei siste før- trengte arkitekturane ELMO og BERT. Vi formerer konklusjonar om å gjere gjennomsiktige domene og i domene for kvar metode. Uansvarleg viste BERT til å vera ein sterk utfører, spesielt i kryss- domeneinnstillinga. Det som er overraskende er imidlertid solid utvikling av den relativt enkle multinomielle Naive Bayes-klassifiseren, som utførte like godt og BERT på fleire datasett.', 'sr': 'Cilj ovog papira je upotrebu svih dostupnih poljskih jezičkih podataka kako bi tražio najbolje moguće izvedbe u analizi nadzornih sentimenta kratkih tekstova. Koristimo kolekcije teksta sa označenim osjećajima kao što su tweets, filmski pregled i sentimentalni udarac, u tri usporedna režima. Prvo, pregledamo provedbu modela obučenih i testovanih na istoj kolekciji teksta koristeći standardnu krstovalidaciju (u domenu). U drugom treniramo modele na svim dostupnim podacima, osim određene kolekcije testa, koje koristimo za testiranje (jedan protiv ostatka preko domena). Trećem, treniramo model na jednom setu podataka i primjenjujemo ga na drugu (jedan protiv jedne prekršne domene). Uspoređujemo širok raspon metoda uključujući učenje mašine o reprezentaciji vreća riječi, dvodirektivne rekonstruirane neuralne mreže, kao i najnovije predobučene arhitekture ELMO i BERT. Formiramo zaključke o prekršenom domenu i provedbi svake metode u domenu. Nečudno, BERT se ispostavilo da je snažan izvođa č, posebno u postavljanju preko domena. Ono što je iznenađujuće, međutim, je čvrst učinkovit relativno jednostavnog klasifikatora multinomijskog klasifikatora Naive Bayes, koji je proveo isto kao i BERT na nekoliko seta podataka.', 'sv': 'Syftet med denna uppsats är att använda alla tillgängliga polska språkdata för att hitta bästa möjliga resultat i övervakad sentimentalanalys av korta texter. Vi använder textsamlingar med märkt sentiment som tweets, filmrecensioner och en sentiment treebank, i tre jämförelselägen. I det första undersöker vi prestandan hos modeller som tränats och testats på samma textsamling med hjälp av standardkorsvalidering (in-domain). I den andra tränar vi modeller på alla tillgängliga data utom den givna testsamlingen, som vi använder för testning (one vs rest cross-domain). I den tredje tränar vi en modell på en datauppsättning och tillämpar den på en annan (en mot en tvärdomän). Vi jämför ett brett spektrum av metoder, inklusive maskininlärning på säck-of-word representation, dubbelriktade återkommande neurala nätverk samt de senaste förklädda arkitekturerna ELMO och BERT. Vi formulerar slutsatser om cross-domain och in-domain prestanda för varje metod. Inte överraskande visade BERT sig vara en stark aktör, särskilt i gränsöverskridande miljö. Vad som är förvånande är dock att den relativt enkla multinomiska Naive Bayes-klassificeraren presterade lika bra som BERT på flera datauppsättningar.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ ඉලක්කය තමයි පොලිෂ් භාෂා දත්ත සෙට් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් හොඳම ප්\u200dරභාවිත විශ්ලේෂණ විශ අපි පාළ සම්බන්ධයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වගේ ට්විට්, චිත්\u200dරපට පරීක්ෂණයක් සහ හැකියුම් ට්\u200dරීබැන්ක් තුනක් තියෙන මුලින්ම, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය කරලා පරීක්ෂණය කරලා පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්න දෙවෙනි වලින් අපි හැම තොරතුරු ගැන පුළුවන් තොරතුරු පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධයක් විතරයි අපි ප තුන්වෙනි වලින්, අපි මොඩල් එකක් දත්ත සූදානයට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ඒක වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා (එකක් එක අපි විශාල විදියට පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධ විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, බෑග් වචන ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සමහර විදියට ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සඳහා පරීක් අපි හැම ප්\u200dරවේශයක්ම සහ හැම ප්\u200dරවේශයක්ම ප්\u200dරවේශනයක්ම ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා. විශේෂයෙන්ම, BERT විශේෂයෙන් ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරදේශකයෙක් වෙන්න පුළුවන්, විශේෂයෙන්ම ක්\u200dරීස් ඩොම ඒත් පුදුම වෙන්න පුළුවන් දේවල්, සාමාන්\u200dය සාමාන්\u200dය නේව් බේස් විශේෂකයේ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරභාවිතයි, ඒ වගේම BERT වගේම දත්ත', 'so': "Ujeedada warqaddan waa in la isticmaalo dhammaan kooxda aqoonta luqada Boolishka oo dhan si aad u raadsato sameynta suurtagalka ugu wanaagsan baaritaanka maandooriyaha qoraalka gaaban. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa qoraal-qoraal ah oo ku qoran dareemo la qoray, tusaale ahaan Tweetka, wargelinta filimada iyo garsooridda treebank, sadex noocyo isbarbardhig ah. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu baaritaan sameynta sameynta qaababka lagu tababariyey, waxaana lagu tijaabiyey waxyaabaha lagu soo bandhigi karo qoraal isku mid ah oo lagu isticmaalayo aqoonsiga caadiga ah (domain). Second waxan ku tababarinnaa samooyin ku saabsan dhammaan macluumaadka la heli karo oo aan ahayn ururka imtixaanka la siiyey oo aan u isticmaalno imtixaanka (hal vs. gudaha iskuulka ah). Saddexda saddexaadna waxaynu ku tababarinnaa model hal sawir oo ku codsanaynaa mid kale (mid vs. hal iskutar). Waxaynu isbarbardhignaa qaabooyin badan oo kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ah machine barashada ku saabsan qaabka hadalka, shabakadaha neurada ee ku soo socda, iyo meelaha ugu dambeeyay horay loo bartay ELMO iyo BERT. Waxaannu u sameynaa dhamaadyo si ay u baaraato gudaha iyo sameynta gudaha. Si yaab la'aan ah, BERT waxay u muuqatay inuu noqdo shaqo xoog leh, khusuusan marka koronta iskutallaabta ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxa la yaabo waa sameynta kooxaha noocyo yar ee Naive Bayes, kaasoo si siman ah u sameynaya BERT oo ku qoran kooxaha macluumaadka.", 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தின் இலக்கு சிறிய உரைகளின் மேல் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட உணர்வு ஆய்வு நாம் மூன்று ஒப்பிடும் முறைகளில் உரை தொகுப்புகளை உபயோகிக்கிறோம் tweets, filmreview and a sentiment treebank. முதலில், நாம் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளின் செயல்பாட்டை பரிசோதிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் அதே உரை தொகுப்பில் சோதிக்கப்பட் இரண்டாவது முறையில் நாம் அனைத்து கிடைக்கும் தரவுகளிலும் மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்கிறோம். கொடுக்கப்பட்ட சோதனைக்கு தவ மூன்றாவதாக, நாம் ஒரு தரவு அமைப்பில் ஒரு மாதிரியை பயிற்சி மற்றும் மற்றொரு மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் ( ஒன்று  நாம் பல்வேறு முறைகளையும் ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் பாக்-ஆல் வார்த்தைகள் குறிப்பிடுதல் மீது கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் இயந்திரத்தை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம், தொடர்ந்து நி நாம் முடிவுகளை உருவாக்குகிறோம் ஒவ்வொரு முறைமையிலும் களத்தில் முடிவுகள் மற்றும் உள்ள முறைமையில ஆச்சரியமாக, பிரெட் ஒரு வலிமையான இயக்கி தெரிந்தது, குறிப்பிட்ட களம் அமைப்பில். என்ன ஆச்சரியமாக இருக்கிறது என்றாலும் அது சுருக்கமாக சுலபமான பல்டினோமியல் நீவ் பேய் வகுப்பாளரின் செயல்பாடு, அது பல தரவு அமைப்புகளில் ப', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ کا موقع یہ ہے کہ تمام موجود پولیش زبان ڈیٹ سٹوں کو استعمال کرنا ہے کہ چھوٹے ٹیکسٹوں کے تحقیق میں سب سے بہترین ممکن عمل تلاش کریں. ہم تین مقایسہ موڈوں میں لکھی ہوئی احساسات کے ساتھ لکھی ہوئی ٹیکسٹ کالکونٹ استعمال کرتے ہیں جیسے ٹیوٹ، فیلم ریونٹ اور ایک احساسات ٹریبنک۔ پہلی بار، ہم نے نمڈلوں کی عملکرد کی تحقیق کی اور اسی ٹیکسٹ کلکس پر آزمائش کی تھی جو استاندارڈ کرس-والیڈیٹ (ڈومین میں) استعمال کر رہے ہیں۔ دوسرے میں ہم تمام موجودات پر مدلکوں کو ٹرین کریں گے سوائے اس کے جو ہم نے آزمائش کے لئے استعمال کیا ہے (ایک مقابلہ کرس ڈومین کے ساتھ). تیسرے میں، ہم ایک ڈیٹ سٹ پر ایک مدل کی تعلیم دیتے ہیں اور اس کو دوسرے پر لازم کرتے ہیں (ایک کرس ڈیمین کے مقابلہ میں). ہم طریقوں کی وسیع طریقوں کی مقایسہ کررہے ہیں جن میں ماشین کی تعلیم کے ساتھ بوگ کے کلمات کی تصویر، دوبارہ تکرار نئورل نیٹورک اور اگلوں سے پہلے تکرار کی معماری ELMO اور BERT کے بارے میں ہے. ہم ہر طریقہ کے کرس ڈومین اور ڈومین میں کامل کرنے کے لئے نتیجے فرمول کرتے ہیں۔ بغیر تعجب، BERT ایک مضبوط نمایشگر بن گیا، مخصوصا کرس ڈومین تنظیم میں۔ لیکن جو تعجب کرتا ہے، یہ مقابلہ میں سادھا سادھا سادھا سادھا نئیو بیز کلیسٹر کا کام ہے، جس نے بہت سی ڈیٹ سٹوں پر برابر عمل کیا تھا۔', 'uz': "Ushbu qogʻozning maqsad, bir qisqa matnlarni taʼminlovlagan foydalanadigan Polish tili maʼlumot moslamalaridan foydalanish mumkin. Biz Twitter, filmni tahrirlash va hissiyotni uchta moslash usullarda matn tugmalar birikmasidan foydalanamiz. Birinchi yilda, biz o'rganilgan modellarning natijasini ko'rib chiqaramiz va bitta matn toʻplamlarida standard cross-toʻgʻri haqiqiqiyligini tekshirish. Ikkinchi tomonda biz hamma mavjud maʼlumot uchun modellarni o'rganamiz, faqat koʻrsatilgan sinov toʻplami, bu soʻzni tekshirish uchun foydalanamiz (bitta va boshqa shamol domen). In the third, we train a model on one data set and apply it to another one (one vs one cross-domain).  Biz ko'pchilik usullarni o'rganish mashinalarni bir necha so'zlar taqdimotida o'rganish, qaytadan davom etilgan tarmoqni va eng yaqinda o'rganilgan oldingi ishlayotlar ELMO va BERT bilan o'rganish. Biz qo'llanmalarni qo'shish va har bir usuldan foydalanishga qarang. Hech qanday qilib, BERT juda katta ishga tushiruvchi bo'lgan narsa bo'lgan edi. Shunday qilib, bu bir necha maʼlumot tizimida bir necha bir necha bir necha tizimlarda bir oddiy nuqta Naive Bayes klassifisiyasi (BERT) haqida bajariladi.", 'vi': 'Mục đích của tờ giấy này là sử dụng tất cả các bộ dữ liệu ngôn ngữ Ba Lan có sẵn để tìm kiếm hiệu quả tốt nhất có thể trong việc phân tích cảm xúc giám sát các văn bản ngắn. Chúng tôi sử dụng các bộ sưu tập văn bản có cảm xúc được dán nhãn như Twitter, xem phim và nhận xét cảm xúc, trong ba chế độ so sánh. Đầu tiên, chúng tôi kiểm tra khả năng của các mô- đun đã được huấn luyện và thử trên cùng một bộ sưu tập văn bản, dựa theo duyệt chéo tiêu chuẩn (trong miền). Trong giây phút chúng tôi đào tạo các mẫu trên tất cả dữ liệu có sẵn ngoại trừ bộ sưu tập thử, chúng tôi dùng để thử (một v. phần còn lại). Trong phần thứ ba, chúng tôi đào tạo một mô hình trên một bộ dữ liệu và áp dụng nó vào một bộ khác (một v. một miền chéo). Chúng tôi so sánh các phương pháp rộng rãi, bao gồm việc học máy ở các môi trường đại diện lời nhắn, các mạng thần kinh chạy xuyên trực tiếp, cũng như các kiến trúc não được huấn luyện gần đây nhất... ElMO và BERT. Chúng tôi đưa ra kết luận về lợi thế xuyên lục địa và trong lãnh thổ của mỗi phương pháp. Bất khả kháng, BERT hóa ra lại là một diễn viên mạnh mẽ, đặc biệt trong môi trường lai miền. Điều đáng ngạc nhiên là, tỉ lệ đặc trưng của người phân loại Nai Nai Nai sừng tương đối đơn giản, trình diễn cũng như BERT trong nhiều nhóm dữ liệu khác nhau.', 'bg': 'Целта на настоящата статия е да се използват всички налични масиви от данни на полски език, за да се търси възможно най-доброто представяне при контролиран анализ на сентимента на кратки текстове. Използваме текстови колекции с етикет сентименти като туитове, филмови рецензии и сентиментална трибанка, в три режима на сравнение. В първата, изследваме ефективността на модели, обучени и тествани на една и съща текстова колекция, използвайки стандартно кръстосано валидиране (в домейн). Във втория тренираме модели на всички налични данни, с изключение на дадената колекция от тестове, която използваме за тестване (един срещу почивен междудомейн). В третия тренираме модел върху един набор от данни и го прилагаме към друг (един срещу един междудомейн). Сравняваме широк спектър от методи, включително машинно обучение за представяне на торбички от думи, двупосочни повтарящи се невронни мрежи, както и най-новите предварително обучени архитектури ЕЛМО и БЕРТ. Формулираме заключения за междудомейна и вътрешно изпълнение на всеки метод. Не е изненадващо, че BERT се оказа силен изпълнител, особено в междудомейновата обстановка. Изненадващо обаче е солидното представяне на сравнително простия многономен класификатор на Байс, който се представи еднакво добре, както и на няколко набора данни.', 'hr': 'Cilj ovog papira je upotrebu svih dostupnih poljskih jezičkih podataka kako bi tražio najbolje moguće učinkovitost u analizi nadziranog osjećaja kratkih tekstova. Koristimo kolekcije teksta s označenim osjećajima poput tweets, filmskih pregleda i osjećajnog kreveta u tri usporedbe. Prvo smo pregledali učinkovitost modela obučenih i testiranih na istoj kolekciji teksta koristeći standardnu krstovalidaciju (u domenu). U drugom treniramo modele na svim dostupnim podacima osim određene kolekcije testa, koje koristimo za testiranje (jedan protiv ostatka preko domena). U trećem treniramo model na jednom setu podataka i primjenjujemo ga na drugu (jedan protiv jedne prekršne domene). Uspoređujemo širok raspon metoda uključujući učenje strojeva o reprezentaciji vreća riječi, dvodirektivne rekonstruirane neuralne mreže, kao i najnovije predobučene arhitekture ELMO i BERT. Formiramo zaključke o prekršenom domenu i provedbi svake metode u domenu. Nečudno, BERT se ispostavilo da je snažan izvođa č, posebno u postavljanju preko domena. Ono što je iznenađujuće, međutim, je čvrsta učinka relativno jednostavnog klasifikatora multinomijskog klasifikatora Naive Bayes, koji je proveo jednako kao i BERT na nekoliko seta podataka.', 'nl': 'Het doel van dit artikel is om alle beschikbare Poolse taaldatasets te gebruiken om de best mogelijke prestaties te bereiken in begeleide sentimentanalyse van korte teksten. We gebruiken tekstcollecties met gelabelde tekst zoals tweets, filmrecensies en een sentimentboombank, in drie vergelijkingsmodi. In de eerste onderzoeken we de prestaties van modellen die getraind en getest zijn op dezelfde tekstverzameling met behulp van standaard cross-validatie (in-domain). In de tweede training trainen we modellen op alle beschikbare data behalve de opgegeven testverzameling, die we gebruiken voor het testen (one vs rest cross-domein). In de derde trainen we een model op de ene dataset en passen het toe op een andere (één versus één cross-domein). We vergelijken een breed scala aan methoden, waaronder machine learning op bag-of-words representatie, bidirectionele recidivierende neurale netwerken en de meest recente voorgetrainde architecturen ELMO en BERT. We formuleren conclusies over de cross-domein en in-domein prestaties van elke methode. Niet verrassend bleek BERT een sterke performer te zijn, vooral in de cross-domein setting. Wat echter verrassend is, zijn solide prestaties van de relatief eenvoudige multinomiale Naive Bayes classificator, die even goed presteerde als BERT op verschillende datasets.', 'da': 'Målet med denne artikel er at bruge alle tilgængelige polske sprogdatasæt til at søge den bedst mulige præstation i overvåget sentimentalanalyse af korte tekster. Vi bruger tekstsamlinger med mærket sentiment såsom tweets, filmanmeldelser og en sentiment treebank, i tre sammenligningstilstande. I den første undersøger vi ydeevnen af modeller, der er uddannet og testet på samme tekstsamling ved hjælp af standard cross-validering (in-domain). I det andet træner vi modeller på alle tilgængelige data undtagen den givne testsamling, som vi bruger til test (one vs rest cross-domain). I det tredje træner vi en model på ét datasæt og anvender den på et andet (ét mod ét tværgående domæne). Vi sammenligner en bred vifte af metoder, herunder maskinlæring på taske-of-word repræsentation, bidirektionelle tilbagevendende neurale netværk samt de seneste forududdannede arkitekturer ELMO og BERT. Vi formulerer konklusioner om cross-domain og in-domain performance af hver metode. Ikke overraskende viste BERT sig at være en stærk performer, især i tværs af domæner. Det overraskende er imidlertid, at den relativt enkle multinomiske Naive Bayes klassifikation fungerede lige så godt som BERT på flere datasæt.', 'ko': '본고의 목표는 모든 사용 가능한 폴란드어 데이터 집합을 사용하여 짧은 텍스트의 감독 정서 분석에서 최상의 성능을 찾는 것이다.우리는 트위터, 영화 평론, 정서 트리 라이브러리 등 세 가지 비교 모델에서 정서를 표시하는 텍스트 집합을 사용한다.우선, 우리는 표준 교차 검증 (영역에서) 을 사용하여 같은 텍스트 집합에서 훈련하고 테스트한 모델의 성능을 검사합니다.두 번째 테스트에서, 우리는 모든 사용 가능한 데이터에서 테스트를 위한 주어진 테스트 집합 (하나와 다른 크로스 필드) 을 제외하고 모델을 훈련한다.셋째, 우리는 한 데이터 집합에서 하나의 모델을 훈련시키고 이를 다른 데이터 집합(하나와 하나의 크로스 영역)에 응용한다.우리는 단어봉투 표시를 바탕으로 하는 기계 학습, 양방향 귀속 신경 네트워크와 최신 예비 훈련 구조인 ELMO와 BERT를 포함한 여러 가지 방법을 비교했다.우리는 모든 방법의 범위 내와 범위 내 성능에 대해 결론을 얻었다.예상대로 버트는 특히 분야를 뛰어넘는 분야에서 활약했다.그러나 놀랍게도 비교적 간단한 다항식 소박 베일러 분류기의 안정성은 여러 데이터 집합에서 BERT와 마찬가지로 뛰어나다.', 'de': 'Ziel dieser Arbeit ist es, alle verfügbaren polnischen Sprachdatensätze zu nutzen, um die bestmögliche Leistung in der überwachten Stimmungsanalyse von Kurztexten zu erzielen. Wir verwenden Textsammlungen mit beschriftetem Sentiment wie Tweets, Filmrezensionen und eine Sentiment Tree Bank in drei Vergleichsmodi. Zunächst untersuchen wir die Leistungsfähigkeit von Modellen, die an derselben Textsammlung trainiert und getestet wurden, mittels Standard-Cross-Validierung (in-Domain). Im zweiten trainieren wir Modelle auf allen verfügbaren Daten außer der angegebenen Testsammlung, die wir für Tests verwenden (one vs rest cross-domain). Im dritten trainieren wir ein Modell auf einem Datensatz und wenden es auf einen anderen an (ein vs. ein Domänenübergreifender Datensatz). Wir vergleichen eine breite Palette von Methoden, darunter maschinelles Lernen auf Bag-of-Words-Darstellung, bidirektional wiederkehrende neuronale Netze sowie die neuesten vorgetrainierten Architekturen ELMO und BERT. Wir formulieren Schlussfolgerungen zur domänenübergreifenden und domänenübergreifenden Performance jeder Methode. Es überrascht nicht, dass BERT gerade im bereichsübergreifenden Umfeld eine starke Leistung erbracht hat. Überraschend ist jedoch die solide Leistung des relativ einfachen multinomialen Naive Bayes-Klassifikators, der auf mehreren Datensätzen gleich gut abschneidet wie BERT.', 'id': 'Tujuan kertas ini adalah menggunakan semua set data bahasa Polandia yang tersedia untuk mencari prestasi terbaik dalam analisis sentimen yang diawasi dari teks pendek. Kami menggunakan koleksi teks dengan sentimen yang ditabel seperti tweet, ulasan film dan sebuah batang pohon sentimen, dalam tiga modus perbandingan. Pada awalnya, kami memeriksa prestasi model yang dilatih dan diuji pada koleksi teks yang sama menggunakan cross-validation standar (dalam domain). Pada saat kedua kami melatih model pada semua data yang tersedia kecuali koleksi tes yang diberikan, yang kami gunakan untuk menguji (satu vs istirahat cross-domain). In the third, we train a model on one data set and apply it to another one (one vs one cross-domain).  Kami membandingkan jangkauan lebar dari metode termasuk belajar mesin pada representation tas-kata, jaringan neural rekuren bidireksi serta arsitektur terdahulu ELMO dan BERT. We formulate conclusions as to cross-domain and in-domain performance of each method.  Unsurprisingly, BERT ternyata menjadi seorang pemain kuat, terutama dalam pengaturan cross-domain. Yang mengejutkan bagaimanapun, adalah prestasi yang kuat dari klasifikasi multinomial Naive Bayes yang cukup sederhana, yang sama dengan BERT pada beberapa set data.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzyň maksady - gysga metinlerin kontrol edilen duýgular analyzasynda ähli meňzeş polonyça dil maglumatlaryny ulanmak üçin. Biz etiket edilen duýgular bilen týiteler, filmler görüşleri we duýgular çykyşlygyny üç karşılaşyk modunda ulanýarys. Birincisi, eğitilen ve aynı metin koleksiyonunda denetilen modellerin eserini araştırıyoruz. Ikinji wagtda hemme bar maglumatlarda örän modelleri berilen testi koleksiýasyndan başga, testi üçin ulanýarys. Üçüncüsünde, bir veri setinde bir modeli öwrendirip başga bir sahypa uyguladyk (birini cross-domain'a garşy-sahypa garşy-sahypa döredik). Biz makinelerin öwrenmesini bag-of-sözler temsilinde, ikinji tekrarlı näralar şebekelerinde we iňki öňki öňki arhitektarlar ELMO we BERT üzerine karşılaştyrýarys. We formulate conclusions as to cross-domain and in-domain performance of each method. Muharram bolmady, BERT güýçli bir hereketçi bolup göründi, ýöne-ýöne cross-domain düzümlerinde. Ýöne geýinç bolan zady, birnäçe maglumat setirlerinde BERT we ýene-de ýeňil multinomial Naive Bayes klasifikatynyň gaty taýýarlanmagydyr.", 'sw': 'Lengo la gazeti hili ni kutumia seti zote zinazopatikana kwa lugha ya Polish kutafuta ufanisi bora zaidi katika uchambuzi wa hisia za maandishi fupi. Tunatumia mkusanyiko wa maandishi kwa hisia zilizotajwa kama twiti, maoni ya filamu na hisia za mitatu, kwa namna tatu za kulinganisha. Kwanza, tunachunguza performance of models trained and tested on the same collection of text by using standard cross-validation (domain). Katika pili tunafundisha mifano ya taarifa zote zinazopatikana isipokuwa mkusanyiko wa jaribio, ambalo tunatumia kwa ajili ya jaribio (moja na moja dhidi ya mapumziko). Katika tatu, tunamfundisha muundo kwenye seti ya taarifa moja na kuitumia mwingine (moja kwa moja na moja kwa moja). Tunawalinganisha mbinu mbalimbali ikiwa ni pamoja na kujifunza mashine kwenye uwakilizaji wa maneno, mitandao ya neura yanayoendelea kwa muda mrefu pamoja na majengo ya hivi karibuni ya mafunzo ya ELMO na BERT. Tunaweza hitimisho la kupita maeneo na utendaji wa kila njia. Haishangazi, BERT ilionekana kuwa mchezaji wenye nguvu, hasa katika mazingira ya ndani. Kinachotangaza hata hivyo, ni utendaji wa moja kwa moja wa kundi la Naive Bayes, ambalo lilifanya kazi sawa na BERT kwenye seti kadhaa za data.', 'af': "Die doel van hierdie papier is om alle beskikbaar Poolse taal data stelle te gebruik om die beste moontlike prestasie te soek in beskikbaar sentimentanalisie van kort teks te soek. Ons gebruik teks versamelings met etiketeerde sentiment soos tweets, film hersiening en 'n sentiment treebank, in drie vergelyking modus. In die eerste, ons ondersoek die prestasie van modele wat onderwerp en toets is op dieselfde teks versameling met gebruik van standaard kruis-geldigheid (in-domein). In die tweede trein ons modele op alle beskikbare data, behalwe die gegewe toets versameling, wat ons gebruik vir toets (een teen res kruisdomein). In die derde, ons tref 'n model op een data stel en toewend dit na 'n ander een (een teen een kruisdomein). Ons vergelyk wyde omvang van metodes insluitend masjien leer op sak van woorde verteenwoordigheid, bidireksjoneel herhaalde neuralnetwerke en die mees onlangste voorafgeleerde arkitektuure ELMO en BERT. Ons formeer conclusions as om kruis-domein en in-domein-prestasie van elke metode te formeer. Onverwonderbaar, BERT het uitgedraai om 'n sterk uitvoerder te wees, veral in die kruisdomein instelling. Wat is verwonderbaar tog, is solide prestasie van die relativies eenvoudige multinomie Naive Bayes klassifiseerder, wat gelyk as BERT uitgevoer het op verskeie data stelle.", 'fa': 'هدف این کاغذ این است که از تمام مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای زبان لهستانی موجود استفاده کنیم تا بهترین عملکرد امکان را در تحلیل احساسات کوتاه نگاه کنیم. ما از جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای متن با احساسات مشخص شده مثل تویت\u200cها، بررسی\u200cهای فیلم و یک تخت احساسات استفاده می\u200cکنیم، در سه حالت مقایسه. در اولین بار، ما عملکرد مدلهای آموزش یافته و آزمایش کردند در یک مجموعه متن با استفاده از قابلیت متصل استاندارد (در دومین). در دوم ما مدل\u200cها را روی تمام داده\u200cهای موجود آموزش می\u200cدهیم، بجز جمع آزمایش داده شده، که برای آزمایش استفاده می\u200cکنیم (یکی vs. بقیه از دامنه\u200cهای cross-domain). در سوم، ما یک مدل را روی یک مجموعه داده آموزش می دهیم و آن را به یک مجموعه دیگر (یکی بر یکی از مجموعه\u200cهای مختلف). ما از طریق های گسترده\u200cای از روش\u200cها مقایسه می\u200cکنیم که شامل یادگیری ماشین بر روی نمایش کیف\u200cهای کلمات، شبکه\u200cهای عصبی دوباره تکرار می\u200cکنند و ساختارهای اخیر پیش آموزش شده ELMO و BERT را مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. ما نتیجه\u200cهایی را فرمول می\u200cکنیم که انجام\u200cدهنده\u200cی هر روشی از دامنه\u200cهای مختلف و دامنه\u200cای است. بدون تعجب، BERT معلوم شد که یک نمایش\u200cکننده قوی باشد، مخصوصا در تنظیم دامنه\u200cهای مختلف. اما تعجب کننده\u200cای از این است که عملکرد بسیار ساده\u200cای از مجموعه گروه\u200cگر نایو بیز است که در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها به همان اندازه\u200cای انجام می\u200cداد.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի նպատակն է օգտագործել բոլոր հասանելի պոլանդական լեզվի տվյալների համակարգերը լավագույն հնարավոր արդյունքների փնտրելու համար կարճ տեքստների վերահսկվող զգացմունքների վերլուծության մեջ: Մենք օգտագործում ենք տեքստի հավաքածուներ, որոնք նշանակում են թվիթեր, ֆիլմի վերլուծություններ և զգացմունքների ծառի հիմք, երեք համեմատական միջոցներում: Առաջին հերթին մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք նույն տեքստի հավաքածուի վրա սովորեցված և փորձարկված մոդելների արտադրողականությունը, օգտագործելով ստանդարտ խաչը հավաքածությունը (տիեզերքում): Երկրորդ ընթացքում մենք վարժեցնում ենք մոդելները բոլոր հասանելի տվյալների վրա, բացի տվյալ փորձարկումների հավաքածուից, որը մենք օգտագործում ենք փորձարկումների համար (մեկը համեմատած հանգստի խաչվայրի հետ): Երրորդ մասում մենք պատրաստում ենք մի մոդել մեկ տվյալների համակարգի վրա և կիրառում այն մեկ այլ (մեկը համեմատած մեկ խաչվայրի) վրա: Մենք համեմատում ենք բազմաթիվ մեթոդներ, ներառյալ մեքենային ուսումնասիրությունը բառերի պայուսակի ներկայացման, երկու ուղղությամբ կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցերի վրա, ինչպես նաև վերջին նախապատրաստված ճարտարապետական կառուցվածքների ELMo Մենք ձևավորում ենք եզրակացություններ յուրաքանչյուր մեթոդի արտադրողության շրջանակներում: Բայց անզարմանալի է, որ ԲԵՌՏը պարզվեց ուժեղ ներկայացուցիչ, հատկապես միջոցառության մեջ: Սակայն զարմանալի է, որ համեմատաբար պարզ բազմաnomiալ Նայվ Բեյզ դասակարգիչը, որը նույնքան լավ արեց և BER-ը մի քանի տվյալների համակարգերի վրա:', 'sq': 'Qëllimi i kësaj artikulli është të përdorësh të gjitha të dhënat në dispozicion të gjuhës polake për të kërkuar performancën më të mirë të mundshme në analizën e ndjenjave të mbikqyrura të teksteve të shkurtra. Ne përdorim koleksione teksti me ndjenja të etiketuar të tilla si tweet, revista të filmit dhe një bazë pemësh të ndjenjave, në tre modalitete krahasimi. Në fillim, ne e shqyrtojmë performancën e modeleve të stërvitur dhe të testuar në të njëjtin koleksion teksti duke përdorur kryqëvalimin standard (në domeni). Në të dytën ne trajnojmë modele në të gjitha të dhënat e disponueshme përveç koleksionit të dhënë të testit, të cilin ne përdorim për testimin (një vs pushim kryq-domeni). Në të tretën, ne trajnojmë një model në një set të dhënash dhe e aplikojmë në një tjetër (një kundër një kryq-domeni). Ne krahasojmë një gamë të gjerë metodash duke përfshirë mësimin e makinave në përfaqësimin e çantës së fjalëve, rrjetet nervore të përsëritura dy-drejtuese si dhe arkitekturat më të fundit të paratrajnuara ELMO dhe BERT. Ne formulojmë përfundime në lidhje me shfaqjen në domeni dhe në domeni të çdo metode. Pa çudi, BERT doli të jetë një interpretues i fortë, veçanërisht në ambientin ndërdomenik. Ajo që është befasuese megjithatë, është performanca e fortë e klasifikuesit relativisht të thjeshtë të Naive Bayes, i cili veproi në mënyrë të barabartë si BERT në disa grupe të dhënash.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে সকল পোলিশ ভাষার তথ্য সেট ব্যবহার করার জন্য সংক্ষিপ্ত লেখার বিশ্লেষণের মধ্যে সর্বোচ্চ সম্ভাব্য প্ আমরা টুইট, চলচ্চিত্র পর্যবেক্ষণ এবং অনুভূতির তিনটি তুলনায় লেখা অনুভূতি দিয়ে টেক্সট সংগ্রহ ব্যবহার করি। প্রথমতে, আমরা মডেলের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা এবং একই টেক্সট সংগ্রহে পরীক্ষা করি স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার ক্রস-বৈধ ব্যবহার করে (ডোমেইন)। দ্বিতীয় পরীক্ষা সংগ্রহ ব্যতীত প্রাপ্ত তথ্য সম্পর্কে আমরা মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করি, যা পরীক্ষার জন্য আমরা ব্যবহার করি (বিশ্রাম ক্রস- তৃতীয় মাসে আমরা একটি ডাটা সেটে একটি মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করি এবং এটি অন্যের কাছে প্রয়োগ করি (একটি বিপরীত ক্রস-ডোমেইন)। আমরা ব্যাগ-অফ-ওয়ার্ড প্রতিনিধিত্বে মেশিনের শিক্ষা প্রচুর পদ্ধতির তুলনা করি এবং সাম্প্রতিক প্রশিক্ষিত পূর্ববর্তী প্রতিষ্ঠানগুলো ইএলএমও এবং বিরেট আমরা প্রত্যেক পদ্ধতির প্রান্ত এবং ডোমেইন প্রদর্শনের সমাধান নির্ধারণ করি। আশ্চর্যজনকভাবে বিরেট একজন শক্তিশালী প্রদর্শক হিসেবে মনে হচ্ছিল, বিশেষ করে ক্রস-ডোমেইন সেটিং এ। What is surprising however, is solid performance of the relatively simple multinomial Naive Bayes classifier, which performed equally well as BERT on several data sets.', 'az': 'Bu kağızın məqsədi, qısa metinlərin gözləyirlən hisslərin analizi ilə ən yaxşı mümkün mümkün performans axtarmaq üçün polonya dil məlumatlarını istifadə etməkdir. Üç karşılaşdırma modunda, tweets, film görüntüləri və sentiment çubuğu kimi etiketli duyguları ilə mətn koleksiyonlarını istifadə edirik. İlk dəfə, təhsil edilmiş və təhsil edilmiş modellərin performansını təhsil edirik və aynı metin koleksiyonundan test edirik. İkinci dəfə bütün mümkün verilən məlumatlar üzərində modelləri təhsil edirik, verilən test koleksiyonu istisna etmək üçün istifadə edirik. Üçüncüsündə, bir məlumat qutusunda modeli təhsil edirik və onu başqa bir dəstəyə uygulayırıq (bir dəstə-dəstə-dəstə-dəstə-dəstə). Biz makinelərin öyrənməsi barəsində çoxlu metodları ilə birlikdə müxtəlif şəkilləri ilə dəyişdiririk ki, yenidən təhsil edilmiş arhitektarlar ELMO və BERT. Biz hər metodun qarşılıqlı domena və domena işlətməsi barəsindəki sonuçları formüləyirik. Bu təəccüblənməz ki, BERT qüvvətli performer oldu, özlərinə də qarşılaşdırılmış domena quruluşunda. Ancaq təəccüblənən şey, çoxlu məlumat qurularında BERT eyni zamanda işlədən çox asanlıq Naive Bayes klasifikatının sabit performansıdır.', 'am': 'የዚህ ፕሮግራም ጉዳዩ የፖሊስ ቋንቋ ዳታዎችን ሁሉ ለመጠቀም የቻልሙን የስሜት እውቀት ጽሑፎችን ለመጠየቅ ነው፡፡ የጽሑፍ ጉዳይ፣ በትዊተር፣ ፊልዮ ጉዳይ እና ስሜት ቴርብባን በሦስት ተሳያይነናል፡፡ በመጀመሪያው፣ የምናስተምረው እና በአንድ የጽሑፍ ክፍል የተጠቃሚ መስመር ማድረጊያውን (በdomain) በመጠቀም እንሞክራለን፡፡ በሁለተኛው ክፍተት ካልተፈተናው በቀር የተሰጠውን የዳታ ሁሉ ምሳሌዎችን እናስተምረዋለን፡፡ በሦስተኛውም ሞዴል በአንድ ዳታ ማሰሪያ ላይ እናስተምረዋለን እና ሌላውን ለመስቀል እናስጠጋታለን (አንዱን vs አንዱን መስቀል-domain). አካባቢ-የቃላት መልዕክት፣ በጥያቄ የደዌብ መረብ እና የቀድሞው ቀድሞ ተማሪ መሠረት ELMO እና BERT እንደተጨማሪን እናሳያታለን፡፡ የድምፅ ውይይት እና የውይይት ውይይት መፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ ባይደነቂው፣ BERT በጣም ብርቱ ፈቃድ ሆኖ፣ በተለይም በመስቀል መስቀል ውስጥ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን የሚደነቅ ነገር፣ በብዙ ዳታ ማዕከላዊ የናዊ ባይስ ክፍለ ገቢ ነው፡፡', 'bs': 'Cilj ovog papira je upotrebu svih dostupnih poljskih seta podataka kako bi tražio najbolje moguće izvođenje u analizi nadzornih osjećaja kratkih tekstova. Koristimo kolekcije teksta sa označenim osjećajima kao što su tweets, filmski pregled i sentimentalni udarac, u tri usporedna režima. Prvo, pregledamo provedbu modela obučenih i testovanih na istoj kolekciji teksta koristeći standardnu krstovalidaciju (u domenu). U drugom treniramo modele na svim dostupnim podacima osim određene kolekcije testa, koju koristimo za testiranje (jedan protiv ostatka preko domena). U trećem treniramo model na jednom setu podataka i primjenjujemo ga na drugu (jedan protiv jedne prekršne domene). Uspoređujemo širok raspon metoda uključujući učenje mašine o reprezentaciji vreća riječi, dvodirektivne rekonstruirane neuralne mreže, kao i najnovije predobučene arhitekture ELMO i BERT. Formiramo zaključke o prekršenom domenu i provedbi svake metode u domenu. Nečudno, BERT se ispostavilo da je snažan izvođa č, posebno u postavljanju preko domena. Ono što je iznenađujuće, međutim, je čvrsta učinka relativno jednostavnog klasifikatora multinomijskog klasifikatora Naive Bayes, koji je proveo jednako kao i BERT na nekoliko seta podataka.', 'ca': "L'objectiu d'aquest paper és utilitzar tots els conjunts de dades de llenguatge polac disponibles per buscar el millor rendiment possible en l'anàlisi sentimental supervisada de textos curts. Utilitzem col·leccions de text amb sentiments etiquetats com tweets, crítiques de pel·lícules i un banc d'arbres de sentiments, en tres mods de comparació. En primer lloc, examinem el rendiment de models entrenats i testats en la mateixa col·lecció de textos fent servir la validació cruzada estándar (en domini). En el segon temps entrenem models en totes les dades disponibles excepte la col·lecció de proves, que utilitzem per a provar (un vs descansa de domini cruz). In the third, we train a model on one data set and apply it to another one (one vs one cross-domain).  Comparem una gran varietat de mètodes, com l'aprenentatge de màquines en representació de sacs de paraules, xarxes neurals recurrents bidireccionals i les arquitectures més recents, ELMO i BERT. Formulem conclusions sobre el rendiment transdomínic i en domini de cada mètode. Insorprenentment, el BERT va resultar ser un actor fort, especialment en el contexte transfrontal. Però el que és sorprenent és que el classificador multinòmic relativament simple de Naive Bayes, que va funcionar igualment bé com BERT en diversos conjunts de dades.", 'cs': 'Cílem tohoto článku je využít všechny dostupné datové sady polského jazyka k hledání co nejlepšího výkonu při kontrolované sentimentní analýze krátkých textů. Používáme textové sbírky s označenými sentimenty, jako jsou tweety, recenze filmů a stromová banka sentimentů, ve třech režimech srovnání. V první části zkoumáme výkonnost modelů trénovaných a testovaných na stejné sbírce textů pomocí standardní křížové validace (in-domain). Ve druhém trénujeme modely na všech dostupných datech kromě dané sbírky testů, kterou používáme pro testování (one vs rest cross-domain). Ve třetím trénujeme model na jedné datové sadě a aplikujeme ho na další (jeden vs jeden cross-domain). Porovnáváme širokou škálu metod včetně strojového učení na reprezentaci sáčku slov, obousměrných rekurentních neuronových sítí a nejnovějších předškolených architektur ELMO a BERT. Formulujeme závěry ohledně cross-domain a in-domain výkonnosti každé metody. Není divu, že BERT se ukázal jako silný výkon, zejména v rámci různých domén. Co je však překvapující, je solidní výkon relativně jednoduchého multinomiálního Naive Bayesova klasifikátoru, který vedl stejně dobře jako BERT na několika datových sadách.', 'et': 'Käesoleva töö eesmärk on kasutada kõiki olemasolevaid poola keele andmekogumeid, et otsida parimat võimalikku tulemust lühikeste tekstide kontrollitud sentimentaalüüsis. Kasutame kolme võrdlusrežiimis tekstikollektsioone, millel on sildistatud tunded, näiteks säutsud, filmide ülevaated ja tundete puupank. Esimeses uurime samas tekstikogus koolitatud ja testitud mudelite jõudlust standardse ristvalideerimise (in-domain) abil. Teises treenime mudeleid kõigi olemasolevate andmete põhjal, välja arvatud antud testikogumi, mida kasutame testimiseks (üks vs puhkepiirkond). Kolmandas treenime mudelit ühel andmekogumil ja rakendame seda teisel (üks vs üks valdkondadevaheline). Me võrdleme laia valikut meetodeid, sealhulgas masinõpet sõnakoti esitamisel, kahesuunalistel korduvatel närvivõrkudel ning kõige uuemaid eelõpetatud arhitektuure ELMO ja BERT. Sõnastame järeldused iga meetodi valdkonnaülese ja valdkonnaülese tulemuslikkuse kohta. Pole üllatav, et BERT osutus tugevaks esinejaks, eriti valdkondadevahelises kontekstis. Üllatav on aga suhteliselt lihtsa mitmekordse Naive Bayesi klassifikaatori tugev tulemus, mis suutis mitmetel andmekogumitel sama hästi kui BERT.', 'fi': 'Tämän artikkelin tavoitteena on käyttää kaikkia saatavilla olevia puolan kielen aineistoja parhaan mahdollisen suorituskyvyn löytämiseksi lyhyiden tekstien valvotussa tunneanalyysissä. Käytämme tekstikokoelmia, joissa on tunnisteita, kuten twiittejä, elokuvaarvosteluja ja tunnepuupalkkia kolmessa vertailutilassa. Ensimmäisessä tarkastellaan samassa tekstikokoelmassa koulutettujen ja testattujen mallien suorituskykyä standardinmukaisella ristikkäisvalidoinnilla (in-domain). Toisessa vaiheessa harjoittelemme malleja kaikilla saatavilla olevilla tiedoilla paitsi annetulla testikokoelmalla, jota käytämme testaukseen (yksi vs lepoalue cross domain). Kolmannessa harjoittelemme mallia yhteen datajoukkoon ja sovellamme sitä toiseen (yksi vs yksi cross-domain). Vertaamme monenlaisia menetelmiä, kuten koneoppimista sanapussin esittämisessä, kaksisuuntaisia toistuvia hermoverkkoja sekä uusimpia esikoulutettuja arkkitehtuureja ELMO ja BERT. Teemme johtopäätöksiä kunkin menetelmän monialaisesta ja sisäisestä suorituskyvystä. Ei ole yllättävää, että BERT osoittautui vahvaksi toimijaksi erityisesti monialaisessa ympäristössä. Yllättävää kuitenkin on suhteellisen yksinkertaisen monikäyttöisen Naive Bayes -luokituksen vankka suorituskyky, joka suoriutui yhtä hyvin kuin BERT useissa datasarjoissa.', 'jv': 'goal Awak dhéwé éntuk kelompok texting karo penting nggambar luwih (Tuytes, Ndelen film lan nganggo cara-cara amben) lan nganggo perantahaan langgar sampeyan tresno. Nang isih, kita surat banjur akeh model sing tukang mroban lan ujian sisain ing kok sampek teks nggawe winih (in-domain). Mungkin segondi, we luwih model lan kabeh gambar data liyane mung pisan sampek ujian, sing nyimpen nggo testing (one against resting krus-domain). Nang wis telu, we jeremut model nang saben data setung banjur ngewehku kuwi wis ana (one against one krus-domain). Anyone We formate concludes as to pass-domain and in-domain success of every method. Ngubah kok, BERT milih ketemut kanggo langgar-langgar, ngomong nek mulai-ngenggo dolanan. Awak dhéwé, sing paling nggalakno uwong gak adhil karo perusahaan multinomer, sampeyan bayes sing sampeyan ngono BERT nang sampeyan dadi.', 'he': 'המטרה של הנייר הזה היא להשתמש בכל קבוצות נתונים על שפת פולנית זמינות כדי לחפש את ההופעה הטובה ביותר אפשרית בניתוח רגשות על טקסטים קצרים. אנו משתמשים באספות טקסטים עם רגשות מסומנים כמו טוויטים, ביקורות סרטים ובנק עץ רגשות, בשלושה דרכים השוואה. בהתחלה, אנחנו בודקים את ההופעה של דוגמנים מאומנים ובדיקות על אותו אוסף טקסטים באמצעות אישור צלב סטנדרטי (בתחום). בשנייה אנו מאמן דוגמנים על כל נתונים זמינים מלבד אוסף הבדיקות הנתון, שאנחנו משתמשים בו לבדיקות (אחת נגד השאר תחת תחום). In the third, we train a model on one data set and apply it to another one (one vs one cross-domain).  We compare wide range of methods including machine learning on bag-of-words representation, bidirectional recurrent neural networks as well as the most recent pre-trained architectures ELMO and BERT.  אנחנו מתייצבים מסקנות לגבי ביצועים חוצות בתחום ובתוצאות בתחום של כל שיטה. באופן בלתי מפתיע, ברט התברר להיות מופע חזק, במיוחד בסביבת השטח. מה שמפתיע בכל אופן, הוא ביצועים מוצקים של מסגרת הבייס המולטלנומית הפשוטה יחסית, שהופעה באותה מידה כמו BERT על מספר קבוצות נתונים.', 'sk': 'Cilj tega prispevka je uporabiti vse razpoložljive nabore podatkov o poljskem jeziku za iskanje najboljše možne uspešnosti pri nadzorovani analizi sentimenta kratkih besedil. V treh načinih primerjave uporabljamo besedilne zbirke z označenimi občutki, kot so tweeti, ocene filmov in treebanka občutkov. V prvem smo preučili učinkovitost modelov, usposobljenih in testiranih na isti zbirki besedil s standardno navzkrižno validacijo (in-domain). V drugem treningu modele treniramo na vseh razpoložljivih podatkih, razen na dani zbirki testov, ki jo uporabljamo za testiranje (ena vs. počitek). V tretjem delu usposabljamo model na enem naboru podatkov in ga uporabljamo na drugem (en proti en meddomen). Primerjamo široko paleto metod, vključno s strojnim učenjem prikazovanja vrečk besed, dvosmernimi ponavljajočimi se nevronskimi omrežji ter najnovejšimi predhodno usposobljenimi arhitekturami ELMO in BERT. Oblikujemo zaključke o meddomenskem in notranjem delovanju vsake metode. Ni presenetljivo, da se je BERT izkazal za močnega izvajalca, zlasti v meddomenskem okolju. Kar pa je presenetljivo, je trdna uspešnost relativno preprostega multinomskega Bayesovega klasifikatorja, ki je na več podatkovnih nizikih enako dobro kot BERT.', 'ha': "Gagon wannan takarda na yi amfani da duk data na lugha Polish masu iya amfani da shi dõmin ya nẽmi mafi kyaun aikin da aka tsare shi a Analyze na hisitant na rubutun ƙaranci. Tuna amfani da takardar matsayin da aka yi taƙaita da sauri kamar Twitter, mai garwaya na filamu da wani hoto na mitebank, cikin misalin uku. Na farkon, za'a jarraba aikin misãlai wanda aka sanar da shi kuma aka jarraba a kan duk matsayin da ke amfani da tsarin-koronto na daidaita (cikin-Domen). Dukkan da Muke kõra misãlai kan duk data wanda ake iya samansa fãce kayan samun jarraba da aka ba, wanda Muke amfani da shi dõmin jarraba (guda versa tsakanin-sararin). Ga na ukunsa, za'a kõre wata motsi kan daidaita taki guda, kuma mu sami shi zuwa wani na guda (guda versa guda ta tsumare). Tuna samfani masu yawa game da shiryoyin ayuka, kamar kafin da ake karanta a kan masu tsari ga-bags-words, zane da garwaya masu sakan da ke daura, da masu ƙarshen tarakiki na farko da aka sanar da shi ELMO da BERT. Kuma Munã rarraba fassaran kõwane hanyõyi dõmin a shiga guda da a cikin guda. Unsurprisingly, BERT turned out to be a strong performer, especially in the cross-domain setting.  Amma abin da ke mai ban mãkirci, shi ne mai tsaye na fasalin mai sauƙi na Naive Bayes, wanda ya yi aiki daidai da kuma BERT a kan wasu matsayin data.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་སྤྱོད་པའི་པོ་ལིའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གསལ We use text collections with labelled sentiment such as tweets, movie reviews and a sentiment treebank, in three comparison modes. In the first, we examine the performance of models trained and tested on the same text collection using standard cross-validation (in-domain). In the second we train models on all available data except the given test collection, which we use for testing (one vs rest cross-domain). In the third, we train a model on one data set and apply it to another one (one vs one cross-domain). We compare wide range of methods including machine learning on bag-of-words representation, bidirectional recurrent neural networks as well as the most recent pre-trained architectures ELMO and BERT. We formulate conclusions as to cross-domain and in-domain performance of each method. མ་འཕགས་པ་སྦེ། BERT turned out to be a strong performer, especially in the cross-domain setting. ཡིན་ནའང་། བཀྲམ་སྣང་གྲངས་ཀ་ནི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་རྣམ་པ་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟབས་བདེ་བོ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Improving Named Entity Linking Corpora Quality', 'ar': 'تحسين جودة المؤسسات المرتبطة بالكيان المحدد', 'pt': 'Melhorar a qualidade do corpora de vinculação de entidades nomeadas', 'fr': 'Améliorer la qualité des corpus liés aux entités nommées', 'es': 'Mejorar la calidad de los cuerpos de las entidades nombradas', 'ja': '命名されたエンティティのリンクコーポラ品質の向上', 'hi': 'कॉर्पोरेट गुणवत्ता को जोड़ने वाली नामित इकाई में सुधार करना', 'zh': '崇名实体链接语料库质', 'ru': 'Улучшение качества именованной сущности, связывающей корпорации', 'ga': 'Feabhas a chur ar Cháilíocht Chorpóra um Nascadh Aonáin Ainmnithe', 'ka': 'სახელი ინტერტის კოპორის კაalitეტის გაუქმედება', 'hu': 'A Corpora minőségének javítása', 'el': 'Βελτίωση της ποιότητας σύνδεσης σώματος με ονομαστική οντότητα', 'it': 'Miglioramento della qualità dei Corpora', 'lt': 'Pavadintų subjektų, jungiančių korporas, kokybės gerinimas', 'mk': 'Подобрување на квалитетот на корпората за поврзување со именуваниот ентитет', 'kk': 'Аталған нысандарды сілтемелеу корпора сапасы', 'mt': 'Titjib tal-Kwalità tal-Korpora ta’ Konnessjoni ta’ Entità Ismija', 'ml': 'പേരിട്ട എന്റിറ്റിറ്റി ലിങ്ങ് കോര്\u200dപ്പോറാ ഗുണവും മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു', 'ms': 'Menembak Kualiti Korpora Pempautan Entiti bernama', 'mn': 'Шинэ нэрлэгдсэн нэгж холбоотой холбоотой сайн сайжруулах', 'pl': 'Poprawa jakości korpusu łączącego nazwane podmioty', 'no': 'Forbetra korporkvalitet', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea calității Corpora care leagă entitățile denumite', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje kvalitete korpore imenovanih entiteta', 'so': 'Improvement Entity Linking Corpora Quality', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Förbättra kvaliteten på Corpora med namngivna enheter', 'ta': 'Improving Named Entity Linking Corpora Quality', 'ur': 'نام لینک انٹیٹی کی کورپورا کیلوٹی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sửa đổi chất lượng đột biến.', 'bg': 'Подобряване на качеството на корпоративното свързване на името на субекта', 'da': 'Forbedring af sammenkædning af navngivne enheder', 'nl': 'Verbetering van de kwaliteit van het gekoppelde korpora met naam', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje kvalitete korporacije', 'de': 'Verbesserung der Qualität der Verknüpfung mit benannten Entitäten', 'fa': 'بهتر کردن کیفیت ارتباط شرکت نامیده', 'ko': '명명 실체 링크 자료 라이브러리의 질을 향상시키다', 'tr': 'Adlanylan Mazmunlary Gaýşartma Ködlemeleri', 'id': 'Menembak Kualitas Korpora Menghubung Entitas bernama', 'sw': 'Kuboresha Ujumbe wa Kuunganisha Korpora', 'sq': 'Improving Named Entity Linking Corpora Quality', 'am': 'ቦታ፦', 'af': 'Verbeter Genaamde Entiteit Linking Korpora Kwaliteit', 'az': 'ńįsiml…ônmiŇü Entity Linking C…ônn…ôtl…ôri √úst…ôlik', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje kvalitete korpore imenovanih entiteta', 'bn': 'Name', 'hy': 'Improving Named Entity Linking Corpora Quality', 'et': 'Nimetatud üksuste ühendamise kvaliteedi parandamine', 'ca': 'Mellorar la qualitat de la corporació que enllaça una entitat anomenada', 'cs': 'Zlepšení kvality propojení korpusu pojmenovaných entit', 'fi': 'Nimettyjen yksikköjen linkittämisen laadun parantaminen', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'שיפור איכות תאגיד חיבור איכות איכות', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje kakovosti imenovanega subjekta, ki povezuje korpuse', 'bo': 'མིང་ཡོད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་དང་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་ཚད་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང'}
{'en': 'Gold standard corpora and competitive evaluations play a key role in benchmarking named entity linking (NEL) performance and driving the development of more sophisticated NEL systems. The quality of the used corpora and the used evaluation metrics are crucial in this process. We, therefore, assess the quality of three popular evaluation corpora, identifying four major issues which affect these gold standards : (i) the use of different annotation styles, (ii) incorrect and missing annotations, (iii) Knowledge Base evolution, (iv) and differences in annotating co-occurrences. This paper addresses these issues by formalizing NEL annotations and corpus versioning which allows standardizing corpus creation, supports corpus evolution, and paves the way for the use of lenses to automatically transform between different corpus configurations. In addition, the use of clearly defined scoring rules and evaluation metrics ensures a better comparability of evaluation results.', 'ar': 'تلعب المؤسسات ذات المعيار الذهبي والتقييمات التنافسية دورًا رئيسيًا في قياس أداء ربط الكيانات المسماة (NEL) ودفع تطوير أنظمة NEL الأكثر تعقيدًا. تعتبر جودة الهيئة المستخدمة ومقاييس التقييم المستخدمة حاسمة في هذه العملية. لذلك ، نقوم بتقييم جودة ثلاث هيئات تقييم شعبية ، وتحديد أربع قضايا رئيسية تؤثر على هذه المعايير الذهبية: (1) استخدام أنماط التعليقات التوضيحية المختلفة ، (2) التعليقات التوضيحية غير الصحيحة والمفقودة ، (3) تطور قاعدة المعرفة ، (4) ) والاختلافات في شرح التكرارات المشتركة. تتناول هذه الورقة هذه المشكلات من خلال إضفاء الطابع الرسمي على شروح NEL وإصدار مجموعة النصوص التي تسمح بتوحيد إنشاء المجموعة ، وتدعم تطور المجموعة ، وتمهد الطريق لاستخدام العدسات للتحول تلقائيًا بين تكوينات الجسم المختلفة. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يضمن استخدام قواعد تسجيل النقاط المحددة بوضوح ومقاييس التقييم إمكانية مقارنة نتائج التقييم بشكل أفضل.', 'fr': "Les corpus de référence et les évaluations concurrentielles jouent un rôle clé dans l'évaluation comparative des performances NEL (NEL) et dans le développement de systèmes NEL plus sophistiqués. La qualité des corpus utilisés et des mesures d'évaluation utilisées sont cruciales dans ce processus. Nous évaluons donc la qualité de trois corpus d'évaluation populaires, en identifiant quatre problèmes majeurs qui affectent ces normes de référence\xa0: (i) l'utilisation de différents styles d'annotation, (ii) les annotations incorrectes et manquantes, (iii) l'évolution de la base de connaissances, (iv) et les différences dans les cooccurrences d'annotation. Cet article aborde ces questions en formalisant les annotations NEL et la gestion des versions de corpus, ce qui permet de standardiser la création de corpus, prend en charge l'évolution des corpus et ouvre la voie à l'utilisation de lentilles pour transformer automatiquement entre différentes configurations de corpus. En outre, l'utilisation de règles de notation et de mesures d'évaluation clairement définies garantit une meilleure comparabilité des résultats d'évaluation.", 'pt': 'Corpora padrão-ouro e avaliações competitivas desempenham um papel fundamental no benchmarking do desempenho da ligação de entidades nomeadas (NEL) e na condução do desenvolvimento de sistemas NEL mais sofisticados. A qualidade dos corpora utilizados e as métricas de avaliação utilizadas são cruciais neste processo. Assim, avaliamos a qualidade de três corpora de avaliação populares, identificando quatro grandes questões que afetam esses padrões-ouro: (i) o uso de diferentes estilos de anotação, (ii) anotações incorretas e ausentes, (iii) evolução da base de conhecimento, (iv ) e diferenças na anotação de co-ocorrências. Este artigo aborda essas questões formalizando anotações NEL e versionamento de corpus que permite padronizar a criação de corpus, suporta a evolução de corpus e abre caminho para o uso de lentes para transformar automaticamente entre diferentes configurações de corpus. Além disso, o uso de regras de pontuação e métricas de avaliação claramente definidas garante uma melhor comparabilidade dos resultados da avaliação.', 'es': 'Los corpus de referencia y las evaluaciones competitivas desempeñan un papel clave en la evaluación comparativa del rendimiento de la vinculación de entidades denominadas (NEL) e impulsan el desarrollo de sistemas NEL más sofisticados. La calidad de los cuerpos utilizados y las métricas de evaluación utilizadas son cruciales en este proceso. Por lo tanto, evaluamos la calidad de tres corpus de evaluación populares, identificando cuatro problemas principales que afectan estos estándares de oro: (i) el uso de diferentes estilos de anotación, (ii) anotaciones incorrectas y faltantes, (iii) evolución de la base de conocimientos, (iv) y diferencias en la anotación de ocurrencias conjuntas. Este documento aborda estos problemas formalizando las anotaciones NEL y el control de versiones de corpus, lo que permite estandarizar la creación de corpus, admite la evolución del corpus y allana el camino para el uso de lentes para transformar automáticamente entre diferentes configuraciones de corpus. Además, el uso de reglas de calificación y métricas de evaluación claramente definidas garantiza una mejor comparabilidad de los resultados de la evaluación.', 'ja': '金本位制のコーラと競争的評価は、名前付きエンティティをベンチマークし、（ NEL ）パフォーマンスをリンクし、より洗練されたNELシステムの開発を推進する上で重要な役割を果たします。このプロセスでは、使用されたコーポラルの品質と使用された評価指標が重要です。したがって、私たちは3つの人気のある評価団体の品質を評価し、これらのゴールドスタンダードに影響を与える4つの主要な問題を特定します。（ i ）異なる注釈スタイルの使用、（ ii ）誤った注釈と欠落している注釈、（ iii ）ナレッジベースの進化、（ iv ）注釈の併発の違い。この論文は、コーパスの作成を標準化し、コーパスの進化をサポートし、異なるコーパス構成間で自動的に変換するレンズの使用のための道を開くことを可能にする、NELアノテーションとコーパスのバージョン管理を形式化することによって、これらの問題に対処する。さらに、明確に定義されたスコアルールと評価指標を使用することで、評価結果の比較性が向上します。', 'zh': '黄金之准语料库与竞争性评名实链接 (NEL) 性能准测推移 NEL 系统开关键作用。 凡此诸事,语料库质与用料指标至重。 故估三行语料库之量,定其四要:(i)异注式,(ii)非阙注,(iii)知识库之变,(iv)与注同异。 本文因形式化NEL注及语料库版本控制以决之,此许标准化语料库创建,支语料库演变,并为用镜头于异语料库配置之间自转铺平道路。 此外用明义评分则指标可保其可比性。', 'ru': 'Корпорации золотого стандарта и конкурентные оценки играют ключевую роль в сравнительном анализе именованной сущности, увязывая (NEL) производительность и стимулируя развитие более сложных систем NEL. Качество используемых корпусов и используемые оценочные показатели имеют решающее значение в этом процессе. Поэтому мы оцениваем качество трех популярных оценочных корпораций, выявляя четыре основных вопроса, которые влияют на эти золотые стандарты: i) использование различных стилей аннотаций, ii) неправильные и отсутствующие аннотации, iii) эволюция базы знаний, iv) и различия в совместном использовании аннотаций. Эта статья решает эти вопросы путем формализации аннотаций NEL и версии корпуса, которая позволяет стандартизировать создание корпуса, поддерживает эволюцию корпуса и прокладывает путь для использования линз для автоматического преобразования между различными конфигурациями корпуса. Кроме того, использование четко определенных правил оценки и оценочных показателей обеспечивает лучшую сопоставимость результатов оценки.', 'hi': 'गोल्ड स्टैंडर्ड कॉर्पोरेट और प्रतिस्पर्धी मूल्यांकन नामित इकाई लिंकिंग (एनईएल) प्रदर्शन को बेंचमार्क करने और अधिक परिष्कृत एनईएल प्रणालियों के विकास को चलाने में महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाते हैं। उपयोग किए गए कॉर्पोरेट की गुणवत्ता और उपयोग किए गए मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक इस प्रक्रिया में महत्वपूर्ण हैं। इसलिए, हम तीन लोकप्रिय मूल्यांकन कॉर्पोरेट की गुणवत्ता का आकलन करते हैं, चार प्रमुख मुद्दों की पहचान करते हैं जो इन सोने के मानकों को प्रभावित करते हैं: (i) विभिन्न एनोटेशन शैलियों का उपयोग, (ii) गलत और लापता एनोटेशन, (iii) नॉलेज बेस विकास, (iv) और एनोटेटिंग सह-घटनाओं में अंतर। यह पेपर एनईएल एनोटेशन और कॉर्पस संस्करण को औपचारिक रूप देकर इन मुद्दों को संबोधित करता है जो कॉर्पस निर्माण को मानकीकृत करने की अनुमति देता है, कॉर्पस विकास का समर्थन करता है, और लेंस के उपयोग के लिए विभिन्न कॉर्पस कॉन्फ़िगरेशन के बीच स्वचालित रूप से बदलने का मार्ग प्रशस्त करता है। इसके अलावा, स्पष्ट रूप से परिभाषित स्कोरिंग नियमों और मूल्यांकन मैट्रिक्स का उपयोग मूल्यांकन परिणामों की बेहतर तुलनात्मकता सुनिश्चित करता है।', 'ga': 'Tá ról lárnach ag luachálacha corpora caighdeánacha agus iomaíocha maidir le feidhmíocht nasctha aonáin ainmnithe (NEL) a thagarmharcáil agus forbairt córas NEL níos sofaisticiúla a thiomáint. Tá cáilíocht an chorpora úsáidte agus na méadrachta meastóireachta úsáidte ríthábhachtach sa phróiseas seo. Déanaimid measúnú, mar sin, ar cháilíocht trí chorpora meastóireachta a bhfuil an-tóir orthu, ag aithint ceithre mhórcheist a mbíonn tionchar acu ar na caighdeáin óir seo: (i) úsáid stíleanna éagsúla anótála, (ii) nótaí míchearta agus anótálacha in easnamh, (iii) éabhlóid an Bhonn Eolais, (iv ) agus difríochtaí maidir le comhtharluithe anótála. Téann an páipéar seo i ngleic leis na saincheisteanna seo trí nótaí NEL agus leagan corpais a fhoirmiú a cheadaíonn cruthú corpais a chaighdeánú, a thacaíonn le héabhlóid an chorpais, agus a réitíonn an bealach le húsáid lionsaí chun athrú go huathoibríoch idir cumraíochtaí corpais éagsúla. Ina theannta sin, áirithíonn úsáid rialacha scórála atá sainithe go soiléir agus méadracht mheastóireachta inchomparáideacht níos fearr idir torthaí na meastóireachta.', 'ka': 'Gold standard corpora and competitive evaluations play a key role in benchmarking named entity linking performance (NEL) and driving the development of more sophisticated NEL systems. ამ პროცესში გამოყენებული კოპორაის და გამოყენებული განსაზღვრების მეტრიკის გასანიშვნელოვანი უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია. ამიტომ, ჩვენ სამი პოლიპური განსაზღვრების კოპორაციის კაalitეტის გავაკეთებთ, განსაზღვრებით ოთხი მნიშვნელოვანი პრობლემები, რომელიც გამოვაკეთებენ ამ ჱლარული სტანდერში: i) განსხვავებული ანტორაციის სტილების გამოყენება, (ii) არსებული ანტორაცი ეს დოკუმენტი ამ პრობლემების გასაკეთება, რომელიც NEL ანოტალიზაციები და კოპუსური გერსიონიზაციას, რომელიც უნდა სტანდარტიზაციას კოპუსური შექმნა, კოპუსური ევოლუციას დაეხმარებს და დამატებით, გამოყენება წარმოდგენებული სკორიფიკაციის წესების და განსაზღვრების მეტრიკების გამოყენება უკეთესი შემდგენებელობა.', 'hu': 'Az aranyszabású vállalkozások és versenyértékelések kulcsszerepet játszanak a megnevezett entitások összekapcsolásában (NEL) teljesítményének teljesítményértékelésében és a kifinomultabb NEL rendszerek fejlesztésének ösztönzésében. Ebben a folyamatban kulcsfontosságú a felhasznált korpuszok minősége és az alkalmazott értékelési mutatók. Ezért értékeljük három népszerű értékelési korpus minőségét, és azonosítjuk négy fő problémát, amelyek ezeket az aranyszabványokat érintik: (i) különböző jegyzetelési stílusok használata, (ii) helytelen és hiányzó jegyzetek, (iii) Tudásbázis fejlődése, (iv) és az együttes előfordulások jegyzetelési különbségei. A tanulmány ezekkel a problémákkal foglalkozik a NEL jegyzékekkel és a korpusz verzióinak formalizálásával, amely lehetővé teszi a korpusz létrehozásának szabványosítását, támogatja a korpusz evolúcióját, és megnyitja az utat az objektívek használatának a különböző korpusz konfigurációk közötti automatikus átalakításhoz. Ezenkívül egyértelműen meghatározott pontszámítási szabályok és értékelési mutatók alkalmazása biztosítja az értékelési eredmények jobb összehasonlíthatóságát.', 'el': 'Τα χρυσά πρότυπα και οι ανταγωνιστικές αξιολογήσεις διαδραματίζουν βασικό ρόλο στη συγκριτική αξιολόγηση των επιδόσεων που συνδέονται με τις ονομαστικές οντότητες και στην προώθηση της ανάπτυξης πιο εξελιγμένων συστημάτων. Η ποιότητα των χρησιμοποιούμενων σωμάτων και οι χρησιμοποιούμενες μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης είναι κρίσιμες σε αυτή τη διαδικασία. Ως εκ τούτου, αξιολογούμε την ποιότητα τριών κοινών σωμάτων αξιολόγησης, προσδιορίζοντας τέσσερα σημαντικά ζητήματα που επηρεάζουν αυτά τα χρυσά πρότυπα: (i) τη χρήση διαφορετικών μορφών σχολιασμού, (ii) λανθασμένες και ελλείπουσες σχολιασμοί, (iii) την εξέλιξη της Γνωσιακής Βάσης, (iv) και τις διαφορές στην σχολιασμό συναμφανίσεων. Η παρούσα εργασία αντιμετωπίζει αυτά τα ζητήματα με την επισημοποίηση των σχολίων και την έκδοση του σώματος που επιτρέπει την τυποποίηση της δημιουργίας σωμάτων, υποστηρίζει την εξέλιξη του σώματος και ανοίγει το δρόμο για τη χρήση φακών για αυτόματη μετατροπή μεταξύ διαφορετικών διαμορφώσεων σωμάτων. Επιπλέον, η χρήση σαφώς καθορισμένων κανόνων βαθμολόγησης και μετρήσεων αξιολόγησης εξασφαλίζει καλύτερη συγκρισιμότητα των αποτελεσμάτων αξιολόγησης.', 'kk': 'Алтын стандартты корпора және конкурентті бағалау (NEL) деп аталатын бағалау (бағалау) мүмкіндіктерінде негізгі роль орындалады және көптеген NEL жүйелерді жасау жүйелерді жасау үшін. Корпора және қолданылатын бағалау метрикаларының сапасы осы процестің маңызды. Сондықтан біз үш әлемді бағалау корпорасының сапатын анықтап, олардың алтын стандарттарына әсер ететін төрт негізгі мәселелерді анықтап береміз: i) түрлі жазбалар стилін қолдану, (ii) дұрыс және жоқ жазбалар, (iii) білім негізгі эволюциясы, (iv) ж Бұл қағаз бұл мәселелерді NEL жазбаларын және корпус нұсқасын официализациялауға мүмкіндік береді. Бұл корпус құрылғысын стандартизациялауға мүмкіндік береді, корпус эволюциясын қолдауға мүмкіндік береді Қосымша, таңдау ережелерін және метрикалық оқу ережелерін қолдану үшін оқу нәтижелерін жақсы салыстыруға мүмкіндік береді.', 'it': "I corporate standard Gold e le valutazioni competitive svolgono un ruolo chiave nel benchmarking delle prestazioni di entity linking (NEL) e guidano lo sviluppo di sistemi NEL più sofisticati. La qualità dei corpora utilizzati e le metriche di valutazione utilizzate sono cruciali in questo processo. Pertanto, valutiamo la qualità di tre corpi di valutazione popolari, identificando quattro problemi principali che influenzano questi standard aurei: (i) l'uso di diversi stili di annotazione, (ii) annotazioni errate e mancanti, (iii) evoluzione della Knowledge Base, (iv) e differenze nell'annotazione delle co-occorrenze. Questo articolo affronta questi problemi formalizzando le annotazioni NEL e il versioning del corpus che consente di standardizzare la creazione del corpus, supporta l'evoluzione del corpus e apre la strada all'uso degli obiettivi per la trasformazione automatica tra le diverse configurazioni del corpus. Inoltre, l'uso di regole di punteggio chiaramente definite e metriche di valutazione garantisce una migliore comparabilità dei risultati della valutazione.", 'lt': 'Aukso standartiniai korporai ir konkurenciniai vertinimai atlieka svarbų vaidmenį lyginant pavadintą subjektą, susiejantį (NEL) veiklos rezultatus ir skatinantį pažangių NEL sistemų kūrimą. Šiame procese labai svarbi naudojamos korpros kokybė ir naudojami vertinimo rodikliai. Todėl mes vertiname trijų populiarių vertinimo įstaigų kokybę, nustatydami keturis pagrindinius klausimus, kurie turi įtakos šiems aukso standartams: i) skirtingų anotacijų stilių naudojimas, ii) neteisingos ir trūkstamos anotacijos, iii) žin i ų bazės raida, iv) ir anotacijų bendrų įvykių skirtumai. Šiame dokumente šie klausimai sprendžiami formalizuojant NEL anotacijas ir kūno versijas, kurios leidžia standartizuoti kūno kūrimą, palaiko kūno evoliuciją ir padeda naudoti lęšius, kad būtų galima automatiškai pakeisti įvairias kūno konfigūracijas. Be to, taikant aiškiai apibrėžtas vertinimo taisykles ir vertinimo rodiklius užtikrinamas geresnis vertinimo rezultatų palyginamumas.', 'mk': 'Златната стандардна корпора и конкурентните евалуации играат клучна улога во benchmarking именуван ентитет поврзувајќи ја резултатот (НЕЛ) и водејќи го развојот на пософистицирани НЕЛ системи. Квалитетот на употребената корпора и употребената метрика на евалуација се клучни во овој процес. Ние, затоа, го проценуваме квалитетот на трите популарни проценки, идентификувајќи четири главни прашања кои влијаат на овие златни стандарди: (i) употребата на различни стили на анотација, (ii) неправилни и недостасувачки анотации, (iii) еволуција на базата на знаење, (iv) и разлики во анотацијата на косовремени Овој документ ги решава овие прашања со формализација на НЕЛ анотациите и верзионирање на телата кои овозможуваат стандардизација на создавањето на телото, поддржува еволуција на телото и го отвора патот за употреба на лензите за автоматски трансформирање помеѓу различните конфигурации Покрај тоа, употребата на јасно дефинирани правила за оценка и метрика за оценка обезбедува подобра споредливост на резултатите на оценката.', 'ms': 'Korpora piawai emas dan penilaian kompetitif bermain peran utama dalam benchmarking entity bernama yang menghubungkan prestasi (NEL) dan memandu pembangunan sistem NEL yang lebih canggih. Kualiti korpra yang digunakan dan metrik penilaian yang digunakan adalah penting dalam proses ini. Oleh itu, kami menilai kualiti tiga korpora penilaian populer, mengenalpasti empat isu utama yang mempengaruhi standar emas in i: (i) penggunaan gaya annotasi berbeza, (ii) annotasi yang salah dan hilang, (iii) evolusi Pangkalan pengetahuan, (iv) dan perbezaan dalam annotasi kejadian sama. Kertas ini mengatasi isu-isu ini dengan formalisasi anotasi NEL dan versi corpus yang membolehkan mencipta mayat standardisasi, menyokong evolusi mayat, dan membuka jalan untuk menggunakan lensa untuk secara automatik berubah diantara konfigurasi mayat yang berbeza. Selain itu, penggunaan peraturan skor yang ditentukan dengan jelas dan metrik penilaian memastikan perbandingan lebih baik keputusan penilaian.', 'ml': 'സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണസ്റ്റാര്\u200dഡ് കോര്\u200dപ്പറ്റിയും മത്സരിക്കുന്ന വിലാസങ്ങളും കൂടുതല്\u200d സോഫിസ്റ്റിക്കേറ്റ് നെഎല്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പേരിലുള്ള വസ്തു ഈ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന കോര്\u200dപ്പോറയുടെയും മെറ്റിക്കുകളുടെയും ഗുരുതരമാണ്. We, therefore, assess the quality of three popular evaluation corpora, identifying four major issues which affect these gold standards: (i) the use of different annotation styles, (ii) incorrect and missing annotations, (iii) Knowledge Base evolution, (iv) and differences in annotating co-occurrences.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നെഎല്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപങ്ങളും കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് സൃഷ്ടിപ്പിന് സാധ്യതയുള്ള കോര്\u200dപ്പുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്ന, കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്റെ വ്യത്യാസവികസ കൂടാതെ, വ്യക്തമായി നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട സ്കോരിംഗ് നിയമങ്ങളും വിലയിക്കുന്ന മെട്രിക്കളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് വിലയ', 'mn': 'Алтан стандарт корпора болон өрсөлдөөний оюутнууд бүтэц (NEL) холбоотой үйл ажиллагаанд хамгийн чухал үүрэг тоглодог ба илүү нарийн NEL системийн хөгжлийг хөгжүүлж чадна. Хэрэглэгдсэн корпора болон хэрэглэгдсэн үнэлгээний метрик нь энэ үйл явцад чухал. Тиймээс бид гурван олон нийтийн дүгнэлтийн корпора шинжлэх ухааны чанарыг үнэлдэг, эдгээр алтын стандарт нөлөөлдөг дөрвөн чухал асуудлыг тодорхойлдог: i) өөр янз бүрийн дүгнэлтийн загварын хэрэглээ, (ii) буруу, буруу дүгнэлт, (iii) Мэдлэг суурь хөгжли Энэ цаас эдгээр асуудлуудыг НЕЛ анзаарлаа болон корпус хувилбарын официалчлалын тухай ярьдаг. Энэ нь корпус бүтээлийг стандартизацийн боловсруулж, корпус хөгжлийг дэмжиж, линзийн хэрэглээ өөр өөр корпус загварын хооронд автоматаа Үүнээс гадна тодорхой тодорхойлогдсон сүлжээний хууль болон үнэлгээний метрик ашиглах нь үнэлгээний үр дүнг илүү сайн харьцуулах боломжтой байдаг.', 'mt': 'Il-korporazzjonijiet standard tad-deheb u l-evalwazzjonijiet kompetittivi għandhom rwol ewlieni fil-valutazzjoni komparattiva tal-prestazzjoni tal-entità msejħa li torbot (NEL) u tmexxi l-iżvilupp ta’ sistemi tal-NEL aktar sofistikati. The quality of the used corpora and the used evaluation metrics are crucial in this process.  Għalhekk, aħna nivvalutaw il-kwalità ta’ tliet korpi ta’ evalwazzjoni popolari, filwaqt li nidentifikaw erba’ kwistjonijiet ewlenin li jaffettwaw dawn l-i standards tad-deheb: (i) l-użu ta’ stili differenti ta’ annotazzjoni, (ii) annotazzjonijiet inkorretti u nieqsa, (iii) evoluzzjoni tal-Bażi tal-Għarfien, (iv) u differenzi fl-annotazzjoni ta’ kookkorrenzi. Dan id-dokument jindirizza dawn il-kwistjonijiet billi jifformalizza l-annotazzjonijiet tan-NEL u l-verżjoni tal-korpus li jippermetti l-istandardizzazzjoni tal-ħolqien tal-korpus, jappoġġja l-evoluzzjoni tal-korpus, u jwitti t-triq għall-użu tal-lentijiet biex jittrasformaw awtomatikament bejn konfigurazzjonijiet differenti tal-korpus. Barra minn hekk, l-użu ta’ regoli ta’ punteġġi definiti b’mod ċar u metriċi ta’ evalwazzjoni jiżgura komparabbiltà a ħjar tar-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni.', 'sr': 'Zlatne standardne korporacije i konkurentne procjene igraju ključnu ulogu u kriteriji podataka po imenu entitet povezanim (NEL) funkcijama i vožnji razvoj sofisticiranih NEL sistema. Kvaliteta korišćenog korporacije i korišćene procjene u ovom procesu su ključne. Stoga procjenjujemo kvalitet tri popularne procjene korpore, identificirajući četiri glavne pitanja koje utiču na ove zlatne standarde: i) korištenje različitih annotacijskih stila, ii) nepravedne i nestale annotacije, iii) evolucija baze znanja, iv) i razlike u annotacijskim događajima. Ovaj papir rješava te probleme formalizirajući NEL annotacije i verziju korpusa koja omogućava standardizaciju stvaranja korpusa, podržava korpusnu evoluciju i sprema put za korištenje lensa da se automatski transformiše između različitih korpusnih konfiguracija. Osim toga, korištenje jasno definisanih pravila izviđanja i metrika procjene osigurava bolju usporedbu rezultata procjene.', 'no': 'Gold standard korporasjonar og konkurentære evalueringar speler ein nøkkelrolle i benchmarking med namnet entitet som lenkjer (NEL) og køyrer utviklinga av meir sofistikerte NEL-systemar. Kvaliteten til den brukte korporen og den brukte evalueringsmetrikane er viktig i denne prosessen. Vi vurderer derfor kvaliteten til tre populære evalueringskorpora, og identifiserer fire store problemar som påvirkar desse gullstandarane: i) bruken av ulike annotasjonsstil, (ii) feil og manglar annotasjonar, (iii) kunnskapsbaseevolusjon, (iv) og ulike forskjeller i merkingsstillingar. Denne papiret adresserer desse problemene ved å formalisera NEL- notasjonar og korpusversjon som tillater standardisering av korpus- oppretting, støttar korpusevolusjon, og lager måten for bruk av lenser å automatisk transformera mellom ulike korpusoppsett. I tillegg kan bruken av tydelig definerte skaleringsreglar og evalueringsmetrikar sikre at det er betre sammenlignbare med evalueringsresultat.', 'ro': 'Corporațiile Gold Standard și evaluările competitive joacă un rol cheie în benchmarking-ul performanțelor denumite entități care leagă (NEL) și conduc dezvoltarea unor sisteme NEL mai sofisticate. Calitatea corporelor utilizate și măsurătorile de evaluare utilizate sunt esențiale în acest proces. Prin urmare, evaluăm calitatea a trei corpuri populare de evaluare, identificând patru probleme majore care afectează aceste standarde aur: (i) utilizarea diferitelor stiluri de adnotare, (ii) adnotări incorecte și lipsă, (iii) evoluția bazei de cunoștințe, (iv) și diferențele în adnotarea co-evenimentelor. Această lucrare abordează aceste probleme prin formalizarea adnotărilor NEL și a versiunilor corpurilor care permit standardizarea creării corpurilor, sprijină evoluția corpurilor și deschide calea pentru utilizarea obiectivelor pentru transformarea automată între diferite configurații corpurilor. În plus, utilizarea unor reguli clar definite de punctare și a unor valori de evaluare asigură o mai bună comparabilitate a rezultatelor evaluării.', 'pl': 'Korpusy standardów złota i oceny konkurencyjne odgrywają kluczową rolę w porównaniu wydajności nazwanych entity linking (NEL) i napędzaniu rozwoju bardziej zaawansowanych systemów NEL. Kluczowe znaczenie ma w tym procesie jakość wykorzystywanych korpusów oraz wykorzystywane wskaźniki oceny. Oceniamy zatem jakość trzech popularnych korpusów oceniających, identyfikując cztery główne problemy, które mają wpływ na te złote standardy: (i) stosowanie różnych stylów adnotacji, (ii) nieprawidłowych i brakujących adnotacji, (iii) ewolucji Bazy Wiedzy, (iv) oraz różnice w adnotacji współwystępowania. Niniejszy artykuł porusza te problemy poprzez sformalizowanie adnotacji NEL i wersjonowanie korpusów, co pozwala na standaryzację tworzenia korpusów, wspiera ewolucję korpusów i toruje drogę do automatycznej transformacji między różnymi konfiguracjami korpusów. Ponadto zastosowanie jasno określonych reguł oceny i wskaźników oceny zapewnia lepszą porównywalność wyników oceny.', 'so': 'Shirkadda caadiga ah oo Gold ah iyo qiimeynta tartanku waxay leeyihiin qayb muhiim ah oo ku saabsan bangiga lagu magacaabay sameynta jaamacadda la xiriira (NEL) iyo horumarinta nidaamka NEL ee ka sii sophisticated. Tusaalaha shirkadda lagu isticmaalayo iyo qaababka lagu qiimeeyo waa muhiim. Sidaa darteed, waxaynu qiimeynaynaa qiimeynta qiimeynta shirkadda saddexda caadiga ah, taas oo ah afarta arimo oo muhiimka ah oo saameyn ku yeelanaya heerarka dahabka: (i) isticmaalka qaababka caadiga kala duduwan, (ii) saxda iyo baahida caadooyinka (iii) bedelka aasaasiga aqoonta, (iv) iyo kala duwanaanshaha ku saabsan dhacdooyinka labaad. Kanu wuxuu warqaddan u baaraandegaa arimahan si ay u formaliso warqadaha NEL iyo warqadda qofka oo u ogolaada in lagu kordhiyo korpuska, wuxuu taagaa bedelka qofka, wuxuuna hoggaamiyaa jidka lagu isticmaalo mushaarada si loo beddelo si uu u beddelo qaabilaadda korpuska kala duwan. Intaas waxaa dheer, isticmaalka sharciyada qiimeynta iyo qaababka qiimeynta ee caddaan loo yaqaan inuu si fiican u dhigo arimaha qiimeynta.', 'si': 'ගෝල්ඩ් ස්ටැන්ඩ් කොර්පෝරා සහ ප්\u200dරතිභාවිත විශ්ලේෂණයක් බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් කරනවා නම් අයිතිය සම්බන්ධතාවය (NEL) ප්\u200dරභාව පාවිච්චි කර්පෝරාව සහ භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් මේ ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාවේ වැදගත් වෙනවා. අපි, ඉතින්, ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්වාසය තුනක් ගැන අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරුණාකරණය කරුණාකරණය කරන්න, ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හතර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ: i) විවිධ අනතුරු විශ්ව මේ පැත්තේ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා NEL නෝනොටේෂණය සහ කෝර්පස් වර්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, කෝර්පස් නිර්මාණය සඳහා ස්ථානය කරනවා, කෝ ඒ වගේම, පැහැදිලි විශ්වාසයෙන් ස්කෝරින් නීතිය සහ විශ්වාසය මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් විශ්වාසයෙන් විශ්ව', 'ta': 'தங்க நிலையான நிறுவனம் மற்றும் competitive evaluations benchmarking பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் இணைப்பு (NEL) செயல்பாட்டில் ஒரு முக்கிய விளையாட்டை விளையாடுகிறது மற்று பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட நிறுவனத்தின் தரம் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட மதிப்பு மெட்ரிக்கள் இந்த செயல்பாட்டில் முக்கியமானது. இப்பொழுது நாம் மூன்று பிரபலமான மதிப்பீட்டு நிறுவனத்தின் தரமை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம், இந்த தங்க நிலைமைகளை பாதிக்கும் நான்கு முக்கிய விஷயங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம்: (i) வேறு விளக்கம இந்த தாள் NEL அறிவிப்புகளை வடிவமைத்து மற்றும் குறும்பத்தின் பதிப்புகளை வடிவமைப்பதால் இந்த பிரச்சனைகளை முகவரிக்கிறது, அது நிலையான கோர்ப்ஸ் உருவாக்கத்தை அனுமதிக்க மேலும், தெளிவாக வரையறுக்கப்பட்ட மதிப்பெண் விதிகள் மற்றும் மதிப்பின் முறைகளை பயன்படுத்தி மதிப்பின் முடிவுகளின் சி', 'sv': 'Guld standard corpora och konkurrenskraftiga utvärderingar spelar en nyckelroll i benchmarking av namngivna entity linking (NEL) prestanda och driver utvecklingen av mer sofistikerade NEL-system. Kvaliteten på de använda korporarna och de använda utvärderingsmetoderna är avgörande i denna process. Vi bedömer därför kvaliteten på tre populära utvärderingskorpor och identifierar fyra viktiga frågor som påverkar dessa guldstandarder: (i) användningen av olika annotationsstilar, (ii) felaktiga och saknade anteckningar, (iii) kunskapsbasens utveckling, (iv) och skillnader i kommentering av samtidiga händelser. Denna uppsats behandlar dessa frågor genom att formalisera NEL-anteckningar och korpusversionering som möjliggör standardisering av korpusskapande, stöder korpusutveckling och banar väg för användning av linser för att automatiskt omvandla mellan olika korpuskonfigurationer. Dessutom säkerställer användningen av tydligt definierade poängregler och utvärderingsmetoder en bättre jämförbarhet av utvärderingsresultaten.', 'ur': 'سولڈ استاندارڈ کورپورا اور مسابقات کی ارزیابی بنچم مارکینگ میں ایک کلی رول ہے جس کا نام انٹیٹی (NEL) کرنا ہے اور اس سے زیادہ مصنوعی نیل سیستموں کی توسعہ چلانا ہے۔ استعمال کیا گیا کرپورا اور استعمال کیا گیا ارزش میٹریک اس پرسس میں ضروری ہے۔ سو ہم تین محبوب ارزیابی شرکت کی کیفیت کا ارزیابی کرتے ہیں، چار اصلی مسائل کو پہچان رہے ہیں جو ان سونے کے استاندارد پر اثر دیتے ہیں: i) مختلف نوشنی استیلوں کا استعمال، ii) غلطی اور گم ہوئی نوشنی، iii) علم Base evolution، iv) اور مشارکت میں اختلاف کرتے ہیں. یہ کاغذ ان مسائلوں کے بارے میں تحقیق کرتا ہے NEL یادہانی اور کورپوس ورسینگ کے ذریعہ جو جسم کی پیدائش کی استاندارڈیز کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے، corpus evolution کی مدد کرتا ہے، اور لینس کے استعمال کی راہ بتاتا ہے تاکہ مختلف جسم کے درمیان خود تبدیل کرے۔ اس کے علاوہ، صریح طور پر تعریف کیا گیا اسکونگ قوانین اور ارزیابی میٹریک کے استعمال کا بہترین مقایسہ نتیجے کا ثابت رکھتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Foydalaniladigan kompaniya sifatida va foydalanilgan qiymatning metriklari bu jarayonini muhim. Biz shunday qilamiz, uchta muammiy qiymatning sifatini qiymatdik, bu gull standardlarini ko'rsatadigan to'rt muhim muammolarni aniqlashimiz mumkin: (i) har xil taʼminlov uslublardan foydalanish mumkin, (ii) haqiqiqiy emas va taqdimot yoʻq, (iii) Known asosiy evolution, (iv) va bir xil hodisalarni tasavvur qilish uchun o'zgarishlar. Name Koʻrsatilgan foydalanuvchi qoidalar va qiymatlar metriklari qiymatlar natijalariga yaxshi yaxshi moslamaga ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Tập đoàn đánh giá bằng vàng và cạnh tranh đóng một vai trò quan trọng trong việc giám sát những đối tượng mang tên "liên kết" (NEL) và thúc đẩy việc phát triển hệ thống NEL phức tạp hơn. Chất lượng của vật thể đã sử dụng và đo hồ sơ đã dùng rất quan trọng trong quá trình này. Chúng tôi đánh giá chất lượng của ba người đánh giá phổ biến, xác định bốn vấn đề quan trọng ảnh hưởng tới các tiêu chuẩn vàng: i) sử dụng các phong cách ghi chú khác nhau, Tờ giấy này giải quyết các vấn đề bằng cách chính thức hóa hóa hóa hóa biên bản NEL và kết hợp hợp hợp hợp để thiết lập cấu hình thể, hỗ trợ tiến hóa tập thể, và mở đường cho phép sử dụng các thấu kính tự động thay đổi giữa các cấu hình hữu khác nhau. Thêm vào đó, việc dùng các quy tắc đánh dấu rõ ràng và đo hồ sơ đánh giá đảm bảo sự tương xứng tốt hơn của kết quả đánh giá.', 'bg': 'Корпусите със златен стандарт и конкурентните оценки играят ключова роля в сравнителното оценяване на ефективността, наречена обвързваща единица (НЕЛ), и стимулират развитието на по-сложни системи за НЕЛ. Качеството на използваните корпуси и използваните показатели за оценка са от решаващо значение в този процес. Затова оценяваме качеството на три популярни корпората за оценка, като идентифицираме четири основни проблема, които засягат тези златни стандарти: (i) използването на различни стилове на анотация, (ii) неправилни и липсващи анотации, (iii) еволюция на базата знания, (iv) и разлики в анотирането на съвместни събития. Настоящата статия разглежда тези въпроси чрез формализиране на анотациите и версиите на корпусите, което позволява стандартизиране на създаването на корпуси, подпомага еволюцията на корпусите и проправя пътя за използването на лещи да се трансформират автоматично между различните конфигурации на корпусите. Освен това използването на ясно определени правила за оценка и показатели за оценка гарантира по-добра съпоставимост на резултатите от оценката.', 'de': 'Goldstandardkorpora und Wettbewerbsbewertungen spielen eine Schlüsselrolle beim Benchmarking der NEL-Performance (Named Entity Linking) und bei der Entwicklung komplexerer NEL-Systeme. Die Qualität der verwendeten Korpora und die verwendeten Auswertungsmetriken sind dabei entscheidend. Wir bewerten daher die Qualität von drei populären Bewertungskorpora und identifizieren vier wesentliche Probleme, die diese Goldstandards beeinflussen: (i) die Verwendung verschiedener Annotationsstile, (ii) falsche und fehlende Annotationen, (iii) Knowledge Base Evolution, (iv) und Unterschiede in der Annotation von Co-Vorkommen. Dieser Beitrag befasst sich mit diesen Fragen durch die Formalisierung von NEL-Annotationen und Korpusversionierung, die eine Standardisierung der Korpuserstellung ermöglicht, die Korpusentwicklung unterstützt und den Weg für die Verwendung von Linsen ebnet, um automatisch zwischen verschiedenen Korpuskonfigurationen zu transformieren. Darüber hinaus sorgt der Einsatz klar definierter Scoring-Regeln und Bewertungsmetriken für eine bessere Vergleichbarkeit der Bewertungsergebnisse.', 'hr': 'Zlatne standardne korporacije i konkurentne procjene imaju ključnu ulogu u kritičnoj mjeri imena entiteta povezanih (NEL) učinkovitosti i vožnji razvoj sofisticiranih NEL sustava. U ovom procesu su ključne kvalitete korišćenog tijela i korišćene procjene metrike. Stoga procjenjujemo kvalitet tri popularne procjene tijela, identificirajući četiri glavne pitanja koje utječu na te zlatne standarde: i) korištenje različitih stila annotacije, ii) nepravednih i nestalih annotacija, iii) evolucija baze znanja, iv) i razlike u společnim događajima. Ovaj papir rješava te pitanja formalizirajući NEL annotacije i verziju korpusa koja omogućava standardizaciju stvaranja korpusa, podržava evoluciju korpusa i sprečava put korištenja lensa kako bi se automatski transformirala između različitih korpusnih konfiguracija. Osim toga, korištenje jasno definiranih pravila izvlačenja i mjerila procjene osigurava bolju usporedbu rezultata procjene.', 'id': 'Korpora standar emas dan evaluasi kompetitif bermain peran kunci dalam benchmarking entity bernama menghubungkan prestasi (NEL) dan mendorong pengembangan sistem NEL yang lebih canggih. Kualitas dari korpra yang digunakan dan metrik evaluasi yang digunakan adalah penting dalam proses ini. Oleh karena itu, kami mempertimbangkan kualitas tiga korpora evaluasi populer, mengidentifikasi empat isu utama yang mempengaruhi standar emas in i: (i) penggunaan gaya annotasi yang berbeda, (ii) annotasi yang salah dan yang hilang, (iii) evolusi dasar pengetahuan, (iv) dan perbedaan dalam annotasi korespondensi. Kertas ini mengatasi masalah ini dengan formalisasi anotasi NEL dan versi mayat yang memungkinkan standardisasi penciptaan mayat, mendukung evolusi mayat, dan membuka jalan untuk menggunakan lensa untuk secara otomatis berubah antara konfigurasi mayat yang berbeda. Selain itu, penggunaan aturan skor yang jelas ditentukan dan metrik evaluasi memastikan perbandingan yang lebih baik dari hasil evaluasi.', 'ko': '금 표준 자료 라이브러리와 경쟁 평가는 명명 실체 링크(NEL)의 실적을 평가하고 더욱 복잡한 NEL 시스템 개발을 추진하는 데 중요한 역할을 한다.이 과정에서 사용된 자료 라이브러리의 질과 사용된 평가 지표가 매우 중요하다.따라서 우리는 세 가지 유행하는 평가 자료 라이브러리의 질을 평가하고 이러한 황금 기준에 영향을 주는 네 가지 주요 문제를 확정했다. (i) 서로 다른 주석 스타일의 사용, (ii) 오류와 부족한 주석, (iii) 지식 라이브러리의 변화, (iv) 주석의 공통된 차이이다.본고는 형식화된 NEL 주석과 자료 라이브러리 버전 제어를 통해 이러한 문제점을 해결하고자 한다. 이는 표준화된 자료 라이브러리 창설을 허용하고 자료 라이브러리의 진화를 지원하며 렌즈를 사용하여 서로 다른 자료 라이브러리 설정 사이의 자동 전환을 위해 길을 닦았다.또한 명확하게 정의된 평점 규칙과 평가 지표를 사용하면 평가 결과가 더욱 좋은 비교성을 확보할 수 있다.', 'nl': "Gold standaard corpora en competitieve evaluaties spelen een belangrijke rol bij het benchmarken van named entity linking (NEL) prestaties en het stimuleren van de ontwikkeling van meer geavanceerde NEL-systemen. De kwaliteit van de gebruikte corpora en de gebruikte evaluatiemetrics zijn hierbij cruciaal. Daarom beoordelen we de kwaliteit van drie populaire evaluatiecorpora's en identificeren we vier belangrijke problemen die van invloed zijn op deze gouden standaarden: (i) het gebruik van verschillende annotatiestijlen, (ii) onjuiste en ontbrekende annotaties, (iii) Knowledge Base evolutie, (iv) en verschillen in annotatie co-incidenten. Dit artikel behandelt deze problemen door NEL-annotaties en corpusversieëring te formaliseren die het mogelijk maakt corpuscreatie te standaardiseren, corpusevolutie te ondersteunen en de weg effent voor het gebruik van lenzen om automatisch te transformeren tussen verschillende corpusconfiguraties. Daarnaast zorgt het gebruik van duidelijk gedefinieerde scoreregels en evaluatiestatistieken voor een betere vergelijkbaarheid van de evaluatieresultaten.", 'da': 'Guld standard corporate og konkurrencemæssige evalueringer spiller en central rolle i benchmarking navngivet entity linking (NEL) performance og driver udviklingen af mere sofistikerede NEL-systemer. Kvaliteten af de anvendte corpora og de anvendte evalueringsmetrics er afgørende i denne proces. Vi vurderer derfor kvaliteten af tre populære evalueringskorpora og identificerer fire vigtige spørgsmål, der påvirker disse guldstandarder: (i) brugen af forskellige annotationsstilarter, (ii) ukorrekte og manglende noteringer, (iii) vidensbasens udvikling, (iv) og forskelle i notering af samtidige forekomster. Denne artikel behandler disse problemer ved at formalisere NEL annotationer og corpus versioning, som gør det muligt at standardisere corpus oprettelse, understøtter corpus evolution og baner vejen for brugen af linser til automatisk at omdanne mellem forskellige corpus konfigurationer. Desuden sikrer anvendelsen af klart definerede scoreregler og evalueringsmetrics en bedre sammenlignelighed af evalueringsresultaterne.', 'af': "Goude standaard korpora en mededingsevaluasies speel 'n sleutel rol in benchmarking van genaamde entiteit wat verbind (NEL) funksie en die ontwikkeling van meer sofistikeerde NEL stelsels. Die kwaliteit van die gebruikte korpora en die gebruikte evalueringsmetries is cruciaal in hierdie proses. Ons, daarom, die kwaliteit van drie populêre evalueringskorpora beoorsaak, met vier groot probleme te identifiseer wat hierdie goue standaard beïnvloor: i) die gebruik van verskillende annotasie style, (ii) verkeerde en miskiede annotasie, (iii) kennisbasis evolusie, (iv) en verskille in die annotasie van koörenisse. Hierdie papier adreseer hierdie probleme deur formalisering van NEL-annotasies en korpus-versioning wat toelaat standaard-skepping van korpus, ondersteun korpus-evolusie en plaas die pad vir die gebruik van lense om automaties tussen verskillende korpus-konfigurasies te transformeer. In addition, the use of clearly defined scoring rules and evaluation metrics ensures a better comparability of evaluation results.", 'fa': 'ارزیابی استاندارد طلا و ارزیابی مسابقه\u200cای نقش کلی در برچسب\u200cبندی نامیدهٔ entity linking (NEL) و رهبری توسعه سیستم\u200cهای NEL متفاوت\u200cتر است. کیفیت شرکت استفاده شده و متریک ارزیابی استفاده شده در این فرایند مهم است. بنابراین، ما کیفیت سه شرکت ارزیابی محبوب را ارزیابی می کنیم، با تشخیص چهار مسئله بزرگی که بر این استانداردهای طلا تأثیر می دهد: i) استفاده از طریق نویسندگی مختلف، ii) نویسندگی غلط و گم شده، iii) تکامل بنی دانش، iv) و تفاوت در اتفاقات نویسندگی. این کاغذ این مسائل را با رسمی\u200cسازی نوشته\u200cهای NEL و نسخه\u200cهای کورپوس که اجازه می\u200cدهد ایجاد جسد را استاندارد کند، تکامل جسد را پشتیبانی کند، و راه برای استفاده از لینز را برای تغییر خودکار بین تنظیمات جسد مختلف قرار می\u200cدهد. علاوه بر این، استفاده از قوانین آزمایش واضح تعریف شده و متریک ارزیابی بهتر از نتایج ارزیابی را تضمین می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Kampuni ya dhahabu na tafiti za ushindani zinacheza jukumu muhimu katika bendera zinazoitwa utendaji wa vyombo vinavyounganisha (NEL) na kuendesha maendeleo ya mifumo ya NEL yenye sifa zaidi. Ukubwa wa kampuni iliyotumika na mbinu za uchunguzi zinazotumiwa ni muhimu katika mchakato huu. We, therefore, assess the quality of three popular evaluation corpora, identifying four major issues which affect these gold standards: (i) the use of different annotation styles, (ii) incorrect and missing annotations, (iii) Knowledge Base evolution, (iv) and differences in annotating co-occurrences.  Gazeti hili linazungumzia masuala haya kwa kuandaa matangazo ya NEL na mabadiliko ya viungo vinavyoruhusu kutengeneza vifaa vya kupiga kura, inaunga mkono mabadiliko ya mabadiliko ya barafu, na inatoa njia ya matumizi ya mistari ya mabadiliko ya mabadiliko ya viungo tofauti. Kwa nyongeza, matumizi ya sheria za uvunjifu na mbinu za uchunguzi inahakikisha ufafanuzi bora wa matokeo ya uchunguzi.', 'tr': 'Altyn standart korpora we döwletli çykyşlar (NEL) bir zat baglaýyşynyň (benchmarking) geçirmesi we daha sofistikli NEL sistemleriniň gelişmesini süreýärler. Kullanylýan korporanyň we ullanýan deňlenme metrikleri bu prosesde örän möhüm. Şol sebäpli biz üç popüler deňlenme korporatynyň keyfiňi takyklaýarys, bu altyn standartlaryna täsirli dört esasy meseleleri belirleýäris: (i) farklı döwürleme stilleriniň ullanyşyny, (ii) ýalňyş we ýok duýdurmalaryň, (iii) Bilim bazynyň evolusiýasyny, (iv) we i şbirlikleri duýdurmak üçin deňle Bu kagyz bu meseleleri NEL duýdurmalary we korpus düzenlemesi üçin formalizarak çözýär. Bu mesele korpus düzenlemesi üçin standardyşdyrylýar, korpus evoluciýasyny destekleýär we lenslaryň ullanyşyny öz-özüne üýtgetmek üçin ýola getirir. Ayrıca, a çık tanımlanmış scoring kuralları ve değerlendirme metriklerinin kullanımı değerlendirme neticelerinin daha iyi karşılaştırılabiliğini sağlayar.', 'am': 'የወርቅ ኮርፖርት እና ተቃዋሚዎች አካባቢ አካባቢ (NEL) ስርዓት ማቀናኘት እና የበለጠ የNEL ስርዓት መግለጫ ማሳየትን በመጫወት የቁልፍ ክፍል ነው፡፡ በተጠቃሚ ኮርፖርት እና የተጠቃሚ ሚትሪኮች የዚህ ፕሮግራም ግማሽ ነው፡፡ እንግዲህ እነዚህን ወርቅ ዓላማዎች የሚጠቅሙትን አራት ታላላቅ ጉዳዮች እናውቃለን:(i) የልዩ ልዩ ልዩ አካባቢ ዓይነት፣ (ii) ጥሩ እና ጠይቅ እና ጠይቋል (iii) የእውቀት መሠረት ውጤት (iv) እና የተለየ ሁኔታዎችን በመጠቀም እና ልዩነት ነው፡፡ ይህ ገጽ የNEL ማስታወቂያ እና የኮፕስ ክፍተት ክፍተቶችን በመፍጠር የሚፈቅድ የኮፕስ ፍጥረት፣ የቆርፓስ ፍጥረት ይረዳል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የተለየ የፊርት ሥርዓት እና ማስታወቂያው ሜትሪኮችን ለመተካከል የሚሻል ትክክል እንዲያደርጋል፡፡', 'az': 'AltńĪn standart korpora v…ô m√ľqayis…ôd…ô deńüerlendirm…ôl…ôr benchmarking adlńĪ entity bańülayńĪcńĪ (NEL) performansńĪ v…ô daha sofistikli NEL sisteml…ôrinin geliŇüm…ôsini s√ľr√ľkl…ôyir. QullanńĪlan korpora v…ô istifad…ô edil…ôn deńüerlendirm…ô metrikl…ôrinin keyfiyy…ôti bu prosesd…ô √ßox m√∂vcuddur. Buna g√∂r…ô d…ô biz √ľ√ß m…ôŇühur deńüerlendirm…ô korporasńĪnńĪn keyfiyy…ôtini t…ôsdiq edirik, bu altńĪn standartlarńĪna t…ôsir ed…ôn d√∂rd b√∂y√ľk m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôri t…ôsdiq edirik: i) m√ľxt…ôlif annotation still…ôrinin istifad…ôsi, (ii) yanlńĪŇü v…ô yox edilmiŇü annotatiyonlarńĪn, (iii) Bilim Base evolution, (iv) v…ô ortaqlarńĪnńĪn m√ľxt…ôlif fikirl…ôri t…ôsdiq edirik. Bu kańüńĪt bu m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôri NEL annotations v…ô corpus versiyonlarńĪnńĪ formaliz…ô ed…ôr…ôk √ß…ôkir ki, corpus yaradńĪlńĪŇüńĪnńĪ standardiz…ô ed…ôr, corpus evolution d…ôst…ôkl…ôyir v…ô lensl…ôrin istifad…ôsinin yolunu √∂z-√∂z√ľnd…ô f…ôrqli corpus konfigurasiyonlarńĪn arasńĪnda d…ôyiŇü…ôr. ∆Źksin…ô, a √ßńĪq-aydńĪn tanńĪmlanmńĪŇü scoring kurallarńĪnńĪn v…ô deńüerlendirm…ô metrikl…ôrinin istifad…ôsi daha yaxŇüńĪ deńüerlendirm…ô sonu√ßlarńĪnńĪn m√ľqayis…ôd…ô olacańüńĪnńĪ g√ľman edir.', 'hy': "Ոսկու ստանդարտ կառուցվածքները և մրցակցության գնահատումները կարևոր դեր են խաղում համեմատական վերաբերյալ կոչված կառուցվածքի վերաբերյալ, որը կապում է (ՆԵL) արտադրողականությունը և խթանում է ավելի բարդ ՆԵL համակարգե The quality of the used corpora and the used evaluation metrics are crucial in this process.  Այսպիսով, մենք գնահատում ենք երեք հայտնի գնահատման մարմնի որակը, որոշում ենք չորս կարևոր հարց, որոնք ազդում են այս ոսկու ստանդարտներին. i) տարբեր annoտացիայի ոճերի օգտագործումը, II) սխալ և բացակայած annoտացիաները, III) Գիտության հիմքի էվոլյուցիան, v) և տարբերությունները annoտացիայի համապատասխան Այս թղթին լուծում է այս խնդիրները' ձևավորելով ՆԵL-ի նշումները և մարմնի տարբերակները, որոնք թույլ են տալիս ստանդարտիզացնել մարմնի ստեղծումը, աջակցել մարմնի էվոլյուցիան և պատրաստում են ուղին ոսպնյակների օգտագործման համար, որպեսզի ինքնաբեր Ավելին, պարզ սահմանված գնահատման կանոնների և գնահատման չափումների օգտագործումը ապահովում է գնահատման արդյունքների ավելի լավ համեմատություն:", 'bs': 'Zlatne standardne korporacije i konkurentne procjene imaju ključnu ulogu u kritičnoj mjeri imena entiteta povezanih (NEL) učinkovitosti i vožnji razvoj sofisticiranih NEL sustava. U ovom procesu je ključna kvalitet korišćenog korisnika i korišćene procjene metrike. Stoga procjenjujemo kvalitet tri popularne procjene korpore, identificirajući četiri glavne pitanja koje utječu na te zlatne standarde: i) korištenje različitih annotacijskih stila, ii) nepravedne i nestale annotacije, iii) evolucija baze znanja, iv) i razlike u annotacijskim događajima. Ovaj papir rješava te probleme formalizirajući NEL annotacije i verziju korpusa koja omogućava standardizaciju stvaranja korpusa, podržava evoluciju korpusa i sprema put za upotrebu lensa da se automatski transformiše između različitih korpusnih konfiguracija. Osim toga, korištenje jasno definiranih pravila izvlačenja i metrika procjene osigurava bolju usporedbu rezultata procjene.', 'ca': "La corpora normal d'or i les evaluacions competitives juguen un paper clau en comparar l'entitat anomenada vinculant el rendiment (NEL) i impulsant el desenvolupament de sistemes NEL més sofisticats. La qualitat del corpore utilitzat i les mètriques d'evaluació utilitzades són crucials en aquest procés. Per tant, evaluem la qualitat de tres corpores populars d'evaluació, identificant quatre temes importants que afecten aquests estàndards d'or: (i) l'ús de diferents estils d'anotació, (ii) anotacions incorrectes i que falten, (iii) evolució de la base del coneixement, (iv) i diferències en anotació de coocurrències. This paper addresses these issues by formalizing NEL annotations and corpus versioning which allows standardizing corpus creation, supports corpus evolution, and paves the way for the use of lenses to automatically transform between different corpus configurations.  A més, l'ús de normes clarament definides de puntuació i mètriques d'evaluació assegura una millor comparabilitat dels resultats d'evaluació.", 'sq': 'Korpora standard e artë dhe vlerësimet konkurruese luajnë një rol kyç në analizimin e njësisë së quajtur që lidh performancën (NEL) dhe nxit zhvillimin e sistemeve më të sofistikuara të NEL. Kualiteti i korprës së përdorur dhe metrika e vlerësimit të përdorur janë vendimtare në këtë proces. We, therefore, assess the quality of three popular evaluation corpora, identifying four major issues which affect these gold standards: (i) the use of different annotation styles, (ii) incorrect and missing annotations, (iii) Knowledge Base evolution, (iv) and differences in annotating co-occurrences.  This paper addresses these issues by formalizing NEL annotations and corpus versioning which allows standardizing corpus creation, supports corpus evolution, and paves the way for the use of lenses to automatically transform between different corpus configurations.  In addition, the use of clearly defined scoring rules and evaluation metrics ensures a better comparability of evaluation results.', 'bn': 'সোনার স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার্ড কোর্পোরা এবং প্রতিযোগিতার মূল্য বেনম্যাঙ্কিং নামের বস্তুকে লিঙ্ক করা এবং আরও সাফিক্সিক নেল সিস্টেম উন্ন এই প্রক্রিয়ায় ব্যবহৃত কর্পোরা এবং ব্যবহার করা মূল্যায়ন মেট্রিকের মান গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। তাই আমরা তিনটি জনপ্রিয় মূল্যবোধ কোর্পোরার মানের মূল্য মূল্য মূল্যের মূল্য মূল্য মূল্য পরিচিত করি, যা এই সোনার মানে প্রভাব ফেলে দেয়:(i) বিভিন্ন স্টাইল ব্যবহার করে (ii) ভুল এবং বিষয়টি  এই কাগজটি নেএল বিবেচনা এবং কোর্পাস সংস্করণ গঠন করার মাধ্যমে এই সমস্ত বিষয়গুলোর বিষয়গুলোকে ঠিক করেছে, যা কোর্পাস সৃষ্টি করার সুযোগ দেয়, কর্পাস বিবর্তনের সমর্থন করে এবং  এছাড়াও, পরিষ্কার করে স্কোরিং নিয়ম এবং মূল্যায়ন মেট্রিক ব্যবহারের মূল্যায়নের ফলাফলের সুবিধা নিশ্চিত করে।', 'cs': 'Korpusy zlatého standardu a konkurenční hodnocení hrají klíčovou roli při srovnávání výkonu pojmenovaných entit linking (NEL) a řízení vývoje sofistikovanějších systémů NEL. Kvalita použitých korpusů a použité hodnotící metriky jsou v tomto procesu klíčové. Proto hodnotíme kvalitu tří populárních hodnotících korpusů a identifikujeme čtyři hlavní problémy, které ovlivňují tyto zlaté standardy: (i) použití různých stylů anotace, (ii) nesprávné a chybějící anotace, (iii) evoluce znalostní báze, (iv) a rozdíly v anotaci společných výskytů. Tento článek řeší tyto problémy formalizací anotací NEL a verze korpusu, které umožňují standardizaci tvorby korpusů, podporují evoluci korpusů a připravují cestu pro použití objektivů k automatické transformaci mezi různými konfiguracemi korpusů. Použití jasně definovaných bodovacích pravidel a hodnotících metrik navíc zajišťuje lepší srovnatelnost výsledků hodnocení.', 'fi': 'Kullastandardin korpusilla ja kilpailuarvioinneilla on keskeinen rooli nimettyjen kokonaisuuksien linkittämisen (NEL) suorituskyvyn vertailussa ja kehittyneempien NEL-järjestelmien kehittämisessä. Käytettyjen korpusten laatu ja käytetyt arviointimittarit ovat tässä prosessissa ratkaisevan tärkeitä. Tämän vuoksi arvioimme kolmen suositun arviointikorpusen laatua ja yksilöimme neljä keskeistä asiaa, jotka vaikuttavat näihin kultaisiin standardeihin: (i) erilaisten merkintätyylien käyttö, (ii) virheelliset ja puuttuvat merkinnät, (iii) Knowledge Base evolution, (iv) ja erot samanaikaisten merkintöjen tekemisessä. Tämä artikkeli käsittelee näitä kysymyksiä formalisoimalla NEL-merkinnät ja korpusversioinnin, joka mahdollistaa korpusten luomisen standardoinnin, tukee korpusten kehitystä ja tasoittaa tietä linssien käytölle automaattisesti muuntautumiseen eri korpuskokoonpanojen välillä. Lisäksi selkeästi määriteltyjen pisteytyssääntöjen ja arviointimittareiden käyttö takaa paremman vertailtavuuden arviointituloksissa.', 'et': 'Kuldstandardite korpused ja konkurentsivõime hindamised mängivad olulist rolli nimetatud üksuste sidumise võrdlemisel ja keerukamate NEL-süsteemide arendamisel. Selles protsessis on otsustava tähtsusega kasutatud korpuste kvaliteet ja kasutatud hindamismeetodikud. Seetõttu hindame kolme populaarse hindamiskorpora kvaliteeti, tehes kindlaks neli peamist küsimust, mis mõjutavad neid kuldstandardeid: (i) erinevate märgistusstiilide kasutamine, (ii) ebaõiged ja puuduvad märgistused, (iii) teabebaasi areng, (iv) ja erinevused samaaegsete esinemiste märgistamisel. Käesolevas artiklis käsitletakse neid küsimusi, vormistades NEL-i annotatsioonid ja korpuse versioonid, mis võimaldavad korpuse loomist standardida, toetavad korpuse arengut ja sillutavad teed läätsede kasutamisel automaatselt erinevate korpuse konfiguratsioonide vahel muundumiseks. Lisaks tagab selgelt määratletud hindamisreeglite ja hindamismõõdikute kasutamine hindamistulemuste parema võrreldavuse.', 'jv': 'Njaring kalitas karo perusahaan nggampang kana-perusahaan karo hal-hal kuwi nggunakaké meta-perusahaan iki diangga bantuan. Awak dhéwé Awak dhéwé iki eraus akeh perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo ngilanggar aturan NéL lan versi cara-cara sing supoyo tindakan akeh dumadhi iki, nggunaké evolusyon cara-cara, lan ijol-itik dhéwé kanggo nguasai tanggal kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan cara-cara sing ngedol Genjer-genjer', 'sk': 'Korpusi zlatih standardov in konkurenčne ocene igrajo ključno vlogo pri primerjavi zmogljivosti imenovanega povezovanja entitet (NEL) in spodbujanju razvoja bolj prefinjenih sistemov NEL. Kakovost uporabljenih korpusov in uporabljene meritve ocenjevanja so ključnega pomena v tem procesu. Zato ocenjujemo kakovost treh priljubljenih korpusov ocenjevanja, pri čemer ugotavljamo štiri glavna vprašanja, ki vplivajo na te zlate standarde: (i) uporaba različnih slogov označevanja, (ii) napačne in manjkajoče opombe, (iii) razvoj baze znanja, (iv) in razlike pri označevanju sočasnih pojavov. Ta vprašanja se obravnavajo s formalizacijo NEL opomb in različic korpusa, ki omogoča standardizacijo ustvarjanja korpusa, podpira razvoj korpusa in utrjuje pot uporabi leč za samodejno preoblikovanje med različnimi konfiguracijami korpusa. Poleg tega uporaba jasno opredeljenih pravil ocenjevanja in meritev ocenjevanja zagotavlja boljšo primerljivost rezultatov ocenjevanja.', 'ha': "QXml Tsarin korpo da metrici da aka yi amfani da shi na muhimu a cikin wannan aikin. Kayya, ko da yaushe, za'a ƙaddara sifar firma uku da aka popular ta, ana gane masu huɗu masu muhimmi waɗanda ke yi amfani da kanalatan waɗannan na zĩnãriya: (i) isticmani da misãlai masu hasãra, (ii) mai daidai da kuma wanda ba'a sava haske ba, (ii) Bambancin Cilmi (IV) da sãɓãni a cikin su sanar da ko-koma. Wannan takardar ɗin na yi amfani da shiryoyin ayukan ayuka na NEL da tsohon nau'in da za'a fara yin motsi da shirin kwamfyuta wanda ke yarda a daidaita halittar nau'in, kuma yana ƙarani da kwamfyuta, kuma yana tafiyar da hanya da za'a yi amfani da linse farat ɗaya dõmin ya canza tsakanin tsarin nau'i daban-nau'in. In a ƙara, amfani da shiryoyin kode da tunkuɗe-metric na bayyana bayani yana kasancewa mafiya daidaita ga fassarar evaluation.", 'he': 'גופורה סטנדרטית זהב והערכות תחרותיות משחקות תפקיד מפתח בהערכה בניסיון שנקראת יחידה שמקשרת ביצועים (NEL) ומנהלת את הפיתוח של מערכות NEL מתוחכמות יותר. איכות הקופורה השתמשת והמטריות הערכה השתמשת הן קריטיות בתהליך הזה. אנו, לכן, מעריכים את איכות שלושה גופות הערכה פופולריות, מזהה ארבעה בעיות גדולות שמשפיעות על הסטנדרטים הזהבים האלה: (i) השימוש בסגנונות הערות שונות, (ii) הערות הלא נכונות והחסרות, (iii) אבולוציה בסיס ידע, (iv) והשונים בהציעות התרחשות משותפות. הנייר הזה מתייחס לנושאים האלה באמצעות הפרשמיות של הערות של NEL וגרסה גופוס שמאפשרת ליצור גוף סטנדרטיזציה, תומכת באבולוציה גופוס, ומפתחת את הדרך לשימוש בעדשות כדי לשנות באופן אוטומטי בין הגדרות גופות שונות. בנוסף, השימוש של חוקי ציונים מוגדרים בבירור ומטריקות הערכה מאבטחים שיוואי טוב יותר של תוצאות הערכה.', 'bo': 'Gold standard corpora and competitive evaluations play a key role in benchmarking named entity linking (NEL) performance and driving the development of more sophisticated NEL systems. The quality of the used corpora and the used evaluation metrics are crucial in this process. འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཕལ་ཆེན་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཁང་གི་གནད་དོན་གྱི་དཔྱད་ཚད་གསུམ་ཡིན་དཔྱད་པར། རྩིས་གཞི་འདི་དག་གི་ཐོན་སྐྱེད་ཚད་འདི་དག་གནོད་པའི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ཚུ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་དགོས: (i) སྙན་སྲིད་བཟོ་སྣ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་རྐྱེན་འདི་དག ཁྱད་པར། གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་ངེས་འཛིན་བྱས་པའི་སྐོར་ལས་དབྱེ་བ་དང་ཚད་རྩིས་པ་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡ'}
{'en': 'An Open, Extendible, and Fast Turkish Morphological Analyzer', 'ar': 'محلل صرفي تركي مفتوح وقابل للتمديد وسريع', 'pt': 'Um analisador morfológico turco aberto, extensível e rápido', 'fr': 'Un analyseur morphologique turc ouvert, extensible et rapide', 'es': 'Un analizador morfológico turco abierto, extensible y rápido', 'ja': 'オープン、エクステンダブル、および高速トルコの形態分析装置', 'zh': '开放式、可广而疾者土耳其形分析仪', 'hi': 'एक खुला, विस्तारित, और तेजी से तुर्की रूपात्मक विश्लेषक', 'ru': 'Открытый, расширяемый и быстрый турецкий морфологический анализатор', 'ga': 'Anailíseoir moirfeolaíoch Tuircis Oscailte, Insínte agus Tapa', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένας ανοιχτός, επεκτάσιμος και γρήγορος τουρκικός μορφολογικός αναλυτής', 'hu': 'Egy nyitott, bővíthető és gyors török morfológiai elemző', 'it': 'Un analizzatore morfologico turco aperto, estensibile e veloce', 'kk': 'Name', 'mk': 'Отворен, проширен и брз турски морфолошки анализатор', 'lt': 'Atviras, išplėstinis ir greitas Turkijos morfologinis analizatorius', 'ms': 'Penganalisis Morfologi Turki Terbuka, Terluas, dan Cepat', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Analizzatur Morfoloġiku Tork Miftuħ, Estendibbli u Rapidu', 'mn': 'Нэг нээлттэй, нэмэгдэж, хурдан Туркийн морфологик анализ', 'pl': 'Otwarty, rozszerzalny i szybki turecki analizator morfologiczny', 'ro': 'Un analizor morfologic turc deschis, extensibil și rapid', 'sr': 'Otvoren, prošireni i brzi turski morfološki analizator', 'no': 'Name', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En öppen, utbyggbar och snabb turkisk morfologisk analysator', 'so': 'Analyzer morphological ah ee Turki', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'A Mở, kéo dài, và Tua nhanh tập đoàn Morphine', 'hr': 'Otvoren, prošireni i brzi turski morfološki analizator', 'da': 'En åben, udvidelig og hurtig tyrkisk morfologisk analyse', 'de': 'Ein offener, erweiterbarer und schneller türkischer Morphologischer Analysator', 'bg': 'Отворен, разширяем и бърз турски морфологичен анализатор', 'id': 'An Open, Extendible, and Fast Turkish Morphological Analyzer', 'nl': 'Een open, uitbreidbare en snelle Turkse morfologische analysator', 'ko': '개방적이고 확장 가능하며 빠른 터키 형태 분석기', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'An Open, Extended, and Fast Turkish Morphological Analyzer', 'sw': 'Anachambua Kitambuzi cha Kimorphological cha Uturuki', 'sq': 'Një analizues i hapur, i zgjeruar dhe i shpejtë morfologjik turk', 'hy': 'An Open, Extendible, and Fast Turkish Morphological Analyzer', 'af': 'Name', 'az': 'Açıq, genişlənən və hızlı Türk Morphological Analyzer', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'bn': 'একটি খোলা, বিস্তৃত, এবং দ্রুত তুর্কি মরোফোলিক্যালেজার', 'bs': 'Otvoren, prošireni i brzi turski morfološki analizator', 'et': 'Avatud, laiendatav ja kiire Türgi morfoloogiline analüsaator', 'ca': 'Un analitzador morfològic turc obert, extensible i ràpid', 'fi': 'Avoin, laajennettava ja nopea turkkilainen morfologinen analysaattori', 'cs': 'Otevřený, rozšířitelný a rychlý turecký morfologický analyzátor', 'jv': 'an Open, Expanddible, and fast turc', 'he': 'ניתוח מורפולוגי טורקי פתוח, מתרחב ומהיר', 'ha': 'An buÉ—e, Extent, and Fast Tkurki Analyze', 'sk': 'Odprt, razširljiv in hiter turški morfološki analizator', 'bo': 'An Open, Extendible, and Fast Turkish Morphological Analyzer'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present a two-level morphological analyzer for Turkish. The morphological analyzer consists of five main components : finite state transducer, rule engine for suffixation, lexicon, trie data structure, and LRU cache. We use Java language to implement finite state machine logic and rule engine, Xml language to describe the finite state transducer rules of the Turkish language, which makes the morphological analyzer both easily extendible and easily applicable to other languages. Empowered with the comprehensiveness of a lexicon of 54,000 bare-forms including 19,000 proper nouns, our morphological analyzer presents one of the most reliable analyzers produced so far. The analyzer is compared with Turkish morphological analyzers in the literature. By using LRU cache and a trie data structure, the system can analyze 100,000 words per second, which enables users to analyze huge corpora in a few hours.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث ، نقدم محلل صرفي من مستويين للغة التركية. يتكون المحلل المورفولوجي من خمسة مكونات رئيسية: محول الحالة المحدود ، ومحرك القاعدة للاحقة ، والمعجم ، وبنية البيانات الثلاثية ، وذاكرة التخزين المؤقت LRU. نحن نستخدم لغة Java لتنفيذ منطق آلة الحالة المحدودة ومحرك القاعدة ، لغة Xml لوصف قواعد محول الحالة المحدودة للغة التركية ، مما يجعل المحلل الصرفي سهل الامتداد وقابل للتطبيق بسهولة على اللغات الأخرى. مدعومًا بشمولية معجم لـ 54000 من الأشكال المجردة بما في ذلك 19000 اسم علم ، يقدم محلل الصروف لدينا أحد أكثر أدوات التحليل موثوقية التي تم إنتاجها حتى الآن. تمت مقارنة المحلل بالمحللات المورفولوجية التركية في الأدبيات. باستخدام ذاكرة التخزين المؤقت LRU وهيكل بيانات ثلاثي ، يمكن للنظام تحليل 100000 كلمة في الثانية ، مما يتيح للمستخدمين تحليل مجموعات ضخمة في غضون ساعات قليلة.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos um analisador morfológico de dois níveis para turco. O analisador morfológico consiste em cinco componentes principais: transdutor de estado finito, mecanismo de regras para sufixação, léxico, estrutura de dados trie e cache LRU. Usamos a linguagem Java para implementar a lógica da máquina de estado finito e o mecanismo de regras, a linguagem Xml para descrever as regras do transdutor de estado finito da língua turca, o que torna o analisador morfológico facilmente extensível e facilmente aplicável a outras linguagens. Fortalecido com a abrangência de um léxico de 54.000 formas simples, incluindo 19.000 nomes próprios, nosso analisador morfológico apresenta um dos analisadores mais confiáveis produzidos até agora. O analisador é comparado com analisadores morfológicos turcos na literatura. Usando cache LRU e uma estrutura de dados trie, o sistema pode analisar 100.000 palavras por segundo, o que permite aos usuários analisar corpora enormes em poucas horas.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos un analizador morfológico de dos niveles para turco. El analizador morfológico consta de cinco componentes principales: transductor de estados finitos, motor de reglas para sufijación, léxico, estructura de datos trie y caché LRU. Utilizamos el lenguaje Java para implementar la lógica de la máquina de estados finitos y el motor de reglas, el lenguaje Xml para describir las reglas del transductor de estado finito del idioma turco, lo que hace que el analizador morfológico sea fácilmente extensible y fácilmente aplicable a otros idiomas. Potenciado con la exhaustividad de un léxico de 54 000 formas desnudas que incluyen 19 000 nombres propios, nuestro analizador morfológico presenta uno de los analizadores más fiables producidos hasta ahora. El analizador se compara con los analizadores morfológicos turcos en la literatura. Mediante el uso de la caché LRU y una estructura de datos real, el sistema puede analizar 100.000 palabras por segundo, lo que permite a los usuarios analizar grandes cuerpos en unas pocas horas.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons un analyseur morphologique à deux niveaux pour le turc. L'analyseur morphologique comprend cinq composants principaux\xa0: un transducteur d'état fini, un moteur de règles pour la suffixation, un lexique, une structure de données de trie et un cache LRU. Nous utilisons le langage Java pour implémenter une logique de machine à états finis et un moteur de règles, le langage Xml pour décrire les règles de transducteur d'états finis de la langue turque, ce qui rend l'analyseur morphologique à la fois facilement extensible et facilement applicable à d'autres langages. Doté de l'exhaustivité d'un lexique de 54 000 formes nues comprenant 19 000 noms propres, notre analyseur morphologique présente l'un des analyseurs les plus fiables produits à ce jour. L'analyseur est comparé aux analyseurs morphologiques turcs de la littérature. En utilisant le cache LRU et une structure de données triée, le système peut analyser 100 000 mots par seconde, ce qui permet aux utilisateurs d'analyser d'énormes corpus en quelques heures.", 'ja': '本稿では、トルコ語のための2レベルの形態分析器を紹介する。形態分析装置は、有限状態トランスデューサ、接尾辞用ルールエンジン、辞書、トライデータ構造、およびLRUキャッシュの5つの主要コンポーネントで構成されています。私たちは、Java言語を使用して有限状態機械論理とルールエンジンを実装し、Xml言語を使用してトルコ語の有限状態トランスデューサルールを記述します。これにより、形態分析器は容易に拡張可能であり、他の言語にも簡単に適用できます。19,000の固有名詞を含む54,000のベアフォームの包括的な語彙を備えた当社の形態分析装置は、これまでに生産された最も信頼性の高い分析装置の1つを提供します。分析装置は文献中のトルコの形態分析装置と比較される。LRUキャッシュとTRIEデータ構造を使用することで、1秒あたり10万ワードを解析することができ、ユーザーは数時間で巨大なコーパスを解析することができます。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम तुर्की के लिए दो-स्तरीय रूपात्मक विश्लेषक प्रस्तुत करते हैं। रूपात्मक विश्लेषक में पांच मुख्य घटक होते हैं: परिमित राज्य ट्रांसड्यूसर, प्रत्यय के लिए नियम इंजन, शब्दकोश, ट्राइ डेटा संरचना और एलआरयू कैश। हम जावा भाषा का उपयोग परिमित राज्य मशीन तर्क और नियम इंजन को लागू करने के लिए करते हैं, तुर्की भाषा के परिमित राज्य ट्रांसड्यूसर नियमों का वर्णन करने के लिए एक्सएमएल भाषा, जो रूपात्मक विश्लेषक को आसानी से विस्तारित और आसानी से अन्य भाषाओं पर लागू करता है। 19,000 उचित संज्ञाओं सहित 54,000 नंगे-रूपों के एक शब्दकोश की व्यापकता के साथ सशक्त, हमारे रूपात्मक विश्लेषक अब तक उत्पादित सबसे विश्वसनीय विश्लेषकों में से एक प्रस्तुत करते हैं। विश्लेषक की तुलना साहित्य में तुर्की रूपात्मक विश्लेषकों के साथ की जाती है। एलआरयू कैश और एक ट्राइ डेटा संरचना का उपयोग करके, सिस्टम प्रति सेकंड 100,000 शब्दों का विश्लेषण कर सकता है, जो उपयोगकर्ताओं को कुछ घंटों में विशाल कॉर्पोरेट का विश्लेषण करने में सक्षम बनाता है।', 'zh': '本文中,有土耳其语二态分析仪。 形分析器五要组件:有限传感器、后缀则引擎、词典、trie 数据结构、 LRU 缓存。 吾以Java言成有限状态机逻法引擎,以Xml言述土耳其语有限换能器则,是使形分析器易广而易用也。 吾形分析仪有 54,000 裸文(包 19,000 专有名词)之词典全面性,迄今为止生之至分析仪也。 其分析仪与文献土耳其形分析仪较之。 用LRU缓存trie数据结构,统每秒析100,000一单词,使用户得数时之间析大语料库。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем двухуровневый морфологический анализатор для турецкого языка. Морфологический анализатор состоит из пяти основных компонентов: конечный преобразователь, механизм правил для суффиксации, лексикон, структура данных TRIE и кэш LRU. Мы используем язык Java для реализации логики конечных состояний машины и движка правил, язык Xml для описания правил конечных состояний преобразователя турецкого языка, что делает морфологический анализатор как легко расширяемым, так и легко применимым к другим языкам. Обладая всеобъемлющей лексикой из 54 000 неизолированных форм, включая 19 000 собственных существительных, наш морфологический анализатор представляет один из самых надежных анализаторов, произведенных до сих пор. Анализатор сравнивается с турецкими морфологическими анализаторами в литературе. Используя кэш LRU и структуру данных TRIE, система может анализировать 100 000 слов в секунду, что позволяет пользователям анализировать огромные тела за несколько часов.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid anailíseoir moirfeolaíoch dhá leibhéal i láthair don Tuircis. Tá cúig phríomhchuid san anailíseoir moirfeolaíoch: trasduchtóir staide críochta, inneall rialach le haghaidh iarmhírithe, foclóir, struchtúr sonraí trie, agus taisce LRU. Bainimid úsáid as teanga Java chun loighic meaisín stáit chríochnaithe agus inneall riail a chur i bhfeidhm, teanga Xml chun cur síos a dhéanamh ar na rialacha um thrasduchtúr staide críochta na Tuirce, rud a fhágann go bhfuil an anailíseoir moirfeolaíoch insínte agus infheidhmithe go héasca do theangacha eile. Agus é cumasaithe le cuimsitheacht foclóir de 54,000 foirm lom lena n-áirítear 19,000 ainmfhocal cearta, cuireann ár n-anailísí moirfeolaíocha ceann de na hanailíseoirí is iontaofa a táirgeadh go dtí seo i láthair. Cuirtear an anailíseoir i gcomparáid le hanailíseoirí moirfeolaíocha na Tuirce sa litríocht. Trí úsáid a bhaint as taisce LRU agus struchtúr sonraí trie, is féidir leis an gcóras anailís a dhéanamh ar 100,000 focal in aghaidh an tsoicind, rud a chuireann ar chumas úsáideoirí anailís a dhéanamh ar chorpas ollmhór i gceann cúpla uair an chloig.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζεται ένας μορφολογικός αναλυτής δύο επιπέδων για τα τουρκικά. Ο μορφολογικός αναλυτής αποτελείται από πέντε κύρια συστατικά: μετατροπέα πεπερασμένης κατάστασης, μηχανή κανόνων για την επίθεση, λεξικό, δομή δεδομένων και προσωρινή μνήμη. Χρησιμοποιούμε τη γλώσσα για να εφαρμόσουμε τη λογική μηχανών πεπερασμένης κατάστασης και τη μηχανή κανόνων, τη γλώσσα για να περιγράψουμε τους κανόνες μετατροπέων πεπερασμένης κατάστασης της τουρκικής γλώσσας, γεγονός που καθιστά τον μορφολογικό αναλυτή τόσο εύκολα επεκτάσιμο όσο και εύκολα εφαρμόσιμο σε άλλες γλώσσες. Ενισχυμένος με την πληρότητα ενός λεξικού 54.000 γυμνών μορφών συμπεριλαμβανομένων 19.000 κανονικών ουσιαστικών, ο μορφολογικός αναλυτής μας παρουσιάζει έναν από τους πιο αξιόπιστους αναλυτές που έχουν παραχθεί μέχρι στιγμής. Ο αναλυτής συγκρίνεται με τους τουρκικούς μορφολογικούς αναλυτές στη βιβλιογραφία. Με τη χρήση της προσωρινής μνήμης και μιας δομής δεδομένων, το σύστημα μπορεί να αναλύσει 100.000 λέξεις ανά δευτερόλεπτο, γεγονός που επιτρέπει στους χρήστες να αναλύσουν τεράστια σώματα σε λίγες ώρες.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban egy kétszintes morfológiai analizátort mutatunk be török számára. A morfológiai analizátor öt fő összetevőből áll: véges állapotátalakító, utólagos szabályozó motor, lexikon, trie adatszerkezet és LRU gyorsítótár. Java nyelvet használunk a véges állapotú gép logikájának és szabálymeghajtójának megvalósítására, Xml nyelvet a török nyelv véges állapotú átalakító szabályainak leírására, ami a morfológiai analizátort könnyen bővíthetővé és könnyen alkalmazhatóvá teszi más nyelvekre. Az 54 000 csupasz formából álló lexikon átfogóságával felszerelt, 19 000 főnevet tartalmazó morfológiai analizátorunk az eddig gyártott egyik legmegbízhatóbb analizátort mutatja be. Az analizátort a török morfológiai analizátorokkal hasonlítjuk össze az irodalomban. Az LRU gyorsítótár és egy tria adatszerkezet használatával a rendszer 100 000 szót képes elemezni másodpercenként, ami lehetővé teszi a felhasználók számára, hogy pár óra alatt elemezzék a hatalmas corporákat.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნში ჩვენ ორ-დონე მოპოროლოგიური ანალიზატორის გამოყენებთ. მოპოროლოგიური ანალიზატორი ხუთი მნიშვნელოვანი კომპონენტების შეფარდება: დასრულებული სტატუსაციის მოწყობილობა, ლექსიკონის მოწყობილობა, მონაცემების სტრუქტ ჩვენ Java-ის ენაზე გამოყენებთ განსაკუთრებული მაქსინური ლოგიკის და მაქსინური მოდულის გამოყენებაში, Xml ენაზე, რომელიც ტერქური ენაზე განსაკუთრებელი სახელის განსაკუთრებელი წესების განსაკუთრებელი წესების განსაკუთ 54.000 ბოლოფორმების ლექსიკონის ყველაზე უფრო ძალიან, რომელიც 19.000 მსგავსი სახელი, ჩვენი მორპოლოგიური ანალიზატორი ახლა ერთი უფრო დარწმუნებელი ანალიზატორის გამოყენება. ანალიზატორი ტერქნის მორპოლოგიური ანალიზატორითან შედგენა ლიტურატში. LRU კაქის და მონაცემების სტრუქტურის გამოყენებით, სისტემა შეუძლია 100 000 სიტყვები წუთში ანალიზება, რომელიც მომხმარებელი უფრო საათში დიდი კოპორა ანალიზება.', 'it': "In questo articolo, presentiamo un analizzatore morfologico a due livelli per il turco. L'analizzatore morfologico è costituito da cinque componenti principali: trasduttore a stato finito, motore di regole per suffissi, lessico, struttura dati trie e cache LRU. Usiamo il linguaggio Java per implementare logica macchina a stato finito e motore di regole, linguaggio Xml per descrivere le regole del trasduttore a stato finito della lingua turca, che rende l'analizzatore morfologico sia facilmente estensibile e facilmente applicabile ad altre lingue. Dotato della completezza di un lessico di 54.000 forme nude tra cui 19.000 sostantivi propri, il nostro analizzatore morfologico presenta uno degli analizzatori più affidabili finora prodotti. L'analizzatore è confrontato con gli analizzatori morfologici turchi in letteratura. Utilizzando la cache LRU e una struttura di dati trie, il sistema può analizzare 100.000 parole al secondo, che consente agli utenti di analizzare enormi corpora in poche ore.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome dviejų lygių morfologinį analizatorių turkiečiams. Morfologinį analizatorių sudaro penki pagrindinės sudedamosios dalys: galutinės būsenos transduktorius, užpildymo reguliavimo variklis, leksikonas, bandymo duomenų struktūra ir LRU cache. Naudojame Java kalbą, kad įdiegtume galutinės būsenos mašinų logikos ir reguliavimo variklį, Xml kalbą, kad aprašytume galutinės būsenos transdutorių taisykles turkų kalboje, todėl morfologinis analizatorius tampa lengvai išplėstinis ir lengvai taikomas kitoms kalboms. Įgaliotas 54 000 nuogių formų lexikono išsamumu, įskaitant 19 000 tinkamų vardų, mūsų morfologinis analizatorius pristato vieną iš patikimiausių iki šiol pagamintų analizatorių. Analizatorius literatūroje lyginamas su Turkijos morfologiniais analizatoriais. Naudojant LRU cache ir bandomąją duomenų struktūrą sistema gali analizuoti 100 000 žodžių per sekundę, o tai leidžia naudotojams per kelias valandas analizuoti didžiulę korprą.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз Түрк үшін екі деңгейі морфологиялық анализерін көрсетедік. Морфологикалық анализері бес негізгі компоненттерден тұрады: аяқталған күй аударғышы, жұрнақтық ережелер тетігі, лексикан, деректер құрылымын сынақтау және LRU кэші. Біз Java тілін механизм логикалық және ережелер тетігін шектеу үшін қолданып, Xml тілі Түрк тілінің шектелген күй аударушы ережелерін таңдау үшін, ол морфологиялық анализаторын басқа тілдерге оңай және оңай қолдан Біздің морфологиялық анализеріміз жасалған ең сенімді анализердің бірін көрсетеді. Анализатор литературадағы Түрк морфологиялық анализаторлармен салыстырылады. LRU кэшін және деректер құрылғысын қолдану арқылы жүйе секундта 100.000 сөзді анализ алады. Бұл пайдаланушылардың бірнеше сағатта үлкен корпораны анализ етуін мүмкіндік береді.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, претставуваме морфолошки анализатор на два нива за турски. Морфолошкиот анализатор се состои од пет главни компоненти: трансдукер на крајна состојба, мотор на правила за суфиксација, лексикон, структура на податоци за обид и LRU кеш. Ние го користиме јазикот Java за имплементирање на ограничена државна машинска логика и мотор на правила, Xml јазик за опишување на ограничените државни правила за трансдукција на турскиот јазик, што го прави морфолошкиот анализатор лесно проширен и лесно применлив на други јазици. Нашиот морфолошки анализатор претставува еден од најдоверливите анализатори кои досега се произведени. The analyzer is compared with Turkish morphological analyzers in the literature.  Со употреба на ЛРУ кеш и структура на податоци за обид, системот може да анализира 100.000 зборови во секунда, што им овозможува на корисниците да анализираат огромна корпора за неколку часа.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan penganalisis morfologi dua tahap untuk Turki. Penganalisis morfologi terdiri dari lima komponen utama: pengubah keadaan tertentu, enjin peraturan untuk pengabaian, leksikon, struktur data cuba, dan cache LRU. Kami menggunakan bahasa Java untuk melaksanakan logik dan enjin peraturan mesin keadaan tertentu, bahasa Xml untuk menggambarkan peraturan pengubah keadaan tertentu bahasa Turki, yang menjadikan penganalisis morfologik kedua-dua mudah diperluaskan dan mudah digunakan untuk bahasa lain. Berkuasa dengan keseluruhan lexikon 54,000 bentuk kosong termasuk 19,000 nama yang tepat, penganalisis morfologik kami memperkenalkan salah satu penganalisis yang paling dipercayai yang dihasilkan sejauh ini. Analisis dibandingkan dengan analisis morfologi Turki dalam literatur. Dengan menggunakan cache LRU dan struktur data cuba, sistem boleh menganalisis 100,000 perkataan per saat, yang membolehkan pengguna menganalisis korpra besar dalam beberapa jam.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d തുര്\u200dക്കിക്ക് വേണ്ടി രണ്ട് നിലയില്\u200d ഒരു മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d അന്യായോജിക്കുന്നു. മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d അന്യായിക്കുന്നവന്\u200d അഞ്ചു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഘടകങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉള്ളതാണ്: ഫൈനിറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ട്രെന്\u200dസ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ജാവാ ഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു സ്റ്റേറ്റ് മെഷിന്\u200d ലോജിക്കും നിയന്ത്രിക്കുന്ന എഞ്ചിനും എക്സ്എല്\u200d ഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത്, തുര്\u200dക്കിക്ക് ഭാഷയുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല നമ്മുടെ മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കൽ വിശ്വസിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ലെക്സിക്കോണിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന് അധികാരമുണ്ട്. ഇതുവരെ ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ ഒരു ഏറ്റവും വിശ്വസ്തനായ അന്യായങ്ങളില ഈ അന്യോനിസര്\u200d സാഹിത്യത്തില്\u200d തുര്\u200dക്കിക്ക് മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d അന്യായോജിക്കുന്നവരോടൊപ്പമാണ്. LRU ക്യാഷും മൂന്നു ഡേറ്റാ ഘടനയും ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, സിസ്റ്റം ഒരു സെക്കന്റില്\u200d 100,000 വാക്കുകള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കും. അത് ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw analizzatur morfoloġiku ta’ żewġ livelli għat-Turkiż. L-analizzatur morfoloġiku jikkonsisti minn ħames komponenti ewlenin: trasdutur fi stat finit, magna tar-regola għas-suffissjoni, lexicon, struttura tad-dejta tat-test, u cache LRU. Aħna nużaw il-lingwa Java biex nimplimentaw il-loġika tal-magna u l-magna tar-regoli tal-istat finit, il-lingwa Xml biex jiddeskrivu r-regoli tat-trasduttur tal-istat finit tal-lingwa Torka, li jagħmel l-analizzatur morfoloġiku kemm faċilment estensibbli kif ukoll faċilment applikabbli għal lingwi oħra. Permezz tal-komprensività ta’ lexicon ta’ 54,000 forma vojta inklużi 19,000 isem xieraq, l-analizzatur morfoloġiku tagħna jippreżenta wieħed mill-aktar analizzaturi affidabbli prodotti s’issa. L-analizzatur jitqabbel mal-analizzaturi morfoloġiċi Torok fil-letteratura. Billi tuża cache tal-LRU u struttura ta’ dejta ta’ prova, is-sistema tista’ tanalizza 100,000 kelma kull sekonda, li tippermetti lill-utenti janalizzaw korpra enormi fi ftit sigħat.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi ein to nivå morfologisk analyser for tyrkisk. Morfologisk analysering inneheld fem hovudkomponentar: avslutta tilstand- transducer, regelmotor for suffiksjon, leksikon, prøv datastruktur og LRU- mellomlager. Vi bruker Java- språk for å implementera einaste tilstandsmotor- logikk og reglametoren, Xml- språk for å beskrive einaste tilstandskontrollreglane til den turske språket, som gjer morfologiske analyseren både enkelt utvidbare og enkelt tilgjengeleg for andre språk. Tømt med den omfattende leksikonen av 54.000 bare-formar, inkludert 19.000 rette namn, vår morfologisk analyser viser ein av dei mest betre analyserane som er produsert så langt. Analizatoren er samanlikna med tyrkiske morfologiske analyser i litteratur. Ved å bruka LRU-mellomlager og eit prøve-datastruktur kan systemet analysera 100.000 ord per sekund, slik at brukarar kan analysera store korpora i nokre timar.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiamy dwupoziomowy analizator morfologiczny dla tureckiego. Analizator morfologiczny składa się z pięciu głównych składników: przetwornika stanu skończonego, silnika reguł do sufiksacji, leksykonu, struktury danych trie i pamięci podręcznej LRU. Używamy języka Java do implementacji logiki maszyn skończonych stanów i silnika reguł, języka Xml do opisu reguł przetworników stanów skończonych języka tureckiego, co sprawia, że analizator morfologiczny jest łatwy do rozszerzenia i łatwego zastosowania do innych języków. Nasz analizator morfologiczny zapewnia kompleksowość leksykonu 54.000 nagich form, w tym rzeczowników 19.000, jeden z najbardziej niezawodnych analizatorów produkowanych dotychczas. Analizator porównywany jest z tureckimi analizatorami morfologicznymi w literaturze. Korzystając z pamięci podręcznej LRU i struktury danych, system może analizować 100.000 słów na sekundę, co umożliwia użytkownikom analizę ogromnych korpusów w ciągu kilku godzin.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm un analizor morfologic pe două niveluri pentru turcă. Analizorul morfologic constă din cinci componente principale: traductor de stare finită, motor de regulă pentru sufixare, lexicon, structură de date trie și cache LRU. Folosim limbajul Java pentru a implementa logica mașinilor cu stări finite și motorul de reguli, limbajul Xml pentru a descrie regulile traductorului de stări finite ale limbii turcești, ceea ce face analizorul morfologic atât ușor extensibil, cât și ușor de aplicat la alte limbi. Având capacitatea cuprinzătoare a unui lexicon de 54.000 de forme goale, inclusiv 19.000 de substantive proprii, analizorul nostru morfologic prezintă unul dintre cele mai fiabile analizoare produse până acum. Analizorul este comparat cu analizoarele morfologice turcești în literatură. Utilizând cache LRU și o structură de date trie, sistemul poate analiza 100.000 de cuvinte pe secundă, ceea ce permite utilizatorilor să analizeze corpore uriașe în câteva ore.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид Туркийн хоёр түвшинд морфологик шинжилгээ хийдэг. Морфологийн шинжилгээчид таван чухал компонентүүд байдаг: төгсгөл орнуудын хөгжүүлэгч, зориулалтын хөгжүүлэгч, лексикон, өгөгдлийн бүтэц болон LRU кэш. Бид Java хэл ашиглаж төгсгөл орнуудын логик, дүрмийн хөдөлгөөн, Xml хэл Турк хэлийн төгсгөл орнуудын хөгжүүлэгч дүрмийг тайлбарлаж, мөн морфологик шинжилгээгч бусад хэл дээр амархан, амархан ашиглах боломжтой болго Бидний морфологийн шинжилгээгчид хамгийн итгэлтэй шинжилгээчдийн нэгийг нэмэгдүүлж байна. Шалиулагч нь уран зохиолын Турк морфологик шинжилгээчтэй харьцуулдаг. LRU кэш болон өгөгдлийн бүтэц ашиглан систем секундэд 100,000 үг шинжилгээ хийж чадна. Энэ нь хэрэглэгчид хэдэн цагт том корпора шинжилгээ хийж чадна.', 'so': 'Warqadan waxaan Turkish ugu keenaynaa wax analyaal ah oo laba heer ah. Analyzerka morphologiga waxaa ka mid ah shan qayb oo muhiim ah: finite state transmitter, dowlad u taliya qalabka dhibaatada, lexicon, sadex sawir data ah, and LRU cache. Luqada Java waxaynu u isticmaalnaa in lagu sameeyo mashiinka shabakada dowladda ee Finnishka ah iyo maamulka, luuqada Xml si aynu u u sawirinno qaynuunnada wadamada turjumaha ee Finnishka, taasoo ka dhigaya baaritaanka sahlan iyo si fudud ugu isticmaalaya luuqadaha kale. Qofka la awooday dhamaantooda lexico oo ah 54,000 oo foom oo dhashay, kuwaas oo ku jira 19,000 oo cunto sax ah, analyoonkeenna waxaa soo saara mid ka mid ah wax analyaal u aamin karo ilaa hada. Analyzerka waxaa la barbaran karaa qoraalka ku qoran qofka dhakhtarka ah ee Turkish. Isku isticmaalka shabakada LRU iyo dhismaha macluumaadka saddex sano ayaa nidaamka wax ku sawiri kara 100,000 hadal per sekunde, kaas oo isticmaalayaasha wax ku sawiraya shirkad aad u weyn gudaha dhawr saacadood.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi en morfologisk analysator på två nivåer för turkiska. Den morfologiska analysatorn består av fem huvudkomponenter: finit state transducer, regelmotor för sufficering, lexikon, trie datastruktur och LRU cache. Vi använder Java språk för att implementera finite state machine logik och regelmotor, Xml språk för att beskriva finite state transducer regler för det turkiska språket, vilket gör den morfologiska analysatorn både lätt utbyggbar och lätt tillämplig på andra språk. Vår morfologiska analysator är utrustad med omfattningen av ett lexikon på 54 000 bara former inklusive 19 000 egensubstantiv och presenterar en av de mest tillförlitliga analysatorer som hittills producerats. Analysatorn jämförs med turkiska morfologiska analysatorer i litteraturen. Genom att använda LRU cache och en trie datastruktur kan systemet analysera 100 000 ord per sekund, vilket gör det möjligt för användare att analysera enorma korpora på några timmar.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo morfološki analizator na dva nivoa za turske. Morfološki analizator se sastoji od pet glavnih komponenta: krajnji državni prevoditelj, pravilni motor za sufiksiranje, leksikon, pokušaj strukturu podataka i cache LRU. Koristimo javni jezik za provedbu konačne logike i pravilnog motora državnih strojeva, Xml jezika za opisivanje konačnih pravila državnog prevodioca turskog jezika, što čini morfološki analizator lako proširenim i lako primjenjivom na druge jezike. Naš morfološki analizator predstavlja jedan od najpouzdanijih analizatora koji je do sada proizveden. Analizator se uspoređuje sa turskim morfološkim analizatorima u literaturi. Koristeći LRU cache i strukturu podataka, sistem može analizirati 100.000 reči sekundi, što omogućava korisnicima da analiziraju ogromnu korporu za nekoliko sati.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි තුර්කිෂ් විශ්ලේෂකයෙක් විස්තර කරනවා. මොර්ෆික්සාලෝගික විශ්ලේෂකයේ ප්\u200dරධාන අංකයක් පහයෙන් තියෙනවා: සීමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂකය, ප්\u200dරධාන අංකය, ලෙක්සිකෝ අපි ජාවා භාෂාව භාවිතාව භාවිතා කරනවා සම්පූර්ණ ස්ථාන පද්ධති පද්ධති ලොකික් සහ නීති එන්ජින්, XmL භාෂාව තුර්කිෂ් භාෂාවේ සි අපේ විශ්ලේෂක විශ්ලේෂකයෙන් ඉදිරියට විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් 54,000 බෝර් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ, 19,000 නියමයි, අපේ විශ්ලේෂක විශ් විශ්ලේෂකයා තුර්කිෂ් මෝර්ෆෝලෝජික විශ්ලේෂකයෙක් සමග උනතුරු කරනවා. LRU කැෂ් සහ දත්ත සංවිධානයක් භාවිත කරන්න, පද්ධතියේ පැය කිහිපයකින් විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් විද්\u200dයාස කරන්න, ප්\u200dරයාස', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் துருக்கிக்கான இரண்டு மட்டத்தில் ஒரு மருத்துவ ஆராய்ச்சியை கொண்டுள்ளோம். The morphological analyzer consists of five main components: finite state transducer, rule engine for suffixation, lexicon, trie data structure, and LRU cache.  நாம் ஜாவா மொழியை உபயோகிக்கிறோம் மின்னதமான நாட்டு இயந்திரத்தின் துருக்கி மொழியின் சிறந்த நாட்டு மாற்றி விதிகளை விவரிக்க எளிதாக மாற்றும் மற்ற மொ 19,000 சரியான உணவுகள் சேர்ந்து 54,000 தனிப்பட்ட வடிவங்களின் மூழ்க்கையால் வெற்றியடைந்தது, நம்முடைய மரபோக்கிய ஆராய்ச்சியாளர் இப்போது உருவாக்கப்பட்ட ஆராய்ச்சி துருக்கிய மோர்போலிகல் ஆராய்ச்சிகளுடன் ஒப்பிடும். LRU நினைவகத்தையும் மூன்று தரவு அமைப்புகளையும் பயன்படுத்தி, கணினி ஒரு நொடிக்கு 100,000 வார்த்தைகளை ஆய்வு செய்யலாம், அது பயனர்கள் சில மணிக்', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم ترکیش کے لئے ایک دو سطح مورفولوژیک تحلیل کرنے والے کو پیش کرتے ہیں۔ مورفولوژیکی تحلیل کرنے والے پانچ اصلی رقموں میں سے ہے: پائین سٹیٹ ٹرنڈوکری، سوفکسیس، لکسیکن، ڈاٹ ساختر کی کوشش کریں، اور LRU کیش. ہم جاوا زبان کا استعمال کرتے ہیں تاکہ مضبوط موقعیت ماشین لوجیک اور قانون انجینٹ کی عملکرد کریں، Xml زبان کو ترکیس زبان کی مضبوط موقعیت قانون کی تعریف کریں، جسے morfological analyzer both easily extendable and easily applicable to other languages. جو 54,000 صحیح فرموں کے مطابق قوت رکھا گیا ہے جن میں 19,000 صحیح نوم شامل ہے، ہمارا مورپولوژیکی تحلیل کرنے والا ایک بہت قابل تحلیل کرنے والا ہے جو یہاں تک پیدا کیا گیا ہے. تحلیل کرنے والے تورکیس مورفولوجی تحلیل کرنے والوں سے مقایسہ کیا گیا ہے۔ LRU کیچ اور ایک ڈیٹا ساختار کی کوشش کے ذریعہ، سیستم ایک ثانیه میں 100,000 کلمات کا تحلیل کر سکتا ہے، جو کارساز کو چند گھنٹوں میں بڑا کورپورا تحلیل کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz Turkish uchun ikki daraja morfologik analyzerni hozir qilamiz. Name Biz Java tildan foydalanamiz, davlat foydalanuvchi vosita logik va boshqa tillarda foydalanish uchun Xml tilni ishlatamiz, Turkish tilning eng yuqori vaqt tarjima qiluvchi qoidalarini aniqlash uchun oddiy tarjima qilamiz va boshqa tillarda qo'llanmagan oddiy tarjima qiladi. 54,000 qo'llangan 5,000 qo'llangan foydalanuvchiga ega bo'lgan natijada yetarli bo'ladi. Bizning morfologik analyzerimizning eng ishlayotgan analytiklardan biri beradi. Analyzer haqida Turkish morfologik analyzerga kamaytirilgan. Name", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi có một phân tích lịch sự hai cấp cho Thổ Nhĩ Kỳ. The morphology analizer consists of five main computers: finite state transucer, nore động cơ for suin, lexion, trie data structure, and LLIU lưư. Chúng tôi dùng ngôn ngữ Java để thực hiện cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc, dạng dạng Xml, để mô tả các quy tắc hạn chế của ngôn ngữ Thổ Nhĩ Kỳ. Đầy đủ ngôn ngữ của ngôn ngữ hồ sơ 54,000 với các danh từ mà trong đó có cả 58,000, phân tích lịch sử của chúng tôi có một trong những phân tích đáng tin cậy nhất được sản xuất đến nay. Chất phân tích được so sánh với các phân tích morphine của Thổ Nhĩ Kỳ. Bằng cách sử dụng bộ nhớ tạm đặt đặt đặt đặt đặt đặt đặt đặt đặt đặt đặt chính xác và cấu trúc dữ liệu loại ba, hệ thống có thể phân tích từng chữ một.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo morfološki analizator na dvije razine za turske. Morfološki analizator se sastoji od pet glavnih komponenta: krajnji državni prevoditelj, pravilni motor za suffiksiranje, leksikon, pokušaj strukturu podataka i cache LRU. Koristimo javni jezik za provedbu konačne logike i pravilnog motora državnih strojeva, Xml jezika za opisivanje krajnjih pravila državnog prevodioca turskog jezika, što čini morfološki analizator lako proširenim i lako primjenjivom na druge jezike. Naš morfološki analizator predstavlja jedan od najpouzdanijih analizatora koji je do sada proizveden. Analizator se uspoređuje s turskim morfološkim analizatorima u literaturi. Koristeći LRU cache i strukturu podataka, sustav može analizirati 100.000 riječi u sekundi, što omogućava korisnicima analizirati ogromnu tijelo za nekoliko sati.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме двустепенен морфологичен анализатор за турски език. Морфологичният анализатор се състои от пет основни компонента: крайно състояние преобразувател, правило двигател за наставка, лексикон, структура на трите данни и кеш. Използваме Ява език за внедряване на машинна логика и правилен двигател, език за описване на правилата за преобразуватели на крайно състояние на турския език, което прави морфологичния анализатор лесно разширяем и лесно приложим към други езици. Благодарение на изчерпателността на лексикон от 54 000 голи форми, включително 19 000 подходящи съществителни, нашият морфологичен анализатор представя един от най-надеждните анализатори, произведени досега. Анализаторът се сравнява с турските морфологични анализатори в литературата. С помощта на кеш и структура от три данни системата може да анализира 100 000 думи в секунда, което позволява на потребителите да анализират огромни корпуси за няколко часа.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we een morfologische analyse op twee niveaus voor Turks. De morfologische analyzer bestaat uit vijf hoofdcomponenten: eindige state transducer, regelengine voor suffixatie, lexicon, trie data structuur, en LRU cache. We gebruiken Java-taal om eindige state machine logica en regel engine te implementeren, Xml-taal om de eindige state transducer regels van de Turkse taal te beschrijven, waardoor de morfologische analyzer zowel gemakkelijk uitbreidbaar als gemakkelijk toepasbaar is op andere talen. Onze morfologische analyzer is een van de meest betrouwbare analyzers die tot nu toe zijn geproduceerd. De analysator wordt vergeleken met Turkse morfologische analysatoren in de literatuur. Door LRU cache en een trie datastructuur te gebruiken, kan het systeem 100.000 woorden per seconde analyseren, waardoor gebruikers enorme corpora in een paar uur kunnen analyseren.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi en to-niveau morfologisk analysator for tyrkisk. Den morfologiske analysator består af fem hovedkomponenter: finite state transducer, regelmotor til suffikering, leksikon, trie datastruktur og LRU cache. Vi bruger Java sprog til at implementere finite state machine logik og regelmotor, Xml sprog til at beskrive finite state transducer regler i det tyrkiske sprog, hvilket gør den morfologiske analysator både let udvidelig og let anvendelig til andre sprog. Forsynet med omfattende ordbog på 54.000 bare former, herunder 19.000 egennavne, præsenterer vores morfologiske analysator en af de mest pålidelige analysatorer produceret indtil videre. Analysatoren sammenlignes med tyrkiske morfologiske analysatorer i litteraturen. Ved at bruge LRU cache og en trie datastruktur, kan systemet analysere 100.000 ord i sekundet, hvilket gør det muligt for brugerne at analysere enorme korpora på få timer.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 2급 형태 분석기인 터키를 제시했다.형태 분석기는 다섯 가지 주요 구성 요소로 구성되어 있는데 그것이 바로 유한 상태 변환기, 접미사 규칙 엔진, 사전,trie 데이터 구조와 LRU 캐시이다.우리는 자바 언어로 유한 상태기 논리와 규칙 엔진을 실현했고 Xml 언어로 터키어의 유한 상태 전환 규칙을 묘사했다. 이로써 형태 분석기는 확장하기 쉽고 다른 언어에 적용하기 쉽다.우리의 어법 분석기는 54000개의 간단한 형식의 어휘를 가지고 있으며 19000개의 전문 명사를 포함하여 지금까지 가장 믿을 만한 분석기 중의 하나이다.이 분석기는 문헌 속의 터키 형태 분석기와 비교했다.LRU 캐시와 trie 데이터 구조를 사용하면 이 시스템은 초당 10만 개의 단어를 분석할 수 있어 사용자가 몇 시간 안에 거대한 자료 라이브러리를 분석할 수 있다.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک تحلیل مرفولژیک دو سطح برای ترکیه را پیشنهاد می کنیم. تحلیل\u200cکننده مورفولوژیکی از پنج عنصر اصلی است: تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cی وضعیت محدود، موتور قانونی برای تأثیر، لکسیکون، ساختار داده\u200cها را امتحان کنید، و cache LRU. ما از زبان جاوا استفاده می کنیم تا موتور منطقی و قانونی موقعیت محدودیت را انجام دهیم، زبان Xml برای توصیف قوانین قانونی قانونی قانون ترکیه را توصیف کند، که تحلیل\u200cکننده مورفولوژیکی را به آسانی و آسانی برای زبان\u200cهای دیگر فراخ می\u200cکند. قدرت دارد با کلی کلکسیون 54.000 فرم خالی که شامل 19.000 اسم درست است، تحلیل\u200cکننده مورفولوژیکی ما یکی از بهترین تحلیل\u200cکنندگان مطمئنی که تا حالا تولید شده است را نشان می\u200cدهد. تحلیل\u200cکننده با تحلیل\u200cکنندگان مورفولوژیک ترکیه در ادبیات مقایسه می\u200cشود. با استفاده از cache LRU و ساختار داده\u200cهای تلاش سیستم می\u200cتواند در ثانیه ۱۰۰۰۰ کلمه را تحلیل کند، که به کاربران اجازه می\u200cدهد که در چند ساعت شرکت بزرگی را تحلیل کنند.', 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit stellen wir einen zweistufigen morphologischen Analysator für Türkisch vor. Der morphologische Analysator besteht aus fünf Hauptkomponenten: Finite State Wandler, Rule Engine für Suffixation, Lexikon, Trie Datenstruktur und LRU Cache. Wir verwenden Java-Sprache, um Finite State Machine Logik und Rule Engine zu implementieren, Xml Sprache, um die Finite State Wandler Regeln der türkischen Sprache zu beschreiben, was den morphologischen Analysator sowohl leicht erweiterbar als auch leicht auf andere Sprachen anwendbar macht. Unser morphologischer Analysator ist mit der Vollständigkeit eines Lexikons von 54.000 nackten Formen einschließlich 19.000 Eigennamen ausgestattet und stellt einen der zuverlässigsten Analysatoren dar, die bisher produziert wurden. Der Analysator wird mit türkischen morphologischen Analysatoren in der Literatur verglichen. Durch den Einsatz von LRU-Cache und einer Tria-Datenstruktur kann das System 100.000 Wörter pro Sekunde analysieren, was es Benutzern ermöglicht, riesige Korpora in wenigen Stunden zu analysieren.', 'id': 'In this paper, we present a two-level morphological analyzer for Turkish.  Analisa morfologi terdiri dari lima komponen utama: transducer keadaan terbatas, mesin aturan untuk suffiksasi, leksikon, struktur data percobaan, dan cache LRU. We use Java language to implement finite state machine logic and rule engine, Xml language to describe the finite state transducer rules of the Turkish language, which makes the morphological analyzer both easily extendible and easily applicable to other languages.  Empowered with the comprehensiveness of a lexicon of 54,000 bare-forms including 19,000 proper nouns, our morphological analyzer presents one of the most reliable analyzers produced so far.  The analyzer is compared with Turkish morphological analyzers in the literature.  Dengan menggunakan cache LRU dan struktur data percobaan, sistem dapat menganalisis 100.000 kata per detik, yang memungkinkan pengguna untuk menganalisis korpra besar dalam beberapa jam.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunatoa mchambuzi wa kiwango cha viwili cha kifolojia kwa Uturuki. Mchambuzi wa kimaadilojia ni sehemu tano kuu: Mtengenezaji maarufu wa serikali, injini utawala kwa ajili ya kuteswa, lexico, muundo wa takwimu tatu, na kifaa cha LRU. Tunatumia lugha ya Java kutekeleza mbinu za kisasa na utawala, lugha ya Xml ili kuelezea sheria za mpitoaji wa taifa bora za lugha ya Uturuki, ambayo inafanya mchambuzi wa kifolojia wote kwa urahisi na kwa urahisi kutumika kwa lugha nyingine. Inawezekana na umuhimu wa lexico wa aina 54,000 zilizozaliwa ikiwa ni pamoja na chakula cha chakula kinachosahihi 19,000, mchambuzi wetu wa kifolojia anatoa moja ya wachambuzi wenye kuaminika zaidi mpaka sasa. The analyzer is compared with Turkish morphological analyzers in the literature.  Kwa kutumia mahindi ya LRU na muundo wa taarifa tatu, mfumo unaweza kuchambua maneno 100,000 kwa sekunde, ambayo inawawezesha watumiaji kuchambua kampuni kubwa ndani ya masaa machache.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, voorsien ons 'n twee vlak morfologiese analiseerder vir Turks. Name Ons gebruik Java taal om afeindige staatsmasjien logiek en reël masjien te implementeer, Xml taal om die afeindige staatsoordragters reëls van die Turkse taal te beskrywe, wat die morfologiese analiseerder maklik en maklik toewenbaar vir ander tale maak. Ons morfologiese analiseerder stel een van die mees betroubare analiseerders wat tot toe produseer is, met die omgewing van 'n leksikon van 54,000 bare-vorms, insluitend 19,000 regte noume. Die analiseerder is vergelyk met Turkse morfologiese analiseerders in die literature. Deur LRU-kase en 'n probeer-data-struktuur te gebruik, kan die stelsel 100.000 woorde per sekonde analyseer, wat gebruikers laat toe om groot korpora in 'n paar uur te analyseer.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një analizues morfologjik dy niveli për turqin. The morphological analyzer consists of five main components: finite state transducer, rule engine for suffixation, lexicon, trie data structure, and LRU cache.  Ne përdorim gjuhën Java për të zbatuar logjikën e kufizuar të makinave shtetërore dhe motorin e rregullave, gjuhën Xml për të përshkruar rregullat e kufizuar të transducuesit shtetëror të gjuhës turke, që e bën analizuesin morfologjik të shtrihet lehtë dhe lehtë të aplikohet për gjuhë të tjera. I fuqizuar me kompleksitetin e një lexikoni me 54,000 forma të zhveshura duke përfshirë 19,000 emra të përshtatshme, analizuesi ynë morfologjik paraqet një nga analizuesit më të besueshëm të prodhuar deri tani. Analizuesi krahasohet me analizuesit morfologjik turq në literaturë. Duke përdorur cache LRU dhe një strukturë përpjekjeje të të dhënave, sistemi mund të analizojë 100,000 fjalë në sekondë, gjë që lejon përdoruesit të analizojnë korpra të mëdha për disa orë.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, Türkçe üçin iki dereje morfolojik analyzçisini görkezip berýäris. Morfolojik analizicisi beş esap komponentlerden oluşur: sonlu durum terjime atıcısı, sufiksi, leksikon motoru, veri yapısını dene, ve LRU cache. Biz Jawa dilini soňky enjamlaryň logik we düzgün motorlaryny implementetmek üçin ullanýarys, Xml dilini Türkçe dilinden soňky düzgün terjime eden düzgünlerini tassyklamak üçin, ol hem morfolojik analyzçini başga dillere aňsatly we aňsatlyk ýagdaýlaýar. 54,000 çizgi şeklinde ve 19,000 adet isim vardır. Morfolojik analizcisimiz bugüne kadar üretilen en güvenilir analizcisinden birini gösteriyor. Analyzçy edebiýatda Türk morfolojik analyzçylar bilen guruldy. LRU köpüsüni ulanarak we veri strukturasyny barlap sistemi saniyede 100,000 söz analyze biler. Bu köpüsi birkaç sagatda uly korporany çözümleyebilir.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք թուրքերի երկու մակարդակի մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծում: The morphological analyzer consists of five main components: finite state transducer, rule engine for suffixation, lexicon, trie data structure, and LRU cache.  We use Java language to implement finite state machine logic and rule engine, Xml language to describe the finite state transducer rules of the Turkish language, which makes the morphological analyzer both easily extendible and easily applicable to other languages.  Empowered with the comprehensiveness of a lexicon of 54,000 bare-forms including 19,000 proper nouns, our morphological analyzer presents one of the most reliable analyzers produced so far.  Անթեմատիչը համեմատում է թուրք մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծողների հետ գրականության մեջ: Օգտագործելով LRU-ի կեղևակը և փորձարկվող տվյալների կառուցվածքը, համակարգը կարող է վերլուծել 100,000 բառ վայրկյանում, ինչը թույլ է տալիս օգտագործողներին վերլուծել հսկայական մարմնի մի քանի ժամվա ընթացքում', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ ለቱርክ በሁለት ደረጃዎች የሞፎሎጂ አስተያየት እናቀርባለን፡፡ የሞሮፎሎጂ Analyzer አምስት የዋነኛው ክፍለ ሰንቨሮች:: የሀገር ተቃውሞ፣ የግንኙነት መግለጫ ኢንተር፣ ሊክሲን፣ ሦስት የዳታ መሠረት እና LRU ክፍል ነው፡፡ የኢያቪ ቋንቋ ጥሩ የሀገር መሳሪያን ግንኙነት እና የኢንተርኔት ቋንቋን ለመፈጸም እና የXml ቋንቋ የቱርክ ቋንቋ የተሰናከረውን የኢንተርኔት ግንኙነት ለመግለጥ እና ለሌሎች ቋንቋዎች የሚጠቅመውን እና ለቀላል የሚጠቅመውን እና ለሚገልጸው የኢንተርኔት ግ በ54,000 ብልሃቶች ውስጥ ያሉት የሊክሲኮን አካላዊ አካላቢ፣ የሞሮፎሎጂ Analyzer እስከ ዛሬ ድረስ ከሚታመኑት ትክክለኛ አንዱን ያቀርባል፡፡ Analyzer ከቱርክ morphological analyzer በሐሳብተር ይተካከላል፡፡ የLRU ክፍቻ እና ሦስት የዳታ መሠረት በመጠቀም ስርዓቱ በጥቂት ሰዓት ውስጥ የተጠቃሚዎችን ትልቅ ኮርፖርት የሚያስተምር ይችላል፡፡', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা তুরস্কের জন্য দুই স্তরের মৃত্যুবিশ্লেষক উপস্থাপন করি। The morphological analyzer consists of five main components: finite state transducer, rule engine for suffixation, lexicon, trie data structure, and LRU cache.  আমরা জাভা ভাষাকে ব্যবহার করি ফিনাইট রাষ্ট্রীয় মেশিন লজিক এবং শাসন ইঞ্জিন ব্যবহার করার জন্য, এক্সএল ভাষা তুরস্ক ভাষার সর্বোচ্চ রাষ্ট্রের ট্রান্সপার্সার নিয়ম বর এই পর্যন্ত আমাদের মোর্ফোলিক বিশ্লেষকের মধ্যে ১৯,০০০ নিষ্ঠানের মধ্যে ৫৪,০০০ বেলিক্সিকোর মূল্যের মাধ্যমে ক্ষমতাশীল। এই বিশ্লেষক সাহিত্যে তুরস্কের মরোফোলগিক বিশ্লেষকদের তুলনায়। এলআরউ ক্যাশ এবং ত্রিমাত্রিক তথ্য কাঠামোর মাধ্যমে সিস্টেম প্রতি সেকেন্ডে ১০০০০ শব্দ বিশ্লেষণ করতে পারে, যা ব্যবহারকারীদের কয়েক ঘন্', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, Türkiyə üçün iki səviyyə morfolojik analizəçi göstəririk. Morfolojik analizatçı beş ana komponentlərdir: qurğulu vəziyyətdə təkrarlayıcı, suffiksi, leksikon motoru, verilən quruluşu və LRU cache. Biz Java dilini müəyyən müddətli maşına logik və düzgün motoru istifadə etmək üçün, Xml dilini Türk dilinin müəyyən müddəti tərcümləyici qaydalarını təsdiqləmək üçün, bu da morfolojik analizacını başqa dillərə asanlaşdırmaq və asanlaşdırmaq üçün asanlaşdırır. Bizim morfolojik analizatçımız, həyata qədər ürəkləndirilən ən güvenilir analizatçılardan birini göstərir. Analizator kitabda Türk morfolojik analizatçıları ilə qarşılaşdırılır. LRU cache və məlumat quruluğunu istifadə edərək, sistem saniyədə 100.000 söz analizə bilər, bu da istifadəçiləri birkaç saat içində böyük korpora analizə edər.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme dvouúrovňový morfologický analyzátor pro turečtinu. Morfologický analyzátor se skládá z pěti hlavních složek: převodník konečného stavu, pravidla pro sufixaci, lexikon, trie datová struktura a LRU cache. Používáme jazyk Java k implementaci konečných stavů strojové logiky a pravidel engine, jazyk Xml k popisu pravidel konečného stavu převodníku tureckého jazyka, což činí morfologický analyzátor snadno rozšířitelný a snadno použitelný na další jazyky. Díky komplexnosti slovníku 54.000 holých forem včetně 19.000 vlastních podstatných jmen představuje náš morfologický analyzátor jeden z nejspolehlivějších analyzátorů dosud vyrobených. Analyzátor je porovnáván s tureckými morfologickými analyzátory v literatuře. Pomocí LRU cache a zkušební datové struktury může systém analyzovat 100.000 slov za sekundu, což umožňuje uživatelům analyzovat obrovské korpusy během několika hodin.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame kahetasandilist morfoloogilist analüsaatorit Türgi jaoks. morfoloogiline analüsaator koosneb viiest põhikomponendist: piiritletud oleku andur, sufiksatsiooni reeglimootor, leksikon, trie andmestruktuur ja LRU vahemälu. Me kasutame Java keelt piiritletud oleku masinloogika ja reeglimootori rakendamiseks, Xml keelt türgi keele piiritletud oleku andurite reeglite kirjeldamiseks, mis muudab morfoloogilise analüsaatori nii kergesti laiendatavaks kui ka teistele keeltele kergesti rakendatavaks. Meie morfoloogiline analüsaator, mis on varustatud 54 000 paljast vormist koosneva leksikoni terviklikkusega, sisaldab 19 000 pärisnime, esitab meie morfoloogilise analüsaatori ühte seni toodetud kõige usaldusväärsemat analüsaatorit. Analüsaatorit võrreldakse kirjanduses Türgi morfoloogiliste analüsaatoritega. Kasutades LRU vahemälu ja trie andmestruktuuri, saab süsteem analüüsida 100 000 sõna sekundis, mis võimaldab kasutajatel analüüsida tohutuid korpuseid mõne tunniga.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esittelemme kaksitasoisen morfologisen analysaattorin turkkilaiselle kielelle. Morfologiset analysaattorit koostuvat viidestä pääkomponentista: finite state transducer, rule engine for sufiksation, lexicon, trie data structure ja LRU välimuisti. Käytämme Java-kieltä finite state machine logiikan ja sääntömoottorin toteuttamiseen, Xml-kieltä kuvaamaan Turkin kielen finite state transducer -sääntöjä, mikä tekee morfologisesta analysaattorista sekä helposti laajennettavan että helposti sovellettavissa muihin kieliin. Morfologisen analysaattorimme on yksi luotettavimmista tähän mennessä tuotetuista analysaattoreista, ja se tarjoaa kattavan sanaston 54 000 paljaasta muodosta sisältäen 19 000 substantiivin. Analysaattoria verrataan kirjallisuudessa turkkilaisiin morfologisiin analysaattoreihin. Käyttämällä LRU-välimuistia ja trie-tietorakennetta järjestelmä pystyy analysoimaan 100 000 sanaa sekunnissa, minkä ansiosta käyttäjät voivat analysoida valtavia korpusia muutamassa tunnissa.', 'ca': "In this paper, we present a two-level morphological analyzer for Turkish.  The morphological analyzer consists of five main components: finite state transducer, rule engine for suffixation, lexicon, trie data structure, and LRU cache.  We use Java language to implement finite state machine logic and rule engine, Xml language to describe the finite state transducer rules of the Turkish language, which makes the morphological analyzer both easily extendible and easily applicable to other languages.  Potenciat amb la comprensió d'un lexicó de 54.000 formes descobertas incloent 19.000 noms adequats, el nostre analitzador morfològic presenta un dels analitzadors més fiables produïts fins ara. L'analitzador es compara amb els analitzadors morfològics turcs de la literatura. Utilitzant la caché LRU i una estructura de dades d'intent, el sistema pot analitzar 100.000 paraules per segon, cosa que permet als usuaris analitzar grans corpores en unes quantes hores.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo morfološki analizator na dva nivoa za turske. Morfološki analizator se sastoji od pet glavnih komponenta: krajnji državni prevoditelj, pravilni motor za sufiksiranje, leksikon, pokušaj strukturu podataka i cache LRU. Koristimo javni jezik za provedbu konačne logike i pravilnog motora državnih strojeva, Xml jezika za opisivanje konačnih pravila državnog prevodioca turskog jezika, što čini morfološki analizator lako proširenim i lako primjenjivom na druge jezike. Naš morfološki analizator predstavlja jedan od najpouzdanijih analizatora koji su do sada proizvedeni. Analizator se uspoređuje s turskim morfološkim analizatorima u literaturi. Koristeći LRU cache i strukturu podataka, sistem može analizirati 100.000 riječi u sekundi, što omogućava korisnicima analizirati ogromnu korporu za nekoliko sati.', 'jv': 'Nan pepul iki, kita sembarang kelas kuwi mroleholojke iki banget kanggo turco. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé nggunakake Jawané kanggo ngemulai sistem sistem logik karo rule engin, XmL nggawe barang nggawe gerangguna kehidupan aturak sing basa basa turkas, olèhku nggawe gerangkat dhéwé, akeh onês akeh basa sak susahé sak jeut nguasai layang langa sing bakal maneh. Awak dhéwé nggawe luwih beraksi kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo kalah basa luwih kanggo kalah-kalah kanggo 14,000 patik dadi 19,000 awak dhéwé, akeh onja dipoletik sing nyimpen kanggo ngerasakno sing paling dhéwé. Awak dhéwé, akeh onja dipoleksi sing gak nggawe Tanalêter kuwi nggampang karo perbudhakan mroleh turka nang basa. Nambah koyong kelas LRU karo sistem dadi nggawe data, sistem iso disenyalusi uwong meta-mudhun kanggo sampeyan mrot', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan nan, muna halatar da wani analyi mai daraja biyu wa turuki. Analyzaren morfologi na ƙunsa da kima guda shan masu ƙaranci: mai amfani da state na finite, mai amfani da masu saka, mai lissafa, lekson, salon mutane uku da kuma aikin kwamfyutan LRU. Tuna amfani da harshen Java dõmin a yi amfani da mashine na masu tsari na matabbatar da kuma masu rubutu, harshen Xml zuwa a bayyana masu buƙata masu buƙata Rubuwa na rubutu na cikin harshen turukin, wanda ke sanya analyren mutafalojiki biyu mai sauƙi da mai amfani da wasu harshe. Ina iya iya cikakken littafan leksisi na 54,000 fomat guda, ikin nuna 19,000 ma'aunin gaskiya, Analyzayenmu na halatar da ɗayan analymai da ake gaskata a yanzu. Ana yi anayyar da watin mutafaloki na turukin littafin. Yi amfani da shirin LRU cachen da wani matsayin taki uku, na'ura yana iya yin anadi ga maganar 100,000 a sakan, da kuma yana iya amfani da shi, dõmin su yi analyni ga firam babba guda guda guda.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo dvostopenjski morfološki analizator za turščino. Morfološki analizator je sestavljen iz petih glavnih komponent: končnega stanja pretvornika, pravilnika za pripono, leksikona, trie podatkovna struktura in LRU predpomnilnik. Uporabljamo jezik Java za implementacijo strojne logike končnih stanj in pravilnika, jezik Xml za opis pravil končnih stanj pretvornikov turškega jezika, zaradi česar je morfološki analizator enostavno razširljiv in enostavno uporaben za druge jezike. Z obsežnostjo leksikona 54.000 golih oblik, vključno z 19.000 pravimi samostalniki, naš morfološki analizator predstavlja enega najzanesljivejših doslej proizvedenih analizatorjev. Analizator primerjamo s turškimi morfološkimi analizatorji v literaturi. Z uporabo predpomnilnika LRU in trie podatkovne strukture lahko sistem analizira 100.000 besed na sekundo, kar uporabnikom omogoča analizo ogromnih korpusov v nekaj urah.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים ניתוח מורפולוגי בשני רמות לטורקים. המנבחן המורפולוגי כולל חמישה רכיבים ראשיים: מעביר מצב מוגבל, מנוע חוקים לספיקציה, לקסיקון, מבנה נתונים ניסיון, וקשה LRU. אנו משתמשים בשפה Java כדי להפעיל הגיוני המכונה המדינה הגבוהה ומנוע הכללים, שפה Xml לתאר את חוקי המעבר המדינה הגבוהים של שפת הטורקיה, מה שעושה את המבחן המורפולוגי גם בקלות אפשרי למרחב ובקל אפשרי לשפות אחרות. מוסמכים על ידי היכולת של לקסיקון של 54,000 צורות חשופות כולל 19,000 שמות מתאימים, המנבחן המורפולוגי שלנו מציג אחד מהאנליזצים האמינים ביותר שנוצרים עד כה. הניתוח משווה עם הניתוחים המורפולוגיים הטורקים בספרות. על ידי השימוש במחסן LRU ומבנה ניסיון נתונים, המערכת יכולה לנתח 100,000 מילים לשנייה, מה שאפשר למשתמשים לנתח גופורה ענקית בעוד כמה שעות.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རིམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དང་། The morphological analyzer consists of five main components: finite state transducer, rule engine for suffixation, lexicon, trie data structure, and LRU cache. We use Java language to implement finite state machine logic and rule engine, Xml language to describe the finite state transducer rules of the Turkish language, which makes the morphological analyzer both easily extendable and easily applicable to other languages. ཞེས་པ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་54,000 རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་ཚད་བཅུག་ནུས་མིང་19,000 ཞེས་པ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་དཔྱད་སྟངས་འཛིན་བྱེད་མཁན་ལས་ཆེ་ཤོ དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཆས་འདི་ནི་ཊར་ཀིའི་དབྱིབས་བཟོས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་པ་ཚོར་མཉམ་བཟོ་བ་ཡོད། LRU cache་སྤྱོད་པ་དང་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བཟོ་བརྩོན་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་བཟོ་བཀོད་པ་ལྟར་མ་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོར་སྐར་ཆའི་ཐེངས་སྐར་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོགས་ཆ་ཉུ'}
{'en': 'Multilingual Dynamic Topic Model', 'pt': 'Modelo de tópico dinâmico multilíngue', 'ar': 'نموذج موضوع ديناميكي متعدد اللغات', 'es': 'Modelo de temas dinámicos multilingüe', 'fr': 'Modèle de sujet dynamique multilingue', 'zh': '多言动主题模', 'ja': '多言語動的トピックモデル', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी गतिशील विषय मॉडल', 'ru': 'Многоязычная динамическая тематическая модель', 'ga': 'Samhail Ábhair Ilteangacha Dinimiciúla', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური დინამიკური ტემიკური მოდელი', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű dinamikus témamodell', 'el': 'Πολυγλωσσικό δυναμικό μοντέλο θέματος', 'it': 'Modello dinamico multilingue', 'kk': 'Көп тілді динамикалық нақыштар үлгісі', 'lt': 'Daugiakalbis dinaminis teminis modelis', 'mk': 'Мултијазичен модел на динамична тема', 'ms': 'Model Topik Dinamik Berbahasa', 'mt': 'Mudell Topiku Dinamiku Multilingwi', 'ml': 'പല ഭാഷ ഡിനാനിമിക്ക് സംയോജക മോഡല്\u200d', 'mn': 'Олон хэл хөдөлгөөн сэдвийн загвар', 'no': 'Multispråk dynamisk temamodell', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczny dynamiczny model tematu', 'ro': 'Model dinamic multilingv', 'sr': 'Multijezički dinamički model teme', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාවික විශේෂ මොඩල්', 'so': 'Multilingual Dynamic Topic Model', 'ta': 'Multilingual Dynamic Topic Model', 'sv': 'Flerspråkig dynamisk ämnesmodell', 'ur': 'Multilingual Dynamic Topic Model', 'uz': 'Har bir nechta Dynamik mavzu modeli', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Многоезичен динамичен тематичен модел', 'da': 'Flersproget dynamisk emnemodel', 'nl': 'Meertalig dynamisch topic model', 'hr': 'Multijezički dinamički model teme', 'de': 'Mehrsprachiges dynamisches Themenmodell', 'ko': '다중 언어 동적 화제 모델', 'fa': 'مدل موضوع داینامیک زیادی زبان', 'id': 'Model Topik Dinamik Berbahasa', 'sw': 'Modala ya Mada ya Dynamic ya lugha nyingi', 'tr': 'Çoklu dilli modi', 'af': 'Veelvuldige Dinamiese Tema Model', 'am': 'dialogs-action', 'hy': 'Բազլեզու դինամիկ թեմայի մոդել', 'az': '칂oxlu dil dinamik m톛lumat Modeli', 'bs': 'Multijezički dinamički model teme', 'bn': 'বহুভাষায় ডাইনামিক বিষয় মডেল', 'ca': 'Model de tema dinàmic multilingüe', 'et': 'Mitmekeelne dünaamiline teemamudel', 'cs': 'Vícejazyčný dynamický tématický model', 'fi': 'Monikielinen dynaaminen aihemalli', 'sq': 'Model i temës shumëgjuhëse dinamike', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Večjezični dinamični model teme', 'he': 'מודל נושא דינמי רבולוגי', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་དབྱིབས་འགྱུར་བ་ཅན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་མ་དབྱིབས'}
{'en': 'Dynamic topic models (DTMs) capture the evolution of topics and trends in time series data. Current DTMs are applicable only to monolingual datasets. In this paper we present the multilingual dynamic topic model (ML-DTM), a novel topic model that combines DTM with an existing multilingual topic modeling method to capture cross-lingual topics that evolve across time. We present results of this model on a parallel German-English corpus of news articles and a comparable corpus of Finnish and Swedish news articles. We demonstrate the capability of ML-DTM to track significant events related to a topic and show that it finds distinct topics and performs as well as existing multilingual topic models in aligning cross-lingual topics.', 'ar': 'نماذج الموضوع الديناميكي (DTMs) تلتقط تطور الموضوعات والاتجاهات في بيانات السلاسل الزمنية. DTMs الحالية قابلة للتطبيق فقط على مجموعات البيانات أحادية اللغة. في هذا البحث نقدم نموذج موضوع ديناميكي متعدد اللغات (ML-DTM) ، وهو نموذج موضوع جديد يجمع بين DTM وطريقة نمذجة موضوعية متعددة اللغات لالتقاط موضوعات متعددة اللغات والتي تتطور بمرور الوقت. نقدم نتائج هذا النموذج في مجموعة مقالات إخبارية ألمانية-إنجليزية موازية ومجموعة مماثلة من المقالات الإخبارية الفنلندية والسويدية. نبرهن على قدرة ML-DTM على تتبع الأحداث المهمة المتعلقة بموضوع ما ونظهر أنه يجد موضوعات مميزة ويعمل بالإضافة إلى نماذج موضوعات متعددة اللغات موجودة في محاذاة الموضوعات متعددة اللغات.', 'es': 'Los modelos de temas dinámicos (DTM) capturan la evolución de los temas y las tendencias en los datos de series temporales. Los DTM actuales solo se aplican a conjuntos de datos monolingües. En este artículo presentamos el modelo de temas dinámicos multilingües (ML-DTM), un modelo de tema novedoso que combina la DTM con un método de modelado de temas multilingüe existente para capturar temas multilingües que evolucionan con el tiempo. Presentamos los resultados de este modelo en un corpus paralelo alemán-inglés de artículos de noticias y un corpus comparable de artículos de noticias finlandeses y suecos. Demostramos la capacidad de ML-DTM para rastrear eventos significativos relacionados con un tema y demostramos que encuentra temas y resultados distintos, así como los modelos de temas multilingües existentes en la alineación de temas multilingües.', 'fr': "Les modèles thématiques dynamiques (MNT) capturent l'évolution des sujets et des tendances dans les données de séries chronologiques Les MNT actuels ne s'appliquent qu'aux ensembles de données monolingues. Dans cet article, nous présentons le modèle thématique dynamique multilingue (ML-DTM), un nouveau modèle de sujet qui combine la MNT à une méthode de modélisation thématique multilingue existante pour capturer des sujets multilingues qui évoluent au fil du temps. Nous présentons les résultats de ce modèle sur un corpus parallèle d'articles de presse allemand-anglais et un corpus comparable d'articles de presse finnois et suédois. Nous démontrons la capacité de ML-DTM à suivre les événements importants liés à un sujet et montrons qu'il trouve des sujets distincts et qu'il fonctionne aussi bien que les modèles de sujets multilingues existants dans l'alignement de sujets multilingues.", 'pt': 'Modelos de tópicos dinâmicos (DTMs) capturam a evolução de tópicos e tendências em dados de séries temporais. Os DTMs atuais são aplicáveis apenas a conjuntos de dados monolíngues. Neste artigo, apresentamos o modelo de tópico dinâmico multilíngue (ML-DTM), um novo modelo de tópico que combina o DTM com um método de modelagem de tópico multilíngue existente para capturar tópicos multilíngues que evoluem ao longo do tempo. Apresentamos resultados deste modelo em um corpus paralelo alemão-inglês de artigos de notícias e um corpus comparável de artigos de notícias finlandês e sueco. Demonstramos a capacidade do ML-DTM de rastrear eventos significativos relacionados a um tópico e mostramos que ele encontra tópicos distintos e funciona tão bem quanto os modelos de tópicos multilíngues existentes no alinhamento de tópicos multilíngues.', 'ja': '動的トピックモデル（ DTM ）は、時系列データのトピックと傾向の進化をキャプチャします。現在のDTMは、単一言語のデータセットにのみ適用できます。本稿では、DTMと既存の多言語トピックモデリング手法を組み合わせて、時間とともに進化するクロスリンガルトピックを取り込む新規トピックモデルである多言語動的トピックモデル（ ML - DTM ）を紹介する。このモデルの結果を、ドイツ語と英語のニュース記事の並列コーパスと、フィンランド語とスウェーデン語のニュース記事の同等のコーパスで紹介します。私たちは、ML - DTMがトピックに関連する重要なイベントを追跡し、異なるトピックを見つけ、クロスリンガルトピックの調整において既存の多言語トピックモデルと同様にパフォーマンスすることを示す能力を示します。', 'hi': 'गतिशील विषय मॉडल (DTMs) समय श्रृंखला डेटा में विषयों और प्रवृत्तियों के विकास पर कब्जा. वर्तमान डीटीएम केवल मोनोलिंगुअल डेटासेट पर लागू होते हैं। इस पेपर में हम बहुभाषी गतिशील विषय मॉडल (एमएल-डीटीएम) प्रस्तुत करते हैं, एक उपन्यास विषय मॉडल जो समय के साथ विकसित होने वाले क्रॉस-लिंगुअल विषयों को कैप्चर करने के लिए मौजूदा बहुभाषी विषय मॉडलिंग विधि के साथ डीटीएम को जोड़ता है। हम समाचार लेखों के समानांतर जर्मन-अंग्रेजी कॉर्पस और फिनिश और स्वीडिश समाचार लेखों के एक तुलनीय कॉर्पस पर इस मॉडल के परिणाम प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम किसी विषय से संबंधित महत्वपूर्ण घटनाओं को ट्रैक करने के लिए एमएल-डीटीएम की क्षमता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि यह अलग-अलग विषयों को पाता है और क्रॉस-लिंगुअल विषयों को संरेखित करने में मौजूदा बहुभाषी विषय मॉडल के साथ-साथ प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'zh': '动主题模 (DTM) 获时序数中主题及趋势之变。 今之 DTM ,宜用单语数集。 在本文中,我们介多语言动态主题模(ML-DTM),这是一种新颖的主题模形,将DTM与现在多言语主题建模法相合,以获随时演变的跨语主题。 平行德语- 英语新闻文语料库及芬兰语瑞典语新闻文章比语料库上呈模样。 展 ML-DTM 之重大,明其异于题,齐跨言与时同。', 'ru': 'Динамические тематические модели (DTM) отражают эволюцию тем и тенденций в данных временных рядов. Текущие DTM применимы только к одноязычным наборам данных. В этой статье мы представляем многоязычную динамическую тематическую модель (ML-DTM), новую тематическую модель, которая сочетает DTM с существующим многоязычным методом тематического моделирования для захвата межязычных тем, которые развиваются с течением времени. Результаты этой модели мы представляем на параллельном немецко-английском корпусе новостных статей и сопоставимом корпусе финских и шведских новостных статей. Мы демонстрируем способность ML-DTM отслеживать значимые события, связанные с темой, и показываем, что он находит различные темы и выполняет, а также существующие многоязычные тематические модели в выравнивании кросс-лингвистических тем.', 'ga': "Gabhann samhlacha dinimiciúla topaicí (DTManna) éabhlóid na dtopaicí agus na dtreochtaí i sonraí amshraitheanna. Ní bhaineann DTManna reatha ach le tacair shonraí aonteangacha. Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid i láthair an tsamhail topaicí dinimiciúla ilteangach (ML-DTM), samhail topaicí úrnua a chomhcheanglaíonn DTM le modh samhaltaithe topaicí ilteangach atá ann cheana chun topaicí trasteangacha a thagann chun cinn thar am a ghabháil. Cuirimid torthaí na samhla seo i láthair ar chorpas comhthreomhar Gearmáinis-Béarla d'ailt nuachta agus ar chorpas inchomparáide d'ailt nuachta na Fionlainne agus na Sualainne. Léirímid cumas ML-DTM chun imeachtaí suntasacha a bhaineann le topaic a rianú agus taispeánaimid go n-aimsíonn sé topaicí ar leith agus go bhfeidhmíonn sé chomh maith le samhlacha topaicí ilteangacha atá ann cheana féin chun topaicí tras-teangacha a ailíniú.", 'el': 'Τα δυναμικά μοντέλα θεμάτων καταγράφουν την εξέλιξη των θεμάτων και των τάσεων στα δεδομένα χρονοσειρών. Οι τρέχουσες DTM εφαρμόζονται μόνο σε μονογλωσσικά σύνολα δεδομένων. Σε αυτή την εργασία παρουσιάζουμε το πολύγλωσσο δυναμικό μοντέλο θέματος (ένα νέο θεματικό μοντέλο που συνδυάζει την DTM με μια υπάρχουσα πολύγλωσση μέθοδο μοντελοποίησης θεμάτων για να συλλάβει τα διγλωσσικά θέματα που εξελίσσονται με την πάροδο του χρόνου. Παρουσιάζουμε τα αποτελέσματα αυτού του μοντέλου σε παράλληλο γερμανικό-αγγλικό σώμα ειδησεογραφικών άρθρων και συγκρίσιμο σώμα φινλανδικών και σουηδικών ειδησεογραφικών άρθρων. Επιδεικνύουμε την ικανότητα του να παρακολουθεί σημαντικά γεγονότα που σχετίζονται με ένα θέμα και να δείχνει ότι βρίσκει διακριτά θέματα και αποδίδει καθώς και υπάρχοντα πολύγλωσσα μοντέλα θεμάτων στην ευθυγράμμιση των γλωσσικών θεμάτων.', 'ka': 'დინამიკური ტემების მოდელები მიმდინარე DTMs მხოლოდ მონოლენგური მონაცემების კონფიგურაციისთვის დაყენება. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მრავალენგური დინამიკური ტემიკური მოდელს (ML-DTM), პრომენტი ტემიკური მოდელი, რომელიც DTM-ს გამოყენებს მრავალენგური ტემიკური მოდელური მეტისთან, რომელიც განვითარებულია მრავალ ჩვენ ამ მოდელის წარმოდგენების პარალელი გერმანეთის-ინგლისური კორპუსზე ახალგაზრულ ახალგაზრულების და ტინნური და შვედიის ახალგაზრულების შემდგენებელი კორპუსს ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ ML-DTM-ის შესაძლებლობა გადავიწყება მნიშვნელოვანი მოვლენების შესახებ და გამოჩვენება, რომ ის იძლება განსხვავებული ტემები და გავაკეთება, და მრავალენგური ტემების მოდელების შესახებ მრავალენ', 'hu': 'A dinamikus témamodellek (DTM-k) rögzítik a témák és trendek evolúcióját az idősoros adatokban. A jelenlegi DTM-ek csak egynyelvű adatkészletekre alkalmazhatók. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a többnyelvű dinamikus téma modellt (ML-DTM), egy új téma modellt, amely ötvözi a DTM-t egy meglévő többnyelvű téma modellezési módszerrel, hogy rögzítse az idő során fejlődő, többnyelvű témákat. Ennek a modell eredményeit egy párhuzamos német-angol hírcsoportban, valamint egy hasonló finn és svéd hírcsoportban mutatjuk be. Bemutatjuk, hogy az ML-DTM képes nyomon követni a témához kapcsolódó jelentős eseményeket, és megmutatjuk, hogy különböző témákat talál és teljesít, valamint a meglévő többnyelvű témamodelleket a többnyelvű témák összehangolásában.', 'kk': 'Динамикалық нақыштар үлгілері (DTMs) уақыт сериясындағы нақыштар мен тенденциялардың эволюциясын түсіндіреді. Назардағы DTMs тек монолингі деректер жиындарына қолданылады. Бұл қағазда біз көптеген тілдік динамикалық нақыштар үлгісін (ML-DTM) көрсетедік. DTM бағдарламасының көптеген тілдік нақыштарды өзгерту үшін көптеген тілдік нақыштарды түсіру әдісімен біріктіреді. Біз бұл моделінің нәтижелерін жаңалық мақалалар мен Финляндия және Швед жаңалық мақалаларының салыстырмалы корпусына таңдаймыз. Біз ML-DTM тақырыптағы маңызды оқиғаларды қадағалау мүмкіндігін көрсету және оның айырмашылық нақыштарды табу және бірнеше тілдік нақыштар үлгілерін біріктіру үшін көрсету мүмкіндігін көрсетедік', 'lt': 'Dinamieji teminiai modeliai (DTM) apima temų ir tendencijų raidą laiko serijų duomenise. Dabartiniai DTM taikomi tik vienakalbiniams duomenų rinkiniams. Šiame dokumente pristatome daugiakalbį dinaminį temų model į (ML-DTM), naują temų modelį, kuris derina DTM su esamu daugiakalbiu temų modeliavimo metodu, kad būtų aptariamos tarpkalbinės temos, kurios vystosi laikui bėgant. Pateikiame šio modelio rezultatus lygiagrečiame vokiečių ir anglų žinių straipsnių korpuse ir panašiame Suomijos ir Švedijos žinių straipsnių korpuse. Mes parodome ML-DTM gebėjimą sekti svarbius su tema susijusius įvykius ir parodome, kad jame yra atskirų temų ir rezultatų, taip pat esamų daugiakalbių temų modelių derinant tarpkalbines temas.', 'mk': 'Динамичките темски модели (ДТМ) ја заземаат еволуцијата на темите и трендовите во податоците на временските серии. Сегашните DTM се применливи само на монојазични датотеки. Во овој весник го претставуваме мултијазичкиот динамичен темски модел (ML-DTM), нов темски модел кој го комбинира DTM со постоечкиот мултијазички метод на моделирање на теми за зафатување на меѓујазичните теми кои еволуираат преку времето. Презентираме резултати од овој модел на паралелниот германско-англиски корпус на вести и споредлив корпус на фински и шведски вести. Ние ја демонстрираме способноста на ML-DTM да ги следи значителните настани поврзани со една тема и да покажеме дека таа пронајде различни теми и изведува, како и постојните мултијазични темски модели во прилагодувањето на меѓујазичните теми.', 'it': "I modelli dinamici degli argomenti (DTM) catturano l'evoluzione degli argomenti e delle tendenze nei dati delle serie temporali. I DTM attuali sono applicabili solo ai set di dati monolingue. In questo articolo presentiamo il modello multilingual dynamic topic model (ML-DTM), un nuovo modello di argomento che combina DTM con un metodo di modellazione di argomenti multilingue esistente per catturare argomenti cross-lingual che evolvono nel tempo. Presentiamo i risultati di questo modello su un corpus parallelo tedesco-inglese di articoli di notizie e un corpus comparabile di articoli di notizie finlandesi e svedesi. Dimostriamo la capacità di ML-DTM di tenere traccia di eventi significativi relativi a un argomento e mostrare che trova argomenti distinti e si comporta così come modelli di argomenti multilingue esistenti nell'allineamento di argomenti cross-lingual.", 'ms': 'Model topik dinamik (DTM) menangkap evolusi topik dan trends dalam data siri masa. Current DTMs are applicable only to monolingual datasets.  In this paper we present the multilingual dynamic topic model (ML-DTM), a novel topic model that combines DTM with an existing multilingual topic modeling method to capture cross-lingual topics that evolve across time.  Kami memperkenalkan hasil model ini pada korpus Jerman-Inggeris selari artikel berita dan korpus berbanding artikel berita Finlandia dan Swedia. Kami menunjukkan kemampuan ML-DTM untuk mengesan peristiwa yang signifikan berkaitan dengan topik dan menunjukkan bahawa ia mencari topik yang berbeza dan melaksanakan serta model topik berbilang bahasa yang wujud dalam menyesuaikan topik saling bahasa.', 'ml': 'സമയത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെയും സ്ഥിതികളുടെയും മോഡലുകള്\u200d (DTMs) പിടികൂടുന്നു. നിലവിലുള്ള DTMs മോണോളില്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d മാത്രമേ പ്രയോഗിക്കുകയുള്ളൂ. ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ ഡൈനാമിക് പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ മോഡല്\u200d (ML-DTM) കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. സമയത്ത് മുഴുവന്\u200d വികസിക്കുന്ന പല ഭാഷയിലുള്ള പ്രമേയത് ഈ മോഡലിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d-ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്റെ പാര്\u200dട്ടില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. വാര്\u200dത്തകാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ പേര നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനുള്ള എംഎല്\u200d-ഡിടിഎമിന്റെ കഴിവ് കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. അത് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിഷയങ്ങളും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്', 'mn': 'Динамик сэдвийн загварууд (DTMs) хугацааны цуврал өгөгдлийн тухай сэдэв болон тенденцийн хөгжлийг ойлгож байна. Одоогийн DTMs зөвхөн ганц хэл өгөгдлийн санд хэрэглэгддэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон хэлний динамик сэдэв загварыг (ML-DTM), DTM-г цаг хугацаанд хөгжиж буй олон хэлний сэдэв загвартай холбогдож байгаа олон хэлний сэдэв загварын арга загварыг үзүүлнэ. Бид энэ загварын үр дүнг Финляндын болон Шведийн мэдээллийн хэвлэлийн зэрэгцээ Герман-Англи корпус дээр харьцуулж байна. Бид ML-DTM-ийн сэдвээс холбогдсон чухал үйл явдал олох боломжтой байдлыг харуулж, тэр нь ялгаатай сэдвүүд, үйл явдал олон хэлний сэдвүүдийг олон хэлний сэдвүүдийн загвар олж харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Dynamiske temamodeller (DTMs) oppfattar utviklinga av emne og trender i tidseriedata. Gjeldande DTMs er berre tilgjengeleg for monospråk datasett. I denne papiret presenterer vi den fleirspråk dynamiske temamodellen (ML-DTM), eit roman temamodellen som kombinerer DTM med ein eksisterande multispråk temamodelleringsmetode for å henta krysspråk emne som utviklar over tid. Vi presenterer resultatet av denne modellen på eit parallell tysk-engelsk korpus av nyttikler og ei sammenlignbar korpus av finnske og svenske nyttikler. Vi demonstrerer at ML-DTM kan spora signifikante hendingar som er relatert til eit emne og vise at han finn spesifikke emne og utfører, og det eksisterande fleirspråk emnemodular i å justera fleirspråk emne.', 'pl': 'Dynamiczne modele tematów (DTM) rejestrują ewolucję tematów i trendów w danych szeregów czasowych. Obecne DTM mają zastosowanie tylko do jednojęzycznych zbiorów danych. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy wielojęzyczny dynamiczny model tematu (ML-DTM), nowy model tematu, który łączy DTM z istniejącą wielojęzyczną metodą modelowania tematów w celu uchwycenia tematów wielojęzycznych, które ewoluują w czasie. Przedstawiamy wyniki tego modelu na równoległym niemiecko-angielskim korpusie artykułów wiadomościowych oraz porównywalnym korpusie fińskich i szwedzkich artykułów wiadomościowych. Pokazujemy zdolność ML-DTM do śledzenia istotnych zdarzeń związanych z tematem i pokazujemy, że znajduje odrębne tematy i działa tak samo jak istniejące wielojęzyczne modele tematów w dostosowaniu tematów między językami.', 'ro': 'Modelele dinamice ale subiectelor (DTM) captează evoluția subiectelor și tendințelor în datele seriilor de timp. DTM-urile actuale sunt aplicabile numai seturilor de date monolingve. În această lucrare prezentăm modelul multilingv de subiecte dinamice (ML-DTM), un model nou de subiecte care combină DTM cu o metodă existentă de modelare multilingvă a subiectelor pentru a surprinde subiecte interlingve care evoluează de-a lungul timpului. Prezentăm rezultatele acestui model pe un corpus paralel german-englez de articole de știri și un corpus comparabil de articole de știri finlandeză și suedeză. Demonstrăm capacitatea ML-DTM de a urmări evenimente semnificative legate de un subiect și de a arăta că găsește subiecte distincte și performează, precum și modele de subiecte multilingve existente în alinierea subiectelor interlingve.', 'sr': 'Dinamički modeli teme (DTMs) uhvatili su evoluciju teme i trendova u podacima vremenskih serija. Trenutne DTMs se primjenjuju samo na monojezičke sete podataka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo multijezički dinamični model tema (ML-DTM), nov model tema koji kombinuje DTM sa postojećim metodom modeliranja multijezičkih tema kako bi uhvatili preko jezičkih tema koje se razvijaju kroz vreme. Predstavljamo rezultate ovog model a o paralelnom njemačkom-engleskom korpusu novinskih članaka i usporednom korpusu finskog i švedskog novinskog članaka. Pokazujemo sposobnost ML-DTM-a da prati značajne događaje povezane sa temom i pokažemo da nalazi različite teme i izvode, kao i postojeće multijezičke modele teme u usklađivanju međujezičkih tema.', 'mt': 'Mudelli tematiċi dinamiċi (DTMs) jaqbdu l-evoluzzjoni tas-suġġetti u x-xejriet fid-dejta tas-serje taż-żmien. DTMs attwali huma applikabbli biss għal settijiet ta’ dejta monolingwi. In this paper we present the multilingual dynamic topic model (ML-DTM), a novel topic model that combines DTM with an existing multilingual topic modeling method to capture cross-lingual topics that evolve across time.  Aħna nippreżentaw ir-riżultati ta’ dan il-mudell fuq korpus parallel Ġermaniż-Ingliż ta’ artikoli tal-a ħbarijiet u korpus komparabbli ta’ artikoli tal-aħbarijiet Finlandiżi u Svediżi. Aħna nuru l-kapaċit à tal-ML-DTM li jsegwi avvenimenti sinifikanti relatati ma’ suġġett u nuru li jsib suġġetti u prestazzjonijiet distinti kif ukoll mudelli ta’ suġġetti multilingwi eżistenti fl-allinjament ta’ suġġetti translingwi.', 'si': 'විද්\u200dයාව සහ විද්\u200dයාවක් විද්\u200dයාව (DTMs) විද්\u200dයාව සඳහා විද්\u200dයාව සඳහා විද්\u200dයාව අල්ලගන්න. දැන් DTMs එක භාෂාවක් තොරතුරු සෙට් විතරයි භාෂාවක් විතරයි. මේ පැත්තේ අපි ගොඩක් භාෂාවික විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාප අපි මේ මොඩල් එකේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර දෙන්නේ ජර්මාන්-ඉංග්\u200dරිස් කොර්පුස් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සහ අපි ML-DTM විදිහට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න සමහර විදිහට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට වි', 'so': 'Tusaaladaha dawooyinka (DTMs) waxay qabsataa bedelka macluumaadka iyo waddooyinka marka lagu soo bandhigayo macluumaadka safarka. DTMs hada la joogo waxaa lagu codsadaa sawirada macluumaadka oo kaliya. Qoraalkan waxaan ku soo bandhignaa muusikada mada luuqadaha kala duduwan (ML-DTM), model warqad ah oo ku soo bandhigga DTM, kaas oo ku qoran qaab tusaale ah oo ku qoran mada luuqadaha kala duduwan, si loo qabsado mada luuqadaha kala duduwan oo soo kordha waqtiga oo dhan. Tusaaladan waxaan soo saaraynaa resultooyin ku saabsan warqadaha warqadaha warqadaha ee Jarmalka- Ingiriiska oo lambarka ah iyo qoraalada warqadaha Finnishka iyo Iswidishka oo u eg. Waxaynu muujinnaa awoodda ML-DTM in ay soo raaco dhacdooyin muhiim ah oo la xiriira mada, waxaana tusnaynaa in ay helaan maadooyin kala duduwan oo ay sameynayaan sidoo kale sameynta muusikooyin ku qoran mada luuqadaha kala duduwan.', 'sv': 'Dynamiska ämnesmodeller (DTM) fångar utvecklingen av ämnen och trender i tidsseriedata. Nuvarande DTM är endast tillämpliga på enspråkiga datauppsättningar. I denna uppsats presenterar vi den flerspråkiga dynamiska ämnesmodellen (ML-DTM), en ny ämnesmodell som kombinerar DTM med en befintlig flerspråkig ämnesmodelleringsmetod för att fånga korspråkiga ämnen som utvecklas över tid. Vi presenterar resultaten av denna modell på en parallell tysk-engelsk korpus av nyhetsartiklar och en jämförbar korpus av finska och svenska nyhetsartiklar. Vi demonstrerar ML-DTM:s förmåga att spåra viktiga händelser relaterade till ett ämne och visa att den hittar distinkta ämnen och presterar såväl som befintliga flerspråkiga ämnesmodeller för att anpassa tvärspråkiga ämnen.', 'ta': 'Dynamic theme models (DTMs) time series data in themes and trends evolution தற்போதைய DTMs monolingual data sets மட்டும் பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் பல மொழிகளில் இயங்கும் தலைப்பு மாதிரி( ML- DTM), ஒரு புதிய தலைப்பு மாதிரி, அது DTM யை கூட்டும் ஒரு இருக்கும் பல மொழி தலைப்பு மாதிரி முறைமையை  நாம் இந்த மாதிரியின் முடிவுகளை காண்பிக்கிறோம் ஒரு ஜெர்மன்- ஆங்கிலத்தின் செய்தி கட்டுரைகள் ஒப்பிட்ட மற்றும் பின்ஷி முக்கியமான நிகழ்வுகளை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு ML-DTM தான் காட்டுகிறது மற்றும் அது வித்தியாசமான தலைப்புகளை கண்டுபிடி', 'ur': 'ڈینامیک ٹوپ موڈل (DTMs) ٹوپ اور ٹرینڈوں کی تکامل کو ٹیموں سیریریوں ڈاٹوں میں پکڑتے ہیں. موجود DTMs صرف monolingual datasets کے لئے موجود ہیں. ہم اس کاغذ میں ملتی زبان کی ڈینامیک ٹوپ موڈل (ML-DTM) کو پیش کریں گے، ایک نوم ٹوپ موڈل جو DTM کو ایک موجود multilingual ٹوپ موڈلینگ طریقہ سے ملتا ہے کہ کرس زبان کی ٹوپ کو پکڑ سکے جو زمانہ میں تکامل ہوتی ہے۔ ہم اس مدل کا نتیجہ فینلاندی اور سوئدی خبریوں کی ایک مشابہ جرمن-انگلیسی کرپوس پر پیش کرتے ہیں۔ ہم ML-DTM کے قابلیت کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک موضوع کے ساتھ اثر اثر حادثوں کو ترک کریں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ مختلف موضوع پاتا ہے اور عمل کرتا ہے اور مختلف زبان کے موضوع کے مطابق موجود موضوع کے موجود موجود ہیں۔', 'uz': "Name Joriy DTMs faqat bir nechta maʼlumot moslamalariga qoʻllaniladi. Bu hujjatda biz bir necha tildagi dynamik mavzu modelini (ML-DTM) hosil qilamiz, yangi mavzu modeli DTM bilan birlashtirilgan muloqat tillar mavzusini o'zgartirish uchun bir necha tillar mavzuni olib tashlaydi. Biz bu modelning natijalarini bir xil-ingliz maqolalarning ko'plab keladigan Olmon-Ingliz maqolalarning ko'rinishiga ega qilamiz va fincha va iswidhish xabarlarning bir qismlariga bir qismiz. Biz mavzu bilan murakkab bogʻ'liq hodisalarni qidirish imkoniyatini ko'rsatamiz va bu mavzuni ko'rsatish va har xil tillar mavzularini ko'rsatish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Các mô hình chủ đề động động (DTDM) thu được sự phát triển của chủ đề và xu hướng trong dữ liệu chuỗi thời gian. Quyền DTD bây giờ chỉ áp dụng cho nhà dữ liệu độc ngôn. Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi giới thiệu mô hình chủ đề động đa dạng (ML-DM), một điển hình chủ đề mới kết hợp DDDDM với một phương pháp tạo mẫu thảo chủ đề đa dạng đã có để thu thập các chủ đề ngôn ngữ khác nhau phát triển xuyên thời gian. Chúng tôi đưa ra kết quả của mô hình này trên một tập tin tức song song của Đức-Anh và một tập tin tức tương đối về Phần Lan và Thụy Điển. Chúng tôi thể hiện khả năng của ML-DM theo dõi các sự kiện quan trọng liên quan tới một chủ đề và cho thấy nó tìm các chủ đề khác nhau và thực hiện cùng các mô hình chủ đề đa dạng đang có trong việc chỉnh các chủ đề ngôn ngữ khác nhau.', 'bg': 'Динамичните тематични модели улавят еволюцията на темите и тенденциите в данните от времевите серии. Настоящите DTM са приложими само за едноезични набори от данни. В настоящата статия представяме многоезичния динамичен тематичен модел (МЛ-ДТМ), нов тематичен модел, който съчетава ДТМ със съществуващ многоезичен метод за моделиране на теми, за да улови междуезични теми, които се развиват във времето. Представяме резултатите от този модел върху паралелен германско-английски корпус от новинарски статии и сравним корпус от финландски и шведски новинарски статии. Ние демонстрираме способността на МЛ-ДТМ да проследява значими събития, свързани с дадена тема и показва, че намира отделни теми и изпълнява както съществуващите многоезични тематични модели в привеждането в съответствие на междуезичните теми.', 'da': "Dynamiske emnemodeller (DTM'er) registrerer udviklingen af emner og tendenser i tidsseriedata. Nuværende DTM'er gælder kun for ensprogede datasæt. I denne artikel præsenterer vi den flersprogede dynamiske emnemodel (ML-DTM), en ny emnemodel, der kombinerer DTM med en eksisterende flersproget emnemodelmodel for at fange tværsprogede emner, der udvikler sig over tid. Vi præsenterer resultaterne af denne model på et parallelt tysk-engelsk korpus af nyhedsartikler og et tilsvarende korpus af finske og svenske nyhedsartikler. Vi demonstrerer ML-DTM's evne til at spore betydelige begivenheder relateret til et emne og vise, at det finder forskellige emner og fungerer såvel som eksisterende flersprogede emnemodeller i tilpasning af tværsprogede emner.", 'nl': "Dynamische topic modellen (DTM's) leggen de evolutie van onderwerpen en trends in tijdreeksgegevens vast. Huidige DTM's zijn alleen van toepassing op eentalige datasets. In dit artikel presenteren we het meertalige dynamische topic model (ML-DTM), een nieuw topic model dat DTM combineert met een bestaande meertalige topic modelling methode om cross-lingual onderwerpen vast te leggen die evolueren in de tijd. We presenteren resultaten van dit model op een parallel Duits-Engels corpus van nieuwsberichten en een vergelijkbaar corpus van Finse en Zweedse nieuwsberichten. We demonstreren de mogelijkheid van ML-DTM om belangrijke gebeurtenissen gerelateerd aan een onderwerp te volgen en te laten zien dat het verschillende onderwerpen vindt en net zo goed presteert als bestaande meertalige topic modellen bij het uitlijnen van meertalige onderwerpen.", 'hr': 'Dinamički modeli teme (DTMs) uključuju evoluciju teme i trendova u podacima o vremenskim serijama. Trenutne DTMs se primjenjuju samo na monojezičke sete podataka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo multijezički dinamički model teme (ML-DTM), nov model teme koji kombinira DTM sa postojećim metodom modeliranja multijezičkih tema kako bi uhvatili cross-jezičke teme koje se razvijaju tijekom vremena. Predstavljamo rezultate ovog model a o paralelnom njemačkom-engleskom korpusu novinskih članaka i usporednom korpusu finskih i švedskih novinskih članaka. Pokazujemo sposobnost ML-DTM-a pratiti značajne događaje povezane s temom i pokazujemo da pronalazi različite teme i izvode, kao i postojeće multijezičke modele teme u usklađivanju međujezičkih tema.', 'de': 'Dynamische Themenmodelle (DTMs) erfassen die Entwicklung von Themen und Trends in Zeitreihendaten. Aktuelle DTMs gelten nur für einsprachige Datensätze. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir das multilinguale dynamische Themenmodell (ML-DTM) vor, ein neuartiges Themenmodell, das DTM mit einer bestehenden mehrsprachigen Themenmodellierungsmethode kombiniert, um sprachübergreifende Themen zu erfassen, die sich im Laufe der Zeit entwickeln. Die Ergebnisse dieses Modells präsentieren wir auf einem parallelen deutsch-englischen Korpus von Nachrichtenartikeln und einem vergleichbaren Korpus finnischer und schwedischer Nachrichtenartikel. Wir demonstrieren die Fähigkeit von ML-DTM, wichtige Ereignisse im Zusammenhang mit einem Thema zu verfolgen und zeigen, dass es verschiedene Themen findet und genauso gut funktioniert wie bestehende mehrsprachige Themenmodelle bei der Ausrichtung von crosslingualen Themen.', 'id': 'Model topik dinamik (DTM) menangkap evolusi topik dan trends dalam data seri waktu. DTM saat ini hanya berlaku untuk set data monobahasa. Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan model topik dinamik berbagai bahasa (ML-DTM), model topik baru yang menggabungkan DTM dengan metode modeling topik berbagai bahasa yang ada untuk menangkap topik berbagai bahasa yang berevolusi sepanjang waktu. We present results of this model on a parallel German-English corpus of news articles and a comparable corpus of Finnish and Swedish news articles.  Kami menunjukkan kemampuan ML-DTM untuk melacak peristiwa yang signifikan yang berhubungan dengan topik dan menunjukkan bahwa topik tersebut menemukan topik dan prestasi yang berbeda serta model topik berbagai bahasa yang ada dalam menyesuaikan topik berbagai bahasa.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای موضوع دینامیک (DTMs) تکامل موضوع و ترند در داده\u200cهای سری زمان را دریافت می\u200cکنند. DTMs فعلی فقط برای مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای یک زبان استفاده می\u200cکنند. در این کاغذ ما مدل موضوع داینامیک multilingual dynamic (ML-DTM) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک مدل موضوع رمانی که DTM را با یک روش مدل\u200cسازی موضوع زیادی زبان\u200cها ترکیب می\u200cکند تا موضوع\u200cهای متوسط زبان\u200cها را که در طول زمان تکامل می\u200cکنند بگیریم. ما نتیجه\u200cهای این مدل را بر یک شرکت آلمانی-انگلیسی متفاوت از مکالمات خبری و یک شرکت قابل مقایسه از مکالمات خبری فنلاندی و سوئدی ارائه می\u200cدهیم. ما توانایی ML-DTM را نشان می دهیم تا اتفاقات مهمتری را رابطه به یک موضوع ردیابی کند و نشان می دهیم که موضوع مختلف را پیدا می کند و اجرا می کند و مدل موجود موضوع موجود زیادی زبان در تطبیق موضوع متفاوت زبان.', 'ko': '동적 테마 모델(DTM)은 시간 시퀀스 데이터의 테마와 트렌드의 변화를 포착합니다.현재 DTM은 한어 데이터 세트에만 사용할 수 있습니다.본고에서 우리는 다중 언어 동적 주제 모델(ML-DTM)을 제시했다. 이것은 새로운 주제 모델로 DTM과 기존의 다중 언어 주제 모델링 방법을 결합시켜 다중 언어 주제가 시간에 따라 변화하는 것을 포착한다.우리는 평행 독일어 - 영어 뉴스 문장 자료 라이브러리와 비교 가능한 핀란드와 스웨덴 뉴스 문장 자료 라이브러리에서 이 모델의 결과를 보여 주었다.우리는 ML-DTM가 주제와 관련된 중요한 이벤트를 추적하는 능력을 보여 주었고, 서로 다른 주제를 발견하는 능력과 크로스 언어 주제의 정렬에 있어서 기존의 다중 언어 주제 모델과 같은 성능을 보여 주었다.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa mada ya kidynamic (DTMs) unaweza kukuta mabadiliko ya mada na mwenendo wa mifumo ya muda. DTMs za sasa zinatumika pekee kwenye seti za takwimu za lugha. Katika karatasi hii tunaonyesha modeli ya mada ya lugha mbalimbali (ML-DTM), modeli ya mada ya riwaya inayounganisha DTM na njia ya mifano ya mada ya lugha mbalimbali ya kuchukua mada za lugha zinazoendelea wakati wote. Tunaonyesha matokeo ya mtindo huu kwenye makala mbalimbali ya Kijerumani na Kiingereza za za makala za habari na makala yanayofanana na Kiingereza. Tunaonyesha uwezo wa ML-DTM kufuatilia matukio muhimu yanayohusiana na mada na kuonyesha kuwa inapata mada tofauti na kutekeleza pamoja na mifano ya mada ya lugha nyingine katika kuendeleza mada za lugha.', 'tr': "Dinamik meýdançalar (DTMs) meýdançalaryň we zaman seriýa maglumatyň evolusiýasyny çekýär. Häzirki DTM diňe monolingüň veri setirlere ýazmak üçin ullanylar. Bu kagyzda biz uluslary dinamik tema nusgasyny (ML-DTM), DTM'i zaman içinde öwrülen uluslary temalary almak üçin bir nusgasy bilen birleşdirýäris. Biz bu nusganyň netijesini, parallel nemes-iňlisçe täzelikler barada we Finlandiýa we Şwediýa täzelikler barada ýakynlaşýan korpusa görkeýäris. Biz ML-DTM'iň möhüm wajyplary bir tema ýaly çykyp biljek ählisini görkeýäris we munuň tapa meňzeş temalary tapyp, we munuň bar multi-dil tema nusgalary ýaly çatlaşdyrylyp bilen görkezip bilýäris.", 'af': "Dinamiese onderwerp modele (DTMs) vang die evolusie van onderwerpe en trende in tydsreek data. Huidige DTMs word slegs toewenbaar na monolinglike datastelle. In hierdie papier voorsien ons die multitaalske dinamiese onderwerp model (ML-DTM),  'n nuwe onderwerp model wat DTM met 'n bestaande multitaalske onderwerp modeling metode kombinieer om kruistale onderwerpe te vang wat deur tyd ontwikkeld word. Ons stel die resultate van hierdie model op 'n parallele Duitse-Engels korpus van nuus artikels en 'n vergelykbare korpus van Finnish en Swedese nuus artikels. Ons wys die moontlikheid van ML-DTM om betekende gebeurtenis met 'n onderwerp te volg en te wys dat dit verskillende onderwerpe en uitvoer en bestaande multitaalske onderwerp modele vind in die alignering van kruistale onderwerpe.", 'sq': 'Modelet dinamike të temave (DTMs) kapin evolucionin e temave dhe prirjeve në të dhënat e serive kohore. DTMs aktuale janë të aplikueshme vetëm për të dhënat monogjuhësore. In this paper we present the multilingual dynamic topic model (ML-DTM), a novel topic model that combines DTM with an existing multilingual topic modeling method to capture cross-lingual topics that evolve across time.  Ne paraqesim rezultatet e këtij modeli në një korpus paralel gjerman-anglez të artikujve të lajmeve dhe një korpus të krahasueshëm të artikujve të lajmeve finlandeze dhe suedeze. Ne demonstrojmë aftësinë e ML-DTM për të ndjekur ngjarje të rëndësishme lidhur me një temë dhe tregojmë se ajo gjen temat e veçanta dhe shfaq si dhe modelet e temave shumëgjuhësore ekzistuese në rregullimin e temave ndërgjuhësore.', 'am': 'የድምፅ ምርጫዎች (DTMs) ቋንቋ በዚህ ፕሮግራም የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች የደራሲ ጉዳይ ሞዴል (ML-DTM) እናሳየዋለን፤ በጊዜው የሚወስደውን የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ጉዳዮች ለመያዝ የሚኖረውን የረኀብ ትምህርት ሞዴል እናስገድዳለን፡፡ የዚህን ምሳሌ ፍሬዎችን በጀርመን-እንግሊዘኛ የዜና ቃላት እና የፊኒስና የስዊድ ዜና ቃላት አካላት በሚተያያየው አካባቢ እናቀርባለን፡፡ በንግግር ላይ የተለየውን ትልቅ ጉዳዮች እና የተለየ ጉዳዮች እና የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ጉዳዮችን ማሳየት የሚችሉትን የML-DTM ሥልጣን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Դինամական թեմային մոդելները (ԴՏՄ) ներկայացնում են ժամանակային շարքերի տվյալների թեմաների և միտումների էվոլյուցիան: Ներկայումս տեղեկատվական համակարգերը կիրառվում են միայն միալեզու տվյալների համակարգերի համար: Այս աշխատանքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք բազլեզու դինամիկ թեմայի մոդելը (ML-DMT), նոր թեմայի մոդելը, որը համադրում է DMT-ը գոյություն ունեցող բազլեզու թեմայի մոդելների մեթոդի, որպեսզի վերցնի տարբերլեզու թեմաներ, որոնք զարգանում են ժամանակի ընթացքում Մենք ներկայացնում ենք այս մոդելի արդյունքները գերմաներեն-անգլերեն մի զուգահեռ նորությունների հոդվածների և ֆիներեն և շվեդական նորությունների համեմատական հոդվածների վրա: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս ML-DMT-ի հնարավորությունը հետևել թեմայի հետ կապված նշանակալի իրադարձություններին և ցույց տալ, որ այն գտնում է տարբեր թեմաներ և արտադրում, ինչպես նաև գոյություն ունեցող բազլեզու թեմայի մոդելներ փոխլեզվով թեմաների հավասարման համար:', 'az': "Dinamik m…ôlumat modell…ôri (DTMs) m…ôlumatlarńĪn v…ô trendl…ôrin d…ôyiŇüikliyini zaman seri m…ôlumatlarńĪnda yakalayńĪr. HazńĪrkńĪ DTMs yalnńĪz monodil veri qurularńĪna uyńüun ola bil…ôr. Bu kańüńĪzda √ßoxlu dil dinamik m…ôs…ôl…ônin modelini (ML-DTM) g√∂st…ôririk. Bu yeni m…ôs…ôl modelini, DTM'nin m√∂vcud olan √ßoxlu dil m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôri modellik metodlarńĪ il…ô birl…ôŇüdirir ki, zamanńĪnda √ßoxlu dil m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôri tutmaq √ľ√ß√ľn √ßoxlu m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr istifad…ô edir. Biz bu modelinin sonu√ßlarńĪnńĪ, parallel Alman-ńįngilizce korpusu haqq m…ôktullarńĪnńĪn v…ô Finlandiya v…ô ńįsve√ß…ô haqq m…ôktullarńĪnńĪn kompatibil korpusu il…ô g√∂st…ôririk. Biz ML-DTM'nin m√∂hk…ôm vaxtlarńĪnńĪ bir m…ôs…ôl…ôy…ô qovuŇüdurduńüunu g√∂st…ôrdik v…ô bunun m√ľxt…ôlif m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôri v…ô √ßoxlu dil m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôrini birlikd…ô m√ľ…ôyy…ôn etdiyini g√∂st…ôrdik.", 'bn': 'ডায়ানিমিক বিষয় মডেল (ডিটিএমএস) সময় সিরিজের তথ্যে বিষয়বস্তুর বিবর্তন এবং ধারার বিবর্তন তুলে ধরেছে। বর্তমান DTMs শুধুমাত্র মনোলিঙ্গুলো ডাটাসেটের জন্য প্রয়োজন। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা মাল্টিভাল ভাষার ডায়ান্ডামিক বিষয় মডেল (এমএল-ডিটিএম) উপস্থাপন করি একটি নোভেল বিষয় মডেল যা ডিটিএমের সাথে বিদ্যমান বহুভাষী বিষয়ের মডেলের মাধ্যমে এক আমরা এই মডেলের ফলাফল উপস্থাপন করছি সংবাদ প্রবন্ধের তুলনায় জার্মান-ইংরেজী কোর্পাস এবং ফিনিশ ও সুইডিয়ান সংবাদ প্রবন্ধের তুলনায় আমরা এক বিষয়ের সাথে সম্পর্কিত গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ঘটনা অনুসন্ধান করতে এমএল-ডিটিএমের ক্ষমতা প্রদর্শন করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে এটি বিভিন্ন বিষয় খুঁজে পাচ্ছে এবং বিভিন্ন বিষয়বস্তু প', 'ca': "Models dinàmics de temes (DTMs) capturen l'evolució de temes i tendències en les dades de sèrie temporal. Els DTM actuals són aplicables només als conjunts de dades monolingües. En aquest paper presentem el model de tema dinàmic multilingüe (ML-DTM), un model de tema nou que combina DTM amb un mètode de modelació multilingüe existent per capturar temes translingües que evolucionen a través del temps. Presentam els resultats d'aquest model en un corpus paral·lel german-anglès d'articles de notícies i un corpus comparable d'articles de notícies finlandès i suecs. Demostram la capacitat del ML-DTM de seguir esdeveniments significatius relacionats amb un tema i demostram que troba temes distints i actua, així com models multilingües existents, en alliniar temes translingües.", 'bs': 'Dinamički modeli teme (DTMs) uhvatili su evoluciju teme i trendova u podacima vremenskih serija. Trenutne DTMs se primjenjuju samo na monojezičke sete podataka. U ovom papiru predstavljamo multijezički dinamički model tema (ML-DTM), nov model tema koji kombinuje DTM sa postojećim metodom modeliranja multijezičkih tema kako bi uhvatili cross-jezičke teme koje se razvijaju kroz vrijeme. Predstavljamo rezultate ovog model a o paralelnom njemačkom-engleskom korpusu novinskih članaka i usporednom korpusu novinskih članaka finskog i švedskog. Pokazujemo sposobnost ML-DTM za praćenje značajnih događaja povezanih sa temom i pokazujemo da pronalazi različite teme i izvode, kao i postojeće multijezičke modele teme u usklađivanju međujezičkih tema.', 'cs': 'Dynamické tématické modely (DTM) zachycují vývoj témat a trendů v datech časových řad. Současné DTM se vztahují pouze na jednojjazyčné datové sady. V tomto článku představujeme vícejazyčný dynamický tématický model (ML-DTM), nový tématický model, který kombinuje DTM s existující vícejazyčnou metodou modelování témat pro zachycení vícejazyčných témat, která se vyvíjejí v průběhu času. Výsledky tohoto modelu prezentujeme na paralelním německo-anglickém korpusu zpravodajských článků a srovnatelném korpusu finských a švédských zpravodajských článků. Ukážeme schopnost ML-DTM sledovat významné události související s tématem a ukázat, že nalezne odlišná témata a funguje stejně jako existující vícejazyčné modely témat při sladění témat mezi jazyky.', 'et': 'Dünaamilised teemamudelid kajastavad aegridade andmete teemade ja suundumuste arengut. Praegused DTMid on kohaldatavad ainult ühekeelsete andmekogumite suhtes. Käesolevas töös tutvustame mitmekeelset dünaamilist teemamudelit (ML-DTM), uudset teemamudelit, mis ühendab DTM olemasoleva mitmekeelse teemamodelleerimise meetodiga, et jäädvustada aja jooksul arenevaid keeleüleseid teemasid. Esitleme selle mudeli tulemusi paralleelsel saksa-inglise uudisteartiklite korpusel ning võrreldaval Soome ja Rootsi uudisteartiklite korpusel. Näitame ML-DTM suutlikkust jälgida teemaga seotud olulisi sündmusi ja näidata, et see leiab erinevaid teemasid ja toimib nii olemasolevate mitmekeelsete teemamudelite kui ka keeleüleste teemade ühtlustamisel.', 'fi': 'Dynaamiset teemamallit kuvaavat aikasarjadatan aiheiden ja trendien kehitystä. Nykyisiä DTM-malleja sovelletaan vain yksikielisiin tietoaineistoihin. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään monikielinen dynaaminen teemamalli (ML-DTM), uusi teemamalli, joka yhdistää DTM:n olemassa olevaan monikieliseen teemamallinnusmenetelmään ja tallentaa monikielisiä aiheita, jotka kehittyvät ajan mittaan. Mallin tuloksia esitellään rinnakkaisella saksa-englantilaisella uutisartikkelikorpusella sekä vastaavalla suomen- ja ruotsinkielisillä uutisartikkeleilla. Osoitamme ML-DTM:n kyvyn seurata aiheeseen liittyviä merkittäviä tapahtumia ja osoittaa, että se löytää erillisiä aiheita ja toimii samoin kuin olemassa olevat monikieliset teemamallit monikielisten aiheiden yhdenmukaistamisessa.', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog DTS Actual iku dipunangno kanggo sampeyan dikenalke data yang MonLingui Nang pepulan iki kita nambah mulalah sistem multilenguang dumalah sing model (ML-DT M), model sing paling dhéwé kuwi ngregane DT M nganggo sistem multilenguang mulalah sing model kuwi nggawe gerakan cara-dilangugan sing bisa kuwi nggawe gerakan cara-cara sistem sing bisa dumadhi iki. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem iki ning paralan karo perusahaan-ingkang alaman nganggo barang-alaman kuwi nggawe barang-alaman kuwi nggawe barang-alaman kita sabanjuré karo perusahaan hari mbutuhakan Finse karo Swade. Awak dhéwé éntuk perkoro sing gawe ML-DT kanggo nêmên langgar akèh dumadhi sing gagal ning temu iki ngono wong kuwi nggawe temu sing dibenakno karo pak sampeyan ngono gambar sistem multilenguase sing dumadhi kanggo nggawe gerarané temu sistem bantuan.", 'sk': 'Dinamični tematski modeli (DTM) zajemajo razvoj tem in trendov v podatkih časovnih vrst. Trenutni DTM se uporabljajo samo za enojezične nabore podatkov. V prispevku predstavljamo večjezični dinamični tematski model (ML-DTM), nov tematski model, ki združuje DTM z obstoječo metodo večjezičnega tematskega modeliranja, da zajame medjezične teme, ki se razvijajo skozi čas. Rezultate tega modela predstavljamo na vzporednem nemško-angleškem korpusu novic in primerljivem korpusu finskih in švedskih novic. Prikazujemo zmožnost ML-DTM za sledenje pomembnih dogodkov, povezanih s temo, in pokažemo, da najde različne teme in uspešno kot tudi obstoječe večjezične modele tematike pri usklajevanju medjezičnih tem.', 'ha': "@ action: button @ item license (short name) Daga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da misalin madaidaita masu cikin mulki-lingui (ML-DTM), wata salon maɓalli wanda ke haɗa DTM da wata hanyon da ke samar da maɓallin mulki-lingui da za'a kãma maɓallin-cikin-linguin da ke buɗe kowace lokaci. Tuna halatar da fassaran wannan misalin a sami'a ga rubutun-Ingiriya na rubutun da takarda makampuni na lãbãra da sami daidai na makampuni na masu karatun masu fasafar Finnish da Iswidishki. Tuna nuna awon ML-DTM da za'a bi masu muhimmi da ke haɗi da wani madaidai kuma Mu nuna cewa, za'a sami maɓalli da masu buƙata da kuma ke sami sami da misãlai masu cikin mulki-linguin da ke sami cikin masu buƙata-rubutu.", 'bo': 'འཕྱུར་འགྲོས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་མིག་models(DTMs)ནང་དུ་གཏམ་གླེང་གཏོང་དང་འཕེལ་རིམ་མང་ཙམ་ཅིག་ཡོད་པ ད་ལྟོའི་DTMs སྤྱོད་སྟངས་གཅིག་སྐད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཆ་ཁོ་ན་ལ་སྤྱོད་རུང་བ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་འདིའི་མིག་གཟུགས་གཅིག་གི་སྐོར་ལས་དབུགས་ཆའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་མཉམ་འབྱུང་མི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ML-DTM་གི་ཆེད་དུ་བྱ་བ་ཚུལ་ཁག་ཅིག་གི་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲེལ་བའི་བྱ་བ་མང་ཆོག་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་འདྲ་བྱས་ཆོག་ཉིད་དུ་རྣམས་མཐུན་གཏོང', 'he': 'דוגמני נושאים דינמיים (DTMs) מכילים את האבולוציה של נושאים וטנדות בנתונים בסדרת הזמן. DTMs הנוכחים מתאימים רק לקבוצות נתונים מונושפתיים. בעיתון הזה אנו מציגים את מודל הנושא הדינמיקלי הרב-שפוי (ML-DTM), מודל נושא חדש שמשולב DTM עם שיטת מודל הנושא הרב-שפוי קיימת אנחנו מציגים תוצאות של הדוגמא הזו על קורפוס גרמני-אנגלי מקביל של מאמרים חדשות וקורפוס שווה של מאמרים חדשות פיני ושוודית. אנחנו מראים את היכולת של ML-DTM לאתר אירועים משמעותיים קשורים לנושא ולהראות שהוא מוצא נושאים ומופעים בודדים'}
{'en': 'A Wide-Coverage Context-Free Grammar for Icelandic and an Accompanying Parsing System', 'ar': 'تغطية واسعة خالية من السياق لقواعد اللغة الأيسلندية ونظام الإعراب المصاحب', 'fr': "Une grammaire sans contexte à large couverture pour l'islandais et un système d'analyse syntaxique qui l'accompagne", 'es': 'Una gramática libre de contexto de amplia cobertura para el islandés y un sistema de análisis que lo acompaña', 'pt': 'Uma gramática livre de contexto de ampla cobertura para islandês e um sistema de análise de acompanhamento', 'zh': '冰岛语之广覆盖上下文无关语法与随附之解析统', 'ru': 'Бесконтекстная грамматика с широким охватом для исландского языка и сопутствующая система анализа', 'ja': 'アイスランド語とそれに付随する構文解析システムのための広範囲の文脈自由文法', 'hi': 'आइसलैंडिक के लिए एक व्यापक कवरेज संदर्भ-मुक्त व्याकरण और एक साथ पार्सिंग सिस्टम', 'ga': 'Gramadach Gan Comhthéacs Clúdach Leathan don Íoslainnis agus Córas Parsála a théann leis', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Széles körű kontextusmentes nyelvtan izlandi és kísérő értelmezési rendszer', 'el': 'Μια ευρεία κάλυψη χωρίς πλαίσιο γραμματική για ισλανδικά και ένα συνοδευτικό σύστημα ανάλυσης', 'it': "Una grammatica senza contesto ad ampia copertura per l'islandese e un sistema di analisi di accompagnamento", 'mk': 'Грамара без контекст на широко покривање за исландски и придружен систем за анализирање', 'kk': 'Исландиялық және сәйкестік талдау жүйесі үшін үлкен мәтіні бос контексті грамматтары', 'lt': 'Islandijos kalba ir lydinė analizavimo sistema be konteksto', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Grammar b’Kopertura wiesgħa mingħajr Kuntest għall-Islandiż u Sistema ta’ Analiżi Akkumpanjata', 'mn': 'Айланд болон хамтрагчийн шинжилгээний системийн өргөн түвшингүй контекст-үнэгүй багш', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Szeroki zakres kontekstowa gramatyka dla islandzkiego i towarzyszący mu system parsowania', 'ro': 'O gramatică largă fără context pentru islandeză și un sistem de interpretare însoțitor', 'sr': 'Široki kontekst oslobođeni Grammar za Islandski i kompanirajući analizirajući sistem', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Wide-Coverage Context-Free Grammar for Icelandic and an Accounting Parsing System', 'sv': 'En bred täckning sammanhangsfri grammatik för isländska och ett åtföljande tolkningssystem', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'A Wide-coverage Miền bắc-Free Grammar cho Iceland và một hộ chiếu phân tích', 'bg': 'Широка граматика без контекст за исландски език и придружаваща система за анализ', 'da': 'En bred dækning kontekstfri grammatik for islandsk og et ledsagende fortolkningssystem', 'hr': 'Široki kontekst oslobođeni Grammar za Islandski i povezan sustav za razmatranje', 'nl': 'Een brede contextvrije grammatica voor het IJslands en een begeleidend parsing systeem', 'de': 'Eine umfassende kontextfreie Grammatik für Isländisch und ein begleitendes Parsing-System', 'id': 'Sebuah Grammar Bebas Konteks Penutupan Lebar untuk Icelandic dan Sistem Analisis yang Bergabung', 'ko': '범위가 광범위한 아이슬란드어 상하문은 문법 및 상응하는 문법 분석 시스템과 무관하다', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'Isländçe we Täzelikli Parlamak Sistemi üçin Goluby Mazmunlar', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa Uchaguzi wa Kiislamu na Mfumo wa Uchaguzi', 'sq': 'Një grafik pa kontekst të gjerë për islandezën dhe një sistem analizimi shoqërues', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'የተለመደው ጭብጥ', 'hy': 'Իսլանդացի և համալսարանի վերլուծության համակարգի լայն ծածկույթը առանց կոնտեքստի գրամամա', 'bn': 'Name', 'ca': "Un grama lliure de contest per a l'islàndia i un sistema d'analització acompanyant", 'az': 'İslandiyac və Tərəfləndirici Səfləndirici Sistemi üçün geniş-Tərəfləndirici Kontext-Özgür Grammar', 'bs': 'Široki kontekst oslobođeni Grammar za Islandski i kompanirajući analizirajući sustav', 'et': 'Laiaulatuslik kontekstivaba grammatika islandi keele ja kaasnev parsimissüsteem', 'cs': 'Široké pokrytí kontextové gramatiky pro islandštinu a doprovodný systém analýzy', 'fi': 'Laaja-alainen kontekstiton kielioppi islannille ja siihen liittyvä jäsennysjärjestelmä', 'jv': 'Name', 'sk': 'Široko pokrita slovnica brez konteksta za islandsko jezik in spremljajoči sistem razčlenjanja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'A Wide-Coverage Context-Free Grammar for Icelandic and an Accompanying Parsing System', 'bo': 'A Wide-Coverage Context-Free Grammar for Icelandic and an Accompanying Parsing System'}
{'en': 'We present an open-source, wide-coverage context-free grammar (CFG) for Icelandic, and an accompanying parsing system. The grammar has over 5,600 nonterminals, 4,600 terminals and 19,000 productions in fully expanded form, with feature agreement constraints for case, gender, number and person. The parsing system consists of an enhanced Earley-based parser and a mechanism to select best-scoring parse trees from shared packed parse forests. Our parsing system is able to parse about 90 % of all sentences in articles published on the main Icelandic news websites. Preliminary evaluation with evalb shows an F-measure of 70.72 % on parsed sentences. Our system demonstrates that parsing a morphologically rich language using a wide-coverage CFG can be practical.', 'ar': 'نقدم نظامًا لغويًا مفتوح المصدر وتغطية واسعة وخالية من السياق (CFG) للأيسلنديين ونظام تحليل مصاحب. تحتوي القواعد على أكثر من 5600 حرف غير نهائي ، و 4600 محطة طرفية و 19000 إنتاج في شكل موسع بالكامل ، مع قيود اتفاقية الميزات للحالة والجنس والعدد والشخص. يتكون نظام الإعراب من محلل إيرلي مُحسَّن وآلية لاختيار أشجار التحليل الأفضل تسجيلًا من غابات التحليل المعبأة المشتركة. نظام الإعراب لدينا قادر على تحليل حوالي 90٪ من جميع الجمل في المقالات المنشورة على المواقع الإخبارية الأيسلندية الرئيسية. يُظهر التقييم الأولي باستخدام Evalb مقياس F بنسبة 70.72٪ في الجمل التي تم تحليلها. يوضح نظامنا أن تحليل لغة غنية شكليًا باستخدام CFG ذات التغطية الواسعة يمكن أن يكون عمليًا.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma gramática livre de contexto (CFG) de código aberto e ampla cobertura para islandês e um sistema de análise sintático que o acompanha. A gramática tem mais de 5.600 não terminais, 4.600 terminais e 19.000 produções em forma totalmente expandida, com restrições de concordância de recursos para caso, gênero, número e pessoa. O sistema de análise consiste em um analisador baseado em Earley aprimorado e um mecanismo para selecionar árvores de análise com melhor pontuação de florestas de análise compactada compartilhadas. Nosso sistema de análise é capaz de analisar cerca de 90% de todas as frases em artigos publicados nos principais sites de notícias da Islândia. A avaliação preliminar com evalb mostra uma F-measure de 70,72% nas sentenças analisadas. Nosso sistema demonstra que analisar uma linguagem morfologicamente rica usando um CFG de ampla cobertura pode ser prático.', 'es': 'Presentamos una gramática libre de contexto (CFG) de código abierto y amplia cobertura para islandés, y un sistema de análisis que lo acompaña. La gramática tiene más de 5.600 no terminales, 4.600 terminales y 19.000 producciones en forma totalmente expandida, con restricciones de acuerdo de características para caso, género, número y persona. El sistema de análisis consiste en un analizador mejorado basado en Earley y un mecanismo para seleccionar los árboles de análisis con la mejor puntuación de los bosques de análisis empaquetados compartidos. Nuestro sistema de análisis es capaz de analizar aproximadamente el 90% de todas las frases de los artículos publicados en los principales sitios web de noticias islandeses. La evaluación preliminar con evalb muestra una medida F del 70,72% en las oraciones analizadas. Nuestro sistema demuestra que el análisis de un lenguaje rico morfológicamente mediante un CFG de amplia cobertura puede ser práctico.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une grammaire libre de contexte (CFG) open source et à couverture étendue pour l'islandais, ainsi qu'un système d'analyse qui l'accompagne. La grammaire compte plus de 5 600 non-terminaux, 4 600 terminaux et 19 000 productions dans une forme entièrement étendue, avec des contraintes d'accord de fonctionnalités pour la casse, le sexe, le nombre et la personne. Le système d'analyse se compose d'un analyseur amélioré basé sur Earley et d'un mécanisme permettant de sélectionner les arbres d'analyse les mieux notés à partir de forêts d'analyse groupées partagées. Notre système d'analyse est capable d'analyser environ 90\xa0% de toutes les phrases contenues dans les articles publiés sur les principaux sites d'information islandais. L'évaluation préliminaire avec evalb montre une mesure F de 70,72\xa0% sur les phrases analysées. Notre système démontre que l'analyse d'un langage morphologiquement riche à l'aide d'un CFG à couverture étendue peut être pratique.", 'ja': '私たちは、アイスランド語のオープンソース、広範囲の文脈自由文法（ CFG ）、およびそれに付随する構文解析システムを提示します。この文法には、5,600以上のノンターミナル、4,600のターミナル、19,000のプロダクションが完全に拡張された形であり、ケース、性別、数、および人のための機能契約の制約があります。構文解析システムは、強化されたEarleyベースの構文解析器と、共有されたパックされた構文解析林からベストスコアの構文解析ツリーを選択するメカニズムで構成されています。私たちの解析システムは、アイスランドの主要なニュースウェブサイトに掲載された記事のすべての文章の約90 ％を解析することができます。EARBBによる予備的評価では、解析された文章で70.72 ％のF -メジャーが示されています。当社のシステムは、広範囲のCFGを使用して形態学的に豊富な言語を解析することが実用的であることを実証しています。', 'zh': '建一开源者,覆盖面广冰岛语上下文无关语法(CFG),与一随附解析系统。 语法有过5,600非终端,4,600终端19,000广其文,有小大,有性别,数限人物一致性。 解析统由一增 Earley 之解析器,与一从共打包之解析林中择得分最高之解析树之制。 吾解析统能解析冰岛主新闻网站文章中约90%句。 用evalb初估显,解析句F量值为70.72%。 吾之统明,博覆之CFG解析多言可也。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем открытую широкоохватную бесконтекстную грамматику (CFG) для исландского языка и сопутствующую систему синтаксического анализа. Грамматика имеет более 5600 нетерминалов, 4600 терминалов и 19 000 произведений в полностью расширенном виде, с ограничениями по признакам, связанным с делом, полом, числом и личностью. Система синтаксического анализа состоит из улучшенного синтаксического анализатора на основе Earley и механизма для выбора синтаксических деревьев с наилучшими показателями из общих упакованных синтаксических лесов. Наша система синтаксического анализа способна анализировать около 90% всех предложений в статьях, опубликованных на основных новостных сайтах Исландии. Предварительная оценка с помощью evalb показывает F-измерение 70,72% для проанализированных предложений. Наша система демонстрирует, что синтаксический анализ морфологически богатого языка с использованием широкополосного CFG может быть практичным.', 'hi': 'हम आइसलैंडिक के लिए एक ओपन-सोर्स, वाइड-कवरेज संदर्भ-मुक्त व्याकरण (सीएफजी) और एक साथ पार्सिंग सिस्टम प्रस्तुत करते हैं। व्याकरण में 5,600 से अधिक nonterminals, 4,600 टर्मिनल और 19,000 प्रस्तुतियों को पूरी तरह से विस्तारित रूप में रखा गया है, जिसमें मामले, लिंग, संख्या और व्यक्ति के लिए सुविधा समझौते की बाधाएं हैं। पार्सिंग प्रणाली में एक बढ़ाया अर्ले-आधारित पार्सर और साझा पैक किए गए पार्स जंगलों से सर्वश्रेष्ठ स्कोरिंग पार्स पेड़ों का चयन करने के लिए एक तंत्र होता है। हमारी पार्सिंग प्रणाली मुख्य आइसलैंडिक समाचार वेबसाइटों पर प्रकाशित लेखों में सभी वाक्यों के लगभग 90% को पार्स करने में सक्षम है। Evalb के साथ प्रारंभिक मूल्यांकन पार्स किए गए वाक्यों पर 70.72% का एफ-माप दिखाता है। हमारी प्रणाली दर्शाती है कि व्यापक कवरेज सीएफजी का उपयोग करके एक रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भाषा को पार्स करना व्यावहारिक हो सकता है।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair gramadach foinse oscailte, leathan-chlúdach saor ó chomhthéacs (CFG) don Íoslainnis, agus córas parsála a théann leis. Tá breis is 5,600 neamhtheirminéil sa ghramadach, 4,600 críochfort agus 19,000 léiriúchán i bhfoirm leathnaithe go hiomlán, le srianta ar chomhaontuithe gné maidir le cás, inscne, uimhir agus pearsa. Is éard atá sa chóras parsála parsálaí feabhsaithe Earley-bhunaithe agus meicníocht chun crainn pharsála a bhfuil an scór is fearr leo a roghnú ó fhoraoisí parsála pacáilte roinnte. Tá ár gcóras parsála in ann thart ar 90% de na habairtí go léir in ailt a fhoilsítear ar phríomhshuímh ghréasáin nuachta na hÍoslainne a pharsáil. Léiríonn réamhmheastóireacht le evalb beart F de 70.72% ar phianbhreitheanna parsáilte. Léiríonn ár gcóras gur féidir a bheith praiticiúil teanga atá saibhir ó thaobh moirfeolaíochta de a pharsáil trí úsáid a bhaint as CFG a bhfuil clúdach leathan uirthi.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აღწერეთ ახლანეთიკისთვის საკუთარი კონტექსტური სისტემა (CFG) და დამატებული პარასტის სისტემა. გრამმარიკაში უფრო მეტი 50600 არსტერმინალის, 4000 ტერმინალის და 19.000 პროექტირების უფრო გაფარდებული ფორმაში, რომელიც შესაძლებელია შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებელება, გენდრების, რიცხვის და პანსტირების სისტემა იქნება უფრო მეტი პანსერი და მექანსი, რომელიც უფრო მეტი სკორირებული პანსერი ხელების გადაიყენება გაყოფილი პანსერი ქალებიდან. ჩვენი პანსტირების სისტემა შეუძლია გააკეთოთ 90% ყველა წარმოდგენების მაგალითი ინფორმაციის საბოლო საიზოგადოებში. ოპვეგთენარა ვგალბ-ის განსაზღვრება აჩვენებს, რომ F-მაზი 70,72%-ის გადაწყვეტილი სიტყვებზე. ჩვენი სისტემა მოდენსტურებს, რომ მორპოლოგიურად ბეჭდვილი ენაზე გამოყენება საშუალებელი CFG შეიძლება იყოს პრაქტიკური.', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy nyílt forráskódú, széles körű kontextusmentes nyelvtani (CFG) izlandi nyelvtan, valamint egy kísérő elemzési rendszert. A nyelvtan több mint 5.600 nem terminált, 4.600 terminált és 19.000 produkciót tartalmaz teljesen kibővített formában, az eset, a nem, a szám és a személy szempontjából. Az elemzési rendszer egy továbbfejlesztett Earley alapú elemzőből és egy mechanizmusból áll, amely a legjobb pontszámú elemzőfákat választja ki a megosztott csomagolt elemzőerdőkből. Elemzési rendszerünk a főbb izlandi hírlapokon publikált cikkekben megjelenő mondatok 90%-át képes elemezni. Az értékeléssel végzett előzetes értékelés 70,72%-os F-mértéket mutat az értelmezett mondatok esetében. Rendszerünk bizonyítja, hogy egy morfológiailag gazdag nyelv elemzése széles körű CFG segítségével praktikus lehet.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια ανοικτού κώδικα γραμματική χωρίς πλαίσιο ευρείας κάλυψης για τα ισλανδικά, και ένα συνοδευτικό σύστημα ανάλυσης. Η γραμματική έχει πάνω από 5.600 μη τερματικά, 4.600 τερματικά και 19.000 παραγωγές σε πλήρως διευρυμένη μορφή, με περιορισμούς συμφωνίας χαρακτηριστικών για περίπτωση, φύλο, αριθμό και πρόσωπο. Το σύστημα ανάλυσης αποτελείται από έναν ενισχυμένο αναλυτή βασισμένο στο Earley και έναν μηχανισμό επιλογής δέντρων ανάλυσης με την καλύτερη βαθμολογία από κοινόχρηστα συσκευασμένα δάση ανάλυσης. Το σύστημα ανάλυσης μας είναι σε θέση να αναλύσει περίπου 90% όλων των προτάσεων σε άρθρα που δημοσιεύονται στις κύριες ισλανδικές ιστοσελίδες ειδήσεων. Η προκαταρκτική αξιολόγηση με αξιολόγηση δείχνει ένα μέτρο F 70,72% στις επεξεργασμένες προτάσεις. Το σύστημά μας αποδεικνύει ότι η ανάλυση μιας μορφολογικά πλούσιας γλώσσας χρησιμοποιώντας μια ευρεία κάλυψη μπορεί να είναι πρακτική.', 'it': "Presentiamo una grammatica open-source (CFG) per l'islandese e un sistema di analisi associato. La grammatica ha più di 5.600 non terminali, 4.600 terminali e 19.000 produzioni in forma completamente espansa, con vincoli di accordo per caso, genere, numero e persona. Il sistema di analisi consiste in un parser avanzato basato su Earley e un meccanismo per selezionare gli alberi di parse con il miglior punteggio da foreste di parse impacchettate condivise. Il nostro sistema di analisi è in grado di analizzare circa il 90% di tutte le frasi in articoli pubblicati sui principali siti di notizie islandesi. La valutazione preliminare con evalb mostra una misura F del 70,72% sulle frasi analizzate. Il nostro sistema dimostra che analizzare un linguaggio morfologicamente ricco utilizzando un CFG ad ampia copertura può essere pratico.", 'mk': 'Презентираме слободна граматика без контекст (CFG) за исландски и придружен систем на анализирање. Граматиката има повеќе од 5.600 нетерминали, 4.600 терминали и 19.000 производи во целосно проширена форма, со ограничувања на договорот за карактеристики за случај, пол, број и личност. Системот на анализирање се состои од подобрен анализирач базиран на Ерли и механизам за избор на најдобри оценки на анализирачките дрвја од заедничките пакувани анализирани шуми. Нашиот систем за анализирање може да анализира околу 90 отсто од сите реченици во статии објавени на главните исландски веб страници за вести. Прелиминарната оценка со оценката покажува F-мерка од 70,72 отсто за анализираните реченици. Нашиот систем покажува дека анализирањето на морфолошки богат јазик користејќи широко покриен CFG може да биде практично.', 'lt': 'We present an open-source, wide-coverage context-free grammar (CFG) for Icelandic, and an accompanying parsing system.  Gramatikoje yra daugiau kaip 5 600 nefinalinių terminalų, 4 600 terminalų ir 19 000 visiškai išplėstos formos produkcijų, su savybėmis susijusiais susitarimais dėl atvejų, lyties, skaičiaus ir asmens. Analizės sistemą sudaro patobulintas Earley pagrįstas analizatorius ir mechanizmas parinkti geriausius analizatorių medžius iš bendrų supakuotų analizatorių miškų. Mūsų analizavimo sistema gali išanalizuoti apie 90 proc. visų sakinių straipsniuose, paskelbtuose pagrindinėse Islandijos naujienų interneto svetainėse. Išankstinis vertinimas su vertinimu parodė, kad analizuojamų sakinių F rodiklis yra 70,72 %. Our system demonstrates that parsing a morphologically rich language using a wide-coverage CFG can be practical.', 'kk': 'Біз Исландия үшін ашық көзі, жарық мәліметі бос контексті грамматиканы (CFG) және қосымша талдау жүйесін таңдаймыз. Грамматика 5 600 нетерминалдардан артық, 4000 терминалдар және 19 000 жасаулар толық кеңейтілген түрінде болады. Бірақ бұл жасаулар үшін, гендер, саны және адамдар үшін кеңейтілген кеңейтіліктерді ше Бұл талдау жүйесі бөлек талдау ормандарынан ең жақсы талдау ағаштарды таңдау үшін Earley-based талдаушы мен механизм болады. Біздің талдау жүйесіміз негізгі Исландия жаңалық сайттарында шығарылған мақалалардың 90% дегенді талдай алады. evalb- дің алдыңғы оқиғасы талдаған сөздерде 70, 72% F- өлшемін көрсетеді. Біздің жүйеміз морфологиялық баяны тілді CFG қолданып талдау мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan grammar bebas konteks (CFG) bagi bahasa Icelandic, sumber terbuka, dan sistem penghuraian yang menyertai. Gramatik mempunyai lebih dari 5,600 terminal bukan terminal, 4,600 terminal dan 19,000 produksi dalam bentuk penuh kembang, dengan keterangan persetujuan ciri untuk kes, jenis, nombor dan orang. Sistem penghuraian terdiri dari penghuraian berdasarkan Earley yang diperbaiki dan mekanisme untuk memilih pepohonan penghuraian yang terbaik dari hutan penghuraian berkongsi. Sistem penghuraian kami mampu menghurai kira-kira 90% dari semua kalimat dalam artikel yang diterbitkan di laman web berita utama Iceland. Evaluasi awal dengan evalb menunjukkan F-ukuran 70.72% pada kalimat dihurai. Sistem kita menunjukkan bahawa penghuraian bahasa yang kaya secara morfologik menggunakan CFG yang meliputi luas boleh menjadi praktik.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw gramma b’sors miftuħ u b’kopertura wiesgħa mingħajr kuntest (CFG) għall-Islandiż, u sistema ta’ analiżi li takkumpanja. Il-gramma għandha aktar minn 5,600 terminal mhux terminali, 4,600 terminal u 19,000 produzzjoni f’forma estiża bis-sħiħ, b’restrizzjonijiet ta’ ftehim dwar karatteristiċi għall-każ, is-sess, in-numru u l-persuna. Is-sistema tal-analiżi tikkonsisti f’analizzatur imsaħħa ħ ibbażat fuq Earley u mekkaniżmu biex jintgħażel siġar tal-analiżi bl-aħjar punteġġ minn foresti tal-analizzatur ippakkjati kondiviżi. Is-sistema tagħna ta’ analiżi hija kapaċi tanalizza madwar 90% tas-sentenzi kollha f’artikoli ppubblikati fuq is-siti ewlenin tal-aħbarijiet tal-Islanda. Evalwazzjoni preliminari b’evalb turi kejl F ta’ 70.72% fuq sentenzi analizzati. Is-sistema tagħna turi li l-analiżi ta’ lingwa morfoloġikament rikka bl-użu ta’ CFG ta’ kopertura wiesgħa tista’ tkun prattika.', 'ml': 'ഇസ്ലാന്\u200dഡിക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഒരു തുറന്ന സ്രോതസ്സ്, വിശാലമായ കോണ്\u200dസെക്സ്റ്റ് ഫ്രീഡ് ഗ്രാമാര്\u200d (സിഎഫിജി) നിങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക ഗ്രാമാര്\u200dക്ക് 5,600 അധികം ടെര്\u200dമിനലുകളുണ്ട്, 4,600 ടെര്\u200dമിനലുകളും 19,000 ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി വിശാലമായ രീതികളും  പാര്\u200dസിംഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഒരു മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയ എര്\u200dലി- അടിസ്ഥാനമായ പാര്\u200dസ് പാര്\u200dസ് വൃക്ഷങ്ങളും പങ്കെടുത്ത പാര്\u200dസ് കാട ഞങ്ങളുടെ പാര്\u200dസിംഗ് സിസ്റ്റം പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഇസ്ലാന്റിക് വെയിലുകളില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട എല്ലാ വാക്കുകളിലും 90 Evlb ഉപയോഗിച്ചുള്ള ആദ്യ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d പാര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്ത വാക്കുകളില്\u200d 70.72% എക്സ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ സിസ്റ്റം പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, ഒരു മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d സമ്പന്നമായ ഭാഷ പാര്\u200dസിഗ് ച', 'mn': 'Бид Исландийн нээлттэй эх үүсвэртэй, өргөн мэдээллийн аграммаар (CFG) болон хамтран ажиллах системийг тайлбарлаж байна. Граммат нь 5000 гаруй биш терминал, 4000 терминал, 19,000 бүтээгдэхүүний бүтээгдэхүүнтэй. Хүмүүсийн тоо, гендер, тоо болон хүн төрөлхтний тохиромжтой байдаг. Тайлбарлах систем нь Earley-д суурилсан хуваалцагч болон хамгийн шилдэг шокрингийн модыг хуваалцах механизм юм. Бидний хуваалцах систем Исландийн мэдээллийн сайт дээр нийтлэгдсэн бүх өгүүлбэрийн 90% нь хуваалцаж чадна. evalb-тэй эхний дүгнэлт нь F-хэмжээ 70.72% нь хуваалцагдсан өгүүлбэрийг харуулж байна. Бидний систем морфологийн баян хэлний талаар шинжлэх ухаан CFG-г ашиглаж болно гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit opna kjeldekode, breiddekkevne kontekstfri grammar (CFG) for islandsk, og eit tilfeldig tolkingssystem. Grammaren har over 5,600 nonterminal, 4,600 terminal og 19,000 produksjonar i fullstendig utvida form, med funksjonsavgrensingar for tilfelle, seks, tal og personen. Tolkingssystemet best år av ein forbetra tidlegare tolkar og ein mekanisme for å velja best skoring- tolking trær frå delte pakkede tolkingskog. Tolkingssystemet vårt kan tolka omtrent 90% av alle setningar i artiklar som er publisert på hovudnettstaden for islandske nyhetar. Preliminar evalb- evalb viser en F- mål på 70,72% på tolka setningar. Sistemet vårt viser at tolking av ein morfologisk rikt språk med ein breiddekke CFG kan vera praktisk.', 'pl': 'Prezentujemy open source, szeroko zakrojoną gramatykę bezkontekstową (CFG) dla islandzkiego oraz towarzyszący mu system parsowania. Gramatyka ma ponad 5.600 nieterminale, 4.600 terminale i 19.000 produkcje w pełni rozszerzonej formie, z ograniczeniami umowy funkcji dla przypadku, płci, liczby i osoby. System parsowania składa się z ulepszonego parsera opartego na Earley i mechanizmu wyboru najlepszych wyników drzew parsowania ze współdzielonych pakowanych lasów parsowania. Nasz system parsowania jest w stanie analizować około 90% wszystkich zdań w artykułach publikowanych na głównych islandzkich stronach informacyjnych. Ocena wstępna z oceną pokazuje miarę F 70,72% na analizowanych zdaniach. Nasz system pokazuje, że analiza języka bogatego morfologicznie przy użyciu szerokiego zakresu CFG może być praktyczna.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo slobodnu gramatiku bez širokog pokrivanja (CFG) islandskom, i praćenu analizu sistemu. gramatika ima preko 5.600 non-terminala, 4.600 terminala i 19.000 proizvoda u potpuno širenoj formi, sa ograničenjem dogovora za slučaj, spol, broj i osobu. Analiziranje sustava sastoji se od poboljšanog analizatora na ranijoj bazi i mehanizma za izbor najboljih analizatorskih drveta iz zajedničkih pakiranih parsijskih šuma. Naš analizirani sistem može da analizira oko 90% svih rečenica u člancima objavljenih na glavnim islandskim novinskim sajtovima. Preliminarna procjena evalba pokazuje da je F-mjera od 70,72% na parsiranim rečenicama. Naš sistem pokazuje da razmatranje morfološki bogatog jezika koristeći široko pokrivanje CFG može biti praktično.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm o gramatică fără context (CFG) cu sursă deschisă, cu acoperire largă pentru islandeză și un sistem de analizare însoțitor. Gramatica are peste 5.600 non-terminale, 4.600 terminale și 19.000 de producții în formă complet extinsă, cu constrângeri de acord de caracteristici pentru caz, gen, număr și persoană. Sistemul de analizare constă dintr-un parser îmbunătățit bazat pe Earley și un mecanism de selectare a copacilor de pătrundere cu cel mai bun scor din pădurile de pătrundere împărțite. Sistemul nostru de analizare este capabil să analizeze aproximativ 90% din toate propozițiile din articolele publicate pe principalele site-uri de știri islandeze. Evaluarea preliminară cu evalb arată o măsură F de 70,72% pe propozițiile analizate. Sistemul nostru demonstrează că analiza unui limbaj bogat din punct de vedere morfologic folosind un CFG cu acoperire largă poate fi practică.', 'si': 'අපි අයිස්ලෑන්ඩික් වෙනුවෙන් විවෘත ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක්, විශාල ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් (CFG) නිදහස් විවෘත්තියක්, ස ගර්මාර්කයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 5,600 ක් වඩා වැඩි නොටර්මිනල්, 4,600 ටර්මිනල් සහ 19,000 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා පුරුණුවන් විසිද්ධ විසින විශ්ලේෂණ පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂකයෙක් සහ හොඳම ස්කෝරින් විශේෂ ගස් තෝරාගන්න හොඳම පැ අපේ විශ්ලේෂණ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරධාන ආයිස්ලෑන්ඩික් වැබැයිට් වලින් ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරකාශ කරපු පිළිබඳ සියල evalb එක්ක ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ F-විශ්ලේෂණය 70.72% විශ්ලේෂණය. අපේ පද්ධතිය පෙන්වන්නයි මොර්ෆෝලෝජික විශාල භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා.', 'so': 'Waxaannu Icelandic u soo bandhignaa qoraal bannaan oo furan, oo ballaadhan qoraal-xor ah (CFG), iyo nidaam baaritaanka la socda. Qoraammadu waxay leedahay wax ka badan 5,600 qalloocyo, 4,600 terminal, 19,000 oo midhaha ah oo aad u ballaadhsan karto oo ku qoran heshiiska gaarka ah, jinsi, nambarka iyo qof. Tirada baarlamaanka waxaa ka mid ah qoryo kordhisan Earley-based Parser iyo mechanism in lagu doorto geedaha baarlamaanka ee ugu wanaagsan oo laga helo kaynta lagu sharrajiyey. Sirkayada baarlamaanka waxay ku baaraan karaan qiyaastii 90% erayada oo dhan ee warqadaha lagu soo daabacay bogagga macluumaadka ee Iceland. Preliminary evaluation with evalb shows an F-measure of 70.72% on parsed sentences.  Systemkanagu wuxuu muujiyaa in baaritaanka luuqad hodan ah oo morphologically ah lagu isticmaalo CFG oo ballaadhan ay ku shaqeyn karto.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஐஸ்லாந்திக்கான திறந்த மூலம், அகலமான cover context-free grammar (CFG) மற்றும் ஒரு பாடல் அமைப்பு வரைப்படத்திற்கு மேல் 5,600 முனையம், 4,600 முனையம் மற்றும் 19,000 விரிவாக்கப்பட்ட வடிவத்தில் உறுப்புகள் உள்ளன, விஷயத்திற்கு சிறப்பு ஒப்பந்தம்  காட்சி அமைப்பு மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட ஏர்லி- அடிப்படையிலான பகிர்ந்த பார்ச் காட்டிலிருந்து சிறந்த மதிப்புரிய பார்ச் மரங்களை  எங்கள் பாடல் அமைப்பு முக்கிய ஐஸ்லாந்திக் செய்தி இணையதளங்களில் வெளியிட்ட அனைத்து வாக்கியங்களிலும் 90% வாக்க Evlb உடன் முன்னிருப்பு மதிப்பில் பார்க்கப்பட்ட வாக்குகளில் ஒரு F- அளவை காட்டுகிறது. Our system demonstrates that parsing a morphologically rich language using a wide-coverage CFG can be practical.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en öppen källkod, bred täckning kontextfri grammatik (CFG) för isländska, och ett tillhörande tolkningssystem. Grammatiken har över 5 600 icke-terminaler, 4 600 terminaler och 19 000 produktioner i fullt utbyggd form, med funktionsavtalsbegränsningar för fall, kön, antal och person. Analyssystemet består av en förbättrad Earley-baserad parser och en mekanism för att välja ut bäst rankade parseträd från delade packade parsskogar. Vårt analyssystem kan tolka cirka 90% av alla meningar i artiklar som publiceras på de viktigaste isländska nyhetswebbplatserna. Preliminär utvärdering med evalb visar ett F-mått på 70,72% på tolkade meningar. Vårt system visar att det kan vara praktiskt att tolka ett morfologiskt rikt språk med hjälp av en bred täckning CFG.', 'ur': 'ہم اسلاندی کے لئے ایک کھلے سورج، وسیع کاوپٹ کائنٹ منفی گرامار (CFG) اور ایک ساتھی پارسینگ سیسٹم کو پیش کرتے ہیں۔ گراماری میں 5,600 غیر ترمینال ہے، 4,600 ترمینال اور 19,000 تولیدات پوری طرح پھیلائی ہوئی فرم میں ہے، جس کے ساتھ موافقت کے معاملہ کی محدودیت ہیں، جنس، نمبر اور شخص کے لئے۔ پارسینگ سیسٹم میں ایک مہربانی ارلی بنیادی پارسینٹر اور ایک مکانیسم ہے جو بہترین اسکوینگ پارسینٹ درختوں کو مشترک پاکس جنگل سے انتخاب کرے۔ ہمارا پارسینگ سیسٹم پورچ کرنا قادر ہے اسلاندی نیویٹ سایٹوں پر منصف ہوئے تمام کلمات میں 90% کے بارے میں پارس کرسکتا ہے۔ evalb کے ساتھ پہلی ارزیابی کا مطالعہ 70.72% کے اندازے کو دکھاتا ہے۔ ہماری سیسٹم دکھاتا ہے کہ ایک قالب طریقے سے پوری زبان کا پارس کرنا ایک وسیع کاوپٹر CFG کے استعمال سے کامل ہو سکتا ہے.', 'uz': "Biz Islandcha uchun ochiq manbasi, kengaytirish context-free grammatik (CFG) va bir xil parsing tizimi. Grammatika 5,600 dan ortiq terminal bor, 4,600 terminal va 19,000 tashkilotlar butun kengaytirilgan shaklga aylanadi, holatda, jinsiya, raqam va odamning qoidalari darajalari bor. Name Bizning parsing tizimimizning asosiy Icelandiya xabarlar veb- sahifalarda published barcha maqolalarning 90% ga birlashtirish mumkin. Preliminary evaluation with evalb shows an F-measure of 70.72% on parsed sentences.  Bizning tizimimiz qo'shimcha CFG yordamida murfologik ichki tilni ajratish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu ngữ pháp không phải mở nguồn, đa dạng ngữ cảnh rộng (CG) cho Iceland, và một hệ thống phân tích đi kèm. The Ngữ has over 5,600 non terms, 4,600 terms and 19,000 productions in fully exposed form, with Đặc trưng contracts conditions for case, female, number and personal. Hệ thống phân tách gồm một cha xứ, và một cơ chế để chọn những cây cha xứ có nhiều điểm tuyệt nhất từ những khu rừng rải rác. Hệ thống phân tích của chúng tôi có thể phân tích khoảng 90. của tất cả câu trong các báo được công bố trên các trang web tin tức lớn của Iceland. Bài đánh giá sơ bộ cho thấy một mức F của 7072. quá cao. Hệ thống của chúng tôi chứng minh rằng phân tích một ngôn ngữ giàu lịch sử sử sử sử dụng một CFO có thể được thực hiện.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een open source, brede dekking context-vrije grammatica (CFG) voor het IJslands, en een begeleidend parsing systeem. De grammatica heeft meer dan 5.600 non-terminals, 4.600 terminals en 19.000 producties in volledig uitgebreide vorm, met feature agreement beperkingen voor geval, geslacht, aantal en persoon. Het parsing systeem bestaat uit een verbeterde Earley-gebaseerde parser en een mechanisme om de best scorende parse bomen te selecteren uit gedeelde gepakte parse bossen. Ons parsing systeem is in staat om ongeveer 90% van alle zinnen te parsen in artikelen gepubliceerd op de belangrijkste IJslandse nieuwswebsites. Voorlopige evaluatie met evaluatie toont een F-maat van 70,72% op geparste zinnen. Ons systeem toont aan dat het parsen van een morfologisch rijke taal met een breed bereik CFG praktisch kan zijn.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo gramatiku slobodnog konteksta (CFG) za islandski i praćenog sustava za analizu otvorenog izvora, širokog pokrivanja. gramatika ima preko 5.600 neoterminala, 4.600 terminala i 19.000 proizvoda u potpuno proširenoj formi, s ograničenjem dogovora za slučaj, spol, broj i osobu. Analizacijski sustav sastoji se od poboljšanog ranijeg analizatora i mehanizma za izbor najboljih analizacijskih drveća iz zajedničkih pakiranih analizacijskih šuma. Naš analizacijski sustav može analizirati oko 90% svih rečenica u člancima objavljenim na glavnim islandskim novinskim stranicama. Preliminarna procjena s evalbom pokazuje F-mjeru od 70,72% na proučavanim rečenicama. Naš sustav pokazuje da razmatranje morfološki bogatog jezika koristeći široko pokrivanje CFG može biti praktično.', 'bg': 'Представяме граматика без контекст с отворен код и съпътстваща система за анализ. Граматиката има над 5 600 нетерминала, 4 600 терминала и 19 000 продукции в напълно разширена форма, с ограничения за съответствие на характеристиките за случай, пол, брой и човек. Системата за анализиране се състои от подобрен анализ базиран на Ърли и механизъм за избор на най-добри резултати за анализиране на дървета от споделени опаковани гори. Нашата система за анализ е в състояние да анализира около 90% от всички изречения в статии, публикувани на основните исландски новинарски сайтове. Предварителната оценка с оценка показва F-мярка от 70.72% за анализирани изречения. Нашата система демонстрира, че анализирането на морфологично богат език с помощта на широкообхватен ФХГ може да бъде практично.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en open source, bredt dækkende kontekstfri grammatik (CFG) for islandsk, og et ledsagende fortolkningssystem. Grammatikken har over 5.600 nonterminals, 4.600 terminaler og 19.000 produktioner i fuldt udvidet form, med funktionsaftalebegrænsninger for sag, køn, antal og person. Analysesystemet består af en forbedret Earley-baseret fortolker og en mekanisme til at vælge bedst scorede parsetræer fra delte pakkede parseskove. Vores analysesystem er i stand til at analysere omkring 90% af alle sætninger i artikler udgivet på de vigtigste islandske nyhedshjemmesider. Foreløbig evaluering med evalb viser et F-mål på 70,72% på fortolkede sætninger. Vores system viser, at det kan være praktisk at analysere et morfologisk rigt sprog ved hjælp af en bred dækning CFG.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan gramatika bebas konteks (CFG) dari sumber terbuka untuk Icelandic, dan sistem penghuraian yang menyertai. Gramatika memiliki lebih dari 5.600 nonterminal, 4.600 terminal dan 19.000 produksi dalam bentuk penuh ekspansi, dengan batas kesepakatan fitur untuk kasus, jenis, nomor dan orang. Sistem penghuraian terdiri dari penghuraian terbesar berdasarkan Earley dan mekanisme untuk memilih puncak terbaik pohon penghuraian dari hutan penghuraian berkemas berbagi. Our parsing system is able to parse about 90% of all sentences in articles published on the main Icelandic news websites.  Evaluasi awal dengan evalb menunjukkan F-ukuran 70,72% pada kalimat yang diuji. Sistem kita menunjukkan bahwa analisis bahasa yang kaya secara morfologis menggunakan CFG yang meliputi luas dapat menjadi praktis.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren eine Open-Source, kontextfreie Grammatik (CFG) für Isländisch und ein begleitendes Parsing-System. Die Grammatik hat über 5.600 Nonterminals, 4.600 Terminals und 19.000 Produktionen in vollständig erweiterter Form, mit Feature Agreement Einschränkungen für Fall, Geschlecht, Anzahl und Person. Das Parsing-System besteht aus einem verbesserten Earley-basierten Parser und einem Mechanismus zur Auswahl der besten Parse-Bäume aus gemeinsam genutzten gepackten Parse-Wäldern. Unser Parsing-System ist in der Lage, etwa 90% aller Sätze in Artikeln zu analysieren, die auf den wichtigsten isländischen Nachrichtenseiten veröffentlicht wurden. Die vorläufige Auswertung mit evalb zeigt ein F-Maß von 70,72% auf parsed Sätze. Unser System zeigt, dass das Parsen einer morphologisch reichen Sprache mit einem CFG mit breiter Abdeckung praktisch sein kann.', 'ko': '우리는 아이슬란드어에 기원적이고 범위가 넓은 상하문 무관문법 (CFG), 그리고 첨부된 해석 시스템을 제공했다.이 문법은 5600여 개의 비종결부, 4600개의 종결부와 19000개의 완전 확장 형식의 제품으로 대소문자, 성별, 숫자와 인물의 특징 일치성 제약을 가지고 있다.분석 시스템은 향상된 Earley 기반 파서와 공유된 패키징 분석 포리스트에서 최적 채점 분석 트리를 선택하는 메커니즘으로 구성되어 있습니다.우리의 해석 시스템은 아이슬란드 주요 뉴스 사이트에 발표된 글 중 약 90퍼센트의 문장을 해석할 수 있다.evalb을 사용하여 실시한 초보적인 평가에 따르면 해석된 문장에서 F값은 70.72% 였다.우리 시스템은 광범위하게 덮어쓰는 CFG 해석 형태가 풍부한 언어를 사용하는 것이 가능하다는 것을 보여 준다.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutoa programu huru, yenye taarifa mbalimbali za muktadha (CFG) kwa ajili ya Kiisland, na mfumo wa wimbo unaofanana nao. Mpango huu una zaidi ya vituo 5,600, vituo 4,600 na bidhaa 19,000 katika mfumo mzuri, na makubaliano ya tabia kwa ajili ya kesi, jinsia, namba na mtu. Mfumo wa wimbo huo unajumuisha mchambuzi wa msingi wa mapema na mfumo wa kuchagua mti wa mbuga unaotumiwa vizuri kutoka misitu iliyotumiwa. Mfumo wetu wa wimbo huu unaweza kuonyesha takribani asilimia 90 ya hukumu zote katika makala zilizochapishwa kwenye tovuti kuu ya habari za Iceland. Tathmini ya awali kwa upasuaji unaonyesha kiwango cha F cha asilimia 70.72 kwenye hukumu zilizofungwa. Mfumo wetu unaonyesha kuwa kuingiza lugha yenye utajiri wa kifolojia kwa kutumia habari nyingi za CFG inaweza kuwa jambo la kawaida.', 'fa': 'ما یک گرامرات منبع باز و حفاظت فراوان (CFG) را برای اسلاندی و یک سیستم تجزیه\u200cکننده همراه با هم پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. برنامه\u200cریزی بیش از ۵۰۰۰ ناترمینال، ۴۰۰۰ ترمینال و ۱۹۰۰۰ تولید کاملاً گسترده شده است، با محدودیت توافق برای پرونده، جنس، شماره و شخص. سیستم تجزیه\u200cگیری از یک تجزیه\u200cکننده\u200cی بسیار بالا و یک مکانیسم برای انتخاب بهترین تجزیه\u200cگیری درختان از جنگل\u200cهای تجزیه\u200cگیری مشترک است. سیستم تحلیل ما قادر است حدود ۹۰ درصد از جمله\u200cها در مقاله\u200cهایی که در وبسایت\u200cهای خبرهای اصلی ایسلند منتشر شده\u200cاند تحلیل کند. ارزیابی اولیه با evalb نشان می\u200cدهد که اندازه\u200cی F 70.72 درصد در جمله\u200cهای جدا شده است. سیستم ما نشان می دهد که با استفاده از یک CFG پوشش وسیع یک زبان مورفولوژیکی ثروتمند است.', 'tr': "Biz Isländçe üçin açyk-çeşme, geniş-täsirli kontekstsiz gramatika (CFG) we ýerleşýän bir analyz sistemini görkezip berýäris. Grammatikanyň 5,600 üstünde onterminaly, 4,600 terminaly we 19,000 ösümlikleri doly döwletli şeklinde meýilleşdirilýär. Kiçilikler kiçi, cins, sany we kişiler üçin sözleşme mümkinçilikleri bar. Bu analyz sistemi Earley'de gelişmiş bir tansçydyr we paýlanan pars meýdançasyndan iň gowy atlan agaçlary saýlamak üçin mekanizmanyň içine bar. Biziň ayramçylyk sistemimiz Isländçe täzelikler websitede esaslandyrylan hemme sözleriň 90% ýagdaýyny çözebilir. evalb bilen öňki çözümlenmek üçin önüm çözümlenme sözleriň üstünde F-ölçüsi 70.72%-dir. Biziň sistemamyz morfologiki baý dili CFG ullanýan şekilde çykyp biljekdigini görkez.", 'sq': 'We present an open-source, wide-coverage context-free grammar (CFG) for Icelandic, and an accompanying parsing system.  Gramatika ka mbi 5,600 terminale jo-terminale, 4,600 terminale dhe 19,000 prodhime në form ë të zgjeruar plotësisht, me kufizime të marrëveshjes për rastin, gjininë, numrin dhe person in. Sistemi i analizimit përbëhet nga një analizues i përmirësuar me bazë në Earley dhe një mekanizëm për të zgjedhur pemët e analizimit më të mira nga pyjet e përbashkëta të analizimit. Sistemi ynë analizues është në gjendje të analizojë rreth 90% të të gjitha fjalëve në artikujt e botuar në faqet kryesore të lajmeve islandeze. Vlerësimi paraprak me vlerësimin tregon një masë F prej 70.72% në dënimet e analizuara. Sistemi ynë demonstron se analiza e një gjuhe morfologjikisht të pasur duke përdorur një CFG të mbuluar të gjerë mund të jetë praktike.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք իսլանդացի լեզվով բաց կոնտեքստի, լայնածավոր անկոնտեքստի գրաֆիկա (ՔՍԳ) և ուղեկցող վերլուծության համակարգ: Գրագրականությունը ունի ավելի քան 5,600 ոչ տերմինալ, 4,600 տերմինալ և 19,000 արտադրություն ամբողջովին ընդլայնված ձևով, առանձնահատուկ սահմանափակումներով դեպքերի, գենդերային, թվերի և անձի համար: Համարձակման համակարգը կազմված է Էրլին հիմնված վերլուծության մեխանիզմից և մեխանիզմից, որը օգտագործում է ընտրել լավագույն գնահատականները վերլուծության ծառերից: Մեր վերլուծության համակարգը կարողանում է վերլուծել ինսլանդացի հիմնական նորությունների կայքերում հրատարակված բոլոր նախադասությունների մոտ 90 տոկոսը: Preliminary evaluation with evalb shows an F-measure of 70.72% on parsed sentences.  Մեր համակարգը ցույց է տալիս, որ մորֆոլոգիապես հարուստ լեզու վերլուծումը, օգտագործելով լայն ծավալը գոյություն ունեցող խմբագրություն, կարող է պրակտիկ լինել:', 'am': 'We present an open-source, wide-coverage context-free grammar (CFG) for Icelandic, and an accompanying parsing system.  ላማር 5,600 በላይ ተርሚናል፣ 4,600 ተርሚናል እና 19,000 ፍሬዎችን በሙሉ በተዘረጋ ፎርማት አግኝቷል፡፡ የፓርቲው ስርዓት በተካፈለ ፓርስ ዱሮች ውስጥ የተለየ የበለጠ የፓርስ ዛፎችን ለመምረጥ የሚችል ስልጣን ነው፡፡ የፓርቲው ስርዓታችን በቋንቋው የኢስላንድያ ዜና ድረአምቦች ላይ በሚገልጹ ጽሑፎች ውስጥ 90 በመቶ ፍርድ ማጋራት ይችላል፡፡ በመጀመሪያ የኢቤል ውጤት የፍጥረት ፍርድ 70.72 በመቶ ነው፡፡ ስርዓታችን የCFG ደረጃን በመጠቀም የሞሮፎሎጂ ባለጠጋ ቋንቋን መዘርጋት ይችላል፡፡', 'az': 'Biz İslandiya üçün açıq-kaynaklı, geniş-örtülü kontekst-özgür gramatika (CFG) və birlikdə ayrılma sistemini göstəririk. Grammatikanın 5.600-dən fazla terminalı, 4.600 terminalı və 19.000 ürəkləri tamamilə genişləşdirilmiş formda, kişilər, cins, sayı və kişilər üçün mövcuddur. Analizasyon sistemi, Earley-based analizator və paylaşdırılmış parsing ormanlarından ən yaxşı scoring a ğaclarını seçmək üçün ən yaxşı analizasyon sistemindən olub. Bizim ayırma sistemimiz İslandiyalı xəbər sitələrində yayınlanan məsələlərin 90%-ini ayırmağa qadir. evalb ilə ilk təcrübə müəyyən edilən cümlələrdə F-ölçüsi 70,72%-dir. Sistemimiz morfolojik zəngin dilini CFG vasitəsilə ayırmaq praktika olar.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n oop-bron, wyd-dekkeningskonteks-vry grammatiek (CFG) vir Islandse en 'n saamgevoeg verwerking stelsel. Die grammatiek het meer 5,600 onterminale, 4,600 terminale en 19,000 produksies in volledig uitgevoud vorm, met funksie-ooreenkoms beheinings vir geval, geneem, getal en persoon. Die verwerking stelsel best a an van 'n verbeterde Earley-gebaseerde verwerker en 'n mekanisme om die beste-skoring verwerking bome te kies van gedeelde pakte verwerking bose. Ons verwerking stelsel kan omtrent 90% van alle teikens in aktikels wat op die hoofde Icelandic nuuswebwerke gepubliseer is. Vorige evaluasie met evalb vertoon 'n F- maat van 70. 72% op verwerking setinge. Ons stelsel vertoon dat die verwerking van 'n morfologiese ryk taal gebruik van 'n wyde dekking CFG praktiese kan wees.", 'ca': "Presentam una gramàtica lliure de context (CFG) de codi obert per a l'islàndic i un sistema d'analització acompanyant. La gramàtica té més de 5.600 terminals no terminals, 4.600 terminals i 19.000 productions en forma completament expandida, amb restriccions d'acord de característiques per cas, gènere, nombre i persona. El sistema d'analització consisteix en un analitzador millorat basat en Earley i un mecanisme per seleccionar arbres d'analització amb millor puntuació dels boscos compartits. El nostre sistema d'analització pot analitzar aproximadament el 90% de totes les frases en articles publicats a les principals pàgines web de notícies islàndeses. L'evaluació preliminar amb evalb mostra una mesura F del 70,72% en frases analitzades. El nostre sistema demostra que l'analització d'un llenguatge morfològicament ric utilitzant una CFG de gran cobertura pot ser pràctica.", 'bn': 'আমরা ইসলান্ডিকের জন্য একটি উন্মুক্ত সূত্র, বিস্তারিত কন্টেক্সটেক্স-ফ্রি গ্রামার (সিএফজি) এবং একটি সহযোগী পার্গিং সি গ্রামগ্রামের মধ্যে ৫,৬০০ বেশি অটার্মিনাল, ৪,৬০০ টার্মিনাল এবং ১৯,০০০ প্রযুক্তি সম্পূর্ণ বিস্তৃত ফর্মে প্রযুক্তি আছে, যেখা পার্সিং সিস্টেমের মধ্যে একটি উন্নত প্যার্লি ভিত্তিক প্যার্স ব্যবহারকারী এবং শেয়ার করা পার্স বন থেকে সেরা স্কোরিং গাছ নির্বা আমাদের পার্সিং সিস্টেম প্রধান আইস্লান্ডিক সংবাদ ওয়েবসাইটে প্রকাশিত প্রধান প্রবন্ধে প্রায় ৯০% বাক্য পার্স করত Evlb এর প্রাথমিকভাবে মূল্য প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে পার্সিডেন্টের বাক্যে ৭০. ৭২% এর একটি F-মাপ। আমাদের সিস্টেম প্রদর্শন করছে যে সিএফজি ব্যবহার করে একটি বিস্তৃত কাভারেজ ব্যবহার করে একটি মরোফোলজিক সমৃদ্ধ ভাষা পার্সিং', 'cs': 'Představujeme open-source, široce pokrytou kontextovou gramatiku (CFG) pro islandštinu a doprovodný systém analýzy. Grammatika má více než 5.600 nonterminály, 4.600 terminály a 19.000 produkce v plně rozšířené podobě, s omezeními dohody funkcí pro případ, pohlaví, číslo a osobu. Parsovací systém se skládá z vylepšeného parseru založeného na Earley a mechanismu pro výběr parse stromů s nejlepším skórem ze sdílených balených parse lesů. Náš parsing systém je schopen analyzovat zhruba 90% všech vět v článcích publikovaných na hlavních islandských zpravodajských webech. Předběžné hodnocení s hodnocením ukazuje F-míru 70,72% na analyzovaných větách. Náš systém ukazuje, že analýza morfologicky bohatého jazyka pomocí širokého pokrytí CFG může být praktická.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo gramatiku slobodnog konteksta bez otvorenog izvora, širokog pokrivanja (CFG) islandskom i praćenog sustava za analizu. gramatika ima preko 5.600 neoterminala, 4.600 terminala i 19.000 proizvoda u potpuno širenoj formi, sa ograničenjem dogovora o karakterističnim dogovorima za slučaj, spol, broj i osobu. Analizacijski sistem se sastoji od poboljšanog ranijeg analizatora i mehanizma za izbor najboljih analizacija drveta iz zajedničkih pakiranih parsijskih šuma. Naš analizirani sistem može analizirati oko 90% svih rečenica u člancima objavljenim na glavnim islandskim novinskim sajtovima. Preliminarna procjena s evalbom pokazuje F-mjeru od 70,72% na parsiranim rečenicama. Naš sistem pokazuje da razmatranje morfološki bogatog jezika koristeći široko pokrivanje CFG može biti praktično.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme avoimen lähdekoodin, laajan kattavuuden kontekstivapaa kielioppia (CFG) islanniksi ja siihen liittyvän jäsennysjärjestelmän. Kieliopissa on yli 5 600 ei-terminaalia, 4 600 päätelmää ja 19 000 tuotantoa täysin laajennetussa muodossa, ja ominaisuuksien sopivuusrajoitukset koskevat tapausta, sukupuolta, lukumäärää ja henkilöä. Analysointijärjestelmä koostuu parannetusta Earley-pohjaisesta jäsentäjästä ja mekanismista, jolla valitaan parhaat pisteet jaettujen jäsennysmetsien puista. Analysointijärjestelmämme pystyy jäsentämään noin 90% kaikista Islannin tärkeimmillä uutissivustoilla julkaistuista artikkeleista. Alustavan evalb-arvioinnin mukaan F-mitta on 70,72% jäsennetyistä lauseista. Järjestelmämme osoittaa, että morfologisesti rikkaan kielen jäsentäminen laajan CFG:n avulla voi olla käytännöllistä.', 'et': 'Tutvustame avatud lähtekoodiga laiaulatuslikku kontekstivaba grammatikat (CFG) islandi keele jaoks ja sellega kaasnevat parsimissüsteemi. Grammatikas on üle 5600 mitteterminali, 4600 terminali ja 19 000 toodangu täielikult laiendatud kujul, omaduste kokkuleppe piirangutega juhtumi, soo, arvu ja isiku jaoks. Parsimissüsteem koosneb täiustatud Earley-põhisest parserist ja mehhanismist, mis võimaldab valida parimaid tulemusi parsimispuid jagatud parsimismetsadest. Meie parsimissüsteem suudab parsimida umbes 90% kõigist Islandi peamistel uudiste veebisaitidel avaldatud artiklitest. Esialgne hindamine evalb näitab F-mõõdet 70,72% parsitud lausete puhul. Meie süsteem näitab, et morfoloogiliselt rikkaliku keele parsimine laiaulatusliku CFG abil võib olla praktiline.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe Open-source, Wide-Coverage context-free Genjer Kernel Awakdhéwé nglanggar sistem iso nggawe sawetara dhéwé, yakuwis nyang modhak assertion Sistem dhéwé éntuk ngerasah kanggo kelas barang nggawe tarjamahan kelas CFG kang jeral', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo odprtokodno, široko pokrito slovnico brez konteksta (CFG) za islandsko jeziko in spremljajoč sistem razčlenjanja. Slovnica ima več kot 5.600 neterminalov, 4.600 terminalov in 19.000 produkcij v popolnoma razširjeni obliki, z omejitvami glede primera, spola, števila in osebe. Sistem razčlenjevanja je sestavljen iz izboljšanega Earleyjevega razčlenjevalnika in mehanizma za izbiro najboljših rezultatov razčlenjevanja dreves iz skupnih zapakiranih razčlenjevalnih gozdov. Naš sistem razčlenitve lahko razčleni približno 90% vseh stavkov v člankih, objavljenih na glavnih islandskih novicah. Predhodna ocena z evalb kaže, da je F-merilo 70,72% na razčlenjenih stavkih. Naš sistem dokazuje, da je lahko razčlenitev morfološko bogatega jezika s široko pokritostjo CFG praktično.', 'ha': 'Munã ƙayyade wata grammar da aka buɗe wa-salon da aka rufe (CFG) wa Icandaki, da kuma wata matsayin parse. Gammamma yana da kodi 5,600 ɗin taswai, 4,600 da wasu alama 19,000 da aka cikakken cikin shirin faɗaɗawa, da kuma ana ƙudura karãtun ayuka masu husũma, jini, namba da mutane. @ action: button Ubuntu na parse yana iya iya parse taki 90% daga duk matsayi cikin makala da aka faɗa a kan website masu babban shaidar Icaland. Kiddara farko da evalb na nuna an F-metodi na 70,42% a kan sonar da aka parse. GafuyinMu na nuna cewa yin parse da wata harshe na mutfologi mai riki da ya yi amfani da wata rufaffiyar CFG ya zama mai amfani.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་Icelandic(CFG)ལ་ཁུངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཕགས་ཆས་པ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པའི་ཡུལ་རིགས(open-source)ཞིག་གནང་བ་ཡིན་པ། grammar has over 5,600 nonterminals, 4,600 terminals and 19,000 productions in fully expanded form, with feature agreement constraints for case, gender, number and person. དབྱེ་སྟངས ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་གིས་རྩ་བའི་འཁྱཊ་གླིང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་ཚང་མར་90% evalb་ཡི་བརྗོད་ཟིན་བྱས་པའི་སྔོན་ལྟའི་དཔྱད་ཞིག་ནི་ཚིག་རྟགས་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཚད་70.72% ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་དཔེ་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་ལྟར་མངོན་པོ་ཞིག་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ན།', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים גרמטיקה ללא קונטקסט (CFG) של מקור פתוח, מכסה רחב, לאיסלנדית, ומערכת מעבדה מלווה. לראטמינציה יש יותר מ-5,600 טרמינציאלים לא טרמינציאלים, 4,600 טרמינציאלים ו-19,000 יצירות בצורה מורחבת לחלוטין, עם חוסר הסכם תכונות למקרה, מין, מספר ואדם. מערכת המחקר מורכבת מפרסם מבוסס ארלי ומנגנון לבחור עצי המחקר הכי טובים ביערות המחקר משותפות. Our parsing system is able to parse about 90% of all sentences in articles published on the main Icelandic news websites.  הערכה קודמית עם הערכה מראה F-מדידה של 70.72% על משפטים ניתוח. המערכת שלנו מראה כי מעבדת שפה עשירה באופן מורפולוגי בשימוש CFG מכסה רחבה יכול להיות מעשי.'}
{'en': 'Classification Approaches to Identify Informative Tweets', 'es': 'Métodos de clasificación para identificar tuits informativos', 'pt': 'Abordagens de classificação para identificar tweets informativos', 'ar': 'أساليب التصنيف لتحديد التغريدات المفيدة', 'fr': 'Approches de classification pour identifier les tweets informatifs', 'ja': '有益なツイートを識別するための分類アプローチ', 'zh': '识信息性推文之类也', 'hi': 'वर्गीकरण दृष्टिकोण जानकारीपूर्ण Tweets की पहचान करने के लिए', 'ru': 'Классификационные подходы к идентификации информационных твитов', 'ga': 'Cur Chuige Aicmithe chun Tweetanna Faisnéiseacha a Aithint', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Osztályozási megközelítések az információs tweetek azonosítására', 'el': 'Προσεγγίσεις ταξινόμησης για τον προσδιορισμό πληροφοριακών tweets', 'it': 'Approcci di classificazione per identificare i tweet informativi', 'lt': 'Informacinių Tweetų identifikavimo klasifikavimo metodai', 'kk': 'Мәліметтерді таңдау үшін классификациялау қасиеттері', 'mk': 'Приблизи на класификација за идентификување на информативни твитови', 'ms': 'Pendekatan Klasifikasi untuk Mengenalpasti Tweet Maklumat', 'mt': 'Approċċi ta’ Klassifikazzjoni għall-Identifikazzjoni ta’ Tweets Informattivi', 'ml': 'വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d സമീപിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Мэдээллийн Tweets-г тайлбарлахын тулд', 'pl': 'Podejścia klasyfikacyjne do identyfikacji tweetów informacyjnych', 'no': 'Klassifikasjonstilnærmingar for identifisering av informativ tweeter', 'sr': 'Klasifikacioni pristup identifikaciji informativnih tweets', 'ro': 'Abordări de clasificare pentru identificarea tweeturilor informative', 'so': 'Wargelinta waxaad ka heleysaa aqoonsiga macluumaadka Tweetka', 'sv': 'Klassificeringsmetoder för att identifiera informationstweets', 'si': '@ title: group', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phương pháp phân loại để xác định báo động Tweet', 'bg': 'Подходи за класификация за идентифициране на информативни туитове', 'da': 'Klassificeringsmetoder til identificering af informationstweets', 'nl': 'Classificatie benaderingen om informatieve tweets te identificeren', 'hr': 'Pristupi klasifikacije identificiranja informativnih Tweets', 'de': 'Klassifizierungsansätze zur Identifizierung informativer Tweets', 'fa': 'دسترسی تقریبا برای شناسایی Tweets اطلاعاتی', 'ko': '식별 정보 추문의 분류 방법', 'id': 'Pendekatan Klasifikasi untuk Identifikasi Tweet Informatif', 'sw': 'Makala yanapatikana kutambua Twita za Taarifa', 'af': 'Klassifikasie toegang na Identifiseer Informatiewe Tweets', 'tr': 'Maglumat Täzelmeleri Kimliklendirmek üçin Ýarlanjak Mazmunlar', 'sq': 'Përqafimet e klasifikimit për të identifikuar Tweets Informative', 'hy': 'Տեղեկատվական թվիթերի հայտնաբերման համար դասակարգման մոտեցումներ', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'bn': 'তথ্য প্রমাণিত টুইট পরিচিতির জন্য ক্লাসিকেশন প্রাপ্ত', 'az': 'MalĂ¼matlÄ± TĂ¶vetlÉ™ri KimliÅŸdirmÉ™k Ă¼Ă§Ă¼n Klasifikat YaxÄ±nlÄ±qlarÄ±', 'ca': 'Approaches of Classification to Identify Informative Tweets', 'bs': 'Pristupi klasifikacije identificiranja informativnih Tweets', 'cs': 'Klasifikační přístupy k identifikaci informačních tweetů', 'et': 'Klassifitseerimismeetodid informatiivsete tweetide tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'Luokitusmenetelmät informatiivisten twiittien tunnistamiseksi', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Pristopi klasifikacije za prepoznavanje informativnih Tweets', 'he': 'גישות סיווג לזהות טוויטים מידעיים', 'bo': 'ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་དང་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་དབྱེ་སྤྱོད་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Social media platforms have become prime forums for reporting news, with users sharing what they saw, heard or read on social media. News from social media is potentially useful for various stakeholders including aid organizations, news agencies, and individuals. However, social media also contains a vast amount of non-news content. For users to be able to draw on benefits from news reported on social media it is necessary to reliably identify news content and differentiate it from non-news. In this paper, we tackle the challenge of classifying a social post as news or not. To this end, we provide a new manually annotated dataset containing 2,992 tweets from 5 different topical categories. Unlike earlier datasets, it includes postings posted by personal users who do not promote a business or a product and are not affiliated with any organization. We also investigate various baseline systems and evaluate their performance on the newly generated dataset. Our results show that the best classifiers are the SVM and BERT models.', 'ar': 'أصبحت منصات وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي منتديات رئيسية لنقل الأخبار ، حيث يشارك المستخدمون ما رأوه أو سمعوه أو قرأوه على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. من المحتمل أن تكون الأخبار الواردة من وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي مفيدة للعديد من أصحاب المصلحة بما في ذلك منظمات الإغاثة ووكالات الأنباء والأفراد. ومع ذلك ، تحتوي وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي أيضًا على قدر هائل من المحتوى غير الإخباري. لكي يتمكن المستخدمون من الاستفادة من الفوائد من الأخبار التي يتم الإبلاغ عنها على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ، من الضروري تحديد محتوى الأخبار بشكل موثوق وتمييزه عن غير الأخبار. في هذه الورقة ، نتناول التحدي المتمثل في تصنيف المنشور الاجتماعي على أنه أخبار أم لا. ولهذه الغاية ، نقدم مجموعة بيانات جديدة مشروحة يدويًا تحتوي على 2992 تغريدة من 5 فئات موضوعية مختلفة. على عكس مجموعات البيانات السابقة ، فهو يتضمن المنشورات التي نشرها المستخدمون الشخصيون الذين لا يروجون لنشاط تجاري أو منتج ولا ينتمون إلى أي مؤسسة. نتحرى أيضًا عن أنظمة أساسية مختلفة ونقيم أدائها على مجموعة البيانات التي تم إنشاؤها حديثًا. تظهر نتائجنا أن أفضل المصنفات هي طرازي SVM و BERT.', 'fr': "Les plateformes de médias sociaux sont devenues des forums privilégiés pour les reportages, les utilisateurs partageant ce qu'ils ont vu, entendu ou lu sur les réseaux sociaux. Les nouvelles des médias sociaux sont potentiellement utiles pour diverses parties prenantes, y compris les organisations humanitaires, les agences de presse et les particuliers. Cependant, les réseaux sociaux contiennent également une grande quantité de contenu non journalistique. Pour que les utilisateurs puissent tirer parti des avantages des actualités rapportées sur les réseaux sociaux, il est nécessaire d'identifier de manière fiable le contenu des actualités et de le différencier des autres. Dans cet article, nous abordons le défi de classer une publication sociale comme une actualité ou non. À cette fin, nous fournissons un nouveau jeu de données annoté manuellement contenant 2 992 tweets provenant de 5 catégories thématiques différentes. Contrairement aux ensembles de données précédents, il inclut les publications publiées par des utilisateurs personnels qui ne font pas la promotion d'une entreprise ou d'un produit et qui ne sont affiliés à aucune organisation. Nous étudions également divers systèmes de base et évaluons leurs performances sur le jeu de données nouvellement généré. Nos résultats montrent que les meilleurs classificateurs sont les modèles SVM et BERT.", 'pt': 'As plataformas de mídia social tornaram-se os principais fóruns para relatar notícias, com usuários compartilhando o que viram, ouviram ou leram nas mídias sociais. As notícias das mídias sociais são potencialmente úteis para várias partes interessadas, incluindo organizações de ajuda, agências de notícias e indivíduos. No entanto, a mídia social também contém uma grande quantidade de conteúdo não noticioso. Para que os usuários possam aproveitar os benefícios das notícias divulgadas nas mídias sociais, é necessário identificar de forma confiável o conteúdo de notícias e diferenciá-lo de não notícias. Neste artigo, enfrentamos o desafio de classificar um post social como notícia ou não. Para isso, fornecemos um novo conjunto de dados anotado manualmente contendo 2.992 tweets de 5 categorias de tópicos diferentes. Ao contrário dos conjuntos de dados anteriores, ele inclui postagens postadas por usuários pessoais que não promovem uma empresa ou produto e não são afiliados a nenhuma organização. Também investigamos vários sistemas de linha de base e avaliamos seu desempenho no conjunto de dados recém-gerado. Nossos resultados mostram que os melhores classificadores são os modelos SVM e BERT.', 'es': 'Las plataformas de redes sociales se han convertido en los principales foros para reportar noticias, y los usuarios comparten lo que vieron, escucharon o leyeron en las redes sociales. Las noticias de las redes sociales son potencialmente útiles para varias partes interesadas, incluidas las organizaciones de ayuda, las agencias de noticias y los particulares. Sin embargo, las redes sociales también contienen una gran cantidad de contenido que no es de noticias. Para que los usuarios puedan aprovechar los beneficios de las noticias informadas en las redes sociales, es necesario identificar de manera confiable el contenido de las noticias y diferenciarlo de las que no son noticias. En este artículo, abordamos el desafío de clasificar una publicación en redes sociales como noticia o no. Con este fin, proporcionamos un nuevo conjunto de datos anotado manualmente que contiene 2992 tuits de 5 categorías temáticas diferentes. A diferencia de los conjuntos de datos anteriores, incluye publicaciones publicadas por usuarios personales que no promocionan un negocio o un producto y no están afiliados a ninguna organización. También investigamos varios sistemas de referencia y evaluamos su rendimiento en el conjunto de datos recién generado. Nuestros resultados muestran que los mejores clasificadores son los modelos SVM y BERT.', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアプラットフォームは、ユーザーがソーシャルメディアで見たり、聞いたり、読んだりしたことを共有する、ニュースを報告するための主要なフォーラムになっています。 ソーシャルメディアからのニュースは、援助団体、通信社、個人を含むさまざまなステークホルダーにとって役立つ可能性があります。 しかし、ソーシャルメディアにはニュース以外のコンテンツも膨大に含まれています。 ソーシャルメディアで報道されたニュースのメリットを利用できるようにするには、ニュースコンテンツを確実に特定し、ニュース以外との差別化を図る必要がある。 本稿では、ソーシャル投稿をニュースとして分類するかどうかという課題に取り組む。 このために、5つの異なるトピックカテゴリからの2,992件のツイートを含む新しい手動で注釈付けされたデータセットを提供します。 以前のデータセットとは異なり、ビジネスやプロダクトを宣伝せず、どの組織にも所属していない個人ユーザーが投稿した投稿が含まれます。 また、さまざまなベースラインシステムを調査し、新しく生成されたデータセットのパフォーマンスを評価します。 私たちの結果は、最良の分類子がSVMモデルとBERTモデルであることを示しています。', 'ru': 'Социальные медиа-платформы стали основными форумами для передачи новостей, когда пользователи делятся тем, что они видели, слышали или читали в социальных сетях. Новости из социальных сетей потенциально полезны для различных заинтересованных сторон, включая организации по оказанию помощи, новостные агентства и отдельных лиц. Тем не менее, социальные сети также содержат огромное количество не новостного контента. Для того, чтобы пользователи могли извлекать выгоду из новостей, сообщаемых в социальных сетях, необходимо достоверно идентифицировать новостной контент и отличать его от не-новостей. В этой статье мы рассматриваем проблему классификации социальных сообщений в качестве новостей или нет. С этой целью мы предоставляем новый аннотированный вручную набор данных, содержащий 2992 твита из 5 различных тематических категорий. В отличие от предыдущих наборов данных, они включают в себя публикации, размещенные личными пользователями, которые не продвигают бизнес или продукт и не аффилированы с какой-либо организацией. Мы также изучаем различные базовые системы и оцениваем их эффективность на вновь созданном наборе данных. Наши результаты показывают, что лучшими классификаторами являются модели виртуальных машин защиты и BERT.', 'zh': '社交媒体台已为报道新闻大论坛,用户分享于社交媒体,闻读所至。 社交媒体之新闻援,新闻官私利相关者皆有潜用。 然社交媒体亦多非新闻义。 使用户益于社交媒体新闻,有以别新闻非新闻者。 本文中,分社交帖为新闻挑战。 供一新手动注数集,其中包5异题之2,992条推文。 与早期数集不同,其不推广业产,不隶一个人用户帖子。 考诸基线统,评其数集上。 吾之的结果表明,莫若SVMBERT。', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया प्लेटफॉर्म समाचारों की रिपोर्टिंग के लिए प्रमुख मंच बन गए हैं, उपयोगकर्ताओं ने सोशल मीडिया पर जो कुछ भी देखा, सुना या पढ़ा है, उसे साझा किया है। सोशल मीडिया से समाचार सहायता संगठनों, समाचार एजेंसियों और व्यक्तियों सहित विभिन्न हितधारकों के लिए संभावित रूप से उपयोगी है। हालांकि, सोशल मीडिया में गैर-समाचार सामग्री की एक बड़ी मात्रा भी होती है। उपयोगकर्ताओं को सोशल मीडिया पर रिपोर्ट की गई खबरों से लाभ प्राप्त करने में सक्षम होने के लिए समाचार सामग्री की मज़बूती से पहचान करना और इसे गैर-समाचारों से अलग करना आवश्यक है। इस पेपर में, हम एक सामाजिक पोस्ट को समाचार के रूप में वर्गीकृत करने की चुनौती से निपटते हैं या नहीं। इस अंत में, हम एक नया मैन्युअल रूप से एनोटेट डेटासेट प्रदान करते हैं जिसमें 5 अलग-अलग सामयिक श्रेणियों से 2,992 ट्वीट्स होते हैं। पहले के डेटासेट के विपरीत, इसमें व्यक्तिगत उपयोगकर्ताओं द्वारा पोस्ट की गई पोस्टिंग शामिल है जो किसी व्यवसाय या उत्पाद को बढ़ावा नहीं देते हैं और किसी भी संगठन से संबद्ध नहीं हैं। हम विभिन्न बेसलाइन सिस्टम की भी जांच करते हैं और नए उत्पन्न डेटासेट पर उनके प्रदर्शन का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हमारे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि सबसे अच्छा क्लासिफायर एसवीएम और बर्ट मॉडल हैं।', 'ga': 'Is príomhfhóraim iad ardáin na meán sóisialta chun nuacht a thuairisciú, agus roinneann úsáideoirí an méid a chonaic siad, a chuala siad nó a léigh siad ar na meáin shóisialta. D’fhéadfadh nuacht ó na meáin shóisialta a bheith úsáideach do pháirtithe leasmhara éagsúla lena n-áirítear eagraíochtaí cúnaimh, gníomhaireachtaí nuachta, agus daoine aonair. Mar sin féin, tá méid mór ábhar nach nuacht é ar na meáin shóisialta. Le go mbeidh úsáideoirí in ann leas a bhaint as na tairbhí a bhaineann le nuacht a thuairiscítear ar na meáin shóisialta, is gá ábhar nuachta a shainaithint go hiontaofa agus é a dhifreáil ó neamhnuacht. Sa pháipéar seo, téimid i ngleic leis an dúshlán a bhaineann le post sóisialta a rangú mar nuacht nó nach ea. Chuige sin, cuirimid tacar sonraí nua anótáilte ar fáil de láimh ina bhfuil 2,992 tvuít ó 5 chatagóir tráthúla éagsúla. Murab ionann agus tacair shonraí níos luaithe, cuimsíonn sé postálacha arna bpostáil ag úsáideoirí pearsanta nach gcuireann gnó nó táirge chun cinn agus nach bhfuil cleamhnaithe le haon eagraíocht. Déanaimid imscrúdú freisin ar chórais bunlíne éagsúla agus luachálaimid a bhfeidhmíocht ar an tacar sonraí nuaghinte. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí gurb iad na samhlacha SVM agus BERT na haicmitheoirí is fearr.', 'el': 'Οι πλατφόρμες κοινωνικών μέσων έχουν γίνει τα κύρια φόρουμ για την αναφορά ειδήσεων, με τους χρήστες να μοιράζονται αυτά που είδαν, άκουσαν ή διάβασαν στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Τα νέα από τα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης είναι δυνητικά χρήσιμα για διάφορους ενδιαφερόμενους, συμπεριλαμβανομένων οργανισμών βοήθειας, πρακτορείων ειδήσεων και ατόμων. Ωστόσο, τα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης περιέχουν επίσης ένα τεράστιο ποσό μη ειδησεογραφικού περιεχομένου. Για να μπορούν οι χρήστες να επωφεληθούν από τα οφέλη των ειδήσεων που αναφέρονται στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης, είναι απαραίτητο να εντοπιστούν αξιόπιστα το περιεχόμενο ειδήσεων και να διαφοροποιηθεί από το περιεχόμενο μη ειδήσεων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αντιμετωπίζουμε την πρόκληση της ταξινόμησης μιας κοινωνικής ανάρτησης ως είδηση ή όχι. Για το σκοπό αυτό, παρέχουμε ένα νέο χειροκίνητα σχολιασμένο σύνολο δεδομένων που περιέχει 2,992 tweets από πέντε διαφορετικές τοπικές κατηγορίες. Σε αντίθεση με προηγούμενα σύνολα δεδομένων, περιλαμβάνει δημοσιεύσεις που δημοσιεύονται από προσωπικούς χρήστες που δεν προωθούν μια επιχείρηση ή ένα προϊόν και δεν συνδέονται με κανέναν οργανισμό. Ερευνούμε επίσης διάφορα συστήματα βάσης και αξιολογούμε την απόδοσή τους στο νέο σύνολο δεδομένων. Τα αποτελέσματα μας δείχνουν ότι οι καλύτεροι ταξινομητές είναι τα μοντέλα SVM και BERT.', 'hu': 'A közösségi média platformok elsődleges fórumokká váltak a hírek bejelentéséhez, ahol a felhasználók megosztják, amit láttak, hallottak vagy olvastak a közösségi médián. A közösségi médiából származó hírek potenciálisan hasznosak a különböző érdekelt felek számára, beleértve a segélyszervezeteket, a hírügynökségeket és az egyéneket. A közösségi média azonban hatalmas mennyiségű nem híradó tartalmat is tartalmaz. Ahhoz, hogy a felhasználók élvezhessék a közösségi médiában bejelentett hírek előnyeit, megbízhatóan azonosítani kell a hírtartalmat és meg kell különböztetni a nem hírektől. Ebben a tanulmányban azzal a kihívással foglalkozunk, hogy egy közösségi bejegyzést hírként vagy sem soroljuk be. Ennek érdekében egy új, manuálisan jegyzetelt adatkészletet kínálunk, amely 2 992 tweetet tartalmaz 5 különböző aktuális kategóriából. A korábbi adatkészletekkel ellentétben ez magában foglalja a személyes felhasználók által közzétett közzétételeket, akik nem reklámoznak vállalkozást vagy terméket, és nem kapcsolódnak semmilyen szervezethez. Vizsgáljuk továbbá a különböző alapvető rendszereket, és értékeljük teljesítményüket az újonnan létrehozott adatkészleten. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a legjobb osztályozók az SVM és BERT modellek.', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედია პლარფორმები გახდა პირველ ფორმები, რომელიც აღწერების შესახებ, მომხმარებელი სოციალური მედიაში იყო, რომელიც ხედავთ, სურდა ან სოციალური მედიაზე ახალი პოციალურად გამოიყენებელია განსხვავებული სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვ მაგრამ სოციალური მედიაში ასევე უფრო დიდი ზომა არაფერი ინფორმაცია. მომხმარებელი შეუძლებელია გავაკეთოთ საზოგადომი მედიაში შესაძლებელია, რომ საზოგადომი მედიაში შეუძლებელია გავაკეთოთ ინფორმაციის შემდგომარებით და განსხვავებას ამ დომენტში ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ სოციალური პოსტის კლასიფიკაციის გამოსახულება როგორც ახალი. ამ დასავლეთში, ჩვენ ახალი ხელსახურად მონიშნული მონაცემების კოტეგორია, რომელიც ხუთი განსხვავებული ტექტომების კოტეგორიადან 2 992 tweets. პირველი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის განსხვავებაში, ის კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც პირველური მომხმარებელი არ მომხმარებს სამუშაო ან პროდისტის განსხვავებას ჩვენ ასევე განსხვავებული ბაზლინური სისტემების შესახებ და ახალი დავიწყებული მონაცემების შესახებ განსხვავებული მონაცემების შესახებ გავაკეთებ ნაქთრვ პვჱსლრართ ოჲკაჱგარ, ფვ ნაი-ეჲბპთრვ კლაჟთტთპაუთ ჟა SVM თ BERT მჲევლთ.', 'it': "Le piattaforme di social media sono diventate forum privilegiati per segnalare notizie, con gli utenti che condividono ciò che hanno visto, sentito o letto sui social media. Le notizie dai social media sono potenzialmente utili per vari stakeholder, tra cui organizzazioni umanitarie, agenzie di stampa e individui. Tuttavia, i social media contengono anche una grande quantità di contenuti non di notizie. Affinché gli utenti possano trarre vantaggio dalle notizie riportate sui social media è necessario identificare in modo affidabile i contenuti delle notizie e differenziarli dai non-news. In questo articolo affrontiamo la sfida di classificare un post social come notizie o meno. A tal fine, forniamo un nuovo dataset annotato manualmente contenente 2.992 tweet provenienti da 5 diverse categorie di attualità. A differenza di set di dati precedenti, include post pubblicati da utenti personali che non promuovono un'attività o un prodotto e non sono affiliati a nessuna organizzazione. Esaminiamo anche vari sistemi di base e valutiamo le loro prestazioni sul set di dati appena generato. I nostri risultati dimostrano che i migliori classificatori sono i modelli SVM e BERT.", 'kk': 'Социалдық медиа платформалары жаңалықтарды хабарлау үшін премьер форум болып, олардың көрген, оқылған, оқылған пайдаланушылары социалдық медиақта ортақтастырып, орта Солтүстік медиақтардың жаңалықтары көмек бағдарламалары, жаңалық агенциялары және адамдар үшін әртүрлі қатысушылар үшін пайдалы болуы мүмкін. Сонымен қатар, социалдық медиақтар жаңалық емес мазмұның көп саны бар. Пайдаланушылардың социалдық медиақтағы жаңалықтардан ашықтарын таңдау үшін, жаңалықтардың мазмұнын сенімді анықтау және оны жаңалықтардан айыру керек. Бұл қағазда, жаңалықтар ретінде әлеуметтік поштасын жаңалықтар ретінде сақтау үшін әсер етіп тұрмыз. Бұл соңында, 5 түрлі нақышты санаттардан 2 992 tweet бар деректер жиынын қолмен жазып береміз. Бірінші деректер қорларына қарамастан, бұл жеке пайдаланушылардың жіберілген жіберілген жіберілген жіберілген жіберілген жіберілген жіберілген жіберілген және құрылғымен қа Мұндай-ақ біз түрлі негізгі жүйелерді зерттеп, жаңа құрылған деректер жинағындағы әрекеттерін бағалаймыз. Біздің нәтижелеріміз ең жақсы классификациялық SVM және BERT үлгілері дегенді көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Socialinės žiniasklaidos platformos tapo pagrindiniais pranešimo apie naujienas forumais, o vartotojai dalijasi tuo, ką jie matė, girdėjo ar skaitė socialinėje žiniasklaidoje. Socialinės žiniasklaidos žinios gali būti naudingos įvairioms suinteresuotosioms šalims, įskaitant pagalbos organizacijas, naujienų agentūras ir asmenis. Tačiau socialinėje žiniasklaidoje taip pat yra daug ne naujienų turinio. Kad naudotojai galėtų pasinaudoti socialinėje žiniasklaidoje pateiktų naujienų teikiama nauda, būtina patikimai nustatyti naujienų turinį ir jį atskirti nuo ne naujienų turinio. Šiame dokumente sprendžiame uždavinį klasifikuoti socialinį post ą kaip naujieną ar ne. Šiuo tikslu mes pateikiame naują rankiniu būdu anotuotą duomenų rinkinį, kuriame yra 2 992 tweetai iš 5 skirtingų vietinių kategorijų. Priešingai nei anksčiau, jame pateikiami asmeninių naudotojų, kurie neskatina verslo ar produkto ir nėra susijusi su jokia organizacija, komandiruojami duomenys. Taip pat tiriame įvairias bazines sistemas ir vertiname jų rezultatus naujai sukurtame duomenų rinkinyje. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad geriausi klasifikuotojai yra SVM ir BERT modeliai.', 'ms': 'Platform media sosial telah menjadi forum utama untuk melaporkan berita, dengan pengguna berkongsi apa yang mereka lihat, mendengar atau membaca di media sosial. Berita dari media sosial mungkin berguna untuk berbagai-bagai pihak berminat termasuk organisasi bantuan, agensi berita, dan individu. Namun, media sosial juga mengandungi banyak kandungan bukan berita. Untuk pengguna dapat menggunakan keuntungan dari berita yang dilaporkan pada media sosial, perlu mengenalpasti kandungan berita dengan yakin dan membezakannya dari bukan berita. Dalam kertas ini, kita menghadapi cabaran untuk mengklasifikasi pos sosial sebagai berita atau tidak. Untuk tujuan ini, kami menyediakan set data baru yang dicatat secara manual yang mengandungi 2,992 tweet dari 5 kategori topik yang berbeza. Tidak seperti set data sebelumnya, ia termasuk posting yang dipostikan oleh pengguna peribadi yang tidak mempromosikan perniagaan atau produk dan tidak terkait dengan mana-mana organisasi. Kami juga menyelidiki berbagai sistem asas dan menilai prestasi mereka pada set data yang baru dicipta. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahawa pengklasifikasi terbaik adalah model SVM dan BERT.', 'mk': 'Платформите на социјалните медиуми станаа главни форуми за известување на вестите, со корисниците кои го споделуваат она што го видоа, слушнале или читале на социјалните медиуми. Вестите од социјалните медиуми се потенцијално корисни за различни интересни страни, вклучително и за организациите за помош, новинските агенции и поединците. Сепак, социјалните медиуми, исто така, содржат голема количина невести. За корисниците да можат да искористат бенефиции од вестите објавени на социјалните медиуми, е неопходно доверливо да се идентификува содржината на вестите и да се разликува од невестите. Во овој весник се справуваме со предизвикот да класификуваме социјален пост како вести или не. За ова, обезбедуваме нов рачно анотиран податок кој содржи 2.992 твитови од 5 различни темелни категории. За разлика од претходните податоци, истиот вклучува објавувања поставени од лични корисници кои не промовираат бизнис или производ и не се поврзани со никаква организација. Исто така, ги истражуваме различните основни системи и ги проценуваме нивните резултати на новиот генериран податок. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека најдобрите класификатори се СВМ и БЕРТ моделите.', 'mt': 'Il-pjattaformi tal-midja soċjali saru forums ewlenin għar-rappurtar tal-aħbarijiet, bl-utenti jaqsmu dak li raw, jinstemgħu jew jaqraw fuq il-midja soċjali. L-aħbarijiet mill-midja soċjali huma potenzjalment utli għal diversi partijiet interessati inklużi organizzazzjonijiet tal-għajnuna, aġenziji tal-aħbarijiet, u individwi. Madankollu, il-midja soċjali fiha wkoll ammont kbir ta’ kontenut mhux ta’ a ħbarijiet. Sabiex l-utenti jkunu jistgħu jisfruttaw il-benefiċċji mill-aħbarijiet irrappurtati fuq il-midja soċjali huwa meħtieġ li jiġi identifikat b’mod affidabbli l-kontenut tal-aħbarijiet u li jiġi differenzjat minn dak mhux aħbarijiet. F’dan id-dokument, nindirizzaw l-isfida li nikklassifikaw post soċjali bħala a ħbarijiet jew le. Għal dan il-għan, nipprovdu sett ta’ dejta ġdid annotat manwalment li fih 2 992 tweet minn 5 kategoriji topiċi differenti. Unlike earlier datasets, it includes postings posted by personal users who do not promote a business or a product and are not affiliated with any organization.  Investigaw ukoll diversi sistemi bażiċi u jivvalutaw il-prestazzjoni tagħhom fuq is-sett tad-dejta li għadu kif ġie ġġenerat. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li l-aħjar klassifikaturi huma l-mudelli SVM u BERT.', 'ml': 'Social media platforms have become prime forums for reporting news, with users sharing what they saw, heard or read on social media.  സാമൂഹിക മാധ്യമങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d സഹായ സംഘടനകള്\u200d, സംവാര്\u200dത്തക സംഘങ്ങള്\u200d, വ്യക്തിക്കാര്\u200dക്കും പ് എന്നാലും സാമൂഹ്യ മാധ്യമങ്ങളില്\u200d വിശാലമായി വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d ഇല്ലാത്ത വിഭവങ്ങളുണ്ട്. സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയില്\u200d നിന്നും വാര്\u200dത്തകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഒരു സാമൂഹിക പോസ്റ്റ് വാര്\u200dത്തയായി വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നോക്കിക് ഈ അവസാനത്തേക്ക് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൈകാര്യമായി വിവരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്ന ഡാറ്റാസറ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും 2,992 ടൂട മുമ്പുള്ള ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d പോസ്റ്റേഷന്\u200dറെ പോസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ബിസിനസ്സോ പ്രോജട നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം അന്വേഷിക്കുകയും പുതിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയതില്\u200d അവരുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ് നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d SVM, BERT മോഡലുകള്\u200d.', 'pl': 'Platformy mediów społecznościowych stały się głównymi forami do raportowania wiadomości, a użytkownicy dzielą się tym, co widzieli, słyszeli lub czytali w mediach społecznościowych. Wiadomości z mediów społecznościowych są potencjalnie przydatne dla różnych interesariuszy, w tym organizacji pomocowych, agencji informacyjnych i osób fizycznych. Jednak media społecznościowe zawierają również ogromną ilość treści niewiadomościowych. Aby użytkownicy mogli czerpać korzyści z wiadomości raportowanych w mediach społecznościowych, konieczne jest rzetelne zidentyfikowanie treści wiadomościowych i odróżnienie ich od innych. W niniejszym artykule podejmujemy wyzwanie klasyfikacji postu społecznościowego jako wiadomości czy nie. W tym celu udostępniamy nowy ręcznie annotowany zestaw danych zawierający 2,992 tweety z pięciu różnych kategorii tematycznych. W przeciwieństwie do wcześniejszych zbiorów danych, obejmuje on posty publikowane przez użytkowników osobistych, którzy nie promują firmy lub produktu i nie są powiązani z żadną organizacją. Badamy również różne systemy bazowe i oceniamy ich wydajność na nowo generowanym zbiorze danych. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że najlepszymi klasyfikatorami są modele SVM i BERT.', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн хэвлэлийн платформ нь мэдээг сонсох, харж, сонсох, унших хэрэглэгчид нийгмийн хэвлэлийн тухай анхны форум болсон. Нийгмийн хэвлэлийн мэдээллүүд нь тусламжтай байгууллагууд, мэдээллийн агентлагууд болон хүн төрөлхтнүүд тусламжтай байдаг. Гэвч нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэгслүүд мөн маш олон мэдээлэл биш байдаг. Хэрэглэгчид нийгмийн мэдээлэлд мэдээллээс ашиг авч чадна гэсэн үг мэдээллийн тодорхойлолтуудыг итгэлтэй мэдээлэл олж мэдээлэл биш мэдээлээс өөрчлөх хэрэгтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид нийгмийн тайлбарыг мэдээлэл гэж хэлэх эсэхийг зориулдаг. Энэ төгсгөлд бид 5 төрлийн сэдвийн хэлбэрээс 2 992 tweets агуулдаг шинэ өгөгдлийн санг гаргаж өгдөг. Өмнөх өгөгдлийн сангийн ялгаа нь хувийн хэрэглэгчид бизнес эсвэл бүтээгдэхүүнийг дэмжиж, ямар ч байгууллага холбоотой биш байдаг захидал бичдэг. Мөн бид олон суурь шугам системийг судалж, шинэ үүсгэсэн өгөгдлийн сангийн үйл ажиллагааг үнэлэх болно. Бидний үр дүнд хамгийн сайн ангилалтууд нь SVM болон BERT загварууд юм.', 'ro': 'Platformele de social media au devenit forumuri principale pentru raportarea știrilor, utilizatorii împărtășind ceea ce au văzut, auzit sau citit pe social media. Știrile de pe rețelele sociale sunt potențial utile pentru diferite părți interesate, inclusiv organizațiile de ajutor, agențiile de știri și persoanele fizice. Cu toate acestea, rețelele sociale conțin, de asemenea, o cantitate mare de conținut non-știri. Pentru ca utilizatorii să poată profita de beneficiile știrilor raportate pe rețelele de socializare, este necesar să identifice în mod fiabil conținutul știrilor și să-l diferențieze de cele non-știri. În această lucrare, abordăm provocarea de a clasifica un post social ca știri sau nu. În acest scop, vă oferim un nou set de date adnotat manual care conține 2.992 tweet-uri din 5 categorii de actualitate diferite. Spre deosebire de seturile de date anterioare, include postări postate de utilizatori personali care nu promovează o afacere sau un produs și nu sunt afiliați cu nicio organizație. De asemenea, investigăm diferite sisteme de bază și evaluăm performanța acestora pe setul de date nou generat. Rezultatele noastre arată că cele mai bune clasificatoare sunt modelele SVM și BERT.', 'no': 'Sosiale mediaplattformar har blitt primærforum for rapportering av nyhetar, med brukarar som deler hva dei så, hørte eller lesar på sosiale media. Nyhetar frå sosiale media er potensielt nyttig for ulike stakeholder, inkludert hjelpeorganisasjonar, nyhetsgjenester og individuer. Men sosiale media inneheld også stor stor innhald som ikkje er nytt. For at brukarar kan teikna på nyhetar som er rapportert på sosiale medier, er det nødvendig å sikkert identifisera nyhetsinhald og forskjeller det frå ikkje-nyhetar. I denne papiret løyser vi utfordringen til å klassera ein sosiale post som nyhetar eller ikkje. I denne slutten oppgjev vi ei ny datasett som inneheld 2 992 tweets frå 5 ulike temakategoriar. I motsetjing til tidlegare datasett inneheld meldingar som vert sendt av personlege brukarar som ikkje promoterer eit bedrift eller eit produkt og ikkje er tilknytta nokon organisasjon. Vi undersøker også ulike baselinjesystemer og evaluerer utviklinga på den nye genererte datasettet. Resultatet våre viser at dei beste klassifiseringane er SVM og BERT-modellen.', 'so': 'Jardiinooyinka bulshada waxay noqdeen jardiinado ugu horeeya wargelinta wargelinta wargelinta, isticmaalayaashuna ay sharaxeeyaan wixii ay arkeen, maqaleen ama akhriyeen shabakadda bulshada. Wararka shabakadda bulshada ah waxey si suurtagal ah u faa’iido badan yihiin, kuwaas oo ah ururo caawimaad ah, hay’adaha warbixinta iyo qof gaar ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee shabakadda bulshada waxaa sidoo kale ku jira wax badan oo aan warbixinayn. Waxaad u baahan tahay in loo caddeeyo waxyaabaha warbixinta ee macluumaadka bulshada si aamin ah looga caddeeyo macluumaadka warbixinta oo looga kala bedeli karo warbixinta. Warqadan waxaynu ka tacliinaynaa dhibaatada ku qoran boostada bulshada sida warar ama aan ahayn. Taas darteed waxaynu soo bandhignaa sawir cusub oo rasmi ah oo ku qoran 2,992 tweets oo ka mid ah 5 kooxo kala duduwan. Unlike earlier datasets, it includes postings posted by personal users who do not promote a business or a product and are not affiliated with any organization.  Sidoo kale waxaynu baaraynaa nidaamka hoose-dhigka kala duduwan, waxaynu qiimeynaynaa falimahooda sameynta taariikhda cusub ee cusub. Abaalkayaga waxay muuqataa in fasaladaha ugu fiican ee SVM iyo BERT models.', 'sr': 'Socijalne medijske platforme postale su glavni forumi za prijavu vijesti, sa korisnicima koji dijele ono što su videli, čuli ili čitali u društvenim medijima. Novosti iz društvenih medija su potencijalno korisne za različite dionice, uključujući organizacije pomoći, novinske agencije i pojedince. Međutim, društveni mediji takođe sadrže ogromnu količinu nesvestnih sadržaja. Da bi korisnici mogli da dobiju koristi od vijesti prijavljenih na društvenim medijima, potrebno je da pouzdano identifikuju sadržaj vijesti i da je razlikuju od nedavnih vijesti. U ovom papiru, riješimo izazov klasifikacije socijalnog post a kao vesti ili ne. Za ovaj cilj, pružamo novu manualnu notiranu seriju podataka koja sadrži 2 992 tweets iz 5 različitih temalnih kategorija. Za razliku od ranijih setova podataka, uključuje postignuće koje lični korisnici ne promoviraju biznis ili proizvod i ne povezuju se sa bilo kojom organizacijom. Istražujemo i različite osnovne sisteme i procjenjujemo njihovu provedbu na novom generisanom setu podataka. Naši rezultati pokazuju da su najbolji klasifikatori SVM i BERT modeli.', 'sv': 'Sociala medieplattformar har blivit främsta forum för rapportering av nyheter, där användare delar vad de såg, hörde eller läste på sociala medier. Nyheter från sociala medier är potentiellt användbara för olika intressenter, inklusive hjälporganisationer, nyhetsbyråer och individer. Men sociala medier innehåller också en stor mängd icke-nyhetsinnehåll. För att användarna ska kunna dra nytta av nyheter som rapporteras på sociala medier är det nödvändigt att tillförlitligt identifiera nyhetsinnehåll och skilja det från icke-nyheter. I denna uppsats tar vi oss an utmaningen att klassificera ett socialt inlägg som nyheter eller inte. För detta ändamål tillhandahåller vi ett nytt manuellt kommenterat dataset som innehåller 2 992 tweets från 5 olika aktuella kategorier. Till skillnad från tidigare datauppsättningar inkluderar det inlägg som publiceras av personliga användare som inte marknadsför ett företag eller en produkt och inte är anslutna till någon organisation. Vi undersöker även olika baslinjesystem och utvärderar deras prestanda på den nygenererade datauppsättningen. Våra resultat visar att de bästa klassificerarna är SVM- och BERT-modellerna.', 'si': 'සාමාජික මධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධා සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමයෙන් ආරංචිතය ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විවිදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන විදිහට ස ඒත් සාමාජික මිඩියාවත් ගොඩක් අවස්ථාවක් තියෙනවා. ප්\u200dරයෝජකයන්ට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් සමාජික මිඩියාවට ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200d මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා සමාජික පොස්ට් එකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා නැත්නම් නැත්නම්. මේ අවසානයෙන්, අපි අලුත් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පහත් වලින් 2,992 ට්විට් තියෙන අලුත් දත්ත සෙට් එකක් දෙනවා. මුලින් දත්ත සැට් වගේම, ඒක පුද්ගලික ප්\u200dරයෝජනකයෙන් පිළිබඳ ප්\u200dරයෝජනකයෙන් පිළිබඳු ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් නැති ව අපි විවිධ ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම එයාලගේ ප්\u200dරධානය අළුත් නිර්මාණය කරපු දත් අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ හොඳම විශේෂකයෝ SVM සහ BERT මොඩේල් කියලා.', 'ur': 'سوسیل میڈیا پٹرومٹ اخبار راپورٹ کرنے کے لئے پہلی فورمز بن گئے ہیں، کارساز جو دیکھتے ہیں، سنتے یا پڑھتے ہیں سوسیل میڈیا میں شریک کرتے ہیں۔ سوسیل میڈیا سے خبریں مختلف علاقمند لوگوں کے لئے مفید ہیں جن میں مدد سازمانوں، نیویس اگنجینٹوں اور شخصوں کے شامل ہیں. لیکن سوسیل میڈیا بھی بہت سی نویس کے منصوبات میں ہیں۔ سوسیل میڈیا میں گزارے ہوئے اخبار سے فائدے اٹھانے کے لئے کارساز کو قادر ہونا چاہیے کہ اخبار منصوبات کو یقین سے پہچان سکیں اور اسے غیر اخبار سے فرق کریں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نے اخبار کے طور پر سوسیال پوسٹ کا فرض کیا ہے یا نہ کیا ہے۔ یہاں تک، ہم نے ایک نئی دستی کے ذریعہ مضبوط ڈاٹ سٹ کو پانچ مختلف ٹوپیٹ کے ٹوپیٹ میں 2,992 ٹوئیٹ پیدا کیا ہے۔ اس سے پہلے ڈاٹ سٹ کے مطابق، اس میں شخصی کارساز کے ذریعے پیغام لگائے گئے ہیں جو تجارت یا محصولات کو پیغام نہیں دیتے اور کسی سازمان کے ساتھ کوئی تعلق نہیں رکھتے۔ ہم نے بھی مختلف بنیس لین سیستموں کی تحقیق کرتی ہیں اور ان کی عملکرد نیا پیدا ہوئی ڈاٹ سٹ پر ارزش کرتی ہے ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ سب سے بہترین کلاسیفوں SVM اور BERT موڈل ہیں.', 'ta': 'சமூக ஊடகங்கள் அறிவிப்பதற்கான முக்கிய தளங்களாகி விட்டனர், அவர்கள் பார்த்து, கேட்டு அல்லது படித்ததை பயனீட்டாளர்கள் பகிர்ந்து  சமூக ஊடகங்களிலிருந்து செய்திகள் உதவி நிறுவனங்கள், செய்தி நிறுவனங்கள் மற்றும் தனிப்பட்ட தனிப்பெண்களுக்கு பயனுள ஆயினும், சமூக ஊடகங்களுக்கு செய்தி இல்லாத உள்ளடக்கங்கள் உள்ளது. செய்திகளில் அறிக்கப்பட்ட செய்திகளிலிருந்து பயன்பாடுகளை வரைய முடியும் பயனர்களுக்கு நம்பிக்கையாக செய்தி உள்ளடக்கத்தை  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் செய்தி அல்லது ஒரு சமூக புதியை வகுப்பதின் சவால்கத்தை எதிர்பார்க்கிறோம். இந்த முடிவிற்கு, நாம் ஒரு புதிய கைமுறையாக வெளிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட தகவல் அமைப்பை வழங்குகிறோம். இதில் இருந்து 2,992 டி முந்தைய தகவல் அமைப்பு புதிய உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தரவுத்தளத்தில் அவர்களுடைய செயல்பாட்டை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். எங்கள் முடிவுகள் சிறந்த வகுப்பாளர்கள் SVM மற்றும் BERT மாதிரிகள் என்று காட்டுகிறது.', 'uz': "Name Name Lekin, jamiyat mediyatlarida ko'p ma'lumot tarkibi mavjud. Name In this paper, we tackle the challenge of classifying a social post as news or not.  Bu hozirda biz 5 boshqa maʼlumot turlaridan 2,992 tweeti bilan yangi qoʻlbola yordam beramiz. Аввалги маълумотлар тарқатишда, бу шахс фойдаланувчилар томонидан қўйилган почталар мавжуд, улар тижорат ёки ҳосил ташкилига қўшилмайдиганлар ва ҳеч бир ташкилга қўшилмайдиганлар. Biz boshqa asboblar tizimini aniqlamiz va yangi yaratilgan maʼlumotlar sohasida ularning amalni qiymatimiz. Bizning natijalarimizning eng yaxshi darajalar SVM va BERT modellaridir.", 'vi': 'Mạng xã hội đã trở thành diễn đàn chính để báo tin, với những người dùng chia sẻ những gì họ thấy, nghe hay đọc trên mạng xã hội. Tin tức từ các phương tiện truyền thông xã hội có thể hữu ích cho nhiều cá nhân, bao gồm các tổ chức hỗ trợ, các hãng tin và cá nhân. Tuy nhiên, các phương tiện xã hội cũng chứa rất nhiều nội dung không tin tức. Để người dùng có thể dựa vào lợi ích từ những tin tức được báo lên truyền thông xã hội, cần phải xác định chắc chắn nội dung tin tức và phân biệt nó với tin tức không. Trong bài báo này, chúng ta phải giải quyết thử thách cho một bài báo xã hội hay không. Chúng tôi cung cấp một tập tin mới được ghi vào bằng tay có 2,999992 từ năm loại hiện thời khác nhau. Không giống các dữ liệu trước, nó bao gồm các bưu phẩm được gửi bởi những người dùng cá nhân không hỗ trợ kinh doanh hay sản phẩm và không liên kết với bất kỳ tổ chức nào. Chúng tôi cũng nghiên cứu các hệ thống cơ bản khác nhau và đánh giá khả năng của chúng. Kết quả cho thấy các phân loại tốt nhất là mẫu SVM và BERT.', 'da': 'Sociale medieplatforme er blevet førende fora til rapportering af nyheder, hvor brugere deler, hvad de så, hørte eller læste på sociale medier. Nyheder fra sociale medier er potentielt nyttige for forskellige interessenter, herunder hjælpeorganisationer, nyhedsbureauer og enkeltpersoner. Men sociale medier indeholder også en stor mængde ikke-nyhedsindhold. For at brugerne kan drage fordel af nyheder rapporteret på sociale medier, er det nødvendigt at identificere nyhedsindhold pålideligt og adskille det fra ikke-nyheder. I denne artikel tager vi fat på udfordringen med at klassificere et socialt indlæg som nyheder eller ej. Til dette formål leverer vi et nyt manuelt annoteret datasæt, der indeholder 2.992 tweets fra 5 forskellige aktuelle kategorier. I modsætning til tidligere datasæt omfatter det indlæg, der offentliggøres af personlige brugere, der ikke promoverer en virksomhed eller et produkt og ikke er tilknyttet nogen organisation. Vi undersøger også forskellige basissystemer og evaluerer deres ydeevne på det nyligt genererede datasæt. Vores resultater viser, at de bedste klassificeringer er SVM- og BERT-modellerne.', 'nl': 'Social media platforms zijn uitgegroeid tot topforums voor het rapporteren van nieuws, waarbij gebruikers delen wat ze zagen, gehoord of gelezen hebben op sociale media. Nieuws van sociale media is potentieel nuttig voor verschillende stakeholders, waaronder hulporganisaties, nieuwsagenten en individuen. Social media bevat echter ook een enorme hoeveelheid non-news content. Om gebruikers te kunnen profiteren van nieuws dat op sociale media wordt gerapporteerd, is het noodzakelijk om nieuwsinhoud betrouwbaar te identificeren en te onderscheiden van niet-nieuws. In dit artikel pakken we de uitdaging aan om een social post al dan niet als nieuws te classificeren. Hiervoor bieden we een nieuwe handmatig geannoteerde dataset met 2.992 tweets uit vijf verschillende actuele categorieën. In tegenstelling tot eerdere datasets omvat het postings geplaatst door persoonlijke gebruikers die geen bedrijf of product promoten en niet verbonden zijn met een organisatie. We onderzoeken ook verschillende baseline systemen en evalueren hun prestaties op de nieuw gegenereerde dataset. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat de beste classificatoren de SVM- en BERT-modellen zijn.', 'hr': 'Platforme društvenih medija postale su glavni forumi za izvještaj vijesti, s korisnicima koji dijele ono što su vidjeli, čuli ili čitali u društvenim medijima. Novosti iz društvenih medija su potencijalno korisne za različite dionice uključujući organizacije pomoći, novinske agencije i pojedince. Međutim, društveni mediji također sadrže ogromnu količinu nesvestnih sadržaja. Da bi korisnici mogli dobiti koristi od vijesti prijavljenih na društvenim medijima, potrebno je pouzdano identificirati sadržaj vijesti i razlikovati ga od nedavnih vijesti. U ovom papiru rješavamo izazov klasifikacije socijalnog mjesta kao vijesti ili ne. Za taj cilj, pružamo novu manuelno annotiranu kompetu podataka sadrži 2 992 tweets iz 5 različitih temalnih kategorija. Za razliku od ranijih setova podataka, uključuje postavke koje su postavili osobni korisnici koji ne promoviraju posao ili proizvod te nisu povezani s bilo kojom organizacijom. Istražujemo i različite osnovne sustave i procjenjujemo njihovu učinku na novom generiranom setu podataka. Naši rezultati pokazuju da su najbolji klasifikatori SVM i BERT modeli.', 'bg': 'Платформата на социалните медии се превърна в първокласни форуми за докладване на новини, като потребителите споделят това, което са видели, чули или прочели в социалните медии. Новини от социалните медии са потенциално полезни за различни заинтересовани страни, включително организации за помощ, информационни агенции и физически лица. Социалните медии обаче съдържат и огромно количество неновинарско съдържание. За да могат потребителите да се възползват от ползите от новините, съобщавани в социалните медии, е необходимо надеждно да идентифицират съдържанието на новините и да го разграничат от не-новините. В тази статия се справяме с предизвикателството да класифицираме социален пост като новина или не. За тази цел предоставяме нов ръчно анотиран набор от данни, съдържащ 2992 туита от 5 различни тематични категории. За разлика от предишните набори от данни, тя включва публикации, публикувани от лични потребители, които не популяризират бизнес или продукт и не са свързани с никоя организация. Също така изследваме различни базови системи и оценяваме ефективността им върху новогенерирания набор от данни. Нашите резултати показват, че най-добрите класификатори са моделите.', 'fa': 'Plataforma رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی برای گزارش گزارش اخبار اول شدند، با کاربران که آنچه را دیدند، شنیدند یا خواندند در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی مشترک می\u200cکنند. اخبار از رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی احتمالا برای گروهی مختلف مشترک مفید است که شامل سازمان\u200cهای کمک، سازمان\u200cهای خبری، و فردی\u200cها می\u200cباشند. ولی رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی همچنین محتوای بسیار زیادی غیر اخبار دارد. برای اینکه کاربران قادر باشند به سودی از اخبار گزارش شده در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی نشان دهند، لازم است که به یقین محتوای اخبار را شناسایی کنند و آن را از غیر اخبار متفاوت کنند. در این کاغذ، ما با چالش کلاس کردن یک پست اجتماعی به عنوان اخبار یا نه حل می کنیم. برای این پایان، ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدید با دستی که شامل ۲.992 تویت از ۵ گروه موضوع متفاوت است را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. برخلاف مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای قبلی، آن شامل پیغام\u200cهایی است که توسط کاربران شخصی فرستاده شده\u200cاند که تجارت یا محصولات را ترجیح نمی\u200cدهند و با هیچ سازمان ارتباطی ندارند. ما همچنین سیستم\u200cهای بنیادی مختلف را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم و عملکرد آنها را در مجموعه داده\u200cهای تازه تولید می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که بهترین راهنمایی\u200cکننده\u200cها مدل SVM و BERT هستند.', 'id': 'Platform media sosial telah menjadi forum utama untuk melaporkan berita, dengan pengguna berbagi apa yang mereka lihat, mendengar atau membaca di media sosial. Berita dari media sosial berpotensi berguna untuk berbagai pihak berwenang termasuk organisasi bantuan, agensi berita, dan individu. Namun, media sosial juga mengandung banyak isi bukan berita. Untuk pengguna dapat menggunakan keuntungan dari berita yang dilaporkan di media sosial, perlu untuk mengidentifikasi dengan yakin isi berita dan membedakannya dari bukan berita. Dalam koran ini, kita mengatasi tantangan untuk mengklasifikasi pos sosial sebagai berita atau tidak. To this end, we provide a new manually annotated dataset containing 2,992 tweets from 5 different topical categories.  Tidak seperti set data sebelumnya, itu termasuk posting yang ditempatkan oleh pengguna pribadi yang tidak mempromosikan bisnis atau produk dan tidak berhubungan dengan organisasi apapun. Kami juga menyelidiki berbagai sistem dasar dan mengevaluasi prestasi mereka pada set data yang baru dibuat. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa klasifikasi terbaik adalah model SVM dan BERT.', 'de': 'Social-Media-Plattformen sind zu den wichtigsten Foren für die Berichterstattung von Nachrichten geworden, in denen Nutzer teilen, was sie gesehen, gehört oder gelesen haben. Nachrichten aus sozialen Medien sind potenziell nützlich für verschiedene Stakeholder, darunter Hilfsorganisationen, Nachrichtenagenturen und Einzelpersonen. Social Media enthält jedoch auch eine große Menge an Nicht-News-Inhalten. Damit Nutzer von den in sozialen Medien berichteten Nachrichten profitieren können, ist es notwendig, Nachrichteninhalte zuverlässig zu identifizieren und von Nichtnachrichten zu unterscheiden. In diesem Beitrag gehen wir der Herausforderung an, einen Social Post als News einzustufen oder nicht. Zu diesem Zweck stellen wir einen neuen manuell kommentierten Datensatz mit 2.992 Tweets aus fünf verschiedenen Themenkategorien zur Verfügung. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Datensätzen umfasst es Postings, die von persönlichen Benutzern gepostet wurden, die kein Unternehmen oder Produkt bewerben und nicht mit einer Organisation verbunden sind. Außerdem untersuchen wir verschiedene Basissysteme und bewerten deren Performance auf dem neu generierten Datensatz. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die besten Klassifikatoren die SVM- und BERT-Modelle sind.', 'ko': '소셜 미디어 플랫폼은 이미 뉴스를 보도하는 주요 포럼이 되었고 사용자는 그들이 소셜 미디어에서 보고 들은 것을 공유할 수 있다.소셜 미디어에서 온 뉴스는 원조 단체, 뉴스 기관과 개인을 포함한 다양한 이해관계자에게 유용할 수 있다.그러나 소셜미디어에도 비뉴스 내용이 많이 포함돼 있다.사용자가 소셜미디어에 보도된 뉴스에서 이익을 얻을 수 있도록 뉴스 내용을 믿음직스럽게 식별하고 비뉴스 내용과 구분할 필요가 있다.본고에서 우리는 소셜네트워크서비스(SNS)를 뉴스 여부로 분류하는 도전을 해결했다.이를 위해 5개의 주제 카테고리에서 2992개의 트윗이 포함된 새로운 수동 주석 데이터 세트를 제공합니다.초기의 데이터 집합과 달리 개인 사용자가 발표한 게시물을 포함하는데 이런 사용자들은 업무나 제품을 홍보하지 않고 그 어떠한 조직에도 속하지 않는다.우리는 또 각종 기선 시스템을 조사하고 새로 생성된 데이터 집합에서 그것들의 성능을 평가했다.우리의 결과에 따르면 가장 좋은 분류기는 SVM과 버트 모델이다.', 'sw': 'Jukwaa la mitandao ya kijamii zimekuwa jukwaa la msingi kwa ajili ya taarifa za habari, kwa watumiaji wakishirikisha kile walichokiona, wakisikia au kusoma kwenye mitandao ya kijamii. Habari kutoka mitandao ya kijamii inaweza kuwa na manufaa kwa watumiaji mbalimbali wakiwemo mashirika ya misaada, mashirika ya habari na watu binafsi. However, social media also contains a vast amount of non-news content.  Kwa watumiaji wanaweza kuchukua faida kutoka kwenye habari zinazoripotiwa kwenye mitandao ya kijamii, ni muhimu kutambua maudhui ya habari na kutofautisha habari zisizo na habari. Katika karatasi hii, tunakabiliana na changamoto ya kutangaza makala ya kijamii kama habari au la. Kwa mwisho huu, tunatoa kituo kipya cha taarifa kinachotangazwa kwa mkono kina twiti 2,992 kutoka katika makundi matano tofauti. Tofauti na seti za taarifa zilizopita, inajumuisha makala zilizowekwa na watumiaji binafsi ambao hawawezi kukuza biashara au bidhaa na hawana ushirikiano na shirika lolote. Pia tunachunguza mifumo mbalimbali ya msingi na kutathmini utendaji wao kwenye seti ya taarifa mpya zilizotengenezwa. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa wataalamu bora ni mifano ya SVM na BERT.', 'tr': 'Sosyal medya platformları, haberler bildirmek için başlangıç forumlar oldu. Ulaşanları gördüklerini, duyduklarını ya da sosyal medya üzerinde okuyup paylaşırlar. Sosial mediýanyň haberleri dürli adamlar üçin kömekleşmeler, täzelikler maslahatlary we adamlar üçin ulanypdyr. Ýöne sosyal medýdylar hem täzeliklerde köp daşary ýok. Ullançylar sosial mediýalarda habarlaryň faydalaryny çykarmak üçin, täzelikleriň maksadyny ynamly tanamak we ony täzelikleriň ýok bolmadykdan ayırmak gerek. Bu kagyzda, sosyal ýerleri täzelikler ýaly däldirmegiň kynçylygyny çözýäris. Bu üçin 5 farklı topar kategoriýasyndan 2,992 tweet içerilýan täze bir hili saýlandyrys. Erteki sanat setirleri ýaly, ol oglan kişisel ullançylar tarapyndan gönderilen postalary ahmal we hiçbir soragy bilen baglanmaýan. Biz hem çeşitli baseline sistemlerini inceleýäris we olaryň etkinleşigini täze döredilen veri setirinde deňleýäris Biziň netijelerimiz iň gowy klasifikatçylar SVM we BERT nusgalardygyny görkezýär.', 'sq': 'Platformet e medias sociale janë bërë forume kryesorë për raportimin e lajmeve, me përdoruesit që ndajnë atë që shohin, dëgjuan apo lexojnë në mediat sociale. Lajmet nga media sociale janë potencialisht të dobishme për interesante të ndryshme duke përfshirë organizatat e ndihmës, agjensitë e lajmeve dhe individët. Megjithatë, media sociale përmban gjithashtu një sasi të madhe përmbajtjesh jo-lajmesh. Për përdoruesit që të jenë në gjendje të përfitojnë nga lajmet e raportuara në media sociale është e nevojshme të identifikohen me siguri përmbajtjen e lajmeve dhe ta dallojnë atë nga jo-lajmet. Në këtë letër, ne trajtojmë sfidën e klasifikimit të një post shoqëror si lajm apo jo. Për këtë qëllim, ne ofrojmë një set të ri të dhënash të anotuar manualisht që përmban 2,992 tweets nga 5 kategori të ndryshme tematike. Ndryshe nga grupet e të dhënave të mëparshme, ajo përfshin postime të publikuara nga përdoruesit personal ë që nuk nxisin një biznes apo një produkt dhe nuk janë të lidhur me asnjë organizatë. Ne gjithashtu hetojmë sisteme të ndryshme bazë dhe vlerësojmë performancën e tyre në grupin e të dhënave të gjeneruara sapo. Rezultatet tona tregojnë se klasifikuesit më të mirë janë modelet SVM dhe BERT.', 'af': "Soziale media platforme het eerste forume geword om nuus te rapporteer, met gebruikers wat hulle gesien, hoor of gelees het op sosiale media. Nuus van sosiale media is potensieal nuttig vir verskeie staatshouers, insluitend hulp organisasies, nuusagencies en individuele. Maar sosiale media bevat ook 'n groot hoeveelheid nie-nuus inhoud. Vir gebruikers om op voordeel te teken van nuus wat op sosiale media verspreek is, is dit nodig om nuus inhoud te identifiseer en dit van nie-nuus te verskillig. In hierdie papier is ons die uitdrukking van klassifisering van 'n sosiale post as nuus of nie. Op hierdie einde verskaf ons 'n nuwe manuelt aangetelde datastel bevat 2,992 tweets van 5 verskillende onderwerpe kategorie. Ongelyks soos vroeëre datastelle, is dit opgesluit poste wat deur persoonlike gebruikers gestuur word wat nie 'n besigheid of 'n produkt bevestig nie en nie met enige organisasie verbind word nie. Ons ondersoek ook verskeie basisline stelsels en evalueer hulle prestasie op die nuwe genereerde datastel. Ons resultate wys dat die beste klassifiseerders is die SVM en BERT modele.", 'az': 'Sosyal media platformları xəbərləri bildirmək üçün, gördüklərini, eşitdiklərini və oxuyan istifadəçiləri ilə birlikdə prim forumlar oldular. Sosyal mediyaların xəbərləri müxtəlif mövcuddurlarına kömək organizasiyaları, xəbər agenciyaları və kişilər içərisində istifadə edirlər. Lakin sosyal media də çox xəbəri olmayan məlumatı var. İstifadəçilərin sosyal medialarda bildirilən xəbərlərdən faydalar almaq üçün istifadəçilər üçün xəbərlər məlumatını təsdiqləmək və xəbərləri olmayan xəbərlərdən ayırmaq lazımdır. Bu kağızda, sosyal məlumatı xəbərlər kimi dəyişdirmək və ya yoxdur. Bu səbəbdə, 5 müxtəlif məlumat kategoriyalarından 2.992 tweet içərik yeni məlumat qurması təyin edirik. Daha əvvəlki verilən qurğular kimi, bu qurğulu və proqramı təşkil etməyən kişisel istifadəçilər tarafından göndərilən məktublar daxil edir. Biz də müxtəlif səhifələr sistemlərini incidirik və yeni yaratdığı verilən qurğuda onların performansını değerləşdiririk. Sonuçlarımız ən yaxşı klassifikatçılar SVM və BERT modelleridir.', 'am': 'ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ጦማሪያዎች ዜናዎችን ለማስታወቂያ የመጀመሪያ የጦማሪያዎች ሆነዋል፤ በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ ያዩትን፣ የሰሙትን ወይም የሚያነቡ ተጠቃሚዎች ያጋራሉ፡፡ ከማኅበራዊ አውታር ዜና እርዳታ ድርጅቶች፣ ዜና አካባቢዎች እና ለብዙዎቹ ለሌሎች ተቃዋሚዎች የሚጠቅሙ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ደግሞ ብዙ የዜና ጥያቄ አለ፡፡ በማኅበራዊ ማኅበራዊ አውታር ላይ ከተዘጋጀው ዜና ጥቅሞችን ለመቀበል ለሚችሉ የዜና ውይይቶችን በማረጋገጥ እና ከማይለወጥ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ ማኅበራዊ ፖስቲካን እንደ ዜና መፍጠር የሚችሉትን ጥላቻ እናቃጥላለን፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት 2,992 ትዊተሮችን ከ5 ልዩ ደረጃ ክፍሎች የሚይዙ አዲስ አዲስ የዳታ ማዕከላዊ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የቀድሞው የዳታ ጽሑፎች በተለየ፣ የንግድ ጉዳይ ወይም የጉዳይ ጉዳይ ያላደረጉት፣ ማንኛውም ድርጅት ያላገኙትን የግል ተጠቃሚዎች የደብዳቤ ጽሑፎችን ያስተካክላሉ፡፡ አዲስ አዲስ ወለደ ዳታ ሰርቨርስቲ ላይ የጥያቄ ስርዓቶችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን የSVM እና BERT ዓይነቶች መሆኑን ያሳየናል፡፡', 'hy': 'Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների պլատֆորմները դարձան նորությունների հայտարարման հիմնական ֆորմներ, որտեղ օգտագործողները կիսում են այն, ինչ տեսել, լսել կամ կարդալ են սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում: Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների նորությունները պոտենցիալ օգտակար են տարբեր հետաքրքրությունների համար, ներառյալ օգնության կազմակերպությունները, լրատվամիջոցները և անհատները: Այնուամենայնիվ, սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցները պարունակում են նաև բազմաթիվ ոչ նորությունների պարունակություն: Որպեսզի օգտագործողները կարողանան օգտագործել սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում հայտարարված նորություններից ստացված առավելությունները, անհրաժեշտ է վստահելի հայտնաբերել նորությունների պարունակությունը և տարբերել այն ոչ նորություններից: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք լուծում ենք սոցիալական աշխատանքը որպես նորություն դասավորելու խնդիրը, թե ոչ: To this end, we provide a new manually annotated dataset containing 2,992 tweets from 5 different topical categories.  Ի տարբերություն նախորդ տվյալների համակարգերին, այն ներառում է տեղադրություններ, որոնք տեղադրվում են անձնական օգտագործողների կողմից, ովքեր չեն խրախուսում բիզնես կամ ապրանք և չեն կապված որևէ կազմակերպության հետ Մենք նաև ուսումնասիրում ենք տարբեր հիմնական համակարգերը և գնահատում ենք նրանց արդյունքը նորից ստեղծված տվյալների համակարգի վրա: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ լավագույն դասակարգիչներն են ՎԻՄ և ԲԵՌԹ մոդելները:', 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের প্লাটফর্ম সংবাদ প্রতিবেদনের জন্য প্রধান ফোরামে পরিণত হয়েছে, যারা সামাজিক মিডিয়ায় যা দেখ সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যম থেকে সংবাদ সম্ভাব্য বিভিন্ন ধরনের ক্ষেত্রের জন্যে উপকার রয়েছে, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে সহযোগী  তবে সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমেও বিশাল সংবাদ বিষয়বস্তু রয়েছে। সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে সংবাদ প্রদান করা সংবাদের সুবিধা তুলে ধরার জন্য ব্যবহারকারীদের কাছ থেকে সুবিধা প্রদান করতে পারে ত এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি সামাজিক পোস্টের সংবাদ হিসেবে বিশ্লেষণের চ্যালেঞ্জের সাথে মোকাবেলা করি। To this end, we provide a new manually annotated dataset containing 2,992 tweets from 5 different topical categories.  পূর্ববর্তী তথ্য সংক্রান্ত ব্যবহারকারীরা পোস্ট করেছেন, যারা ব্যক্তিগত ব্যবহারকারীদের পোস্ট করেছে যারা কোন ব্যবসা বা প্রযু আমরা বিভিন্ন বেস্লাইন সিস্টেম অনুসন্ধান করি এবং নতুন তৈরি করা ডেটাসেটে তাদের প্রভাবের মূল্যায়ন করি। আমাদের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে সেরা শ্রেষ্ঠ শ্রেণীবিদ্যালয় হচ্ছে এসভিএম এবং বের্টি মডেল।', 'bs': 'Socijalne medijske platforme postale su glavni forumi za prijavu vijesti, s korisnicima koji dijele ono što su vidjeli, čuli ili čitali u društvenim medijima. Novosti iz društvenih medija su potencijalno korisne za različite dionice, uključujući organizacije pomoći, novinske agencije i pojedince. Međutim, društveni mediji također sadrže ogromnu količinu nesvestnih sadržaja. Da bi korisnici mogli dobiti koristi od vijesti prijavljenih na društvenim medijima, potrebno je pouzdano identificirati sadržaj vijesti i razlikovati ga od nedavnih vijesti. U ovom papiru, riješimo izazov klasifikacije socijalnog post a kao vijesti ili ne. Za taj cilj, pružamo novu manuelno annotiranu seriju podataka koja sadrži 2 992 tweets iz 5 različitih temalnih kategorija. Za razliku od ranijih seta podataka, uključuje postignuće koje lični korisnici ne promoviraju posao ili proizvod i nisu povezani s bilo kojom organizacijom. Istražujemo i različite osnovne sisteme i procjenjujemo njihovu učinku na novom generiranom setu podataka. Naši rezultati pokazuju da su najbolji klasifikatori SVM i BERT modeli.', 'cs': 'Platformy sociálních médií se staly hlavními fóry pro hlášení zpráv, kde uživatelé sdílejí, co viděli, slyšeli nebo četli na sociálních médiích. Zprávy ze sociálních médií jsou potenciálně užitečné pro různé zúčastněné strany, včetně organizací pomoci, zpravodajských agentur a jednotlivců. Sociální média však také obsahují obrovské množství non-zpravodajského obsahu. Aby uživatelé mohli čerpat z výhod zpráv hlášených na sociálních médiích, je nutné spolehlivě identifikovat zpravodajský obsah a odlišit ho od jiných. V tomto článku se zabýváme výzvou klasifikovat sociální příspěvek jako zprávy nebo ne. Za tímto účelem poskytujeme novou ručně anotovanou datovou sadu obsahující 2,992 tweety z pěti různých aktuálních kategorií. Na rozdíl od předchozích datových sad zahrnuje příspěvky zveřejněné osobními uživateli, kteří nepodporují podnikání nebo produkt a nejsou spojeni s žádnou organizací. Dále zkoumáme různé základní systémy a hodnotíme jejich výkonnost na nově generovaném datovém souboru. Naše výsledky ukazují, že nejlepšími klasifikátory jsou modely SVM a BERT.', 'ca': "Les plataformes dels mitjans socials s'han convertit en fòrums primordials per reportar notícies, amb usuaris compartint el que van veure, sentir o llegir als mitjans socials. Les notícies dels mitjans socials són potencialment útils per a diverses partes interessades, com ara organitzacions d'ajuda, agències de notícies i individus. No obstant això, els mitjans socials també contén una gran quantitat de continguts no de notícies. Per a que els usuaris puguin aprofitar-se dels beneficis de les notícies que s'informen dels mitjans socials és necessari identificar de manera fiable el contingut de notícies i diferenciar-lo de no notícies. En aquest article, ens enfrontem al repte de classificar un post social com not ícies o no. Per això, proporcionem un nou conjunt de dades anotats manualment que conté 2.992 tweets de 5 categories tòpices diferents. A diferència dels conjunts de dades anteriors, inclou publicacions publicades per usuaris personals que no promouen un negoci o un producte i no estan afiliats a cap organització. We also investigate various baseline systems and evaluate their performance on the newly generated dataset.  Els nostres resultats mostren que els millors classificadors són els models SVM i BERT.", 'et': 'Sotsiaalmeedia platvormidest on saanud parimad foorumid uudiste edastamiseks, kus kasutajad jagavad sotsiaalmeedias seda, mida nad nägid, kuulsid või lugesid. Sotsiaalmeedia uudised on potentsiaalselt kasulikud erinevatele sidusrühmadele, sealhulgas abiorganisatsioonidele, uudisteagentuuridele ja üksikisikutele. Sotsiaalmeedia sisaldab aga ka tohutult mitteuudistelist sisu. Selleks et kasutajad saaksid kasutada sotsiaalmeedias avaldatud uudistest saadavat kasu, on vaja usaldusväärselt tuvastada uudiste sisu ja eristada seda mitteuudistest. Käesolevas dokumendis käsitleme väljakutset liigitada sotsiaalne postitus uudiseks või mitte. Selleks pakume uut käsitsi annoteeritud andmekogumit, mis sisaldab 2992 säutsu viiest erinevast teemakategooriast. Erinevalt varasematest andmekogumitest hõlmab see postitusi isiklike kasutajate poolt, kes ei reklaami ettevõtet ega toodet ega ole seotud ühegi organisatsiooniga. Samuti uurime erinevaid baassüsteeme ja hindame nende jõudlust äsja loodud andmekogumil. Meie tulemused näitavad, et parimad klassifitseerijad on SVM ja BERT mudelid.', 'fi': 'Sosiaalisen median alustoista on tullut parhaita uutisten raportointifoorumeita, joissa käyttäjät jakavat näkemänsä, kuulemansa tai lukemansa sosiaalisessa mediassa. Sosiaalisen median uutiset voivat olla hyödyllisiä eri sidosryhmille, kuten avustusorganisaatioille, uutistoimistoille ja yksilöille. Sosiaalinen media sisältää kuitenkin myös valtavan määrän muuta kuin uutissisältöä. Jotta käyttäjät voisivat hyödyntää sosiaalisen median uutisten etuja, on välttämätöntä tunnistaa uutissisältö luotettavasti ja erottaa se ei-uutisista. Tässä artikkelissa vastaamme haasteeseen luokitella sosiaalinen viesti uutisiksi tai ei. Tätä varten tarjoamme uuden manuaalisesti merkityn aineiston, joka sisältää 2 992 twiittiä viidestä eri aihealueesta. Toisin kuin aikaisemmat aineistot, se sisältää sellaisten henkilökohtaisten käyttäjien julkaisemia viestejä, jotka eivät mainosta yritystä tai tuotetta eivätkä ole sidoksissa mihinkään organisaatioon. Tutkimme myös erilaisia perusjärjestelmiä ja arvioimme niiden suorituskykyä juuri luodussa aineistossa. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että parhaat luokittelijat ovat SVM- ja BERT-mallit.', 'jv': 'Multimedia-medial sing rumangsa nik sabanjur sabanjur wartané alam kanggo ngerasah jutir, karo perusahaan ngerasah sing ndelok, nari apa basa ning media sotiki. Berita sing mengko media sothik sak supaya kanggo kalaha-kalaha luwih dumadhan karo Organisi jutahan, lan alam-alam lan alam-alam Nanging, media sothik karo akeh liyo sing paling-alah sing gak bener. Daerah bener kanggo kake iso dianggalakno bener kanggo alih jutir liyane ing media sotiki dadi soalé dhéwé nggawe nguasakno perkaraan balêh lan ingatan sampek-sampek ora ngerasakno Nang mapun iki, awak dhéwé iso nggawe ngubah ujak-ujaran iki luwih apik lan or a ngerasakno. Nyong sisané-sisané digawe sing manut gawe data setung manut sing digawe 2,Nind2 Anggal Sampeyan dataset sing dianggap, dadi iso nggawe mritir pernik sing or a bisa nguasai negoro sing alih karo penting sing ora iso nggawe nguasakno. Awak dhéwé ngeremusi sistem sing paling-sistem sing dadi nêmên karo ngono perusahaan dataset sing gawe mbukaké durung. Rasané awak dhéwé ngomong nik alih sing paling dhéwé karo model SVM karo BERT.', 'sk': 'Platforme družbenih medijev so postale glavni forumi za poročanje o novicah, pri čemer uporabniki delijo, kar so videli, slišali ali prebrali na družbenih medijih. Novice iz družbenih medijev so potencialno koristne za različne deležnike, vključno z organizacijami za pomoč, novinarskimi agencijami in posamezniki. Vendar pa družbena omrežja vsebujejo tudi ogromno vsebin, ki niso novice. Da bi uporabniki lahko izkoristili koristi novic, ki jih poročajo na družbenih omrežjih, je treba zanesljivo prepoznati vsebino novic in jo razlikovati od nenovic. V tem članku se soočamo z izzivom razvrstitve socialne objave kot novice ali ne. V ta namen vam zagotavljamo nov ročno označen nabor podatkov, ki vsebuje 2.992 tweetov iz 5 različnih tematskih kategorij. Za razliko od prejšnjih naborov podatkov vključuje objave osebnih uporabnikov, ki ne promovirajo podjetja ali izdelka in niso povezani z nobeno organizacijo. Preučujemo tudi različne osnovne sisteme in ocenjujemo njihovo učinkovitost na novo ustvarjenem naboru podatkov. Naši rezultati kažejo, da sta najboljša klasifikatorja modela SVM in BERT.', 'ha': "Kamunan mitandai da jamii sun kasance jama'a na farko wa wajen gayin lãbãri, da mãsu amfani da su shari abin da suka gan, suka ji, kuma suna karãtun su a kan mitandaya jamii. Habari daga mitandai na jamii yana da amfani ga mataimaki masu yawa, kamar mashãwarta mataimaka, mashãwansa na lãbãri da mutane. A lokacin da, mitandaki na jamii yana da kodi mai girma cikin tsarin abin da bai sani ba. Ga mãsu amfani da shi, su iya canza amfani daga zane-zane-zane da aka rubũta shi a kan mitandaya masu ƙarami, sai ya buƙata bayan ka gane maɓallin lãbãri kuma ka rarrabe shi daga zane-zane. Ga wannan takardan, Munã karɓi musamman ta bayyana makala na jamii kamar news ko ba. Ga wannan, Munã gaura wani sabo da aka sanar da shi da hannayen hannu, yana da Twitter 2,992 daga ƙungiyoyi 5 dabam-daban. Unlike earlier datasets, it includes postings posted by personal users who do not promote a business or a product and are not affiliated with any organization.  Tuna sami ƙidãya masu basuɗe-layin da Muke ƙaddara aikin su a kan tsarin da aka yanzu-yanzu. MatamayinMu na nũna cewa mafi kyaun fasalarar su ne SvM da BERT.", 'he': 'פלטפורמות התקשורת החברתית הפכו לפורמים ראשיים לדווח חדשות, עם משתמשים שותפים במה שראו, שמעו או קוראים בתקשורת החברתית. חדשות ממדיה חברתית פוטנציאלית שימושית למשונים מעוניינים כולל ארגוני עזרה, סוכנויות חדשות, ואנשים. However, social media also contains a vast amount of non-news content.  כדי שמשתמשים יוכלו להשתמש בחדשות שדווחות על התקשורת החברתית, צריך לזהות בתוכן החדשות באופן אמיתי ולהפריד אותו מהחדשות הלא חדשות. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתמודדים עם האתגר של להקליף פוסט חברתי כחדשות או לא. למטרה זו, אנו מספקים קבוצת נתונים חדשה שנעטפת ידנית שמכילה 2,992 טוויטים מ-5 קטגוריות נושאיות שונות. בניגוד לקבוצות נתונים קודמות, זה כולל פרסומות שפורסמות על ידי משתמשים אישיים שלא מקדמים עסק או מוצר ולא קשורים לאף ארגון. אנחנו חוקרים גם מערכות שונות בסיסיות ולעריך את היציאות שלהם על קבוצת הנתונים החדשה. התוצאות שלנו מראות שהמסווגים הטובים ביותר הם דוגמני SVM וברט.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས སྤྱི་ཚོགས ཡིན་ནའང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་དེ་ནང་དུ་གསར་འགྱུར་བའི་ནང་དོན་མང་ཆེ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད། ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བའི་བརྡ་སྐོར་ལས་ཕན་འབྲས་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གནས མཇུག་གི་དུས་ལ་ང་ཚོས་ལག་ཐོག་གི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་སྐྱེས་པ་ཞིག་བྱིན་ཡོད། འདི་ལྟ་ཀློག་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཆ་སྔོན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་མི་སྒེར་གྱི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱིས་བཀོག ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་རྨང་གཞིའི་མ་ལག་འདྲ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱས་ནས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་བྱ་སྟངས ང་ཚོའི་འབྲུག་འབྲས་བ་ནི་དབྱེ་བ་ཆེ་ཤོས་པ་དེ་SVM དང BERT མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པ་དག་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Multilingual Language Models for Named Entity Recognition in German and English', 'ar': 'نماذج لغات متعددة للتعرف على الكيانات المسماة باللغتين الألمانية والإنجليزية', 'es': 'Modelos lingüísticos multilingües para el reconocimiento de entidades designadas en alemán e inglés', 'fr': "Modèles linguistiques multilingues pour la reconnaissance d'entités nommées en allemand et en anglais", 'pt': 'Modelos de idioma multilíngue para reconhecimento de entidade nomeada em alemão e inglês', 'ja': 'ドイツ語と英語の名前付きエンティティ認識のための多言語モデル', 'zh': '以德语与英语名实体识者多语言模样', 'hi': 'जर्मन और अंग्रेजी में नामित इकाई मान्यता के लिए बहुभाषी भाषा मॉडल', 'ru': 'Многоязычные языковые модели для распознавания именованных сущностей на немецком и английском языках', 'ga': 'Múnlaí Teanga Ilteangacha le hAitheantas Aonán Ainmnithe i nGearmáinis agus i mBéarla', 'el': 'Πολυγλωσσικά μοντέλα γλωσσών για αναγνώριση ονομαστών οντοτήτων στα γερμανικά και αγγλικά', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური ენის მოდელიName', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű nyelvi modellek a nevezett szervezetek elismerésére német és angol nyelven', 'kk': 'Неміс және ағылшын тілінде аталған нысандардың көп тіл үлгілері', 'lt': 'Daugiakalbiai vardinio subjekto pripažinimo vokiečių ir anglų kalbomis pavyzdžiai', 'ms': 'Model Bahasa Berbahasa untuk Pengenalan Entiti bernama dalam bahasa Jerman dan Inggeris', 'mk': 'Мултијазични јазички модели за препознавање на именувани ентитети на германски и англиски', 'mn': 'Герман болон Англи хэлний нэрлэгдсэн элементүүдийн олон хэл загвар', 'it': 'Modelli linguistici multilingue per il riconoscimento delle entità nominate in tedesco e inglese', 'ml': 'ജര്\u200dമ്മനിലും ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലും പേരിട്ട എന്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള പല ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d', 'no': 'Fleirspråk- modeller for gjenkjenning av namnet entitet i tysk og engelsk', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczne modele językowe do rozpoznawania nazwanych podmiotów w języku niemieckim i angielskim', 'mt': 'Mudelli tal-Lingwa Multilingwi għar-Rikonoxximent tal-Entità Ismija bil-Ġermaniż u bl-Ingliż', 'so': 'Isticmaalka luuqadaha badan ee loogu magacaabay Entity Recognition afka Jarmalka iyo Ingiriis', 'ro': 'Modele lingvistice multilingve pentru recunoașterea entităților denumite în germană și engleză', 'sr': 'Mnogi jezički modeli za priznanje imenovanih entiteta na njemačkom i engleskom jeziku', 'sv': 'Flerspråkiga språkmodeller för erkännande av namngivna enheter på tyska och engelska', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'جرمن اور انگلیسی میں نام لیا ہوا انٹیٹی Recognition کے لئے بہت سی زبان مدل', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ ngôn ngữ đa ngôn ngữ cho người Đức và Anh Nhận dạng Entity', 'da': 'Flersprogede sprogmodeller til anerkendelse af navngivne enheder på tysk og engelsk', 'bg': 'Многоезични езикови модели за разпознаване на наименовани лица на немски и английски език', 'nl': 'Meertalige taalmodellen voor naamsbekendheid in het Duits en Engels', 'hr': 'Većina jezičkih modela za priznanje imenovanih podataka na njemačkom i engleskom', 'id': 'Model Bahasa Berbahasa untuk Pengenalan Entitas bernama dalam bahasa Jerman dan Inggris', 'fa': 'Models Multilingual Language for Named Entity Recognition in German and English', 'de': 'Mehrsprachige Sprachmodelle zur Erkennung benannter Entitäten in Deutsch und Englisch', 'ko': '독일어와 영어 명칭 실체 식별의 다중 언어 모델', 'sw': 'Modeli za lugha nyingi kwa ajili ya kutambuliwa kwa Kijerumani na Kiingereza', 'tr': 'Adlanylan gural üçin köp diller', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Modele shumëgjuhëse gjuhësh për njohjen e njësisë së emëruar në gjermani dhe anglisht', 'am': 'ቋንቋዎች', 'hy': 'Գերմաներենում և անգլերենում անվանվող անհատականության ճանաչման բազմալեզու մոդելներ', 'bn': 'জার্মান এবং ইংরেজীতে নামের এন্টিটি পরিচিতির জন্য মাল্টিভাষা ভাষার মডেল', 'bs': 'Većina jezičkih modela za priznanje imenovanih entiteta na njemačkom i engleskom jeziku', 'az': '캻smim Entity Recognition 칲칞칲n 칞ox dil Modell톛ri Almanca v톛 캻ngiliz톛', 'ca': "Models multilingües de reconeixement d'entitats anomenades en alemany i anglès", 'cs': 'Vícejazyčné jazykové modely pro rozpoznávání jmenovaných subjektů v němčině a angličtině', 'et': 'Mitmekeelsed keelemudelid nimetatud üksuste tunnustamiseks saksa ja inglise keeles', 'fi': 'Monikieliset kielimallit nimettyjen yhteisöjen tunnistamiseen saksaksi ja englanniksi', 'sk': 'Večjezični jezikovni modeli za prepoznavanje imenovanih subjektov v nemščini in angleščini', 'jv': 'Language', 'ha': '@ item Spelling dictionary', 'he': 'דוגמני שפת רבות לשפות לזהות יחידות בשם בגרמנית ואנגלית', 'bo': 'Named Entity Recognition in German and English Multilingual Language Models for Named Entity'}
{'en': 'We assess the language specificity of recent language models by exploring the potential of a multilingual language model. In particular, we evaluate Google’s multilingual BERT (mBERT) model on Named Entity Recognition (NER) in German and English. We expand the work on language model fine-tuning by Howard and Ruder (2018), applying it to the BERT architecture. We successfully reproduce the NER results published by Devlin et al. (2019).Our results show that the multilingual language model generalises well for NER in the chosen languages, matching the native model in English and comparing well with recent approaches for German. However, it does not benefit from the added fine-tuning methods.', 'ar': 'نقوم بتقييم خصوصية اللغة لنماذج اللغة الحديثة من خلال استكشاف إمكانات نموذج متعدد اللغات. على وجه الخصوص ، نقوم بتقييم نموذج BERT متعدد اللغات (mBERT) الخاص بـ Google على التعرف على الكيانات المسماة (NER) باللغتين الألمانية والإنجليزية. قمنا بتوسيع العمل على ضبط نموذج اللغة بواسطة Howard and Ruder (2018) ، وتطبيقه على بنية BERT. نجحنا في إعادة إنتاج نتائج NER التي نشرتها Devlin et al. (2019) تظهر نتائجنا أن نموذج اللغة متعدد اللغات يُعمم جيدًا لـ NER في اللغات المختارة ، ويتطابق مع النموذج الأصلي في اللغة الإنجليزية ويقارن جيدًا مع الأساليب الحديثة للألمانية. ومع ذلك ، فإنه لا يستفيد من طرق الضبط المضافة.', 'es': 'Evaluamos la especificidad lingüística de los modelos lingüísticos recientes explorando el potencial de un modelo lingüístico multilingüe. En particular, evaluamos el modelo BERT multilingüe (mBERT) de Google sobre el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER) en alemán e inglés. Ampliamos el trabajo sobre el ajuste del modelo lingüístico de Howard y Ruder (2018), aplicándolo a la arquitectura BERT. Reproducimos con éxito los resultados de NER publicados por Devlin et al. (2019) .Nuestros resultados muestran que el modelo lingüístico multilingüe se generaliza bien para NER en los idiomas elegidos, coincidiendo con el modelo nativo en inglés y comparándolo bien con los enfoques recientes para el alemán. Sin embargo, no se beneficia de los métodos de ajuste adicionales.', 'fr': "Nous évaluons la spécificité linguistique des modèles linguistiques récents en explorant le potentiel d'un modèle linguistique multilingue. En particulier, nous évaluons le modèle multilingue BERT (mBERT) de Google sur la reconnaissance des entités nommées (NER) en allemand et en anglais. Nous étendons le travail de Howard et Ruder sur le peaufinage des modèles linguistiques (2018), en l'appliquant à l'architecture BERT. Nous reproduisons avec succès les résultats NER publiés par Devlin et al. (2019). Nos résultats montrent que le modèle linguistique multilingue se généralise bien pour le NER dans les langues choisies, qu'il correspond au modèle natif en anglais et qu'il se compare bien aux approches récentes pour l'allemand. Cependant, il ne bénéficie pas des méthodes de réglage fin supplémentaires.", 'pt': 'Avaliamos a especificidade linguística de modelos linguísticos recentes explorando o potencial de um modelo linguístico multilíngue. Em particular, avaliamos o modelo multilíngue BERT (mBERT) do Google no Reconhecimento de Entidade Nomeada (NER) em alemão e inglês. Expandimos o trabalho de ajuste fino do modelo de linguagem de Howard e Ruder (2018), aplicando-o à arquitetura BERT. Reproduzimos com sucesso os resultados de NER publicados por Devlin et al. (2019). Nossos resultados mostram que o modelo de idioma multilíngue generaliza bem para NER nos idiomas escolhidos, combinando com o modelo nativo em inglês e comparando bem com abordagens recentes para alemão. No entanto, ele não se beneficia dos métodos de ajuste fino adicionados.', 'ja': '私たちは、多言語モデルの可能性を探ることによって、最近の言語モデルの言語特異性を評価します。特に、名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）に関するGoogleの多言語BERT （ mBERT ）モデルをドイツ語と英語で評価します。ハワードとルーダー（ Howard and Ruder, 2018 ）による言語モデル微調整の研究を拡大し、BERTアーキテクチャに適用した。Devlin et al. (2019)が発表したNERの結果を再現することに成功しました。この結果は、多言語言語モデルが選択された言語のNERによく一般化し、英語のネイティブモデルと一致し、ドイツ語の最近のアプローチとよく比較されていることを示しています。しかし、追加された微調整方法の恩恵を受けることはありません。', 'hi': 'हम एक बहुभाषी भाषा मॉडल की क्षमता की खोज करके हाल के भाषा मॉडल की भाषा विशिष्टता का आकलन करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम जर्मन और अंग्रेजी में नामित इकाई मान्यता (एनईआर) पर Google के बहुभाषी BERT (mBERT) मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हम हावर्ड और रूडर (2018) द्वारा भाषा मॉडल फाइन-ट्यूनिंग पर काम का विस्तार करते हैं, इसे BERT आर्किटेक्चर पर लागू करते हैं। हम डेवलिन एट अल द्वारा प्रकाशित एनईआर परिणामों को सफलतापूर्वक पुन: पेश करते हैं (2019)। हमारे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि बहुभाषी भाषा मॉडल चुनी हुई भाषाओं में एनईआर के लिए अच्छी तरह से सामान्यीकृत करता है, अंग्रेजी में मूल मॉडल से मेल खाता है और जर्मन के लिए हाल के दृष्टिकोणों के साथ अच्छी तरह से तुलना करता है। हालांकि, यह जोड़ा ठीक ट्यूनिंग विधियों से लाभ नहीं है।', 'zh': '探多言之潜,以质近言之特异性。 凡料Google之多言BERT(mBERT),以德语英语名(NER)。 广HowardRuder(2018),施于BERT架构。 成功复制Devlin等(2019)发NER。 吾之的结果表明,多言NER之广效,与英语之本相匹,与德语之最新善者也。 但不从添加微调法中受益。', 'ru': 'Мы оцениваем языковую специфику последних языковых моделей, исследуя потенциал многоязычной языковой модели. В частности, мы оцениваем многоязычную модель Google BERT (mBERT) на основе распознавания именованных сущностей (NER) на немецком и английском языках. Расширяем работу по доработке языковой модели Говардом и Рудером (2018), применяя ее к архитектуре BERT. Мы успешно воспроизводим результаты NER, опубликованные Devlin et al. (2019). Наши результаты показывают, что многоязычная языковая модель хорошо обобщает NER на выбранных языках, согласовывая нативную модель на английском языке и хорошо сравнивая с последними подходами для немецкого языка. Тем не менее, она не извлекает пользы из дополнительных методов тонкой настройки.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid measúnú ar shainiúlacht teanga na múnlaí teanga le déanaí trí acmhainneacht mhúnla teanga ilteangach a fhiosrú. Go háirithe, déanaimid meastóireacht ar mhúnla ilteangach BERT (mBERT) Google ar Aitheantas Aonán Ainmnithe (NER) i nGearmáinis agus i mBéarla. Déanaimid leathnú ar an obair ar mhionchoigeartú samhlacha teanga le Howard agus Ruder (2018), á chur i bhfeidhm ar ailtireacht BERT. D’éirigh linn na torthaí NER arna bhfoilsiú ag Devlin et al. (2019).Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go ndéanann an tsamhail ilteangach teanga ginearálú go maith do NER sna teangacha roghnaithe, ag teacht leis an múnla dúchais sa Bhéarla agus ag déanamh comparáide maith leis na cineálacha cur chuige a rinneadh le déanaí don Ghearmáinis. Mar sin féin, ní bhaineann sé leas as na modhanna mionchoigeartaithe breise.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ახალი ენის მოდელების ენის განსაკუთრებულობას გავაკეთებთ მრავალენგური მოდელის პროცენტის გამოყენებით. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ Google-ის მრავალენგური BERT (mBERT) მოდელის მიხედვით სახელი ინტერტის განახლება (NER) გერმანეთში და ანგლისში. ჩვენ მუშაობით ენის მოდელზე, რომელიც ჰოვაპე და პუდერი (2018) გამოყენება, რომელიც ამას BERT აქტიქტიქტურაზე დავყენებთ. ჩვენ წარმატებით განვიხსენებთ NER შედეგი, რომელიც Devlin et al. (2019). ჩვენი წარმოდგენები აჩვენებენ, რომ მრავალენგური ენგური მოდელეში NER-სთვის უკეთესია, რომელიც მონიშნული ენგურების მოდელეში თანამდვილეობის მოდელეობით ანგლისური და დამ მაგრამ ეს არ იქნება დამატებული კონფიგურაციის მეტიდან.', 'hu': 'A legújabb nyelvi modellek nyelvi sajátosságait egy többnyelvű nyelvi modell potenciáljának feltárásával értékeljük. Különösen a Google többnyelvű BERT (mBERT) modelljét értékeljük német és angol nyelven. Kibővítjük Howard és Ruder nyelvmodell finomhangolásának munkáját (2018), alkalmazva azt a BERT architektúrára. Sikeresen reprodukáljuk a Devlin et al. (2019) által közzétett NER eredményeket. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a többnyelvű nyelvi modell jól általánosítja a NER számára a kiválasztott nyelveken, illeszkedik az angol nyelvű anyanyelvi modellhez és jól összehasonlítja a legutóbbi német megközelítésekkel. Ugyanakkor nem profitál a hozzáadott finomhangolási módszerekből.', 'it': "Valutiamo la specificità linguistica dei modelli linguistici recenti esplorando le potenzialità di un modello linguistico multilingue. In particolare, valutiamo il modello multilingue BERT (mBERT) di Google sul riconoscimento delle entità nominate (NER) in tedesco e inglese. Ampliamo il lavoro sulla messa a punto del modello linguistico di Howard e Ruder (2018), applicandolo all'architettura BERT. Riproduciamo con successo i risultati NER pubblicati da Devlin et al. (2019). I nostri risultati dimostrano che il modello multilingue si generalizza bene per NER nelle lingue prescelte, abbinando il modello nativo in inglese e confrontando bene con gli approcci recenti per il tedesco. Tuttavia, non beneficia dei metodi di messa a punto aggiunti.", 'kk': 'Біз жуырдағы тіл үлгілерінің тілдерін бірнеше тіл үлгісінің мүмкіндігін зерттеп баптамыз. Мысалы, біз Google көп тілді BERT (mBERT) үлгісін неміс және ағылшын тілде аталған нысандарды анықтау (NER) үлгісін бағалаймыз. Біз тіл үлгісін 2018 жылы Хауард және Рудер архитектурасына қолдану үшін жұмыс істедік. Devlin et al. таратылған NER нәтижелерін сәтті жасадық. (2019). Біздің нәтижелеріміз бірнеше тіл үлгісі таңдалған тілдерде NER үшін жақсы жасайды, ағылшын тілінде негізгі үлгісіне сәйкес келеді және неміс тілдерінің жаңа жағдайларына с Бірақ бұл қосылған жақсы баптау әдістерінен пайда болмайды.', 'el': 'Αξιολογούμε την γλωσσική ιδιαιτερότητα των πρόσφατων γλωσσικών μοντέλων εξερευνώντας τις δυνατότητες ενός πολύγλωσσου γλωσσικού μοντέλου. Ειδικότερα, αξιολογούμε το πολύγλωσσο μοντέλο της για την αναγνώριση ονομαστικών οντοτήτων (NER) στα γερμανικά και αγγλικά. Επεκτείνουμε την εργασία για την τελειοποίηση γλωσσικών μοντέλων από τον Χάουαρντ και τον Ρούντερ (2018), εφαρμόζοντας την στην αρχιτεκτονική του BERT. Αναπαράγουμε με επιτυχία τα αποτελέσματα του ΝΕΡ που δημοσιεύτηκαν από την Ντέβλιν κ.α. (2019). Τα αποτελέσματα μας δείχνουν ότι το πολύγλωσσο μοντέλο γλώσσας γενικεύει καλά για τις επιλεγμένες γλώσσες, ταιριάζοντας με το μητρικό μοντέλο στα αγγλικά και συγκρίνοντας καλά με τις πρόσφατες προσεγγίσεις για τα γερμανικά. Ωστόσο, δεν ωφελείται από τις προστιθέμενες μεθόδους συντονισμού.', 'lt': 'We assess the language specificity of recent language models by exploring the potential of a multilingual language model.  Visų pirma vertiname Google daugiakalbį BERT (mBERT) model į dėl pavadinimo subjekto pripažinimo (NER) vokiečių ir anglų kalbomis. Išplėsime Howardo ir Ruderio (2018 m.) kalbos modelio tobulinimo darbą ir jį taikysime BERT architektūrai. Mes sėkmingai atkuriame Devlin et al. paskelbtus NER rezultatus (2019 m.). Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad daugiakalbis modelis gerai apibendrina NER pasirinktomis kalbomis, atitinka gimtinį model į anglų kalba ir gerai palygina su naujausiais metodais vokiečių kalba. However, it does not benefit from the added fine-tuning methods.', 'mt': 'Nivvalutaw l-ispeċifiċità lingwistika tal-mudelli lingwistiċi riċenti billi nesploraw il-potenzjal ta’ mudell lingwistiku multilingwistiku. B’mod partikolari, aħna jevalwaw il-mudell multilingwi BERT (mBERT) ta’ Google dwar ir-Rikonoxximent tal-Entità Ismija (NER) bil-Ġermaniż u bl-Ingliż. Aħna nistabbilixxu l-ħidma dwar l-irfinar tal-mudell tal-lingwa minn Howard u Ruder (2018), bl-applikazzjoni tagħha għall-arkitettura BERT. Irriproduċu b’suċċess ir-riżultati NER ippubblikati minn Devlin et al. (2019). Our results show that the multilingual language model generalises well for NER in the chosen languages, matching the native model in English and comparing well with recent approaches for German.  However, it does not benefit from the added fine-tuning methods.', 'mk': 'We assess the language specificity of recent language models by exploring the potential of a multilingual language model.  Посебно, го проценуваме мултијазичниот модел на Гугл BERT (mBERT) за препознавање на именувани ентитети (NER) на германски и англиски. Ние ја прошируваме работата за финетизирање на јазичкиот модел од Хауард и Рудер (2018), применувајќи ја на архитектурата БЕРТ. Успешно ги репродуктираме резултатите на НЕР објавени од Девлин и г.н. (2019). Нашите резултати покажуваат дека мултијазичкиот модел се генерализира добро за НЕР на избраните јазици, се совпаѓа со родниот модел на англиски и се споредува добро со неодамнешните пристапи за германски. Сепак, истиот не користи од додадените методи на финетизирање.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത ഭാഷയുടെ മോഡലുകളുടെ ഭാഷ പ്രത്യേകം നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു പല ഭാഷ മോഡലിന്റെ സാധ്യതയെ പരിശോധിക്ക പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ജര്\u200dമ്മനിലും ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലും പേരിട്ട എന്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന ഗൂഗിന്റെ പല ഭാഷ ബെര്\u200dട്ടി (mBERT) മോഡല്\u200d നാം  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ ജോലി വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഹോവാര്\u200dഡും റൂഡര്\u200d (2018), ബെര്\u200dട്ടി ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിലേക്ക് പ്രയോഗിച്ചു. ഡെവിലിന്\u200d എറ്റ് അല്\u200d പ്രസിദ്ധീകരിച്ച NER ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വിജയകരമായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പുനര്\u200dത്ഥിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് പല ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നെആര്\u200dക്ക് നന്നായി സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലെ സ്ഥ എന്നാലും ഇത് നല്ല തുടങ്ങുന്ന രീതികളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപകരിക്കുന്നില്ല.', 'ms': 'We assess the language specificity of recent language models by exploring the potential of a multilingual language model.  Secara khususnya, kami menilai model BERT berbilang bahasa Google (mBERT) pada Pengenalan Entiti bernama (NER) dalam bahasa Jerman dan Inggeris. We expand the work on language model fine-tuning by Howard and Ruder (2018), applying it to the BERT architecture.  Kami berjaya mengembalikan hasil NER yang diterbitkan oleh Devlin et al. (2019). Our results show that the multilingual language model generalises well for NER in the chosen languages, matching the native model in English and comparing well with recent approaches for German.  However, it does not benefit from the added fine-tuning methods.', 'pl': 'Oceniamy specyfikę językową najnowszych modeli językowych poprzez badanie potencjału wielojęzycznego modelu językowego. W szczególności oceniamy wielojęzyczny model BERT (mBERT) Google na temat rozpoznawania nazwanych podmiotów (NER) w języku niemieckim i angielskim. Rozszerzamy prace nad dostrajaniem modelu językowego Howarda i Rudera (2018), stosując je do architektury BERT. Z powodzeniem reprodukujemy wyniki NER publikowane przez Devlin et al. (2019). Nasze wyniki pokazują, że wielojęzyczny model językowy dobrze uogólnia się dla NER w wybranych językach, dopasowując model ojczysty w języku angielskim i dobrze porównując z najnowszymi podejściami dla niemieckiego. Nie korzysta jednak z dodatkowych metod dostrajania.', 'ro': 'Evaluăm specificul lingvistic al modelelor lingvistice recente explorând potențialul unui model lingvistic multilingv. În special, evaluăm modelul multilingv BERT (mBERT) al Google privind recunoașterea entităților denumite (NER) în germană și engleză. Extindem lucrările de reglare fină a modelului lingvistic realizate de Howard și Ruder (2018), aplicându-l arhitecturii BERT. Reproducem cu succes rezultatele NER publicate de Devlin et al. (2019). Rezultatele noastre arată că modelul lingvistic multilingv generalizează bine pentru NER în limbile alese, potrivind modelul nativ în limba engleză și comparând bine cu abordările recente pentru germană. Cu toate acestea, nu beneficiază de metodele de reglare fină adăugate.', 'mn': 'Бид сүүлийн хэл загварын тодорхойлолтыг олон хэл загварын боломжтой судалж үздэг. Ялангуяа бид Герман болон Англи хэлний нэрлэгдсэн Entity Recognition (NER) дээр Google-ын олон хэлний BERT (mBERT) загварыг үнэлдэг. Бид хэл загварын загварыг 2018 оны Хауард болон Рудер (2018 оны) хувьд нэмэгдүүлсэн. Бид үүнийг BERT архитектурд ашиглаж байна. Бид Devlin et al-ын нийтлэгдсэн NER үр дүнг амжилттай үржүүлдэг. Бидний үр дүн нь олон хэл загварын загвар нь сонгогдсон хэл дээр NER-д сайн байдаг, Англи хэлний ээж загвартай холбоотой, Германы саяхан арга загвартай сайн харьцуулж байна. Гэвч энэ нь нэмэгдсэн сайн тохируулах арга замаас ашиггүй.', 'no': 'Vi vurderer språkspesifikasjonen av nyleg språksmodeller ved å utforska potensialen av ein fleirspråksmodell. Dette er spesielt at vi evaluerer Google s in multispråk BERT (mBERT) modell på namnet Entity Recognition (NER) i tysk og engelsk. Vi utvidar arbeidet på språk-modellen for finnstilling av Howard og Ruder (2018), som bruker den til BERT-arkitekturen. Vi gjenoppretter NER-resultatene som er publisert av Devlin et al. (2019). Resultatet våre viser at multispråk-modellen generelliserer bra for NER i dei valde språka, som passar med den native modellen på engelsk og samanliknar bra med nyleg tilnærmingar for tysk. Det er imidlertid ikkje nyttig frå dei lagde finnstillingsmetodane.', 'so': 'Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa noocyada luuqada ee ugu dambeeyay, si aan u baarayno muuqashada luuqadaha kala duduwan. Si gaar ah, waxaynu qiimeynaynaa modelka BERT ee luuqadaha kala duduwan ee Google (mBERT) oo ku qoran Jarmal iyo Ingiriis. Shaqo ku saabsan model afka ee Howard iyo Ruder (2018), waxaynu ku dalbannay dhismaha BERT. Dhab ahaan waxaynu soo celinaynaa arimaha NER ee lagu soo daabacay Devlin et al. (2019) Midhahayaga waxaa tusinaya in tusaalaha luuqadaha luuqadaha kala duduwanu ay si wanaagsan ugu sameeyaan NER afafka la doortay, oo u eg qaababka afka Ingiriiska hooyo, si wanaagsan looga barbardhigo qaababka ugu dambeeyey ee Jarmalka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee wax faa’iido ah uma laha qaababka lagu daro.', 'sv': 'Vi bedömer språkspecifikationen hos de senaste språkmodellerna genom att utforska potentialen hos en flerspråkig språkmodell. I synnerhet utvärderar vi Googles flerspråkiga BERT-modell (mBERT) för Named Entity Recognition (NER) på tyska och engelska. Vi utökar arbetet med finjustering av språkmodeller av Howard och Ruder (2018) och tillämpar det på BERT-arkitekturen. Vi reproducerar framgångsrikt NER-resultaten publicerade av Devlin et al. (2019). Våra resultat visar att den flerspråkiga språkmodellen generaliserar väl för NER på de valda språken, matchar den inhemska modellen på engelska och jämför väl med de senaste metoderna för tyska. Den drar dock inte nytta av de extra finjusteringsmetoderna.', 'ta': 'We assess the language specificity of recent language models by exploring the potential of a multilingual language model.  குறிப்பிட்டு, ஜெர்மன் மற்றும் ஆங்கிலத்தில் கூகுலின் பல மொழி BERT (mBERT) மாதிரியை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். நாம் மொழி மாதிரியின் வேலையை விரிவாக்குகிறோம் ஹோவார்ட் மற்றும் Ruder (2018), பெர்ட் கட்டுப்பாட்டிற்கு பயன்படுத்த நாம் வெற்றிகரமாக டெப்லின் எட் அல் வெளிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட NER முடிவுகளை புதுப்பிக்க வேண்டும். (2019). முடிவு ஆனால், அது சேர்க்கப்பட்ட நல்ல தூண்டுதல் முறைகளிலிருந்து பயனுள்ளாது.', 'sr': 'Procjenjujemo specifičnost jezika nedavnih jezičkih model a istraživanjem potencijala multijezičkog modela. Posebno procjenjujemo Google multijezički model BERT (mBERT) na priznanju imenovanih entiteta (NER) na njemačkom i engleskom jeziku. Proširili smo rad na jezičkoj modelu fino prilagođenja Howardom i Ruderom (2018), primjenjujući ga na arhitekturu BERT-a. Uspješno reprodukujemo rezultate NER objavljene od strane Devlin et al. (2019). Naši rezultati pokazuju da se multijezički model generalizuje dobro za NER na izabranim jezicima, odgovara rodnom modelu na engleskom jeziku i uspoređuje dobro sa nedavnim pristupima nemačkom. Međutim, to ne koristi dodatne metode dobre prilagodbe.', 'si': 'අපි අලුත් භාෂා මෝඩේල්ස් වල භාෂා විශේෂතාව අවශ්\u200dයය කරනවා වගේ භාෂාවක් මෝඩේල්ස් වලින් ප්\u200d විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ගුගුල් ගේ බොහොම භාෂාවක් BERT (mBERT) මොඩේල් එකක් ජර්මන් සහ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වල නාමය කරලා තියෙන්නේ. අපි භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණයේ හොවාර්ඩ් සහ රූඩර් වලින් හොඳ සංවිධානය සඳහා වැඩ කරනවා, ඒක BERT සංවිධානයට ඇතුළත අපි සමහර විශ්වාසයෙන්ම NER ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් දෙව්ලින් එල් වලින් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා. අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ විශේෂ භාෂාවක් මොඩල් භාෂාව සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට NER වෙනුවෙන් තෝරාගත භාෂාවට හොඳයි, ඉ නමුත්, ඒක විශේෂ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් නෑ.', 'ur': 'ہم نے اگلے زبان مدلکوں کی زبان کی تعریف کی تصدیق کی کہ ایک بہت سی زبان مدلکوں کی امکانات کا تحقیق کریں۔ خاص طور پر، ہم نے گگل کے بہت سی زبان BERT (mBERT) موڈل کو جرمن اور انگلیسی میں نامہ دار انٹیٹی Recognition (NER) کے ذریعے مطالبہ کیا ہے. ہم نے زبان موڈل کے بارے میں کام گھیر دیا تھا جو حوارد اور راڈر (2018) کے ذریعے اچھی طرح تنظیم کرتی تھی، اس کو BERT معماری پر لازم کرتی تھی۔ ہم سفارش کے ساتھ Devlin et al کے ذریعے نور نتیجے کو دوبارہ پیدا کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ multilingual language model NER کے لئے انتخاب کئے ہوئے زبانوں میں اچھی طرح مطابق ہے، انگلیسی میں مادی موڈل کے مطابق مطابق ہے اور جرمن کے اچھے طریقے سے بہتر مطابق مطابق کرتا ہے۔ لیکن یہ اضافہ کردینے کے طریقے سے فائدہ نہیں دیتا۔', 'uz': "Yaqinda tilning modellarining tilning xossalarini ko'p tillar modelini aniqlash mumkin. Ko'pchilik, biz Olmon va Ingliz tilida nomli bir tillar BERT (mBERT) modelini qiymatimiz. Biz tilning modelini Howard va Ruder (2018) yordamida ajratishni ko'paydik. Buni BERT arkitekiga qoʻllash. Biz muvaffaqiyatli deb atalgan NER natijalarini qaytadan qaytadi. (2019). Bizning natijalarimiz ko'pchilik tilning modeli tanlangan tillarda NER uchun yaxshi narsa yaratadi, ingliz tilidagi native modelga mos keladi va yaqinda Olmonchaga murakkablar bilan yaxshi bir nechta murakkab qiladi. Lekin, bu qoʻshilgan yaxshi usuldan foydalanmaydi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đánh giá đặc tính ngôn ngữ của các mô hình ngôn ngữ gần đây bằng cách khám phá khả năng của mô hình ngôn ngữ đa dạng. Chúng tôi đánh giá mẫu giao dịch của Google trên cùng tên gọi Entity recognition (NER) ở Đức và Anh. Chúng tôi mở rộng công việc chỉnh sửa ngôn ngữ của Howard và Ruder (thẩm vấn), áp dụng nó vào các kiến trúc vang Berlin. Chúng tôi đã mô phỏng thành công kết quả của Devlin et al. (209). Những kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy mô hình ngôn ngữ đa dạng sẽ phổ biến tốt cho người máy trong các ngôn ngữ đã chọn, khớp với mô hình bản xứ bằng tiếng Anh và so sánh tốt với các phương pháp gần đây của Đức. Tuy nhiên, nó không được hưởng lợi từ các phương pháp độ chín.', 'bg': 'Ние оценяваме езиковата специфичност на съвременните езикови модели, като изследваме потенциала на многоезичен езиков модел. По-специално, оценяваме многоезичния модел за разпознаване на наименовани субекти (НЕР) на немски и английски език. Разширяваме работата по фино настройване на езикови модели от Хауърд и Рудер (2018), като я прилагаме към архитектурата на БЕРТ. Успешно възпроизвеждаме резултатите от НЕР публикувани от Девлин и др. (2019). Нашите резултати показват, че многоезичният езиков модел обобщава добре за НЕР в избраните езици, съответства на родния модел на английски език и се сравнява добре с последните подходи за немски език. Той обаче не се възползва от добавените методи за фино регулиране.', 'nl': "We beoordelen de taalspecificiteit van recente taalmodellen door het potentieel van een meertalig taalmodel te onderzoeken. In het bijzonder evalueren we Google's meertalige BERT (mBERT) model op Named Entity Recognition (NER) in het Duits en Engels. We breiden het werk van Howard en Ruder aan taalmodel finetuning uit (2018) en passen het toe op de BERT-architectuur. We reproduceren met succes de NER resultaten gepubliceerd door Devlin et al. (2019). Onze resultaten tonen aan dat het meertalige taalmodel goed generaliseert voor NER in de gekozen talen, overeenkomt met het moedertaalmodel in het Engels en vergelijkt goed met recente benaderingen voor het Duits. Het profiteert echter niet van de toegevoegde fine-tuning methoden.", 'da': 'Vi vurderer sprogspecifikken af nyere sprogmodeller ved at undersøge potentialet i en flersproget sprogmodel. Vi evaluerer især Googles flersprogede BERT-model (mBERT) om anerkendelse af navngivne enheder (NER) på tysk og engelsk. Vi udvider arbejdet med finjustering af sprogmodel af Howard og Ruder (2018) og anvender det til BERT-arkitekturen. Vi gengiver med succes NER resultaterne offentliggjort af Devlin et al. (2019). Vores resultater viser, at den flersprogede sprogmodel genererer godt for NER på de valgte sprog, matcher den indfødte model på engelsk og sammenligner godt med de seneste tilgange til tysk. Den drager imidlertid ikke fordel af de ekstra finjusteringsmetoder.', 'hr': 'Procjenjujemo specifičnost jezika nedavnih jezičkih model a istraživanjem potencijala multijezičkog modela. Posebno procjenjujemo Google multijezički model BERT (mBERT) na priznanju imenovanih entiteta (NER) na njemačkom i engleskom jeziku. Proširili smo rad na jezičkim modelima dobre prilagodbe Howard i Ruder (2018), primjenjujući ga na arhitekturu BERT-a. Uspjelo smo reprodukirati rezultate NER objavljene Devlin et al. (2019). Naši rezultati pokazuju da se multijezički model generalizira dobro za NER na odabranim jezicima, odgovara rodnom modelu na engleskom jeziku i uspoređuje dobro s nedavnim pristupima Njemačkom. Međutim, to ne koristi dodatne metode ispravljanja.', 'de': 'Wir bewerten die Sprachspezifität aktueller Sprachmodelle, indem wir das Potenzial eines mehrsprachigen Sprachmodells untersuchen. Insbesondere evaluieren wir Googles mehrsprachiges BERT (mBERT)-Modell zur Named Entity Recognition (NER) in Deutsch und Englisch. Wir erweitern die Arbeit an der Sprachmodelloptimierung von Howard und Ruder (2018) und wenden sie auf die BERT-Architektur an. Wir reproduzieren erfolgreich die von Devlin et al. (2019) veröffentlichten NER-Ergebnisse. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass das mehrsprachige Sprachmodell gut für NER in den ausgewählten Sprachen verallgemeinert, mit dem nativen Modell in Englisch übereinstimmt und gut mit aktuellen Ansätzen für Deutsch verglichen wird. Es profitiert jedoch nicht von den zusätzlichen Feinabstimmungsmethoden.', 'ko': '우리는 다중 언어 모델의 잠재력을 탐색함으로써 최근 언어 모델의 언어 특이성을 평가한다.특히 구글의 다국어 버트(mBERT) 모델이 독일어와 영어명명 실체인식(NER)에 미친 영향을 평가했다.우리는 Howard와 Ruder(2018)의 언어 모델 마이크로스피커에 대한 작업을 확장하고 이를 BERT 체계 구조에 응용했다.Devlin 등(2019)이 발표한 NER 결과를 복사하는 데 성공했다.우리의 결과에 따르면 선택한 언어에서 다국어 모델은 NER에 좋은 범용 능력을 가지고 영어의 모국어 모델과 일치하며 독일어의 최신 방법과 비교하였다.그러나 추가된 미세 조정 방법에서 이득을 보지 못했다.', 'id': "Kami menilai spesifik bahasa model bahasa baru-baru ini dengan mengeksplorasi potensi dari model bahasa berbagai bahasa. In particular, we evaluate Google's multilingual BERT (mBERT) model on Named Entity Recognition (NER) in German and English.  Kami memperluas pekerjaan tentang model bahasa fine-tuning oleh Howard dan Ruder (2018), menerapkannya ke arsitektur BERT. Kami berhasil mereproduksi hasil NER yang diterbitkan oleh Devlin et al. (2019). Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa model bahasa berbagai bahasa menggeneralisasi dengan baik untuk NER dalam bahasa yang dipilih, cocok dengan model asli dalam bahasa Inggris dan membandingkan dengan baik dengan pendekatan baru-baru ini untuk Jerman. Namun, itu tidak berguna dari metode penyesuaian tambahan.", 'sw': 'Tunafahamu utaalamu wa lugha wa mifano ya lugha ya hivi karibuni kwa kutambua uwezekano wa muundo wa lugha mbalimbali. Kwa hakika, tunapitia muundo wa lugha mbalimbali wa Google wa BERT (mBERT) kuhusu Tambulisho la Ujumbe (NER) kwa Kijerumani na Kiingereza. Tunaendelea kazi kwenye mifano ya lugha yenye mafanikio mazuri na Howard na Ruder (2018), kwa kutumia ujenzi wa BERT. Tumefanikiwa kurudisha matokeo ya NER yaliyochapishwa na Devlin et al. (2019). Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wa lugha za lugha mbalimbali unatengeneza vizuri kwa ajili ya NER kwa lugha zilizochaguliwa, ukilinganisha na mtindo wa asili kwa Kiingereza na kulinganisha vizuri na namna za hivi karibuni kwa Ujerumani. Hata hivyo, haifaidi kwa njia zilizoongezeka kwa mafunzo mazuri.', 'tr': 'Biz ýakynda dil nusgalarynyň täsirini köp dil nusgalarynyň mümkinçiligini gözlemek bilen takyklaýarys. Googlanyň birnäçe dilinde BERT (mBERT) nusgynda Named Entity Recognition (NER) nusgynda çykýarys. Biz Howard we Ruder (2018) tarapyndan dil nusgasynda işleýän işi, BERT arhitektura geçirip otyrdyk. Biz Devlin et al tarapyndan janlaýan NER netijelerini üýtgedik (2019). Biziň netijelerimiz köp dil nusgasy saýlanan dillerde NER üçin gowy döredilýär we iňlisçe ene nusgasyna eşleýär we iňlisçe nemesçe golaýlary bilen gowy görýär. Ýöne bu ýene-de gowy düzeltmek yöntemlerinden fayda ýok.', 'af': "Ons bepaal die taal spesifiekheid van onlangse taal modele deur die potensiele van 'n multitaal taal model te ondersoek. In besonderhede, on s evalueer Google se multitaalse BERT (mBERT) model op genoem Entity Recognition (NER) in Duits en Engels. Ons uitbrei die werk op taal model fyn-tuning deur Howard en Ruder (2018), toepassing dit aan die BERT-arkitektuur. Ons het suksesvol die NER resultate gepubliseer deur Devlin et al. (2019). Ons resultate vertoon dat die multitaal model goed vir NER in die gekose tale genereer, ooreenstemmende met die native model in Engels en vergelyk goed met onlangse toegang vir Duits. Maar dit doen nie voordeel van die bygevoeg fyn-tuning metodes nie.", 'fa': 'ما مشخصت زبان مدل های زبان اخیر را با تحقیق پتانسیل یک مدل زبان بیشتر ارزیابی می کنیم. مخصوصا، ما مدل بسیاری زبان\u200cهای گوگل BERT (mBERT) را بر روی شناسایی نامیده\u200cشده entity Recognition (NER) در آلمان و انگلیسی ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم. ما کار روی مدل زبانی را توسط هاوارد و رودر (2018) گسترش دادیم، که آن را به معماری BERT تغییر می\u200cدهیم. ما به موفقیت نتایج NER که توسط Devlin et al منتشر شده\u200cاند را بازگشت می\u200cکنیم. (2019). نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل زیادی زبان\u200cها برای NER در زبان\u200cهای برگزیده\u200cاند، با مدل اصلی در انگلیسی هماهنگ می\u200cکنند و با دسترسی اخیر برای آلمان خوب مقایسه می\u200cکنند. ولی این از روش\u200cهای اصلاح کردن اضافه\u200cشده سودی ندارد.', 'am': 'የቋንቋውን የቅርብ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን በመፍጠር የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ምሳሌ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተለይም የጎግል ብልቋ ቋንቋ BERT (mBERT) ሞዴል በጀርመን እና እንግሊዘኛ በተባለው የኢንተርኔት ማውቀት (NER) እናስተዋልታለን፡፡ በቋንቋው ሞዴል ላይ በሆward እና ጉዳይ (2018) ጥያቄን እና BERT መሠረት ለመጠቀም እናደርጋለን፡፡ ዳውልሊን እና አል የተዘጋጀውን የአዲስ ውጤቶች በማድረግ አግኝተናል፡፡ ፍሬቶቻችን የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ምሳሌ በመረጠው ቋንቋዎች ለNER መልካም እንዲያሳየው እና በአገሪክኛ ቋንቋ የሚተካክል እና የጀርመን ደረጃዎችን ለመቀናቀል መልካም እንዲያሳያል ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን በተጨማሪው ጥሩ ልማድ አይጠቅምም፡፡', 'sq': 'Ne vlerësojmë specificitetin gjuhësor të modeleve gjuhësore të fundit duke eksploruar potencialin e një modeli gjuhësor shumëgjuhës. Ne veçanërisht, ne vlerësojmë model in e shumëgjuhës BERT (mBERT) të Google-it mbi njohjen e emëruar të njësisë (NER) në gjerman dhe anglisht. Ne zgjerojmë punën mbi rregullimin e model it gjuhësor nga Howard dhe Ruder (2018), duke e aplikuar atë në arkitekturën BERT. Ne riprodhojmë me sukses rezultatet e NER publikuar nga Devlin et al. (2019). Rezultatet tona tregojnë se modeli i gjuhës shumëgjuhëse gjeneralizon mirë për NER në gjuhët e zgjedhura, duke përputhur me model in vendas në anglisht dhe duke krahasuar mirë me qasjet e fundit për gjermanin. However, it does not benefit from the added fine-tuning methods.', 'hy': 'We assess the language specificity of recent language models by exploring the potential of a multilingual language model.  Մենք հատկապես գնահատում ենք Google-ի բազլեզու BERT (mBERT) մոդելը գերմաներեն և անգլերեն անվանումների ճանաչման (ՆԵՌ) մասին: Մենք ընդլայնում ենք Հովարդի և Ռուդերի (2018 թվականի) լեզվի մոդելի բարելավման աշխատանքը, կիրառելով այն BER ճարտարապետության վրա: Մենք հաջողությամբ վերարտադրում ենք ՆԵՌ արդյունքները, որոնք հրատարակվել են Դեվինի և այլների կողմից (2019 թվականը): Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ բազմալեզու լեզվի մոդելը լավ ընդհանուր է ընտրված լեզուներում, համապատասխանում է անգլերենով բնիկ մոդելը և համեմատում է գերմաներենի վերջին մոտեցումներին: Այնուամենայնիվ, այն չի օգտակար ավելացված բարելավման մեթոդներից:', 'bn': 'আমরা সাম্প্রতিক ভাষার মডেলের ভাষার বিশেষ বিশেষ বিষয়টি মূল্যায়ন করি একটি বহুভাষার ভাষার মডেলের সম্ভাবনা বিশ বিশেষ করে, আমরা জার্মান এবং ইংরেজী ভাষায় গুগলের বহুভাষী বিবের্ট (mBERT) মডেলের মূল্যায়ন করি। হাওয়ার্ড এবং রুডার (২০১৮) ভাষার মডেলের ভাষায় কাজ ব্যাপকভাবে বিবেরেট কাঠামোর প্রয়োগ করেছে। আমরা সফলভাবে ডেভিলিন এন্ট আল প্রকাশিত NER ফলাফল পুনরায় প্রকাশ করি। আমাদের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে মাল্টিভাষার ভাষার মডেল নির্বাচিত ভাষায় নেরীর জন্য ভালোভাবে সৃষ্টি করে, যা ইংরেজীতে স্থানীয় মডেলে তবে এটা যোগ করা ভালো টিউনিং পদ্ধতি থেকে লাভ করে না।', 'ca': "Evaluam l'especificitat lingüística dels models de llenguatge recents explorant el potencial d'un model de llenguatge multilingüe. En particular, evaluem el model multilingüe BERT (mBERT) de Google sobre Recognition Named Entity Recognition (NER) en alemany i anglès. Expandim la feina sobre el perfeccionament del model de llenguatge de Howard i Ruder (2018), aplicant-la a l'arquitectura BERT. Reproduim amb èxit els resultats del NER publicats per Devlin et al. (2019). Els nostres resultats demostren que el model de llenguatges multilingües generalitza bé el NER en les llengües escollides, coincident amb el model natiu en anglès i comparant bé amb els enfocaments recents en alemany. No obstant això, no beneficia dels mètodes d'ajustament afegits.", 'et': "Hindame hiljutiste keelemudelite keelespetsiifilisust, uurides mitmekeelse keelemudeli potentsiaali. Eelkõige hindame Google'i mitmekeelset BERT (mBERT) mudelit nimetatud üksuste tunnustamise (NER) kohta saksa ja inglise keeles. Laiendame Howardi ja Ruderi (2018) keelemudelite peenhäälestuse tööd, rakendades seda BERT arhitektuurile. Me taasesitame edukalt Devlin et al. (2019) avaldatud NER tulemusi. Meie tulemused näitavad, et mitmekeelne keelemudel üldistab NER-i jaoks hästi valitud keeltes, sobib emakeelse mudeliga inglise keeles ja võrdleb hästi hiljutiste saksa keele lähenemisviisidega. Lisatud peenhäälestusmeetoditest ei ole siiski kasu.", 'fi': 'Arvioimme viimeaikaisten kielimallien kielispesifisyyttä tutkimalla monikielisen kielimallin mahdollisuuksia. Arvioimme erityisesti Googlen monikielistä BERT (mBERT) -mallia nimettyjen yhteisöjen tunnistamisesta saksaksi ja englanniksi. Laajennamme Howardin ja Ruderin (2018) kielimallin hienosäätöä soveltaen sitä BERT-arkkitehtuuriin. Toistamme onnistuneesti Devlin et al. (2019) julkaisemat NER-tulokset. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että monikielinen kielimalli yleistyy hyvin NER:lle valituilla kielillä, vastaa äidinkielen mallia englanniksi ja vertaa hyvin tuoreisiin saksan lähestymistapoihin. Se ei kuitenkaan hyödy lisätyistä hienosäätömenetelmistä.', 'cs': 'Posuzujeme jazykovou specificitu současných jazykových modelů zkoumáním potenciálu vícejazyčného jazykového modelu. Zejména hodnotíme vícejazyčný model BERT (mBERT) společnosti Google na rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit (NER) v němčině a angličtině. Rozšiřujeme práci na jemném ladění jazykových modelů Howardem a Ruderem (2018) a aplikujeme ji na architekturu BERT. Úspěšně reprodukujeme výsledky NER publikované společností Devlin et al. (2019). Naše výsledky ukazují, že vícejazyčný jazykový model se dobře generalizuje pro NER ve vybraných jazycích, odpovídá rodnému modelu v angličtině a dobře porovnává s nedávnými přístupy pro němčinu. Nicméně nemá prospěch z přidaných metod jemného ladění.', 'az': "Biz çoxlu dil modelinin potansiyelini keşfetmək üçün yeni dil modellərinin tərzini təmin edirik. Özellikle, biz Google'un çoxlu dil BERT (mBERT) modelini Alman və İngilizce Adlı Entity Recognition (NER) olaraq değerlendiririk. Biz 2018-ci ildə Howard və Ruder tərəfindən dil modellərinin düzəltməsi üzərində işləri genişləşdirdik, bunu BERT arhitektarına uydururduq. Devlin et al. tarafından yayınlanan NER sonuçlarını müvəffəqiyyətlə yeniləşdiririk. Növbətimiz göstərir ki, çoxlu dil modeli seçilmiş dillərdə NER üçün yaxşı işlər görür, İngilizce dilində yerli modeli ilə uyuşar və Alman üçün yeni tərzlərlə yaxşı qarşılaşır. Ancaq bu, əlavə edilən təmizləmə metodlarından fayda verməz.", 'bs': 'Procjenjujemo specifičnost jezika nedavnih jezičkih model a istraživanjem potencijala multijezičkog modela. Posebno procjenjujemo Google multijezički model BERT (mBERT) na priznanju imenovanih entiteta (NER) na njemačkom i engleskom jeziku. Proširili smo rad na jezičkim modelima kako bi se Howard i Ruder (2018), primjenjivali na arhitekturu BERT-a. Uspješno reprodukujemo rezultate NER objavljene Devlin et al. (2019). Naši rezultati pokazuju da se multijezički model generalizuje dobro za NER na odabranim jezicima, odgovara rodnom modelu na engleskom jeziku i uspoređuje dobro sa nedavnim pristupima nemačkom. Međutim, to ne koristi dodatne metode ispravljanja.', 'jv': "Awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan ning model sing nggawe luwih bantuan ingkang. Ero ngomong, awake dhewe kuwi model multilengkang BERT (mBERT) Google nang Named Entty RefGNtion (NeR) ning alam lan Inggris. Awak dhéwé ngembatalé nggawe barang-barang nggawe model sing arep nggawe ngulinakake sing apik, nggawe ngulinakake sistem BERT. Awak dhéwé ngejaraké sewulang nggawe barang 'nerR' seneng dipuluh Devlin et al (2011). Rejalaké awak dhéwé ngomong nik, modèl kanggo langgambar luwih apik batar nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggo langgambar, iso nggawe modèl anyar ingles karo iso nggerarané sing apik tur angel nggo ngerasah kanggo ngerasah alam. Nanging, kuwi ora tau luwih-luwih apik penting.", 'he': 'אנו מעריכים את ספציפיות השפה של דוגמני שפה לאחרונה על ידי לחקור את הפוטנציאל של דוגמני שפה רבות שפות. במיוחד, אנו מעריכים את מודל BERT (mBERT) רב-שפתי של גוגל על זיהוי Entity בשם (NER) בגרמנית ואנגלית. אנחנו מרחיבים את העבודה על התאמה של דוגמני שפה על ידי הווארד ורודר (2018), תוקף אותה לארכיטקטורה BERT. אנו משחזרים בהצלחה את תוצאות NER שפורסמו על ידי Devlin et al. (2019). Our results show that the multilingual language model generalises well for NER in the chosen languages, matching the native model in English and comparing well with recent approaches for German.  However, it does not benefit from the added fine-tuning methods.', 'ha': "Tuna ƙaddara game da misãlai na harshe na farko da ke jarraba wani mataimaki na misalin harshe-mulki. Babu ƙaddara, misalin ayukan BERT (mBERT) na Google'ar mulki-lingui da aka sunan Entity Recognition (NER) cikin Jarman da Ingiriya. Mu shimfiɗa aikin da ke samun misalin harshe mai kyau na Howard da Ruder (2018), kuma Muke amfani da shi zuwa matsayin BERT. Tuna samun mataimaki na NER da aka nuna da Devlin et al(2019). MatamayinMu na nũna cewa misalin harshen multilafu na zaɓe mai kyau ga NAR cikin harshen waɗanda aka zãɓe, yana daidaita misãlai na farko cikin Ingiriya kuma yana sami da sami da hanyoyin ƙarshen na Jarman. Haƙĩƙa, bã ya da amfani da shiryoyin da aka ƙara shi.", 'sk': 'Jezikovno specifičnost novih jezikovnih modelov ocenjujemo z raziskovanjem potenciala večjezičnega jezikovnega modela. Zlasti ocenjujemo Googlov večjezični model BERT (mBERT) za prepoznavanje imenovanih subjektov (NER) v nemščini in angleščini. Razširimo delo na področju finega uravnavanja jezikovnih modelov Howarda in Ruderja (2018), ki ga uporabljamo v arhitekturi BERT. Uspešno reproduciramo rezultate NER, ki so jih objavili Devlin et al. (2019). Naši rezultati kažejo, da se večjezični jezikovni model dobro posploši za NER v izbranih jezikih, ujema se z maternim modelom v angleščini in se dobro primerja z novejšimi pristopi za nemščino. Vendar pa nima koristi od dodanih metod finega uravnavanja.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་BERT (mBERT) མིང་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་Named Entity Recognition (NER)རྣམ་གྲངས་འདིའི་ནང་། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་མ་དཔེ་ལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་པ་དང་། Howard and Ruder(2018)རྣམས་ཀྱིས་དེ་སྒྲིག་བཀོད་པ་དང་། BERT སྒྲིག་བཀོད་ ང་ཚོས་Devlin et al(2019)ཡིས་སྐྱེས་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བ་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་འབྲས་མང་ཆེ་སྐད་ཡིག ཡིན་ནའང་། དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ལམ་ལུགས་ཁ་སྐོང་རྐྱབ་པ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་མེད།'}
{'en': 'Cross-Lingual Coreference : The Case of Bulgarian and English', 'ar': 'مرجعية متعددة اللغات: حالة اللغتين البلغارية والإنجليزية', 'fr': "Coréférence multilingue\xa0: le cas du bulgare et de l'anglais", 'es': 'Correferencia multilingüe: el caso del búlgaro y el inglés', 'pt': 'Correferência interlíngue: o caso do búlgaro e do inglês', 'ru': 'Кросс-лингвальное ядро: случай болгарского и английского языков', 'ja': 'クロスリンガルコアリファレンス：ブルガリア語と英語のケース', 'zh': '跨语:保加利亚语、英语例', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-लिंगुअल कोरेफेरेंस: बल्गेरियाई और अंग्रेजी का मामला', 'ga': 'Croílár Trastheangach: Cás na Bulgáire agus an Bhéarla', 'ka': 'ბულდარიური და ინგლისური შესახებ', 'hu': 'A bolgár és az angol nyelv közötti korreferencia', 'el': 'Διασγλωσσική συνεργασία: Η περίπτωση της βουλγαρικής και της αγγλικής γλώσσας', 'it': "Coreferenza interlinguistica: il caso del bulgaro e dell'inglese", 'kk': 'Тіпті тілік қатынасы: Болгария және ағылшын тілінің әріптері', 'mk': 'Крослингуална кореференција: Примерот на бугарски и англиски', 'lt': 'Cross-Lingual Coreference: The Case of Bulgarian and English', 'ms': 'Coreference Selasa Bahasa: Kasus Bahasa Bulgari dan Inggeris', 'mt': 'Cross-Lingual Coreference: The Case of Bulgarian and English', 'no': 'Krysslingskoreferanse: The Case of Bulgarian and English', 'mn': 'Хөгжин хэлний зэрэгцээ: Болгариан, Англи хэлний тухай', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്ഗല്\u200d കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ്: ബുള്\u200dഗേറിയയും ഇംഗ്ലീഷും കേസ്', 'pl': 'Współpraca między językami: przypadek bułgarskiego i angielskiego', 'ro': 'Coreferenţa interlingvistică: Cazul bulgarei şi englezei', 'si': 'ක්\u200dරොස් ලින්ගුවාල් කොරෙෆෙරෙන්ස්: The case of Bullgarian and English', 'sr': 'KrozLingualna korisnost: slučaj bugarskog i engleskog', 'so': 'Koreference-luqada: Xaaladda Bulgarian iyo Ingiriis', 'sv': 'Tvärspråkig Coreferens: fallet med bulgariska och engelska', 'ta': 'குறுக்கு- கோட்டு மேற்கோள்: புல்கேரிய மற்றும் ஆங்கிலத்தின் விஷயம்', 'ur': 'Cross-Lingual Coreference: The Case of Bulgarian and English', 'uz': 'Bolgariy va ingliz tilining haqida', 'vi': 'Quốc phòng ngôn ngữ Tây Đức: Trường hợp của Bulgaria và Anh', 'bg': 'Междулингвистична кореференция: случаят на българския и английския', 'nl': 'Cross-Lingual Coreferentie: Het geval van het Bulgaars en Engels', 'da': 'Tværsproglig coreference: Tilfældet med bulgarsk og engelsk', 'hr': 'Prejezična korisnost: slučaj bugarskog i engleskog', 'de': 'Sprachübergreifende Coreferenz: Der Fall des Bulgarischen und Englischen', 'id': 'Coreference Selasa Bahasa: Kasus Bulgari dan Inggris', 'fa': 'تعادل کلی زبان: Case of Bulgarian and English', 'ko': '불가리아어와 영어를 예로 들다', 'sw': 'Cross-Lingual Coreference: The Case of Bulgarian and English', 'tr': 'Çapraz Diller Haýraty: Bulgarça we Iňlisçe Gadyry', 'af': 'Kruis- Linguale Koreferensie: The Case of Bulgarian and English', 'sq': 'Koreferenca ndër-gjuhëse: Çështja e bullgarës dhe anglishtes', 'am': 'መስቀል-ቋንቋ አርእስት: የቡልጋሪኛ እና እንግሊዘኛ ጉዳይ', 'hy': 'Խոսլեզու կորեֆերանսը. Բուլգարենի և անգլերենի դեպքը', 'az': '√á…ôrz-Lingual ńįfad…ôsi: Bulgarca v…ô ńįngilizce Case', 'ca': "Coreferència translíngua: El cas del búlgar i l'anglès", 'bn': 'ক্রস-লিঙ্গুয়াল কোরেফারেন্স: বুলগেরিয়া এবং ইংরেজীর মামলা', 'cs': 'Mezijazyčná společnost: Případ bulharštiny a angličtiny', 'bs': 'KrozLingualna korisnost: slučaj bugarskog i engleskog', 'fi': 'Kieltenvälinen Coreferenssi: Bulgarian ja englannin tapaus', 'et': 'Keeleülene koostöö: bulgaaria ja inglise keele juhtum', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'he': 'קורפירנס לינגולי: התיק של בוגרי ואנגלית', 'sk': 'Medjezikovna korferenca: primer bolgarščine in angleščine', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Cross-Lingual Coreference: The case of Bulgarian and English'}
{'en': 'The paper presents several common approaches towards cross- and multi-lingual coreference resolution in a search of the most effective practices to be applied within the work on Bulgarian-English manual coreference annotation of a short story. The work aims at outlining the typology of the differences in the annotated parallel texts. The results of the research prove to be comparable with the tendencies observed in similar works on other Slavic languages and show surprising differences between the types of markables and their frequency in Bulgarian and English.', 'ar': 'تقدم الورقة عدة مناهج مشتركة لحل المرجع المرجعي متعدد اللغات في البحث عن الممارسات الأكثر فاعلية التي يجب تطبيقها في العمل على الشرح التوضيحي المرجعي اليدوي لقصة قصيرة. يهدف العمل إلى تحديد تصنيف الاختلافات في النصوص المتوازية المشروحة. أثبتت نتائج البحث أنها قابلة للمقارنة مع الميول التي لوحظت في الأعمال المماثلة على اللغات السلافية الأخرى وتظهر اختلافات مفاجئة بين أنواع العلامات وتكرارها باللغتين البلغارية والإنجليزية.', 'pt': 'O artigo apresenta várias abordagens comuns para a resolução de correferência cruzada e multilíngue em uma busca das práticas mais eficazes a serem aplicadas no trabalho de anotação de correferência manual búlgaro-inglês de um conto. O trabalho visa delinear a tipologia das diferenças nos textos paralelos anotados. Os resultados da pesquisa mostram-se comparáveis com as tendências observadas em trabalhos semelhantes em outras línguas eslavas e mostram diferenças surpreendentes entre os tipos de marcações e sua frequência em búlgaro e inglês.', 'es': 'El documento presenta varios enfoques comunes hacia la resolución de correferencias cruzadas y multilingües en una búsqueda de las prácticas más efectivas que se aplicarán dentro del trabajo sobre la anotación manual de correferencias búlgaro-inglés de una historia corta. El trabajo tiene como objetivo esbozar la tipología de las diferencias en los textos paralelos anotados. Los resultados de la investigación demuestran ser comparables con las tendencias observadas en trabajos similares en otras lenguas eslavas y muestran diferencias sorprendentes entre los tipos de marcadores y su frecuencia en búlgaro e inglés.', 'fr': "L'article présente plusieurs approches communes de résolution de coréférence multilingue et multilingue dans le but de rechercher les pratiques les plus efficaces à appliquer dans le cadre du travail sur l'annotation de coréférence manuelle bulgaro-anglais d'une nouvelle. Le travail vise à souligner la typologie des différences entre les textes parallèles annotés. Les résultats de la recherche se révèlent comparables aux tendances observées dans des ouvrages similaires sur d'autres langues slaves et montrent des différences surprenantes entre les types de marquages et leur fréquence en bulgare et en anglais.", 'ja': 'この論文は、ブルガリア語と英語の手動のコアリファレンスに関する短いストーリーの注釈の研究に適用される最も効果的な実践を探すために、クロスリンガルおよびマルチリンガルコアリファレンスの解決に向けたいくつかの一般的なアプローチを提示している。この著作は、注釈付きの並行テキストの違いの類型を概説することを目的としている。この研究結果は、他のスラブ諸語に関する同様の研究で観察された傾向と同等であることが証明されており、マーカーの種類とブルガリア語と英語の頻度との間に驚くべき違いが示されています。', 'hi': 'पेपर एक छोटी कहानी के बल्गेरियाई-अंग्रेजी मैनुअल कोरेफेरेंस एनोटेशन पर काम के भीतर लागू होने वाली सबसे प्रभावी प्रथाओं की खोज में क्रॉस- और बहुभाषी कोरेफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्यूशन की ओर कई सामान्य दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करता है। काम का उद्देश्य एनोटेटेड समानांतर ग्रंथों में अंतर की टाइपोलॉजी को रेखांकित करना है। अनुसंधान के परिणाम अन्य स्लाव भाषाओं पर इसी तरह के कार्यों में देखी गई प्रवृत्तियों के साथ तुलनीय साबित होते हैं और बल्गेरियाई और अंग्रेजी में मार्केबल्स के प्रकार और उनकी आवृत्ति के बीच आश्चर्यजनक अंतर दिखाते हैं।', 'zh': '本文引数语及多语言共指解常见之法,以求保加利亚语 - 英语手动短篇小说协引注事之最效者。 其旨概述注平行文本之异者类型学。 论验斯拉夫言,观其势相当,而见保加利亚语英语之可表者,与频率之惊人异也。', 'ru': 'В документе представлены несколько общих подходов к межязычному и многоязычному разрешению ядра в поисках наиболее эффективной практики, которая будет применяться в работе над аннотацией короткого рассказа к болгарско-английскому справочнику по ядру. Эта работа направлена на определение типологии различий в аннотированных параллельных текстах. Результаты исследования сопоставимы с тенденциями, наблюдаемыми в аналогичных работах на других славянских языках, и показывают удивительные различия между типами знаков и их частотой в болгарском и английском языках.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar i láthair roinnt cur chuige coitianta i dtreo réiteach croíchomhdhála tras-agus ilteangach chun cuardach a dhéanamh ar na cleachtais is éifeachtaí atá le cur i bhfeidhm san obair ar anótáil lámhleabhair Bhulgáiris-Bhéarla de ghearrscéal. Tá sé mar aidhm ag an obair chlóscríobh na ndifríochtaí sna téacsanna comhthreomhara anótáilte a leagan amach. Is léir go bhfuil torthaí an taighde inchomparáide leis na treochtaí a breathnaíodh i saothair chomhchosúla ar theangacha Slavacha eile agus léiríonn siad difríochtaí iontasacha idir na cineálacha earraí inmharcáilte agus a minicíocht sa Bhulgáiris agus sa Bhéarla.', 'ka': 'ბულოგური-ინგლისური პროგრამის შესახებ ბულოგური-ინგლისური პროგრამის შესახებ ძალიან ძალიან ეფექტიური პროგრამის შესაძლებელად გამოყენება. სამუშაო მინიშნავს, რომ აღწეროთ პარალელი ტექსტის განსხვავებების ტიპოლოგია. შესწავლობის შედეგი გამოწვება იქნება შემდგომარებელია ტენდენციებით, რომლებიც სხვა სლავიური ენერგიაში დააჩვენებულია და ჩვენებს განსხვავებელი განსხვავებების ტიპები მარკაბის და მათი ფერიკულობის', 'hu': 'A tanulmány számos közös megközelítést mutat be a többnyelvű és többnyelvű coreferencia feloldására a bolgár-angol kézi coreferencia jegyzékkel kapcsolatos munkában alkalmazandó leghatékonyabb gyakorlatok keresésében. A munka célja, hogy felvázolja a jegyzetelt párhuzamos szövegek különbségeinek tipológiáját. A kutatás eredményei összehasonlíthatónak bizonyulnak a hasonló művekben megfigyelt tendenciákkal más szláv nyelveken, és meglepő különbségeket mutatnak a jelölések típusai és gyakorisága között bolgár és angol nyelven.', 'el': 'Η εργασία παρουσιάζει διάφορες κοινές προσεγγίσεις για την επίλυση διασταυρούμενης και πολυγλωσσικής συγχορήγησης σε αναζήτηση των πιο αποτελεσματικών πρακτικών που θα εφαρμοστούν στο πλαίσιο της εργασίας για τη βουλγαρική-αγγλική χειροκίνητη συγχορήγηση μιας σύντομης ιστορίας. Στόχος της εργασίας είναι να σκιαγραφεί η τυπολογία των διαφορών στα σχολιασμένα παράλληλα κείμενα. Τα αποτελέσματα της έρευνας αποδεικνύονται συγκρίσιμα με τις τάσεις που παρατηρούνται σε παρόμοια έργα σε άλλες σλαβικές γλώσσες και δείχνουν εκπληκτικές διαφορές μεταξύ των τύπων σημάτων και της συχνότητάς τους στα βουλγαρικά και τα αγγλικά.', 'it': "L'articolo presenta diversi approcci comuni alla risoluzione della coreferenza cross-lingual e multi-lingual alla ricerca delle pratiche più efficaci da applicare all'interno del lavoro sull'annotazione manuale bulgaro-inglese di un racconto breve. Il lavoro mira a delineare la tipologia delle differenze nei testi paralleli annotati. I risultati della ricerca si dimostrano confrontabili con le tendenze osservate in opere simili su altre lingue slave e mostrano sorprendenti differenze tra i tipi di marcatori e la loro frequenza in bulgaro e inglese.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз бірнеше жалпы тілдердің көпшілік және көпшілік қатынасының айырмашылығына қатынайды. Болгария- ағылшын тілінің қолмен қатынасының қысқа оқиғаның ең эффективті әрекеттерін іздеу үшін бірн Жұмыс белгіленген параллель мәтіндердің айырмашылығын түсіндіру мақсаты. Исследацияның нәтижелері басқа Славиттық тілдерінде ұқсас жұмыс істеген тенденциялармен салыстырылып, белгілер түрлері мен олардың жиілігі болгария және ағылшын тілдерінде айырмашылық түрлерінің айырмаш', 'mk': 'Во весникот се претставуваат неколку заеднички пристапи кон резолуцијата на крстојачната и мултијазичката современост во потрага по најефикасните практики кои ќе бидат применети во рамките на работата на бугарско-англиската рачна современост анотација на кратка приказна. Работата има за цел да ја опише типологијата на разликите во анотираните паралелни тексти. Резултатите од истражувањето се покажаа дека се споредливи со тенденциите забележани во слични дела на другите словачки јазици и покажуваат изненадувачки разлики помеѓу видовите на означувачки и нивната фреквенција на бугарски и англиски јазик.', 'lt': 'The paper presents several common approaches towards cross- and multi-lingual coreference resolution in a search of the most effective practices to be applied within the work on Bulgarian-English manual coreference annotation of a short story.  Šiuo darbu siekiama apibūdinti anotuotų lygiagrečių tekstų skirtumų tipologiją. Atrodo, kad mokslinių tyrimų rezultatai yra panašūs į tendencijas panašiuose darbuose kitose slaviškose kalbose ir rodo stebinančius žymėtųjų medžiagų tipų ir jų dažnumo bulgarų ir anglų kalbomis skirtumus.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d ഒരു ചെറിയ കഥയുടെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കാനുള്ള ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നതിനായി കുറച്ച് സാധാരണ മാറ്റങ് വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളുടെ ടൈപ്പോളജിയെ വ്യക്തമാക്കുവാനാണ് ഈ ജോലി ലക്ഷ്യം. അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വേറെ സ്ലാവിക് ഭാഷകളില്\u200d കണ്ട പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d തുല്യമാണെന്ന് തെളിയിക്കുന്നു. അതിശയമായ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan beberapa pendekatan umum menuju resolusi persamaan salib dan berbilang-bahasa dalam mencari praktek yang paling berkesan untuk dilaksanakan dalam kerja pada anotasi persamaan manual Bulgarian-Inggeris cerita pendek. Kerja ini bermaksud melintang tipologi perbezaan dalam teks selari yang dicatat. Hasil kajian terbukti boleh dibandingkan dengan kecenderungan yang dilihat dalam kerja yang sama dalam bahasa Slavic lain dan menunjukkan perbezaan yang mengejutkan antara jenis tandables dan frekuensi mereka dalam bahasa Bulgari dan Inggeris.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас богино түүхийн тухай Болгари-Англи хэл дээр хэрэгжүүлэх хамгийн үр дүнтэй дасгалыг хайж үзэхэд олон нийтийн арга барилгыг харуулдаг. Ажилтын зорилго нь анзаарсан параллел текстүүдийн өөрчлөлтийг тодорхойлох юм. Судалгааны үр дүн нь бусад Славийн хэл дээр төстэй ажиллагаатай харагдаж буй төрлийн тэмдэглэл болон их хэмжээний хоорондын гайхалтай ялгааг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono kilka wspólnych podejść do rozwiązywania koreferencji krzyżowych i wielojęzycznych w poszukiwaniu najbardziej efektywnych praktyk stosowanych w ramach pracy nad bułgarsko-angielską podręczną adnotacją koreferencji krótkiej opowieści. Celem pracy jest zarysowanie typologii różnic w adnotacjach tekstów równoległych. Wyniki badań okazują się porównywalne z tendencjami obserwowanymi w podobnych pracach dotyczących innych języków słowiańskich i pokazują zaskakujące różnice między rodzajami znaczników a ich częstotliwością w języku bułgarskim i angielskim.', 'no': 'Papiret viser fleire felles tilnærmingar mot kryss- og fleirspråk koreferens oppløysing i eit søk etter dei mest effektive praksisene som skal brukast i arbeidet om boksarsk- engelsk manuelt koreferens notasjon om kort historie. Arbeidsmålet er å omforma typologien av ulike forskjeller i dei markerte parallelle tekstane. Resultatet av forskningen viser å vera samanlikbar med tendensene som er observert i liknande arbeid på andre slaviske språk og viser overraskende forskjeller mellom typane markør og frekvensen sine i Bulgarsk og engelsk.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea prezintă mai multe abordări comune în ceea ce privește rezolvarea corefenței între limbi și mai multe, în căutarea celor mai eficiente practici care urmează să fie aplicate în cadrul lucrării privind adnotarea manuală de corefență bulgară-engleză a unei povestiri scurte. Lucrarea își propune să evidențieze tipologia diferențelor dintre textele paralele adnotate. Rezultatele cercetării se dovedesc a fi comparabile cu tendințele observate în lucrări similare pe alte limbi slave și arată diferențe surprinzătoare între tipurile de marcaje și frecvența lor în bulgară și engleză.', 'sr': 'U novinama se nalazi nekoliko zajedničkih pristupa ka rezoluciji međujezičkih i višejezičkih pristojnosti u potrazi za najefikasnijom praksijom koje se primjenjuju u radu o zabilježenju bugarskog-engleskog ručnog pristojnosti kratke priče. Rad je cilj da istakne tipologiju razlika u annotiranim paralelnim tekstima. Rezultati istraživanja dokazuju da su usporedni sa tendencijama posmatranom na sličnim delovima na drugim slavičkim jezicima i pokazuju iznenađujuće razlike između vrsta znakova i njihove frekvencije na Bugarskom i engleskom jeziku.', 'si': 'The papers presents a number of shared approach to cross- and Multi-language corepherson resolution වැඩේ අලක්ෂා කරනවා වෙනස් විදියට පැත්තක් වලින් වෙනස් විදියට පැත්තක් තියෙන්න. පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ බුල්ගරියාන් සහ ඉංග්\u200dරියාන් භාෂාවයේ වගේ වගේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශේෂ වෙනස් වලින්', 'so': 'Qoraalka warqaddu wuxuu ku soo bandhigaa qaabab caadi ah oo u jeeda qayb-qayb ah oo af kala duduwan oo kala duduwan, si aad u raadsato hababka ugu saameyn badan ee lagu sameeyo shaqada qoraalka qoraalka qoraalka Bulgarian-Ingiriis. Shaqada shaqadu wuxuu ku qoran yahay noocyada kala duwan ee qoraalka lambarka ah. Sababta waxbarashadu waxay caddaan inay u eg yihiin shuqullada isku mid ah oo lagu arko luuqadaha kale ee Slavic, waxayna muujiyaan kala duwanaanshaha yaabka leh oo u dhexeeya noocyada marxalada iyo isbedelka Bulgarian iyo Ingiriis.', 'sv': 'Uppsatsen presenterar flera gemensamma tillvägagångssätt för kors- och flerspråkig coreference resolution i ett sökande efter de mest effektiva metoder som ska tillämpas inom arbetet med bulgarisk-engelsk manuell coreference annotering av en novell. Arbetet syftar till att beskriva typologin av skillnaderna i kommenterade parallella texter. Resultaten av forskningen visar sig vara jämförbara med de tendenser som observerats i liknande verk på andra slaviska språk och visar överraskande skillnader mellan typerna av markables och deras frekvens på bulgariska och engelska.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் பல மொழி குறியீட்டு தெளிவுத்திறனுக்கு பல பொதுவான வழிகளை காட்டுகிறது ஒரு சிறிய கதையின் சுருக்கத்தின் செயல்பாட்டில் பயன்படுத்தும குறிப்பிட்ட இணைப்பு உரைகளில் வேறுபாடுகளின் மாறுபாடுகளை வரையறுக்க வேண்டும். ஆய்வு முடிவு', 'mt': 'The paper presents several common approaches towards cross- and multi-lingual coreference resolution in a search of the most effective practices to be applied within the work on Bulgarian-English manual coreference annotation of a short story.  Il-ħidma għandha l-għan li tiddeskrivi t-tipoloġija tad-differenzi fit-testi paralleli annotati. Ir-riżultati tar-riċerka juru li huma komparabbli mat-tendenzi osservati f’xogħlijiet simili f’lingwi Slavi oħra u juru differenzi sorprendenti bejn it-tipi ta’ oġġetti markabbli u l-frekwenza tagħhom fil-Bulgaru u fl-Ingliż.', 'ur': 'The paper presents several common approaches to cross- and multi-language coreference resolution in a search of the most effective practices that are applied in the work on Bulgarian-English manual coreference annotation of a short story. اس کام کا مطابق ہے کہ مشارک متن میں اختلاف کی تایپولوژی کی تعریف کریں. تحقیقات کا نتیجہ ثابت ہوتا ہے کہ دوسری اسلاوی زبانوں پر مشابہ ہونے والی تورینگوں کے ساتھ مثالیں برابر ہوتی ہیں اور ان کی فرکانس بولګاری اور انگلیسی زبانوں کے درمیان تعجب کرنے والی فرکانس دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Qog\xa0Ľoz Bulgariy- Ingliz qo\xa0Ľllanmalar qo\xa0Ľllanmalarining qisqa qisqa hikoyalarni qidirish uchun bir nechta ko'plab tillar qo'llanmalar qo'llanmalarni boshqarish uchun bir necha ko'plab qo'llanmalarni aniqlaydi. Bu ishni ta\xa0ľminlovchi parallel matnlarida o'zgarishlarning turologini aniqlashga ega. Ta\xa0ľminlovchi natijalari boshqa Slavik tillarida o'xshash ishlarda o'xshash narsalarni ko'rsatadi va bir necha narsalar turlari va Bulgariy va Ingliz tilidagi frekvenlarning orasidagi ajoyib farqlarini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy đề cập đến nhiều phương pháp liên quan đến giải pháp hạn hẹp và đa ngôn ngữ để tìm kiếm những hành vi hiệu quả nhất được áp dụng trong công việc nhấn mạnh về hướng dẫn chân dung ở Bulgaria-English về một câu chuyện ngắn. Công việc nhằm mục đích xác định phân loại các khác biệt trong các văn bản song song ghi chú. Kết quả của nghiên cứu có thể so sánh với xu hướng được nhìn thấy trong các tác phẩm giống nhau trên các ngôn ngữ Slavic khác nhau và cho thấy sự khác biệt đáng ngạc nhiên giữa các loại thuốc hiệu và tần số của chúng ở Bulgaria và Anh.', 'hr': 'U novinama pokazuje nekoliko zajedničkih pristupa prema rješavanju krstojezičkih i višejezičkih pristojnosti u potrazi za najučinkovitijim praksima koje se primjenjuju u radu o zabilježenju bugarskog-engleskog ručnog pristojnosti kratke priče. Rad je cilj istaknuti tipologiju razlika u annotiranim paralelnim tekstima. Rezultati istraživanja dokazuju da su usporedni sa tendencijama koje su primijećene na sličnim djelima na drugim slavičkim jezicima i pokazuju iznenađujuće razlike između vrsta znakova i njihove učestalost na Bugarskom i engleskom jeziku.', 'bg': 'Статията представя няколко общи подхода към кръстосано и многоезично решаване на кореференцията в търсене на най-ефективните практики, които да бъдат приложени в работата по българо-английската ръчна кореференция анотация на кратък разказ. Работата има за цел да очертае типологията на разликите в анотираните паралелни текстове. Резултатите от изследването се доказват съпоставими с тенденциите, наблюдавани в подобни произведения на други славянски езици, и показват изненадващи различия между видовете маркировки и тяхната честота на български и английски език.', 'nl': 'Het artikel presenteert verschillende gemeenschappelijke benaderingen voor cross- en meertalige coreference resolutie in een zoektocht naar de meest effectieve praktijken die kunnen worden toegepast binnen het werk aan Bulgaars-Engels handmatige coreference annotatie van een kort verhaal. Het werk heeft tot doel de typologie van de verschillen in de geannoteerde parallelle teksten te schetsen. De resultaten van het onderzoek blijken vergelijkbaar te zijn met de tendensen die worden waargenomen in soortgelijke werken over andere Slavische talen en tonen verrassende verschillen tussen de soorten markables en hun frequentie in het Bulgaars en Engels.', 'da': 'Artiklen præsenterer flere fælles tilgange til tværs- og flersproget coreference resolution i en søgen efter de mest effektive praksis, der skal anvendes i arbejdet med bulgarsk-engelsk manuel coreference annotation af en novelle. Arbejdet har til formål at skitsere typologien af forskellene i de kommenterede parallelle tekster. Resultaterne af forskningen viser sig at være sammenlignelige med tendenserne observeret i lignende værker på andre slaviske sprog og viser overraskende forskelle mellem typerne af markables og deres hyppighed på bulgarsk og engelsk.', 'de': 'Der Beitrag stellt mehrere gängige Ansätze zur cross- und mehrsprachigen Coreferenzlösung vor, um die effektivsten Praktiken für die Arbeit an bulgarisch-englischer manueller Coreferenzannotation einer Kurzgeschichte zu finden. Ziel der Arbeit ist es, die Typologie der Unterschiede in den kommentierten Paralleltexten zu skizzieren. Die Ergebnisse der Forschung erweisen sich als vergleichbar mit den Tendenzen ähnlicher Arbeiten zu anderen slawischen Sprachen und zeigen überraschende Unterschiede zwischen den Arten von Markablen und ihrer Häufigkeit im Bulgarischen und Englischen.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ تعدادی از روش\u200cهای مشترک به راه حل\u200cهای مختلف و متعدد زبان در جستجوی بهترین روش\u200cهای تاثیری که در کار بر اثر اثرات دستورالعمل بولگاری و انگلیسی از یک داستان کوتاه استفاده می\u200cشود را نشان می\u200cدهد. این کار را هدف می\u200cدهد که تایپولوژی تفاوت در متن\u200cهای متفاوتی مشخص شده را توضیح دهد. نتیجه تحقیقات ثابت می\u200cشود که با نقشه\u200cهای مشابه در کار های مشابه در زبانهای دیگر اسلاویک قابل مقایسه است و تفاوت\u200cهای تعجب کننده بین نوع علامت\u200cها و فرکانس آنها در بولگاری و انگلیسی نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '본고는 불가리아-영어 단편소설 공지 주석 작업에서 가장 효과적인 방법을 찾기 위해 몇 가지 흔히 볼 수 있는 다국어와 다국어 공지 해소 방법을 소개했다.이 작업의 목적은 주석 평행 텍스트의 차이의 유형을 개술하는 것이다.다른 슬라브어와 유사한 작품에서 관찰된 추세는 비교가 가능하며 불가리아어와 영어에서 표기어의 유형과 빈도 간의 놀라운 차이를 보여준다는 연구결과가 나왔다.', 'id': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan beberapa pendekatan umum menuju resolusi salib- dan multibahasa koreferensi dalam pencarian praktek paling efektif yang akan diterapkan dalam pekerjaan pada buku manual Bulgaria-Inggris koreferensi annotasi cerita pendek. Pekerjaan ini bermaksud menggambarkan tipologi perbedaan dalam teks paralel yang dicatat. Hasil penelitian terbukti dapat dibandingkan dengan tendensi yang diperhatikan dalam pekerjaan yang sama pada bahasa Slavic lain dan menunjukkan perbedaan yang mengejutkan antara jenis tandables dan frekuensi mereka dalam bahasa Bulgaria dan Inggris.', 'af': "Die papier stel verskeie gemeenskaplike toegange teen kruis- en meer- tale koreferensie oplossing in 'n soek van die mees effektiewe praksies wat in die werk aangepas word op Bulgarse-Engelske handbokmerke kortferende notasie van 'n kort storie. Die werk bepaal om die tipologie van die verskille in die aanmerkte parallele tekste te uittrek. Die resultate van die ondersoek bevestig dat vergelykbaar is met die tendensies wat in gelykbare werke aangesien is op ander slavisse tale en vertoon verwonderende verskille tussen die tipes merkels en hulle frekwensie in Bulgarse en Engels.", 'sw': 'Gazeti hilo linaonyesha mbinu kadhaa za kawaida zinazoelekea suluhisho la lugha na lugha mbalimbali katika kutafuta vitendo vyenye ufanisi zaidi zinazotumiwa ndani ya kazi za manufaa ya Bulgaria na Kiingereza zinazoelezea habari fupi. Kazi hiyo inakusudia kuelezea mtindo wa tofauti katika maandishi yaliyotengenezwa. Matokeo ya utafiti yanaonyesha kuwa yanalinganishwa na tabia zinazoonekana katika kazi kama hizo katika lugha nyingine za Kislavic na kuonyesha tofauti za kushangaza kati ya aina ya mabango na frekve zao nchini Bulgaria na Kiingereza.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz bugarsça-iňlisçe elipbi bilen gysga hekaýa döredilmeli iň täsirli praktikalary gözlemek üçin birnäçe ortak ýagdaýlary görkezýär. Iş amaçlary, tanyş edilen parallel metinlerin tapawutlarynyň tipologiýasyny çykarmaga maksadýar. Araştyrmalaryň netijesi bolup Bulgarça we Iňlis dilinde meňzeş işlerinde gözleýän täsirlerle görnüşdürilýän ýagdaýlary bilen meňzeşdir.', 'sq': 'Gazeta paraqet disa qasje të përbashkëta drejt zgjidhjes së korreferencës ndër- dhe shumëgjuhësore në një kërkim të praktikave më efektive që do të aplikohen brenda punës mbi anotacionin e korreferencës manuale bullgare-angleze të një historie të shkurtër. Puna synon të përshkruajë tipologjinë e dallimeve në tekstet paralele të anotuara. Rezultatet e kërkimit provojnë të jenë të krahasueshme me prirjet e vëzhguara në punë të ngjashme në gjuhët e tjera sllave dhe tregojnë dallime surprizuese midis tipeve të shënuara dhe frekuencës së tyre në bullgar dhe anglisht.', 'am': 'ጉዳዩ በብልጋሪያዊ-እንግሊዘኛ ገጽ ታሪክ ላይ በሚደረገው ሥራ ውስጥ የሚደረገውን በብዙ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ክፍለ መልዕክት ለመፈለግ የተለየውን የሁኔታ ደረጃዎች ያሳያል፡፡ ሥራው በተለየ ተለያዩ ጽሑፎችን ትክክል ማሳየት ነው፡፡ The results of the research prove to be comparable with the tendencies observed in similar works on other Slavic languages and show surprising differences between the types of markables and their frequency in Bulgarian and English.', 'az': 'Kağıt, çoxlu dil mərhəmət çətinliklərinə görə, Bulgaristan-İngilizə əlli əlli mərhəmət məlumatının qısa hekayəsinin istifadə ediləcək ən etkili praktikalarını axtarmaq üçün çoxlu ortaq tərzlərini göstərir. İş məlumatların məlumatlarında fərqləndirilənlərin tipologiyasını göstərməyə niyyət edir. Araştırmaların sonuçları, başqa Slavi dillərində eyni işlərdə görünən təsirlərlə qarşılaşır və Bulgarca və İngilizce dillərində təsirlərinin təsirlərinin arasında təəccüblü fərqliyi göstərər.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ներկայացնում է մի քանի ընդհանուր մոտեցումներ խաչը- և բազլեզու կորեֆերանսի լուծման համար, որոնք օգտագործվում են ամենաարդյունավետ գործողությունների որոնման մեջ, որոնք պետք է կիրառվեն Բուլգարիայի-անգլերենի ձեռքի կորեֆերանսի լուծման համար կար Աշխատանքը նպատակն է գտնել գրված զուգահեռ տեքստերի տարբերությունների տիպոլոգիան: Հետազոտության արդյունքները համեմատություն են ապացուցել այլ սլավիական լեզուների նման աշխատանքներում հետազոտված հակվածությունների հետ, և ցույց են տալիս զարմանալի տարբերություններ մարկաբլերի տեսակների և դրանց հաճախականության միջև բուլերենում և անգլերենում:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি বুলগেরিয়ান-ইংরেজী মানুষের কাজের মধ্যে কাজের সবচেয়ে কার্যকর কাজের অনুসন্ধানের জন্য বেশ কয়েকটি সাধারণ উপায় উপস্থাপন করেছে যা কার্যকর করে প্ এই কাজের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে বিরক্তিকর প্যারালেল লেখার মধ্যে পার্থক্যের টাইপোলিজি উল্লেখ করা। গবেষণার ফলাফল অন্যান্য স্লাভিক ভাষায় দেখা যাচ্ছে তার সাথে তুলনা করা হয়েছে এবং বুলগেরিয়া ও ইংরেজীতে তাদের প্রায় বিস্ময়কর পার্থক্য দেখায়।', 'bs': 'U novinama se nalazi nekoliko zajedničkih pristupa prema rješavanju krstojezičkih i višejezičkih pristojnosti u potrazi za najučinkovitijim praksima koje se primjenjuju unutar rada o zabilježenju bugarskog-engleskog ručnog pristojnosti kratke priče. Rad je cilj naglasiti tipologiju razlika u annotiranim paralelnim tekstima. Rezultati istraživanja dokazuju da su usporedni sa tendencijama koje su posmatrane na sličnim djelima na drugim slavičkim jezicima i pokazuju iznenađujuće razlike između vrsta znakova i njihove frekvencije na bugarskom i engleskom jeziku.', 'cs': 'Příspěvek představuje několik běžných přístupů k řešení koreferencí v rámci práce na bulharsko-anglické manuální koreferenční anotaci krátkého příběhu. Cílem práce je nastínit typologii rozdílů v anotovaných paralelních textech. Výsledky výzkumu jsou srovnatelné s tendencemi pozorovanými v podobných dílech na jiných slovanských jazycích a ukazují překvapivé rozdíly mezi typy značných značek a jejich frekvencí v bulharštině a angličtině.', 'et': 'Töös esitatakse mitmeid ühiseid lähenemisviise rist- ja mitmekeelse kaasviite lahendamisele, otsides kõige tõhusamaid tavasid, mida saaks rakendada Bulgaaria-Inglise käsitsi kaasviite annoteerimise töös lühijutu kohta. Töö eesmärk on välja tuua märgitud paralleelsete tekstide erinevuste tüpoloogia. Uuringu tulemused on võrreldavad sarnaste tööde suundumustega teistes slaavikeeltes ning näitavad üllatavaid erinevusi märgistuste tüüpide ja sageduse vahel bulgaaria ja inglise keeles.', 'ca': "El paper presenta diversos enfocaments comuns cap a la resolució de coreferencia transversal i multillengua en busca de les pràctiques més eficaces que s'han d'aplicar en el treball sobre la anotació de coreferencia manual búlgaro-anglès d'una història curta. La feina mira a esboçar la tipologia de les diferències dels textos paralèls anotats. Els resultats de la recerca es demostren ser comparables amb les tendències observades en treballs similars en altres llengües eslàviques i mostran diferències sorprenents entre els tipus de marcables i la seva freqüència en búlgar i anglès.", 'fi': 'Artikkelissa esitellään useita yhteisiä lähestymistapoja monikieliseen ja monikieliseen koreferenssin ratkaisuun etsien tehokkaimpia käytäntöjä, joita voidaan soveltaa artikkelin bulgarian-englannin manuaaliseen koreferenssin annotointiin. Työn tavoitteena on hahmotella merkintöihin perustuvien rinnakkaistekstien erojen typologiaa. Tutkimuksen tulokset osoittautuvat vertailukelpoisiksi muiden slaavilaisten kielten samankaltaisissa teoksissa havaittujen suuntausten kanssa ja osoittavat yllättäviä eroja bulgarian ja englannin merkkien tyyppien ja esiintymistiheyden välillä.', 'jv': 'Perintah sing nduwe akeh akeh sing sampeyan kanggo nggawe gerakno karo akeh-karo akeh langgambar nggawe gerakan kanggo nguasai perusahaan sing apik dhéwé, kang ngerasai kapan langgar karo nganggo dolanan surat sing diralah batasan kanggo nguasai perusahaan langgar-ingkang Monday Rejalaké kapan resmi kawit karo perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno karo aturan sing ngerasakno karo hal-hal sing gawe barang Slawih banjur wong-wong liyane karo perusahaan kanggo kalagayaan karo perusahaan kanggo sakjane kanggo sakjane kanggo ngerasakno karo bugar karo Inggris.', 'ha': "Gansa na gaya wasu hanyõyi masu kawaici zuwa masu buƙata masu fassara na fassarar littafin na rubutu da mulki-lingui, a search for mafiya amfani da masu amfani da zã a yi amfani da shi a cikin aikin aiki na manunin Bulgaria-Ingiriya na buga wani littãfi na ƙaranci. Yin aikin yana aimar ya ƙara typogi na cikin littãfin da aka sanar da shi. Mataimakin research za'a sami da misãlai da aka gani a cikin wasu aikin misãlai na Slawiki kuma ya nuna sãɓãnin ajabu tsakanin nau'i-nau'i da kuma misali da su cikin Bulgaria da Ingiriya.", 'sk': 'Prispevek predstavlja več skupnih pristopov k reševanju medjezične in večjezične koreference v iskanju najučinkovitejših praks, ki jih je treba uporabiti v okviru dela o bolgarsko-angleškem ročnem koreferenčnem označevanju kratke zgodbe. Cilj dela je opisati tipologijo razlik v označenih vzporednih besedilih. Rezultati raziskave so primerljivi s težnjami, opaženimi v podobnih delih na drugih slovanskih jezikih, in kažejo presenetljive razlike med vrstami označb in njihovo pogostostjo v bolgarskem in angleškem jeziku.', 'he': 'העיתון מציג מספר גישות משותפות כלפי פתרון בין-שפתיים ובין-שפתיים במחפש על הפרקטיקות הכי יעילות שיש להפעיל בתוך העבודה על ציון בין-יד בוגרי-אנגלי של סיפור קצר. העבודה מתכוונת לתאר את הטיפולוגיה של ההבדלים בטקסטים המקבילים המכתבים. התוצאות של המחקר מוכיחות להיות שוויות עם הנטיות שנראות בעבודות דומות בשפות סלאביות אחרות והופעות בהבדלים מפתיעים בין סוגי המרקבלים לתדר שלהם בבולגרית ואנגלית.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བུ་དེ་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་ཐེབས་ཅན་མི་འདྲ་བ་ཐད་ཡིན་པའི་སྐོར་ལས་མཐུན་སྣ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཐད་ཡིན། The work aims to outline the typology of the differences in the annotated parallel texts. དབྱངས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་བ་དག་ནི་སྐྱེན་རིས་སྤྱོད་པ་གཞན་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བྱས་མིན་འདུག།'}
{'en': 'Evaluation of Stacked Embeddings for Bulgarian on the Downstream Tasks POS and NERC', 'ar': 'تقييم حفلات الزفاف المكدسة للبلغارية في مهام المصب POS و NERC', 'es': 'Evaluación de incrustaciones apiladas para búlgaro en las tareas descendentes POS y NERC', 'fr': 'Évaluation des intégrations empilées pour le bulgare sur les tâches en aval POS et NERC', 'pt': 'Avaliação de Embeddings empilhados para búlgaro nas tarefas a jusante POS e NERC', 'ja': '下流タスクPOSおよびNERCのブルガリア語のための積み重ねられた埋め込みの評価', 'ru': 'Оценка штабелируемых вложений для болгарского языка в нижнем бьефе задач POS и NERC', 'zh': '评估下流POS与NERC上保加利亚语堆嵌', 'hi': 'डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्य पॉस और NERC पर बल्गेरियाई के लिए स्टैक्ड एम्बेडिंग का मूल्यांकन', 'ga': 'Meastóireacht ar Leabú Cruachta don Bhulgáir ar na Tascanna Iartheachtach POS agus NERC', 'ka': 'ბულდარიური სახელსაწყისთვის სტანკური დავალების POS და NERC', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση Στοιβαγμένων Ενσωματώσεων για τη βουλγαρική στα επόμενα καθήκοντα POS και NERC', 'it': 'Valutazione di Embedding Stacked per Bulgaro sui Tasks Downstream POS e NERC', 'hu': 'Bolgár nyelvű beágyazások értékelése a Downstream feladatokra vonatkozóan POS és NERC', 'kk': 'Болгариялық бағытталған тапсырмалар POS және NERC бағытталған ендірулердің оқу', 'lt': 'Bulgarui skirtas įdiegimo kompleksų vertinimas, susijęs su tolesnėmis užduotimis POS ir NERC', 'mk': 'Evaluation of Stacked Embeddings for Bulgarian on the Downstream Tasks POS and NERC', 'ml': 'ബുള്\u200dഗേരിയയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി സ്റ്റാക്ക് എംബെഡിങ്ങുകളുടെ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുക', 'ms': 'Pengevaluasi Pemasangan Tersimpan untuk Bulgarian pada Tugas Downstream POS dan NERC', 'mt': 'Evalwazzjoni tal-Embeddings Stacked for Bulgarian on the Downstream Tasks POS and NERC', 'mn': 'Болгарчуудын төвшин ажиллагааны POS болон NERC-ын төвшин хөрөнгө оруулалтын үнэлгээ', 'ro': 'Evaluarea încorporărilor stivuite pentru bulgară în Downstream Tasks POS și NERC', 'pl': 'Ocena osadzeń stosowanych dla języka bułgarskiego na kolejnych zadaniach POS i NERC', 'no': 'Evaluering av stakkerte innbygging for bulgarsk på nedstrekke oppgåver POS og NERC', 'sr': 'Evaluacija Stacked Embedding za Bugarske o spuštenim zadacima POS i NERC', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Qiimeynta qalabka shaqada ee Bulgarian ee shaqooyinka badda hoose ee POS iyo NERC', 'sv': 'Utvärdering av staplade inbäddningar för bulgariska på Downstream Tasks POS och NERC', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ڈونسٹریم ٹاکس POS اور NERC پر بلگاریان کے لئے استکٹ ایمبڈینگ کا ارزش', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đánh giá các nền đệm được xếp chồng cho Bulgaria trên thực địa Phủ định POS và NERC', 'bg': 'Оценка на натрупаните вграждания за български език по задачите надолу по веригата ПОС и НЕРС', 'nl': 'Evaluatie van gestapelde embeddings voor Bulgaars op de downstreamtaken POS en NERC', 'hr': 'Procjenjivanje uloženih udruženja Bugarskih poslova o potpunim zadacima POS i NERC-u', 'da': 'Evaluering af stablede indlejringer til bulgarsk på downstream opgaver POS og NERC', 'de': 'Bewertung von Stacked Embeddings für Bulgarisch bei den Downstream-Aufgaben POS und NERC', 'id': 'Evaluasi Embeddings Stacked for Bulgarian on the Downstream Tasks POS and NERC', 'ko': '다운스트림 작업 POS 및 NERC에서 불가리아인의 스태킹 포함 평가', 'fa': 'ارزیابی ابتدایی\u200cهای پایین\u200cترین برای بولغاری در کار\u200cهای پایین\u200cترین POS و NERC', 'sw': 'Uthibitisho wa Mazingira yaliyofungwa kwa ajili ya Bulgaria kwenye kazi za POS na NERC', 'tr': 'Bolgariýanyň indiki Görevleri POS we NERC üçin Stacked Embeddings Taýýarlama', 'af': 'Evalueer van Stacked Embeddings vir Bulgaries op die Downstream Tasks POS en NERC', 'sq': 'Vlerësimi i përfshirjeve të mbushura për bullgarët në detyrat e poshtme POS dhe NERC', 'am': 'የቡልጋሪያን አካባቢዎች የፖስስ እና NERC ስራዎችን ማረጋገጥ', 'hy': 'Բուլգարենի համար տեղադրված ներգրավումների գնահատումը', 'az': "Bulgarlılar üçün Aşağı Gözəllər POS və NERC'da Stacked Embedding Assessment", 'bn': 'বুলগেরিয়ার জন্য স্ট্যাক্টেডিং দূর্বাবস্থার পরিমাণ পোস এবং নের্সি', 'bs': 'Evaluacija uloženih udruženja bugarskih na poslovima POS i NERC-a', 'cs': 'Hodnocení stohovaných vložek pro bulharštinu na následné úkoly POS a NERC', 'ca': 'Evaluation of Stacked Embeddings for Bulgarian on the Downstream Tasks POS and NERC', 'et': 'Bulgaaria keele virnastatud manustuste hindamine järgnevate ülesannete POS ja NERC puhul', 'fi': 'Bulgarian pinottujen upotusten arviointi jälkipään tehtävissä POS- ja NERC-järjestelmässä', 'jv': 'Injih sing dikarolan ambekan Stack kanggo Bolgari nang Daftar tasks po S karo NeC', 'sk': 'Ocena zloženih vdelav za bolgarščino v nadaljnjih nalogah POS in NERC', 'ha': 'Bayani', 'he': 'Evaluation of Stacked Embeddings for Bulgarian on the Downstream Tasks POS and NERC', 'bo': 'Bulgarian(Downstream Tasks POS)དང་NERC(Assessment of Stacked Embedding for Bulgarian)ཡི་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱིས་རྟགས་བཀལ་སྡོད་ཀྱི་དཔྱད་ཞིབ'}
{'en': 'This paper reports on experiments with different stacks of word embeddings and evaluation of their usefulness for Bulgarian downstream tasks such as Named Entity Recognition and Classification (NERC) and Part-of-speech (POS) Tagging. Word embeddings stay in the core of the development of NLP, with several key language models being created over the last two years like FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) and Flair (CITATION). Stacking or combining different word embeddings is another technique used in this paper and still not reported for Bulgarian NERC. Well-established architecture is used for the sequence tagging task such as BI-LSTM-CRF, and different pre-trained language models are combined in the embedding layer to decide which combination of them scores better.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة تقريرًا عن تجارب مع مجموعات مختلفة من حفلات الزفاف وتقييم فائدتها في مهام المصب البلغاري مثل التعرف على الكيانات المسماة وتصنيفها (NERC) وعلامات جزء من الكلام (POS). تظل Word embeddings في صميم تطوير البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، حيث تم إنشاء العديد من نماذج اللغة الرئيسية على مدار العامين الماضيين مثل FastText (CITATION) و ElMo (CITATION) و BERT (CITATION) و Flair (CITATION). يعد تكديس أو الجمع بين تطعيمات الكلمات المختلفة تقنية أخرى مستخدمة في هذه الورقة ولم يتم الإبلاغ عنها بعد في NERC البلغاري. يتم استخدام البنية الراسخة لمهمة وضع العلامات على التسلسل مثل BI-LSTM-CRF ، ويتم دمج نماذج اللغة المختلفة المدربة مسبقًا في طبقة التضمين لتحديد المجموعة التي تحقق أفضل النتائج.', 'fr': "Cet article rend compte d'expériences avec différentes piles d'intégrations de mots et d'une évaluation de leur utilité pour les tâches bulgares en aval, telles que la reconnaissance et la classification des entités nommées (NERC) et le marquage des parties de discours (POS). Les intégrations de mots restent au cœur du développement de la PNL, plusieurs modèles de langage clés ayant été créés au cours des deux dernières années, tels que FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) et Flair (CITATION). L'empilement ou la combinaison de différents intégrations de mots est une autre technique utilisée dans cet article et n'a toujours pas été rapportée pour le NERC bulgare. Une architecture bien établie est utilisée pour la tâche de marquage de séquence, telle que BI-LSTM-CRF, et différents modèles de langage pré-entraînés sont combinés dans la couche d'intégration afin de décider quelle combinaison d'entre eux obtient les meilleurs résultats.", 'es': 'Este artículo informa sobre los experimentos con diferentes pilas de incrustaciones de palabras y la evaluación de su utilidad para las tareas posteriores en búlgaro, como el reconocimiento y clasificación de entidades nombradas (NERC) y el etiquetado de partes del habla (POS). Las incrustaciones de palabras se mantienen en el centro del desarrollo de la PNL, con varios modelos lingüísticos clave que se han creado en los últimos dos años, como FastText (CITATION), eLMO (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) y Flair (CITATION). Apilar o combinar diferentes incrustaciones de palabras es otra técnica utilizada en este documento y aún no se ha informado para NERC búlgaro. Se utiliza una arquitectura bien establecida para la tarea de etiquetado de secuencias, como BI-LSTM-CRF, y se combinan diferentes modelos de lenguaje previamente entrenados en la capa de incrustación para decidir qué combinación de ellos obtiene mejores resultados.', 'pt': 'Este artigo relata experimentos com diferentes pilhas de incorporação de palavras e avaliação de sua utilidade para tarefas downstream búlgaras, como reconhecimento e classificação de entidades nomeadas (NERC) e marcação de parte da fala (POS). A incorporação de palavras permanece no centro do desenvolvimento da PNL, com vários modelos de linguagem-chave sendo criados nos últimos dois anos, como FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) e Flair (CITATION). Empilhar ou combinar diferentes incorporações de palavras é outra técnica usada neste artigo e ainda não relatada para o NERC búlgaro. Uma arquitetura bem estabelecida é usada para a tarefa de marcação de sequência, como BI-LSTM-CRF, e diferentes modelos de linguagem pré-treinados são combinados na camada de incorporação para decidir qual combinação deles pontua melhor.', 'ja': 'この論文では、さまざまな単語埋め込みのスタックを用いた実験と、名前付きエンティティ認識と分類（ NERC ）および部分音声（ POS ）タグ付けなどのブルガリアの下流タスクに対するそれらの有用性の評価について報告する。ワード埋め込みは、NLPの開発の中核であり続け、FastText （引用）、ElMo （引用）、BERT （引用）、Flair （引用）など、過去2年間にわたっていくつかの主要な言語モデルが作成されています。異なる単語の埋め込みを積み重ねたり組み合わせたりすることは、この論文で使用されている別の手法であり、ブルガリアのNERCではまだ報告されていません。確立されたアーキテクチャは、BI - LSTM - CRFなどのシーケンスタグ付けタスクに使用され、さまざまな事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルが埋め込みレイヤーに組み合わされ、それらの組み合わせがより良いスコアになるかを決定します。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर शब्द एम्बेडिंग के विभिन्न स्टैक के साथ प्रयोगों और बुल्गारियाई डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों के लिए उनकी उपयोगिता के मूल्यांकन जैसे नामित एंटिटी रिकग्निशन एंड क्लासिफिकेशन (एनईआरसी) और पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच (पीओएस) टैगिंग के साथ रिपोर्ट करता है। शब्द एम्बेडिंग एनएलपी के विकास के मूल में रहते हैं, जिसमें पिछले दो वर्षों में कई प्रमुख भाषा मॉडल बनाए जा रहे हैं जैसे फास्टटेक्स्ट (प्रशस्ति पत्र), एलमो (प्रशस्ति पत्र), बर्ट (प्रशस्ति पत्र) और फ्लेयर (प्रशस्ति पत्र)। स्टैकिंग या विभिन्न शब्द एम्बेडिंग का संयोजन इस पेपर में उपयोग की जाने वाली एक और तकनीक है और अभी भी बल्गेरियाई एनईआरसी के लिए रिपोर्ट नहीं की गई है। अच्छी तरह से स्थापित आर्किटेक्चर का उपयोग बीआई-एलएसटीएम-सीआरएफ जैसे अनुक्रम टैगिंग कार्य के लिए किया जाता है, और विभिन्न पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल को एम्बेडिंग परत में यह तय करने के लिए जोड़ा जाता है कि उनमें से कौन सा संयोजन बेहतर स्कोर करता है।', 'zh': '本文告异词嵌堆栈之实验,而估其对保加利亚下流之任(如名实体识类(NERC)与词性(POS)标)者有用性。 词嵌仍是NLP之核,于往二年中创立数要,如FastText(CITATION),ElMo(CITATION),BERT(CITATION)Flair(CITATION)。 堆叠或合异词嵌入本文中所用一术,但保加利亚语NERC未报。 其序志(如 BI-LSTM-CRF),已建之体系结构,以序其事,以练其言,以定其得分。', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе сообщается об экспериментах с различными стеками вложений слов и оценке их полезности для Болгарии в таких последующих задачах, как распознавание и классификация именованных сущностей (NERC) и маркировка части речи (POS). Вложения слов остаются в центре развития NLP, и за последние два года было создано несколько ключевых языковых моделей, таких как FastText (ЦИТИРОВАНИЕ), ElMo (ЦИТИРОВАНИЕ), BERT (ЦИТИРОВАНИЕ) и Flair (ЦИТИРОВАНИЕ). Укладка или объединение различных вложений слов является еще одним методом, используемым в этой статье и до сих пор не сообщенным для болгарского НКРЭ. Хорошо отлаженная архитектура используется для задачи маркировки последовательностей, такой как BI-LSTM-CRF, и различные предварительно обученные языковые модели объединяются в уровне встраивания, чтобы решить, какая комбинация из них оценивается лучше.', 'ga': 'Tuairiscíonn an páipéar seo ar thurgnaimh le stoic éagsúla de leabú focal agus meastóireacht ar a n-úsáidí do thascanna iartheachtacha na Bulgáire ar nós Aithint agus Aicmiú Aonán Ainmnithe (NERC) agus Cuid-de-Urlabhra (POS) Clibeáil. Fanann leabaithe focal i gcroílár fhorbairt an NLP, agus cruthaíodh roinnt eochairmhúnlaí teanga le dhá bhliain anuas mar FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) agus Flair (CITATION). Teicníc eile a úsáidtear sa pháipéar seo agus nach bhfuil tuairiscithe fós do NERC na Bulgáire is ea cruachadh nó comhcheangal leabú focal difriúil. Úsáidtear ailtireacht seanbhunaithe don tasc clibeála seichimh ar nós BI-LSTM-CRF, agus cuirtear múnlaí teanga réamh-oilte éagsúla le chéile sa chiseal leabaithe chun cinneadh a dhéanamh cé acu teaglaim díobh is fearr a scóráil.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία αναφέρει πειράματα με διαφορετικές στοίβες ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων και την αξιολόγηση της χρησιμότητάς τους για βουλγαρικά μεταγενέστερα καθήκοντα όπως αναγνώριση και ταξινόμηση ονομαστών οντοτήτων (NERC) και σήμανση μέρους λόγου (POS). Η ενσωμάτωση λέξεων παραμένει στον πυρήνα της ανάπτυξης του με αρκετά βασικά γλωσσικά μοντέλα να δημιουργούνται τα τελευταία δύο χρόνια, όπως το FastText (CITATION), το ElMo (CITATION), το BERT (CITATION) και το Flair (CITATION). Η συσσώρευση ή ο συνδυασμός διαφορετικών λέξεων ενσωμάτωσης είναι μια άλλη τεχνική που χρησιμοποιείται σε αυτή την εργασία και ακόμα δεν αναφέρεται για τη βουλγαρική NERC. Η καλά καθιερωμένη αρχιτεκτονική χρησιμοποιείται για την εργασία επισήμανσης ακολουθίας, όπως και διαφορετικά προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα γλώσσας συνδυάζονται στο στρώμα ενσωμάτωσης για να αποφασίσουν ποιος συνδυασμός τους έχει καλύτερη βαθμολογία.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány a különböző szóhalmok beágyazásával végzett kísérletekről számol be, és értékeli azok hasznosságát bolgár downstream feladatokban, mint például a Nevezett Entity Recognition and Classification (NERC) és a Beszédrész (POS) címkézés. A szóbeágyazások az NLP fejlesztésének középpontjában maradnak, az elmúlt két évben számos kulcsfontosságú nyelvi modellt hoztak létre, mint például a FastText (CITATION), az Elmo (CITATION), a BERT (CITATION) és a Flair (CITATION). A különböző szóbeágyazások halmozása vagy kombinálása egy másik technika, amelyet ebben a tanulmányban használnak, és még mindig nem jelentettek a bolgár NERC esetében. Jól megalapozott architektúrát használnak a szekvencia-címkézési feladatokhoz, mint például a BI-LSTM-CRF, és a beágyazási rétegben különböző előre képzett nyelvi modelleket kombinálnak, hogy eldöntsék, melyik kombinációjuk melyik pontszám jobb.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი ექსპერიმენტებზე განსხვავებული სიტყვების შემოწმება და გამოყენება, როგორც ბულდარიური ქვემოწმების მომხმარებისთვის, როგორც სახელი ინტერტის განაცნობა და კლასიფიკაცია (NERC) და სიტყვების ნაწი NLP განვითარების კონდერებში სიტყვების შესაბამისი მოდელები, რომელიც ბოლო ორი წლის შესაბამისი FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) და Flair (CITATION) იქნება. განსხვავებული სიტყვების შეყვარება ან შეყვარება არის სხვა ტექნექტიკა, რომელიც ამ გვერდიში გამოყენებულია და უკვე ბულდარიური NERC-ის შესახებ არ აღწერა. კარგი დააყენებული არქტიქტიკატი გამოყენებულია, როგორც BI-LSTM-CRF, და განსხვავებული წინასწარმოადგენებული ენის მოდელები კომბუნირებულია, რომელსაც მათ კომბუნირებულია.', 'it': "Questo articolo riporta gli esperimenti con diversi stack di embedding di parole e la valutazione della loro utilità per compiti a valle bulgari come Named Entity Recognition and Classification (NERC) e Part-of-speech (POS) Tagging. Le incorporazioni di parole rimangono al centro dello sviluppo di NLP, con diversi modelli linguistici chiave creati negli ultimi due anni come FastText (CITATION), Elmo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) e Flair (CITATION). Impilare o combinare diverse incorporazioni di parole è un'altra tecnica utilizzata in questo articolo e ancora non riportata per il NERC bulgaro. Un'architettura ben consolidata viene utilizzata per l'attività di codifica delle sequenze come BI-LSTM-CRF, e diversi modelli linguistici pre-addestrati vengono combinati nel livello di incorporazione per decidere quale combinazione di essi ha un punteggio migliore.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiami eksperimentai su skirtingais žodžių įterpimo rinkiniais ir jų naudingumo Bulgarijos tolesnėms užduotims, pavyzdžiui, vardinio subjekto pripažinimo ir klasifikavimo (NERC) ir kalbos dalies (POS) ženklinimo, vertinimas. žodžių įtraukimas išlieka NLP kūrimo pagrindu, per pastaruosius dvejus metus buvo sukurti keli pagrindiniai kalbų modeliai, pavyzdžiui, FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) ir Flair (CITATION). Įvairių žodžių įdėjimų įdėjimas arba jų derinimas yra kitas šiame popieriuje naudojamas metodas, apie kurį Bulgarijos NERC vis dar nėra pranešta. Gerai sukurta architektūra naudojama sekos žymėjimo užduotims, pvz., BI-LSTM-CRF, ir įvairi iš anksto parengti kalbos modeliai derinami įterpiamuoju sluoksniu, kad būtų galima nuspręsti, kuris iš jų derinys geriau vertina.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз бірнеше сөздерді ендіру және олардың болгариялық төмендету тапсырмаларының пайдалығын, мысалы, аталған нысандарды анықтау және классификациялау (NERC) және сөздердің бөлігі (POS) тегтері үшін тәжірибелерін тал Сөздегі екі жылда FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) және Flair (CITATION) секілді бірнеше кілт тіл үлгілері жасалған NLP құрылысының негізгісінде тұрады. Басқа сөздерді ендіру немесе біріктіру - бұл қағазда қолданылатын басқа техника. Бұл қағаз үшін әлі Болгария NERC үшін хабарламайды. BI- LSTM- CRF секілді тапсырмаларды таңдау үшін жақсы құрылған архитектура қолданылады, және бірнеше алдын- оқылған тіл үлгілері ендіру қабаттарында біріктірілген, олардың қайсының жақсы нәтижесін шешу', 'mk': 'Овој документ известува за експериментите со различни купки вложувања на зборови и проценка на нивната корисност за бугарските понатамошни задачи како што се Именуваното препознавање и класификација на ентитетите (НЕРЦ) и Иметирање на дел од говорот (ПоС). Вклучувањето на зборови останува во јадрото на развојот на НЛП, со неколку клучни јазички модели кои се создадени во текот на изминатите две години, како што се FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) и Flair (CITATION). Следењето или комбинацијата на различни зборови е друга техника која се користи во оваа хартија и сé уште не е известена за бугарската НЕРЦ. Добро воспоставена архитектура се користи за задачата за означување на секвенцата, како што е Би-LSTM-CRF, и различни предобучени јазички модели се комбинирани во вградувачкиот слој за да се одлучи која комбинација од нив е подобра.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini melaporkan eksperimen dengan tumpukan pelbagai penyampaian perkataan dan penilaian kegunaan mereka untuk tugas turun Bulgari seperti Pengenalan Entiti bernama dan Klasifikasi (NERC) dan Tagging Bahagian-dari-ucapan (POS). Penampilan perkataan tetap di inti pembangunan NLP, dengan beberapa model bahasa kunci dicipta selama dua tahun terakhir seperti FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) dan Flair (CITATION). Menentang atau menggabungkan penyambungan perkataan berbeza adalah teknik lain yang digunakan dalam kertas ini dan masih tidak dilaporkan untuk NERC Bulgaria. Arkitektur yang ditetapkan dengan baik digunakan untuk tugas tag urutan seperti BI-LSTM-CRF, dan model bahasa berlainan yang dilatih dahulu digabungkan dalam lapisan penyembedding untuk memutuskan kombinasi mana daripada mereka yang lebih baik skor.', 'ml': 'പേര് എന്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുകയും സംസാരിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നത് പോലുള്ള പേര് പേരിട്ട എന്റിറ്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുകയും ചെയ്യുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രയോജനവും  വാക്കുകള്\u200d എംഎല്\u200dപിയുടെ വികസിപ്പിന്റെ ഉള്ളടക്കത്തില്\u200d താമസിക്കുന്നു. കഴിഞ്ഞ രണ്ടു വര്\u200dഷങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മുമ്പ് ഫാസ്റ്റ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് പോലെ സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട പല ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d സ്റ്റാക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത ബി- എല്\u200dസ്റ്റി- എംഎം- CRF എന്ന പോലുള്ള സെക്കന്റ് ടാഗിങ്ങ് ജോലിക്കായി നല്ല സ്ഥാപിച്ച ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കേറ്റര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാ', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jirrapporta dwar esperimenti b’pilastri differenti ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem u evalwazzjoni tal-utilità tagħhom għall-kompiti Bulgari downstream bħall-Isem Entity Recognition and Classification (NERC) u l-Partijiet ta’ Diskussjoni (POS) Tagging. L-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem tibqa’ fil-qalba tal-iżvilupp tal-NLP, b’bosta mudelli lingwistiċi ewlenin li nħolqu matul l-aħħar sentejn bħal FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) u Flair (CITATION). L-istakkar jew il-kombinazzjoni ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem differenti hija teknika oħra użata f’din il-karta u għadha mhijiex irrappurtata għall-Bulgarian NERC. L-arkitettura stabbilita sew tintuża għall-kompitu tat-tikkettar tas-sekwenza bħall-BI-LSTM-CRF, u mudelli differenti ta’ lingwa mħarrġa minn qabel huma kkombinati fis-saff ta’ inkorporazzjoni biex jiddeċiedu liema kombinazzjoni minnhom tagħmel punteġġi aħjar.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł przedstawia eksperymenty z różnymi stosami osadzeń słów i ocenę ich przydatności dla bułgarskich zadań kolejnych, takich jak rozpoznawanie i klasyfikacja nazwanych podmiotów (NERC) i tagowanie części mowy (POS). Integracje słów pozostają w centrum rozwoju NLP, a w ciągu ostatnich dwóch lat powstało kilka kluczowych modeli językowych, takich jak FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) i Flair (CITATION). Kolejną techniką stosowaną w niniejszym artykule jest układanie lub łączenie różnych osadzeń słowowych i nadal nie zgłaszane dla bułgarskiego NERC. Dobrze ugruntowana architektura jest używana do zadania tagowania sekwencji, takich jak BI-LSTM-CRF, a różne wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe są łączone w warstwie osadzania, aby zdecydować, która z nich kombinacja osiąga lepsze wyniki.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă experimente cu diferite stive de încorporări de cuvinte și evaluarea utilității acestora pentru sarcini din aval bulgare, cum ar fi recunoașterea și clasificarea entităților denumite (NERC) și etichetarea Part-of-speech (POS). Încorporările de cuvinte rămân în centrul dezvoltării PNL, mai multe modele lingvistice cheie fiind create în ultimii doi ani, cum ar fi FastText (CITATION), Elmo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) și Flair (CITATION). Stivuirea sau combinarea diferitelor încorporări de cuvinte este o altă tehnică folosită în această lucrare și încă nu a fost raportată pentru NERC bulgar. Arhitectura bine stabilită este utilizată pentru activitatea de etichetare a secvențelor, cum ar fi BI-LSTM-CRF, iar diferite modele lingvistice pre-instruite sunt combinate în stratul de încorporare pentru a decide care combinație dintre ele punctează mai bine.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас Болгариан доорх үйл ажиллагаанд өөр хэсэг хэмжээний хэмжээтэй туршилтуудын тухай мэдээлэл өгдөг. Сүүлийн хоёр жилийн турш FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) болон Flair (CITATION) шиг олон чухал хэл загварууд бүтээгдэж байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр ашиглаж буй өөр үгнүүдийг нэгтгэх эсвэл нэгтгэх нь булгарийн НЕРК-д хэрэглэгддэг өөр техник юм. Би-LSTM-CRF гэх мэт дарааллын тагжуулах ажлын хувьд бүтээгдэхүүний архитектур хэрэглэгддэг. Өөр дасгал сургалтын хэл загварууд нь хамтдаа хамтдаа хамтдаа хамтдаа хамтдаа хамтдаа хамтдаа хамтда', 'no': 'Denne papiret rapporterer om eksperimenter med ulike stader av ordinnbygging og evaluering av dei nyttigheten for Bulgarske nedstrekkoppgåver, som namnet Entity Recognition and Classification (NERC) og Part of speech (POS) Tagging. Ordinnbygging blir i kjernen av utviklinga av NLP, med fleire nøkkelspråk-modeller som blir laga over dei siste to åra som FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) og Flair (CITATION). Dette er eit anna teknikk som brukar i denne papiret og ikkje fortsatt rapportert for Bulgarsk NERC om å kombinerera ulike ord-innbygging. Vel oppretta arkitektur blir brukt for å merke oppgåva som BI-LSTM-CRF, og forskjellige språk-modeller er kombinerte i det innebygde laget for å bestemma kva kombinasjon av dei skal vere bedre.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats redovisar experiment med olika staplar av ordinbäddningar och utvärdering av deras användbarhet för bulgariska nedströmsuppgifter såsom Named Entity Recognition and Classification (NERC) och Part-of-speech (POS) Tagging. Ordinbäddningar förblir kärnan i utvecklingen av NLP, med flera nyckelspråkmodeller som skapats under de senaste två åren som FastText (CITATION), Elmo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) och Flair (CITATION). Stapling eller kombination av olika ord inbäddningar är en annan teknik som används i detta arbete och fortfarande inte rapporterats för bulgariska NERC. Väletablerad arkitektur används för sekvenstaggningsuppgiften som BI-LSTM-CRF, och olika förklädda språkmodeller kombineras i inbäddningslaget för att avgöra vilken kombination av dem som får bäst resultat.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir izvještava o eksperimentima sa različitim gomilom reči ugrađenja i procjena njihove korisnosti za bugarske niz zadatke, poput priznanja i klasifikacije imena entiteta (NERC) i označavanja dijela govora (POS). Uključenje reèi ostaju u temelju razvoja NLP-a, sa nekoliko ključnih jezičkih modela koje su stvorene u proteklih dve godine poput FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) i Flair (CITATION). Druga tehnika koja se koristi u ovom papiru i još uvek nije prijavljena za Bugarski NERC. Dobro uspostavljena arhitektura se koristi za zadatak označavanja sekvence kao što je BI-LSTM-CRF, a različiti predobučeni jezički modeli su kombinirani u ugrađenom sloju kako bi odlučili koja kombinacija od njih bolja rezultata.', 'si': 'Name WordEmbdings are in the core of the progress of NLP, with a number of key language Models that are set up over the latter 2 decades, as FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) and Flair (CITATION) වගේ. වෙනස් වචනය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් මේ පැත්තේ භාව හොඳයි ස්ථාපනය කරපු ස්ථාපනය භාවිතා වෙන්නේ, BI-LSTM-CRF වගේ, සහ වෙනස් ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂාව මොඩේල් සම්බන්ධ කරපු ස්ථානයෙන් ඉ', 'so': "Wargelintan warqaddan ayaa ku qoran jirrabaadyo kala duduwan oo hadal ku soo diraya iyo qiimeynaya faa'iidadooda shaqaalaha Bulgaria ee webiga ka hooseeya, sida magaca aqoonsiga iyo klassification (NERC) iyo qayb ka mid ah hadalka (POS). Hadal embeddings remain in the core of development of NLP, with several models of key language created over the last two years like FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) and Flair (CITATION). Stacking or combining different word embeddings is another technique used in this paper and still not reported for Bulgarian NERC.  Arkit sax ah waxaa loo isticmaalaa shaqada tagitaanka, sida BI-LSTM-CRF, waxaana lagu soo bandhigaa noocyo kala duduwan oo afka hore lagu baray, si uu u go’aamiyo labada kooxood oo isku xiran.", 'ta': 'Name Name Stacking or combining different word embeddings is another technique used in this paper and still not reported for Bulgarian NERC.  சரியாக நிறுவப்பட்ட கட்டுரையை பிஐ- LSTM- CRF போன்ற வரிசையில் ஒட்டும் செயலுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, மற்றும் வேறு முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகள் உள்ளிட', 'ur': 'This paper reports on experiments with different stacks of words embedding and evaluation of their usefulness for Bulgarian downstream tasks such as Named Entity Recognition and Classification (NERC) and Part-of-speech (POS) Tagging. کلمات انبودینگ NLP کی توسعہ کے مرکز میں رہتے ہیں، ان کے لئے اگلے دو سال میں بہت سے کلمات کی زبان مدل بنائے گئے ہیں جیسے FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) اور Flair (CITATION) ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ایک دوسری تکنیک استکینگ یا مختلف کلمات امبرڈینگ کی ترکینگ کرنا ہے اور ابھی بلگاری NERC کے لئے گزارش نہیں کی جاتی۔ بہترین ساختہ معماری ٹاگ ٹائگ ٹاکس کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں جیسے BI-LSTM-CRF، اور مختلف پیش آموزش کی زبان نمڈلوں میں انڈینگ لائر میں جمع کئے جاتے ہیں تاکہ فیصلہ کریں کہ ان میں سے کس کی ترکیب بہتر ہے.', 'uz': "Name Name Bulgariy NERC uchun boshqa so'zlarni birlashtirish yoki birlashtirish uchun boshqa teknologiya ishlatiladi. Name", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này báo cáo về các thí nghiệm với nhiều chồng khác nhau về sự tác động từ ngữ và đánh giá sự hữu dụng của nó cho các công việc xuôi dòng Bulgaria như Named Entity recognition and classification (NERC) và Phần của ngôn ngữ (POS) Tagping. Sự gắn kết từ ở cốt lõi của việc phát triển ngôn ngữ Nchọc, với nhiều mô hình ngôn ngữ chủ chốt được tạo ra trong vòng hai năm qua như FastbText (Citation), ElMo (Citation), BERT (Citation) và Flair (Citation). Xếp vào hoặc kết hợp các từ khác nhau là một kỹ thuật khác được sử dụng trong tờ giấy này và vẫn chưa được báo cáo cho công ty hâm mộ Bulgaria. Kiến trúc được thiết lập kỹ lưỡng được sử dụng cho nhiệm vụ định vị dãy như BI-LSTM-CRF, và các mô hình ngôn ngữ khác nhau được ghép lại trong lớp nhúng để quyết định điểm kết hợp của chúng tốt hơn.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя експерименти с различни купчини от вграждания на думи и оценка на тяхната полезност за задачи в България надолу по веригата като разпознаване и класификация на имена на субекти (НЕРК) и етикетиране на част от речта (ПОС). Вградените думи остават в основата на развитието на НЛП, като през последните две години се създават няколко ключови езикови модела като FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) и Flair (CITATION). Друга техника, използвана в тази статия и все още не е докладвана за българския НЕРК, е натрупването или комбинирането на различни словни вграждания. За задачата за маркиране на последователността се използва добре установена архитектура, като например и различни предварително обучени езикови модели се комбинират в вграждащия слой, за да се реши коя комбинация от тях има по-добра оценка.', 'da': 'Denne artikel rapporterer om eksperimenter med forskellige stakke af ordindlejringer og evaluering af deres anvendelighed til bulgarske downstream opgaver såsom Named Entity Recognition and Classification (NERC) og Part-of-speech (POS) Tagging. Ordindlejringer forbliver kernen i udviklingen af NLP, med flere vigtige sprogmodeller er blevet skabt i løbet af de sidste to år som FastText (CITATION), Elmo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) og Flair (CITATION). Stabling eller kombinering af forskellige ord indlejringer er en anden teknik, der anvendes i dette papir og stadig ikke rapporteret for bulgarsk NERC. Veletableret arkitektur bruges til sekvensmærkningsopgaven som BI-LSTM-CRF, og forskellige prætrænede sprogmodeller kombineres i indlejringslaget for at beslutte, hvilken kombination af dem der scorer bedre.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir izvještava o eksperimentima s različitim gomilom riječi ugrađenja i procjena njihove korisnosti za bugarske niz zadatke poput priznanja i klasifikacije imenovanih podataka (NERC) i označavanja dijela govora (POS). Uključenje riječi ostaju u temelju razvoja NLP-a, s nekoliko ključnih jezičkih modela koje su stvorene u proteklih dvije godine poput FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) i Flair (CITATION). Druga tehnika koja se koristi u ovom papiru i još uvijek nije prijavljena za Bugarsku NERC-u. Dobro uspostavljena arhitektura se koristi za zadatak označavanja sekvence poput BI-LSTM-CRF, a različiti predobučeni jezički modeli su kombinirani u ugrađenom sloju kako bi odlučili koja kombinacija od njih bolja rezultata.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag berichtet über Experimente mit verschiedenen Stapeln von Wort-Einbettungen und Bewertung ihrer Nützlichkeit für bulgarische nachgelagerte Aufgaben wie Named Entity Recognition and Classification (NERC) und Part-of-Speech (POS) Tagging. Worteinbettungen bleiben im Kern der Entwicklung von NLP, wobei in den letzten zwei Jahren mehrere Schlüsselsprachmodelle wie FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) und Flair (CITATION) erstellt wurden. Das Stapeln oder Kombinieren verschiedener Worteinbettungen ist eine weitere Technik, die in diesem Papier verwendet wird und noch nicht für bulgarische NERC berichtet wird. Für die Sequenz-Tagging-Aufgabe wie BI-LSTM-CRF wird eine etablierte Architektur verwendet, und verschiedene vortrainierte Sprachmodelle werden in der Einbettungsebene kombiniert, um zu entscheiden, welche Kombination von ihnen besser abschneidet.', 'id': 'This paper reports on experiments with different stacks of word embeddings and evaluation of their usefulness for Bulgarian downstream tasks such as Named Entity Recognition and Classification (NERC) and Part-of-speech (POS) Tagging.  Penampilan kata tetap di inti pembangunan NLP, dengan beberapa model bahasa kunci diciptakan selama dua tahun terakhir seperti FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) dan Flair (CITATION). Mengumpul atau menggabungkan pembangunan kata yang berbeda adalah teknik lain yang digunakan dalam kertas ini dan masih belum dilaporkan untuk NERC Bulgaria. Arkitektur yang ditentukan dengan baik digunakan untuk tugas penulisan urutan seperti BI-LSTM-CRF, dan model bahasa yang berbeda yang dilatih-dilatih dikombinasikan dalam lapisan penerbangan untuk memutuskan kombinasi mana dari mereka yang lebih baik.', 'ko': '본고는 서로 다른 단어가 창고에 박힌 실험을 보고하고 불가리아 하류 임무, 예를 들어 명칭 실체 식별과 분류(NERC)와 단어성(POS) 표기 등 불가리아 하류 임무에 대한 유용성을 평가했다.단어 삽입은 여전히 NLP 개발의 핵심으로 지난 2년 동안FastText(인용문), ElMo(인용문), BERT(인용문)와 Flair(인용문) 등 몇 가지 관건적인 언어 모델을 만들었다.서로 다른 단어를 쌓거나 조합해서 삽입하는 것은 본고에서 사용한 또 다른 기술이지만 불가리아어 NERC는 아직 보도되지 않았다.BI-LSTM-CRF 등 시퀀스 태그 임무는 성숙한 아키텍처를 사용하고, 내장 레이어에 서로 다른 사전 트레이닝 언어 모델을 조합하여 어떤 조합이 더 좋은지 결정한다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ در مورد آزمایش\u200cهای مختلف با جمله\u200cهای عبارت و ارزیابی کارشان برای کارهای پایین بولگاری مثل شناسایی و شناسایی اجتماعی نامیده (NERC) و قسمتی از گفتار (POS) گزارش می\u200cدهد. جمع کردن کلمات در مرکز توسعه NLP می\u200cمانند، با چند مدل کلید زبان در دو سال گذشته مانند FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) و Flair (CITATION) ایجاد می\u200cشوند. تکنیک دیگری است که در این کاغذ استفاده می\u200cشود و هنوز برای NERC بلگاری گزارش نمی\u200cدهد. معماری بسیار خوب ساخته شده برای کار برگزیدن برچسب\u200cها مثل BI-LSTM-CRF استفاده می\u200cشود، و مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش زبانی مختلف در طبقه\u200cای متحده می\u200cشوند تا تصمیم بگیرند که کدام یک ترکیب از آنها بهتر امتیاز می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaripoti kuhusu majaribio mbalimbali ya maneno yanayotumika na kutathmini manufaa yao kwa kazi za mito ya Bulgaria kama vile Tambulisho na Utafiti (NERC) na Sehemu ya hotuba (POS). Matambo yanaendelea kwenye msingi wa maendeleo ya NLP, na mifano kadhaa ya lugha muhimu iliyotengenezwa kwa miaka miwili iliyopita kama vile FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) na Mfuko (CITATION). Kusimamia au kuunganisha maneno tofauti ni teknolojia nyingine inayotumiwa katika gazeti hili na bado haitaarifiwa kwa ajili ya NERC ya Bulgaria. Ujengo ulioanzishwa vizuri unatumiwa kwa ajili ya jukumu la kuchagua mfululizo kama vile BI-LSTM-CRF, na miundo mbalimbali ya lugha zilizojifunza vimeunganishwa katika kiwango kinachopangwa ili kuamua muunganiko wao ni bora zaidi.', 'af': "Hierdie papier rapporteer op eksperimente met verskillende stappe van woord inbettings en evaluering van hul gebruikbaardigheid vir Bulgaarske onderstreem opdragte soos genoem Entity Recognition and Classification (NERC) en Part-of-speech (POS) Tagging. Woord inbettings bly in die kern van die ontwikkeling van NLP, met veelvuldige sleutel taal modele wat geskep word oor die laaste twee jaar soos FastText (KYTATION), ElMo (KYTATION), BERT (KYTATION) en Flair (KYTATION). Stapeling of kombinasie van verskillende woord inbêding is 'n ander teknike wat in hierdie papier gebruik word en steeds nie rapporteer vir Bulgarse NERC nie. Wel-geïnstalleerde arkitektuur is gebruik vir die volgorde merking taak soos BI-LSTM-CRF, en verskillende voorafgeleerde taal modele word gekombineer in die inbêding laag om te besluit watter kombinasie van hulle beter tel.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument raporton mbi eksperimentet me grupe të ndryshme të përfshirjeve të fjalëve dhe vlerësimit të dobësisë së tyre për detyrat bullgare poshtë rrjedhës të tilla si njohja dhe klasifikimi i njësisë së quajtur (NERC) dhe etiketa e pjesës së fjalimit (POS). Përmbajtja e fjalëve qëndron në thelbin e zhvillimit të NLP, me disa modele gjuhësh kyçe që janë krijuar gjatë dy viteve të fundit si FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) dhe Flair (CITATION). Mbledhja apo kombinimi i përfshirjeve të fjalëve të ndryshme është një teknikë tjetër e përdorur në këtë letër dhe ende nuk raportohet për NERC bullgare. Arkitektura e vendosur mirë përdoret për detyrën e shënimit të sekuencës të tillë si BI-LSTM-CRF dhe modele të ndryshme gjuhësh të paratrajnuara janë kombinuar në nivelin e përfshirjes për të vendosur se cila kombinim prej tyre shënon më mirë.', 'nl': 'Deze paper rapporteert over experimenten met verschillende stapels woord embeddings en evaluatie van hun nut voor Bulgaarse downstream taken zoals Named Entity Recognition and Classification (NERC) en Part-of-Speech (POS) Tagging. Word embeddings blijven de kern van de ontwikkeling van NLP, met verschillende belangrijke taalmodellen die de afgelopen twee jaar zijn gemaakt, zoals FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) en Flair (CITATION). Het stapelen of combineren van verschillende woord embeddings is een andere techniek die wordt gebruikt in dit artikel en nog steeds niet gerapporteerd voor Bulgaars NERC. Goed gevestigde architectuur wordt gebruikt voor de sequentie tagging taak zoals BI-LSTM-CRF, en verschillende vooraf getrainde taalmodellen worden gecombineerd in de insluitingslaag om te bepalen welke combinatie ervan beter scoort.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz bolgariýanyň indiki işi üçin ullanýan ýerleri kelime girişimleri bilen deňleýän deneyler barada hasaplaýar. NLP'yň gelişiminiň esasy bilen söz baglanmasy bar. Soňky iki ýyl içinde Fast Text (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) we Flair (CITATION) ýaly birnäçe açyk dil nusgalary bar. Bu kagyzda başga söz integrasyny çykmak ýa-da birleşmek başga teknikidir we ol halda Bulgarça NERC üçin berilmeýär. BI-LSTM-CRF ýaly taýýarlanan arhitektura, beýleki öňe taýýarlanan täzelikleri üçin ullanylýar.", 'am': 'This paper reports on experiments with different stacks of word embeddings and evaluation of their usefulness for Bulgarian downstream tasks such as Named Entity Recognition and Classification (NERC) and Part-of-speech (POS) Tagging.  በኋለኛው ሁለት ዓመት እንደ ፋስት ጽሑፍ (CITATION), ኤል (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) እና Flair (CITATION) በተፈጠሩ የቁልፍ ቋንቋ ሞዴል ውስጥ የሚኖሩ ቃላት ግንኙነቶች ውስጥ ይኖራሉ፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ የተጠቀመ ወይም ደግሞ ለቡልጋሪያ NERC ያልተዘጋጀ የንግግር ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ የመሠረተ ሥርዓት እንደ BI-LSTM-CRF እና የተለየ የቋንቋ ሞዴላዎች በክፍለ ደረጃው ውስጥ የተጠቃቀሙ ናቸው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը պատմում է բառերի տարբեր կույտերի փորձարկումների մասին և դրանց օգտակարության գնահատման մասին բուլգարիայի ներքևի առաջադրանքների համար, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ անվանումների ճանաչելը և դասակարգումը (ՆԵՌԿ) և խոսքի մասը (POS) նշանները: Բառերի ներդրումը մնում է ՆԼՊ-ի զարգացման հիմքում, և վերջին երկու տարիների ընթացքում ստեղծվում են մի քանի կարևոր լեզվի մոդելներ, ինչպիսիք են «արագ տեքստը», «արագ տեքստը», «Էլմո», «բերթ», «արագ տեքստը», «արագ տեքստ Տարբեր բառերի ներգրավման հետևելը կամ համադրումը մեկ այլ մեթոդ է, որը օգտագործվում է այս թղթի մեջ և որը դեռևս չի հայտարարվել Բուլգարական ՆԵՌԿ-ի համար: Լավ կազմակերպված ճարտարապետությունը օգտագործվում է հաջորդականության նշանակման խնդիրների համար, ինչպիսիք են ԲԻ-ԼՍԹՄ-ԿՌՖ, և տարբեր նախկինում պատրաստված լեզվի մոդելները համադրվում են ներդրման շերտում, որոշելու համար, թե դրանց համադրումը ավելի լավ է գն', 'az': "Bu kağıt, İsmim Entity Recognition, Classification (NERC) və Part-of-speech (POS) Tagging kimi, Bulgariyalı aşağı işləri üçün faydalanılıqlarını müxtəlif sözlərlə birlikdə təcrübələr haqqında xəbər verir. Sözlüklər NLP'in gelişməsinin dibində qalar, son iki il içində FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) və Flair (CITATION) kimi bir neçə düzgün dil modelləri yaradılırlar. Bu kağıtda istifadə edilən başqa bir teknikədir və hələ də Bulgariya NERC üçün bildirilmədir. BI-LSTM-CRF kimi təhsil edilmiş arhitektür üçün istifadə edilir. Onların hansı birləşdirilməsini daha yaxşı hesablamaq üçün müxtəlif əvvəl təhsil edilmiş dil modelləri birləşdirilmişdir.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি প্রতিবেদন করেছে বুলগেরিয়ার নীচের কাজের জন্য তাদের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাষার পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা এবং মূল্যের বিষয়টি যেমন নামের প্রতিষ্ঠা ফাস্ট ট টেক্সট (সিটাশন), এল মো (সিট্যাটেশন), বার্ট (সিটাটিশন) এবং ফ্লায়ার (সিটাশন) এর মতো বেশ কয়েকটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভাষার মডেল তৈরি করা হয়েছে। এই পত্রিকায় ব্যবহৃত আরেকটি প্রযুক্তি এবং এখনও বুলগেরিয়ার নেআরসির জন্য রিপোর্ট করা হয়নি। Well-established architecture is used for the sequence tagging task such as BI-LSTM-CRF, and different pre-trained language models are combined in the embedding layer to decide which combination of them scores better.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir izvještava o eksperimentima sa različitim gomilom riječi ugrađenja i procjena njihove korisnosti za bugarske niz zadatke poput priznanja i klasifikacije imenovanih podataka (NERC) i oznake dio govora (POS). Uključenje riječi ostaju u temelju razvoja NLP-a, s nekoliko ključnih jezičkih modela koje su stvorene u proteklih dvije godine poput FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) i Flair (CITATION). Ubijanje ili kombinacija različitih riječi o ugrađenju je druga tehnika koja se koristi u ovom papiru i još uvijek nije prijavljena za bugarski NERC. Dobro uspostavljena arhitektura se koristi za zadatak označavanja sekvence poput BI-LSTM-CRF, a različiti predobučeni jezički modeli su kombinirani u ugrađenom sloju kako bi odlučili koja kombinacija od njih bolja rezultata.', 'ca': "Aquest paper relata experiments amb diverses piles d'incorporacions de paraules i l'evaluació de la seva utilitat per a tasques búlgareses en avall com la Recognició i Classificació de Nomada Entitat (NERC) i l'Etiqueta de Part-of-speech (POS). L'incorporació de paraules es manté en el nucli del desenvolupament del NLP, amb molts models de llenguatge clau creats en els últims dos anys com FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) i Flair (CITATION). Encontrar o combinar diferents incorporacions de paraules és una altra tècnica que s'utilitza en aquest paper i encara no es diu per a la NERC búlgara. Well-established architecture is used for the sequence tagging task such as BI-LSTM-CRF, and different pre-trained language models are combined in the embedding layer to decide which combination of them scores better.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje experimenty s různými stohy vložení slov a hodnocení jejich užitečnosti pro bulharské následné úlohy, jako je rozpoznávání a klasifikace jmenovaných entit (NERC) a značení části řeči (POS). Vložení slov zůstává v jádru vývoje NLP, přičemž v posledních dvou letech vzniklo několik klíčových jazykových modelů, jako například FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) a Flair (CITATION). Stohování nebo kombinování různých slovních vložení je další technika používaná v tomto článku a stále není hlášena pro bulharský NERC. Pro úlohu sekvenčního tagování, jako je BI-LSTM-CRF, se používá dobře zavedená architektura a v vložené vrstvě jsou kombinovány různé předškolené jazykové modely, aby se rozhodlo, která kombinace z nich skóre lepší.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis esitatakse katseid erinevate sõnade manustamisega ning hinnatakse nende kasulikkust Bulgaaria alljärgnevates ülesannetes, nagu nimega üksuste tunnustamine ja klassifitseerimine (NERC) ja kõneosa märgistamine (POS). Sõnade manustamine jääb uue õppekava arendamise keskmesse ning viimase kahe aasta jooksul on loodud mitmeid põhilisi keelemudeleid nagu FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) ja Flair (CITATION). Erinevate sõnade manustamise virnastamine või kombineerimine on veel üks selles töös kasutatud tehnika, mida Bulgaaria NERC puhul veel ei ole kirjeldatud. Järjekordade sildistamise ülesandeks, näiteks BI-LSTM-CRF, kasutatakse hästi väljakujunenud arhitektuuri ning manustamiskihti kombineeritakse erinevad eelõpetatud keelemudelid, et otsustada, milline kombinatsioon neist paremini hindab.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli raportoi erilaisista sanaupotuspinoista tehdyistä kokeista ja niiden hyödyllisyydestä bulgarialaisissa jatkojalostustehtävissä, kuten NERC (Nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistus ja luokittelu) ja POS (Part-of-speech). Sanaupotukset pysyvät NLP:n kehityksen ytimessä, ja kahden viime vuoden aikana on luotu useita keskeisiä kielimalleja, kuten FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) ja Flair (CITATION). Eri sanaupotusten pinoaminen tai yhdistäminen on toinen menetelmä, jota käytetään tässä artikkelissa, eikä vieläkään raportoitu bulgarian NERC:ssä. Hyvin vakiintunutta arkkitehtuuria käytetään sekvenssimallennustehtävään, kuten BI-LSTM-CRF, ja erilaiset esikoulutetut kielimallit yhdistetään upotuskerrokseen päättämään, mikä yhdistelmä niistä tuottaa parempia tuloksia.', 'jv': 'Name embedding word politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': '@ info @ info: status @ info: status Well-established architecture is used for the sequence tagging task such as BI-LSTM-CRF, and different pre-trained language models are combined in the embedding layer to decide which combination of them scores better.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek poroča o poskusih z različnimi sklopi vgradnje besed in ocenjevanju njihove uporabnosti pri bolgarskih nadaljnjih nalogah, kot sta prepoznavanje in klasifikacija imenovanih subjektov (NERC) in označevanje dela govora (POS). Besedne vključitve ostajajo v jedro razvoja NLP, saj so v zadnjih dveh letih ustvarjali več ključnih jezikovnih modelov, kot so FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) in Flair (CITATION). Zlaganje ali kombiniranje različnih besednih vdelav je še ena tehnika, ki se uporablja v tem članku in še vedno ni poročala za bolgarsko NERC. Dobro uveljavljena arhitektura se uporablja za opravilo označevanja zaporedja, kot je BI-LSTM-CRF, različni vnaprej usposobljeni jezikovni modeli pa so združeni v plasti vdelave, da se odloči, katera kombinacija teh modelov bolje ocenjuje.', 'he': 'העבודה הזו דווחת על ניסויים עם ערכות שונות של מילים תוספות והעריכה של שימושיהם למשימות בולגריות למטה כגון זיהוי ואישור איכויות בשם (NERC) וחלק הנאום (POS) Tagging. תוכניות מילים נשארות בלב הפיתוח של NLP, עם כמה דוגמנים לשפה מפתחות יוצרים במהלך השנתיים האחרונות כמו FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) ו Flair (CITATION). עקבות או שילוב מילים שונות היא טכניקה אחרת שמשתמשת בעיתון הזה ועדיין לא דווחת עבור NERC בולגרי. הארכיטקטורה המבוססת היטב משתמשת למשימת התג הרצף, כמו BI-LSTM-CRF, ודוגמנים שונים לשפה מאומנים מראש משולבים בשכבת ההכנה כדי להחליט איזה שילוב מהם מצליח יותר טוב.', 'bo': 'This paper reports on experiments with different stacks of word embeddings and evaluation of their usefulness for Bulgarian downstream tasks such as Named Entity Recognition and Classification (NERC) and Part-of-speech (POS) Tagging. Word embeddings stay in the core of the development of NLP, with several key language models being created over the last two years like FastText (CITATION), ElMo (CITATION), BERT (CITATION) and Flair (CITATION). Stacking or combining different words embedding is another technique used in this paper and still not reported for Bulgarian NERC. Well-established architecture is used for the sequence tagging task such as BI-LSTM-CRF, and different pre-trained language models are combined in the embedding layer to decide which combination of them scores better.'}
{'en': 'Overview on NLP Techniques for Content-based Recommender Systems for Books', 'ar': 'نظرة عامة على تقنيات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية للأنظمة المستندة إلى المحتوى للكتب', 'pt': 'Visão geral sobre técnicas de PNL para sistemas de recomendação baseados em conteúdo para livros', 'es': 'Descripción general de las técnicas de PNL para los sistemas de recomendación de libros basados en el contenido', 'fr': 'Présentation des techniques de PNL pour les systèmes de recommandation basés sur le contenu pour les livres', 'ja': '書籍向けコンテンツベースレコメンダシステムのためのNLPテクニックの概要', 'zh': '盖图书荐统NLP术概述', 'hi': 'पुस्तकों के लिए सामग्री-आधारित अनुशंसक सिस्टम के लिए एनएलपी तकनीकों पर सिंहावलोकन', 'ru': 'Обзор методов NLP для контентных рекомендательных систем для книг', 'ga': 'Forbhreathnú ar Theicnící NLP le haghaidh Córais Molta Bunaithe ar Ábhar do Leabhair', 'hu': 'Áttekintés a tartalom alapú ajánló rendszerek NLP technikáiról a könyvekhez', 'el': 'Επισκόπηση των τεχνικών για συστήματα συστάσεων βασισμένα στο περιεχόμενο για βιβλία', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Panoramica sulle tecniche NLP per i sistemi di raccomandazione basati su contenuti per libri', 'kk': 'Мазмұны негіздеген рекомендациялау жүйелерінің NLP техникаларының қарау', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'പുസ്തകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പരിശോധന സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള NLP ടെക്നിക്കുകള്\u200d നോക്കുക', 'mt': 'Ħarsa ġenerali lejn it-Tekniki NLP għal Sistemi ta’ Rakkomandazzjoni għall-Ktejjeb ibbażati fuq il-Kontenut', 'mk': 'Преглед на техниките на NLP за препорачувачки системи за книги базирани на содржина', 'no': 'Oversikt på NLP- teknikk for innhaldsbaserte anbefalingssystemer for bøker', 'mn': 'NLP техникийн тухай дүгнэлт нь Content-based Recommender Systems for Books', 'ro': 'Prezentare generală asupra tehnicilor PNL pentru sistemele de recomandare bazate pe conținut pentru cărți', 'sr': 'Pregled NLP tehnike za sisteme preporuèujuæi na sadržaju knjige', 'so': 'Ka fiiri qoraalka', 'lt': 'NLP knygų rekomendavimo sistemų turiniu technologijų apžvalga', 'pl': 'Przegląd technik NLP dla systemów rekomendujących książki opartych na treści', 'sv': 'Översikt över NLP-tekniker för innehållsbaserade rekommendationssystem för böcker', 'ta': 'Comment', 'ur': 'Name', 'si': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Ghi chú về công nghệ Y học về Hệ thống Y pháp nội dung cho sách', 'bg': 'Преглед на техниките за НЛП за системи за препоръки за книги, базирани на съдържание', 'hr': 'Pregled NLP tehnike za sustave preporukivača za knjige na temelju sadržaja', 'da': 'Oversigt over NLP teknikker til indholdsbaserede anbefalingssystemer til bøger', 'nl': 'Overzicht van NLP-technieken voor inhoudsbasierte aanbevelingssystemen voor boeken', 'ko': '내용 기반 도서 추천 시스템 NLP 기술 총론', 'de': 'Überblick über NLP-Techniken für inhaltsbasierte Empfehlungssysteme für Bücher', 'id': 'Penjelasan tentang Teknik NLP untuk Sistem Recommender untuk Buku Berdasarkan Konten', 'sw': 'Tazama juu ya Teknolojia za NLP kwa Mapendekezo ya Mazingira', 'tr': 'NLP Tehniklerinde Mazmunlar Baýlanan Mazmunlar Systemleri for Books', 'af': 'Oorskou op NLP Tehnikasies vir Inhoud- gebaseerde Aanvaringsstelsels vir boeke', 'sq': 'Shfaqje e përgjithshme mbi Teknikët NLP për Sistemet e rekomandimeve për librat me bazë në përmbajtje', 'am': 'á‹¨NLP Techniqs', 'hy': 'Գրքերի համար հիմնված խորհուրդների համակարգերի ՆԼՊ տեխնիկայի վերաբերյալ', 'az': 'NLP Tehniklərinin Məzmun-tabanlı Tövratçı Sistemləri Kitablar üçün Görüş', 'bn': 'বিষয়বস্তু ভিত্তিক পরামর্শক সিস্টেমের জন্য NLP প্রযুক্তির উপর পর্যবেক্ষণ করুন', 'bs': 'Pregled NLP tehnike za sustave preporukivača za knjige na temelju sadržaja', 'fa': 'Overview on NLP Techniques for Content-based Recommender Systems for Books', 'cs': 'Přehled o technikách NLP pro obsahově založené doporučovací systémy knih', 'ca': 'Vista general de les tècniques NLP per a sistemes de recomanació per llibres basats en continguts', 'et': 'Ülevaade raamatute sisupõhiste soovitussüsteemide NLP tehnikatest', 'fi': 'Yleiskatsaus kirjojen sisältöpohjaisten suositusjärjestelmien NLP-tekniikoihin', 'ha': 'Overview on NLP Techniques for Content-based Recommender Systems for Books', 'jv': 'Name', 'sk': 'Pregled tehnik NLP za vsebinske priporočevalne sisteme za knjige', 'he': 'Name', 'bo': 'Overview on NLP Techniques for Content-based Recommender Systems for Books'}
{'en': 'Recommender systems are an essential part of today’s largest websites. Without them, it would be hard for users to find the right products and content. One of the most popular methods for recommendations is content-based filtering. It relies on analysing product metadata, a great part of which is textual data. Despite their frequent use, there is still no standard procedure for developing and evaluating content-based recommenders. In this paper, we will first examine current approaches for designing, training and evaluating recommender systems based on textual data for books recommendations for GoodReads’ website. We will give critiques on existing methods and suggest how natural language techniques can be employed for the improvement of content-based recommenders.', 'es': 'Los sistemas de recomendación son una parte esencial de los sitios web más grandes de la actualidad. Sin ellos, sería difícil para los usuarios encontrar los productos y el contenido adecuados. Uno de los métodos de recomendación más populares es el filtrado basado en el contenido. Se basa en analizar los metadatos de los productos, una gran parte de los cuales son datos textuales. A pesar de su uso frecuente, todavía no existe un procedimiento estándar para desarrollar y evaluar los recomendadores basados en el contenido. En este artículo, primero examinaremos los enfoques actuales para diseñar, capacitar y evaluar los sistemas de recomendación basados en datos textuales para las recomendaciones de libros para el sitio web de GoodReads. Haremos críticas sobre los métodos existentes y sugeriremos cómo se pueden emplear las técnicas del lenguaje natural para mejorar los recomendadores basados en el contenido.', 'fr': "Les systèmes de recommandation sont un élément essentiel des sites Web les plus importants d'aujourd'hui. Sans eux, il serait difficile pour les utilisateurs de trouver les bons produits et contenus. L'une des méthodes les plus populaires pour les recommandations est le filtrage basé sur le contenu. Elle repose sur l'analyse des métadonnées des produits, dont une grande partie est constituée de données textuelles. Malgré leur utilisation fréquente, il n'existe toujours pas de procédure standard pour développer et évaluer des recommandations basées sur le contenu. Dans cet article, nous examinerons d'abord les approches actuelles de conception, de formation et d'évaluation des systèmes de recommandation basés sur des données textuelles pour les recommandations de livres pour le site Web de GoodReads. Nous critiquerons les méthodes existantes et proposerons comment les techniques du langage naturel peuvent être utilisées pour améliorer les recommandations basées sur le contenu.", 'pt': 'Os sistemas de recomendação são uma parte essencial dos maiores sites da atualidade. Sem eles, seria difícil para os usuários encontrarem os produtos e conteúdos certos. Um dos métodos mais populares para recomendações é a filtragem baseada em conteúdo. Ele se baseia na análise de metadados do produto, grande parte dos quais são dados textuais. Apesar de seu uso frequente, ainda não existe um procedimento padrão para desenvolver e avaliar recomendações baseadas em conteúdo. Neste artigo, examinaremos primeiro as abordagens atuais para projetar, treinar e avaliar sistemas de recomendação baseados em dados textuais para recomendações de livros para o site GoodReads. Faremos críticas sobre os métodos existentes e sugeriremos como as técnicas de linguagem natural podem ser empregadas para o aprimoramento de recomendações baseadas em conteúdo.', 'zh': '荐统者,当今之大网站组成部分。 无之,用户难得其宜。 最流行的荐举法一是基于理选。 其依分产品元数,其大者为文本数。 虽其常用,犹未有开估推荐器程也。 于本文中,将首究今本数为GoodReads网站荐书设计,培训与评估荐系统之法。 吾将进行批评于今,而建言以自然语言术易其推荐者。', 'ar': 'تعد أنظمة التوصية جزءًا أساسيًا من أكبر مواقع الويب اليوم. بدونها ، سيكون من الصعب على المستخدمين العثور على المنتجات والمحتوى المناسب. من أكثر الطرق شيوعًا للتوصيات التصفية القائمة على المحتوى. يعتمد على تحليل البيانات الوصفية للمنتج ، جزء كبير منها عبارة عن بيانات نصية. على الرغم من استخدامها المتكرر ، لا يوجد حتى الآن إجراء معياري لتطوير وتقييم التوصيات المستندة إلى المحتوى. في هذه الورقة ، سنقوم أولاً بفحص الأساليب الحالية لتصميم وتدريب وتقييم أنظمة التوصية بناءً على البيانات النصية لتوصيات الكتب لموقع GoodReads على الويب. سنقدم انتقادات للطرق الحالية ونقترح كيفية استخدام تقنيات اللغة الطبيعية لتحسين المقترحين المستندة إلى المحتوى.', 'ru': 'Рекомендательные системы являются неотъемлемой частью сегодняшних крупнейших веб-сайтов. Без них пользователям будет трудно найти нужные продукты и контент. Одним из самых популярных методов рекомендаций является контентная фильтрация. Она опирается на анализ метаданных о продуктах, значительную часть которых составляют текстовые данные. Несмотря на их частое использование, стандартной процедуры разработки и оценки рекомендаций, основанных на содержании, до сих пор не существует. В этом документе мы сначала рассмотрим текущие подходы к разработке, обучению и оценке рекомендательных систем на основе текстовых данных для рекомендаций книг для веб-сайта GoodReads. Мы выступим с критикой существующих методов и предложим, как можно использовать методы естественного языка для улучшения рекомендаций, основанных на содержании.', 'ja': 'レコメンダーシステムは、今日の最大のウェブサイトの重要な部分です。それらがなければ、ユーザーが適切な製品やコンテンツを見つけるのは難しいでしょう。推奨される最も一般的な方法の1つは、コンテンツベースのフィルタリングです。製品メタデータの分析に依存しており、その多くはテキストデータです。頻繁に使用されているにもかかわらず、コンテンツベースの推奨者を開発および評価するための標準的な手順はまだありません。本稿ではまず、GoodReadsのウェブサイトの推奨する書籍のテキストデータに基づいて、推奨者システムの設計、トレーニング、評価の現行アプローチを検討する。既存の方法について批評を行い、コンテンツベースの推奨者の改善のために自然言語技術をどのように採用できるかを提案します。', 'hi': 'सिफारिशकर्ता सिस्टम आज की सबसे बड़ी वेबसाइटों का एक अनिवार्य हिस्सा हैं। उनके बिना, उपयोगकर्ताओं के लिए सही उत्पादों और सामग्री को ढूंढना मुश्किल होगा। सिफारिशों के लिए सबसे लोकप्रिय तरीकों में से एक सामग्री-आधारित फ़िल्टरिंग है। यह उत्पाद मेटाडेटा का विश्लेषण करने पर निर्भर करता है, जिसका एक बड़ा हिस्सा पाठ्य डेटा है। उनके लगातार उपयोग के बावजूद, सामग्री-आधारित सिफारिशकर्ताओं को विकसित करने और मूल्यांकन करने के लिए अभी भी कोई मानक प्रक्रिया नहीं है। इस पेपर में, हम पहले GoodReads की वेबसाइट के लिए पुस्तकों की सिफारिशों के लिए पाठ्य डेटा के आधार पर डिजाइन, प्रशिक्षण और मूल्यांकन अनुशंसक प्रणालियों के लिए वर्तमान दृष्टिकोणों की जांच करेंगे। हम मौजूदा तरीकों पर आलोचनाएं देंगे और सुझाव देंगे कि सामग्री-आधारित सिफारिशकर्ताओं के सुधार के लिए प्राकृतिक भाषा तकनीकों को कैसे नियोजित किया जा सकता है।', 'ga': 'Cuid riachtanach de na suíomhanna gréasáin is mó sa lá atá inniu ann is ea córais molta. Gan iad, bheadh sé deacair d’úsáideoirí na táirgí agus an t-ábhar ceart a aimsiú. Ceann de na modhanna moltaí is coitianta ná scagadh ábharbhunaithe. Braitheann sé ar anailís a dhéanamh ar mheiteashonraí táirgí, ar sonraí téacsúla cuid mhór díobh. In ainneoin a n-úsáid go minic, níl aon nós imeachta caighdeánach ann fós chun moltaí atá bunaithe ar ábhar a fhorbairt agus a mheas. Sa pháipéar seo, scrúdóimid ar dtús cuir chuige reatha chun córais mholtóirí a dhearadh, a oiliúint agus a mheasúnú bunaithe ar shonraí téacsúla do mholtaí leabhar do shuíomh Gréasáin GoodReads. Déanfaimid léirmheasanna ar na modhanna atá ann cheana féin agus molfaimid conas is féidir teicníochtaí nádúrtha teanga a úsáid chun feabhas a chur ar mholtóirí ábharbhunaithe.', 'ka': 'შემწყვებელი სისტემები დღეს უფრო დიდი ვებ საიტების მნიშვნელოვანია. მათ უკვე, მომხმარებისთვის ძალიან რთული იქნება მარტივი პროდისტი და შემდგომარება. ერთი უფრო პოლიპური პრომენტების პრომენტებისთვის არის შემდგომარების ფილტრირება. ეს დარწმუნება პროდისტის მეტადიატატის ანალიზაციაზე, რომლის დიდი ნაწილი არის ტექსტური მონაცემები. მათი წარმოიყენებული გამოყენებას მაგრამ არ არის სტანდარული პროცექტი, რომელიც შეუძლიათ განვითარება და განსაზღვრება მუშაობების შესახებ. ამ დოკუმენტში, ჩვენ პირველად შევხედოთ მიმდინარე დაწყებების განაზღვრება, განაკეთება და განაზღვრება სისტემის ტექსუალური მონაცემებისთვის წიგნის შესაძლებლობა Good ჩვენ მივიღეთ კრიტიკები არსებობს მეტისების შესახებ და მივიღეთ თუ როგორ შეიძლება მომხმარებელი ენის ტექნოგიების შესაძლებლობად მომხმარებელების შესახებ.', 'it': "I sistemi di raccomandazione sono una parte essenziale dei più grandi siti web di oggi. Senza di loro, sarebbe difficile per gli utenti trovare i prodotti e i contenuti giusti. Uno dei metodi più popolari per le raccomandazioni è il filtraggio basato sui contenuti. Si basa sull'analisi dei metadati dei prodotti, gran parte dei quali sono dati testuali. Nonostante il loro uso frequente, non esiste ancora una procedura standard per lo sviluppo e la valutazione di raccomandazioni basate sui contenuti. In questo articolo esamineremo innanzitutto gli approcci attuali per la progettazione, la formazione e la valutazione dei sistemi di raccomandazione basati su dati testuali per le raccomandazioni dei libri per il sito web di GoodReads. Daremo critiche sui metodi esistenti e suggeriremo come le tecniche del linguaggio naturale possono essere utilizzate per migliorare i consigli basati sui contenuti.", 'hu': 'Az ajánló rendszerek ma legnagyobb weboldalainak alapvető részét képezik. Nélkülük a felhasználók számára nehéz lenne megtalálni a megfelelő termékeket és tartalmakat. Az ajánlások egyik legnépszerűbb módszere a tartalom alapú szűrés. A termék metaadatainak elemzésére támaszkodik, amelyek nagy része szöveges adatok. Gyakori használatuk ellenére még mindig nincs szabványos eljárás a tartalom alapú ajánlók fejlesztésére és értékelésére. Ebben a tanulmányban először a GoodReads weboldalára vonatkozó ajánlói rendszerek tervezésének, képzésének és értékelésének aktuális megközelítéseit vizsgáljuk meg. Kritikáljuk a meglévő módszereket és javasoljuk, hogyan lehet a természetes nyelvi technikákat alkalmazni a tartalom alapú ajánlók fejlesztésére.', 'el': 'Τα συστήματα συστάσεων αποτελούν βασικό μέρος των μεγαλύτερων ιστοσελίδων σήμερα. Χωρίς αυτά, θα ήταν δύσκολο για τους χρήστες να βρουν τα σωστά προϊόντα και περιεχόμενο. Μια από τις πιο δημοφιλείς μεθόδους για συστάσεις είναι το φιλτράρισμα με βάση το περιεχόμενο. Βασίζεται στην ανάλυση μεταδεδομένων προϊόντων, ένα μεγάλο μέρος των οποίων είναι δεδομένα κειμένου. Παρά τη συχνή χρήση τους, εξακολουθεί να μην υπάρχει τυποποιημένη διαδικασία για την ανάπτυξη και αξιολόγηση συστάσεων βασισμένων στο περιεχόμενο. Στην παρούσα εργασία, θα εξετάσουμε πρώτα τις τρέχουσες προσεγγίσεις για το σχεδιασμό, την κατάρτιση και την αξιολόγηση συστημάτων συστάσεων βασισμένων σε δεδομένα κειμένου για συστάσεις βιβλίων για την ιστοσελίδα της. Θα κάνουμε κριτική στις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους και θα προτείνουμε πώς μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν τεχνικές φυσικής γλώσσας για τη βελτίωση των συστάσεων βασισμένων στο περιεχόμενο.', 'lt': 'Rekomendatorių sistemos yra svarbiausia šiandien didžiausių interneto svetainių dalis. Be jų vartotojams būtų sunku rasti tinkamus produktus ir turinį. Vienas populiariausių rekomendacijų metodų yra turinio filtravimas. Ji remiasi produktų metaduomenimis, kurių didžioji dalis yra tekstiniai duomenys, analize. Nepaisant dažno jų naudojimo, vis dar nėra standartinės turiniu pagrįstų rekomendacijų rengimo ir vertinimo procedūros. Šiame dokumente pirmiausia išnagrinėsime dabartinius metodus, kaip kurti, mokyti ir vertinti rekomenduotojų sistemas, grindžiamas tekstiniais duomenimis, skirtais knygų rekomendacijoms GoodReads interneto svetainėje. Kritizuosime esamus metodus ir pasiūlysime, kaip gali būti naudojami natūralūs kalbos metodai turiniu pagrįstiems rekomendatoriams tobulinti.', 'kk': 'Бүгінгі ең үлкен веб- сайттардың негізгі бөлігі. Олар болмаса, пайдаланушылардың оңай продукттарды және мазмұнын табуы қиын болады. Кеңейтулердің ең жақсы әдістерінің бірі мазмұның негізінде сүзгілеу. Бұл продукттың метадеректерін анализиялауына тәуелді, олардың көп бөлігі мәтіндік деректеріне тәуелді. Олардың көпшілігін қолдануға қарамастан, мазмұның негіздеген рекомендацияларын жасау және оқу үшін стандартты процедура жоқ. Бұл қағазда, біріншіден GoodReads вебсайтының мәтіндік деректеріне негізделген мәтіндік мәліметтерді құру, оқыту және оқыту жүйелерін тексереміз. Біз бар әдістер туралы критикаларды береміз және табиғи тіл техникаларын мазмұның негіздеген рекомендацияларды жақсарту үшін қалай жұмыс істеуге болады.', 'mk': 'Системите за препораки се суштински дел од денешните најголеми веб-сајтови. Без нив, би било тешко за корисниците да ги најдат вистинските производи и содржина. One of the most popular methods for recommendations is content-based filtering.  Се потпира на анализирање на метададаните на производот, од кои голем дел се текстуални податоци. И покрај нивната често употреба, сé уште не постои стандардна процедура за развој и евалуирање на препорачачи базирани на содржина. Во овој документ, прво ќе ги испитаме актуелните пристапи за дизајнирање, обука и евалуирање на системите за препорачување базирани на текстуални податоци за препораките за книгите на веб-страницата на GoodReads. Ќе дадеме критики за постоечките методи и ќе предложиме како природните јазички техники можат да се употребат за подобрување на препорачувачите базирани на содржина.', 'mn': 'Тайлбарлах системүүд өнөөдрийн хамгийн том вебсайтын чухал хэсэг юм. Хэрэглэгчид зөв бүтээгдэхүүн болон бүтээгдэхүүнийг олох нь хэцүү. Баталгаа өгүүлэх хамгийн алдартай арга нь content-based filtering юм. Энэ нь бүтээгдэхүүний мета өгөгдлийг шинжилгээнд хамаарна. Үүний гол хэсэг нь текст өгөгдлийг. Тэдний ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгддэг ч, content-based зөвлөгчийг хөгжүүлж, үнэлэх стандарт процедур байхгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид анх GoodReads-ийн вебсайт дээр номын зөвлөгөөний өгөгдлийн санал өгүүлэх, сургалт болон оюутнуудын системийн загвар бүтээх, сургалт болон оюутнуудыг судлах болно. Бид сууж буй арга замыг хэрхэн хэрхэн байгалийн хэл технологийг хэрхэн ашиглаж болох вэ гэдгийг сануулах болно.', 'no': 'Anbefalingssystemet er ein viktig del av dei største nettsidene i dag. Utan dei vil det vera vanskeleg for brukarar å finna dei rette produktane og innhaldet. Ein av dei populerte metodane for anbefalingar er filteret med innhaldsbasert. Det dependerer på analysering av produktmetadata, ein stor del av dei er tekstdata. Til tross dei ofte bruka er det framleis ingen standard prosedyr for å utvikla og evaluera innhaldsbaserte anbefalingar. I denne papiret vil vi først undersøke gjeldande tilnærmingar for å utvikla, opplæra og evaluera anbefalingssystemer basert på tekstdata for bøkanbefalingar for GoodReads- nettstaden. Vi vil gi kritikk på eksisterande metodar og foreslå korleis naturspråk-teknikk kan arbeidast for forbetringa av innhaldsbaserte anbefalingar.', 'mt': "Is-sistemi ta’ rakkomandaturi huma parti essenzjali mill-akbar siti tal-lum. Mingħajrhom, ikun diffiċli għall-utenti li jsibu l-prodotti u l-kontenut it-tajbin. Wieħed mill-metodi l-aktar popolari għar-rakkomandazzjonijiet huwa l-filtrazzjoni bbażata fuq il-kontenut. Jiddependi fuq l-analiżi tal-metadejta tal-prodott, li parti kbira minnha hija dejta testwali. Minkejja l-użu frekwenti tagħhom, għad m’hemmx proċedura standard għall-iżvilupp u l-evalwazzjoni ta’ rakkomandaturi bbażati fuq il-kontenut. F'dan id-dokument, l-ewwel se jeżaminaw l-approċċi attwali għat-tfassil, it-taħriġ u l-evalwazzjoni tas-sistemi ta' rakkomandazzjoni bbażati fuq dejta testwali għar-rakkomandazzjonijiet tal-kotba għall-websajt ta' GoodReads. We will give critiques on existing methods and suggest how natural language techniques can be employed for the improvement of content-based recommenders.", 'pl': 'Systemy rekomendujące stanowią istotną część dzisiejszych największych stron internetowych. Bez nich trudno byłoby użytkownikom znaleźć odpowiednie produkty i treści. Jedną z najpopularniejszych metod rekomendacji jest filtrowanie oparte na treści. Opiera się on na analizie metadanych produktów, których dużą część stanowią dane tekstowe. Pomimo ich częstego stosowania, nadal nie istnieje standardowa procedura opracowywania i oceny rekomendatorów opartych na treści. W niniejszym artykule przeanalizujemy najpierw aktualne podejścia do projektowania, szkolenia i oceny systemów rekomendujących w oparciu o dane tekstowe dla rekomendacji książek dla strony internetowej GoodReads. Przedstawimy krytykę dotyczącą istniejących metod i zaproponujemy, w jaki sposób techniki języka naturalnego mogą być wykorzystane do poprawy treściowych rekomenderów.', 'ro': 'Sistemele de recomandare sunt o parte esențială a celor mai mari site-uri web de astăzi. Fără ele, ar fi greu pentru utilizatori să găsească produsele și conținutul potrivit. Una dintre cele mai populare metode de recomandări este filtrarea bazată pe conținut. Se bazează pe analiza metadatelor produselor, dintre care o mare parte sunt date textuale. În ciuda utilizării lor frecvente, nu există încă o procedură standard pentru dezvoltarea și evaluarea recomandătorilor bazați pe conținut. În această lucrare, vom examina mai întâi abordările actuale pentru proiectarea, instruirea și evaluarea sistemelor de recomandare bazate pe date textuale pentru recomandările cărților pentru site-ul GoodReads. Vom da critici asupra metodelor existente și vom sugera modul în care tehnicile de limbaj natural pot fi utilizate pentru îmbunătățirea recomandătorilor bazați pe conținut.', 'ml': 'നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം ഇന്നിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും വലിയ വെബിളുകളില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഭാഗമാണ്. അവയില്ലാതെ ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് ശരിയായ ഉല്\u200dപാദ്യങ്ങളും ഉള്ളടക്കം കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d പ്രയാസമായിരിക്കും. പരിപാടികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട രീതികളില്\u200d ഒന്നാണ് ഉള്ളിലുള്ള ഫില്\u200dറ്റര്\u200d അത് പദ്ധതിയുടെ മെറ്റാഡാറ്റ അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ ഭാഗമാണ് ടെക്സ്ച അവരുടെ അധികാരം ഉപയോഗിച്ചിട്ടുമുണ്ടെങ്കിലും, ഉള്ളിലുള്ള പരിപാടികള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനും സാധാരണ പ്രക്രിയയി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം ഗൂഡ്രീഡിന്റെ വെബ്സിറ്റിനുള്ള ബുക്കുകളുടെ ശുദ്ധീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന, പര നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികളെക്കുറിച്ച് നമുക്ക് പ്രതികാരം നല്\u200dകാം. സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് ഉപയോഗിക', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශාලකය පද්ධතියක් අද වෙබ් සයිට් වල ලොකු කොටසක්. ඔවුන්ගෙන් නැතුව, පාවිච්චිකරුවන්ට හරි උපකරණය සහ සමාව හොයාගන්න අමාරුයි. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන එකක් තමයි සාමාන්\u200dයය අධාරිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. ඒක විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරදේශ මෙටාඩේටා විශ්ලේෂණය, ඒකේ ලොකු කොටසක් තියෙන්නේ පාළුම දත්ත ඔවුන්ගේ සාමාන්\u200dය භාවිතාවට නමුත්, තාමත් සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැහැ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විකාශ මේ පත්තරේ අපි මුලින්ම පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය, ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ගුඩ් රීඩ්ස් වැබැයිට් සඳහා පොත්තුවන්ගේ පුළුවන් පත්තර සඳහ අපි තියෙන්න තියෙන විදියට ක්\u200dරියාත්මක දෙන්නම් සහ ස්වභාවික භාෂාත්මක විදියට කොහොමද ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න පුළ', 'so': "Isticmaalka la taliyo waa qeyb muhiim ah bogagga internetka ugu weyn ee maanta. Iyadoo aan jirin, isticmaalayaasha waxaa ku adag in ay helaan alaabta saxda ah iyo waxyaabaha ku jira. Mid ka mid ah qaababka ugu wada maamulan ee lagu talogalay waa baaritaanka waxyaabaha ku qoran. waxay ku xiran tahay baaritaanka wax-taranka ah, qayb badan oo ka mid ah macluumaadka qoraalka. Inta kastoo ay isticmaalaan isticmaalkooda inta badan, ma jirto qalabka caadiga ah oo horumarinta iyo qiimeynaya talosiinta waxyaabaha ku qoran. In this paper, we will first examine current approaches for designing, training and evaluating recommender systems based on textual data for books recommendations for GoodReads' website.  Waxaannu ku siinaynaa dhibaatooyin ku saabsan qaababka joogta ah, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa in loo isticmaali karo qaababka afka dabiiciga ah si loo hagaajiyo talobixiyayaasha ku qoran.", 'sv': 'Rekommendationssystem är en viktig del av dagens största webbplatser. Utan dem skulle det vara svårt för användarna att hitta rätt produkter och innehåll. En av de mest populära metoderna för rekommendationer är innehållsbaserad filtrering. Den bygger på att analysera produktmetadata, varav en stor del är textdata. Trots att de används ofta finns det fortfarande inget standardförfarande för att utveckla och utvärdera innehållsbaserade rekommendationer. I denna uppsats kommer vi först att undersöka aktuella tillvägagångssätt för att utforma, utbilda och utvärdera rekommendationssystem baserat på textdata för bokrekommendationer för GoodReads webbplats. Vi kommer att ge kritik av befintliga metoder och föreslå hur naturliga språktekniker kan användas för att förbättra innehållsbaserade rekommendationer.', 'sr': 'Preporučujući sistemi su ključni deo današnjih najvećih sajtova. Bez njih bi bilo teško da korisnici pronađu prave proizvode i sadržaj. Jedna od najpopularnijih metoda za preporuke je filtriranje na sadržaju. On se oslanja na analizu metapodataka proizvoda, veliki dio kojih je tekstualni podatak. Uprkos čestoj primjeni, još uvek nema standardne procedure za razvoj i procjenu preporučnika na temelju sadržaja. U ovom papiru, prvo ćemo pregledati trenutne pristupe za dizajniranje, obuku i procjenu sistema preporukivača na temelju tekstualnih podataka za preporuke knjiga za sajt GoodReadsa. Mi ćemo dati kritike o postojećim metodama i predložiti kako se prirodne jezičke tehnike mogu zapošljavati za poboljšanje preporučivača na sadržaju.', 'ta': 'பரிந்துரைக்கும் அமைப்புகள் இன்றைய பெரிய இணையதளங்களில் ஒரு முக்கியமான பகுதி. அவர்கள் இல்லாமல், சரியான பொருட்களையும் உள்ளடக்கத்தையும் பயனர்களுக்கு கடினமாக இருக்கும். பரிந்துரைகளுக்கான மிகவும் பெரிய முறைகளில் ஒன்று உள்ளடக்கமான வடிகட்டி அது பொருள் மெடெடேடாவை ஆய்வு செய்வதை சார்ந்து கொள்ளும், அதில் ஒரு மிக பெரிய பகுதியாக உள்ளது. அவர்கள் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டாலும், உள்ளடக்க பரிந்துரைகளை உருவாக்க மற்றும் மதிப்பிடுவதற்கான நிலையான செயல்பாடு இல்லை. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் முதலில் இப்போதைய செயல்பாடுகளை வடிவமைப்பதற்கு, பயிற்சி மற்றும் பரிந்துரைப்பாளர் முறைமைகளை பரிந்துரைப்பு  நாம் ஏற்கனவே இருக்கும் முறைகளில் சிகிச்சைகளை கொடுக்கும் மற்றும் இயற்கையான மொழி தொழில்நுட்பத்திற்கு எவ்வாறு உபய', 'ur': 'آج کے سب سے بڑے ویب سائٹوں کا ایک حصہ ہے. ان کے بغیر، استعمال کرنے والوں کے لئے بہت مشکل ہوگا کہ ان کے سامنے صحیح مواد اور منزل پیدا کریں۔ سفارش کے لئے سب سے زیادہ محبوب طریقے میں سے ایک محبوب فیلٹرینگ ہے۔ یہ محصولات متڈیٹا کا تحلیل کرنا پر باقی رہتا ہے، اس میں سے بہت بڑا حصہ ہے کہ متکسل ڈیٹا ہے. ان کے اکثریت استعمال کے بغیر بھی، اصل بات یہ ہے کہ منصفات کی بنیادی توفیق کرنے والوں کے لئے استاندارڈ پردازی نہیں ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم پہلی بار گوڈ ریڈز ویب سٹیٹ کے لئے کتاب کی توصیفیں کے لئے پاکستال ڈیٹ پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں، طراحی، تعلیم اور مطالبہ کرنے کے لئے موجود مطالبے کی طریقوں کی تحقیق کریں گے. ہم موجود طریقے کے بارے میں کریٹیک دیں گے اور سفارش دیں گے کہ کس طرح طبیعی زبان تکنیک استعمال کئے جائیں گے اس طرح منصفات کی اصلاح کرنے والوں کے لئے۔', 'ms': 'Sistem penasihat adalah bahagian penting laman web terbesar hari ini. Tanpa mereka, ia akan menjadi sukar bagi pengguna untuk mencari produk dan kandungan yang betul. Salah satu kaedah paling popular untuk rekomendasi adalah penapisan berdasarkan kandungan. It relies on analysing product metadata, a great part of which is textual data.  Walaupun penggunaan sering mereka, masih tiada prosedur piawai untuk mengembangkan dan menilai rekomendasi berdasarkan kandungan. Dalam kertas ini, kita akan pertama-tama memeriksa pendekatan semasa untuk merancang, melatih dan menilai sistem rekomendasi berdasarkan data teks untuk rekomendasi buku untuk laman web GoodReads. Kami akan memberikan kritik pada kaedah yang ada dan menyarankan bagaimana teknik bahasa semulajadi boleh digunakan untuk peningkatan rekomendasi berdasarkan kandungan.', 'uz': "Taʼminlovchi tizimlar bugun eng katta veb- saytlarning qismidir. Ularni yo'q, foydalanuvchilar haqiqida narsalar va tarkibini topish qiyin edi. Maʼlumotlar uchun eng katta usuldan biri mavjud filter. Bu produktlarni metadata tahrirlashga ishlatadi. Bu narsa texnologiya maʼlumotlariga juda katta qismi. Despite their frequent use, there is still no standard procedure for developing and evaluating content-based recommenders.  Bu hujjatda, biz birinchi marta GoodReads' tovuti sahifasi uchun tizimni yaratish, tahrirlash va qiymatlash uchun foydalanuvchi tizimini tahrirlash va qiymatlashimiz mumkin. Biz mavjud usullar haqida xavfli beramiz va tarkibi soniyalarni o'zgartirish uchun asl tilni qanday foydalanishini talab qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Các hệ thống khuyến cáo là một phần thiết yếu trong các trang web lớn nhất. Không có chúng, sẽ khó khăn cho người dùng để tìm đúng sản phẩm và chất lượng. Một trong những phương pháp hướng dẫn phổ biến nhất là bộ lọc nội dung. Nó nhờ phân tích siêu dữ liệu, phần lớn là dữ liệu cấu trúc. Mặc dù họ thường sử dụng chúng, vẫn chưa có thủ tục tiêu chuẩn để phát triển và đánh giá các lời khuyên dựa trên nội dung. Chúng tôi sẽ nghiên cứu các phương pháp hiện thời để thiết kế, huấn luyện và đánh giá các hệ thống liên bang dựa trên các dữ liệu cấu hình cho sách hướng dẫn về trang web GoodReads. Chúng tôi sẽ thảo luận về các phương pháp đã có và hướng dẫn cách sử dụng các kỹ thuật ngôn ngữ tự nhiên để cải thiện các lời khuyên dựa trên nội dung.', 'bg': 'Системите за препоръки са съществена част от днешните най-големи уебсайтове. Без тях потребителите трудно ще намерят правилните продукти и съдържание. Един от най-популярните методи за препоръки е базираното на съдържание филтриране. Тя разчита на анализа на метаданните на продуктите, голяма част от които са текстови данни. Въпреки честата им употреба все още няма стандартна процедура за разработване и оценяване на съдържателни препоръки. В настоящата статия първо ще разгледаме актуалните подходи за проектиране, обучение и оценка на системи за препоръки въз основа на текстови данни за препоръки за книги за уебсайта на ГудРийдс. Ще отправим критики към съществуващите методи и ще предложим как естествените езикови техники могат да бъдат използвани за подобряване на съдържанието-базираните препоръки.', 'da': "Anbefalingssystemer er en væsentlig del af nutidens største websteder. Uden dem ville det være svært for brugerne at finde de rigtige produkter og indhold. En af de mest populære metoder til anbefalinger er indholdsbaseret filtrering. Den er afhængig af at analysere produktmetadata, hvoraf en stor del er tekstdata. På trods af deres hyppige brug er der stadig ingen standardprocedure for udvikling og evaluering af indholdsbaserede anbefalinger. I denne artikel vil vi først undersøge aktuelle tilgange til at designe, træne og evaluere anbefalingssystemer baseret på tekstdata til bøger anbefalinger til GoodReads' hjemmeside. Vi vil give kritik af eksisterende metoder og foreslå, hvordan natursprogteknikker kan anvendes til forbedring af indholdsbaserede anbefalere.", 'nl': 'Aanbevelingssystemen zijn een essentieel onderdeel van de grootste websites van vandaag. Zonder hen zou het moeilijk zijn voor gebruikers om de juiste producten en content te vinden. Een van de meest populaire methoden voor aanbevelingen is inhoudsgebaseerde filtering. Het is gebaseerd op het analyseren van productmetadata, waarvan een groot deel tekstgegevens zijn. Ondanks het veelvuldige gebruik ervan bestaat er nog steeds geen standaardprocedure voor het ontwikkelen en evalueren van content-based recommenders. In dit artikel onderzoeken we eerst de huidige benaderingen voor het ontwerpen, trainen en evalueren van aanbevelingssystemen op basis van tekstgegevens voor boekaanbevelingen voor de website van GoodReads. We zullen kritiek geven op bestaande methoden en voorstellen hoe natuurlijke taaltechnieken kunnen worden gebruikt voor de verbetering van content-based recommenders.', 'hr': 'Preporučujući sustavi su ključni dio današnjih najvećih web stranica. Bez njih bi bilo teško da korisnici pronađu prave proizvode i sadržaj. Jedna od najpopularnijih metoda preporuke je filtriranje na sadržaju. On se oslanja na analizu metapodataka proizvoda, veliki dio kojih je tekstualni podatak. Unatoč čestoj primjeni, još uvijek nema standardne postupke za razvoj i procjenu preporučnika na temelju sadržaja. U ovom papiru, prvo ćemo pregledati trenutne pristupe za dizajniranje, obuku i procjenu sustava preporukivača na temelju tekstualnih podataka za preporuke knjiga za stranicu GoodReadsa. Mi ćemo dati kritike o postojećim metodama i predložiti kako se prirodne jezičke tehnike mogu zapošljavati za poboljšanje preporučivača na sadržaju.', 'de': "Empfehlungssysteme sind ein wesentlicher Bestandteil der größten Websites von heute. Ohne sie wäre es für die Nutzer schwierig, die richtigen Produkte und Inhalte zu finden. Eine der beliebtesten Methoden für Empfehlungen ist die inhaltsbasierte Filterung. Es basiert auf der Analyse von Produkt-Metadaten, von denen ein großer Teil Textdaten sind. Trotz ihrer häufigen Nutzung gibt es noch kein Standardverfahren zur Entwicklung und Bewertung von inhaltsbasierten Empfehlern. In diesem Beitrag werden wir zunächst aktuelle Ansätze zur Gestaltung, Schulung und Bewertung von Empfehlungssystemen auf Basis von Textdaten für Buchempfehlungen für GoodReads' Website untersuchen. Wir werden bestehende Methoden kritisieren und vorschlagen, wie natursprachliche Techniken zur Verbesserung von inhaltsbasierten Empfehlern eingesetzt werden können.", 'id': 'Sistem rekomendasi adalah bagian penting dari situs terbesar hari ini. Tanpa mereka, akan sulit bagi pengguna untuk menemukan produk dan isi yang tepat. Salah satu metode paling populer untuk rekomendasi adalah penapisan berdasarkan isi. Ini bergantung pada analisis metadata produk, sebagian besar dari yang adalah data tekstual. Meskipun mereka sering digunakan, masih tidak ada prosedur standar untuk mengembangkan dan mengevaluasi rekomendasi berdasarkan isi. Dalam kertas ini, kita akan pertama-tama memeriksa pendekatan saat ini untuk merancang, melatih dan mengevaluasi sistem rekomendasi berdasarkan data tekstual untuk rekomendasi buku untuk situs GoodReads. Kami akan memberikan kritik pada metode yang ada dan menyarankan bagaimana teknik bahasa alam dapat digunakan untuk meningkatkan rekomander berdasarkan isi.', 'ko': '추천 시스템은 현재 가장 큰 사이트의 중요한 구성 부분이다.그것들이 없으면 사용자는 적당한 제품과 내용을 찾기가 매우 어렵다.가장 유행하는 추천 방법 중 하나는 내용에 기반한 필터다.그것은 제품의 메타데이터를 분석하는 데 의존하는데, 그 중 상당 부분은 텍스트 데이터이다.비록 자주 사용되지만, 내용 기반의 추천 프로그램을 개발하고 평가하는 표준 프로그램은 아직 없다.본고에서 Good Reads 사이트의 도서 추천 텍스트 데이터를 바탕으로 하는 추천 시스템 설계, 교육과 평가의 현재 방법을 먼저 연구하고자 한다.우리는 기존의 방법에 대해 논평을 하고, 내용 기반의 추천을 개선하기 위해 자연 언어 기술을 사용하는 방법을 건의할 것이다.', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای پیشنهاد بخشی از بزرگترین وب\u200cسایت\u200cهای امروز هستند. بدون آنها، برای استفاده کنندگان محصولات و محتویات درست پیدا کردن سخت خواهد بود. یکی از روش\u200cهای محبوب\u200cترین برای پیشنهاد\u200cها فلترینگ بر اساس محتویات است. این روی تحلیل داده های متداده محصولات، یک بخش بزرگی از آن داده های متناک است. با وجود استفاده اغلب آنها هنوز روش استاندارد برای توسعه و ارزیابی پیشنهاد\u200cکننده\u200cهای محتویات وجود ندارد. در این کاغذ، اولین بار برای طراحی, آموزش و ارزیابی سیستم\u200cهای پیشنهاد بر اساس داده\u200cهای متن برای پیشنهاد کتاب برای وبسایت GoodReads تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما بر روش\u200cهای موجود فریاد می\u200cدهیم و پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم که چگونه تکنیک زبان طبیعی برای بهتر کردن توصیه\u200cکننده\u200cهای محتوای استفاده می\u200cشود.', 'tr': 'Maslahatlar sistemleri şu gün iň uly meýdançalaryň bir bölegidir. Olar bolmasa, ulananlar üçin dogry produktlary we maksadyny tapmak kyn bolardy. Maslahatlar üçin iň meşhur täzelikleriň biri maksada daýanýan filtredir. Munuň önümleriniň metadata analýşine mümkin edýär. Bu iň köp bölegi metin maglumatdyr. Köplenç ulanylaryna rağmen, daşary taýýarlanan maslahatlary gelişmek we çykarmak üçin adatça standart prosedür ýok. Bu kagyzda, biz GoodReads website üçin metin maglumatlar üçin häzirki golaýlary düzenlemek, okuwçylyk we çykarmak üçin mektup maglumatlaryna daýanýar. Öň bar yöntemlerde kritikalar berjek we tebigy dil tekniklerini maksadyň täze maslahat täzelerini geliştirmek üçin nähili ullanyp biljekdigini maslahat berjek.', 'sw': 'Mifumo ya kupendekeza ni sehemu muhimu ya tovuti kubwa zaidi ya leo. Bila ya hayo, itakuwa vigumu kwa watumiaji kutafuta bidhaa sahihi na maudhui. Moja ya njia maarufu zaidi ya mapendekezo ni kuchuja vifaa vya maudhui. Inategemea kuchambua taarifa za meta za uzalishaji, sehemu kubwa ambayo ni takwimu za msingi. Pamoja na matumizi yao mara kwa mara, bado hakuna utaratibu wa kawaida wa maendeleo na kutathmini mapendekezo yaliyoko kwenye maudhui. Katika karatasi hii, tutachunguza hatua za sasa kwa ajili ya kutengeneza, mafunzo na kutathmini mfumo wa mapendekezo kwa kutumia data za maandishi kwa mapendekezo ya vitabu kwa ajili ya tovuti ya GoodReads. Tutakuwa na ukosoaji wa njia zilizopo na tutapendekeza namna mbinu za lugha za asili zinavyotumika kwa ajili ya kuboresha mapendekezo ya maudhui.', 'sq': "Recommender systems are an essential part of today's largest websites.  Pa ta, do të ishte e vështirë për përdoruesit të gjenin prodhimet dhe përmbajtjen e duhura. Një nga metodat më popullore për rekomandimet është filtrimi bazuar në përmbajtje. Ajo mbështetet në analizën e metatë të prodhimit, një pjesë e madhe e të cilave janë të dhënat tekstuale. Megjithë përdorimin e tyre të shpeshtë, nuk ka ende procedurë standarte për zhvillimin dhe vlerësimin e rekomandimeve bazuar në përmbajtje. Në këtë letër, ne së pari do të shqyrtojmë qasjet aktuale për dizajnimin, trajnimin dhe vlerësimin e sistemeve rekomanduese bazuar në të dhënat tekstuale për rekomandimet e librave për uebsajtin e GoodReads. Ne do të japim kritika mbi metodat ekzistuese dhe do të sugjerojmë se si teknikat natyrore të gjuhës mund të përdoren për përmirësimin e rekomandimeve bazuar në përmbajtje.", 'am': 'የዛሬ ትልቁ ድረ ገጽ መሆኑን መግለጫ ነው፡፡ ባይኖሩ የተግባሩን ዕቃዎችና ውጤቶች ለማግኘት ለተጠቃሚዎች ይጨነቃል፡፡ ለመታሰቢያዎች የሚታወቁ የሆኑን አጣራ ማሳያ ነው፡፡ በተመሳሳይ የፕሮጀክት መሬታዎችን በማስተካከል ትልቅ ክፍል የጽሑፍ ዳታ ነው፡፡ በይዞታዊ ጥያቄ ምንም እንኳ ቢሆን የሆኑን መሠረት እና በመጠቀም ምክንያቶች የሚያስተካክሉ የድጋፍ ሥርዓት የለም፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ ለመጀመሪያ የጉዳዩ ገጽ ለመጻሕፍት የመጻሕፍት ጉዳይ የጽሑፍ ዳታዎችን ለመግለጽ፣ ማስተካከል እና ለማስተዋል የአሁኑን የሥርዓት ጥያቄዎችን እናምረምራለን፡፡ የአካባቢ የቋንቋ ስህተት እንዴት እንዲጠቀም እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'af': "Onbevraagstelsels is 'n nuwe deel van vandag se grootste webtuistes. Sonder hulle sal dit moeilik wees vir gebruikers om die regte produkte en inhoud te vind. Een van die mees populêre metodes vir aanbevelings is inhoudsgebaseerde filtering. Dit verlig op die analyseer van produkt metadata, 'n groot deel van waarvan is tekstuele data. Terwyl hulle dikwels gebruik, is daar nog geen standaard prosedure vir ontwikkeling en evaluering van inhoudsgebaseerde aanbeveelders nie. In hierdie papier sal ons eerste toegang van huidige toegange ondersoek vir die ontwerp, onderwerp en evaluering van aanbevestingsstelsels gebaseer op tekstuurlike data vir boeke aanbevestings vir GoodReads se webwerp. Ons sal kritike gee op bestaande metodes en voorstel hoe natuurlike taal teknike kan gebruik word vir die verbetering van inhoudsgebaseerde aanbeveelders.", 'az': 'Tövsiyə edən sistemlər bugünkü ən böyük veb saytlarının məqsədilə bir parçasıdır. Onlar olmadan, istifadəçilər üçün doğru ürəkləri və məlumatları tapmaq çətin olur. Tövsiyələr üçün ən məşhur metodlardan biri içərisində olan filtrlənmədir. Bu məhsulların metadata analizəsinə təvəkkül edir. Bunların çox böyük bir hissəsi textual verilər. Səfərli istifadə etdiklərinə baxmayaraq, məlumat temelli təsirlərini inkişaf etmək və değerlendirmək üçün standart prosedür yoxdur. Bu kağızda ilk dəfə GoodReads web sitəsi üçün məktub məlumatlarına dayanan, təhsil edən və təhsil edən sistemlərin təhsil edilməsini təsdiqləyəcəyik. Biz müəyyən edilmiş metodlar barəsində kritikləri veririk və təbiətli dil tekniklərinin sadəcə təsirlərin yaxşılıqlarına görə nə qədər istifadə ediləcəyini təmin edirik.', 'bn': "পরামর্শক সিস্টেম আজকের সবচেয়ে বড় ওয়েবসাইটের একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অংশ। তাদের ছাড়া ব্যবহারকারীদের সঠিক পণ্য ও বিষয়বস্তু খুঁজে বের করা কঠিন হবে। পরামর্শের জন্য সবচেয়ে জনপ্রিয় পদ্ধতি হচ্ছে বিষয়বস্তু ফিল্টারিং। এটি প্রযুক্তি মেটাডাটা বিশ্লেষণের উপর নির্ভর করে, যার একটি বিশাল অংশ হচ্ছে টেক্সচুয়াল ডাটা। তাদের প্রায়শ ব্যবহার সত্ত্বেও, বিষয়বস্তুর ভিত্তিক পরামর্শ উন্নয়ন এবং মূল্যায়নের জন্য কোন স্থান্যান্ডার প In this paper, we will first examine current approaches for designing, training and evaluating recommender systems based on textual data for books recommendations for GoodReads' website.  আমরা বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতিতে সমস্যা দেব এবং প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রযুক্তি কিভাবে ভিত্তিক পরামর্শের উন্নতির জন্য ব্যবহার করা যাবে।", 'bs': 'Preporučujući sistemi su ključni dio današnjih najvećih web stranica. Bez njih bi bilo teško da korisnici pronađu prave proizvode i sadržaj. Jedna od najpopularnijih metoda za preporuke je filtriranje na sadržaju. On se oslanja na analizu metapodataka proizvoda, veliki dio kojih je tekstualni podatak. Unatoč čestoj primjeni, još uvijek nema standardne procedure za razvoj i procjenu preporučnika na temelju sadržaja. U ovom papiru, prvo ćemo pregledati trenutne pristupe za dizajniranje, obuku i procjenu sustava preporukivača na temelju tekstualnih podataka za preporuke knjiga za stranicu GoodReadsa. Mi ćemo dati kritike o postojećim metodama i predložiti kako se prirodne jezičke tehnike mogu zapošljavati za poboljšanje preporučnika na sadržaju.', 'ca': "Els sistemes recomendadors s ón una part essencial dels llocs web més grans d'avui en dia. Sense ells, seria difícil per als usuaris trobar els productes i continguts adequats. Un dels mètodes més populars de recomanacions és filtrar basat en continguts. Es basa en l'anàlisi de les metadades del producte, molta de les quals són dades textuals. Malgrat la seva utilització freqüent, encara no hi ha un procediment estàndard per desenvolupar i evaluar recomanadors basats en continguts. En aquest paper, primer examinarem els enfocaments actuals de disseny, formació i evaluació de sistemes recomendadors basats en dades textuals per recomanacions de llibres a la web de GoodReads. We will give critiques on existing methods and suggest how natural language techniques can be employed for the improvement of content-based recommenders.", 'cs': 'Doporučovací systémy jsou nezbytnou součástí dnešních největších webových stránek. Bez nich by bylo pro uživatele těžké najít správné produkty a obsah. Jednou z nejoblíbenějších metod doporučení je filtrování založené na obsahu. Spoléhá na analýzu metadat produktů, z nichž velká část tvoří textová data. Navzdory jejich častému používání stále neexistuje standardní postup pro vývoj a hodnocení doporučovačů založených na obsahu. V tomto článku budeme nejprve zkoumat současné přístupy k navrhování, školení a hodnocení doporučovacích systémů založené na textových datech pro doporučení knih pro webové stránky GoodReads. Budeme kritizovat stávající metody a navrhnout, jak lze techniky přirozeného jazyka využít pro zlepšení obsahově založených doporučovatelů.', 'et': 'Soovitussüsteemid on tänapäeva suurimate veebisaitide oluline osa. Ilma nendeta oleks kasutajatel raske leida õigeid tooteid ja sisu. Üks populaarsemaid soovituste meetodeid on sisupõhine filtreerimine. See tugineb toote metaandmete analüüsimisele, millest suur osa on tekstiandmed. Vaatamata nende sagedasele kasutamisele ei ole sisupõhiste soovituste väljatöötamiseks ja hindamiseks endiselt standardmenetlust. Käesolevas dokumendis uurime esmalt praeguseid lähenemisviise soovitussüsteemide kujundamiseks, koolitamiseks ja hindamiseks, mis põhinevad GoodReadsi veebisaidi raamatusoovituste tekstiandmetel. Kriitikame olemasolevaid meetodeid ja soovitame, kuidas kasutada looduskeele tehnikaid sisupõhiste soovitajate täiustamiseks.', 'fi': 'Suositusjärjestelmät ovat olennainen osa tämän päivän suurimpia verkkosivustoja. Ilman niitä käyttäjien olisi vaikea löytää oikeita tuotteita ja sisältöä. Yksi suosituimmista suositusmenetelmistä on sisältöpohjainen suodatus. Se perustuu tuotemetatietojen analysointiin, josta suuri osa on tekstidataa. Vaikka niitä käytetään usein, ei ole vieläkään olemassa vakiomenettelyä sisältöön perustuvien suositusten kehittämiseksi ja arvioimiseksi. Tässä artikkelissa tarkastelemme ensin nykyisiä lähestymistapoja suositusjärjestelmien suunnitteluun, koulutukseen ja arviointiin, jotka perustuvat GoodReadsin verkkosivujen kirjojen suositusten tekstitietoihin. Esitämme kritiikkiä olemassa olevista menetelmistä ja ehdotamme, miten luonnollisia kielitekniikoita voidaan hyödyntää sisältöpohjaisten suositusten parantamisessa.', 'hy': 'Խնդիչ համակարգերը այսօրվա ամենամեծ վեբկայքերի կարևոր մասն են: Առանց դրանց, օգտագործողների համար դժվար կլինի գտնել ճիշտ ապրանքները և պարունակությունը: One of the most popular methods for recommendations is content-based filtering.  Այն հիմնված է արտադրանքի մետատվյալների վերլուծության վրա, որի մեծ մասը տեքստալ տվյալներ են: Չնայած դրանց հաճախ օգտագործման, դեռևս ոչ մի ստանդարտ գործընթաց չկա պարունակությամբ հիմնված խորհուրդների զարգացման և գնահատման համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք սկզբում կքննարկենք գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները, որոնք օգտագործվում են նախագծելու, վարժեցնելու և գնահատելու խորհրդատվությունների համակարգերի վրա, հիմնված Գույդի Գրքերի խորհուրդների Մենք կքննադատենք գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները և կառաջարկենք, թե ինչպես կարող են բնական լեզվի մեթոդները օգտագործվել պարունակությամբ հիմնված խորհուրդների բարելավման համար:', 'jv': 'Sistem Suggestir sing dibutuhke sing dikarol kanggo situs web sing kudu Nanging dhéwé, aku susah kanggo pengguna-pengguna kuwi nggawe ndhelik ngono sisan sing nyimpen. Yuta sing paling-populer sing dipunangé kanggo tukang mrogram kuwi basa sing katon-ingkang. Mungkin ngubah kang dadi metadata sing paling dadi, sampeyan sing bukane dadi textual. Inggal mbok bener nggawe, ora mbok ono wektu nggawe kesempatan kanggo nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nggawe barang nggawe barang seneng pisan. Nang mapun iki, awak dhéwé bakal luwih nyong nggawe akses nggo nggawe, tukang karo nggawe sistem permanehasan sing bisa data teks nggo tukang mrogram kanggo tukang mrogram kanggo websajin BonReads Awak dhéwé bakal ngewehke pisan kanggo ngerasah akeh sistem sing bisa nguasah tentang kanggo nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang urip bantuan.', 'ha': "Tsarin masu shawara su ne rabo daga wurãren kwanan kami masu girma. Kuma sai ya yi nauyi ga mãsu amfani da matsayin da abin da yake so. Babu ɗayan hanyõyin da ake rufe wa masu shawarar da aka ƙayyade shi yana filteri wanda ke cikin maɓallin ciki. Ina dõgara a kan anayyar da metadata na 'ya'yan amfani, kuma wani rabo mai girma na zama data na littafi. Babu da amfani da su masu sauri, kuma ba za'a buƙata wani aikin da za'a iya daidaita wa buwãyar da aka ƙaddara masu shawarar da ke cikin ciki ba. Daga wannan takardan, zã mu farkon jarraba hanyoyin yanzu ta wajen designi, wa'anar da shirin shiryarwa da ake ƙaddara wa system-masu shawarar da aka ƙaddara wa data na rubutu wa masu shawarar littafin da aka buƙata wa website wa Google dreads. Za sami takardar da ke cikin hanyõyin da ke jira kuma Muke shawarar da jinsi za'a iya amfani da kunnukan harshen asili dõmin improve masu shawarar da ke da shi.", 'sk': 'Sistemi priporočil so bistveni del današnjih največjih spletnih strani. Brez njih bi uporabniki težko našli prave izdelke in vsebine. Ena izmed najbolj priljubljenih metod za priporočila je filtriranje na podlagi vsebine. Zanaša se na analizo metapodatkov o izdelkih, od katerih je velik del besedilnih podatkov. Kljub pogosti uporabi še vedno ni standardnega postopka za razvoj in ocenjevanje vsebinskih priporočil. V tem prispevku bomo najprej preučili aktualne pristope za oblikovanje, usposabljanje in vrednotenje sistemov priporočevalcev na podlagi besedilnih podatkov za priporočila knjig za spletno stran GoodReads. Podali bomo kritike obstoječih metod in predlagali, kako se lahko uporabljajo tehnike naravnega jezika za izboljšanje vsebinskih priporočil.', 'bo': 'འོན་ཀྱི་དེབ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡིག་ཆ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག་རེད། ཁོང་ཚོས་མེད་པར་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ནང་དོན་འཆར་བ་ནི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཡོད། འོས་གཏོང་གི་ཆེས་སྐད་གྲངས་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ནི་ནང་དོན་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་filtering་རེད། དེ་ནི་ཚོར་བ་དང་ཐུག་ཡིག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དེ་དག་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་དེ་བཞིན་པར་ངོས་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་མི་འདུག་པས། འོག ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བྱས་པར་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་དགོས། དེ་ནི་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གཏན་རྐྱེ', 'he': 'מערכות המלצות הן חלק חיוני מאתרי האינטרנט הגדולים ביותר היום. Without them, it would be hard for users to find the right products and content.  One of the most popular methods for recommendations is content-based filtering.  It relies on analysing product metadata, a great part of which is textual data.  למרות השימוש הצפון שלהם, עדיין אין תהליך סטנדרטי לפיתוח ולהערכה ממלצים מבוססים בתוכן. בעיתון הזה, נבדוק קודם את הגישות הנוכחיות לעיצוב, אימון והעריכה מערכות המלצות מבוססות על נתונים טקסטיים למלצות ספרים לאתר של GoodReads. נתן קריטיקות על שיטות קיימות ונציע איך טכניקות שפת טבעיות יכולות להשתמש לשיפור של המלצים המבוססים בתוכן.'}
{'en': 'Multilingual Complex Word Identification : Convolutional Neural Networks with Morphological and Linguistic Features', 'ar': 'تحديد الكلمات المعقدة متعدد اللغات: الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية ذات السمات المورفولوجية واللغوية', 'pt': 'Identificação de palavras complexas multilíngues: redes neurais convolucionais com características morfológicas e linguísticas', 'fr': 'Identification de mots complexes multilingues\xa0: réseaux de neurones convolutifs avec caractéristiques morphologiques et linguistiques', 'es': 'Identificación multilingüe de palabras complejas: redes neuronales convolucionales con características morfológicas y lingüísticas', 'ja': '多言語複雑語識別：形態学的および言語学的特徴を持つ畳み込みニューラルネットワーク', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी जटिल शब्द पहचान: रूपात्मक और भाषाई विशेषताओं के साथ Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क', 'zh': '多言杂单词识:有形态学语言学之卷积神经网络', 'ru': 'Многоязычная сложная идентификация слов: сверточные нейронные сети с морфологическими и лингвистическими признаками', 'ga': 'Aithint Focal Coimpléascach Ilteangach: Líonraí Néaracha Comhdhlúite le Gnéithe Moirfeolaíocha agus Teangeolaíocha', 'ka': 'Multilingual Complex Word Identification: Convolutional Neural Networks with Morphological and Linguistic Features', 'el': 'Πολυγλωσσικός σύνθετος προσδιορισμός λέξεων: Σύλληλα Νευρικά Δίκτυα με Μορφολογικά και Γλωσσολογικά Χαρακτηριστικά', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű komplex szóazonosítás: konvolúciós ideghálózatok morfológiai és nyelvi jellemzőkkel', 'it': 'Identificazione di parole complesse multilingue: reti neurali convoluzionali con caratteristiche morfologiche e linguistiche', 'kk': 'Көптеген тілді толық сөздер идентификациясы: Морфологиялық және лингвистикалық мүмкіндіктермен көптеген нейралық желілер', 'lt': 'Multilingual Complex Word Identification: Convolutional Neural Networks with Morphological and Linguistic Features', 'mk': 'Мултијазична комплексна идентификација на зборови: Конволуционални неврални мрежи со морфолошки и лингвистички карактеристики', 'ms': 'Pengenalan Kata Kompleks Berbahasa: Rangkaian Neural Konveolutional dengan Ciri-ciri Morfologik dan Bahasa', 'mt': 'Identifikazzjoni Multilingwi tal-Kliem Kumplessi: Netwerks newrali konvoluzzjonali b’Karatteristiċi Morfoloġiċi u Lingwistiċi', 'mn': 'Ихэнх хэлний төвөгтэй үг тодорхойлолт: Морфологик болон хэлбэртэй сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээ', 'ml': 'പല ഭാഷകളുടെ കോമ്പ്ലെക്സ് വാക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയുക: മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കും ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്കും വിശേഷതകളുമായി കൊണ്ട', 'ro': 'Identificarea complexă multilingvă a cuvântului: Rețele neuronale convoluționale cu caracteristici morfologice și lingvistice', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczna złożona identyfikacja słów: Konwolucyjne sieci neuronowe z cechami morfologicznymi i językowymi', 'no': 'Fleirspråk kompleks ord- identifikasjon: Konvolusjonelle neiralnettverk med morfologiske og linguistiske funksjonar', 'sr': 'Većina jezičkih kompleksnih reči identifikacija: konvolucionalne neuronske mreže sa morfološkim i lingwiskim karakteristikama', 'so': 'Identification of word complex luqadaha badan: Convolution Neural Network with Morphological and Linguistic Features', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාව සම්පූර්ණ වචන පරීක්ෂණය: මොර්ෆෝලෝජික සහ ලින්ගුස්ටික් විශේෂතාවන් සමග සමග', 'sv': 'Flerspråkig komplex ordidentifiering: Konvulutionella neurala nätverk med morfologiska och språkliga funktioner', 'ta': 'பல மொழி குறிப்பு வார்த்தை அடையாளம்:', 'ur': 'Multilingual Complex Word Identification: Convolutional Neural Networks with Morphological and Linguistic Features', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'đa ngôn ngữ phức tạp nhận diện từ: Gắn kết thần kinh với các yếu tố Morpheus và ngôn ngữ', 'nl': 'Meertalige complexe woordidentificatie: convolutionele neurale netwerken met morfologische en taalkundige kenmerken', 'da': 'Flersproget kompleks ordidentifikation: Konvolutionelle neurale netværk med morfologiske og sproglige funktioner', 'bg': 'Многоезична сложна дума идентификация: конвелуционни неврални мрежи с морфологични и лингвистични характеристики', 'hr': 'Identifikacija višejezičkih kompleksnih riječi: konvolucionalne neuronske mreže sa morfološkim i lingwiskim karakteristikama', 'de': 'Mehrsprachige komplexe Worterkennung: Convolutional Neuronal Networks mit morphologischen und linguistischen Merkmalen', 'id': 'Identifikasi Kata Kompleks Berbahasa: Rangkaian Neural Konvelusional dengan Karakteristik Morfologi dan Linguistik', 'ko': '다국어 복합어 식별: 형태와 언어 특징을 가진 권적 신경 네트워크', 'sw': 'Utambulisho wa neno la lugha nyingi: Mtandao wa Neural yenye Tamko za Kimorphological and Linguistic', 'fa': 'شناسایی کلمه متفاوت زبان: شبکه\u200cهای عصبی متفاوتی با ویژه\u200cهای مورفولوژیک و لینگیستیک', 'tr': 'Çoklu dilli Komplik Kelime Kimliği: Çapriy Nöral Ağları Morphological ve Linguistic Özellikleri ile', 'sq': 'Identifikimi shumëgjuhës i fjalëve komplekse: rrjetet nervore konvolutive me funksione morfologjike dhe gjuhësore', 'af': 'Multilingual Kompleksie Woord Identifikasie: Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerke met Morfologiese en Linguistiese Funksies', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Բազլեզու բարդ բառերի հայտնաբերումը. Մորֆոլոգիական և լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկություններով հակադարձ նեյրոնային ցանցեր', 'bn': 'বহুভাষী কমপ্লেক্স শব্দ পরিচয়: মরোফোলজিক্যাল এবং লিঙ্গিস্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী নেটওয়ার্ক সহযোগিতা', 'bs': 'Identifikacija višejezičkih kompleksnih riječi: konvolucionalne neuronske mreže sa morfološkim i lingwiskim karakteristikama', 'ca': 'Identificació de paraules complexes multilingües: Redes neuronals convolucionals amb característiques morfològiques i lingüístiques', 'cs': 'Vícejazyčná slovní identifikace: Convoluční neuronové sítě s morfologickými a lingvistickými vlastnostmi', 'az': 'Çoxlu dil Komplex Kelimi Kimlik: Morphological və Linguistic Features ilə Convolutional Neural Networks', 'et': 'Mitmekeelne kompleksne sõna identifitseerimine: konvolutsioonilised neuraalsed võrgustikud morfoloogiliste ja keeleliste omadustega', 'fi': 'Monikielinen monimutkainen sanatunnistus: konvolutionaaliset hermoverkot, joilla on morfologisia ja kielellisiä ominaisuuksia', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'זיהוי מילים מורכבות רבות שפתיים: רשתות נוירוליות משתנות עם תכונות מורפולוגיות ולנגליות', 'sk': 'Večjezična kompleksna identifikacija besed: konvolucijska živčna mreža z morfološkimi in jezikovnimi značilnostmi', 'jv': 'Multi-languang kompleh Kelangansi Kemerdekaan: Kemerdekaan Neral Network karo Marphologi karo Linguistik Kemerdekaan', 'bo': 'Multilingual Complex Word Identification: Convolutional Neural Networks with Morphological and Linguistic Features'}
{'en': 'The paper is about our experiments with Complex Word Identification system using deep learning approach with word embeddings and engineered features.', 'ar': 'تدور الورقة حول تجاربنا مع نظام تحديد الكلمات المعقدة باستخدام نهج التعلم العميق مع تضمين الكلمات والميزات الهندسية.', 'es': 'El artículo trata sobre nuestros experimentos con el sistema de identificación de palabras complejas utilizando un enfoque de aprendizaje profundo con incrustaciones de palabras y funciones diseñadas.', 'pt': 'O artigo é sobre nossos experimentos com o sistema de identificação de palavras complexas usando uma abordagem de aprendizado profundo com incorporação de palavras e recursos de engenharia.', 'fr': "L'article traite de nos expériences avec un système d'identification de mots complexes utilisant une approche d'apprentissage profond avec des intégrations de mots et des fonctionnalités techniques.", 'ja': 'この論文は、単語埋め込みと工学的特徴を使用したディープラーニングアプローチを使用した複雑な単語識別システムの実験について説明しています。', 'zh': '本文者,吾等用词嵌工深度学法杂单词识别系统之实验也。', 'hi': 'पेपर जटिल शब्द पहचान प्रणाली के साथ हमारे प्रयोगों के बारे में है जो शब्द एम्बेडिंग और इंजीनियर सुविधाओं के साथ गहरी सीखने के दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग कर रहा है।', 'ru': 'Статья о наших экспериментах с комплексной системой идентификации слов с использованием подхода глубокого обучения с вложениями слов и инженерными особенностями.', 'ga': 'Baineann an páipéar lenár dturgnaimh le córas Coimpléasc Aitheantais Focal ag baint úsáide as cur chuige foghlama domhain le leabaithe focal agus gnéithe innealtóireachta.', 'ka': 'ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტებზე კომპლექსი სიტყვების იდენტიფიკაციის სისტემა გამოყენებული ძალიან სწავლების მიზეზით სიტყვების შესაბამისა და ინექინერ', 'hu': 'A tanulmány a komplex szóazonosító rendszerrel végzett kísérleteinkről szól, mélytanulási megközelítést alkalmazva szóbeágyazásokkal és tervezett funkciókkal.', 'el': 'Η εργασία αφορά τα πειράματά μας με το σύνθετο σύστημα αναγνώρισης λέξεων χρησιμοποιώντας προσέγγιση βαθιάς μάθησης με ενσωμάτωση λέξεων και μηχανικά χαρακτηριστικά.', 'it': "L'articolo riguarda i nostri esperimenti con il sistema di identificazione delle parole complesso utilizzando un approccio di deep learning con incorporazioni di parole e funzionalità ingegnerizzate.", 'mk': 'Документот е за нашите експерименти со системот за идентификација на комплексни зборови користејќи пристап на длабоко учење со зборови вградени и инженерски карактеристики.', 'lt': 'Dokumente kalbama apie mūsų eksperimentus su kompleksine žodžių identifikavimo sistema, taikant gilaus mokymosi metodą su žodžių įterpimu ir inžinerijomis.', 'kk': 'Қағаз біздің комплекс сөзді идентификациялау жүйесіміз және сөзді ендіру мен инженерлік мүмкіндіктеріміздің тәжірибесін қолданады.', 'ms': 'The paper is about our experiments with Complex Word Identification system using deep learning approach with word embeddings and engineered features.', 'ml': 'പേപ്പറിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കുറിച്ചാണ് കമ്പ്ലെക്സ് വാക്ക് വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്തേക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളും എഞ്ചിനീയറ്റിയ വിവ', 'mt': 'Id-dokument huwa dwar l-esperimenti tagħna bis-sistema ta’ Identifikazzjoni tal-Kliem Kumplessi bl-użu ta’ approċċ ta’ tagħlim profond b’inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem u karatteristiċi inġinerizzati.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бол бидний "Complex Word Identification System" гэсэн туршилтуудын тухай, гүн гүнзгий суралцах арга баримтууд болон инженерчлэлтэй байрлалын тухай.', 'no': 'Papiret er om eksperimentene våre med kompleks ordidentifikasjonssystem med dyp læringstilnærming med ordinnbygging og ingeniørte funksjonar.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono nasze eksperymenty z systemem kompleksowej identyfikacji słów z wykorzystaniem podejścia głębokiego uczenia z osadzeniami słów i funkcjami inżynieryjnymi.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea este despre experimentele noastre cu sistemul complex de identificare a cuvintelor utilizând abordarea de învățare profundă cu încorporarea cuvintelor și caracteristici ingineriate.', 'sr': 'Novinar je o našim eksperimentima sa kompleksnim reèima identifikacijskim sistemom koristeći duboki pristup učenja sa reèima integriranim i inženjerskim karakteristikama.', 'si': 'පැත්තේ තමයි අපේ පරීක්ෂණය ගැන සම්පූර්ණ වචන පද්ධතිය සඳහා ගොඩක් ඉගෙනීම් වචන සහ ඉංජිනියාර්තා වි', 'so': 'Qoraalka waxaa ku saabsan imtixaankayada ku qoran nidaamka aqoonsiga ee Complex erayga, isagoo isticmaalaya qaabab aad u dheer waxbarashada oo ku qoran hadalka iyo waxyaabaha lagu qoray.', 'sv': 'Uppsatsen handlar om våra experiment med komplexa ordidentifieringssystem med djupinlärningsmetoder med ordinbäddningar och tekniska funktioner.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தின் சொல்லுப் பொருட்கள் மற்றும் பொறியிடப்பட்ட குணங்களை பயன்படுத்தி ஆழமான கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் முறைமைய', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہمارے آزمائش کے بارے میں ہے کہ کلمز کلمز کی شناسایی سیسٹم کے ذریعہ کلمز کے مطابق سیکھنے کی طرح کلمز ایمبڈینگ اور انجینر کی ویژگی کے مطابق۔', 'uz': "Qogʻoz bizning kompleks Word Tasdiqlash tizimi bilan o'rganish muvaffaqiyatlarimiz haqida, so'z ichki o'rganish muvaffaqiyatli va muhandiya imkoniyatlari bilan o'rganish imtiyozlarimiz haqida.", 'vi': 'Bài báo về thí nghiệm của chúng ta với hệ thống nhận dạng từ phức tạp sử dụng phương pháp học sâu rộng với sự nhúng vào từ và các tính năng kỹ thuật.', 'bg': 'Статията е за нашите експерименти със сложна система за идентификация на думи, използваща подход за дълбоко обучение с вграждане на думи и инженерни функции.', 'nl': 'Het artikel gaat over onze experimenten met Complex Word Identification systeem met behulp van deep learning benadering met woord embeddings en engineered features.', 'da': 'Opgaven handler om vores eksperimenter med kompleks ordidentifikationssystem ved hjælp af dyb læring tilgang med ordindlejringer og konstruerede funktioner.', 'hr': 'Novinar je o našim eksperimentima sa kompleksnim rečnim identifikacijskim sustavom koristeći duboki pristup učenja sa uključenim riječima i inženjerskim karakteristikama.', 'ko': '이 논문은 우리가 복잡한 단어 식별 시스템에서 단어 삽입과 공학 특징을 사용하는 깊이 있는 학습 방법에 대한 실험이다.', 'de': 'Der Beitrag befasst sich mit unseren Experimenten mit komplexem Word Identification System mit Deep Learning Ansatz mit Wort Einbettungen und technischen Funktionen.', 'id': 'The paper is about our experiments with Complex Word Identification system using deep learning approach with word embeddings and engineered features.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ در مورد آزمایشات ما با سیستم شناسایی کلمات پیچیده با استفاده از طریق یادگیری عمیق با کلمات پیچیده و ویژه های مهندسی است.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hilo linahusu majaribio yetu yenye mfumo wa utambulisho wa maneno ya komplekx kwa kutumia mbinu za kujifunza za kina kwa maneno yanayoandikwa na vipengenezwa.', 'af': 'Die papier is oor ons eksperimente met Kompleks Woord Identifikasie stelsel met diep onderwerp toegang met woord inbêring en inbineerde funksies.', 'sq': 'Gazeta ka të bëjë me eksperimentet tona me sistemin e identifikimit të fjalëve komplekse duke përdorur metodën e mësimit të thellë me përfshirjet e fjalëve dhe karakteristikat e inxhinieruara.', 'am': 'የፕሬዝዳንት ቃላት የኮምፕሌክስል ቃላት ማውቀትን እና የግንኙነታችንን ጥልቅ ትምህርት ስርዓት በመጠቀም ነው፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz Complex Word Identifikasyon sistemasy bilen kelime integrasy we inženjerilýän çykyşlary bilen ullanýan deneylerimiz barada.', 'hy': 'Թղթի մասին են մեր փորձերը բարդ բառերի հայտնաբերման համակարգի հետ, օգտագործելով խորը ուսումնասիրության մոտեցում բառերի ներդրման և ճարտարագիտական հատկությունների հետ:', 'az': 'Kaƒüƒ±t bizim Complex Word Identification sistemimizl…ô birlikd…ô t…ôcr√ºb…ôl…ôrimiz bar…ôsind…ôdir.', 'bs': 'Novinar je o našim eksperimentima sa kompleksnim rečnim identifikacijskim sistemom koristeći duboki pristup učenja sa riječima integriranim i inženjerskim karakteristikama.', 'bn': 'The paper is about our experiments with Complex Word Identification system using deep learning approach with word embeddings and engineered features.', 'ca': "El paper tracta dels nostres experiments amb el sistema d'identificació de paraules complexes utilitzant un enfocament d'aprenentatge profund amb integració de paraules i característiques enginyeries.", 'cs': 'Příspěvek se zabývá našimi experimenty se systémem komplexní identifikace slov využívajícím přístup hlubokého učení s vložením slov a technickými funkcemi.', 'et': 'Artikkel käsitleb meie eksperimente keerulise sõnade identifitseerimise süsteemiga, kasutades sügavõppe lähenemisviisi koos sõnade manustamise ja projekteeritud funktsioonidega.', 'fi': 'Artikkeli kertoo kokemuksistamme Complex Word Identification -järjestelmällä, jossa käytetään syväoppimista sanaupotusten ja suunniteltujen ominaisuuksien avulla.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé kuwi karo perintah sing gagalé karo sistem ID Kompliks Word nggambar nggambar tarjamahan karo pergambar embedding lan jinejer', 'he': 'העיתון הוא על הניסויים שלנו עם מערכת זיהוי מילים מורכבת בשימוש גישה למידה עמוקה עם מילים מעורבות והתכונות הנדסה.', 'sk': 'Prispevek govori o naših eksperimentih s sistemom kompleksne identifikacije besed z uporabo pristopa globokega učenja z vdelavami besed in inženirskimi funkcijami.', 'ha': 'Kayan takarda yana tambayar jarrabõyinmu da tsarin AFAI na Complex, idan an yi amfani da matsayin da zane-zane da masu cikin tsari da aka samar da.', 'bo': 'The paper is about our experiments with Complex Word Identification system using deep learning approach with word embeddings and engineered features.'}
